(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“...that much Watch the full interview above...”
“...standing right there He continued by saying that he feels very conflicted about the situation It s not their fault he said but at the same time they should probably learn that if they like a movie or song the person that made that probably doesn t like their dad...”
“I couldn t stop Rogen added and I said Furthermore I hate what you re doing to the country at this moment and I count the days till you no longer have one iota of the power that you currently have And I look over and his kids are still...”
“'” With Ryan’s kids still present, Rogen said, “No way, man!” and went to admonish him for the Trump administration’s actions.”
““He came over and grabbed my hand and I’m just shaking his hand, I don’t know what to do, and he said, ‘Can I have a picture with you?”
““Then they said, ‘Our dad wants to meet you,’ and I turned around and Paul Ryan was walking towards me,” Rogen said.”
“While there, he was approached by two “very nice,” “very white” young men who asked for a photo.”
“Rogen recounted the story Friday while on “The Late Show with Stephen Colbert.” The “Preacher” co-creator, as a longtime proponent and advocate for Alzheimer’s research, had been asked to speak about brain health at Mitt Romney’s annual summit.”
“And evidently, that displeasure extends to denying photo ops to Republican Speaker of the House, Paul Ryan.”
“Like most of Hollywood, Seth Rogen has made his displeasure with the current administration and its activities clear.”


“… Look at the full interview above... "
“… Standing there, he continued, he felt very contradictory about the situation, which is not their fault, he said, but at the same time, they probably should understand that if they like a movie or song, people make it possible that they don't like their father... "
"I can't stop Logan from adding, I also said, I hate what you're doing to this country now, I count the days until you no longer have a little bit of the power you have now, and I look at his children and still..."
"Ryan's kids are still here, and rogen said," no, man! "And admonish him about the actions of the trump administration."
"He came up and grabbed my hand. I was just shaking hands with him. I don't know what to do," he said. "Can I take a picture with you?"
"Then they said, 'our dad wants to see you,' and I turned around and Paul Ryan came up to me," Logan said
"When he was there, two" very good "and" very white "young people asked him for a group photo."
Logan told the story Friday on "Stephen Colbert's evening show.". The co-author of missionaries, a longtime supporter and advocate of Alzheimer's research, was asked to talk about brain health at Mitt Romney's annual summit
"Obviously, this discontent extends to refusing Republican House Speaker Paul Ryan to take photos."
"Like most people in Hollywood, Seth Logan has clearly expressed his dissatisfaction with this administration and its activities."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They really gave it another solid try.”Despite things not working out for Affleck and Shookus, the insider added the pair “will always have love for each other.”Scroll down to see the timeline of Affleck and Shookus’ relationship.”
“...to part ways...”
“She has a kid and an ex husband and a job in New York and Ben has his family and a job in L A and while they love and respect each other they just realized it wasn t going to work an insider explained to Us of their decision...”
“After briefly rekindling their romance in February 2019, multiple sources confirmed to Us Weekly that the two split for a second time in April.”
“The pair went public with their romance in July 2017, but they called it quits in August 2018.”
“The actor found love with the Saturday Night Live producer after his 2015 split from estranged wife Jennifer Garner.”
“It’s over for Ben Affleck and Lindsay Shookus.”


"They really made another solid attempt." Although the relationship between Affleck and shokus did not go well, the insider added that the two "will always be in love." Scroll down to see the timeline of the relationship between Affleck and shokus
“… Go our separate ways... "
"She has a child and an ex husband. She has a job in New York. Ben has his family and a job in Los Angeles. Although they love and respect each other, they realize that it won't work. An insider explained their decision to us..."
"After a brief rekindling in February 2019, a number of sources confirmed to us weekly that the two broke up for the second time in April."
"The two had a public relationship in July 2017, but announced their separation in August 2018."
"The actor found love with the producer of Saturday night live after breaking up with his separated wife, Jennifer Garner, in 2015."
"Ben Affleck and Lindsay schokus are over."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I really like it.””
“It’s a good season.”
“The Atlanta star has welcomed his second child, a boy, with his girlfriend Michelle, Us Weekly confirms.”
““I sleep four hours a night!”
“I mean I don’t dream as much, I just miss dreaming!” Glover told Us about balancing his career and being a father on Friday, January 5, at the Television Critics Association Winter Press Tour.”
“Glover also told Us that his life hasn’t changed a ton since welcoming his second son.”
““It hasn’t.”
“My partner, she does all the hard stuff to be honest.”
“I haven’t really had to change anything.”
“It’s given me another perception of what life is.”


"I really like it."
"It's a good season."
The Atlanta star and his girlfriend Michelle are expecting their second child, a boy, US weekly confirmed
"I sleep four hours a night!"
"I mean I don't dream so much, I just miss dreaming! "On Friday, January 5, at the TV Review Association winter reporter tour, Glover told us how to balance his career with being a father."
"Glover also told us that his life has not changed at all since he welcomed his second son."
"No
"My partner, she did all the hard things, to be honest."
"I really don't need to change anything."
"It gives me a different understanding of life."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Congratulations!”
“Frazer Harrison / Getty ImagesThe addition of baby Raynor makes a loving family of four!”
“The former "Party of Five" actress, 44, and her longtime boyfriend, actor JJ Feild, 40, adopted a beautiful baby boy five months ago, the star revealed Friday on Instagram.”
““Sheer joy!!!”
“!” Campbell labeled her sweet family photo, which she wrote was taken moments after the adoption became official on Thursday.”
“The pic captures mom Campbell, dad Feild and now older brother Caspian all pushing a baby stroller down a rainy city sidewalk.”
““His name is Raynor and we are madly in love with him,” Campbell gushed.”
“Actors Neve Campbell and JJ Feild are now parents of two!”
“Campbell and Feild, who became a pair in 2012, share 5-year-old son Caspian and, according to Campbell’s post, the old brother is infatuated with his soon-to-be partner in crime.”
“...future ahead...”


"Congratulations
"Fraser Harrison / Getty picture baby Renault's joining makes a family of four full of love!"
The 44 year old former "party for five" actress and 40 year old boyfriend JJ feild adopted a beautiful baby boy five months ago
"Pure happiness!"
"! Campbell tagged her sweet family photo, which she wrote was taken shortly after the official adoption on Thursday
This photo shows mother Campbell, father feld and now Brother Caspian pushing a pram on the sidewalk of the city in the rain
Campbell gushed: "his name is Reina, and we are madly in love with him."
Actors neve Campbell and JJ feild are now parents of two children! "
"Campbell and feld got married in 2012. They have a five-year-old son, Caspian. According to Campbell's post, the elder brother is infatuated with his partner who is going to be a criminal partner."
“… The future... "



**Something goes wrong**
““Demi wasn’t doing well over the weekend,” a source told PEOPLE on July 30.”
“Although the singer was initially on the mend after arriving at the hospital, within days she faced another health scare.”
“Her sobriety over the last six years was a fight every single day,” says the friend.”
““Demi never wanted to be a role model.”
“She hasn’t been in a good place.”A longtime friend told PEOPLE exclusively that Lovato had begun to buckle under the pressure to stay clean.”
“She and her team severed ties, and they played a large part in getting her sober years ago.”
“Then, just two days before her hospitalization, the singer forgot the words to her relapse-inspired ballad “Sober” at a California concert, telling the audience: “F–k, I forgot the lyrics.”A separate source close to the situation told PEOPLE: “Things have been a total mess for months.”
“...in the morning on July 15”
“She has still very much kept up her work schedule and daily life but there have definitely been signs that she isn t doing great with her sobriety Indeed Lovato sparked questions regarding her sobriety and romance rumors when she was spotted leaving a club with pal G Eazy early...”
““You could tell when Demi was doing well with her sobriety because she wasn’t hanging out at clubs,” a source tells PEOPLE of Lovato’s recent activities.”


On July 30, a source told people magazine: "Demi didn't do well at the weekend."
Although the singer was getting better when she first arrived at the hospital, she was facing another health crisis in a few days
"For the past six years, she's been fighting every day," the friend said
"Demi never wanted to be a role model."
An old friend told people that Lovato began to give in under the pressure of keeping clean
"She was cut off from her team, who played a big part in waking her up years ago."
Then, just two days before she was hospitalized, the singer forgot the lyrics of her relapsed folk song sober at a concert in California. She told the audience, "OK, I forgot the lyrics." "For months, everything has been a mess," another person familiar with the matter told people
"The morning of July 15"
"She's still very committed to her work schedule and daily life, but there are clear signs that she's not doing well in her lucidity. In fact, when Lovato was found leaving the club early with her friend g eazy, she raised questions about her sober and romantic rumors... "
"You can see when Demi is awake well because she's not hanging out at the club," one source told people about the recent event



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the gallery to see Drew’s complete dating history!”
“MORE: Katie Holmes and Boyfriend Jamie Foxx Ready to Wed After Four Years of DatingPrior to tying the knot with Will, Drew was hitched to Jeremy Thomas from 1994 to 1995 and to Tom Green from 2001 until 2002.”
“...is just I think what s making everything feel safe for my kids Drew added...”
“And you know it really is about the tone you set and you can talk until you re blue in the face but kids watch what you do every single day of your life all day long and that behavior and that example and that love and community and honesty...”
“She continued, "I so wanted to raise kids in this ultra-traditional way and do everything so the polar opposite of my experience."”
“In a recent interview on The Ellen DeGeneres Show, Drew opened up about her split from Will — and called the painful experience her "worst nightmare."”
“MORE: Drew Barrymore Flaunts Her 20-Pound Weight Loss on the Red Carpet — See the New Pics!”
“The former couple — who tied the knot in June 2012 — are parents to two daughters, Olive, 4, and Frankie, 3, together.”
“The businessman is the Santa Clarita Diet star's first rumored boyfriend since she split with her third husband, Will, in April 2016 after four years of marriage.”
“Though Drew has not yet been photographed with her latest beau, she did tag David as the photographer of her most recent Instagram pic, hinting the two may really be an item!”


"Go to the gallery and see drew's complete dating history!"
"More: Katie Holmes and her boyfriend Jamie fox are getting married after four years of dating. Before marrying will, drew married Jeremy Thomas from 1994 to 1995 and Tom Green from 2001 to 2002."
"It's just that I think it's something that makes my kids feel safe," drew added
"And you know it's really about the tone you set, you can keep saying it until you turn blue, but the kids watch you all day, what you do every day, your behavior, your example, your love, your community and honesty..."
She went on, "I really want to raise my children in this extremely traditional way, and doing anything is the opposite of my experience."
In a recent interview on the Ellen DeGeneres Show, drew disclosed her breakup with will, saying the painful experience was her "most terrible nightmare."
More: Drew Barrymore shows off her 20 pound weight loss on the red carpet - look at the new picture
"The former couple married in June 2012 and are the parents of two daughters, Oliver, 4, and Frankie, 3."
"The businessman is Santa Clarita's first rumored boyfriend since she broke up in April 2016 after four years of marriage to her third husband will."
"Although drew hasn't taken a picture with her latest boyfriend, she does list David as the photographer for her latest instagram photo, suggesting that they may really be a project!"



**Something goes wrong**
““They’re amazing parents and their loved ones are thrilled for them.”In November, Levine divulged to Ellen DeGeneres that the couple’s little one on the way would be another daughter — but may not be their last child.”
““Adam and Behati are so happy to be adding another baby to their family,” a source told PEOPLE at the time.”
““ROUND 2 … ” the pregnant star captioned the photo of herself in a bikini, showing off her growing baby bump.”
“Already mom to 15-month-old Dusty Rose, Prinsloo announced she and her Maroon 5 rocker husband would welcome their second child with a mirror selfie in September, just ahead of Dusty’s 1st birthday.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“” ‘Tis the season,” the second-time mom-to-be, 28, captioned the moment, moving the camera around to show her stomach from different angles.”
“In the clip, Prinsloo bares her baby bump in a black bra and colorfully patterned pants, using a filter giving her a cute pink bob that appears to be blowing in the breeze.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Victoria’s Secret Angel — who is currently expecting her second daughter with husband Adam Levine — shared a fun new video to Instagram Tuesday, featuring her growing belly.”


"They are great parents and their loved ones are excited for them." In November, Levin revealed to Ellen DeGeneres that the couple's youngest daughter would be another, but probably not their last
"Adam and behati are very happy to have another child for their family," a source told people at the time
"The second round..." The pregnant star wrote in the title of the photo that she was wearing a bikini and showed her growing lump
"Already the mother of 15 month old dusty Ross, princlow announced that she and her chestnut 5 husband would take a self portrait in September, the eve of dusty's first birthday, to welcome their second child."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"It's a season," the 28 year old mother to be wrote for the second time, moving the camera to show her stomach from different angles
In this video, prinslow is wearing a black bra and colorful pants, giving her a lovely pink Bob, which looks like blowing in the breeze
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Victoria's Secret Angel, who is currently pregnant with her husband Adam Levine with a second daughter, shared an interesting new video on instagram on Tuesday showing her growing belly."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The full entry read: 'When the p***y good but your family don't like her so you drop your family and become an orphan.'”
“'They both have discussed moving in with each other.”
“'She is helping with the decorating and the new pieces in the home.”
“She is his queen.”
“Moving on up: It was reported earlier this week that the 28-year-old has bought a $2.3m home in CalabasasThe insider explained: 'Rob is letting her take control of whatever she wants.”
“Despite their generally short time together, the youngest Kardashian sibling appears to be fully trusting of the Lashed beauty salon owner as he is letting her control the reins when it comes to the decor of the new property.”
“No doubt that is a big move as the two have yet to even hit the two month mark of officially dating.”
“They feel this is a fresh house and a fresh start for them.'”
“She pretty much will be living there once it is up and running.”
“This all comes at an interesting time for the former star of Keeping Up With The Kardashians as he posted an eyebrow-raising message on his Instagram Tuesday evening.”


"The complete entry says:" when your parents are good, but your family doesn't like her, so you give up your family and become an orphan. "
"They both talked about moving in."
"She's helping to decorate the new furniture in the house."
"She is his queen."
"Move on: earlier this week, it was reported that rob, 28, had bought a $2.3 million home in calabasast. "Rob let her control everything she wanted," the person explained
"Although their time together is usually very short, the youngest Kardashian brothers and sisters seem to have full confidence in the flogged beauty salon owner because he let her take charge of the decoration of the new hotel."
"There's no doubt it's a big move, because they haven't even reached the two month mark of a formal date."
"They think it's a new house and a new start for them."
"Once it's up and running, she basically lives there."
"It all happened at an interesting time when the former Kardashian star posted a stunning message on instagram on Tuesday night."



**Something goes wrong**
“...you want to popularity on Instagram, then you can buy Instagram followers from us at low price.”
“She is joined to WWE under the ring name Brie Bella and performs as an diplomat for the company.”
“She is buying real Instagram followers from us and become popular on Instagram.”
“...you want to popular on Instagram, then you can buy Instagram followers from us.”
“Nikki Bella is so not a bridezilla.”I’ve really been beautiful bad about wedding planning right now,” She told E!”
“News last night at the NBC Universal Cable Holiday Party in Hollywood She s gangerous at it Brie Bella ragged her twin I m not horrible Nikki insisted The girl who wanted to get married so bad for years like we all had to see on Total Divas and Total...”
“Bellas you finally get proposed to and it s like all you care about is finding your dress and now that you found your dress it s like nothing else matters Brie joked Dancing With the Stars took up a lot of time of mine so that was the reason...”
“...why John Cena s other half explained...”
““So we have our date, we’re trying to lock down a location, I do have the dress.”
“I m nearly there Watch our interview with Nikki and Brie for more ladle about this season of Total Divas Brie s baby Birdie and Nikki s shocking Dancing With the Stars elimination Brie Bella Short biography Brianna Monique Danielson was born on November 21 1983 in San Diego California...”


“…… If you want to be popular on instagram, you can buy instagram followers from us at a low price. "
"She joined WWE in the name of brebella and worked as a diplomat for the company."
"She's buying real instagram fans from us and is very popular on instagram."
“… If you want to be popular on instagram, you can buy instagram followers from us. "
"Niki Bella is not a bride," she told e
"Last night's news at NBC global cable holiday party in Hollywood, she's very dangerous. Bribella broke her twins. I'm not afraid. Nicky insisted that the girl who wanted to get married for so many years, just like we all had to see on total divas and total..."
"Bellas, you've finally been proposed. All you care about is finding your skirt. Now that you find your skirt, it doesn't matter. Bree joked that dancing with the stars takes up a lot of my time, so that's why..."
“… Why does the other half of John seiner explain that... "
"So we have a date, we want to lock in a place, and I do have this dress."
"I'm almost there. Watch our interview with Nikki and Brie to learn more about this season's total divas brie's birds and Nikki's stunning dance with the stars elimination competition brie Bella. Brianna Monique Danielson was born in San Diego, California on November 21, 1983..."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Mindy Kaling Recalls Her Baby Daughter's Perfect Reaction to Meeting Oprah WinfreyOprah Winfrey Reveals Her Dress for Royal Wedding Was Made the Night BeforeOprah Winfrey Arrives at Royal Wedding in Fabulous Pink Look...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The video was aired on CBS News.”
“Oprah's best friend, Gayle King, and museum director Lonnie Bunch accompanied her on the tour of “Watching Oprah: The Oprah Winfrey Show and American Culture," which includes videos from the start of her career, personal mementos and more.”
“But it was a note from a fan in the guest book that brought the 64-year-old media mogul to tears.”
“"Oprah Winfrey is the reason I love myself so fiercely and know that my voice matters," the message reads.”
“When Bunch thanks Oprah for her tireless work throughout the tears, she continues to get emotional, covering her face as she cries.”
“"Thank you for this," Oprah said simply, as she hugged both Bunch and King.”
“CBS NewsCBS NewsOprah's exhibit also includes the red dress she wore in the iconic Oprah Winfrey Show episode when she surprised the entire audience with a new car.”
“"I wanted a color that would match the bows on the car," she recalled.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Mindy Kaling recalled her little daughter's perfect reaction when she met Oprah Winfrey yopra. Winfrey revealed that her dress for the royal wedding was made the night before Oprah Winfrey attended the royal wedding, wearing a beautiful pink dress... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The video was broadcast on CBS News."
"Oprah's best friend Gayle king and museum director Lonnie bunch accompanied her on a tour of" watching Oprah: Oprah Winfrey Show and American culture ", including videos and personal souvenirs from the beginning of her career."
"But it was a message from a fan in the guest book that brought tears to the eyes of the 64 year old media tycoon."
"Oprah Winfrey is the reason why I love myself so much, and I know that my voice matters," the message said
"When Bonzi thanks Oprah for her tireless work in tears, she continues to be emotional, crying and covering her face."
"Thank you," Oprah said simply, embracing bunch and Kim at the same time
"CBS newscbs news Oprah's show also includes the red dress she wore on the iconic Oprah talk show, when she surprised everyone with a new car."
"I wanted a color to match the bow on the car," she recalled



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In 1971, Coca-Cola’s iconic "I’d Like to Teach the World to Sing," advertisement rode the wave of flower-power protest that had emerged in opposition to the Vietnam War.”
“Pepsi is not the first multinational brand to attempt to use counterculture and protest movements to sell its product.”
“Jenner reaches the remarkably calm front-line of the protest.”
“Then comes the ad's climax — and perhaps the part that has caused most uproar.”
“Jenner fist-bumps one of her recently adopted activists, before grabbing a can of Pepsi from a well-stocked ice-bucket.”
“...pic.twitter.com/lVb8hA7Feo — malibu nova (@theBrittdoll) April 5, 2017In Pepsi's version, no one seems too worked up about anything.”
“"They ain't have no more damn Pepsi at the store!"”
“The beaming, break-dancing protesters are a far cry from the often fractious demonstrations that have broken out across the United States over the past few years.”
“She rips off her blonde wig, wipes away her lipstick and joins the marchers.”
“But Jenner decides to join them anyway, beckoned into the throng by a handsome man with a cello.”


In 1971, Coca Cola's trademark advertisement "I want to teach the world to sing" set off a wave of flower right protests against the Vietnam War
"Pepsi Cola is not the first multinational brand to try to use anti culture and protest movements to sell its products."
"Jenner arrived at a very quiet front of protest."
"Then there's the climax of Advertising - maybe the part that caused the uproar."
Before grabbing a can of Pepsi from a well stocked ice bucket, Jenna bumps into an activist she recently adopted
“... pic.twitter.com/lVb8hA7Feo -Malibu Nova (@ the brittdoll) April 5, 2017 in the version of Pepsi Cola, it seems that no one is too excited about anything
"There's no more damn Pepsi in their shop!"
"The jubilant, break dancing protestors are very different from the often violent demonstrations that have erupted across the United States in the past few years."
"She pulled off her blond wig, wiped her lipstick and joined the procession."
"But Jenna decided to join them, and a handsome guy waved to the crowd with a cello."



**Something goes wrong**
“”Game of Thrones” Season 7 premieres July 16 on HBO.”
“We’re pretty sure it’s the same knife because, as Littlefinger (Aidan Gillen) says in the HBO show, there’s only one like it in all the Seven Kingdoms.”
“We’ve seen them endure unspeakable hardships, such as weddings.”
“Now, Entertainment Weekly has reunited the remaining Starks in a photo shoot ― the Final Four, if you will ― so you know a party is coming.”
“The photos of Sansa (Sophie Turner), Bran (Isaac Hempstead Wright), Jon Snow (Kit Harington) and Arya (Maisie Williams) may reveal another, more subtle reunion going on, too.”
“One tiny detail seems to further support information about the upcoming Season 7 from a rumored leaker:See anything funny?”
“Can’t quite put your “little” finger on it?”
“Look again at Arya.”
“The young assassin is apparently brandishing a new blade at her hip, and it may be a blade we’ve seen before.”
“Following the release of the images, Redditors noticed that Arya seems to be carrying Littlefinger’s Valyrian steel dagger.”


The game of Thrones premiered on July 16 at HBO
"We're pretty sure it's the same knife, because as littfinger (Aidan Gillen) said on HBO, in all seven kingdoms, only one knife is like this."
"We've seen them endure unspeakable hardships, like weddings."
"Now Entertainment Weekly brings the rest of the stars back together for a group photo - the top four, if you like - so you know the party is coming."
"The photos of Sansa (Sophie Turner), bran (ISAAC Hempstead Wright), Jon Snow (kit Harrington) and Aya (Macy Williams) may also reveal a more subtle reunion."
"A small detail seems to further support the rumored information about the upcoming season 7. Leaker: see what? Interesting?"
"Can't you put your little finger on it?"
"Look at Aya again."
"The young assassin is obviously waving a new knife on her hip, which may be one we've seen before."
"After the photos were released, redito noticed that Arya seemed to be carrying litfinger's valerian Steel Dagger."



**Something goes wrong**
“The 2018 Oscars will take place on March 4.”
“Most of the nominees are also nominated for Oscars.”
“Timothe Chalamet...”
“2018 BAFTA Film Awards Red Carpet Arrivals Nominated stars for the 2018 BAFTAs include Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri s Frances McDormand I Tonya s Margot Robbie Lady Bird s Saoirse Ronan Get Out s Daniel Kaluuya Phantom Thread s Daniel Day Lewis and Call Me by Your Name s...”
“Celebrity attendees included Angelina Jolie, Jennifer Lawrence, Game of Thrones alum Natalie Dormer, Chiwetel Ejiofor, Naomie Harris, Salma Hayek and Sir Patrick Stewart.”
“Prince William wore a black tux.”
“Middleton walked the red carpet in a flowing forest green empire waist gown with a long train and black sash, paired with diamond and emerald earrings and a matching necklace and a black clutch.”
“The two have also attended the BAFTA film awards last year.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge, who is expecting their third child and is in the third trimester of her pregnancy, and the Duke of Cambridge joined scores of celebrities at the annual event, which took place at the Royal Albert Hall in London on Sunday.”
“The 2018 BAFTA Film Awards, or BAFTAs, once again became a royal affair with the presence of special guests Duchess of Cambridge Kate Middleton and Prince William.”


"The 2018 Academy Awards ceremony will be held on March 4."
"Most of the nominees are also nominated for Oscars."
"Timothy calemi..."
"The 2018 Academy of Motion Picture Arts Film Awards Red Carpet awards 2018 Academy of Motion Picture Arts nominated stars include three billboards outside the ebb of Missouri s Francis McDonalds I Tonya s Margot Robby Ms. bird s Saori Ronan get off s Daniel carroya phantom line s Daniel Day Lewis call me your name s..."
"Celebrity attendees include Angelina Jolie, Jennifer Lawrence, game of Thrones alumni Natalie domer, chivette egioff, Naomi Harris, Salma Hayek and Sir Patrick Stewart."
"Prince William is wearing a black evening dress."
"Middleton walked up the red carpet in a flowing forest green Empire Dress with a black belt, diamond and emerald earrings, a matching necklace and a black clutch."
"They also took part in the British Academy of Film Awards last year."
The Duchess of Cambridge, who is pregnant with her third child and in her third trimester of pregnancy, joined the Duchess of Cambridge in the annual event at London's Royal Albert Hall on Sunday
"The BAFTA Film Awards in 2018 once again became a royal event. Duchess of Cambridge Kate Middleton and Prince William attended the special guests' event."



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“West Song Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code Restart RELATED CONTENT Kris Jenner Says Khloe Kardashian s Marriage to Lamar Odom Felt So Natural Watch Kris Jenner Addresses Kim Kardashian s Sex Tape and Cheating on Late Husband Rob Kardashian Watch Kim Kardashian North West and Kris Jenner in a Fendi Fashion Video Set to Kanye...”
“The 20-year-old reality star decided to continue one of momager Kris Jenner's traditions with her own 5-month-old daughter, Stormi.”
“During an interview with Fox's OBJECTified, Kris Jenner told Harvey Levin that she brought each of her six children home from the hospital in a different nightgown set.”
“Kylie was outfitted in a matching gown, blanket and bonnet after her birth in 1997.”
“After giving birth to Stormi in February, the youngest Jenner sister opted to reuse that very same nightgown set for her newborn daughter's journey home from the hospital.”
“"I gave all of her baby stuff to her when she got pregnant with Stormi and Stormi wore it home from the hospital," the 62-year-old Keeping Up With the Kardashians matriarch said.”
“This isn't the first time Kris has gushed about her family.”
“ET caught up with her in February, and she gushed over Kylie's ease into motherhood.”
“"I'm just really proud of her.”


"Related galleries of the Western Song Dynasty..."
"Embedded code restart related content Chris Jenner said that Chloe Kardashian's marriage with Lamar Odom feels so natural. Watch Chris Jenner's sex video of Kim Kardashian and his cheating on her late husband rob Kardashian. Watch Kim Kardashian's northwest and Chris Jenner's Kanye in Fundy's fashion video collection..."
"The 20-year-old reality star has decided to continue Chris Jenner's mother's tradition with her five month old daughter, Tommy."
In an objective interview with Fox, Chris Jenner told Harvey Levin that the six children she brought back from the hospital were each wearing a different nightgown
Kelly was born in 1997, wearing a matching robe, blanket and hat
"As like as two peas," Stormy, the youngest sister Jenna, chose to reuse the same pajamas she wore in her home in February.
"When she was pregnant with Tommy, I gave her all her baby things, and Tommy went home from the hospital," said the 62 year old Kardashian
"It's not the first time Chris has talked about her family."
"Et caught up with her in February and she gushed that Kelly could easily become a mother."
"I'm really proud of her."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And as an accomplished performer, too, you can expect his net worth to climb as well.”
“His show has a classic BBC flavor and is somewhat fresh and new for U.S. audience.”
“The host now makes about $10 million a year.”
“That's due in part to a pay rise.”
“03 of 13 Jimmy Kimmel: $35 Million Kevin Winter/Getty Images Late night talk show host Jimmy Kimmel's net worth climbs from $25 to $35 million.”
“We bet it won't be long before Colbert gets a bump in salary.”
“According to reports, it was the move from cable to network television, with the larger audience part of Colbert's overall benefits.”
“Why the pay cut?”
“His net worth remains a nice $45 million.”
“On CBS, he allegedly makes about $4.5 million.”


"As an accomplished performer, you can also expect his net worth to rise."
"His show has a typical BBC style, which is a bit fresh and fresh for the American audience."
"Now the host's annual income is about 10 million dollars."
"Part of the reason is a raise."
"03 out of 13 Jimmy Kimmel: 35 million. Kevin winter / Getty pictures late night talk show host Jimmy Kimmel's net worth rose from $25 million to $35 million."
"We bet that Colbert's salary will rise soon."
"It's reported that this is a shift from cable TV to Internet TV, and Colbert has a larger audience in the overall benefits."
"Why the pay cut?"
"His net worth is still $45 million."
"At CBS, he is said to have made about $4.5 million."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““This Is Us” airs Tuesdays at 9/8c on NBC”
“‘Cause a la, ‘This Is Us.’ But there’ll be joy.”Watch a clip from the interview above.”
“But with the secrecy surrounding the family drama, we know very little about what actually goes down when we say goodbye to the Pearson clan.”
“Fortunately, Chrissy Metz — who plays Kate Pearson — stopped by the “Tonight Show” Monday to give Jimmy Fallon just a teeny, tiny bit more about the ultra secret series finale scenes.”
““So, they’ve done, they’ve banked a couple of scenes for the series finale,” Metz told Fallon, when he pulled at that particular thread.”
““I know.”Also Read: 'This Is Us' Teases ANOTHER Mystery Woman: Who the Heck Is Wearing Jack's Necklace in Vietnam?”
“When Fallon suggested Metz must have had fun filming some of those final pieces of the puzzle, she replied, coyly: “Who knows if I was in them.”Ah, rats, Jimmy.”
“You can’t trick Chrissy into revealing things that easily.”
““Yeah.”
“But I’m not going to tell you who were in the scenes,” Metz continued.”


"This is us" was on NBC at 9:8 on Tuesday
"Because Los Angeles," this is us. " But there will be joy. " Look at the interview above
"But because of the secrecy of family drama, when we say goodbye to the Pearson family, we know very little about what happened."
Fortunately, Chris Metz, who plays Kate Pearson, dropped in on Jimmy Fallon on the "Tonight Show" on Monday about the last act of the super secret series
"So, they've done it, they've reserved a few scenes for the last episode of the series," Metz told Fallon when he pulled on this particular thread
"I know." "This is us," he wrote, teasing another mysterious woman: who is wearing Jack's necklace in Vietnam
"When Fallon hinted that Metz would love to shoot the last part of the puzzle, she replied shyly," who knows if I'm in it. "Ah, mouse, Jimmy."
"You can't lie to Chris so easily to tell it."
"Yes."
"But I won't tell you who was at the scene," Metz continued



**Something goes wrong**
“Yankee Featuring Justin Bieber Despacito Shakira Featuring Maluma Chantaje Selena Gomez Justin Bieber The Weeknd Multiple nominations and awards edit Acts that received multiple awards Awards Act 4 CNCO Prince Royce 3 Enrique Iglesias 2 Shakira...”
“Alunizando Romeo Santos Golden Prince Royce Shakira Deja Vu Gente De Zona Algo Contigo Héctor Acosta El Torito Amorcito Enfermito Jennifer Lopez Marc Anthony Olvídame y Pega La Vuelta Romeo Santos Imitadora Favorite Collaboration Favorite Crossover Artist Enrique Iglesias Featuring Descemer Bueno Zion Lennox Súbeme La Radio Luis Fonsi Daddy...”
“Song Favorite Tropical Artist Maluma Felices Los 4 Farruko Featuring Ky Mani Marley Chillax J Balvin Featuring Pharrell Williams BIA Sky Safari Nicky Jam El Amante Wisin Vacaciones Prince Royce Gente de Zona Romeo Santos Favorite Tropical Album Favorite Tropical Song Prince Royce Five El Gran Combo de Puerto Rico...”
“Mi Estilo Favorite Regional Mexican Song Favorite Urban Artist Christian Nodal Adiós Amor Banda Sinaloense MS de Sergio Lizárraga Tengo Que Colgar Calibre 50 Siempre Te Voy A Querer Gerardo Ortiz Regresa Hermosa Ulices Chaidez y Sus Plebes Te Regalo J Balvin Daddy Yankee Maluma Nicky Jam Wisin Favorite Urban...”
“Gerardo Ortiz Christian Nodal Regulo Caro Favorite Regional Mexican Duo or Group Favorite Regional Mexican Album Banda Sinaloense MS de Sergio Lizárraga Calibre 50 Los Plebes Del Rancho De Ariel Camacho Jenni Rivera Paloma Negra Desde Monterrey Calibre 50 Desde El Rancho Los Plebes del Rancho de Ariel Camacho Recuerden...”
“Vestido De Etiqueta Por Eduardo Magallanes Shakira El Dorado Favorite Pop Rock Song Favorite Regional Mexican Artist CNCO Reggaeton Lento Bailemos Enrique Iglesias Featuring Descemer Bueno Zion Lennox Súbeme La Radio Luis Fonsi Daddy Yankee Featuring Justin Bieber Despacito Ricky Martin Featuring Maluma Vente Pa Ca Shakira Featuring Maluma Chantaje...”
“Eduardo Magallanes Prince Royce Five Romeo Santos Golden Shakira El Dorado Favorite Pop Rock Female Artist Favorite Pop Rock Male Artist Gloria Trevi Alejandra Guzmán Shakira Enrique Iglesias Juanes Luis Fonsi Favorite Pop Rock Duo or Group Favorite Pop Rock Album CNCO Jesse Joy Reik CNCO Primera Cita Juan Gabriel...”
“Deja Vu Banda Sinaloense MS de Sergio Lizárraga Tengo Que Colgar Enrique Iglesias Featuring Descemer Bueno Zion Lennox Súbeme La Radio Luis Fonsi Daddy Yankee Featuring Justin Bieber Despacito Maluma Felices Los 4 Nicky Jam El Amante Shakira Featuring Maluma Chantaje CNCO Primera Cita Juan Gabriel Vestido De Etiqueta Por...”
“2 Artist of the Year New Artist of the Year Enrique Iglesias Banda Sinaloense MS de Sergio Lizárraga Daddy Yankee J Balvin Luis Fonsi Maluma Nicky Jam Romeo Santos Shakira Wisin Ozuna Christian Nodal Ulices Chaidez y Sus Plebes Song of the Year Album of the Year Prince Royce Shakira...”
“[3][4]Nominees and Winners [ edit ]The nominations were announced on September 19, 2017.”


"Yankees feature Justin Bieber de spacito Shakira, feature maruma chantaje Selena Gomez, Justin Bieber's multiple nominations and awards this week, editor's multiple award winning behavior 4 cnco Prince Royce 3 Enrique Iglesias 2 Shakira..."
Romeo Santos golden Prince Royce Shakira deja wugent dezona Argo contigo evermito Acosta Torito amocito enfermito Jennifer Lopez Marc Anthony orvidam and PEGA ravierta Romeo Santos imitadora favorite collaborator favorite crossover artist Enrique· Iglesias, the protagonist is dessemer Bueno Zian Lennox subem La Luis Fonsi, Dad... "
"Popular tropical artist maluma felices Los 4 farruko with KY mani Marley chillax J balvin with Pharrell Williams BIA sky Safari Nicky jam El Amante wise vacciones Prince Royce gente de zona Romeo Santos with the most popular tropical album Prince Royce five El Gran combo de Puerto Rio..."
"Mi estilo's favorite Mexican songs, favorite city artist Christian nodal ADI ó s Amor Banda sinaloense MS de Sergio Liz á rraga tengo que colgar calibre 50 siempre te voy a querer Gerardo Ortiz regresa Hermosa ulices chaidez y sus plebes te Regalo J balvin daddy Yanke maluma Nicky jam wisin's favorite city..."
"Gerardo Ortiz Christian nodal regulo Caro's favorite Mexico album Banda sinaloense MS de Sergio Liz á rraga calibre 50 Los plebes del Rancho de Ariel Camacho Jenni Rivera Paloma Negra de Monterey calibre 50 des de Rancho Los plebes del Rancho de Ariel Camacho recurden..."
"Vestido de etiqueta por Eduardo magallanes Shakira El Dorado favorite pop rock songs, favorite Mexican artists cnco reggaeton Lento bailemos Enrique Iglesias, descemer Bueno zon Lennox s ú BEME la radio Luis Fonsi Daddy Yankee, Justin Bieber despacito Ricky Martin, maluma vente PA CA Shakira, maluma chantajie..."
"Eduardo magalanes Prince Royce V Romeo Santos golden Shakira El Dorado most popular popular popular rock female artist most popular popular popular rock male artist Gloria Trevi Alejandra Guzman Shakira Enrique Iglesias juannes Louis fonsey most popular popular pop rock group or group most popular Pop rock album cnco Jesse joy Lake cnco Primera CITA Juan Gabriel
"Deja vu Banda sinaloense MS de Sergio Liz á rraga tengo que colgar Enrique Iglesias, descemer Bueno zon Lennox s ú BEME la radio Luis Fonsi Daddy Yankee, Justin Bieber despacito maluma felices Los 4 Nicky jam El Amante Shakira, maluma chantaje cnco Primera CITA Juan Gabriel Vestido de etiqueta por..."
"Artist of the year 2 artist of the year new artist of the year Ms. Enrique Iglesias Banda sinaronse Sergio rizaraga dad Yanki J. balvin Louis Fengxi maruma Nikki jamromio Santos Shakira vicin ozuna Kristian nordeulis chaiz sous pleb song album of the year Royce· Prince Shakira... "
"[3] [4] nominees and winners [editor] nominations were announced on September 19, 2017."



**Something goes wrong**
“Here are the best from 2017 and 2018 so far.”
“Away from the setpiece events, these are photos of the royals laughing, gawping, eye-rolling, and generally acting like normal folk.”
“But every now and again, even watching from a distance, we get a bit more than that.”
“For people constantly in the public eye, the royals are unsurprisingly great at shaking the right hands, smiling at the right moments, and generally keeping it all together to make sure they get things done.”
“With engagements and weddings, two pregnancies and a birth, the family has grown and found news reasons to celebrate even as the usual packed schedule of events and foreign trips continues.”
“The past two years have been huge for the royal family.”


"This is the best so far in 2017 and 2018."
Apart from the set pieces, these are pictures of the royal family laughing, gaping and dazzled. They are generally like ordinary people
"But from time to time, even from a distance, we get more."
"For people who are often in the public eye, the royal family is unsurprisingly good at shaking hands, smiling at the right time, and often uniting to make sure they get the job done."
"With the engagement and wedding, two pregnancies and one delivery, the family has grown up and found a journalistic reason to celebrate, even though the normally scheduled events and foreign travel continue."
"The past two years have been huge for the royal family."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Feedback Headlines Ireland Coronavirus World Video Photos Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة”
“Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English...”
“...msn news powered by Microsoft News web search Skip to Navigation Skip to Content Sign in Change language and content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
From 1575; Every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every Respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective Send MSN feedback to the title of Irish coronavirus world video photo, we thank you for your feedback "input..."
"Polska Polski Portugal Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomiswirlich Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rkiye t ü rk ι e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ p о C è me" "stage II"
“Deutsch España Español France français India English Indiaम2352; 2336; Indiaह2342; Indiaব2482; Indiaత3122; "Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italiano Magyarorsz á g Magyar Malaysia English Mexico Espa NIA ol Nederlands New Zealand English Norge Norsk bokm å L Ö sterreich Deutsch" Philippine English
“… MSN news by Microsoft News supports web search jump to navigation jump to content login change language and content African French French French French French Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canadian English Canada French Cesc Republic Chile Spanish Colombia Spain Denmark Denmark- Germany... "



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The formula is one of the best for controlling frizz.”
“But it’s not just the fragrance that’s won over customers.”
“2.”
“If you’ve ever used a shampoo that made your hair feel like straw, chances are it had sulfates in the formula.”
“Unfortunately, they can strip too much of the skin’s natural oil.”
“They create foamy lather that breaks down grime and oil.”
“You’ll find them in a variety of products, from toothpaste to shampoo.”
“Before we go further in our reviews today, let’s explain why sulfates are a problem for curly hair.”
“If you have sensitive skin, you also be happy to know there are no parabens or dyes either.”
“Instead, it’s formulated with coconut oil to control frizz and enhance shine.”


"This formula is one of the best for controlling curly hair."
"But it's not just fragrance that wins customers."
“2.”
"If you've ever used a shampoo that makes your hair feel like straw, the formula is likely to contain sulfate."
"Unfortunately, they take away too much of the skin's natural oils."
"They create bubbles, decompose dirt and grease."
"From toothpaste to shampoo, you can find them in a variety of products."
"Before we go back today, let's explain why sulfate is a problem with curly hair."
"If you have sensitive skin, you are also happy to know that there are no parabens or dyes."
"Instead, it's made with coconut oil to control curl and enhance gloss."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We can use our impact and make the world a better place!””
““WWE is embracing women more than ever before, so to be part of that movement makes us feel so empowered and like we have a voice.”
“See what they had to say about their ‘sisterhood,’ empowering women and MORE right here!”
“Total Divas is back!”
“This season, we’ll see some of WWE’s biggest female stars taking their industry by storm, as they get more opportunities than ever in the ring.”
““I think we’re all so truly grateful that we’re in WWE in this time where we’re literally shattering all the glass ceilings,” Lana told HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY.”
“The sky s the limit Lana along with Nattie Neidhart and Nia Jax stopped by HollywoodLife to dish about season 8 of Total Divas which will feature the return of Paige Brie Bella coming back to the ring Lana killing...”
“...it at Money in the Bank and Nattie throwing some awesome barbecues according to Nia...”
“Of course, the show isn’t all work and no fun…so along with Nattie’s barbecues, we’ll also see the ladies take trips together and spent time together outside of their WWE commitments.”
““That’s the one thing I love about the show,” Lana admitted.”


"We can use our influence to make the world a better place!"
"WWE embraces women more than ever before, so being part of this movement makes us feel so powerful as if we have a say."
"Let's see what they think of their sisterhood, empowerment of women, etc.!"
"I'll be back in a few days!"
"This season, we're going to see some of WWE's top women look up to their industry, because they have more opportunities in the ring than ever before."
"I think we are all very grateful that we have come to WWE at a time when we really want to break all the glass ceilings," Lana said in an exclusive interview with Hollywood life
"The sky is the limit, and Lana, together with natty nazart and NIA Ajax, is stopped by Hollywood life, telling the story of Season 8 of total queen, which is characterized by page Bree Bella's return to Lana's killer circle..."
“… It's money in the bank and Nadi throws some terrible barbecue according to NIA... "
"Of course, it's not all about work, it's not fun So in addition to Nadi's barbecue, we'll see women travel together and spend time together beyond WWE's promise. "
"It's my favorite show," Lana admits



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Donald Glover also stars as Lando Calrissian, with Woody Harrelson, Thandie Newton, Phoebe Waller-Bridge, and Emilia Clarke in as-yet-unrevealed co-starring roles.”
“Period.”
“Although their successor has yet to be named, Star Wars fanboy and filmmaker Kyle Newman threw his hat into the ring and even offered to take a massive pay cut to bring the film to completion.”
“When people began suggesting he take over the reins on Twitter, Newman replied with a string of replies to various different accounts.”
“His message on the matter is as follows:"I'm available.”
“To be honest, I'd kill it.”
“Was born for it.”
“And know Solo inside out.”
“And am free.”
“As in I would cost zero dollars.”


Donald Glover has also starred in undisclosed co stars such as Lando Calrissian, woody hallerson, Tandy Newton, Phoebe Waller bridge and Amelia Clark
"Full stop."
"Although their successor has not yet been nominated, Kyle Newman, a Star Wars fan and filmmaker, has thrown his hat into the ring and even proposed a big pay cut to complete the film."
"When people started tweeting him to take over power, Newman's response was a series of responses to various accounts."
His message on the matter is as follows: "I'm on call."
"To be honest, I'll kill it."
"I was born for it."
"Get to know solo thoroughly."
"I'm free."
"It's like I'm going to spend zero dollars."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“#StarWarsE9 #StarWars pic.twitter.com/s689jv9I4u — Ava DuVernay (@ava) April 17, 2018Abrams is currently in pre-production on the film, and Mahoney will step into a role that requires a close attention to detail, mostly dedicated to shooting essential pieces like establishing shots, stunts, inserts, and cutaways.”
“The “Star Wars” universe is making some changes.”
“While the ever expanding movie franchise has been taken to task plenty of times for its repeated hiring of exactly one type of filmmaker white males including recent turns from Ron Howard and Rian Johnson The Force Awakens director J J Abrams is bringing someone brand new into the fold...”
“...filmmaker Victoria Mahoney...”
“The filmmaker and producer (and, fun fact, bit actor in “Legally Blonde”) will serve as the second unit director on Abrams’ upcoming untitled “Episode IX,” marking the first time an African-American woman has served in any directing capacity on a “Star Wars” film.”
“The news was first announced by fellow Disney filmmaker, Ava DuVernay, who shared a picture of Mahoney and Abrams hanging out at a recent open house at her own production and distribution company, ARRAY.”
“Happy to share this historic news.”
“A black woman directing stories in a galaxy far, far away.”
“First unit director #JJAbrams.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
Star Wars pic.twitter.com/s689jv9I4u -EVA duvinai (@ AVA) April 17, 2018 Abrams is currently in the pre production of the film, Mahoney will play a role that needs to pay close attention to the details, mainly focusing on shooting some important segments, such as determining the lens, special effects, illustrations and silhouettes. "
The universe of Star Wars is changing
"While the ever expanding film franchise has taken on a large number of tasks, its repeated hiring is exactly one type of filmmaker white men, including the recent rotation from Ron Howard and Ryan Johnson's forces to awaken director J. Abrams is bringing a whole new person into the field..."
“… Producer Victoria Mahoney... "
The filmmaker and producer (interestingly, the lead in legal blonde) will direct the second unit of Abrams' upcoming Episode 9, the first time an African American woman has directed a Star Wars film
"The news was first announced by Disney filmmaker Ava Duvernay, who shared photos of Mahoney and Abrams at a recent public event at her production and distribution company, array."
"I'm very happy to share this historic news with you."
"A black woman directing a story in the distant galaxy."
"Jjabrams, unit 1 Director."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“List [ edit ]† = deceasedSee also [ edit ]”
“While there is no restriction on a performer winning the Best Actor/Actress and Best Supporting Actor/Actress awards in the same year for two roles in two movies, this has yet to happen, although there have been occasions where performers have been nominated for both.”
“Of the six, only Nicholson, Streep, and Day-Lewis are still living.”
“...award 6 and Walter Brennan three Best Supporting Actor awards 7 Brennan was the first to receive three or more Academy Awards in 1940 followed by Hepburn in 1968 Bergman in 1974 Nicholson in 1997 Streep in 2011 and most recently Day Lewis in 2012”
“4 Five have won three Academy Awards Daniel Day Lewis three Best Actor awards Meryl Streep two Best Actress awards and one Best Supporting Actress award Jack Nicholson two Best Actor awards and one Best Supporting Actor award 5 Ingrid Bergman two Best Actress awards and one Best Supporting Actress...”
“Katharine Hepburn leads the way with four Best Actress awards.”
“[3]As of 2020 , 43 actors and actresses have received two or more Academy Awards in acting categories.”
“[2] This rule was implemented after Barry Fitzgerald received a Best Actor and a Best Supporting Actor nomination for his performance in Going My Way.”
“[1] The only restriction is that actors cannot receive multiple nominations for the same performance.”
“Throughout the history of the Academy Awards, there have been actors and actresses who have received multiple Academy Awards for Best Actor, Best Actress, Best Supporting Actor, or Best Supporting Actress.”


"List [Edit]} = dead see also [Edit]"
"Although there is no restriction for performers to win the best actor and actress award and the best supporting actor award for two roles in two films in the same year, this has not happened, although there are also cases where performers get two nominations at the same time."
"Of the six, only Nicholson, Streep and day lewis are alive."
“…… Brennan was the first person to win three or more Oscars in 1940, followed by Hepburn in 1968, Bergman in 1974, Nicholson in 1997, Streep in 2011, and Lewis in 2012
"45 people won three Oscars, Daniel Day Lewis three best actor awards, Meryl Streep two best actress awards and one best supporting actress award, Jack Nicholson two best actor awards and one best supporting actor award, Ingrid Bergman two best actress awards and one best supporting actress award..."
"Katherine Hepburn took the lead in four best actress awards."
"[3] by 2020, 43 actors and actresses have won two or more performance Oscars."
"[2] this rule came into effect after Barry Fitzgerald was nominated for best actor and best supporting actor for" do as you go. "
"[1] the only restriction is that an actor cannot get more than one nomination for the same performance."
"Throughout the history of the Oscars, there have been actors and actresses who have won many Oscars, such as best actor, best actress, best supporting actor and best supporting actress."



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"The day we have baby boy, she's going to receive her own little baby boy (doll) to take care of at the same time," Teigen told us.”
“So to mark Luna's transition into big sisterhood, she has a new addition of her own.”
“The couple just welcomed their second child to the world.”
“And it's a boy!”
“Teigen made the announcement via Twitter overnight, and what her tweet lacked in details, it made up for in enthusiasm.”
“"Somebody's herrrrrrre!"”
“...she wrote.”
“Somebody’s herrrrrrre!”
“ — christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) May 17, 2018The brief message was followed by baby and baby bottle emoji, and it was immediately retweeted by proud pop Legend.”
“The model mom and Grammy-winning musician first revealed they were expecting back in November — with a little help from baby No.1, their 2-year-old daughter Luna.”


"The day we have a baby boy, she will take care of her baby boy (doll) at the same time," tegan told us
"So in memory of Luna's transformation into a big sister, she has a new member of her own."
"The couple just had their second child."
"It's a boy!"
"Tegan tweeted this news overnight. Her lack of details on Twitter has been made up for in enthusiasm."
"Someone's coming!"
“…… She wrote
"Someone's coming!"
——Christine Teigen (@ Christine Teigen) may 17, 2018 this short message was followed by baby and baby doll emoticons, which were soon forwarded by proud pop legends
The model mother and Grammy Award winner revealed for the first time that they were pregnant as early as November with a little help from their two-year-old daughter, Luna



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...jam Justice League opens on Friday...”
“We were created by a weird sad kid who grew to later become a weird fat man After Abrams and Affleck debuted their project Kimmel called it the best gift I ever got Affleck s other movie the superhero traffic...”
““We all suck,” Damon concludes.”
“In contrast, The Terrible Ten and Damon spend so much time complaining about their lack of powers and embarrassing outfits that they forget to fight each other.”
“The segment also demonstrates how easy it is to poke fun at the grandiose dialogue and self-important approach of many superhero movies.”
“Damon shows up as their the evil, melodramatic nemesis, Dr. Bolt.”
“Bateman and Jennifer Aniston...”
“I took this exact book as a script I didn t change a word The resulting clip is a testament to Kimmel s star reach The Terrible Ten includes Affleck Zach Galifianakis Shaquille O Neal Will Arnett Jon Hamm Jason...”
““The characters really spoke to me, and they demanded to be brought to life,” Abrams said.”
“The story is full of made-up heroes like “Color Kid.” “Color Kid was the best because he had all the powers of the rainbow, which are really none,” Kimmel joked.”


“… Justice alliance opens on Friday... "
"We were created by a strange sad child. Later, after Abrams and Affleck launched their project, he became a strange fat man. Kimmel said that this was the best gift I received from Affleck's another movie, superhero traffic..."
"We all suck," Damon concluded
"In contrast, the terrorist group of ten and Damon spent so much time complaining about their lack of strength and embarrassing costumes that they forgot to fight."
"This part also shows how easy it is to make fun of the grand dialogue and self importance in many superhero movies."
"Damon appeared as their evil, dramatic avenger, Dr. bolt."
"Bateman and Jennifer Aniston..."
"I took this book as a script, and I didn't change a word of the result clip, which is a proof that Kimmel's stars reached the terrible ten, including Alfred Zac, Galileo, nakis Shaquille O'Neill, Arnett Jon ham Jason..."
"These characters are really talking to me," Abrams said. "They're asking for resurrection."
"The story is full of fictional heroes like the color boy." "The color boy is the best, because he has all the power of the rainbow, and those powers really don't," Kimmel joked



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Ronnie Ortiz-Magro/InstagramImage zoom Credit: Ronnie Ortiz-Magro/InstagramThe proud dad documented the trip on Instagram, sharing a photo of Ariana with the hashtags #HappyBaby “Someone’s excited to go to #Jersey,” he wrote, adding the hashtag #FistPumpinLikeChamps.”
“But we’re hopeful this is the final straw and he doesn’t put himself and his daughter back in danger.”On Tuesday, Ortiz-Magro flew from Las Vegas to New Jersey with his daughter to resume filming season 2 of Jersey Shore Family Vacation.”
“...daughter was in the backseat...”
“A spokesperson for the Clark County District Attorney’s Office tells PEOPLE that the case was “denied due to insufficient evidence.” TMZ was the first to report the news.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Jersey Shore star welcomed his first child, daughter Ariana Sky, with Harley on April 3.”
“In the months that followed, the exes have been making headlines for their explosive altercations.”
“On June 24, Harley, 31, was charged with domestic battery after the car-dragging incident.”
“She was released from the Clark County Detention Center the following day after posting the $3,000 bail.”
“Image zoom Jen Harley Credit LVMPD Splash News A spokesperson for the Las Vegas Metropolitan Police Department told PEOPLE that a suspicious vehicle call came in at about 10 22 p m A patrol unit was dispatched to the intersection and determined that a male and a female were in...”


"Credit for image zooming: Ronnie Ortiz Magro / instagram credit for image zooming: Ronnie Ortiz Magro / instagram proud dad recorded the trip on instagram and shared a photo of Ariana labeled" happy baby "with the tag" fist pump in like champs. "
"But we hope that this is the last straw and that he will not put himself and his daughter in danger again." On Tuesday, Ortiz Magro flew with her daughter from Las Vegas to New Jersey to continue filming season 2 of family vacation on the Jersey coast
“… My daughter is sitting in the back seat... "
A spokesman for the Clark County District Attorney's office told people that the case was "dismissed for lack of evidence.". TMZ was the first to report the news
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
On April 3, the Jersey coast star and Halley welcomed his first child, daughter Ariana Skye
"In the next few months, two ex girlfriends made the headlines over an explosive row."
"On June 24, 31 year old Harley was charged with a home battery after the car towing incident."
"She was released from Clark County Detention Center the next day after she paid $3000 in bail."
"Image zooming janhalley credit lvmpd splash news a spokesman for the Las Vegas Metropolitan Police Department told people that a suspicious vehicle call came in around 10:22 p.m., a patrol was sent to the intersection, and a man and a woman were identified..."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After what was described as a 'quick' meal, all three exited in succession.”
“She is setting up rules for how things needs to be when the kids are with Scott.'”
“And Sofia Richie and her boyfriend Scott Disick looked stony-faced as they emerged from a dinner date in Los Angeles on Thursday night.”
“The 20-year-old model failed to smile as she left the building, raising questions her formal meeting with Scott's ex-girlfriend of nine-years was still firmly on her mind.”
“Solemn Sofia Richie and Scott Disick looked stony faced as they emerged from a dinner date in Los Angeles on Thursday night just days after their tense dinner with Kourtney Kardashian Sofia dressed down for the occasion and took inspiration from the sportluxe trend as she sheathed her trim frame...”
“...in an over sized jumper and black Adidas joggers...”
“She teamed the look with black trainers and donned a pair of her signature Matrix-inspired sunglasses.”
“Wearing her long blonde hair in a sleek straight centre-parting, Sofia opted to showcase her natural beauty with a minimal make-up look.”
“Emotions running high Sofia was as spotted breaking down in tears at Derby Day on Saturday just days after she reportedly shared a tense dinner with Kourtney pictured The 20 year old model failed to raise a smile as she left the building raising questions her first formal meeting with...”
“Scott s ex girlfriend of nine years was still firmly on her mind Father of three Scott was also casually clad for their date night donning a charcoal grey hoodie and khaki corduroy trousers...”


"After being described as' fast food ', all three people left the market one after another."
"When the kids are with Scott, she's making the rules for what's going on."
"Sophia Ritchie and her boyfriend Scott Disick came out of a dinner date in Los Angeles on Thursday night with a stony face."
"The 20-year-old model left the building without a smile, which makes people suspect that her formal meeting with Scott's ex girlfriend of nine years is still firmly in mind."
"After a dinner date in Los Angeles on Thursday night, the solemn Sofia Ritchie and Scott Disick look dignified. Just a few days ago, they had a tense dinner with Kourtney Kardashian. Sofia dressed up for the dinner and drew inspiration from the sportluxe trend for her self-cultivation coat..."
“… Wearing oversized pullovers and black Adidas jogging pants... "
"She paired it with black sneakers and put on her iconic matrix inspired sunglasses."
Sophia has long golden hair with a smooth and straight parting in the middle. She chooses to show her natural beauty with the least makeup
"Sophia, who is in high spirits, was found to be in tears on Saturday's derby day. It is reported that just a few days ago, she had a nervous dinner with kurtney. The picture shows the 20-year-old model leaving the building without a smile, which triggered her and The question of the first formal meeting. "
"Scott's ex girlfriend, who has been dating for nine years, still remembers his father of three. Scott also wears casual clothes, charcoal grey Hoodie and khaki corduroy trousers on his date night."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Miley's fiancé Liam Hemsworth posted a sweet photo of Miley posing under a giant rainbow balloon arch, writing "Happy birthday to my sweet girl.”
“You’re more precious than ever.”
“So thankful to have you in my life.”
“❤️"Miley's father Billy Ray Cyrus also used the platform to share his sentiment for the occasion, posting a photo of Miley with her grandmother, mother Tish, sister Noah, fiancé Liam Hemsworth, and other family members surrounding a cake with the number "26" on top.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“"Thankful for this moment.”
“My thoughts and prayers with so many hearts that need mended.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
Miley's fiance Liam Hemsworth posted a sweet picture of Miley posing under the arch of a giant rainbow balloon and wrote, "Happy Birthday to my lovely girl."
"You are more precious than ever."
"Thank you so much for being in my life."
“ ❤️ "Miley's father, Billy Ray Cyrus, also used this platform to share his feelings about the occasion. He posted pictures of Miley, her grandmother, mother tish, sister Noah, fiancee Liam Hemsworth and other family members around a cake with the number" 26 "on it
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Thank you for this moment."
"My thoughts and prayers, there are so many hearts to repair."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“Congrats to the happy couple!”
“The excited new parents met on the set of the 2010 thriller Frozen and tied the knot at in intimate ceremony in Los Angeles in July 2012.”
“PHOTOS: Celebs Share Pics of Their Cute KidsShe also posted a photo of her son's little feet, writing, "So in love."”
“Dana shared a few precious pics of their little boy as well, including a video of his tiny legs, which she captioned, "We did it guys!!!"”
“Celeb Birth Announcements"Couldn't be more in love with my new baby boy and my incredible wife," the proud papa captioned the cute pic.”
“PHOTOS: Oh, Baby!”
“The 37-year-old actor took to Instagram to share the happy news, along with a heartwarming snapshot of his newborn son's hand holding his finger.”
“The X-Men star and his wife, Dana Ashmore, welcomed their first child, a baby boy, over the weekend.”
“Shawn Ashmore is a new dad!”


Related libraries
"Congratulations to the happy couple
"The excited new parents met on the set of the 2010 thriller frozen and married at a close wedding in Los Angeles in July 2012."
"Photos: celebrities share photos of their lovely children. She also posted a photo of her son's little foot, which says," so in love. "
"Dana also shared some precious photos of their little boy, including a video of his calf, and she wrote in the title of the video," we did it, guys!! "
"Celebrity birth announcement" loves my new son and my incredible wife very much, "proud dad added the title to this lovely picture."
"Photo: Oh, baby!"
"The 37 year old actor shared the good news on instagram and took a warm snapshot of his new son's hand holding his finger."
The X-Men star and his wife Dana Ashmore welcomed their first child, a baby boy, over the weekend
"Sean Ashmore is a new dad!"



**Something goes wrong**
“...https://t.co/YNkPwPGaQt pic.twitter.com/5m1S87qYwo — Tre'vell Anderson (@TrevellAnderson) December 12, 2018”
“Also Read: SAG Awards Nominations by the Numbers: Netflix Is Back on Top“tbh f— category fraud,” one fan tweeted.”
“Furious about the Regina King and BEALE STREET snubs.”
“— hunter harris (@hunteryharris) December 12, 2018Not mad about the Emily Blunt A QUIET PLACE nod.”
“...husband but she was also talking about the SAGs snubbing regina king...”
“Phyllis Nagy PhyllisNagy December 12 2018 If only Regina King was in THE KOMINSKY METHOD Richard Lawson rilaws December 12 2018 u know on lemonade when Beyoncé said so what are you gonna say at my funeral now that you ve killed me she was talking about her cheating ass...”
“I’m sick of this s—.”See some more reactions to the snub below:We love you, Ethan Hawke and Regina King.”
“...miss out in the rightful supporting categories.”
““Emma Stone, Rachel Weisz, Timothee Chalamet, Mahershala Ali and Emily Blunt are the reasons why performers like Regina King, Elizabeth Debicki, Daniel Kaluuya, etc.”
“...actresses in The Favourite and yet still pushed out King in the supporting actress field...”


“... https://t.co/YNkPwPGaQt company pic.twitter.com/5m1S87qYwo -Trevell Anderson, December 12, 2018
"Another piece of news is that sag is nominated by numbers: Netflix is back at the top of the" TBH f fraud "list," one fan tweeted
"Angry at the neglect of King Regina and bill street."
"- Hunter Harris nodded quietly on December 12, 2018, not crazy about Emily Bronte."
“… Husband, but she's also talking about things that don't look up to Regina King... "
"Phyllis Nagi Phyllis Nagi December 12, 2018 if Regina king was the only one using the kominsky method Richard Lawson Rilla December 12, 2018 when you knew lemonade, Beyonce said that, then what would you say at my funeral? Now you kill me, she's talking about her cheating ass..."
"I'm fed up with this s -" see more reactions? Below: our love for you, Ethan Hawke and Regina king. "
“… Missed the right support category. "
"Emma stone, Rachel Weitz, Timothy chalamit, mahsara Ali and Emily Bronte are the reasons for Regina king, Elizabeth Debbie and Daniel Karua."
“… She is the most popular actress, but still can't catch up with the king in the supporting actress field



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nobody guessed this.””
““But I think what fans will understand is that both of these woman actually have a valid argument, and what does that mean?”
“Brooke Shields has about a hundred film and TV credits, as well as two Golden Globe nominations and an iconic Calvin Klein commercial, on her resumé.”
“Still, on her first day working alongside friend Mariska Hargitay on Law & Order: Special Victims Unit, “I was so nervous to come into this well-oiled machine that I called her my character’s name,” Shields said, laughing.”
“She s referring to the scene that ended this week s episode of the NBC procedural Olivia who at the top of the episode was relieved to hear that her child abuse investigation had been closed answers a knock at her apartment door to find Shields standing on the other...”
“...side...”
““Olivia Benson?” the woman says, “I’m Sheila Porter, Noah’s grandmother.”Fans of the series know this is not great for Lt. Benson, who adopted her son, Noah, after his mother Ellie died.”
“And as Liv reminded Trevor Langan in Wednesday’s hour, Ellie had told Olivia that both of her parents were dead.”
“Turns out, Ellie lied.”
“And now that Sheila is making moves to vacate Noah’s adoption, expect to see a lot more of Shields’ character in the coming weeks.”


"No one guessed."
"But I think fans will understand that these two women actually have a reasonable argument. What does that mean?"
"Brooke Shields has about 100 films and TV series on his resume, two Golden Globe nominations and an iconic Calvin Klein commercial."
"Nevertheless, on the first day of her collaboration with her friend Mariska Hargitay, she wrote in law and order: special victims," shields said with a smile& Order:Special Victors  "I was very nervous when I walked into this well lubricated machine, and I called her my character's name," he wrote
"She's referring to Olivia at the end of this week's NBC program. At the top of the episode, Olivia breathes a sigh of relief when she hears that her child abuse investigation is over. She replies that someone knocked on the door and found shields on the other side..."
“… Side
"Olivia Benson? "I'm Sheila Porter, Noah's grandmother," the woman said Benson adopted his son Noah after the death of his mother Ellie, and his fans know that
"When liv reminds Trevor Langan on Wednesday, Ellie tells Olivia that her parents are dead."
"So, Ellie lied."
"Now Sheila is taking action to cancel Noah's adoption and is expected to see more of shields's role in the coming weeks."



**Something goes wrong**
““It’s really too difficult,” she said.”
“Reached by The Post on Saturday, Bourdain’s mother, Gladys, 83, a longtime Times editor, could barely speak.”
“Master butcher Christine Speisser told People magazine Saturday that the crew had set up to film at an outdoor market in nearby Strasbourg.”
““And waiting and waiting.”Also waiting, just down the road, was Bourdain’s camera crew.”
““His friend was waiting at breakfast,” the waiter told the Times.”
““Dried fruits, cold cuts, local cheese, fruit salad, butter, honey and a jar of Christine Ferber jam.”But again, on Friday morning, Bourdain didn’t join him at the table.”
““Fresh bread, Viennese pastries, kouglof, panacota verrines, dried fruits,” the hotel lists as breakfast offerings.”
“But we didn’t think much of it.”Bourdain and Ripert had also eaten breakfast together each morning, again at the Winstub’s big, distressed-wood tables.”
““Maybe he went out and ate somewhere else, we said.”
““He knew the kitchen,” the waiter recalled.”


"It's really hard," she said
"On Saturday, Boden's mother, Gladys, 83, was a longtime editor of the times and could hardly speak."
"Butcher master Christine SPEISSER told people on Saturday that the crew was going to shoot at an outdoor market near Strasbourg."
"Wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait, wait
"His friend is waiting for breakfast," the waiter told the times
"Dried fruit, cold dishes, local cheese, fruit salad, butter, honey and a can of Christine Freeport jam." But on Friday morning, bourdon didn't have dinner with him
"Fresh bread, Viennese pastry, kouglof, Panacota verriens, dried fruit," the hotel lists as breakfast
"But we didn't think much about it." Buldan and Lipper had breakfast together every morning, again on the big old wooden table of the wintobs
"Maybe he went out to eat something else," we said
"He knew the kitchen well," the waiter recalled



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Reynolds calls Hunt for the Wilderpeople “one of the best movies you’ll ever see.”We’re adding it to our list, ASAP.”
“Besides Handmaid’s Tale and all-things Tarantino, Reynolds had high praise for Taika Waititi’s 2016 film Hunt for the Wilderpeople, which stars Reynold’s Deadpool 2 costar, Julian Dennison.”
“We’re guessing the tour starts after his daughters, three-year-old James and one-year-old Inez, are put to bed.”
““She’s probably filing [divorce] papers as we speak.”Part of Reynold’s “weird movie tour” is watching “like every Quentin Tarantino movie,” he told the audience.”
““I’ve been having a ton of time to pretend like I’m watching the kids,” he joked.”
“Reynolds also said he’s been “on a weird movie tour,” while Lively has been overseas shooting The Rhythm Section.”
“Although there’s no release date set for Season 3 yet, it’s expected to hit our screens in April 2019.”
“Wishing there were more, we just watched the last one,” Reynolds said while speaking to fans at a Deadpool 2 panel.”
““Loving Handmaid’s Tale.”
“Over the weekend at San Diego Comic-Con, which ran from July 19th to July 22nd, Reynolds revealed which show he and Lively are currently addicted to, and honestly, same.”


Reynolds called savage hunt "one of the best movies you've ever seen" and we'll add it to our list as soon as possible
"In addition to the maidservant's story and everything about Tarantino, Reynolds also spoke highly of Taika waititi's 2016 film hunt for the wilderpeople, starring Julian Dennison, who is partner of Reynolds' Deadpool 2."
"We guess the tour started after his daughter, James, three, and Inez, one, went to bed."
Part of Reynolds' journey to weird movies is "like every movie of Quentin Tarantino," he told the audience
"I've always had a lot of time pretending to be watching the kids," he joked
Reynolds also said he had been "on a strange film Tour" while leffley had been filming rhythm overseas
"Although no release date has been set for the third season, it is expected to be released in April 2019."
"I hope there's more," Reynolds told fans on a display board in Deadpool 2. "We only saw the last one."
"The story of love maidservant."
At the San Diego comics conference held from July 19 to July 22, Reynolds revealed that the program he and lively are currently addicted to is, to be honest, the same program



**Something goes wrong**
“I am not a fan of ‘being skinny.’ ”And despite fighting off the negative comments from critics, she’s never been happier in her relationship with Adams, especially since moving in together in August.”
“Love you, mean it, k bye,” she said in her Instagram Story.”
“The Modern Family star 27 showed off her figure in a bikini selfie on Instagram Friday along with the hashtag feelinmyselffriday While many including Paris Hilton applauded Hyland and shared positive messages in the comments section others did not including one troll who commented Eat a doughnut Get push notifications...”
“...with news features and more...”
“Hyland’s boyfriend and Bachelor in Paradise star Wells Adams quickly defended his girlfriend.”
““Eat s—,” he responded, as captured by Instagram account Comments by Celebs.”
“Adams, 34, also shared a cheeky comment on Hyland’s photo: “Please come home now.”
“K thanks I ve been reading some of your DMs and so many of you are like Girl you fine but like eat some bread So I would like to put in a request for anyone who is concerned about my bread consumption to send to Wells Adams because he...”
“...is the sole person who knows about how much bread I consume on a daily basis...”
“Thanks!”


"I don't like" slimming. " Despite her resistance to critics' negative comments, her relationship with Adams has never been as happy as it is now, especially since she moved in to live together in August
"Love you, seriously, goodbye," she said on instagram
"The 27 year old modern family star showed off her figure in instagram's Bikini selfie on Friday, and also put on the label of" feel like a ride ". Many people, including Paris Hilton, applauded her and shared positive information in the comments section. Others did not include a troll who commented on eating doughnuts and getting tweets..."
“… There are news features and more... "
"Helan's boyfriend and the single star of paradise, wells Adams, soon defended his girlfriend."
"Eat s -", he said, in response to celebrity comments on his instagram account
Adams, 34, also made a cheeky comment on Hailan's photo: "please go home now."
"Thank you. I've been reading some of your DMS. Many of you are like girls. You are very nice, but you like to eat some bread. So I'd like to ask anyone who cares about my bread consumption to send it to wells Adams, because he..."
“…… The only one who knows how much bread I eat every day... "
"Thank you



**Something goes wrong**
“That delay initially put Melania at a disadvantage, according to a friend who said the rhythm of the White House had already been established, and left her out of the mix.”
“ADRather than move into the White House with her husband, Melania stayed in New York for six months to allow Barron to finish his school year there.”
““Aside from the president’s solo trips, the family spends most evenings together.” She also played down the headlines about Trump’s alleged affairs and said Melania “is focused on being a mom.”
“Grisham said the president and Melania do spend time with each other.”
““They spend very little to no time together,” said one longtime friend of the president.”
“According to several current and former aides, the president and first lady often do not eat together in the White House either.”
“At Mar-a-Lago on holidays and weekends, the president golfs or dines with politicians, business executives and media personalities on the patio, while Melania is often nowhere to be seen.”
“ADThe Trumps are often apart even during their free time, according to several people who know the couple’s schedules.”
“...the White House since John F Kennedy Jr in the early 1960s...”
“They are not that couple that holds hands just because she is old world European and it s not who she is AD It is unusual to see a candid shot of the president enjoying an unplanned moment with his wife or even with Barron the first young son in...”


According to a friend, the delay initially put Melania at a disadvantage, saying that the pace of the White House had been established and that she was not involved
Instead of moving into the White House with her husband, Melania spent six months in New York, where Barron completed his school year
"Except for the president's single visit, the family spent most of the evening together." She also downplayed the headlines about Trump's alleged affair and said Melania was "focused on being a mom."
"Grisham said the president and Melania were really together."
An old friend of the president said, "they spend little or no time together."
"According to several current and former aides, the president and the first lady also often don't eat together at the White House."
"On holidays and weekends in Malag, the president plays golf or has dinner in the yard with politicians, business executives and media people, and Melania is usually absent."
"According to several people who know about the trumps' schedule, the trumps often separate even in their spare time."
“… The White House began with Kennedy Jr. in the early 1960s
"They didn't hold hands just because she was an old world European, or because of who she was. It's unusual to see the president enjoying an unplanned moment with his wife and even with his first young son, Baron... "



**Something goes wrong**
“|”
“He wants to do something great and important but in the end he realizes that the thing that’s truly great is this thing that does not look glamorous."”
“So I hope that also parallels the story that Bo has.”
“...under a very very humble ordinary appearance of a baby born to two peasants in a barn not even in a house...”
“License Photo Director of The Star Timothy Reckart pictured here said of the overall message of the film I think the story about importance and greatness is really at the heart of Christmas story which is about God doing this really great thing coming to Earth as the savior but...”


“|”
"He wanted to do something great and important, but in the end he realized that what was really great was something that didn't look glamorous."
"So I hope it can be compared with the story of Bo Xilai."
“… Under a very ordinary appearance, a baby was born in a barn of two farmers, not even in a house... "
"The authorized photo of star Timothy reckart filmed here, the director said of the overall message of the film, I think the story of importance and greatness is really the core of the Christmas story, which is about God coming to earth as the savior to do this very great thing, but it is..."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In honor of Oprah getting better, fiercer, and funnier every year, allow us to present the 10 different Oprahs she served us in 2018—the Oprahs that had the internet sharing, cackling, and reposting again and again.”
“Plus, her wigs took on a life of their own, she delivered countless gems on her Instagram, and made us all green with glasses envy with every pair she rocked.”
“She graced the big screen in A Wrinkle in Time, gave the speech heard 'round the world, and helped Michelle Obama give high school girls the surprise of a lifetime.”
“And in 2018, the O of O somehow managed to continue being the gift that keeps on giving.”
“...always do the trick and examples on how to live our best lives with um everything she does...”
“Oprah has given the world so much reasons to run home and turn on the TV every afternoon oh how we miss The Oprah Winfrey Show excuses to tune out the world by putting on your headphones those SuperSoul podcasts...”


"To commemorate Oprah, every year is better, more intense and more interesting, please allow us to introduce the 10 different Oprah she has served us in 2018, who have been sharing, giggling and forwarding on the Internet again and again."
"In addition, her wig also has a life of its own. She has sent countless gems on instagram, and every time she shakes a pair, we all admire wearing glasses."
"She's just in time to shine on the big screen, deliver the" around the world "speech, and help Michelle Obama bring a lifetime of surprises to high school girls."
"And in 2018, O's o in some way continues to be a constant gift."
“… Always use every thing she does to do some skills and examples to show us how to live the best life... "
"Oprah has given the world so many reasons. Every afternoon, we run home to turn on the TV. How we miss Oprah Winfrey's show. We shut the world out by wearing earphones and podcasts of super soul..."



**Something goes wrong**
“I think it's important for new moms to to be easy on themselves because it's obviously a high-stress time."”
“I feel a little bit of pressure that I need to have everything prepared and ready to go for the travel and for Sonny's schedule to be organized.”
“From early morning feedings to mental breakdowns, and even the occasional celebratory first-time-mom moments, 32-year-old Port documents it all on her YouTube channel and blog.”
“By developing a strong relationship with her followers who look to her for advice and even offer tips and tricks in return, she's taken the parenting world by storm.”
“A post shared by Bundle Organics (@bundleorganics) on Aug 22, 2017 at 5:37pm PDTYou may recognize Port from MTV's hit show The Hills, which first aired back in 2006.”
“At the time, Port worked alongside Lauren Conrad at Teen Vogue, as the stylish, soft-spoken intern to join the Laguna Beach spinoff.”
“She continued her stint on reality TV with The City—a continuation of The Hills that followed Port's life working for designer Diane Von Furstenberg in New York City.”
“Since her time on MTV, Port has transformed from TV personality to fashion designer, creative director, and CEO of her fashion brand Whitney Eve.”
“Image zoom Credit: Courtesy of Whitney PortNow, with the holidays just around the corner, Port has paired up with Tylenol to promote healthy living during cold and flu season.”
“As she and Rosenman prepare Sonny for his first trip on an airplane, they are relying on Tylenol to manage their families well-being through all the chaos.”


"I think it's important for new mothers to be tolerant of themselves, because this is obviously a time of great pressure."
"I feel a bit stressed and I need to be ready for everything, for the trip and Sonny's schedule."
"From early morning feeding to nervous breakdown and even the occasional celebration of her first time as a mother, the 32 year old recorded all this on her YouTube channel and blog."
"By building strong relationships with her followers, who ask her for advice and even offer tips and tricks in return, she has created a storm in parenting."
"An article shared by bundle organizations (@ bundle organizations) at 5:37 p.m. on August 22, 2017, you may recognize porter from the MTV hit show the hills, which was first broadcast in 2006."
"At the time, Porter and Lauren Conrad worked together in teen vogue, joining Laguna Beach derivatives as a stylish, soft spoken intern."
"She continues to work on the New York reality show, a continuation of Porter's life in New York after working for designer Diane von Furstenberg."
"Since working at MTV, Porter has transformed from a TV celebrity to a fashion designer, creative director and CEO of her fashion brand Whitney Eve."
Photo zooming credit: thanks to Whitney portno. The holiday is coming. Porto and Taino join hands to promote healthy life in the cold and flu season
"When she and Rosenman prepared for Sonny's first plane trip, they relied on Taino to manage their family's happiness in chaos."



**Something goes wrong**
“It could be because he’s a photographer who just recently released his very first book called What I See.”
“While it looks like Moretz took the photo in question, Beckham’s account has a ton of gorgeously shot photos, many which include both of them.”
“Both Beckham and Moretz were in town to check out a rugby match, and Beckham posted this photo celebrating the occasion on Instagram.”
“The video of the kiss looks like it happened in Dublin.”
“Just a few days ago, Beckham posted a sweet photo of their matching checkered Vans on Instagram, which is simply sweet.”
“Rumors sparked that the two had reunited back in August, when they were both spotted out together in New York City.”
“The most important thing is that they seem to be incredibly happy.”
“While they haven’t openly admitted it, we’re under the impression that it’s more than friendship.”
“But, let’s get real here.”
“But even if they’re nothing but friends these days, it seems like they parted on excellent terms.”


"It's probably because he's a photographer and recently published his first book, what I see
"Although it seems that Moritz took this picture, there are a lot of gorgeous pictures on David's account, many of which include these two."
"Both David and Moritz are in town watching football games, and David posted this photo on instagram to celebrate the occasion."
"The kissing video looks like it happened in Dublin."
"Just a few days ago, Beckhams posted a sweet picture on instagram of them matching a lattice van. It's just sweet."
"It's rumored that the two got back together as early as August, when they were both found together in New York City."
"Most of all, they seem to be very happy."
"Although they didn't admit it publicly, our impression is that it's not just friendship."
"But let's be realistic."
"But even if they're just friends now, they seem to break up well."



**Something goes wrong**
“RELATED VIDEO: Selena Gomez & the Weeknd Make Their Couple Debut at the Met Gala...”
“Image zoom Credit: Taylor Hill/FilmMagicGomez opened up about living life in the public eye while trying to maintain privacy in her relationship during an interview with On Air with Ryan Seacrest in June.”
“FROM PEN: EW’s Top Ten Rom-Com Movie MomentsThe pair were spotted out and about several times in New York over the weekend, including on Sunday when they were photographed leaving upscale Japanese restaurant Nobu.”
“Dressed down in an oversized tee, Gomez grinned at the camera while the 27-year-old singer put his arm around her in the booth.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The singer, 25, shared a sweet snapshot — presumably taken on a date night during the holiday weekend — on Tuesday of herself sitting alongside The Weeknd.”
“Selena Gomez Shares a Sweet Snap from Her Holiday Outing with The WeekndSelena Gomez had a happy Labor Day weekend with her boyfriend by her side.”
“Selena Gomez and her boyfriend The Weeknd were spotted together several times in New York City over Labor Day weekendDate Night!”


"Related video: Selena Gomez and the couple make their debut at the metropolitan party..."
"Image scaling credit: Taylor Hill / filmmagic Gomez, in a June TV interview with Ryan Seacrest, revealed her life in public, while trying to keep the privacy of the relationship."
"Excerpt from Peng: EW top 10 ROM com movie moments the couple were filmed several times over the weekend in New York, including Sunday when they were filmed leaving Nobu, an upscale Japanese restaurant."
Gomez grinned at the camera in an oversized T-shirt as the 27 year old singer hugged her on the stand
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The 25-year-old singer shared a sweet snapshot on Tuesday - probably on a date night on a holiday weekend - and sat next to the weekend."
"Serena Gomez shared the sweet moments of her weekend vacation. Serena Gomez and her boyfriend spent a happy Labor Day weekend together."
"Selena Gomez and her boyfriend were found together several times this week in New York City on labor day night!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Don't treat me like an idiot.'"”
“But I do know what's going on.”
“And I said, 'I'm sorry I'm in the way ... and it must be hell for both of you.”
“So I said, 'I want my husband'.”
“You've got all the men in the world fall in love with you and you've got two beautiful children, what more do you want?'”
“"She said to me: 'You've got everything you ever wanted.”
“I said, 'I know what's going on between you and Charles and I just want you to know that,'" Diana said on tapes recorded for Andrew Morton, her biographer.”
“"I was terrified of her.”
“At this point, Diana knew about the affair, and even claims to have approached Camilla herself.”
“By 1986, Camilla and Charles start seeing each other again, even though both are married with children.”


"Don't treat me like an idiot."
"But I know what happened."
"I said," I'm sorry, I'm in the way... It must be hell for both of you. "
"So I said," I want my husband. "
"You make all the men in the world fall in love with you. You have two beautiful children. What else do you want?"
"She said to me: 'you've got everything you want.'"
"I said, 'I know what happened between you and Charles, I just want you to know,'" Diana said on a tape for her biographer Andrew Morton
"I'm afraid of her."
"At this time, Diana knew about it and even claimed that she had been to Camilla."
In 1986, Camilla and Charles began to meet again, even though they were married and had children



**Something goes wrong**
“(This is the actress’s second marriage; she filed for divorce from former tennis player Ryan Sweeting in September 2015.)”
“We are the same, our views are the same, our morals are the same, he is my perfect match.”Image zoom Credit: Milla Cochran/startraksThe duo started dating in spring 2016 and made their first public appearance as a couple in September that same year.”
“The Big Bang Theory star tied the knot with professional equestrian Karl Cook at an intimate wedding at a horse stable near San Diego, California, attended by close friends and family on Saturday, PEOPLE confirms.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Legally KCSQUARED 6-30-18 ❤,” Cuoco captioned an Instagram showing her kissing Cook near horse stalls.”
“For the big day, the actress wore a white lace dress with a cape by Reem Acra and styled by Brad Goreski and Daniela Romero, while Cook went with a classic look in a tux.”
“Cuoco later changed into a lace Tadashi Shoji jumpsuit with Louise et Cie shoes and threw her hair into a ponytail for the reception.”
“Image zoom Credit: Jamie Greenberg“Ok let’s party!!!”
“#kcsquared  ,” Cuoco captioned a second snap of the newlyweds gearing up for the reception.”
“Cuoco, 32, and Cook, 27, delivered their own wedding vows, which had the bride both laughing and wiping tears from her cheeks, as a guest showed in an Instagram video.”


"(it's the actress's second marriage; she filed for divorce from former tennis player Ryan swift in September 2015.)
"We are the same, our views are the same, our morality is the same, he is my perfect partner." Photo zooming credit: Mira Cochran and Star Trek started dating in the spring of 2016 and made their debut as lovers in September of the same year
People confirmed that the big bang star and professional equestrian Carl cook had a close wedding in a stable near San Diego, California, attended by family and friends on Saturday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The square of 6-30-18 ❤ "Kuko added a caption to instagram for the photo of her kissing the cook near the stable."
"On the big day, the actress wore a white lace dress with a shawl designed by Reem acra, Brad Goreski and Daniela Romero, while cook looked classic in a tuxedo."
"Kuko later changed into a lace Tadashi Shoji jumpsuit, paired it with Louise et CIE shoes, and tied his hair in a ponytail for the reception."
Image zooming credit: Jamie Greenberg "OK, let's have a party!"
"Kcsquared," Kuko wrote down the second moment when the newlyweds were ready for the wedding with the title
"Kuko, 32, and cook, 27, made their wedding vows, and the bride wiped tears off her cheeks with a smile in an instagram video."



**Something goes wrong**
“Getting involved: 'Usually we pay someone to model our bathing suits but I thought it would be interesting to have some of these women to create the perfect bathing suit for them,' he added...”
“...her flawless complexion on display in very little makeup Water break Jourdan was also seen sipping on an ice cold beverage as she strolled along the sand Stretch it out In some other black and white snaps Jourdan could be seen showing off her amazing abs Race time The fashion...”
“And Jourdan Dunn was once again showing off her washboard abs as she posed for a slew of behind-the-scenes snaps in the Solid and Striped swim team.”
“The 27-year-old British model flaunted her amazing body in the all-in-one piece, as she frolicked on the sand during breaks from the photoshoot in the Bahamas.”
“Stunning British model Jourdan Dunn 27 showed off her incredible physique in a white swimsuit as she posed for behind the scenes snaps from the Solid and Striped swim team Jourdan was still right in the model mindset even when she wasn t shooting for the campaign keeping her jaw...”
“...dropping figure on full display...”
“The star's skin glistened in the sunshine as she posed by the ocean, with her long hair hanging down her back in a beachy waved style.”
“In some of the snaps, the camera took on a more artistic feel, with the images looking as if they had come straight from a Polaroid camera.”
“Jourdan was also seen taking a sip from an ice cold drink in one snap, while in another she sported a matching white jacket with her name emblazoned on the back.”
“Amazing Jourdan rocked a swimsuit that flaunted her washboard abs as she posed for the campaign in the Bahamas Sensational In some artistic black and white snaps Jourdan knelt in the sand during the photoshoot in the Bahamas Jaw dropping Jourdan kept her black tresses in long beachy waves keeping...”


"Getting involved:" we usually pay to model our swimsuits, but I think it would be fun for some of these women to make perfect swimsuits for them, "he added
“… Her flawless complexion shows up in a very small toner break, and Jourdan is also seen sipping iced drinks as she walks on the beach stretching it in some other black and white snapshots. Jourdan can see the fashion of showing off her amazing abdominal race time... "
"Jourdan Dunn once again showed off her washboard ABS, posing for a series of behind the scenes photos on the solid and striped swimming teams."
"The 27 year old British model was taking photos in the Bahamas, playing on the beach during a break to show off her perfect body."
"The amazing British model, Jourdan Dunn, showed off her incredible physique in a white swimsuit on the 27th. She posed in the background photo of the real shot and the Striped swimming team. Even if Jourdan didn't shoot for the campaign, her chin still kept the model's attitude..."
“… Full graphics
"When she posed by the sea, the star's skin was shining in the sun and her long hair was wavy on her back."
"In some snapshots, the camera presents a more artistic picture, and the picture seems to come directly from the Polaroid camera."
Jordan was also seen to take a sip of an iced drink in one instant, while in another, she was wearing a matching white jacket with her name printed on the back
"The amazing Jourdan shakes a swimsuit and shows off her washboard ABS as she poses for the campaign in the Bahamas. While taking photos in the Bahamas, Jourdan kneels on the beach. The jaw dropping Jourdan keeps her black hair with long beach waves... "



**Something goes wrong**
“It stars Grant Bowler, Wade Briggs, Torrance Coombs, Dan Hildebrand, Lashana Lynch, Ebonee Noel, Medalion Rahimi, Zuleikha Robinson, Sterling Sulieman, Susan Wooldridge, and Anthony Head.”
“Michael Offer is also an executive producer and director of the pilot.”
“Shonda Rhimes, Betsy Beers, Mark Wilding and Michael Goldstein are executive producers.”
““Still Star-Crossed” was developed for television by Heather Mitchell, who serves as the writer and executive producer.”
“It was originally picked up to series by the network last May.”
“The show was originally supposed to debut midseason 2017.”
“The series is based on the book of the same name by Melinda Taub.”
“The period drama series from Shondaland and ABC Studios picks up where the famous story of “Romeo and Juliet” ends, charting the treachery, palace intrigue and ill-fated romances of the Montagues and Capulets in the wake of the young lovers’ tragic fate.”
“It will begin airing on Saturdays on July 8.”
“To date, the series is averaging just a 0.4 rating in adults 18-49 and 1.95 million viewers per episode in live-plus-same day.”


It stars grant Bauer, Wade Briggs, Torrance combs, Dan Hildebrand, rashana Lynch, ebony Noel, medallion Rahimi, Zuleika Robinson, Sterling Suliman, Susan wooldrich and Anthony Haide
"Michael ovel is also the executive producer and director of pilot."
"Shonda Rhimes, Betsy beers, mark wilding and Michael Goldstein are executive producers."
Star Trek was designed by Heather Mitchell, the screenwriter and executive producer of the show
"It was originally connected to a series on the Internet in May last year."
"It was supposed to be premiered in mid-2017."
"This series is based on Melinda Taub's book of the same name."
Santaland and ABC Studios tell the ending of the famous Romeo and Juliet, depicting the treachery, court intrigue and ill fated romance of the Montagues and Capulets after experiencing the tragic fate of the young lovers
"July 8, Saturday."
"So far, the average audience rating of the show among adults aged 18-49 is only 0.4, and the audience rating of each episode is 1.95 million on the live broadcast plus the same day."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"But let's keep collaborating and show the world that Latinos can change the world when we collaborate."”
“The three-hour show, hosted by Roselyn Sanchez and Jaime Camil, included sizzling performances by Luis Fonsi, Steve Aoki, Alessia Cara, J Balvin, Maluma and Person of the Year Alejandro Sanz, among others.”
“Juanes and Luis Fonsi were among the first winners of the night, with the "Despactio" singer taking home all four awards he was nominated for, including Record of the Year and Song of the Year.”
“Shakira, who is currently on vocal rest and absent from the ceremony, won Best Contemporary Pop Vocal Album for her latest record, El Dorado.”
“ET caught up with Fonsi, who was nominated for four Latin GRAMMYs, before the ceremony, where he expressed how much the awards show means to him.”
“EXCLUSIVE Luis Fonsi on His Influential 20 Year Career and His Mission to Help Rebuild Puerto Rico The Latin GRAMMYs to me are the most important music award for Latin music and to have four nominations is certainly an honor said Fonsi who won his first Latin GRAMMY in 2009”
“...for Aqui Estoy Yo which was awarded Song of the Year...”
“"To have Record of the Year and Song of the Year nominations are two huge categories, those two have a lot of weight,” he added.”
““But, you can’t control whether you win or lose and all the artists that are nominated are amazing, so I’m really just truly blessed to be among a great group of artists that I admire."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"But let's continue to work together and show the world that when we work together, Latinos can change the world."
"The three hour show, hosted by Roslin Sanchez and Jamie Camille, includes the wonderful performances of Louis fonsey, Steve Aoki, alexia Kara, J. Baldwin, maluma and the person of the year Alejandro sands."
Juan and Louis fonsey were the first winners of the night, and the "desperate" singer won four awards he nominated, including record of the year and song of the year
Shakira is currently in the vocal music break period and absent from the award ceremony. She won the best contemporary pop vocal album Award for her latest album "Eldorado"
"Before the award ceremony, et interviewed fonsy, who has been nominated for four Latin Grammy Awards, and he expressed the significance of the award ceremony to him."
"Exclusive Louis foncy has an impact on his 20 years of career and his mission to help rebuild Puerto Rico's Latin Grammy Awards for me is the most important music award for Latin music and winning four nominations, of course, is an honor to say foncy who won his first Latin Grammy Award in 2009."
“… For aqui estoy Yo to be awarded song of the year... "
"Record of the year and song of the year nominations are two huge categories that have a lot of weight," he added
"But you can't control yourself. All the nominated artists are amazing, so I'm really lucky to be one of the great artists I adore."



**Something goes wrong**
“The newlyweds’s appearance came just one month after the pair tied the knot for the Royal Wedding in Windsor.”
“But Prince Harry, 33, saved the day when he sprang into action and helped his new bride as they walked hand-in-hand towards the church in the village of Rochford, Lincolnshire.”
“Meghan appeared to lose her footing as she held on to her floaty £3,922 long-sleeved blue-and-white floral Oscar de la Renta wrap dress.”
“The new Duchess of Sussex had to be steadied by her doting husband Prince Harry as she appeared to slip on the uneven grass pathway grass in her towering four-inch Aquazzura stilettos .”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“We will use your email address only for sending you newsletters.”


"The newlyweds appeared a month after they were married to Windsor royal wedding."
"But Prince Harry, 33, saved the day by suddenly helping his new bride walk hand in hand to the church in Rockford, Lincolnshire
"Megan seems to have lost her foothold with a long sleeve Oscar de la Renta wrap dress with elegant blue and white flowers worth 3922 pounds."
"The new Duchess of Sussex had to be stabilized by her beloved husband, Prince Harry, because she seemed to slip on the uneven grass in her towering four inch water drill heels."
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"We will only use your email address to send you a press release."



**Something goes wrong**
“Related:You May Also Like: Watch This Mom Work Out With Her Little Ones...”
“Then the film also delves into "big feelings," and what kids should do if they feel like certain feelings are making it hard to move about their lives, like finding someone they trust to open up to.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge and soon-to-be mother of three provided a brief introduction for a new short children's film on the subject, titled "Talking Mental Health."”
“"Mental health is how we feel and think," Middleton says in the intro.”
“"[It's] things that can't really be seen but that affect us every day, and talking about them can feel difficult."”
“The animated film was created by The Anna Freud National Centre for Children and Families, a U.K.-based mental health charity focused on children's care.”
“"[The video] helps us all talk about our mental health, what to say, and who to talk to when we have feelings that are too big to manage on our own," Middleton says.”
“In the film, kids (depicted as doodled thumbprints) introduce the concept of "small feelings," or fleeting positive and negative emotions.”
“Specifically, the kids discuss how they deal with unpleasant ones (reading, taking a bath, or eating KFC are suggested as classic cures).”
“These big feelings are ones that stick around too long—and can affect our mental health and how we see the world, the film explains.”


"Related people: you can also like: watching this mother exercise with her children..."
"Then the film also explores" big emotions. "If children feel that certain emotions make their lives difficult to change, such as finding someone they trust to open their heart to them, what should they do?"
The Duchess of Cambridge, who is about to become a mother of three, gave a brief introduction to a new children's short film, "talking about mental health."
"Mental health is the way we feel and think," Middleton said in the introduction
"(it's) things that are invisible but affect us every day, and it's hard to talk about them."
"This animated film was created by Anna Freud's National Center for children and families, a child centered British mental health charity."
"It helps us all talk about our mental health, what we say, and who we should talk to when we have too many relationships to deal with ourselves," Middleton said
In the film, children (depicted as graffiti thumbprints) introduce the concept of "little emotions," transient positive and negative emotions
"Specifically, children will discuss how to deal with unpleasant things (reading, bathing or eating KFC is considered a classic treatment)
"These huge emotions will last too long and affect our mental health and our view of the world," the film explains



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The announcement about Lauer’s firing was made Wednesday morning by Today anchor Savannah Guthrie, who read a note on air from NBC News Chairman Andy Lack:”
“So he’d have to do it within his stable, where he exerted power, and he knew people wouldn’t ever complain.”Representatives for Lauer have not yet responded to Vanity Fair’s request for comment.”
“On Wednesday, mere hours after NBC announced that it had fired the Today anchor because of a complaint about alleged sexual misconduct, Variety has dropped a report with hideous allegations about the TV star’s alleged behavior.”
“The claims run the gamut he made lewd sexual remarks about female colleagues he once invited a female employee to his secluded office then showed her his penis he gave one female colleague a sex toy with an explicit note about how he wanted to use it on her Variety...”
“...writes...”
“The allegations don’t stop there.”
“Lauer would also reportedly quiz female producers about their sex lives and play a crass office themed version of the game fuck marry or kill He also reportedly had a button on his desk that allowed him to lock the door two women tell Variety that it enabled him to...”
“...welcome female employees and initiate inappropriate contact while knowing nobody could walk in on him One former producer who knew firsthand of these encounters also told Variety that Lauer who is married allegedly cheated on his wife...”
““There were a lot of consensual relationships, but that’s still a problem because of the power he held,” this person said.”
““He couldn’t sleep around town with celebrities or on the road with random people, because he’s Matt Lauer and he’s married.”


"The news about Raul's dismissal was announced by today anchor Savannah Guthrie on Wednesday morning, who read a statement by NBC News chairman Andy lake on the radio
"So he had to do it in his own stable, where he exercised power, and he knew that people would never complain." Raul's representatives have yet to respond to vanity fair's request for comment
"On Wednesday, just hours after NBC announced the dismissal of today's anchor, variety dropped a report on a horrific charge of the TV star's alleged sexual behavior."
"These statements cover a wide range. He made obscene remarks to his female colleagues. He once invited a female employee to his secluded office and showed her his penis. He gave a female colleague a sex toy with a clear description of how he wanted to use it in her variety show..."
“… Write
"The charges go beyond that."
"Raul is also reported to ask female producers about their sex lives and play a vulgar version of the office themed game" fuck, get married or kill "- he is also reported to have a button on his desk that allows him to lock the door - two women told variety magazine, which allows him to..."
“…… Welcome female employees and initiate inappropriate contacts knowing that no one can get close to him. A former producer who knows about these encounters also told variety that the married Raul is said to have cheated his wife... "
"There are a lot of consensual relationships, but it's still a problem because of the power he has," the person said
"He can't sleep with celebrities in the city or with casual people on the road because he's Matt Raul and he's married."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow NBC Latino on Facebook, Twitter and Instagram.”
“He also threw a jab at President Trump and the administration's policies.”
“Chris Pizzello / Chris Pizzello/Invision/APPitbull delivered words of encouragement to Latinos and a rebuke of Trump's wall proposal as he was honored with the first-ever Latin AMA Dick Clark Achievement Award at Telemundo’s third annual Latin American Music Awards.”
“The event paid tribute to the most influential and chart-topping Latinx recording artists in the music industry.”
“Mr Worldwide as Pitbull is also known delivered a motivational acceptance speech where he not only reflected on his career and thanked a teacher Hope Martinez who believed in him but reminded the crowd that immigrants built the United States of America Pitbull s family immigrated to the U S”
“...from Cuba...”
“He also gave a shout-out to the victims of the recent hurricanes in the Caribbean and U.S., the earthquakes in Mexico, the fires in California and the mass shooting in Las Vegas.”
“"Live Life, Don't Let Life Live You!"”
“Motivados con las palabras de @Pitbull en los #LatinAMAs pic.twitter.com/AH3gjs5e1T — Telemundo (@Telemundo) October 27, 2017"For the folks that are helpless right now, I want to motivate them and inspire them to stay strong, to rebuild even stronger," Pitbull said in his acceptance speech.”
“All the way from Puerto Rico to Cuba the Keys Houston the earthquakes in Mexico may God bless the souls of those in Las Vegas and to all the fires that are happening right now in Northern California this is the time you ve got to take and really appreciate...”


"Follow NBC Latino on Facebook, twitter and instagram."
"He also attacked the policies of President trump and the government."
"Chris pitzello / Chris pitzello / invasion / appitball won the first ever Latin American Dick Clark achievement award at the third annual Latin American music award of telemundo. He expressed encouragement to Latinos and criticized Trump's wall proposal."
"This event pays tribute to the most influential and top Latin American recording artists in the music industry."
"As we all know, Mr. Pittsburgh from all over the world also delivered an inspiring award-winning speech. He not only reviewed his career, thanks a teacher who trusted him, hope Martinez, but also reminded the audience that immigration made the United States of America, and the Pittsburgh family immigrated to the United States."
“… From Cuba... "
He also called out to the victims of recent hurricanes in the Caribbean and the United States, the earthquake in Mexico, fires in California and mass shootings in Las Vegas
"Live in life, don't let life live on you!"
"The Latin American bullring movement" pic.twitter.com/AH3gjs5e1T -Telemundo (@ telemundo) October 27, 2017 "for those who are helpless now, I want to inspire them, inspire them to stay strong and rebuild stronger," Peter bull said in his award speech
"From Puerto Rico to Cuba, from Houston to Mexico, may God bless the souls of the people in Las Vegas and all the fires that are happening in Northern California. This is a time you must cherish. Thank you very much..."



**Something goes wrong**
“"[34]Ratings [ edit ]Notes [ edit ]a b Live +7 ratings were not available, so Live +3 ratings have been used instead.”
“Executive producers included John Wells and John Riggi, who wrote the pilot script.”
“[18] On September 5, 2018, it was announced that the series had been canceled after one season.”
“[17] On January 16, 2018, it was announced at the annual Television Critics Association's winter press tour that the series would premiere on June 7, 2018.”
“Replacing him in the role of showrunner was fellow executive producer John Wells.”
“[16] On August 14, 2017, it was announced that John Riggi had departed the series citing creative differences.”
“[14][15]On March 30, 2017, it was revealed that the series had been shifted from TV Land to the newly rebranded Paramount Network.”
“[13]On November 7, 2016, it was announced that TV Land had given the production a series order for a first season consisting of 12 episodes, but a premiere date had not been set.”
“The pilot was set to be produced by John Wells Productions in association with Warner Horizon Television.”
“"[33] Metacritic, which uses a weighted average, assigned the series a score of 48 out of 100 based on 10 critics, indicating "mixed or average reviews.”


"[34] rating [Edit] note [Edit] a B live + 7 rating is not available, so live + 3 rating has been used instead."
The executive producers include John Wells and John Reggie, who wrote the pilot script
"[18] on September 5, 2018, it was reported that the series was cancelled after one season of broadcasting."
"[17] on January 16, 2018, at the annual winter reporter tour of the TV Review Association, it was announced that the play will premiere on June 7, 2018."
"Instead of him as showrunner is John Wells, the same executive producer."
"[16] on August 14, 2017, it was reported that John Riggi withdrew from the series on the ground of creative difference."
"[14] [15] on March 30, 2017, it was reported that the play had been transferred from the TV land to the newly renamed paramount network."
"[13] on November 7, 2016, it was reported that TV land had placed an order for 12 episodes of the first season of the series, but the premiere date has not been determined."
"The pilot was CO produced by John Wells productions and Warner horizon."
"[33] Metacritic uses the weighted average method to assign 48 out of 100 points to the series according to the commentators of 10 commentators, which means" mixed commentators or average commentators. "



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, the two broke up a year after getting engaged after Young was at the center of an alleged cheating scandal.”
“"So I was like, 'I'm going to find some sh-t you care about and I'm going to start destroying that,' which was his clothes."”
“During Sunday's episode of "Watch What Happens Live With Andy Cohen," the 27-year-old rapper went into detail about how she burned the designer clothes of her ex fiance Nick Young.”
“"I burned it all, darling," she said.”
“"I burned a lot, and I threw stuff in the pool too.”
“I started off with water and it seemed like that didn't work."”
“When host Andy Cohen asked the "Black Widow" artist about the most expensive item she burned, she replied, "every designer you could think of I burned."”
“"I used to break stuff in our house, and I realized that I was breaking my own sh-t.”
“I was like, 'That's stupid,' and he didn't care," Azalea said.”
“Iggy Azalea Gets Salty Over Rumored Run-In With Ex Nick YoungAzalea explained she and the Golden State Warriors player had a gas fire pit outside.”


"However, the two broke up after a year of engagement because Yang was at the heart of the alleged cheating scandal."
"So I said," I'm going to find something you care about, and I'm going to start destroying it. "That's his clothes."
On Sunday's "watch live with Andy Cohen," the 27 year old rapper details how she burned the designer clothes of her former fiance, Nick Young
"I burned it all, honey," she said
"I'm burning a lot and throwing things into the pool."
"I started with water. It didn't seem to work."
When the host Andy Cohen asked the black widow artist the most expensive thing she burned, she replied, "I've burned every designer you can think of."
"I used to break things at home, and I realized I was breaking my own things."
"I said, 'it's stupid,' and he didn't care," said the cuckoo
"Iggy azalea is upset about the rumored run in with former Nick Young azalea, explaining that she and the Golden State Warriors players have a gas crater outside."



**Something goes wrong**
“She also has previously dated Ryan Gosling and Michael Sheen while he was linked to New Girl’s Zooey Deschanel for two years.”
“The couple began dating in 2016 following McAdams’ split from Taylor Kitsch.”
“Earlier this month, it was reported that she welcomed a son with her boyfriend, screenwriter Jamie Linden.”
“McAdams, meanwhile, has kept mum about her newborn — and her entire pregnancy.”
“(She already shares son Henry, 11, with ex-fiancé Darren Aronofsky and Craig is dad of Ella, 25, from his previous marriage to Fiona Loudon.)”
“Weisz announced earlier this month that she is expecting her first child with husband Daniel Craig.”
“McAdams was joined by her costar Rachel Weisz at the event.”
“She wore a sheer Giambattista Valli dress, which was detailed with ruffles, floral embellishments and a deep V-neckline.”
“The Game Night actress, 39, was on hand to promote her new film, Disobedience, at the Tribeca Film Festival in NYC.”
“Rachel McAdams turned heads as she hit her first red carpet on Tuesday, April 24, since secretly welcoming her first child.”


"She's met with Ryan Gosling and Michael sheen before, and he's been dating Zoe Deschamps in the new girl for two years."
"After McAdams broke up with Tyler Koch, the couple started dating in 2016."
"Earlier this month, it was reported that she had a son with her boyfriend and screenwriter Jamie Linden."
At the same time, McAdams remained silent about her newborn and the entire pregnancy
(she has shared with her ex fiancee Darren arenovsky her son Henry, 11, and Craig, Ella's father, 25, from his previous marriage to Fiona Loudon.)
"Weiz announced earlier this month that she would have her first child with her husband, Daniel Craig."
"Michael Adams was at the event with her partner, Rachel Weitz."
"She was wearing a pure Giambattista Valli dress with frills, floral decorations and a deep V-neck."
The 39 year old "game night" actress promoted her new film "disobedience" at the Tribeca Film Festival in New York
On Tuesday, April 24, Rachel McAdams stepped onto her first red carpet, her first since she secretly welcomed her first child



**Something goes wrong**
“The singer’s fourth album, Sweetener, is expected to arrive later this summer and feature production from Max Martin, Savan Kotecha and Pharrell Williams.”
“A bee appears at the end of the video for No Tears Left to Cry, Grande’s comeback single.”
““It’s the absolute worst of humanity,” she told Time.”
“Grande, 24, appeared on the cover of the magazine’s annual Next Generation Leaders issue and described the ongoing impact of the events of 22 May 2017, when a suicide bomber detonated a homemade shrapnel bomb as fans streamed out of Grande’s concert at Manchester Arena.”
“Twenty-two people were killed and more than 800 injured.”
“Grande said: “Music is supposed to be the safest thing in the world.”
“I think that’s why it’s still so heavy on my heart every single day.”
“I wish there was more that I could fix.”
“You think with time it’ll become easier to talk about.”
“Or you’ll make peace with it.”


The singer's fourth album, sweetener, is expected to be released later this summer, including works by Max Martin, SAVAN Kotka and Farrell Williams
"A bee appears at the end of the video, because there are no tears to cry, grand's comeback single."
"This is definitely the worst time for humanity," she told time
"Grande, 24, appeared on the cover of the magazine's annual Next Generation Leaders magazine, describing the continuing impact of the incident on May 22, 2017, when a suicide bomber detonated a homemade grenade and fans poured out of the Manchester arena's Grande concert."
"22 people died and more than 800 were injured."
"Music should be the safest thing in the world," grand said
"I think that's why my heart is still so heavy every day."
"I hope there are more problems I can solve."
"You think it's going to be easier to talk about over time."
"Or you'll make up with it."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cyrus has only performed at the Grammys once before, joining Taylor Swift for a duet of Swift’s ballad “Fifteen.” Her only nomination was for Bangerz in 2015, which was recognized in the Best Pop Vocal Album category.”
“Sheeran s The A Team with the singer songwriter...”
“In 2010 he was a surprise guest at the end of Lady Gaga s Grammy debut the then new pop star transitioned from a massive Poker Face dance number to a dual piano duet that mashed up her own Speechless with John s Your Song In 2013 John sang Ed...”
“In 2001, he controversially joined Eminem to perform “Stan” as the rapper was at the receiving end of massive scrutiny for his homophobic lyrics.”
“Over the course of the 2000s, John has made several appearances on the Grammy stage to perform alongside notable, young, often burgeoning artists.”
“The pair harmonized and remained faithful to one of John’s most signature tracks.”
“Cyrus took the stage in a ball gown, swaggering with her signature raspy twang for the song’s second verse.”
“John started the performance solo, with a single white rose on his piano as a nod to the Time’s Up movement.”
“Elton John continued his hot streak of Grammy duets with young artists as he joined Miley Cyrus to perform his classic song “Tiny Dancer.” John recently announced the dates of his final tour.”


"Cyrus has only performed once in Grammy before and joined Taylor Swift in the duet of Swift's ballad" fifteen ". Her only nomination is 2015's bangez, which is recognized as the best pop vocal album category. "
"Sheeran and singer songwriter form a team..."
"In 2010, at the end of Lady Gaga's Grammy debut, he became a surprise guest. At that time, the pop star changed from a huge poker face dance number to a double piano duet. In 2013's John sings your song, she mixed her wordlessness with John sings your song."
In 2001, he joined Eminem to perform Stan, which caused controversy because rap singers' gay lyrics were widely censored
In the 21st century, John has appeared on the Grammy stage many times, performing with famous, young and often new artists
"They live in harmony, faithful to one of John's most classic songs."
Cyrus came on stage in a ball dress, swaggering the second part of her song
John began his solo with a white rose on the piano to show his praise for the progress of the times
Elton John and Millie Cyrus performed his classic song "little dancer" together, continuing his hot performance in the duet of Grammy and young artists. John recently announced the date of his last tour



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Getty ImagesThe cast of Love & Hip Hop poke a little fun at Cardi, and give their best Cardi B impression.”
“Getty Images13 And, finally, not at all.”
“And no, it’s not because she dropped her first album and got a major co-sign from none other than Oprah Winfrey.”
“It’s not because she’s about to make history on The Tonight Show or because her album is already certified gold.”
“It’s because she managed to keep her pregnancy (sort of) hidden for something like six or seven months (we’re waiting for due date deets) with some strategic poses and a whole lot of fabric.”
“The rapper announced that she’s expecting while performing on Saturday Night Live, and while some of us are like:We’re still all like:Take a look through the gallery below to see just how Cardi B. kept her baby bump hidden for these past few months.”
“1 By claiming she was just getting fat.”
“Instagram2 With a huge teddy bear from Offset.”
“Instagram3 With strategically placed fur.”
“Getty Images4 By wearing clothes that were too big for her.”


Gatty pictures "love and hip hop" cast a little joke in caddy, which left the best impression on caddy
"Getty took 13 pictures, and in the end, not at all."
"No, it's not because she gave up her first album and got a major co signature, no one else, it's Oprah Winfrey."
"It's not because she's going to make history on the tonight show, it's not because her album has won a gold medal."
"It's because she managed to hide the pregnancy (to some extent) for six to seven months (we're waiting for the due date) with some strategic postures and a lot of cloth."
"The rapper announced that she was looking forward to the live show on Saturday night, and some of us, such as: We" are still all, such as: take a look at the gallery below, and see how Katie B. has hidden his little lump in the past few months. "
"1 claimed she was just getting fat."
"Instagram 2 is with a huge teddy bear."
"Instagram 3 uses a carefully laid out fur."
"Gatty is wearing clothes that are too big for her."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I didn't know that we'd have kids.”
“Happy news: It was announced back in February that the happy couple - pictured at an event in London back in January - were expecting twins togetherHe said: '[I'm] even happier [than before].”
“Bundles of joy It was revealed that the human rights lawyer 39 gave birth to a girl Ella and a boy Alexander on Tuesday morning in England as they are pictured in Paris back in February According to the publication the women who stay in that section of the hospital...”
“The stars are believed to have paid up to £8,520 ($11,000) for a private suite in the Kensington Wing according to a Tuesday report from Daily Mirror.”
“The couple welcomed the two new bundles of joy at London's Chelsea and Westminster Hospital.”
“On her doorstep The couple welcomed the two new bundles of joy at London s Chelsea and Westminster Hospital The announcement ended with the quip George is sedated and should recover in a few days...”
“Upmarket E Side is an upmarket shop specialising in gifts in Gerrard s Cross London and brands itself as The Family Store for Modern Organic Living Heading home Baria was seen clambering into a taxi following her shopping session Comfort first The new grandmother slipped her feet into sensible brogues...”
“'Ella, Alexander and Amal are all healthy, happy and doing fine.'”
“'This morning Amal and George welcomed Ella and Alexander Clooney into their lives,' a spokesperson for the 56-year-old actor said in a statement.”
“...morning in England...”


"I didn't know we were going to have children."
"Good news: as early as February, there was news that the happy couple - photographed at an event in London in January - were pregnant with twins - and he said," I'm happier than ever. "
"A bunch of joy it is reported that the 39 year old human rights lawyer gave birth to a girl Ella and a boy Alexander in the UK on Tuesday morning. Their photos in Paris in February were taken according to the magazine women in the part of the hospital..."
"The stars are believed to have paid as much as 8520 pounds (US $11000) for their private suite in Kensington wing, the Daily Mirror reported on Tuesday
"The couple ushered in these two new happy combinations at London's Chelsea and Westminster hospitals
"On her doorstep, the couple welcomed the two new happy couples at London's Chelsea and Westminster hospitals. The last quip of the announcement is: George is calm and should recover in a few days... "
"Up market e side is Gerald's high-end gift shop in London's cross street. It has built itself into a modern organic household goods shop and is going home. Barria climbed into a taxi after shopping. First of all, the new grandmother put her foot into the smart little room... "
"Ella, Alexander and Amar are healthy and happy. Everything is fine."
"This morning, Amar and George Welcome Ella and Alexander Clooney into their lives," a spokesman for the 56 year old actor said in a statement
“… In the morning in England... "



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“You guys might not see me posting that much for a little while.”
“MTV's reboot of the beloved reality series, titled Jersey Shore Family Vacation, has the show's stars reuniting -- with the exception of Sammi "Sweetheart" Giancola.”
“On Thursday, Nicole "Snooki" Polizzi and the gang had not even touched down in the Sunshine State before they were sharing selfies.”
“"And we’re off!"”
“Snooki captioned a pic of herself with Jennifer "JWoww" Farley and Deena Nicole Cortese.”
“"Get ready for a wild season kids ??”
“#JSFamilyReunion #JesusTakeTheWheel #ThisIsReallyHappening."”
“Cortese also shared a selfie while en route to Miami, writing: "Got my coffee.. 4 suitcases and a little bit of meatball fire left in my soul .. out Jersey!!”
“See you in a month."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"You may not see so many posts from me for the time being."
MTV has re launched the reality TV series "Jersey Shore family vacation," where the stars are reunited - except for Sammi "sweetheart" Giancola
"On Thursday, Nicole Polizzi and the gang were not even in sunshine state before they shared their selfie."
"We're going!"
Snooky added a title to his photo with Jennifer Farley and Dina Nicole Curtis
"Get ready for the wild season, children?"
"# jsfamilyreunion # Jesus takes the wheel # it's true."
Curtis also shared a self portrait on his way to Miami, writing: "my coffee.. Four suitcases and a little meatball fire in my soul.. Leave Jersey! "
"See you in a month."



**Something goes wrong**
“...on Monday...”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“The actresses had an honest conversation during the latest episode of Pinkett Smith’s Red Table Talk Facebook Watch show in which they hashed out the miscommunication that led to them not speaking for 17 years.”
“Though neither of them can pinpoint what it was that caused a rift, both Pinkett Smith, 46, and Union, 45, say that they felt tension with each other for almost two decades.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““This is a very special show for me, because what I decided to do was make this about creating a new girlfriend,” Pinkett Smith said to her mom and co-host, Adrienne Banfield-Jones, 64.”
“Gab and I we had a bit of a break we don t know how and she s been open to this healing she s been open to this conversation Image zoom Jada Pinkett Smith and Gabrielle Union Credit Jason Merritt Getty Paras Griffin Getty Before the show Pinkett Smith...”
“...called Union and invited her on the Girlfriends episode after not speaking for so long...”
““It felt so good on the phone with you to even just go, ‘Hey, I’m sorry that I didn’t even take the time to talk to you,’ you know?” Pinkett Smith explained to Union.”
““And then I had to just apologize and just thinking to myself, ‘Damn, Jada!”


“… Monday... "
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"In Pinkett Smith's latest" red table talk "Facebook watch, the two actresses have a frank conversation, in which they analyze in detail the communication mistakes that led to their 17 years of silence."
"Although they are not sure what caused the rift, pinkert Smith, 46, and Eun, 45, both say they have felt the tension between them for nearly 20 years."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It was a very special show for me because what I decided to do was create a new girlfriend," pinkert Smith told her mother and co host, Adrian Banfield Jones, 64
"Gaby and I, we're a little bit rested, we don't know how, she's open to this healing, and she's opened this dialogue image to zoom in on ZAD pinzit Smith and Gabriel Alliance Credit Jason gety Palas Griffin gety's previous performance Pinkett Smith..."
“… Call the league and invite her to "girlfriend" because she hasn't spoken for a long time
"It's nice to talk to you on the phone. I even said, 'Hey, I'm sorry, I didn't even take the time to talk to you,'" you know? "Pinkert Smith explained to the union."
"Then I had to apologize and say to myself, 'damn it, Jada



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I have fond memories of Sunday roasts in pubs with log fires, and it's something I want to recreate."”
“Mr Brooksbank is reportedly distantly related to Princess Eugenie.”
“Mr Brooksbank, 32, was introduced to Eugenie, 28, while they were skiing at the royal hotspot of Verbier in Switzerland in 2010.”
“He described it as "love at first sight".”
“While on holiday in Nicaragua in January this year, Mr Brooksbank proposed to Eugenie, the youngest daughter of Prince Andrew, Duke of York, and Sarah, Duchess of York.”
“The wedding will take place at St George's Chapel in Windsor at 11am this Friday.”
“AdvertisementPlease use Chrome browser for a more accessible video player Eugenie: An 'incredible' proposalIn the limelight since birth, a lot is known of Princess Eugenie - but who is Jack Brooksbank?”
“:: FamilyHe is the son of company director and chartered accountant George and his wife Nicola, who are both in their sixties.”
“Mr Brooksbank has a younger brother, Thomas, who is his best man.”
“His grandmother on his mother's side, Joanna Newton, 91, told The Sun her grandson was a "charming boy" but "not the most intelligent".”


"I have good memories of Sunday barbecue in a bar with firewood, which I want to recreate."
"Brooksbank is reported to be a distant relative of Princess Eugenie."
"Mr. Brooksbank, 32, was introduced to Eugenie, 28, when they were skiing in the Swiss Royal hot spot Weber in 2010."
He described it as "love at first sight"
In January this year, Brooksbank proposed to Prince Andrew, Duke of York, and Eugenie, the youngest daughter of Sarah, Duchess of York
"The wedding will take place at 11 a.m. this Friday at St. George's Church in Windsor."
"Please use Chrome browser to provide Eugenie with a more accessible video player: This is an 'incredible' proposal. People have known a lot about Princess Eugenie since she was born - but who is Jack Brooksbank?"
He is the son of George, a director and chartered accountant of the company, and his wife, Nicholas, who are both in their 60s
"Mr. Brooksbank has a brother, Thomas, who is his best man."
His grandmother sided with his mother, and Joanna Newton, 91, told the sun that her grandson was a "charming boy," but "not the smartest."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...in a Motion Picture Baby Driver Dunkirk Logan War For The Planet Of The Apes Wonder Woman...”
“Performance by an Ensemble in a Comedy Series Black ish Curb Your Enthusiasm GLOW Orange is the New Black Veep Outstanding Action Performance by a Stunt Ensemble in a Comedy or Drama Series Game of Thrones GLOW Homeland Stranger Things The Walking Dead Outstanding Action Performance by a Stunt Ensemble...”
“Olivia Munn and Niecy Nash revealed the nominees from the Pacific Design Center in West Hollywood.”
“TNT, TBS, and truTV aired the announcement, which was also available to stream online, starting at 7 a.m. PT/10 a.m ET.”
“Presenters were joined by SAG-AFTRA president Gabrielle Carteris, SAG Awards committee chair JoBeth Williams, and SAG Awards committee member Elizabeth McLaughlin.”
““Big Little Lies,” “Stranger Things,” and “GLOW” each scored four nods on the TV side, while “Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri” landed four nominations and “Lady Bird” received three for film.”
“Kristen Bell will host the SAG Awards on Jan. 21.”
“The ceremony, recognizing top performances in television and film, will air live on both TNT and TBS at 8 p.m.”
“ET.”
“Here is the full list of nominations Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Leading Role Timothee Chalamet Call Me by Your Name James Franco The Disaster Artist Daniel Kaluuya Get Out Gary Oldman Darkest Hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in...”


“… In a movie, baby driver Dunkirk Logan fights for Wonder Woman on ape planet... "
"Ensemble performance in comedy series black suppresses your enthusiasm and glows orange is the new black veep outstanding action performance of stunt ensemble in comedy or drama series game of Thrones shining home stranger's thing stunt ensemble walking dead outstanding action performance..."
"Olivia Munn and nice Nash revealed the nominees for the Pacific Design Center in West Hollywood."
TNT, TBS and truTV broadcast the announcement at 7:00 a.m. / 10:00 a.m. EST, which can also be broadcast online
Gabrielle carteris, chairman of the sag awards committee, and Elizabeth McLaughlin, member of the sag awards committee.
"Lies big and small", "strange things" and "glory" each received four nominations for television, "three billboards out of Missouri" received four nominations, and "Lady Bird" received three nominations for film
"Christine bell will host the sag awards ceremony on January 21."
The awards ceremony will be broadcast live on TNT and TBS at 8 pm in recognition of top TV and film performances
"Wait a minute."
"The following is the list of nominations for the outstanding performance of timothee chalamet. Please call me James Franco disaster artist Daniel Kaluuya get out Gary Oldman darkest hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel ESQ's outstanding performance..."



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Getty ImagesThe 25-year-old wore a long-sleeved pink Valentino turtleneck dress, strappy red Stuart Weitzman heels, and a green clutch.”
“...of Icons By Carine Roitfeld on Friday...”
“A source has now revealed to People that The Weeknd scheduled his 'Starboy: Legend of the Fall' tour around her surgery so he could spend time with her while she recuperated.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“In a post to Instagram, the 25-year-old revealed her best friend Francia Raisa had donated the kidney.”
“15 September 2017: The Weeknd scheduled his tour around Selena's surgeryYesterday afternoon, Gomez shocked the world when she announced she had undergone a major kidney transplant over the summer as a a result of her Lupus, much to her fans dismay.”
“As usual, Gomez was happy to pose with fans that spotted her at the concert.”
“Selena having fun with her new puppy, video from Selena’s Instagram Story https://t.co/sdhCyIt1H7 pic.twitter.com/nzn9SsY9Yu — Wasa Miroshnichenko (@SELENATORSS) September 10, 201717 September: Selena supports The Weeknd at concertThe Weeknd played in Philadelphia on Saturday night, and in Washington D.C. on Friday.”


The 25-year-old is wearing a pink Valentino high collar long sleeve dress, red Stuart Weitzman heels and a green handbag
"Karin rothfield Friday's Idol"
"A source now reveals that this week he has arranged his own" star boy: The Legend of autumn "tour around her surgery so that he can be with her while she recovers."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"In an instagram post, the 25-year-old revealed that her best friend, Francia Raisa, had donated a kidney."
"September 15, 2017: his tour in Selena's operating room was arranged this week. Yesterday afternoon, Gomez shocked the world by announcing that she had received a large kidney transplant in the summer due to lupus, which made her fans very frustrated."
"As usual, Gomez is very happy to take pictures with her fans at the concert."
Serena and her new puppy are having a good time. This is a video of Serena's instagram story https://t.co/sdhCyIt1H7pic.twitter.com/nzn9SsY9Yu-Wasa  Miroshnichenko (@ selenatorss) September 10, 2017 September: Serena supports concerts in Philadelphia and Washington over the weekend



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“According to BuzzFeed Canada, the restaurant staff members, many Neeson aficionados among them, put the sign up early Tuesday, and by the afternoon, the action star had made an appearance.”
“And as the Key & Peele valets learned, if you wish hard enough for Neeson, he shall appear.”
“The Vancouver-area Big Star Sandwich heard the Taken star was in town filming the upcoming Hard Powder, so put up a sign with the words "Liam Neeson eats here for free" on one side and "Come in and get Taken away by our sandwiches" on the other.”
“This sandwich shop offered Liam Neeson free food — and then he showed up to collectLiam Neeson has a very particular set of preferences when it comes to food: Make it free.”


"According to buzzfeed Canada, the staff of the restaurant, including a lot of Nissen fans, put up the sign early on Tuesday morning, and in the afternoon, action stars have appeared."
"As key and peel's attendants know, if you have enough desire for Nissen, he will show up."
"The big star sandwich in Vancouver heard that the star who was taken away was shooting the coming hard powder in the city, so on one side there was a sign that said 'Liam Nison is here for free' and on the other side it said 'come in and be taken away by our sandwich.'"
"This sandwich shop provides free food for Liam Nissen - and then he shows up to collectors. Liam Nissen has a very special preference for food: free."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She allegedly accused Lauer of inviting her to his hotel room late at night while covering the Winter Olympics in Sochi, Russia in 2014.”
“"[Annette] is feeling shocked and she is now having sorrow for her children.”
“Dec 7, 2017AceShowbiz - In the wake of his sexual harassment scandal, Matt Lauer and his wife Annette Roque reportedly have removed their wedding rings.”
“Lauer, who was recently fired from NBC's "Today", was spotted in Sag Harbor, New York near the couple's properties on Wednesday, December 5.”
“He was noticeably seen without his wedding ring.”
“Donning a blue knitted top, the 59-year-old TV host was snapped heading out for a breakfast.”
“Former model Roque was also photograpped in the Sag Harbor area on the same day, also without her wedding ring.”
“This marks a huge change as Lauer was still seen wearing the ring two days ago.”
“Roque's father, Henri, revealed to Daily Mail that things in the pair's marriage turned bad after Lauer was accused of sexually harassing a female employee of "Today".”
“Speaking from his apartment near Amsterdam, Henry shared, "'I have no words for her husband.”


"She is alleged to have accused Raul of inviting her to her hotel room late at night while covering the 2014 Winter Olympics in Sochi, Russia."
"(Annette) shocked. She's sad for her children now."
"December 7, 2017, aceshowbiz - after his sexual harassment scandal, Matt Raul and his wife, Annette rock, were reported to have taken off their wedding rings."
Raul was recently fired by NBC's today and was found near the couple's home in Sag Harbor, New York, on Wednesday, December 5
"Obviously he didn't have a wedding ring."
The 59 year old TV host was photographed out for breakfast in a blue knitted shirt
"Former model rock was also photographed in the saga harbor area on the same day, without her wedding ring."
"It's a big change because Raul was wearing a ring two days ago."
Rock's father, Henry, told the daily mail that Raul's marital status deteriorated after he was accused of sexually harassing a female employee of today
"I have nothing to say to her husband," Henry said in his apartment near Amsterdam



**Something goes wrong**
“Until then, this sneak peek of Season 13 will more than whet your appetite.”
“We'll see what else Kelly and the rest of the RHOC gang has been up to when the new season premieres Monday, July 16 at 9/8c.”
“Find Out What Lala Kent Does That Confuses Lisa Vanderpump Lala Kent Was Tupac In a Past Life According to Her Ariana Madix Shares How Her Mom Once Has a Ghostly Experience with Her Late Dad Watch James Kennedy Create a Brand New Track in the Studio Right Before Your...”
“Eyes Kelly Dodd Learns the Dos and Don ts of Dating in Orange County You Have to Watch Kelly Dodd Use a Chainsaw Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos sweepstakes and more...”
“Kelly Dodd and Michael Dodd are one big, happy family following their divorce, and we have the photo to prove it.”
“Kelly reunited with her ex-husband Michael over the weekend to celebrate their daughter Jolie's 12th birthday.”
“The pair watched their daughter ring in the big 1-2 with a fun and fabulous meal at Benihana surrounded by friends.”
“Kelly and Michael seem to be on good terms in the photo posted by Kelly on Instagram this weekend.”
“The two are all smiles as they pose for a picture at the restaurant with Jolie (second from left in the bottom row) and her friends.”
“At Benihana!!”


"Until then, this episode of season 13 will not only stimulate your appetite."
"We'll see what Kelly and other RhoC members have done at the new season premiere on Monday, July 16, at 9 / 8 degrees Celsius."
"Find out what Lala Kent has done to confuse Lisa vanderpump. Lala Kent's past life was shared by Tupac according to her Ariana madices. Her mother once had a ghostly experience with her late father to watch James Kennedy create a brand new track in the studio before your..."
"Eye kylido learned to do and don't do dating in Orange County you have to watch Kelly Dodd use a chainsaw to create a free profile to get an exclusive video unlimited lucky draw and more..."
"Kelly Dodd and Michael Dodd are a happy family after their divorce, and we have photos to prove that."
"Kelly reunited with her ex husband Michael over the weekend to celebrate her daughter Julie's 12th birthday."
"Surrounded by friends, they watched their daughter have an interesting and wonderful dinner in benihana, and they started their heartstrings in the big 1-2."
"According to the photos Kelly posted on instagram this weekend, Kelly and Michael seem to have a good relationship."
"When they posed for a picture with Julie (second from the left in the next row) and her friends in the restaurant, they were all smiles."
"In benihana!"



**Something goes wrong**
““Dancing’s over, that’s a bummer, but I’m really looking forward to the future and definitely spending more time with the business and Vanessa.””
“...report didn’t mention that “Star Trek” legend William Shatner, a rabid, high-profile “Dancing WIth the Stars” fan, campaigned against Viall.”
“The recent “Bachelor” star said the right things before the cameras, gushing about Murgatroyd and the whole “DWTS” experience, saying, “I had such an amazing time with Peta.”
“She’s a fantastic partner; we had fun all the time.”But behind the scenes it might have been a different story, with Viall reportedly attributing his failure to win enough votes from viewers to people and situations beyond his ballroom dance abiilty, according to the tabloid OK!”
“Viall felt that Murgatroyd, who gave birth earlier this year, didn’t give it her all.”
“He also was telling other cast members that he thought he was facing backlash over the recent arrest of fellow “Bachelor” alum Chris Soules, a source told OK!”
“Soules, who competed on Season 19 of “The Bachelor” in 2015, was arrested last week in connection with a truck crash in Iowa that killed a 66-year-old farmer.”
“Soules has been charged with leaving the scene of a traffic fatality and is being investigated for possibly driving under the influence at the time of the crash.”
““He was not in a good mood after being eliminated and told cast members that he felt like Chris Soules’ incident had an impact on him,” an insider told OK!”
““Basically, he was blaming everyone else but himself.”The OK!”


"I'm depressed that the dance is over, but I'm really looking forward to the future and will definitely spend more time with the business and Vanessa."
“…… There is no mention in the report of Star Trek legend William Shatner, a fanatical, high-profile fan of dance with the stars, who launched a campaign against Villar
The recent "Bachelor" star said the right thing in front of the camera, talking endlessly about mugartroyd and the whole "DWTS" experience, saying, "I had a wonderful time with PETA."
"She's a great partner and we've always been happy." But according to the tabloid "OK!"
"Villar feels that mugartroyd, who gave birth earlier this year, didn't give her everything."
He also told other actors that he thought he was facing a backlash because of the recent arrest of colleague "Bachelor" alumni Chris sules, a source told OK
"Sules, who competed in season 19 of Bachelor in 2015, was arrested last week in connection with a truck collision in Iowa that killed a 66 year old farmer."
"Sules has been charged with leaving the scene of the accident and is under investigation for possible drunk driving at the time of the accident."
"He was in a bad mood after he was eliminated and told the crew that he felt the Chris sules incident had an impact on him," an insider told OK
"Basically, he's blaming others, not himself."! "



**Something goes wrong**
““She motivates me more than anyone,” Asghari continued.”
“They’ve become known for their couples workout videos which show off their physical fitness and affection for each other.”
“Britney Spears and her boyfriend Sam Asghari posted a video on Wednesday night which gave fans a hilarious glimpse at what the singer is really like when she’s hungry.”
“In the Instagram clip, Spears and Asghari start off walking hand in hand down a hallway.”
“As they walk, you can hear Asghari complimenting Spears on her outfit.”
“But then she interrupts him and asks where they’ll be eating.”
“When he says “steakhouse,” she gets a goofy expression on her face and runs off, to which Asghari replies, “I think she’s really hungry.”Spears confirmed that in the caption of her video.”
““I was freaking hungry.” she wrote.”
“Britney Spears and Sam Asghari have often given fans behind the scenes peeks into their relationship via posts on Instagram.”
“Britney also regularly shares heartwarming photos of them looking very much in love.”


"She inspires me more than anyone else," asgali continued
"They're famous for couple fitness videos that show their health and their feelings for each other."
"Britney Spears and her boyfriend Sam asgali released a video on Wednesday night that showed fans what the singer looked like when he was hungry."
In the instagram video, spears and Ashley walk hand in hand in the corridor
"As they walk, you can hear askari praising her equipment."
"But then she interrupted him and asked where they were eating."
When he said "Steakhouse," she ran away with a silly look on her face, and asgali replied, "I think she's really hungry." Spears confirmed this in the title of the video
"I'm starving." She wrote
"Britney Spears and Sam asgali often let fans spy on their relationship behind the scenes through instagram posts."
"Britney also often shares warm photos of their love affair."



**Something goes wrong**
“With so many kids’ costumes to choose from, you’ll find just the thing for your kiddo before you can say “trick-or-treat.””
“They make dressing up for trick-or-treating a cinch.”
“Don’t forget to take a look at our easy Halloween costumes.”
“We have pirate costumes, animal costumes, ninja costumes, vampire costumes, witch and zombie costumes, gaming costumes, LOL Surprise costumes, JoJoSiwa costumes and more.”
“Our huge selection of kids’ Halloween costumes includes licensed-character costumes from Marvel, Toy Story, Lego, Star Wars, Harry Potter, Justice League, Spider-Man, Disney Princess, Frozen and Disney Descendants.”
“With hundreds of fun Halloween costumes for kids, we’re sure to have the perfect disguise for your little monster.”
“Totally.”
“Scary costumes?”
“Yep.”
“Funny costumes?”


"There are so many children's clothes to choose from. Before you say 'trick or treat', you will find the right clothes for your children."
"They make up to trick or treat."
"Don't forget to look at our relaxed Halloween costumes."
"We have pirate clothing, animal clothing, ninja clothing, vampire clothing, witch and zombie clothing, game clothing, lol surprise clothing, josiwa clothing and so on."
"We have a wide range of children's Halloween costumes, including Marvel comics, toy story, LEGO toys, star wars, Harry Potter, justice alliance, spider man, Disney Princess, Freeman and the authorized role costumes of Disney descendants."
"We've prepared hundreds of fun costumes for children, and we will provide perfect camouflage for your little monsters."
"Absolutely right."
"Terrible clothes?"
"Yes."
"Funny clothes?"



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kim Kardashian confirmed later that month that she was expecting her third child via surrogate in the season 14 trailer of “Keeping Up with the Kardashians.””
“The news was first reported in September, the same month news outlets also said older sister Khloe Kardashian was also expecting her first child with boyfriend Tristan Thompson.”
“No Photoshop, #nofilter, no additives, no preservatives.”KHLOE KARDASHIAN REPORTEDLY PREGNANT IN ADDITION TO SISTER KYLIE JENNERJenner and the Kardashian family have not confirmed or denied reports that the reality star is expecting her first child with boyfriend, Travis Scott.”
“The site later posted: “DailyMail.com can confirm that these pictures have not been Photoshopped.”X17Online, who hired the photographer who took the photos, also defended the images of Jenner and said they are “100% REAL!”
“Kylie debuts her bump for the first time as she hides pregnant figure under baggy clothes.” Jenner is pictured in black Yeezy “Calabasas” sweatshirt and sweatpants at a small airport.”
“The Daily Mail published the exclusive paparazzi photos on Sunday in an article titled, “It's baby Jenner!”
“Check the car line."”
“She later retweeted: "This was edited!!!”
“Check for the crooked lines in the background.2nd photo is clearly altered,” Jenner tweeted with two images that have since been deleted.”
“Jenner tweeted the photos of herself on Sunday that were originally posted on the Daily Mail and said they were “clearly altered.”“First of all if you’re going to photoshop my photos blogs/paps!!”


"Kim Kardashian confirmed later that month that she gave birth to her third child through surrogacy in the season 14" keep up with Kardashian "trailer
"The news was first reported in September, and the same month news media also said that sister Khloe Kardashian was looking forward to her first child with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson."
"No Photoshop, no filters, no additives, no preservatives." In addition to her sister Kylie Jenner and Kardashian's family, Kardashian is reported to be pregnant. The reality star is reported to be pregnant with his boyfriend Travis Scott for the first time
"The website later announced:" Daily Mail x17online hired the photographer who took the photos, and he also defended Jenner's photos, saying they were "100% real!"
"It's the first time Kelly has hidden her pregnant body under loose clothes. It's the first time she has a lump." Jenna was wearing a black yeezy "Calabasas" sweatshirt and sweatpants at a small airport
The daily mail published an exclusive photo of the paparazzi on Sunday with the headline "this is Jenna baby!"
"Check the car wiring."
She later forwarded: "it's the editor's!"
"Check for distorted lines in the background," Jenner tweeted. The second photo was obviously tampered with. " Two photos were later deleted
Jenna tweeted her own photos on Sunday, which were originally published in the daily mail, saying they were "obviously modified." "First of all, if you want to use Photoshop to deal with my photo blog / dad!"



**Something goes wrong**
““He’s a lover, not a judger.””
““Justin is so supportive and I don’t think that he would honestly have a strong opinion in that way,” Upton said.”
“Model Kate Upton and Houston Astros Justin Verlander looked happier than ever walking down the aisle moments after saying their vows in a romantic Tuscan wedding on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple capped off their picture-perfect week by tying the knot in an intimate ceremony after Upton cheered Verlander on in a special Houston Astros necklace and rushing the field as his team took the final win in the World Series last week.”
“The Sports Illustrated cover model couldn’t help but share the excitement of becoming Mrs. Verlander with her fans on Instagram a few days after the ceremony.”
““I feel so lucky that I got to marry my best friend!!”
“@justinverlander Thank you to our family and friends for making this weekend so fun and magical!” Upton captioned a photo of the couple walking down the aisle.”
“Image zoom Credit: KT MerryFor the ceremony, Upton wore a beautiful and classic long-sleeved lace white Valentino gown with a long white veil and carried a bouquet of peach, light pink and ivory flowers.”
“Verlander looked dapper in a classic black tuxedo with a white flower pinned onto his lapel.”


"He's a lover, not a judge."
"Justin is so supportive of me that I don't think he really has such a strong opinion," Upton said
"After models Kate Upton and Houston's Astro Boy Justin Verlander made their vows at a romantic wedding in Tuscany on Saturday, the moment they went to the wedding seemed happier than ever."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Upton is wearing a special Houston astronomy necklace to cheer for willand. His team won the last World Series last week, and the couple put an end to their perfect week at an intimate wedding."
"A few days after the award ceremony, the Sports Illustrated cover model couldn't help sharing the excitement of becoming Mrs. Verlander with her fans on instagram."
"I feel very lucky, I married my best friend!"
"@ justinverlander thanks our family and friends for making this weekend so fun and amazing! "Upton added a title to a photo of a couple walking down the aisle."
"Credit for image zooming: at the ceremony, Upton was wearing a beautiful and classic white Valentino long sleeve lace robe with a long white veil and holding a bunch of peach, light pink and ivory flowers."
"Verlander looks smart in a classic black evening dress with a white flower pinned to his lapel."



**Something goes wrong**
“But it’s telling that Williams, unlike her older sister, Venus, routinely allows...”
“...she didn t lose a set during her seven match tear though she was secretly eight weeks pregnant...”
“On TV Tennis Channel commentator Mary Carillo captured what s changed for Williams in three words Here comes Mom Williams is 36 and seemingly unfettered by age having won 10 of her 23 Grand Slam titles since her 30th birthday the last of them at the 2017 Australian Open where...”
“Harry two weekends ago...”
“As she took center court Tuesday at the French Open her first Grand Slam tournament in 16 months Williams skipped wearing a traditional tennis skirt and came out rocking a black full length Lycra bodysuit and the braids she wore at her friend Meghan Markle s royal wedding to Prince...”
“Tiptoeing has never been Serena Williams’ style.”
“It was no surprise she walked back on-court in Paris with a splashdown that soon had her trending on Twitter.”


"But it shows that Williams, unlike her sister Venus, usually allows..."
“… She hasn't lost a set in seven games, even though she has been secretly pregnant for eight weeks... "
"Commentator Mary Carrillo on the TV network channel recorded the changes of Williams in three words. Williams' mother is 36 years old and seems not to be limited by age. Since her 30th birthday, she has won 10 of 23 Grand Slam titles, and the last one is in the 2017 Australian Open..."
"Harry, two weekends ago..."
"Williams made her first Grand Slam at the French Open on Tuesday, skipping the traditional tennis skirt, wearing a black Lycra tights and the braids she wore at her friend Megan markel's royal wedding to the prince..."
"It's never been Serena Williams' style to stand on tiptoe."
"It's no surprise that she's been on the pitch in Paris and soon became popular on twitter."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Congrats to the soon-to-be newlyweds!”
“...wedding including their bachelor and bachelorette parties...”
“11 22 16 A post shared by Keyshia Ka oir Davis keyshiakaoir on Oct 16 2017 at 6 17am PDT The Wopsters will officially become one in a live wedding special airing on BET which will be followed by a 10 episode docuseries chronicling the events leading up to the...”
“Gucci, born Radric Davis, proposed to the Jamaican beauty in November of 2016 with a 25-carat ring while they sat courtside at an Atlanta Hawks basketball game.”
“The star bought Ka’Oir a turquoise Rolls Royce Wraith, and of course he got one too!”
“Gucci had a surprise in store for his bride-to-be that left her week in the knees.”
“#MrDavis and #MrsDavis A post shared by Gucci Mane (@laflare1017) on Oct 16, 2017 at 7:24pm PDTBut the gifts didn’t stop there.”
“Davis” and a diamond-encrusted bow tie chain that she requested he wear during their nuptials.”
“Wedding tomorrow 10-17-2017 A post shared by Gucci Mane (@laflare1017) on Oct 16, 2017 at 6:35pm PDTBefore officially becoming Mrs. Davis, Ka’Oir gifted her groom-to-be with a necklace that says “Mr.”
“During their rehearsal dinner, the couple wore matching red formal attire and were all smiles as they swapped early wedding presents.”


"Congratulations to the new couple who is going to get married!"
“… Weddings, including their singles and singles parties... "
"11 22 16 keyshia kaoir Davis keyshiakaoir's post at 6:17 am on October 16, 2017, wopsters will officially become a member of bet's live wedding special program, and then there will be a 10 episode docusers, recording that leads to "This is a very important event."
"In November 2016, radric Davis born Gucci sat on the sideline of a basketball game in Atlanta Hawks and proposed to the Jamaican beauty with a 25 carat ring."
"The star bought cahor a turquoise Rolls Royce ghost, and of course he bought one too!"
"Gucci has prepared a surprise for his bride to be, which has made her suffer in the past week."
"Mr Davis and Mr Davis, this is an article that gucci mane (@ laflare1017) shared on PDT at 7:24 p.m. on October 16, 2017, but the gift doesn't stop here."
"Davis" and a diamond set Bow Necklace, she asked him to wear at the wedding
"Tomorrow's wedding 17 October 2017 gucci mane (@ laflare1017) at 6:35 p.m. on 16 October 2017, before officially becoming Mrs. Davis, ka'oir gave her bridegroom a necklace with the words" Mr. "on it
"At the rehearsal dinner, the couple wore matching red suits and were smiling as they exchanged early wedding gifts."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jenna, 35, was understandably eager to see a picture of 'swaddled Mike', and while Savannah said she did take one, she added that she 'probably can't find it right now'.”
“I think I can swaddle you if you are willing,' she said.”
“'So this is supposed to alleviate stress?”
“Savannah then asked Matt to put his feet in the fetal position, so she could lift the bottom of the blank up towards his head.”
“'You know a swaddle is really supposed to mimic the womb.'”
“'You've got to get a nice good tuck because I want you to feel safe,' she said as she pushed the blanket under his side.”
“...the sheet under Matt s sidMatt admitted that being swaddled was actually making him feel more stressed Savannah had Matt lie down on the blanket and put his head on the pillow behind him before she draped one end of the cover over his body...”
“Swaddling pro Savannah who gave birth to her son Charley in December had Matt lie on a large blanket while she draped it over him Getting started The mother of two carefully tucked the sheet under Matt s side Not a fan Getting started The mother of two carefully tucked...”
“Matt took off his jacket to keep it from getting wrinkled, and before they got started, Savannah joked that the baby blanket is a 'little big', telling her co-star: 'You are a bigger baby than most.'”
“I have two kids under three.”


"It's understandable that Jenna, 35, is eager to see a picture of" wrapped Mike. "Although Savannah said she did take one, she added that she" may not be able to find it now. "
"I think I can wrap you up if you want," she said
"So it's for stress relief?"
"Then Savannah asked Matt to put his feet in the position of the fetus so that she could lift the bottom of the hair follicle towards his head."
"You know, swaddling is supposed to imitate the uterus."
"You need to take a good nap because I want you to feel safe," she said, pushing the blanket under him
“…… The sheet under Matt s sidmatt admits that being wrapped actually makes him feel more stressed. Savannah asks Matt to lie on the blanket, put his head on the pillow behind him, and then she puts one end of the quilt over him... "
"Savannah, the swaddling expert who gave birth to her son Charlie in December, let Matt lie on a big blanket. She covered him with the blanket and began to carefully stuff the sheets on Matt's side instead of a fan. At first, the mother of two carefully stuffed the sheets on Matt's side..."
"Matt took off his jacket to prevent wrinkles. Before they started, Savannah joked that the baby blanket was a little big and told her partner: 'you're bigger than most people.'"
"I have two children under three."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Bridges, who looked somewhat embarrassed, posed with Mirren, the jet ski and the life jacket on stage as the show concluded.”
“At the end of the ceremony Kimmel revealed that Phantom Thread costume designer Mark Bridges won the prize, with his speech clocking in at around 30 seconds long.”
““Obviously I’m not going to win the ski,” joked Gary Oldman during his speech for Darkest Hour.”
“The running gag ran throughout the evening, and was referenced by several winners.”
“I have a stopwatch,” he added.”
““I will be timing you.”
“Not saying you shouldn’t give a long speech, but whoever gives the shortest speech tonight will go home with — Johnny, tell them what they’ll win.”Cue the curtain opening to reveal the jet ski, presented by Helen Mirren.”
“So here’s what we’re going to do.”
“He said: “This is a really long show.”
“He was referencing an age old Oscars complaint, that the show – especially the speeches – were too long.”


"Bridges looked a little embarrassed, and at the end of the show, he took a picture on stage with Mirren, the motorboat and the life jacket."
At the end of the ceremony, Kimmel revealed that phantom line fashion designer mark bridges won the prize and his speech lasted about 30 seconds
"Obviously I won't win the skiing race," Gary Oldman joked in his speech at the darkest hour
"The running stunt ran through the night, and several winners quoted it."
"I have a stopwatch," he added
"I'll time you."
"It's not that you shouldn't make a long speech, but the people who have the shortest speech tonight will take - Johnny home and tell them what they're going to win." Unveiling Helen Mirren's motorboat
"That's what we're going to do."
"It's a long show," he said
"He's referring to a long-standing Oscar complaint that shows - especially speeches - are too long."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I believe in being open and trusting each other and respecting each other completely.”Congrats to the happy couple, and may they forever take each other’s breath away.”
““I’m in a happy relationship ― that’s all that matters … I believe in commitment.”
“I love taking care of people,” she said.”
““I absolutely want to have children, whether I have my own or adopt.”
“Speaking with Women’s Health in 2011, Kournikova revealed that while kids were part of her game plan, marriage wasn’t “important” in her eyes.”
“A post shared by Enrique Iglesias (@enriqueiglesias) on Dec 15, 2017 at 2:02pm PSTA post shared by  Anna Аня (@annakournikova) on Dec 15, 2017 at 1:38pm PSTThe couple did, however, share some posts from Miami over the last few days looking happy in the sun.”
“While Kournikova sported some serious bling on her ring finger in a snap from 2016, they’ve never confirmed that they are married.”
“The two have been together since 2001.”
“Despite making themselves mighty comfortable in that public bathroom for Iglesias’ “Escape” music video all those years ago, the pop star and former tennis pro are famously private and rarely appear in public together.”
“Representatives for Iglesias and Kournikova did not return HuffPost’s request for comment.”


"I believe in honesty, mutual trust and mutual respect." Congratulations to this happy couple and may they hold each other's breath forever
"I'm in a happy relationship - that's what matters I believe in commitment. "
"I like to take care of people," she said
"I absolutely want children, whether they're my own or adopted."
In an interview with women's health in 2011, Kournikova revealed that although children are part of her game plan, marriage is not "important" in her eyes
"An article shared by Enrique Iglesias (@ Enrique Iglesias) at 2:02 p.m. on December 15, 2017, and an article shared by Anna a я (@ annakournikova) at 1:38 p.m. on December 15, 2017. The couple did share some posts from Miami in the past few days and looked very happy in the sunshine."
"Although Kournikova put some serious jewelry on her ring finger for a moment in 2016, they never confirmed that they were married."
"The two have been together since 2001."
Although Iglesias' escape video made him comfortable in the public bathroom a few years ago, the pop star and former tennis pro are known for their privacy and rarely appear in public together
"Representatives of Iglesias and Kournikova did not respond to requests for comment from the hofpost post."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Don’t be bashful — let us know in the comments section.”
“Which one of these now very grown men had a presence on your walls in the ’90s?”
“Also Read: Dale Earnhardt Jr Laps Jimmy Fallon in Cooler Scooter Race (Video)Watch the video above.”
“Captain Kirk Ukulele Tuba Gooding Jr Kazoo Apple Shaker Mark Kelley Kazoo Stro Bongos Black Thought Triangle You fellas are our fire...”
“Here is the extended band and their individual assignments Brian Littrell Vocals Apple Shaker Wood Block Nick Carter Vocals Tambourine Kevin Richardson Vocals Güiro AJ McLean Vocals Maraca Howie Dorough Vocals Coconuts Jimmy Fallon Vocals Bass Drum Casio Keyboard Apple Shaker Questlove Hand clappers Kamal Gray Xylophone James Poyser Melodica...”
“1 in late-night among adults 18-49.”
“They had the help of some very accomplished musicians, of course, and the guy who is still No.”
“...and Howie Dorough did the 1999 release justice...”
“Jimmy Fallon and The Roots joined the Backstreet Boys Thursday for a very child like performance of the boy band s classic I Want It That Way Using only their angelic voices and some classroom instruments on last night s Tonight Show Brian Littrell Nick Carter Kevin Richardson AJ McLean...”


"Don't be shy - tell us in the comments section."
"Who among these people who have grown up now appeared on your wall in the 1990s?"
"Also read: darnhart small circle Jimmy Fallon in cooler scooter race (video) watch video above."
"Captain Kirk ukulele Tuba Gooding, little kazu Apple shaker mark Kelly kazu stro bongos black thinks you are our fire..."
"Here's the extended band and their personal mission Brian Littrell vocal Apple rocking block Nick Carter vocal tambourine Kevin Richardson vocal g ü iro AJ McClain vocal malaka Howie dolo vocal coconut Jimmy Fallon vocal bass drum Casio Keyboard Apple rocking block kristolov hand clapping Kamal gremlin James boyse merodyka..."
"One in 18-49 year olds is late at night."
"Of course, they have been helped by some very successful musicians, and this one is not yet."
“… Howie dolo released justice in 1999. "
"Jimmy Fallon and Gen joined Backstreet Boys Thursday for a very childlike performance of the boys' band classic, and I wanted to do so, using only their angelic voices and some classroom instruments last night's tonight to show Brian littel, Nick Carter, Kevin Richardson, AJ McLean..."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow @htshowbiz for more...”
“The movie is slated to release on June 2.”
“Helmed by Patty Jenkins, the movie stars Gal Gadot in titular role and Chris Pine, Connie Nielsen, Robin Wright and Danny Huston.”
“The footage is action-packed and is full of the same great visuals as the previous trailers.”
“The three-minute preview is named Rise of the Warrior.”
“The war will never end,” says Steve Trevor, played by Chris Pine.”
““Millions will die.”
“Then, we get the first glimpse of Doctor Poison, a masked mad scientist, played by Spanish star Elena Anaya.”
“No sharp edges.”The flashback then intercuts with a battle sequence of the Amazons fighting the enemies in World War II in her signature battle armour, shield, tiara and wrist cuffs.”
“Just a shield then!”


"Follow @ htshowbiz to learn more..."
"The film is scheduled to be released on June 2."
"It's Patty Jenkins in charge, with film star Gail gado in the figurehead, Chris pine, Connie Nelson, Robin Wright and Danny Houston."
"The film is full of action scenes, full of the same wonderful visual effects as the previous Trailer."
"The three minute preview is called the rise of martial arts."
"The war will never end," says Steve Trevor, played by Chris pine
"Millions will die."
"Then, we saw for the first time the masked mad scientist Dr. poison played by Spanish star Elena Anaya
"There are no sharp edges." The flashback then features the Amazon fighting the enemy in World War II wearing iconic battle armor, shields, headgear and handcuffs
"Then be a shield."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More on the royal wedding:”
“In the season seven finale of Suits, her character, Rachel Zane, wore an Anne Barge V-neck wedding gown with beading and delicate embroidery that retails for $6,800.”
“The same sources have said that Markle's wedding dress designer is Ralph & Russo, the same designer she wore for her engagement gown.”
“Princess Diana's wedding dress was estimated to cost $115,000, and Kate Middleton's wedding dress reportedly cost $434,000.”
“The world is waiting with bated breath to see which designer Meghan Markle will wear when she marries Prince Harry on May 19 — and how much the The Dress will cost.”
“Rumors have been flying that designers Roland Mouret, Inbal Dror, and Burberry's Christopher Bailey are in the running to dress the future royal for her big day.”
“Don O Neill creative director of bridal bridesmaids and evening wear brand THEIA told Business Insider last week he predicted Canadian designer Erdem Moralıoğlu whose ERDEM brand has a modern Victorian with a quirky edge aesthetic to design the royal wedding dress since Markle has been wearing clothes by Canadian...”
“...designers or brands as of late...”
“But this weekend, the Daily Mail shut all that down by reporting that Markle will wear a creation by Ralph & Russo — the designer behind the black masterpiece of a gown she wore during her engagement photos with Prince Harry.”
“And while the wedding dress has been rumored to come with a six-figure price tag, specifically $550,000, it may not be as high as we've been led to believe.”


"More about royal weddings:
In the final episode of season 7, her character, Rachel Zane, wears an Anne barge V-neck wedding dress with beads and delicate embroidery, which retails for $6800
"The same source said that Marcel's wedding dress designer was Ralph and Russo, the same designer she was wearing on her engagement dress."
"Princess Diana's wedding dress is estimated at $115000 and Kate Middleton's is reported to be $434000."
"The world is waiting for the designer dress Megan markel will wear when she marries Prince Harry on May 19 - and the price of the dress."
"It's rumored that designers Roland Murray, INBAR drow and Christopher Bailey of Burberry are making clothes for future Royal events."
"Don O Neill, the creative director of bridesmaids and evening wear brand Theia, told business insider last week that he predicted that Erdem brand of canadian designer Erdem moral ı o ğ Lu has modern Victorian style and weird edge aesthetics, and can design royal wedding dresses, because Markle has been wearing Canadian clothes all the time..."
“… Recent designer or brand... "
"But this weekend, the Daily Mail reported that markel would be wearing a work by Ralph and Russo, the designer behind the black masterpiece of the dress she wore in her engagement photo with Prince Harry."
"Although it is rumored that the price of this wedding dress is six figures, especially $550000, it may not be as high as we think."



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Episode Recaps Previous S19 E1 Recap Law & Order: SVU premiere react: 'Gone Fishin'' By Nick RomanoS18 E1 Recap Law & Order: SVU premiere recap: Season 18, Episode 1 By Jessica DerschowitzS17 E23 Recap Law and Order SVU season 17 finale recap: 'Heartfelt Passages' By Jessica Derschowitz Next...”
“ET on NBC.”
“Law & Order: Special Victims Unit airs Wednesdays at 9 p.m.”
“The news also comes on the heels of Raúl Esparza, who played ADA Barba, exiting as a series regular.”
“1 SVU ADA, joins a number of other familiar faces who have returned in season 18, including Dean Winters and Sam Waterston.”
“The character, whom EW ranked as the No.”
“She’s returned a number of times since, namely in seasons 11 and 13.”
“...into witness protection...”
“She is and will always be part of SVU s DNA March whose recent credits include Odd Man Out and Nightcap joined the long running NBC procedural in season 2 starring as a series regular until early in season 5 when the character was supposedly killed off but actually went...”
““It is a thrill to welcome Stephanie back to the SVU family, even for a short visit,” executive producer Michael Chernuchin says.”


"Episode review S19 E1 law and order review: SVU premiere reaction: Nick Romanos' gone fishing 18 E1 law and order review: SVU premiere review: season 18, Jessica de showitz's episode 1 17 E23 law and order review SVU season 17 ending review: Jessica de showitz's heartfelt passage..."
"NBC's et."
"Law and order: Special Victims broadcast at 9 p.m. on Wednesday."
"The news came after Raul espaza, who plays ADA Baba, quit as a regular in the series
"1 SVU ADA, with many familiar faces coming back in season 18, including Dean winters and Sam Waterston."
"EW ranks first in this role."
"She's been back a lot since then, in seasons 11 and 13."
“… Enter witness protection... "
"She is and will always be a part of SVU DNA March. Her recent works include" freak out "and" night owl ", which joined NBC's long-term program in the second season. As a frequent guest of a series, until the beginning of the fifth season, the character was thought to have been killed, but actually went..."
"It's exciting, if only a short visit, to welcome Stephanie back to the SVU family," said executive producer Michael chernochin



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And so taking these measures, so that hopefully I can have a bright future and achieve the things that I want to achieve by doing the ovarian reserve is really important.””
“You’re sick, you don’t feel sexy, you don’t feel proud, you don’t feel like there’s much hope.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’m 23 years old, and I’m going to freeze my eggs.”
“And when I tell people that, they’re like, ‘You’re 23, why do you need to do that?”
“Why do you need to freeze your eggs Doing an ovarian reserve is important to me because I m fortunate enough to have that as an option but I need to be aggressive about protecting my fertility about protecting myself Halsey whose real name is Ashley Nicolette Frangipane said on...”
“Thursday s episode of The Doctors...”
“Image zoom Halsey | Credit: Dimitrios Kambouris/amfAR/Getty ImagesHalsey spoke openly about her endometriosis for the first time in January 2017, detailing the “frustrating” process of getting diagnosed.”
““The thing with endometriosis is that it comes down to that doctors can tend to minimize the female experience when it comes to dealing with it,” she said.”
“My whole life my mother had always told me Women in our family just have really bad periods It was just something she thought she was cursed to deal with and I was cursed to deal with and that was just a part of my life But as Halsey toured...”


"So it's really important to take these measures and hope that I can have a bright future and achieve what I want to achieve by doing ovarian reserve."
"You're sick, you don't feel sexy, you don't feel proud, you don't feel hopeful."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'm 23 years old. I'm going to freeze my eggs."
"When I tell people, they say, 'you're 23, why do you do that
"Why do you need to freeze your eggs for ovarian reserve is very important to me, because I am very lucky to have this choice, but I need to actively protect my fertility. About protecting myself, Halsey's real name is Ashley Nicolette frangipun said..."
"Doctor on Thursday..."
"Data picture: Dimitrios kambouris / amfAR / Getty Images Halsey talked about her endometriosis for the first time in January 2017, describing in detail the" frustrating "diagnosis process."
"The problem with endometriosis is that doctors tend to minimize women's experience when dealing with it," she said
"In my whole life, my mother always told me that the women in my family just had very bad times. It was just something she thought she was cursed with, I was cursed with, it was just a part of my life, but as a Halsey tour..."



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check it out on CTV!””
“7pm you ll know who to thank...”
“See us and more awesome people on the WEday special RELATED VIDEO Watch the kids of Stranger Things try to explain the show in 30 seconds Matarazzo also shared the clip on his Instagram account saying When you hear the epic performance from KellyClarkson on the WEday special tomorrow at...”
““DID YOU KNOW: @GatenM123 of #StrangerThings has an awesome voice?” Clarkson wrote alongside the clip, which she shared on social media.”
“But he did know the words to Queen’s “We Are the Champions,” which they launched into next.”
“Afterwards, the unlikely twosome launched into a rousing rendition of Sister Sledge’s “We Are Family,” before Matarazzo admitted he didn’t “know the rest” of the song.”
“Although Matarazzo reassured her that everything would be fine, Clarkson knew she wouldn’t feel ready unless she asked her friend if he could help her out with some vocal warm ups.”
““I am excited,” she replied, before admitting she was also nervous.”
““Are you excited for WE Day?” the Stranger Things star asked.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Watch it on CTV!"
"At 7 p.m., you'll know who to thank..."
"In the video about the Wednesday special, we saw more wonderful people watching the children of strangers trying to explain the show in 30 seconds. Matarazzo also shared a clip from his instagram account. He said when you hear Kelly carkson's epic performance on tomorrow's Wednesday special..."
"Do you know: @ gatenm123 of # strangerthings has a great voice? Clarkson wrote next to a clip she shared on social media
But he does know the Queen's "we are champions" sentence, which they will launch next time
After that, the unlikely couple began an exciting cover of sister sletcher's we are a family, and matalazzo admitted that he "knew nothing" about the rest of the song
"Although matalazzo assured her that everything would be fine, Clarkson knew that she would not feel ready unless she asked her friends if she could help her with some vocal warm-up."
"I'm excited," she replied, and then admitted that she was nervous, too
"Are we very excited today? "Strange things," he asked
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“All eyes were on Nick Jonas and Camila Cabello during the #GRAMMYs red carpet (ooh la la).”
“...https://t.co/qxBLDQKcam pic.twitter.com/427q27M8xZ — E!”
“News (@enews) January 29, 2018As Ryan mentioned, the two have not seen each other since Dick Clark's New Year's Rockin' Eve, which if you remember, is where they almost kissed.”
“(Camila later admitted she "chickened out.")”
“Naturally, the reunion was little uncomfortable, but Camila played it off like a total pro and even blew the singer a kiss at the very end of the interview.”
“Fans were quick to notice and shared their thoughts on the hilariously awkward interaction...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"On the Grammy red carpet, all eyes are focused on Nick Jonas and Camilla Cabello."
“... https://t.co/qxBLDQKcampic.twitter.com/427q27M8xZ-E ！”
"News (@ eNews) January 29, 2018 as Ryan said, the two haven't met since Dick Clark's new year's rock Eve (which, if you remember, is where they almost kiss)
"(Camilla later admitted that she" winced. ")
"Of course, the reunion was a bit uncomfortable, but Camilla acted like a professional and even blew the singer a kiss at the end of the interview."
"Fans quickly noticed and shared their thoughts on this funny and embarrassing interaction..."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stone did receive a supporting nod for her work in the movie The Favourite, however.”
“The Handmaids Tale (Hulu).The dystopian drama swept the Emmys for its debut season in 2017 and won for best drama series at the Globes last year.”
“Also absent from the drama category: The second season of Ozark (Netflix) was snubbed, though star Jason Bateman was nominated.”
“Actors Ed Harris, Jeffrey Wright and Evan Rachel Wood were all left out.”
“The second season cleaned up at the Emmys a few months ago, with four wins, but aside from a supporting nod for Thandi Newton, the Hollywood Foreign Press was apparently less impressed.”
“Another big drama series snub.”
“Westworld (HBO).”
“This is a pretty shocking omission, though the latest season was admittedly more divisive among critics and fans than the first.”
“Yet season 2 failed to get a nomination in the top category, and it was a title on every prediction list (stars Elisabeth Moss and Yvonne Strahovski were both nominated, as expected).”
“But here are the biggest snubs in the TV categories.”


However, stone's performance in the movie "favorite" did receive support
The story of the maid (Hulu). The dystopian drama swept the Emmy Awards in the first quarter of 2017 and won the world's best drama series award last year
"Also absent from the drama category: Netflix was snubbed in season 2, but Jason Bateman was nominated."
"Actors ed Harris, Jeffrey Wright and Evan Rachel wood were all excluded."
"The second season won four Emmy awards a few months ago, but in addition to the support for sandy Newton, the impression of Hollywood foreign media is obviously not so deep."
"It's another big series in the cold."
"The western world (HBO)"
"It's a pretty shocking omission, although the latest season's comments and fans are more divided than the first season."
"However, the second season didn't get the highest level nomination, which is a headline on every forecast list (stars Elizabeth moss and Yvonne strahovsky were nominated, as expected)
"But here's the biggest snub in television."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More:'The Bachelor' recap: Three hours, two devastated women and one worst finale ever...”
“More:Is it time to stop watching 'The Bachelor?'”
“Less than three months after her break-up with Bachelor Arie Luyendyk Jr. aired, the new Bachelorette revealed she is engaged to People magazine.”
“Good Morning America also announced the news Tuesday.”
“"It was the happiest moment of my life.”
“And it feels so good to say it," the 28-year-old Minnesota native told People.”
“"I still pinch myself, like, did that all just happen?”
“It’s been a whirlwind.”Understandably so.”
“Luyendyk proposed to Kufrin only to break-up with her on-camera and make a play for his season's runner-up Lauren Burnham.”
“Luyendyk and Burnham are now engaged and announced on The View Wednesday they will marry in a private ceremony in Maui on Jan. 12.”


"More: 'Bachelor' review: three hours, two devastated women and one of the worst endings ever..."
"More: really? It's time to stop watching Bachelor"
"Less than three months after her break-up with the bachelor Ali luyandik Jr., the new Bachelor revealed that she was engaged to people magazine."
"Good morning, the United States announced that on Tuesday."
"It was the happiest time of my life."
"It's nice to say it," the 28 year old Minnesota native told people
"I still pinch myself, as if, has all this happened?"
"It's a whirlwind." This is understandable
"Luyendyk proposed to kufrin just to break up with her on camera and film for his runner up this season, Lauren Burnham."
"Luyendyk and Burnham are engaged now and will have a private wedding in Maui on January 12."



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Before you know it, Saint West will seem normal, because that’s just who he is.””
““He told me, ‘Everyone freaks out, but you can get used to any name,’ ” said the friend.”
“The Meanings Behind Kanye and Kim Kardashian West's Kids' MonikersKanye and Kim Kardashian West know how to choose some pretty creative names.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“While the new parents of three haven’t commented on the reasoning behind their name choice yet, fans of the 40-year-old musician will recognize Chicago as the city he grew up in.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“RELATED VIDEO: How Kanye and Kim Kardashian West Are Making North and Saint Feel Special After Birth of Third ChildWest and the KKW Beauty mogul, 37, have kept mostly mum about the reasoning behind the names of their older two children Saint, 2, and North, 4½.”
“But in 2013, shortly after North’s birth, Kris Jenner dished on the significance of her granddaughter’s directional moniker.”
““The way [Kim] explained it to me was that North means highest power and she says that North is their highest point together,” she added.”


"Before you realize it, St. West looks normal, because that's what he is."
"He told me, 'everyone gets mad, but you can get used to any name,'" the friend said
"Kanye and Kim Kardashian West know how to choose some very creative names."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Although the new parents of three have yet to comment on the reasons behind their name choices, the 40 year old musician's fans will recognize Chicago as the city where he grew up."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Related video: how Kanye and Kim Kardashian west make north and Saint feel special after the birth of their third child. The 37 year old kkw beauty tycoon is silent about the reasons behind the names of the two older children, the two children are two-year-old saint and four and a half year old north."
"But in 2013, shortly after North was born, Chris Jenner talked about the importance of the directional nickname granddaughter."
"The way Kim explained to me is that the North means supreme power, and she said the north is their common highest point," she added



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Morissette urged a harsher sentence in a victim statement at the hearing, the newspaper reports, saying he had stolen her trust and money.”
“(No, It’s Not a Dance Move)The Tribune reports Schwartz could have faced more than 20 years in federal prison after pleading guilty, but Judge Dolly Gee suggested a sentencing guideline around five to six years.”
““I alone am responsible for the devastation,” he said, adding: “I will spend the rest of my life asking for forgiveness.”FROM COINAGE: What Is the Grammy Bounce?”
“The 47-year-old wept and apologized during the court hearing Wednesday, saying he took full responsibility for his behavior, according to The Chicago Tribune.”
“He will report for his prison sentence on July 11.”
“Schwartz will serve six years in prison along with $8.65 million in restitution, Variety reports.”
“According to the Associated Press at the time, the incidents occurred between May 2010 and January 2014, with Schwartz falsely listing the criminal withdrawals as “sundry/personal expenses.” When first questioned about the mismanagement by prosecutors, he initially claimed that he had invested in an illicit marijuana growing business.”
“He admitted to stealing over $5 million from Morissette, as well as an additional $1.7 million from two other unnamed clients.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Johnathan Schwartz pleaded guilty to charges of wire fraud and filing a false tax return in January, according to The Hollywood Reporter.”


In a victim statement at the hearing, moriset urged a tougher sentence, saying he had stolen her trust and money, the newspaper reported
(no, it's not a dance step) Tribune reported that Schwartz could face more than 20 years of federal imprisonment after pleading guilty, but judge dolly GEE suggested setting sentencing guidelines of about five to six years. "
"I am the only one responsible for this disaster," he said, adding, "I will spend the rest of my life asking for forgiveness."
According to the Chicago Tribune, the 47 year old man wept and apologized at Wednesday's trial, saying he was fully responsible for his actions
"He will serve his sentence on July 11."
"According to variety, Schwartz will be jailed for six years and will pay $8.65 million in damages."
"According to the then associated press, these incidents occurred between May 2010 and January 2014, and Schwartz mistakenly classified criminal withdrawals as" miscellaneous / personal expenses. ". When asked about mismanagement for the first time by prosecutors, he initially claimed that he had invested in an illegal marijuana cultivation business. "
"He admitted stealing more than $5 million from moriset and $1.7 million from two other anonymous clients."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In January, Johnathan Schwartz admitted charges of Telecom fraud and filing false tax returns, the Hollywood Reporter reported



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““But unfortunately, now that she’s passed, it does have a deeper meaning.””
““I just feel like [‘The Last Jedi’] pays homage to them in general,” he said of Fisher and co-star Mark Hamil’s characters to The Hollywood Reporter.”
“Fisher was reportedly going to have a big role in “Star Wars” parts eight and nine, but those plans had to be changed when she died in 2016.”
“Recently, “Star Wars: The Last Jedi” actor John Boyega opened up about the upcoming film and how it became an unexpected homage to the late actress.”
“This means all proceeds from Fisher’s books and other trademarks and copyrights now go right to Lourd.”
“Additionally, the 25-year-old actress is going to inherit the rights to her mother’s very popular public image and likeness.”
“The outlet alleges that Lourd will receive at least $7 million in various inheritence from her late mom.”
“Now, according to new documents obtained by People, fans have a slightly better idea of how much the “Scream Queens” star will inherit from her mother’s estate.”
“This doesn’t even cover Fisher’s various jewelry items, artwork and collectables.”
“It was previously reported that the late “Star Wars” actress left her daughter a slew of owned assets including bank accounts, a 2016 Tesla S, ownership of several LLCs and a life insurance policy.”


"But unfortunately, now that she's gone, it does have a deeper meaning."
"I just think [the last Jedi] is generally a tribute to them," he told Hollywood Reporter, referring to the roles of Fisher and co star Mark Hamil
"It is reported that Fisher will play an important role in parts 8 and 9 of star wars, but when she dies in 2016, these plans have to be changed."
Recently, Star Wars: the last Jedi actor John Boiga talked publicly about the upcoming movie and how it unexpectedly pays homage to the late actress
"This means that all proceeds from Fisher's book and other trademarks and copyrights are now owned by Lauder."
In addition, the 25-year-old actress will inherit the public image and portrait rights of her mother
"The media claimed that Lloyd would receive at least $7 million in various legacies from his late mother."
"Now, according to the latest documents available, fans have a little better idea of how much the Scream Queen star will inherit from her mother's legacy."
"It doesn't even include Fisher's jewelry, art and collections."
"It has been reported that the late Star Wars actress left her daughter a range of assets, including bank accounts, a 2016 Tesla s, ownership of several limited liability companies and a life insurance policy."



**Something goes wrong**
“See all of the celebrity looks from the Met Gala 2017 red carpet:1 / 100 Chevron Chevron Photo: Getty Images Ysaunny Brito and Olivier Rousteing in BalmainListen to Pharrell’s song “Happy””
“With collaborations with the likes of Louis Vuitton, Moncler, Adidas, and CDG under his belt, it’s safe to say that fashion loves Pharrell as much as Pharrell loves fashion.”
“...with first introducing him to the brand.)”
“(William has credited Notorious B.I.G.”
“His tastes range from street to super chic, and he’s as likely to be seen in pieces from his Billionaire Boys Club line, as he is in Chanel.”
“Who can forget the musician’s meme-friendly vintage “Buffalo Girls” hat by punk provocateur Vivienne Westwood?”
“Williams certainly likes to play with fashion.”
“His eyes provided the surprise—they were rimmed in eyeliner.”
“The last time that Williams “got happy” at the Met was for the “Punk: Chaos to Couture” show, where he appeared dapperly attired in a checkered Lanvin suit and patent leather shoes.”
“His wife, Helen Lasichanh, paired her tomato-red onesie with a blonde topknot.”


"Take a look at all the celebrity styles at the 2017 metropolitan pageant carpet: 1 / 100 chevron chevron pictures: Getty Images isani Brito and Olivier rostan listen to Farrell's song" happy "in balman
"Working with companies like Louis Vuitton, moncler, Adidas and CDG, it's safe to say that fashion loves Farrell as much as Farrell loves fashion."
“… First, introduce the brand to him.)
"William owes the infamous B.I.G. to him."
"His tastes range from street to super fashion, and people are likely to see him in his Billionaire Boys Club series, just like he did in Chanel."
Who can forget the musician's meme friendly old "buffalo girl" hat punk provocation Vivian Westwood
"Of course Williams likes fashion."
"His eyes left them with a surprise eye liner."
The last time Williams was "happy" in metropolis was because of the performance of "punk: from chaos to fashion". He looked smart in a plaid blue suit and lacquered shoes
"His wife, Helen laschanh, paired her tomato red top with a blonde knot."



**Something goes wrong**
“"Thank you very much."”
“"The people that watch with us very Tuesday night and embrace the show that reflects positivity and hope and inclusion, we love you," the 40-year-old actor said in his speech.”
“The 2018 Screen Actors Awards ceremony was a big night for "This Is Us," and thanks to the hit NBC drama's stars Chrissy Metz and Justin Hartley, the entire Pearson family got to experience the magic.”
“"This Is Us" star Chrissy Metz, right, brought young actress Mackenzie Hancsicsak, who plays the 10-year-old Kate Pearson, to Sunday night's Screen Actors Guild Awards in Los Angeles.”
“Dimitrios Kambouris / Getty ImagesThat's because big-hearted Metz, 37, and Hartley, 40, brought along the young actors who play their characters as kids as their special guests to Sunday's event.”
“Just want 2 thank Miss @ChrissyMetz again 4 very graciously & selflessly giving up her plus one so I could attend the SAG awards.”
“Some of the kid ensemble didn’t appear in enough episodes 2 qualify, but when the adults found out, they stepped up & offered their plus one.”
“Thank U!”
“...pic twitter com P3DJ58CClU Mackenzie Hancsicsak MHancsicsak January 22 2018 Early Monday morning Mackenzie Hancsicsak 10 who plays the 10 year old version of Kate Pearson took to Twitter to thank Metz for bringing her as her guest explaining that some of the show s young cast members didn t...”
“...have enough screen time under their belts to have been invited on their own...”


"Thank you very much."
The 40 year old actor said in his speech: "the people who watched with us on Tuesday night embraced programs that reflected positivity, hope and tolerance. We love you."
"The 2018 screen actor awards ceremony is a big night for this is us. Thanks to the popular NBC TV stars Chris Metz and Justin Hartley, the whole Pearson family has experienced magic."
Chris Metz (right) from this is us takes young actress Mackenzie hancicsak to the Screen Actors Guild Awards ceremony in Los Angeles on Sunday night, where she plays 10-year-old Kate Pearson
"Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images" because Metz, 37, and Hartley, 40, brought their young actors who played their role as children as their special guests to Sunday's event. "
"I just want to thank Miss Chris Metz again for giving up her plus one very kindly and selflessly so that I can attend the sag award ceremony."
"Some children's troupes didn't show up in the second episode, but when the adults found out, they came forward and offered their plus sign."
"Thank you!"
“… Pic twitter com p3dj58cclu Mackenzie hancsicsak mhancsicsak in the early morning of Monday, January 22, 2018, Mackenzie hancsicsak 10, who plays the 10-year-old version of Kate Pearson, thanks Metz for inviting her as a guest on Twitter and explains that some of the young actors in the play have not... "
“… They have enough time to be invited to play alone... "



**Something goes wrong**
“It’s been about a year.””
“He’s literally one of my best friends.”In December, a source close to Zendaya told Us exclusively that Holland met his girlfriend’s family “and they love him.” The insider added of the pair, “They are still seeing each other.”
“Zendaya and Tom Holland bumped into a statue of the title character from their 2017 movie Spider-Man: Homecoming while hanging out in Los Angeles on Thursday, March 29.”
“The low-key couple stepped out together for an afternoon walk that included a stop at Golden Apple Comics on Melrose Avenue.”
“They stopped to snap a quick photo outside of the store with the statue while showing off their best web-shooting poses.”
“Both movie stars kept it casual during the afternoon outing, with Zendaya wearing a white T-shirt and cuffed pants, and Holland donning a gray tee and faded jeans.”
“They also rocked matching black Converse Chuck Taylor All Star high-top sneakers.”
“The Greatest Showman actress and the British actor are both rumored to star in the 2019 sequel to Spider-Man: Homecoming.”
“He will reprise his role as the superhero, while she will return as Peter Parker’s classmate Michelle “MJ” Jones.”
“Us Weekly confirmed in July 2017 that Zendaya and Holland were officially dating, though they both laughed off the news on Twitter at the time.”


"Almost a year."
"He's really one of my best friends." Last December, a source close to zendaya told us exclusively that Holland met his girlfriend's family, "they love him very much." "They are still meeting," people familiar with the matter added
"On Thursday, March 29, zedaya and Tom Holland were hanging out in Los Angeles when they ran into a statue of the hero in their 2017 movie spider man: Homecoming."
"The low-key couple went out for a walk in the afternoon, including a stop at Golden Apple comics on Melrose street."
"They stopped outside the shop to take a picture with the statue and show their best online pose at the same time."
"Both stars stay relaxed during the afternoon outing, with cendaya wearing a white T-shirt and flannel pants and Holland wearing a gray T-shirt and faded jeans."
"They also shocked the matching black Converse Chuck Taylor All Star High Top sneakers."
"It's rumored that both the greatest actress and the British actor will play in the 2019 sequel spider man: Homecoming."
He will return as a superhero and she will return as Peter Parker's classmate Michelle Jones
"US weekly confirmed in July 2017 that zendaya and Holland were officially dating, but they all laughed at the news on twitter at that time."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As an alternative, the designer went with “stylish, timeless, basic” seems.”
““They appear nice.”Priced at simply $34.50, Cynthia’s readers do not precisely comply with “tremendous, tremendous fashionable” types.”
“Information solely.”
“You possibly can proudly pull out your readers on the dinner desk together with your husband or boyfriend to learn the menu as a result of they’re fabulous,” Cynthia shared with E!”
““They are going to complement your entire state of affairs: face, garments, every part.”
“She’s making her debut on QVC at this time with a set of two readers.”
“And whereas cameras could also be rolling on a brand new season of her hit Bravo actuality present, Cynthia is reaching an enormous milestone in her profession.”
“As Actual Housewives of Atlanta followers know, Cynthia Bailey has been slowly constructing a trend and equipment empire together with her line of eyewear, journey baggage and extra.”


As another choice, designers choose "fashion, eternal, basic" design
"They look good." Cynthia's book costs just $34.50, but it's not exactly in the "very, very fashionable" category
"Information only."
Cynthia and e share: "you may be proud to bring your readers and your husband or boyfriend to the dinner table to learn the menu, because they're great."! "
"They will complement your whole state: face, clothes, every part."
"She made her debut on QVC with a set of two readers."
"Although the camera may also appear in the new season of her hit series Bravo reality, Cynthia is reaching a huge milestone in her career."
"Atlanta housewives know that Cynthia Bailey is slowly building an empire of fashion and equipment with her glasses, travel bags and accessories."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share this: TwitterFacebook...”
“I had to watch her all season draw this conclusion of me of this person that I’m not.”
“...decided to get some stuff off her chest...”
“After an entire season of her feeling like Gizelle was calling her a gold-digger, Monique took a dig at Gizelle’s source of income from ex husband, Pastor Jamal Bryant.”
“I would much rather be associated with my husband and his wealth Samuels said than ten percent of the tithes and offerings from church or whatever supports you Monique opened up about why she made the comment recently during an...”
“...interview...”
““All season long, she had so much to say about my finances.”
“She’s counting my houses and cars.”
“That irritated me more than anything.”
“The first part of the reunion was just a glimpse, it was half of my chest.”Let Your Light Shine!”


"Share this: Twitter, facebook..."
"I've been watching her come to this conclusion about me all season. I'm not."
“… Decided to take something from her chest... "
"For a whole season, Monique felt that gizel was saying she was a gold digger, so she began to dig into the income source of his ex husband, pastor Jamal Bryant."
"I'd rather be associated with my husband and his wealth than receive 10% of the tithes and offerings from the church or anything that supports you," said Samuel. "Monique made it public why she was in a recent meeting
“… Interview... "
"She's been talking about my finances all season."
"She's counting my house and my car."
"It makes me very angry."
"The first part of reunion is just a glimpse, it's half of my chest." Let your light shine



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More From Jason Cohenadvertising...”
“He's hoping for the return of Bloodwynd soon.”
“Suicide Squad star Joel Kinnaman learned the hard way that you probably shouldn't allow a co-worker to give you a tattoo.”
“RELATED: Suicide Squad 2 Will Likely Be "More Grounded"The actor recently appeared on Bravo's Watch What Happens Live, where he revealed how much he regrets letting his Suicide Squad co-star Will Smith loose with a tattoo gun.”
“The cast of the 2016 Warner Bros. film famously (or perhaps infamously) got matching "SKWAD" tattoos to commemorate their work together.”
“But now Kinnaman thinks that may have been a bad idea.”
“Kinnaman was all smiles in a 2015 photo that captured Smith at work (although in the caption, the actor acknowledged, "Will has many many talents, tattooing is not one of them").”
“But when asked on Watch What Happens Live, he acknowledged he regretted the tattoo: "The answer is yes.”
“Absolutely.”
“That was a horrible idea."”


"More from Jason conadvising..."
"He wants Brad winder back soon."
"Joel kinnaman, the star of the suicide team, has learned a hard way that you probably shouldn't have your colleagues tattoo you."
The actor recently appeared on Bravo's "what's going on at the scene" and revealed that he regretted letting his suicide team partner will smith leave with a tattoo gun
"In 2016, Warner Bros actors (perhaps infamous) received matching 'skwad' tattoos to commemorate their collaboration."
"But now kinnaman thinks it might be a bad idea."
"Kinnaman smiles in a photo taken in 2015 in which Smith is working (though in the subtitles, the actor admits," will has a lot of talent, tattoos are not one of them ")
But when asked what would happen at the scene, he admitted that he regretted the tattoo: "the answer is yes."
"Of course."
"That's a terrible idea."



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the full video above.”
“The actress had a very eventful night in the lead-up to the release of “Wonder Woman,” the latest DCEU film set to hit theaters on June 2.”
“Also Read: 'Wonder Woman': Director Patty Jenkins Says 'Superman,' 'Casablanca' Inspired BlockbusterIt was a dance so spellbinding that at one point Fallon tried to cover Gadot’s eyes.”
“She eventually won the game (thanks to the aforementioned foot) and received the best prize as writer Seth Herzog came out and did an interpretive dance to the “Wonder Woman” theme song — complete with Wonder Woman regalia.”
““I don’t even know how to describe this,” she laughed.”
“It’s an item so bizarre that not even Gadot had any idea what to do.”
“One item was a fake foot dressed up like a skiing mountain, complete with little skiiers.”
“Also Read: 'Wonder Woman' First Reactions: 'the Best DCEU Film to Date'Gadot won the game, but granted, some of the items made trying to confuse Fallon really easy.”
“Most of the items, however, are hard to describe even truthfully.”
“The “Wonder Woman” star played “Box of Lies” — a “Tonight Show” game where Fallon and a guest attempted to stump each other on the contents of a mystery box.”


"Watch the full video above."
The actress had an eventful time ahead of the release of dceu's latest film, wonder woman, on June 2
"Also read: 'wonder woman': Director Patty Jenkins says' Superman ','casablanca' inspired blockbuster is a dance so fascinating that Fallon tries to cover up gado's eyes a little bit."
"She finally won the competition (thanks to the feet mentioned earlier), and won the best award. Writer Seth Herzog came out and made an interpretative dance theme song" Wonder Woman "- with the wonder woman royal court to complete."
"I don't know how to describe this," she laughs
"It's a very strange project. Even gado doesn't know what to do."
"One of them is a fake foot, dressed like a ski hill, and a little skier."
"Also read: 'wonder woman' first reaction: 'the best dceu movie to date' gado won the competition, but admitted that some projects try to confuse Fallon really easily."
"Most projects, however, are difficult to describe as they are."
The "Wonder Woman" star played a "lie box" - the "Tonight Show". Fallon and a guest tried to make trouble with each other about the contents of a mysterious box



**Something goes wrong**
“She is currently dating fitness model and personal trainer Sam Asghari, her costar in her sexy “Slumber Party” music video.”
“...a tabloid fixture...”
“February 16 marks ten years since that fateful day Britney Spears hit rock bottom and shaved her head at Esther’s Haircutting Studio in Tarzana, California.”
“Take a look back at the pop princess’ public breakdown, how she has since reclaimed her throne and all the moments in between in the video above, and detailed below.”
“The date was February 16, 2007.”
“Spears, then 25, walked into the hair salon at approximately 7 p.m. and asked owner Esther Tognozzi to shave off her then-brunette locks, just one day after checking herself in and out of rehab.”
“When Tognozzi refused, Spears (who was reportedly battling addiction, an undisclosed mental illness and in the midst of a bitter custody battle with ex Kevin Federline) took matters into her own hands, grabbing the buzzer and shaving off all her hair.”
““The only emotions that she showed was when she said her mom [Lynne Spears] was going to be mad that she was doing this to her hair and she got a little bit teary-eyed,” Tognozzi told Extra at the time.”
““Then she all of a sudden realized what she did.”After leaving the salon, a newly bald Spears headed to the Body & Soul tattoo parlor in Sherman Oaks, California, where she got inked on her hip and her wrist.”
“When asked by an employee why she just shaved her hair off, Spears replied, “I don’t want anyone touching me.”


She is currently dating fitness model and personal trainer Sam asgali, partner of her sexy "sleep party" music video
“… Regular tabloid shows... "
February 16 was 10 years ago when Britney Spears had a haircut at Esther's Barber studio in tasana, California
"Look back at the pop diva's public collapse, how she regained the throne, and the time in the video above and the details below."
"The date is February 16, 2007."
"Spears, then 25, walked into the salon at about 7 p.m. and asked the shopkeeper Esther tognozzi to shave off her black hair, just one day after she checked herself in and out of rehab."
"When tognozzi refused, spears (who is reported to be struggling with drug addiction, an undisclosed mental illness, and a fierce custody battle with former Kevin Federline) grabbed the buzzer and shaved all her hair by herself."
"The only emotion she showed was that she said her mother (Lynn spears) would be angry about her hair. She was a bit tearful," tognozzi told special at the time
"Then she suddenly realized what she had done." After leaving the salon, a new bald spear headed for the body and mind tattoo shop in Sherman oak, California, with ink on her hips and wrists
When an employee asked why she had to shave her hair, spears replied, "I don't want anyone to touch me."



**Something goes wrong**
“Photo Credit: Instagram / @thebriebella...”
“"We were at the forefront of the women's revolution at WWE," she explained, "So when you see what they're doing, I want to be in there."”
“Nikki added that she's excited to make her own comeback and contribute to the women's division even more.”
“So once I feel like boom, I'm ready for that then we're going back together."”
“Especially in ring shape, there's a difference.”
“"So I'm starting next week, I'm going to start working with a personal trainer and we're really gonna get me back in shape.”
“I got into the ring and trained a couple times and I realized that my journey's a little longer than I expected," Brie said.”
“Up Next: Brie Bella's Labor Turns Dangerous During Birth of Birdie Joe on 'Total Bellas'"Granted I do have to do some training.”
“Bella's twin sister, Nikki Bella, is currently on the WWE roster, although she took some time off due to an injury, but the pair is excited to reunite the Bella Twins in the ring once again.”
“So we let the boss know whenever he's ready for us."”


"Image source: instagram / @ thebriebella..."
"We're at the forefront of the women's revolution at WWE," she explained, "so when you see what they're doing, I want to be there."
"Nicky added that she is very happy to be back on her own and contribute more to the women's group."
"So once I feel the bang, I'm ready, and we'll go back together."
"The ring, in particular, is different."
"So I'm going to start next week, I'm going to start working with the personal trainer, we really need to get me back in shape."
"I went into the ring a few times and I realized that my journey was longer than I expected," Bree said
"Next: bribella's labor becomes a dangerous bird, Joe was born in 'total Bellas'" admits I have to do some training
"Bella's twin sister Nicky Bella is on the list of WWE at present. Although she has asked for leave for some time due to injury, they are very excited to reunite Bella twins in the circle again."
"So as long as the boss is ready, we'll let him know."



**Something goes wrong**
“People that knew him really well say they see him in me, that it’s almost scary.”Her older brother, Prince Michael Jackson, agrees.”
“He never wasn’t, and he never will not be.”
“On Wednesday, the 20-year-old daughter of Michael Jackson shared a photo of herself cleaning red graffiti off a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame for an 84-year-old radio host who shares her late father’s name.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Some people have no f—ing respect,” she captioned the post.”
“Paris’ father has a different star to mark his impact on the music industry.”
““I understand that there is a difference between the radio emblem and the record, but a name is a name,” wrote Paris in her caption.”
“A second snap showed the star completely scrubbed of vandalism.”
“Paris further explained her actions on Twitter, revealing that a friend informed her about the defacement.”
““I was at my friend apt that lives basically next door this morning and another buddy of mine said he saw this last night,” she shared.”


"People who know him very well say they saw him in me, which is almost frightening." Her brother, Prince Michael Jackson, agreed
"He has never been and will never be."
On Wednesday, Michael Jackson's 20-year-old daughter shared with an 84 year old radio host a picture of herself cleaning up red graffiti on the Hollywood Walk of fame for a star of the same name as her late father
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Some people don't respect her," she wrote in the title of the post
"Paris' father had a different star to commemorate his influence on the music world."
"I know there's a difference between a radio logo and a record, but a name is a name," Paris wrote in her title
"The second photo shows that the star has not been damaged at all."
"Paris further explained her behavior on twitter, revealing that a friend informed her of the defamation incident."
"I was in a friend's apartment next door this morning, and another friend of mine said he saw this last night," she said



**Something goes wrong**
““They share some of life’s most trying moments with deaths of loved ones and have related on many levels.””
““But Phil isn’t anyone else.”
“The Oscar-nominated actress, 38, looked casual for their stroll in a long sleeve black shirt and a khaki colored overall while holding a straw purse over her shoulder.”
“She completed the look with her signature blonde pixie cut, black shades and black shoes as Elverum held her hand in his.”
“The indie musician, 40, wore an oversized light orange shirt and navy pants which he paired with flip-flops as he shared a laugh with Williams.”
“The actress revealed to Vanity Fair in July that she had married Elverum in a secret ceremony in the Adirondacks with their daughters present.”
“Phil Elverum and Michelle Williams The Image DirectWilliams had 12-year-old Matilda with Heath Ledger while Elverum has as a 3-year-old daughter from his first marriage.”
“Michelle Williams and Phil Elverum Steve Granitz/WireImage; Jordi Vidal/Redferns via Getty“Obviously I’ve never once in my life talked about a relationship,” she told the magazine.”
“And that’s worth something.”
“A source told PEOPLE in August Williams “is very happy and she deserves it.”“Michelle and Phil had an early spiritual connection that she has not experienced since Heath,” the source said.”


"They share some of the toughest moments of their lives with the deaths of their loved ones and are connected on many levels."
"But Phil is no one else."
The 38 year old Oscar nominated actress looks casual in a black long sleeve shirt, khaki and a straw bag over her shoulder
"She's finished with her signature blonde elf hair, black sunglasses and black shoes, and alvaron holds her hand in his."
The 40 year old indie musician wore a oversized light orange shirt and navy blue pants, and a flip flop when laughing with Williams
"In July, the actress revealed to vanity fair that she had a secret wedding in Adirondack and married elvirum, with both daughters present."
"Phil elveren and Michelle Williams' image director Williams and Heath Ledger gave birth to 12-year-old Matilda, and elveren is his 3-year-old daughter in his first marriage."
Michelle Williams and Phil elvirum Steve granitz / wired image; Jodie Vidal / redferns through Getty "obviously, I've never had a relationship in my life," she told the magazine
"It's very valuable."
"A source told people in August that Williams was" very happy, she deserved it. " "Michelle and Phil have an early spiritual connection that she hasn't experienced since heath," the source said



**Something goes wrong**
“Online...”
“Image: E!”
“As for the clip with Chelsea Handler, watch it below!”
“I am happy for them and their rebuttal of When Harry Met Sally, because young men and women all over the world need role models for how to be friends with someone you've kissed on-screen without making a lifetime commitment.”
“Apparently, their platonic friendship is the recipe for prolonged romantic filmmaking together, as emotional baggage is nowhere in sight.”
“Barrymore asserts that there was, "Not even like, as we say in The Wedding Singer, 'church tongue,'" while Sandler adds, "We always hung out, always had a good time."”
“(See Mr. and Mrs. Smith, Twilight, and That 70's Show for the opposite results.)”
“The two Blended stars almost stumbled over themselves explaining how they avoided the great honeypot that is co-starring in a romantic film with another attractive human being.”
“When Handler asked them if they'd ever dated, the response was a firm negative.”
“(Barrymore is currently married to Will Kopelman, while Sandler is spoused up with Jackie Sandler).”


Online
"Picture: e!"
"As for Chelsie handler's clip, see below!"
"I'm happy for them, and I'm happy for their rebuttal to Harry when he met Sally, because young men and women all over the world need role models to let them know how to make friends with people you've kissed on screen without having to make a lifelong commitment."
"Obviously, their platonic friendship is the secret of long-term romantic film making, because the emotional burden is invisible."
"Barrymore asserts," not even like what we say in wedding singer, 'Church tongue', "Sandler adds," we're always together, always having a good time. "
(see the opposite results in the Smiths' twilight and the '70s show.)
"The two mixed stars nearly tripped over themselves as they explained how they avoided the big honeypot of CO starring in a romantic movie with another attractive person."
"When handler asked them if they were dating out of date, they said yes, No."
"(Barrymore is currently married to will Copperman, and Sandler is talking to Jackie Sandler."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...reached their last official child support agreement in 2007 around the same time the singer s financial assets were entered into a court ordered conservatorship managed by her father Jamie Spears...”
“...in court documents that one of the reasons why he was requesting more money is because he is no longer able to perform as a dancer due to my age and I have not been as successful in putting out new music as I was in 2008 He and Spears...”
“A source close to the singer previously told Entertainment Tonight Kevin wants a raise in money and he can t account for where the 20 000 is going RELATED VIDEO Britney Spears Reveals Son Sean 12 Plays Football I Worry He s Still a Baby to Me Federline previously stated...”
“...how much more child support he estimated Spears should pay his client...”
“Federline claimed in the documents that Spears earns in excess of 34 000 000 per year We think the reasonable needs for the children while they would be in Kevin s custody is probably three times what he s currently receiving Federline s attorney Mark Vincent Kaplan told PEOPLE of...”
“The father of six — who shares sons Sean Preston, 13, and Jayden James, 12, with the pop star — claimed he is currently earning $3,000 a month and receives $20,000 ($10,000 per son) each month from Spears in child support.”
“In May, Federline, 40, claimed he makes less than 1 percent of what Spears, 36, does in court documents.”
“A rep for Spears and Federline’s lawyer did not immediately return requests for comment.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“According to The Blast, the “Toxic” singer has agreed to pay her ex-husband “thousands more a month in child support” in a new deal that remains confidential.”


“…… In 2007, they reached the last formal child care agreement when the singer's financial assets entered custody of a court order managed by her father Jamie spears.... "
“…… In court documents, one of the reasons he asked for more money was that because of my age, he was no longer able to perform as a dancer, and I was not as successful in launching new music as I was in 2008, he and spears... "
"A source close to the singer told entertainment tonight that Kevin wanted a raise, and he couldn't explain the whereabouts of 20000 pounds. Britney Spears revealed that her son Sean played football when he was 12 years old. I was worried that he was still a baby for me. Federline said before..."
“… How much alimony does he expect spears to pay his clients? "
"Federline claims in the document that spears earns more than 3.4 million a year, and we believe that Kevin's reasonable demand for these children during his care may be three times as much as what Federline's lawyer mark Vincent Kaplan has told people at present..."
The father of six, who has 13-year-old Sean Preston and 12-year-old Jayden James sons with the pop star, claims to be earning $3000 a month and receiving $20000 a month in child support from spears
In May, Federline, 40, claimed that he made less than 1% of 36 year old Spears' money in court documents
"Spears' representatives and Federline's lawyers did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
According to sources, the "toxic" singer has agreed to pay her ex husband "thousands of dollars a month in child support" in a secret new deal



**Something goes wrong**
“Kevin Mazur via Getty Images Mayer and Jessica Simpson were on and off for about two years.”
“I should’ve known.”Maybe he’ll have better luck with Cohen as his wingman (and staying away from answering interview questions about his exes).”
“Which is probably why a lot of image-conscious celebrities are hesitant to date the 40-year-old now.”
“While they won’t go out with him, Mayer said that A-listers will hang out with him ― but only if his BFF Andy Cohen is around.”
““You have a lot of friends who, without you, would want nothing to do with me and I find that exciting,” Mayer said on an episode of “Watch What Happens Live” that aired over the weekend.”
““You’re friends with Jennifer Lawrence, who just, she doesn’t wanna have anything to do with me.”
“I don’t have the greatest track record when it comes to celebrity relationships.”“It’s amazing to watch your friends humor me on a friend level but also keep a fair distance from me,” he said, as Cohen laughed.”
““Because if you are someone who cares about your image... dating John Mayer, at this point, is just conceptually sort of a no-no.”Kevin Mazur/VF via Getty Images John Mayer and Jennifer Aniston at the 2009 Vanity Fair Oscar party.”
“The star added one last self deprecating jab So it s really fun to get to hang out with your A list star friends who otherwise would be highly uncomfortable sitting around me Mayer has dated Jessica Simpson Jennifer Love Hewitt Jennifer Aniston Katy Perry and Renee Zellweger over the...”
“...years...”


"Kevin mazul and Jessica Simpson were on and off for about two years."
"I should have known." Perhaps he will be more fortunate to see Cohen as his wingman (and away from answering questions about his predecessor)
"That's probably why many image conscious celebrities are now hesitant to date the 40 year old."
"Although they won't go out with him, Mayer said the first-line stars will go out with him - but only if his boyfriend Andy Cohen is around."
"You have a lot of friends who don't want to have anything to do with me without you, and I think it's exciting," Meyer said in a weekend episode of "what's going on at the scene."
"You're friends with Jennifer Lawrence. She just doesn't want to have anything to do with me."
"When it comes to celebrity relationships, I don't have the best record." "It's amazing to see your friend laugh at me as a friend, but keep a good distance from me," said Cohen with a smile
"Because if you're a person who cares about your image... At this point, dating John Mayer is conceptually taboo. "Kevin mazul / special effects through Getty pictures' John Mayer and Jennifer Aniston at the 2009 Vanity Fair Oscar Party."
"The star added one last self mocking jab, so it's really fun to be with your star friends, otherwise it would be uncomfortable to sit next to me. Mayer and Jessica Simpson, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Jennifer Aniston, Katie Perry and Renee Zellweger have dated in the past few years..."
“… Year... "



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Something tells me you won’t miss them.”
“So be on the lookout for some more insane sexual encounters.”
“He wonders what this would look like to somebody watching them.”
“.”
“.“I worship you with my body,” he whispers, as she pushes him inside her.”
“Her labia pulls slickly across his face and he slips into darkness.”
“Perhaps it’s my misinterpretation, but when Gaiman writes “it seems to him that he is hanging,” I always envisioned Bilquis’s client literally dangling between her legs.”
“That’s a visual the show would have had a very hard time making look realistic rather than cartoonish.”
“Instead, Bilquis devours her man on a red-sheeted bed that the American Gods production team outfitted with both a trap door and a hidden compartment.”
“The scene combined visual special effects with some carefully-timed choreography to create the episode’s most stunning tableau, even in a premiere crammed with visual delights.”


"I know you won't miss them."
"So watch out for some of the crazier sexual encounters."
"He wanted to know what it would be like for someone to look at them."
“.”
"I worship you with my body," he whispered, pushing him into her
"Her labia ran across his face, and he slipped into the dark."
"Maybe it's my misunderstanding, but when Gayman wrote that" he seems to feel hanged, "I always imagine that bilqus' client is really hanging between her legs."
"It's a visual effect, and it's very difficult to make the play look more realistic than cartoon."
Instead, bilquez gobbled up her man on a red sheet that God of America's production team had equipped with a trapdoor and a hidden compartment
"This scene combines visual effects with some elaborate choreography to create the most amazing picture of the episode, even at the premiere full of visual pleasure."



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow the AllAboutTRH Podcast on iTunes & Soundcloud – Remember to Rate, Comment & Subscribe!”
“Now, I don’t think the whole cast was supportive of her having a peach until me and her fell out.”
“But I thought she deserved it.”NeNe claims that some of the friends on RHOA are bringing it more than certain full-time Housewives but aren’t reaping the benefits of a full-time paycheck.”
“I think she’s OK.”
“I don’t care if she has a peach if she stays a friend of the show, she’s being seen a lot.”
““No, listen, Marlo’s super funny, she’s a great addition to the show.”
“Then when we got back cool again, now they’re all like all over the place,” she said.”
“When we fell out, then they were all the way here for her having a peach and taking pictures with her and hanging out with her.”
““I’ve always said I think she deserves a peach.”
“And they need to spread that check around to somebody who’s really bringing something to the show,” she said.”


"Follow allaboutthh podcasts on iTunes and Soundcloud - remember ratings, reviews and subscriptions!"
"Now, I don't think the whole cast supports her eating peaches until I fall out with her."
"But I think she deserves it." Some friends on RhoA benefit more than some full-time housewives, but don't benefit from a full-time salary, says Nen
"I think she's OK."
"I don't care if she has peaches or not. If she has always been a friend of the show, she is often seen."
"No, listen to me. Marlowe is super funny. She's one of the highlights of the show."
"Then we calmed down again, and now they seem to be everywhere," she said
"When we quarreled, they came all the way to eat peaches, take pictures with her and play with her."
"I keep saying I think she deserves a peach."
"They need to distribute checks to people who really bring something to the show," she said



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The couple announced their engagement last October.”
“Prepon and Foster, 36, who began dating in July 2016 have been friends since they were teenagers.”
“Us Weekly reported that Prepon, 36, was pregnant in January after the That ’70s Show alum showed off her baby bump at the Sundance Film Festival in Park City, Utah.”
“Following their daughter’s arrival, the couple enjoyed a dinner date at Out East in NYC’s East Village neighborhood on Tuesday, August 22, where an eyewitness tells Us they enjoyed cocktails and wine.”
“Prepon revealed the baby’s gender while appearing as a guest on LIVE With Kelly and Ryan in June.”
““It’s kind of weird, ‘cause it sneaks up on you where you’re like, ‘I can’t believe it’s been eight months already.”
“But then you’re like, ‘Oh my God, she needs to like come out already,” The Girl on the Train actress told Kelly Ripa and Ryan Seacrest.”
“Prepon went onto to share her pregnancy cravings: “[My dad] was a doctor and when he would have a break we would go to this Jewish deli.”
“We would get this pastrami on rye sandwich with a Dr. Brown’s black cherry soda.”
“When I was a kid that’s what we would get with my dad.”


"The couple announced their engagement last October."
"36 year old Prepon and foster have been dating since July 2016, and they have been friends since they were teenagers."
Eppen, 36, became pregnant in January after showing the '70s alum show at the Sundance Film Festival in park, Utah, US Weekly reported
On Tuesday, August 22, after their daughter arrived, the couple had a dinner date in out East, New York's East Village. A witness told us that they liked cocktails and wine
"In June, during a live guest show with Kelly and Ryan, Prepon revealed the child's gender."
"It's a little strange, because it's going to come quietly to you, and you're going to say, 'I can't believe it's been eight months.'
"But you're going to say, 'oh my God, she should be out already,'" the girl actress on the train told Kelly Ripa and Ryan Seacrest
Rippon then shared her desire to be pregnant: "my father is a doctor, and when he's resting, we'll go to this Jewish Deli."
"We'll make this rye beef sandwich with Dr. Brown's black cherry soda."
"When I was a kid, that was our relationship with my dad."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At least Carrell got to reunite with Stone in 2017 with Battle of the Sexes, but fans still want to see Gosling reunite with Stone on the big screen at least one more time.”
“They are, incidentally, two of the nicest people ever."”
“Fred Astaire and Ginger Rogers, Richard Pryor and Gene Wilder, Katharine Hepburn and Spencer Tracy, Meg Ryan and Tom Hanks, and the more recent partnership of Emma Stone and Ryan Gosling.”
“The last pair has starred together in three films, Crazy Stupid Love, Gangster Squad, and La La Land.”
“Moviegoers can't get enough of the somewhat offbeat pair, and Emma Stone's recent comments on Ryan Gosling prove that the co-stars can't get enough of each other, either.”
“According to Entertainment Tonight, Stone spoke about Gosling at Colorado's Telluride Film Festival during a Q&A on Sept. 1.”
“"I can’t even imagine what my life would be without Ryan," Stone said.”
“The Battle of the Sexes star went on, saying, "He’s so special.”
“It makes me emotional.”
“He’s so talented but he’s such a great person to work with because he’s so collaborative and excited about the process.”


"At least Karel will be reunited with stone in 2017 with" battle of the sexes ", but fans still hope to see Gosling reunite with stone at least once more on the big screen."
"By the way, they are the best two people ever."
"Recent partnerships between Fred Astaire and Ginger Rogers, Richard Pryor and Gene Wilder, Catherine Hepburn and Spencer Tracy, Meg Ryan and Tom Hanks, and Emma stone and Ryan gosling."
"The last couple has co starred in three films, crazy and stupid love, gangster team and the earth."
"Fans can't be satisfied with this slightly different combination, and Emma stone's recent comments on Ryan Gosling also prove that the partners can't satisfy each other either."
According to entertainment tonight, stone talked about goslings in a question and answer session at the telluride film festival in Colorado on September 1
"I can't even imagine my life without Ryan," Stone said
The battle of the sexes continues: "he's so special."
"It makes me excited."
"He's very talented, but he's a good partner because he's very cooperative and excited about the process."



**Something goes wrong**
“MORE : Serena Williams returns to competitive action – and she brought her babyMORE : Serena Williams to make competitive comeback next month alongside Venus...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“Got a showbiz story?”
“Venus and Serena Williams competed at the Fed Cup, Serena’s first competitive match since she gave birth in September last year (Picture: AP Photo/Chuck Burton)With this in mind, the crowds applauded and cheered the superstar as she fought her way back into competitive tournaments.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementSerena was bedridden for six weeks after a series of complications – including a pulmonary embolism that led to multiple surgeries – following the birth of her daughter by emergency caesareansection.”
“It’s her first match so I’m glad she got to see it,’ Serena gushed at the Cellular Arena.”
“‘It’s great.”
“But, as reported by the Mirror, she was more concerned with her little girl being present at the match.”
“Alexis Ohanian, the husband of Serena Williams with their baby, Alexis Olympia Ohanian Jr. in the crowd (AP Photo/Chuck Burton)Unfortunately, Serena and younger sister Venus lost their doubles match to Holland’s Demi Schuurs and Lesley Kerkhove.”
“But watching from the crowd, little Alexis Olympia seemed mesmerised as mum stepped back onto court.”


"More: Serena Williams returns to the competitive action - she brings her baby: Serena Williams, bringing the competition back with Venus next month..."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"Is there a story about the show business?"
"Venus and Serena Williams took part in the Fed Cup, Serena's first game since she gave birth in September (photo: AP Photo / chuck Burton). With that in mind, when the superstar struggled to return to the competition, the audience applauded for her. "
"After giving birth to her daughter by emergency caesarean section, Serena developed a series of complications, including pulmonary embolism, which led to multiple operations. She was bedridden for six weeks."
"It's her first game, so I'm glad she can see it," Serena gushed at the beehive arena
"Great."
"But, according to the mirror, she was more concerned about the presence of her little daughter."
"Alexis Ohanian is the husband of Serena Williams with children, and Alexis Olympia Ohanian in the crowd (AP Photo / chuck Burton) Unfortunately, Serena and Venus lost the doubles to Dutch players Demi schours and Venus
"But from the crowd, little Alexis Olympia seems to be fascinated by the sight of his mother walking back to the court."



**Something goes wrong**
“Now with the loss of Davis, Napier says, “Camp Home Town will miss him sorely.””
“...homes in the area...”
“She also adds that she hopes followers appreciate his talent that told all of our stories so beautifully better than any of us ever could Their series second season is currently airing and chronicles Ben and Erin who welcomed their first child daughter Helen in January as they renovate historic...”
“RELATED VIDEO: The Hosts of HGTV’s New Show Home Town Talk Fame, Family and What Makes Small Town America Great“I hope you will watch his work,” she says mentioning his production studio, Black Horn Productions.”
“The clip is narrated by Ben and introduces their fellow townsfolk and their claims to fame, like a woman named Charlotte who makes the best punch bowl cake, and Jerry, who holds the record for anvil shooting.”
““His role as our own world class videographer and producer leaves a wound that won’t heal for a long while.”Image zoom Credit: HGTVNapier posted a video alongside her message, which she says Davis created for their downtown home goods store, the Laurel Mercantile, last year.”
“...she said...”
“As believers we are all part of the body of Christ and as lovers of our little town working all together in the revitalization of downtown Laurel we are all part of the body of our community using our gifts to do the best we can for where we live...”
““We are all reeling, each one of us, and I am most devastated for his wife, baby boy, mama, brother and sister.”The new mom continued to touch on their close-knit Mississippi town, which the TV hosts are dedicated to modernizing.”
““Today our hearts are broken in downtown Laurel after suddenly losing our friend, colleague and #HGTVHomeTown crew member Brandon Davis,” Erin said.”


"Now that we've lost Davis, the camp in our hometown will miss him very much," Napier said
“… Houses in the area... "
"She also added that she wanted followers to appreciate his talent. He told all our stories better than any of us. The second season of their series is currently on air. Chronicle and Irene welcome their first daughter Helen in January, because they renovated the historic..."
"Related video: the host of HGTV's new play hometown talks about fame, family and the greatness of American towns." I hope you can see his work. "She mentioned his production studio, black point production company."
"This video is about their hometown and their way to fame. For example, a woman named Charlotte made the best punch bowl cake, and Jerry, who keeps the record of anvil shooting."
"His role as our own world-class cameraman and producer left a wound that could not be healed for a long time." Image zooming credit: HGTV Napier posted a video along with her message that Davis created last year for laurel mercantile, their downtown home furnishing store
“… She said
"As believers, we are all part of the body of Christ. As lovers of our small town, we are all working together for the revival of downtown laurel. We are all part of the body of the community. We use our gifts to do our best for our lives..."
"We all have a lingering fear. I feel most sorry for his wife, baby boy, mother, brothers and sisters." The new mother continues to talk about their closely connected Mississippi Town, where TV hosts are committed to modernization
"Today, in downtown laurel, our hearts are broken because of the sudden loss of our friend, colleague and home crew member Brandon Davis," Irene said



**Something goes wrong**
“” I can also push myself past what I thought I was capable of.”Image zoom Credit: Adam Franzino/SHAPEAnd Collins doesn’t sweat it if she doesn’t make it to the gym.”
““I try to be active in some way everyday: It’s my time to disappear and be in my own world,” said Collins, who loves swimming and counts Body by Simone as her favorite workout.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The actress opens up about how she overcame eating disorders and learned to love her body﻿Lily Collins Opens Up About Overcoming Eating Disorders: 'Healthy Now Is How Strong I Feel'Lily Collins continues to get candid about her body.”
“The actress, who shared how she overcame eating disorders in her book, Unfiltered, opened up to the July/August issue of Shape about her reveal.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I did consider that talking about my struggles with an eating disorder would overshadow my accomplishments as an actor, but I also knew this was something I needed to do to move forward as a human and an actress.”
“I needed to let go,” said Collins, 28, who plays a woman struggling with anorexia in her new film To The Bone.”
““I’ve always strived to start conversations about taboo subjects with young women … having suffered from an eating disorder does not define me, I’m not ashamed of my past.”Image zoom Credit: Adam Franzino/SHAPEThe self-described “clean eater” now has a healthy relationship with food.”
““I love chicken, fish and vegetables and grains like quinoa, but I don’t eat red meat.” she said.”


"I can also let myself go beyond what I think I can do." Credit for image zooming: Adam franzino / shapien and Collins won't sweat if they don't go to the gym
"I try to be active in some way every day: it's time for me to disappear into my own world," Collins said She likes swimming and lists Simone's body as her favorite sport
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The actress tells how she overcame eating disorders and learned to love her body. Lily Collins tells how she overcame eating disorders:" now health is how strong I feel. "Lily Collins continues to talk frankly about her body
"The actress tells how she overcame eating disorders in her book unfiltered, and she made her story public in the July / August issue of figure magazine."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I do think talking about my fight against eating disorders will mask my achievements as an actor, but I also know that this is what I need to do as a human being and as an actor."
"I need to let go," said Collins, 28, who plays a woman struggling with anorexia in the new film to the bone
"I've been trying to have conversations with young women on taboo topics Eating disorders don't define me. I'm not ashamed of my past Photo zooming credit: Adam franzino / Sharpes, who calls himself a "clean eater," now has a healthy relationship with food
"I like chicken, fish, vegetables and grains like quinoa, but I don't eat red meat," she said



**Something goes wrong**
“This relationship makes Pacey jealous and forces him to confront his true feelings for Joey.”
“Moller (Robin Dunne).”
“But instead of winning the contest, she wins Dawson's heart, as he finally sees past his best friend image, and realizes that he has strong romantic feelings towards her.”
“One day she is convinced to compete in the beauty pageant, which she does so that she can win the cash prize.”
“Nonetheless, Joey manages to be helpful with the birth of Bessie's son, Alexander, as does their critical neighbor, Evelyn Ryan.”
“She is frustrated with having to deal with work and taking care of her sister along with significant helpings of teenage angst.”
“She lives with her pregnant sister Bessie, and she works for her at the Ice House, the Potter family restaurant.”
“She is intimidated by Jen, who grew up in New York and does not know how to compete.”
“She immediately becomes jealous when Jen Lindley arrives and steals Dawson away from her.”
“She is confused by her growth into a teenager and her developing feelings for her longtime best friend Dawson, who she also admitted is her soulmate.”


"This relationship makes Percy jealous and forces him to face up to his true feelings for Joey."
"Moller."
"But instead of winning the competition, she won Dawson's heart, because Dawson finally saw through the image of his best friend and realized that he had strong romantic feelings for her."
"One day, she was convinced to take part in a beauty contest. She did it to win a prize."
"Even so, Joey managed to help Bessie give birth to her son Alexander, as did their neighbor Evelyn Ryan."
"She was frustrated by the significant help of having to deal with work, taking care of her sister and adolescent anxiety."
"She lives with her pregnant sister Bessie and works for her in the potter family restaurant igloo."
"She was scared by Jane. She grew up in New York and didn't know how to compete."
"When Jan Lindley came to steal Dawson from her, she immediately became jealous."
"She was puzzled by her growing up as a teenager and her feelings for her long-time best friend Dawson, and she admitted that Dawson was her soul mate."



**Something goes wrong**
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



**Something goes wrong**
““Maybe I shoulda, did a better job at separating Shady,” he says.”
“Image zoom Credit: WENNAs Hallie gets older Eminem begins to feel guilty for making her the subject of many of his songs — even though they are a large part of the reason he’s been able to provide for his family.”
“Now you’re being punished?”
“You ain’t asked for none of this s—.”
“If I did, I wouldn’t have done it.”
“I never knew it’d be like this.”
““This game is crazy, I wanted to claim my love for you but damn.”
““I said your name but always tried to hide your face,” he raps.”
“He struggles with the idea that he might have exploited his own child for the sake of his career.”
“Starting with her birth, Eminem welcomes her to “mom and dad’s crazy world” before rapping of the pressure he feels to provide Hailie with the life he was never given—the castles of sand.”


"Maybe I should be better at separating the shade," he said
"Photo scaling credit: Wenna Haley is getting older, and Eminem is beginning to feel guilty about making her the subject of many of his songs - even though it's an important reason he can support his family."
"Now you are punished?"
"These are not what you want."
"If I did, I wouldn't do it."
"I never knew it would be like this."
"This game is crazy. I wanted to show you my love, but damn it."
"I said your name, but always wanted to cover your face," he rapped
"He has been struggling, thinking that he might exploit his children for his career."
Since Hayley was born, Eminem has welcomed her to the "crazy world of mom and Dad", and then he began to put pressure on Hayley to live a life she had never lived before



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nina and Paul starred on the CW series together for six seasons before Nina left the show in 2015.”
“Paul and their other co-star Ian Somerhalder had a reunion in February as well.”
“Maybe in a past life?”The duo also got together back in December during the New York City snow showers.”
“I feel like we’ve met before.”
“She posted the same photo in black-and-white on Instagram, writing, “Excuse me sir, you look familiar.”
“Wait…” she captioned it.”
““Ran into this guy who looks exactly like my old costar @paulwesley !”
“The 29-year-old xXx: Return of Xander Cage actress and the 35-year-old Smallville actor – who co-starred on The Vampire Diaries – shared a hug in a photo Nina posted on Twitter on Thursday (May 17).”
“Nina Dobrev and Paul Wesley reunite (again)!”


"Nina and Paul starred together for six seasons before they left CW in 2015."
"Paul and their other partner, Ian summerholder, also had a reunion in February."
"Perhaps in a previous life? "As early as last December, during the snow shower in New York City, they were still together."
"I think we've met before."
She posted the same photo in black and white on instagram and wrote, "I'm sorry, sir, you look familiar."
"Wait..." She wrote in the title
"As like as two peas, Paul Wesley, who is exactly the same as my old partner!"
"29 years old xXx:Xander Cage 's return actress and 35 year old Smallville actor, who co starred in the vampire diaries, shared a hug in a twitter photo posted by Nina on Thursday
"Nina Dobrev and Paul Wesley are reunited!"



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementHappy birthday to the Gosselin sextuplets!”
““You’re the six final pieces of my heart that I never knew I was looking for.”
“I got six times what I planned on, but I’d NEVER EVER go back!” she wrote.”
“I love you guys!”
“I love you all and NO MATTER WHAT it requires of me, I will ALWAYS be there for you; I’ll always be your biggest cheerleader, your role model by example, your shoulder to cry on, the hug and laugh you need, and your mommy and friend!”
“At this moment (7:51-7:53 am) 13 years ago, my life and heart were completed with your births!”
“She captioned it:HAPPY 13th BIRTHDAY, my precious Alexis, Hannah, Aaden, Collin, Leah and Joel!”
“On Wednesday, Kate Gosselin shared a beautiful collage in honor of her new teens on Instagram.”
“...time the sextuplets and big sisters Cara and Mady 16 spend time with their mother Kate Gosselin...”
“After that we did cake and ice cream RELATED Kate Gosselin shared the beautiful memento from the hospital she kept after welcoming her famous sextuplets He continued It was good Gosselin shared that he gets his kids once a week for dinner and every other weekend The rest of the...”


"Happy Birthday to Gosselin sextuples!"
"You are the last six in my heart. I never know what I'm looking for."
"I got six times my plan, but I'll never go back! "She wrote
"I love you
"I love all of you, no matter what you ask of me, I will always be by your side; I will always be your biggest cheerleader, your example, your crying shoulders, the hugs and laughter you need, as well as your mother and friends!"
"At this moment 13 years ago (7:51-7:53), my life and soul ended with your birth!"
"Happy 13th birthday, my dear Alexis, Hannah, Eden, Colin, Leah and Joel!" she wrote in the title
"On Wednesday, Kate Gosselin shared a beautiful collage on instagram to commemorate her new teenager."
“… Sextuples and older sisters Kara and Maddy 16 spend time with their mother Kate Gosselin... "
"After that, we did something about cake and ice cream, and Kate Gosselin shared her beautiful souvenir from the hospital after welcoming the famous sextuples. He went on to say that Gosselin shared it very well. He invited his children to dinner once a week, and the rest of the time every other weekend... "



**Something goes wrong**
“It wouldn’t be surprising at all if the breakup wasn’t as amicable as they’re making it out to be!”
“Like I said, I’m sending my best wishes and have no hard feelings.”The lady (and the Javi) doth protest too much, we think.”
“So why did Javi and Briana break up?”
“Bri said their futures “didn’t line up,” and that explanation would have been frustratingly vague if she had stopped there.”
“But then Bri got much more specific, saying he didn’t approve of her going under the knife.”
““Javi and I are not together anymore,” Briana told Blasting News in January.”
““Our future just doesn’t line up.”
“He doesn’t want me to get my surgery for a breast lift, lipo, and tummy tuck … because it’ll look bad on his name at work.”
“Also, I don’t plan on moving in with him in the summer, and for these reasons, he broke up with me.”Briana elaborated even further, adding, “I have no bad things to say to about him.”
“He wanted a wife and home right now, and I didn’t see a reason to rush.”


"It's no surprise if the breakup isn't as friendly as they say it is!"
"As I said, I send my best wishes without any unpleasant feelings." We think the lady (and Javier) protested too much
"Then why did Harvey and Briana break up?"
"Bree said their future was" inconsistent "and that explanation would be frustratingly vague if she stopped there
"But then Bree said more specifically that he didn't approve of her cutting."
"Javier and I are no longer together," Briana told blast news in January
"Our future is not consistent."
"He didn't want me to have breast implants, fat and abdominal surgery Because it makes his name look bad at work. "
"Besides, I'm not going to live with him in the summer. Because of these reasons, he broke up with me." Briana further explained, "I have nothing bad to say about him."
"He wants a wife and a home now, and I don't think there's any reason to worry."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Get the latest on the actress with BET Breaks, above.”
“The celebrated actress has been overseas taking meetings at Cannes Lions, collaborating with tech and marketing firms as she prepares to relaunch her website and social media platform, Hallewood.”
“She ended with these words: "I don't have time for people who talk the talk but don't walk the walk."”
“...complaining...”
“Speaking on how she specifically addresses these people she added When they say they ve done nothing I say Well don t talk to me because you are part of the problem because you are sitting here spewing negativity and...”
“Have you written a letter?"”
“Have you called your local politicians?”
“It may not seem significant to you, but that's how we start.”
“"In my world, I get so tired of people complaining about, 'Oh, Black lives matter,' and they pontificate and pontificate about it, and I say, 'Well, what are you doing about that?”
“Halle Berry is putting her Hollywood peers on blast who publicly say they support movements like Black Lives Matter and are sick of the racial unrest in America but do nothing to spark a change.”


"Get the latest actress to rest with the bet, above."
"The famous actress has been overseas attending Cannes lions meetings, working with technology and marketing companies to re launch her website and social media platform hallewood."
She finally said, "I don't have time for people who can only talk but can't walk."
“… Complain... "
"Speaking of how she specifically addressed these people, she added that when they said they had done nothing, I said very well, don't talk to me, because you are part of the problem, because you are sitting here venting negative emotions, and..."
"Did you write?"
"Did you call the local politicians?"
"It may not matter to you, but that's how we started."
"In my world, I'm tired of people complaining, 'Oh, black people's life is important,' and they talk about it one by one, and I say, 'well, what are you doing
"Halle Berry made her colleagues in Hollywood furious. They openly said that it was important for them to support such a movement as black life, and they were tired of racial unrest in the United States, but nothing changed."



**Something goes wrong**
““Make no mistake,” he wrote, “this came from a place of loathing and anger.”Weinstein has since been fired from his production company as more women have come forward against him.”
“After announcing the names of the nominees for Best Supporting Actress, he congratulated the actresses, saying, “You five ladies no longer have to pretend to be attracted to Harvey Weinstein.”MacFarlane addressed the joke on Twitter after it resurfaced.”
“JASON REDMOND / Reuters Comedian Seth MacFarlane said his joke about Harvey Weinstein at the Oscars in 2013 "came from a place of loathing and anger."”
“Earlier this month, the comedian and actor made headlines for calling out Weinstein’s misbehavior involving women at the Oscars in 2013.”
“A rep for MacFarlane did not immediately return a request for comment.”
“MacFarlane has yet to publicly address the “Family Guy” joke about Spacey.”
“The “Family Guy” clip was being widely shared on social media and YouTube on Monday.”
“Lucas Jackson / Reuters Oscar-winning actor Kevin Spacey has been accused of making a sexual advance towards a 14-year-old boy in 1986.”
““I am sorry for the feelings he describes having carried with him all these years,” the actor wrote in a statement on Twitter.”
“Spacey then apologized for the incident, adding that he couldn’t remember it occurring.”


"Make no mistake," he wrote, "it comes from a place of disgust and anger." Weinstein was later fired by his production company because more and more women came out against him
After announcing the list of best supporting actress nominees, he congratulated the actresses, saying: "you five ladies don't have to pretend to be attracted to Harvey Weinstein anymore." After McFarlane tweeted the joke, it reappeared
Jason Redmond / Reuters comedian Seth MacFarlane said his 2013 Oscar joke about Harvey Weinstein "came from a place of disgust and anger."
"Earlier this month, the comedian made headlines for publicizing Weinstein's misbehavior involving women at the 2013 Oscars."
"A representative of McFarlane did not immediately respond to a request for comment."
McFarlane has yet to publish his "family member" joke about Spacey
"This" family boy "video was widely shared on social media and Youtube on Monday."
"Lucas Jackson / Reuters Oscar winning actor Kevin Spacey is accused of sexually assaulting a 14-year-old boy in 1986."
"I'm sorry for the feelings he described that have been with him all these years," the actor wrote in a twitter statement
"Spacey later apologized for the incident, adding that he did not remember it happened."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They were still sweeping up a substantial amount of glitter the commercial break after that one.”
“But as anyone experienced with glitter knows, one cleanup never does the trick.”
“Brooms pushed the glitter into one massive pile, which was then shoveled into a trash can.”
“Glitter DumpAfter the glitter-strewn temple sequence, 5-6 people had the damn near impossible task of cleaning up a mountain of glitter in just a few minutes.”
“...skirt at a friend in the audience...”
“About halfway through the show as the cast became more comfortable and confident the backup dancers walked up to the foot of the seated audience to scan for friends and family waving and throwing kisses one dancer cheekily flashed his...”
“While the main cast went backstage during the commercial breaks, much of the supporting cast stayed on stage, running through their choreography and stretching (there was some up dog, down dog yoga) as stage hands changed the set.”
“Commercial BreaksDuring the first commercial break, there were a lot of relieved shoulder squeezes between Legend and the dancers.”
“When the overture kicked in, the crowd exploded with excitement so much that you could feel the stadium style seating literally shaking.”
“He needn’t have worried.”


"After that, they're still cleaning up a lot of flash."
"But anyone with flash experience knows that a clean-up will never succeed."
The broom shoves the flash into a pile and shovels it into the dustbin
"Glittering dump after the glittering Temple sequence, 5-6 people have an almost impossible task, which is to clear a glittering mountain in a few minutes."
“… Around the friends in the audience... "
"In the middle of the performance, the actors become more comfortable and confident. The substitute dancers go to the sitting audience, look for friends and family, wave and kiss, and one dancer shows his cheeky face..."
"When the main actors go backstage during the business break, most of the supporting actors stay on the stage. As the stage players change the setting, they choreograph and stretch (there are some dog yoga and dog yoga)
"Business break at the first business break, there was a lot of light shoulder pressure between the legend and the dancer."
"At the beginning of the overture, the audience was so excited that you could feel the shaking of the stadium seats."
"He doesn't have to worry."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“X-Men: Dark Phoenix premieres in theaters on November 2, 2018.”
“And here’s EW’s first-look issue for Dark Phoenix, featuring none other than the titular mutant herself, Jean Grey.”
“And while the rest of the X-Men are present throughout, Sophie Turner’s Jean Grey is at the forefront of the mayhem.”
“The photos, published by Entertainment Weekly, give X-Men fans a first look at the next film in the saga, X-Men: Dark Phoenix.”
“Set almost 10 years after the events of X Men Apocalypse Dark Phoenix is looking to redeem the X Men universe of the tragedy that was X Men The Last Stand 2006 The Last Stand originally acted as a crude adaptation of Marvel s The Dark Phoenix Saga 1980 which...”
“...the upcoming Dark Phoenix is based on as well...”
“But just what is this story about?”
“It’s nice of you to ask.”
“In the Dark Phoenix Saga, the X-Men are making their way back to Earth from an off-planet mission and get caught up in a solar flare.”
“Jean Grey (recently portrayed by Turner in the films) sacrifices herself and is exposed to a ridiculous amount of radiation that briefly unlocks her full psychic potential.”


"X-Men: The Dark Phoenix" premiered in cinemas on November 2, 2018
"This is the appearance of the first issue of Dark Phoenix released by EW. The protagonist is the nominal mutant gene gray."
"While the other X-Men were on the scene, Sophie Turner's Jean Gray was at the forefront of the chaos."
The photos in Entertainment Weekly gave X-Men fans the first glimpse of the next movie in the legend, X-Men: The Dark Phoenix
"Set nearly 10 years after the Apocalypse of the X-Men, the Dark Phoenix is looking for the tragedy of redeeming the X-Men world. The last stand of the X-Men 2006 was originally a rough adaptation of the Marvel comic" Legend of the Dark Phoenix 1980 "
“… The coming Dark Phoenix is also based on... "
"But what is the story about?"
"That's very kind of you to ask."
"In the legend of Dark Phoenix, X-Men are returning to earth from an extraplanetary mission and are entangled by solar flares."
"Jean gray (Turner recently played in the film) sacrificed herself, exposed to absurd radiation, and released her full spiritual potential for a short time."



**Something goes wrong**
“Check your local listings for showtimes in your area, and watch the hilarious exchange between Cumberbatch and Iron Man above.”
“Well, as in, somebody was saying to me, ‘What haven’t you done that you’d like to do,’ and I guess I’d like to do a horror or a musical.”
“Judging by Benedict Cumberbatch’s hilarious brush with terror on Friday’s episode of The Ellen DeGeneres Show, the answer is a grown adult wearing a cheap Iron Man costume.”
“Notorious for scaring celebrity guests on her long-running talk series, DeGeneres set her sights on the Avengers: Infinity War star for her latest gag.”
““You’ve done just about everything.”
“You have not done a horror film, right?”
“Do you want to do a horror film?” she asks her guest.”
“He responds: “Kind of.”
“Maybe both.”
“It’s getting tired, but clearly not on me… I should know that happens on this show!”The Ellen DeGeneres Show airs weekdays.”


"Check out the programs in your area and see the wonderful interaction between Cumberbatch and Ironman."
"Well, it's like in a movie, someone says to me, 'you haven't done anything you want to do,' and I think I want to do a horror movie or a musical."
"From Benedict Cumberbatch's funny brush with terror on Friday's Ellen DeGeneres Show, the answer is an adult in cheap iron man clothes."
"DeGeneres, notorious for scaring celebrities in her long talk series, has turned her attention to the latest gag," Avengers: the star of Infinite War. "
"You've done almost everything."
"You haven't made a horror film, have you?"
"Do you want to make a horror film? "She asked her guests."
"A little bit," he replied
"Maybe both."
"A little tired, but obviously not on me I should know that this happened on this show! "The Ellen DeGeneres are always on the show."



**Something goes wrong**
“Share it in the comments below.”
“Other fans performed her songs in online videos to show their support.The trend #SingforAdele was prominent on Twitter, with fans showing support and love to the Someone Like You warming videos of her fans crooning to her songs lit up across social media something to add in the story?”
“Adele said she planned on taking a break to focus on her son and also hinted she may never tour again.Following Adele's concert cancellations, hundreds of fans flocked to Wembley Stadium on Saturday to take part in sing-alongs of her tracks.”
“...the Wembley Arena in London because she had damaged her vocal cords Her comments came days after at a previous show at the famous stadium...”
“Adele fans showered their love and support for the singer in a beautiful way after she reluctantly cancelled the two final shows of her tour due to an illness In a descriptive and somber statement the Hello hitmaker said that she would be unable to perform her last concerts at...”


"Please share in the comments below."
"Other fans perform her songs in online videos to show their music support. Trend#sing for Adele is outstanding on twitter. Fans show their support and love for people like you. The warm video of her fans chanting her songs is lit up on social media. What can I add?"
Adele said she planned to take a break and focus on her son, and hinted that she might never tour again. With Adele's concert cancelled, hundreds of fans flocked to Wembley Stadium on Saturday to sing her songs
“… In London's Wembley Arena, because her vocal cords were damaged, her comments were made in a performance at a famous stadium a few days ago... "
"Adele's fans poured out their love and support for the singer in a beautiful way, because she reluctantly cancelled the last two performances of the tour due to illness. In a descriptive and gloomy statement, the producer of Hello said she would not be able to To perform her last concert. "



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s scary, but it’s a risk that you have to take to get the good in the end.””
““I had to work that much harder to draw from our conversations, the essence of Benoit and Clare’s connection,” Lane says.”
“Benoit Beauséjour-Savard popped the question (in French!)”
“...and proposed with a blinding Neil Lane engagement ring during the World Tells All special.”
“So how did the gorgeous oval-shaped diamond come to be?”
“The jeweler opened up to PEOPLE all about the entire design process.”
“As the go-to designer for Bachelor Nation proposals, Lane typically spends time with the fiancé-to-be to create a ring perfectly suited for the couple.”
“But this time the process was a bit different.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““This is the first time I’ve ever designed a ring for a couple I haven’t met in person,” Lane tells PEOPLE.”


"It's scary, but to get the benefit in the end, you have to take the risk."
"I had to work harder to extract the essence of the link between Benoit and Claire from our conversation," Ryan said
"Benoit bosyol sawad suddenly asked this question (in French!)"
“… And made a blind Neil Lane engagement ring in the world to tell all the special. "
"How did the gorgeous OVAL DIAMOND come from?"
"Jewelers have opened up the whole design process to people."
"As a prospective designer of the bachelor state proposal, Ryan usually spends time with his fiancee to make the perfect ring for the couple."
"But the process is a little different this time."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"This is the first time I've designed a ring for a couple I've never met," Ryan told people



**Something goes wrong**
“They have documented their lives on RHONJ since April 2008.”
“He began his 41-month sentence in March 2016.”
““Time is going by quick.”
“I’m busy, I’m doing it all by myself so the days do go by and my thing is I’d rather not see him every week because I feel time goes by slower.”
“This way, it is going quick,” Teresa, 45, told E!”
“News on Wednesday, January 24.”
““I do miss him but I feel like everything happens for a reason and maybe we needed this time apart to help us get stronger together.”
“I just go with it.”
“This is what God wanted.”
“It’s fine.”As previously reported, the Bravo personality served 11 months in federal prison in 2015 after she and Joe, also 45, were indicted on 39 counts, including bankruptcy fraud.”


"They started recording their life in rhonj in April 2008."
"He was sentenced to 41 months from March 2016."
"Time flies."
"I'm very busy. I do it all by myself, so days pass by. My problem is that I would rather not see him every week, because I think time passes slowly."
"It's going fast," Teresa, 45, told e! "
News on Wednesday, January 24
"I really miss him, but I think there's a reason for everything. Maybe we need this separation to help us become stronger together."
"I just agree."
"That's what God wants."
"It doesn't matter." As previously reported, Bravo and Joe, also 45, served 11 months in federal prison in 2015 after being charged with 39 counts including bankruptcy fraud



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...gospel artist Tasha Cobbs Leonard Top social artist BTS Top touring artist U2 Chart achievement award Camila Cabello Icon award Janet Jackson...”
“...duo group Imagine Dragons Top R B artist Bruno Mars Top rap artist Kendrick Lamar Top country artist Chris Stapleton Top rock artist Imagine Dragons Top Latin artist Ozuna Top dance electronic artist The Chainsmokers Top Christian artist MercyMe Top...”
“...by Kendrick Lamar Top artist Ed Sheeran Top new artist Khalid Top female artist Taylor Swift Top male artist Ed Sheeran Top streaming songs artist Kendrick Lamar Top song sales artist Ed Sheeran Top radio songs artist Ed Sheeran Top...”
“Top Hot 100 song: "Despacito" by Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee featuring Justin BieberTop Billboard 200 album: "DAMN."”
“Ed Sheeran, who was not at the show, won big, in categories that included top artist and top male artist, while Janet Jackson won the icon award.”
“LAS VEGAS -- Here are the winners in the top categories at the 2018 Billboard Music Awards, held Sunday at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas.”


“… Evangelical artist Tasha cobs Leonard top social artist BTS top roving artist U2 list achievement award Camilla Cabello idol award Janet Jackson... "
“… Duet group imagine dragons top RB artist Bruno Mars top rap artist Kendrick Lamar top country artist Chris Stapleton top rock artist imagine dragons top Latin artist ozuna top dance electronics artist chainmokers top Christian artist mercyme top... "
“… By Kendrick Lamar top artist ed Sheeran top new artist Khalid top female artist Taylor Swift top male artist ed Sheeran top streaming music artist Kendrick Lamar top song sales artist ed Sheeran top radio song artist ed Sheeran top... "
Top 100 songs: "despacito" by Louis fonsey and Yankee dad on Justin biebertop's billboard 200 Album: "Damn it."
"Ed Sheeran didn't take part in the show. He won awards including top artists and top male artists, while Janet Jackson won the idol award."
"Las Vegas - here are the winners of the 2018 Billboard Music Awards at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas on Sunday."



**Something goes wrong**
“It's hard to say, but with the likes of Alicia Vikander, Cate Blanchett, Jennifer Lawrence and Rooney Mara on the list of nominees, you won't want to miss it.”
“Jean Paul Gaultier Timothy A Clary AFP Getty Images 2009 2009 Anne Hathaway wearing Armani Prive Getty Images 2011 2011 Sandra Bullock in Vera Wang AFP Getty Images 2012 2012 Kate Mara wearing Jack Guisso Kevork Djansezian Getty Images 2012 2012 Emma Stone wearing Giambattista Valli Couture Getty Images 2013”
“So while the Oscars are awarded for the best of Hollywood talent, there's another gong that guests like to keep a close eye on; best dressed.”
“And with designers all over the world vying to dress the biggest names on the guest list, it is no surprise that a number of gowns worn to previous Oscars ceremonies have earnt a place in fashion history.”
“Academy Awards Best Ever Oscars Dresses In pictures 1 54 Academy Awards Best Ever Oscars Dresses In pictures Getty Images Shutterstock 1954 1954 Audrey Hepburn wearing Givenchy NBC via Getty Images 1955 1955 Grace Kelly wearing Givenchy Getty Images 1958 1958 Sophia Loren wearing a fitted gown Getty Images 1968”
“1968 Faye Dunaway wearing Theadora Van Runkle Bettmann Archive 1969 1969 Barbra Streisand wearing Arnold Scaasi ABC Photo Archives Getty Images 1978 1978 Goldie Hawn in silver wrap gown WireImage 1982 1982 Diana Ross wears red sequin gown Getty Images 1986 1986 Cher wearing Bob Mackie Bettmann Archive 1994 1994”
“Whitney Houston wearing a white pantsuit Corbis via Getty Images 1997 1997 Nicole Kidman wearing Dior Couture Vince Bucci AFP Getty Images 1999 1999 Gwyneth Paltrow wearing Ralph Lauren Vince Bucci AFP Getty Images 2002 2002 Kate Winslet wearing Ben de Lisi Vince Bucci Getty Images 2003 2003 Kate Hudson...”
“...wearing Versace Kevin Winter Getty Images 2004 2004 Angelina Jolie wearing Marc Bouwer Frazer Harrison Getty Images 2005 2005 Charlize Theron wearing John Galliano for Christian Dior AFP Getty Images 2005 2005 Cate Blanchett wearing Valentino Couture Carlo Allegri Getty Images 2005 2005 Hilary Swank wearing Guy Laroche Vince Bucci...”
“Getty Images 2006 2006 Michelle Williams wearing Vera Wang Frazer Harrison Getty Images 2006 2006 Reese Witherspoon wearing vintage Dior Frazer Harrison Getty Images 2006 2006 Diane Kruger wearing Elie Saab Jeff Haynes AFP Getty Images 2007 2007 Penelope Cruz wearing Atelier Versace Getty Images 2008 2008 Marion Cotillard wearing...”
“2013 Amy Adams wearing Oscar de la Renta Michael Buckner Getty Images 2013 2013 Jennifer Lawrence wearing Dior Kevork Djansezian Getty Images 2014 2014 Lupita Nyong o wearing Prada Getty Images 2015 2015 Keira Knightley wearing Valentino Getty Images 2015 2015 Emma Stone wearing Elie Saab Mladen Antonov AFP Getty...”


"It's hard to say, but people like Alicia wickander, Kate Blanchett, Jennifer Lawrence and Rooney Mara are on the nomination list and you don't want to miss it."
"Jean Paul Gaultier Timothy a clay AFP Getty Images 2009, Anne Hathaway in Armani prive Getty Images 2011, Sandra Bullock in Vera Wang AFP Getty Images 2012, kettmara in Jack guisso kevork djansezian Getty Images 2012, Emma stone in Giambattista Valli fashion Getty Images 2013"
"So, although the Oscars are to honor the best talent in Hollywood, another award that guests like to pay close attention to is best dressed."
"As designers from all over the world compete to dress the big names on the guest list, it's not surprising that some of the dresses that used to go to the Oscars have won a place in fashion history."
"Oscar best Oscar dress picture 1 54 Oscar best Oscar dress picture Getty picture shutterstock 1954 1954 Audrey Hepburn wearing Givenchy NBC through Getty picture 1955 1955 Grace Kelly wearing Givenchy Getty picture 1958 Sophia Loren wearing a fitting suit Getty picture 1968"
"Fay Dunaway in ciadora van renkel Bateman 1968 Barbara Streisand in Arnold scarcy 1969 ABC file picture 1978 Goldie horn in Silver Wrap 1982 Diana Ross in red Sequin Gatty picture 1986 Cher in Bob McKee Bateman file 1994"
"Whitney Houston in white pants Corbis via Getty Images 1997 Nicole Kidman in Dior fashion Vince Bucci AFP Getty Images 1999 Gwyneth Paltrow in Ralph Lauren Vince Butch AFP Getty Images 2002 Kate Winslet in Ben de Lisi Vince Buchi Getty Images 2003 Kate Hudson..."
“… Wearing Versace Kevin wintergetty 2004 Angelina Jolie wearing mark BWO Fraser Harrison Getty 2005 Charlize Theron wearing John Galliano for Christian Dior AFP Getty 2005 Kate Blanchett wearing Valentino fashion Carlo alegregetty 2005 Hilary Swank wearing gailla rochevansbrucch... "
"Getty Images 2006 Michelle Williams wearing Vera Wang Frazer Harrison Getty Images 2006 Reese Witherspoon wearing vintage Dior Frazer Harrison Getty Images 2006 Diane Kruger wearing Elie Saab Jeff Haynes AFP Getty Images 2007 Penelope Cruz wearing studio Versace Getty Images 2008 Marion collagen wearing..."
"2013 Amy Adams in oscadlarenta Michael bucknagatti 2013 Jennifer Lawrence in diocesan Walker 2014 Lupita nyong o in Prada Getty 2015 Kayla Knightley in Valentino Getty 2015 Emma stone in elisabomladen Antonov Getty..."



**Something goes wrong**
“… I felt very fortunate to be there and to help Hayley take the next step.””
“Hayley’s father inspired her to become a nurse to help people just like him.”
“Despite his injuries, he works incredibly hard as a bus driver to support his family.”
“Unfortunately, he is left with limited mobility and over the past 20 years, he has received multiple back surgeries to try to help.”
“I was also injured right before deployment, so that sense of not finishing your job with the people you started with is something we connected on.”
“John was injured right before being deployed.”
““I understood where Hayley’s father, John, was coming from right away.”
““I found the Williams to be an incredibly close-knit and loving family,” Driver told the Huffington Post.”
“In a new video from Budweiser, Driver drives out to Brodheadsville, Pennsylvania, to personally deliver the good news to the Williams family that Hayley had won one of the grants.”
“Her father has inspired her to become a nurse, and so she applied to the Folds of Honor Foundation for one of the scholarships they provide for children and spouses of veterans (with funding help from Budweiser).”


“…… I feel very lucky to be there to help Haley take the next step
"Haley's father inspired her to become a nurse and help people like him."
"Although he was injured, as a bus driver, he made incredible efforts to support his family."
"Unfortunately, he's not able to move, and in the past 20 years, he's had many back surgeries trying to help him."
"I was injured before deployment, so the feeling was that you didn't finish the work with the people you started with, and that's what we're connected with."
"John was injured before he was deployed."
"I knew right away where Haley's father John came from."
"I found the Williams a very close and loving family," the driver told the Huffington Post
"In a new Budweiser video, the driver drives to broadhead, Pennsylvania, and personally delivers the good news to the Williams family that Haley has won a grant."
"Her father inspired her to become a nurse, so she applied to the honor foundation for their scholarships (funded by Budweiser) for the children and spouses of veterans."



**Something goes wrong**
“Flashback: Party of Five starred Jennifer Love Hewitt, Neve Campbell, Lacey Chabert and Matthew Fox and focused on a group of kids in San Francisco with no parents but plenty of heart...”
“The actor has been married to Kelley Limp, 41, since in 2004.”
“The 50-year-old actor shared a shirtless photo of himself on Instagram Thursday rocking a huge smile and a really mean set of abs.”
“Usually only sharing photos of his loving wife and kids on social media, the Party Of Five star actually bragged about his amazing physique on this post's caption.”
“Ageless: Scott Wolf, 50, proved he hasn't aged a bit since his Party Of Five days after sharing a photo of his perfect six pack abs on Instagram Thursday'If posting a shirtless selfie at 50 years old is wrong...I don't want to be right.”
“#thisis50 #youbetyourassidid,' he captioned the photo.”
“The handsome hunk is also seen wearing Avengers drawstring pajama pants.”
“He shows off his amazing physique by standing in the doorway of a bedroom.”
“The bed in the background is messy like he just woke up.”
“They have three children together: Lucy Marie, four, Miller William, five, Jackson Kayse, nine.”


"Flashback: the Party of five", starring Jennifer Love Hewitt, neve Campbell, Lacey shabert and Matthew fox, focuses on a group of satisfied children in San Francisco who have no parents.... "
The actor has been married to Kelly limp, 41, since 2004
"The 50 year old actor shared a photo of himself naked on instagram on Thursday with a big smile on his face and very rough ABS."
"Usually he only shares photos of his beloved wife and children on social media, and the five stars actually boasted about his amazing physique in the title of this post."
"Not old: Scott wolf, 50, shared a perfect six pack picture on instagram on Thursday, proving that he hasn't aged at all since his five-day party. If it's wrong to release a shirtless selfie at the age of 50 I don't want to be right. "
"This is your assistant," he wrote in the title of the photo
"The handsome guy is still wearing the Avengers' drawstring pajamas."
"He stood at the door of his bedroom showing off his amazing physique."
"The bed in the background is messy, as if he just woke up."
They have three children: Lucy Mary, four, Miller William, five, Jackson case, nine



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Star Best Fandom and Cast on Social Media Best New 2017 2018 Show Most Anticipated New Show Saddest Cancellation and Best Series Finale...”
“Here s the full list of polls Best Comedy and Best Drama Best Drama Acting Best Comedy Acting Best Breakout Stars Best Couple and Sexiest Moment Best Reality Show and Star Best and Worst Shocker Best Fight and Musical Moment Saddest Death and Actor Exit Best Villain and Best Guest...”
“Others nominated include Charmed, Sharp Objects, Shadowhunters, Will & Grace, New Girl, Kerry Washington (Scandal), James Corden, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmel Kimmel and Michelle Wolf.”
“Pretty Little Liars: The Perfectionists is up for 'Most Anticipated Show' of 2018/2019.”
“Any show that aired between June 9 2017 and June 8 2018 is eligible.”
“News' TV Scoop Awards.”
“Shortlink to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday, June 29, 2018 7:37am ET by PresspartyVoting closes at 5pm PT today (June 29) for this year's E!”


"Star, best fan and social media, best new 2017, best 2018 show, most expected rookie, saddest cancellation and best series ending..."
"The following are the best comedy and the best drama, the best drama performance, the best comedy performance, the best breakthrough star, the best couple and the sexiest moment, the best reality show and the best and the worst shock star, the best battle and music moment, the saddest death and the actor's exit, the best villain and the best guest..."
"Other nominations include magician, sharp weapon, shadow hunter, will and grace, new girl, Kerry Washington (scandal), James scodon, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmy Kimmel and Michelle wolf."
"Beautiful little liar: perfectionists will participate in the 2018 / 2019" most anticipated show. "
"Any program broadcast between June 9, 2017 and June 8, 2018 is eligible."
"News TV exclusive Award"
"Short link to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday , June 29, 2018, 7:37 a.m. EDT press release ends today (June 29) at 5 p.m. this year's e! "



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They are spending time getting to know him,” another insider told People.”
“Her family has accepted Blake.”
“After the successful event that was put together by Griffin, the two were spotted talking and walking hand in hand outdoors.”
“Jenner kept warm by wearing Griffin’s jacket throughout the rest of the night.”
““Kendall was there supporting Blake.”
“She arrived at The Avalon a few minutes before the show started and greeted several of Blake’s friends.”
“She seemed to know them well and they all stood around chatting,” the source told E!”
“News.”
“Jenner and Griffin were first linked to each other in August.”
“But until today, the two have not yet confirmed the real status of their relationship.”


"They took the time to get to know him," another person familiar with the matter told people
"Her family has accepted black."
"After Griffin's successful activities, people found the two people talking and walking hand in hand outdoors."
"Jenna kept warm in Griffin's jacket all night."
"Kendall is there to support black."
"She came to Avalon a few minutes before the show to say hello to some of Blake's friends."
"She seems to know them very well and they all stand around chatting," the source told e! "
"News."
"Jenna and Griffin were first linked in August."
"But to this day, the two have yet to confirm the true state of their relationship."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the full clip below.”
““She’s so lucky to be able to look like a 19th century baby,” she said.”
“"I heard Oprah was gonna do it, so we did this instead."”
“New mom Mindy Kaling stopped by The Late Show on Thursday to promote A Wrinkle in Time, though the conversation quickly turned to the topic of her two-month-old daughter Katherine.”
““I’m a new mom, so I don’t have to be at home with my kid,” Kaling joked after host Stephen Colbert thanked her for being on the show.”
“As for her thoughts on motherhood, Kaling said, “It’s really profound and strange and I was not a kid person at all.”
“I was the person that if you had a baby at a party, I would go up to them and shake their hand.”
“On planes when babies would cry, I would be mad at the families.”
“Now I'm like, 'Let them cry!”
“Let them do whatever they want!”


"Watch the full clip below."
"She's lucky to be like a 19th century baby," she said
"I heard Oprah was going to do it, so we did it instead."
"New mom Mindy Kaling stopped on Thursday night's show to promote" wrinkles in time, "but the topic soon turned to her two month old daughter, Katherine
"I'm a new mom, so I don't have to stay at home with my kids," Karin joked after host Stephen Colbert thanks her for being on the show
As for her view of her mother, Karin said, "it's really profound and strange. I'm not a child at all."
"If you have a baby at a party, I'll come up to them and shake hands with them."
"On the plane, when children cry, I get angry with their families."
"Now I think, 'let them cry
"Let them do what they want!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Look out for The Person of the Year announcement on Dec. 6.”
“TIME does not comment on our choice until publication, which is December 6.”
“Time Magazine called to say that I was PROBABLY going to be named “Man (Person) of the Year,” like last year, but I would have to agree to an interview and a major photo shoot.”
“I said probably is no good and took a pass.”
“Thanks anyway!”
“— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) November 24, 2017The magazine also took to twitter to respond to the President’s claims.”
“The highly acclaimed publication often reveals “The Person of the Year” during its final publication, which is released on December 6.”
“They began the feature, which was previously Man of the Year (until 1999), during a struggling time period in 1928.”
“AdvertisementThe President is incorrect about how we choose Person of the Year.”
“— TIME (@TIME) November 25, 2017The title is not necessarily a worth of praise, but rather an acknowledgement of how one individual has shaped the entire year.”


"Watch out for the person of the year announcement on December 6."
"Time will not comment on our choice until December 6."
"Time called and said that I might be named person of the year as I was last year, but I had to agree to an interview and a big photo shoot."
"I said maybe not, so I passed."
"Thank you all the same!"
"- Donald J. trump (@ real Donald Trump) responded to the president's comments on twitter on November 24, 2017."
This highly acclaimed publication often publishes "person of the year" in its final issue on December 6
They started making the film in a difficult time in 1928, which used to be person of the year (until 1999)
"The president is not right about how we choose the person of the year."
"- time (@ time) November 25, 2017 is not necessarily a laudable title, but a recognition of how one person shaped the whole year."



**Something goes wrong**
“RELATED CONTENT”
““For the People” drew a 0.8 and 2.8 million viewers at 10.”
““Roseanne” averaged a 3.9 rating in adults 18-49 and 15.2 million viewers.”
“The first two episodes of “Roseanne,” airing back-to-back last week, stunned industry analysts when they averaged a 5.2 and 18.4 million viewers between them.”
“That means this week’s episode was down 25% in the demo and 17% in total viewers.”
“However, only one episode aired this week and it was always likely that it would see some kind of decline.”
“The “Roseanne” bump translated into a good night for “The Middle,” which was up significantly airing immediately after the revival with a 2.2 and 8.3 million viewers.”
“That is a new season high in both measures for the comedy series.”
““Black-ish” (1.5, 5.4 million) and “Splitting Up Together” (1.4, 4.8 million) both came down from the increases they saw thanks to “Roseanne” last week, but were still the top shows in their half hour time slots in the key demo.”
“For NBC, “The Voice” (1.8, 9.3 million) was even while “Rise” (0.9, 4.5 million) ticked up in the demo, as was “Chicago Med” (1.1, 6.2 million).”


"Related content"
Serving the people attracted 800000 and 2.8 million viewers
Rosani has an average audience rating of 3.9% among adults aged 18-49 and 15.2 million viewers
"Last week, the average ratings of the first two episodes of Anne of the rose were 5.2 million and 18.4 million, respectively, which surprised industry analysts."
"It means that this week's shows are down 25% in demos and 17% in total audience."
"However, with only one episode on air this week, there is always the possibility of a certain degree of decline."
"The success of rosani turned into a wonderful night for the man in the middle. After the revival of the man in the middle, the TV series was broadcast immediately, with 2.2 million and 8.3 million viewers."
"It's a new season high for the two indicators of the comedy series."
"Black" (1.5 million, 5.4 million) and "split together" (1.4 million, 4.8 million) are both lower than the growth of "Roseanne" they saw last week, but they are still hot shows in half an hour of key presentations
For NBC, "sound" (1.8 million, 9.3 million) is uniform, while "rise" (900000, 4.5 million) is checked in the demo, just like "Chicago medicine" (1.1 million, 6.2 million)



**Something goes wrong**
““It is a great joy to have another grandchild, the only trouble is I don’t know how I am going to keep up with them.””
“And the name Arthur is a family tradition.”
““You’ll find out soon enough,” he said with a smile.”
“William also teased his son’s name as he left the hospital.”
“While Will and Kate waited four days before revealing their new baby’s name, that didn’t keep British oddsmakers from making predictions (Albert and Arthur were early favorites).”
“King Arthur is a legendary figure who was head of the kingdom Camelot and the Knights of the Round Table in medieval times.”
“Image zoomThe name Arthur, which means “bear” in Celtic, is also rooted in mythology.”
“Arthur was also the name of Queen Victoria’s third son (and seventh child) and was said to be her favorite child.”
“Both dad William and grandfather Charles have it as a middle name.”
“Charles, of course, is in honor of the baby boy’s grandfather, Prince Charles.”


"I'm so happy to have another grandson. The only problem is that I don't know how to keep up with them."
"The name Arthur is a family tradition."
"You'll find out soon," he said with a smile
"When William left the hospital, he made fun of his son's name."
"Although will and Kate waited four days to reveal the name of their new baby, it didn't stop the British geeks from making predictions (Albert and Arthur were early favorites)."
"King Arthur is a legend. He was the head of state and knight of the round table of the medieval kingdom of Camelot."
The name Arthur means "bear" in Celtic, which also comes from mythology
"Arthur is also the name of Queen Victoria's third (and seventh) son and is said to be her favorite."
"Father William and grandfather Charles use it as a middle name."
"Of course, Charles is in memory of the boy's grandfather, Prince Charles."



**Something goes wrong**
“Shelton is currently dating No Doubt alum Gwen Stefani.”
“AdvertisementMeanwhile, as many of you already know, Miranda Lambert’s ex-husband has also moved on since the divorce.”
“Following the success of Lambert’s latest album, The Weight of These Wings, the country star revealed that she struggled just making it through her daily life while living on Shelton’s sprawling ranch.”
“Lambert admitted that things got so rough with Shelton that it started to affect her music.”
“She recalled a time when she was contracted to write a car commercial song and she barely got it done in time.”
“It was at that moment that she realized something needed to change.”
““I remember I had to write a song for a Dodge RAM commercial.”
“It was hard.”
“I barely got it out, and I was like, ‘Man, I need some fuel.”
“I have to go fall in love with it again,’” she explained.”


"Sheldon is currently dating alum Gwen Stephanie."
"At the same time, as many of you already know, Miranda Lambert's ex husband moved after his divorce."
After the success of Lambert's latest album weight of wings, the country singer revealed that she struggled through every day while living in Shelton's vast ranch
"Lambert admits that Sheldon's business became so difficult that it began to affect her music."
"She recalled a time when she was contracted to write a car business song, but she almost didn't finish it in time."
"At that moment, she realized that something needed to change."
"I remember I had to write a song for the Dodge Ram commercial."
"It's hard."
"I barely took it out, and I thought," man, I need some fuel. "
"I have to fall in love with it again," she explained



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fleetwood Mac MusiCares Person Of The Year Tribute: Buy Tickets...”
“Individual tickets for mezzanine seats are on-sale to the general public via Ticketmaster.”
“For more information on purchasing VIP ticket packages to the event, or placing ads/messages in the tribute journal, please contact Dana Tomarken at MusiCares at 310.581.8727.”
“Proceeds from the annual Person of the Year gala — now in its 28th year — provide essential support for MusiCares, which ensures music people have a place to turn in times of financial, medical and personal need.”
“The 2018 MusiCares Person of the Year tribute will be followed by the official Person of the Year after-party celebration and a silent auction offering an exclusive and unparalleled selection of luxury items, VIP experiences and one-of-a-kind celebrity memorabilia for bidding guests.”
“Fleetwood Mac — Lindsey Buckingham, Mick Fleetwood, Christine McVie, John McVie, and Stevie Nicks — will close the show with a special performance.”
“This latest group joins previously announced performers Haim, Lorde, OneRepublic, Harry Styles, and Keith Urban.”
“Former President Bill Clinton will be on hand to present Fleetwood Mac with their award.”
“The Man will perform during the Person of the Year concert on Jan. 26 at Radio City Music Hall in New York.”
“GRAMMY winners Imagine Dragons, Juanes, Alison Krauss and Jerry Douglas, Little Big Town, and Zac Brown Band; GRAMMY nominees Brandi Carlile and Miley Cyrus; and current GRAMMY nominees Portugal.”


"People of the year at Fleetwood MAC musiccares: buying tickets..."
"Individual tickets for mezzanine seats are available to the public through Ticketmaster."
"For more information on purchasing the VIP ticket package or placing advertisements / information in the memorial log, please contact Dana tomarken of Musicares at 310.581.8727."
"The revenue from the annual people of the Year Awards (now the 28th) provides Musicares with the necessary support to ensure that musicians have a place to turn themselves in when they need financial, medical and personal needs."
"After the 2018 musiccares person of the year award ceremony, the official person of the year will hold a gala party and a silent auction to provide unique luxury items, VIP experience and unique celebrity souvenirs for auction guests."
"Fleetwood, Mike Lindsay Buckingham, Mick Fleetwood, Christina McVeigh, John McVeigh and Stevie Knicks - will end with a special performance."
"This latest combination adds previously announced performers Haim, Lord, OneRepublic, Harry stiles and Keith Urban."
"Former President Bill Clinton will personally present the award to flightwood Mac."
"The man will perform at the person of the year concert at the New York broadcasting City Concert Hall on January 26."
"Grammy winners imagine dragon, Juan, Alison Klaus and Jerry Douglas, small town and Zach brown; Grammy nominees brandy Carlyle and Millie Cyrus; and current Grammy nominees Portugal."



**Something goes wrong**
“...like to be wrongfully accused Which is not so much a point as just a sentence you can say...”
“While Rinna points out that he s gonna be a judge on our court for the rest of his fucking life an angry Grammer seemingly comes to the Supreme Court justice s defense by saying she knows what it feels...”
“...nomination of Brett Kavanaugh between official Camille Grammer and Lisa Rinna...”
“Finally in case you were worried that the bad blood between Dorit Kemsley and Lisa Vanderpump wasn t enough to sustain an entire season rest assured that the Housewives are now also getting political with a heated debate about the...”
“You heard that right: Someone figured out how to make a printer work so they could have hard copies of texts.”
“There are printed texts, there is a fire, and also Denise Richards is here now.”
“Seriously.”
“The paint is still drying on the battle lines that were drawn in season eight, but today People premiered a trailer for The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills season nine that could mean war.”
“Photo: The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills.”


“… I like to be wrongly accused. It's not so much a problem as a sentence you can say... "
"When Lina pointed out that he would be a damn judge in our court for his whole life, an angry linguist seemed to defend the Supreme Court justice, saying that she knew the feeling..."
“…… Camille grammer and Lisa Lina nominated Brett cavano... "
"In the end, if you're worried that the bad relationship between Dorothy Kemsley and Lisa van der PANP won't last a whole season, don't worry, housewives is also passing a game about It became politicized because of the heated debate. "
"You're right: someone figured out how to make printers work so they can get hard copies of the text."
"There are printed texts, there are fires, and Dennis Richards is here now."
"Seriously."
"On the front painted in season 8, the paint is still drying, but today people premiere the trailer of Real Housewives in Beverly Hills season 9, which may mean war."
"Photo: Beverly Hills real housewife."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After watching season two episode ten, one fan put the startling pieces together to form an incredible theory for a Drogo return, despite the fact he and their son died.”
“...died in season two...”
“The pair joined forces as allies in the final episodes of season seven before taking things to the next level to become lovers but fans can t forget about the mother of dragons first love Khal Drogo Jason Momoa who...”
“One of the major questions on everybody’s lips is what will happen to fan-favourite characters Daenerys (played by Emilia Clarke) and Jon Snow (Kit Harington).”
“The HBO mammoth hit’s final episode will be a very sad day for devoted Game of Thrones fans, but it’s sure to be a cracker that ties up all the loose ends.”


"After watching the tenth episode of season two, a fan pieced together these amazing pieces to form an incredible theory for drogo to return, even though he and their son are dead."
“… Died in season two... "
"In the last few episodes of season 7, the two join hands as allies, and then take things to the next stage and become lovers, but fans can't forget the first love of mother dragon, khal drogo Jason Momoa, who..."
"One of the main questions on everyone's lips is what will happen to fans' favorite characters, danielis (played by Amelia Clark) and Jon Snow (played by kit Harrington)
"The final episode of HBO mammoth will be a very sad day for power game fans, but it will definitely be a firecracker that ties all the loose endings together."



**Something goes wrong**
“[BLANK_AUDIO]”
“When I get all steamed up hear me shout, tip me over and pour me out.”
“And seeing as well, we'll be in LA at the same time, it's the perfect opportunity for us to meet for tea and delightful conversation.”
“The best part of this is that every donation benefits the Geanco foundation.”
“Their mission is to save and transform the lives of the poor and vulnerable in Africa.”
“And they're a charity very dear to my heart.”
“[MUSIC] [NOISE] [MUSIC] I'm a little teapot.”
“Short and stout.”
“This is my handle and this my spout.”
“[BLANK_AUDIO][MUSIC] I am Benedict Cumberbatch actor, and I'm teaming up with Omaze to fly you and a friend out to Los Angeles to attend the world premiere of my next student film Avengers Infinity war.”


[blank audio]
"When I get angry, listen to me and turn me upside down."
"Also, we'll be in Los Angeles at the same time. It's a great opportunity for us to have tea and have a good conversation."
"The best part is that every donation benefits the geuno foundation."
"Their mission is to save and change the lives of the poor and vulnerable in Africa."
"To me, they are a charity."
"[music] [NOISE] [music] I'm a small teapot."
"Short and strong."
"This is my handle, this is my mouth."
"I'm a Benedict Cumberbatch actor, and I'm working with omaze to fly you and a friend to Los Angeles for the world premiere of my next student film Avengers Infinite War."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let’s just be women.””
““It really feels like preparing to leave home…that’s exciting, but it’s sad and scary all at the same time,” she said.”
“With hundreds of millions of dollars on the line, the filmmakers shuffle could have doomed the picture and resulted in lots of bad blood on the set.”
“However in an interview at the Cannes Film Festival on Tuesday where Solo A Star Wars Story is about to screen Emilia Clarke said that the shift from directors Chris Lord and Phil Miller to Ron Howard was seamless Howard the Oscar winning director of A Beautiful Mind had no...”
“...time to prep Clarke said but on his first day he immediately earned the trust of his cast and crew...”
“He took us all in and listened to everyone said Clarke adding He took us from this kind of what are we doing to a place of such ease and comfort and fun During an hour long talk as part of the Kering Women in Motion talks Clarke didn t...”
“...say what happened to lead to Lord and Miller s firing but the duo s improvisation heavy style was reportedly alienating some actors and led to clashes with LucasFilm head Kathleen Kennedy...”
“She did allude to substantial re-shoots, saying that her response when she’d revisit certain scenes was, “Yes, thank goodness.”
“I did not do that well Although deathly afraid of Solo spoilers she gripped the sides of her chair when asked Clarke did tease that takes place in a part of Star Wars that we have not spent a huge amount of time in before the dark shady gangster underworld...”
“Clarke flew to Cannes in the midst of shooting the final season of HBO s Game of Thrones the fantasy epic series that features her playing the steel willed Daenerys Targaryen...”


"Let's be women."
"It's really like getting ready to leave home It's exciting, but it's sad and scary at the same time
"The investment of hundreds of millions of dollars and the reshuffle of filmmakers may determine the fate of this film and lead to a lot of evil blood on the set."
"However, in an interview at the Cannes Film Festival on Tuesday, Amelia Clark, who is about to release a Solow Star Wars film, said that the transition from director Chris Lord and Phil Miller to Ron Howard is seamless, and that Howard, the Oscar winning director of beautiful heart, has not..."
"It's time to prepare, Clark said, but on his first day, he immediately won the trust of his cast and crew
"He took us all in and listened to everyone," Clark added. He took us from this place where we were doing something to such a relaxed, comfortable and interesting place. During the hour long conversation, it was part of the "kering women in motion" conversation that Clark did not attend
“…… Talk about what happened that led to the dismissal of Lord and Miller, but it's reported that the improvisation style of the pair alienated some actors and led to a clash with Catherine Kennedy, head of Lucas pictures.... "
She did mention a substantial remake, saying that her reaction to remaking certain scenes was, "yes, thank God."
"I didn't do a good job. Although she was very afraid of monologues, when asked if Clark ever teased a part of star wars, she grabbed the sides of the chair, and we didn't spend too much time in it before the dark underworld..."
"Clark flew to Cannes to film the final season of HBO's game of thrones, a fantasy epic series featuring her as the iron willed daenerys targaryen..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know!”
“...for the new season of WAGS LA”
“HollywoodLife.com has an EXCLUSIVE preview of the Nov. 5 episode.”
“Nicole is all about wedding planning, but Larry is really feeling the pressure.”
“After 5 years of being together, Nicole Williams, 31, is beyond ready to plan her wedding to NFL player Larry English, 31.”
“She wants to go all-out for her dream wedding.”
“She starts talking to Larry about a bridal shower, bachelorette, bachelor, and an engagement party all before the wedding even happens.”
““I don’t remember going to all these different, separate things for the wedding,” Larry says to Nicole.”
“Larry’s getting a little stressed, to say the least.”
““I don’t have time to like sit and plan yet another thing to attach to the whole wedding,” he continues.”


"Let us know!"
“… For wags La
"Hollywood life has an exclusive announcement for November 5."
"Nicole is thinking about wedding planning, but Larry really feels the pressure."
"After five years together, 31 year old Nicole Williams is ready to plan a wedding with 31 year old NFL player Larry English
"She wants to go all out for her dream wedding."
"She started talking to Larry about bridal parties, bachelors, Bachelors and engagement parties before the wedding."
"I don't remember going to so many different, different events at the wedding," Larry told Nicole
"Larry is a little nervous, to say the least."
"I don't have time to sit down and plan another thing and attach it to the whole wedding," he continued



**Something goes wrong**
“On Wednesday 22nd March Liam and I became parents to an incredibly beautiful, healthy baby boy, weighing 7lb 9 and looking like a dream.”
“A day that now has a different meaning to me forever."”
“Irina ShaykThe 31 year-old model and Bradley Cooper's much-awaited first baby, daughter Lea De Seine Shayk Cooper, was born March 21.”
“My girl �������������� A post shared by Hoda Kotb (@hodakotb) on Apr 18, 2017 at 10:45am PDT4.”
“After her battle with cancer left her unable to conceive, Kotb decided to move forward with the adoption and bring home the little one who changed her life forever.”
“Hoda KotbThis year, the Today show co-host adopted a daughter, Haley Joy ��� who was born on Valentine's Day.”
“3.”
“Since her birth, the couple has kept their little one hidden from the limelight.”
“Amanda SeyfriedThe Mean Girls actress and husband Thomas Sadoski welcomed their first child, a baby girl, in March.”
“A post shared by Janet Jackson (@janetjackson) on Apr 14, 2017 at 6:17pm PDT 2.”


"On Wednesday, March 22nd, Liam and I became the parents of a very beautiful, healthy baby boy who weighs seven pounds and nine pounds and looks like a dream."
"This day always has a different meaning to me."
"Model Irina Shayk, 31, and Bradley Cooper's long-awaited first child, daughter Leah dessena Shayk Cooper, were born on March 21."
"My girl" is a post shared by Hoda Kotb (@ hodakotb) at pdt4 at 10:45 am on April 18, 2017
"After the fight against cancer prevented her from getting pregnant, Kotb decided to continue adopting and bring home the little girl who would change her life forever."
This year, Hoda Kotb, co host of today's show, adopted a daughter named Haley joy, who was born on Valentine's day
“3.”
"Since she was born, the couple have been hiding their little daughter in the spotlight."
Amanda Seyfried is a mean girl actress whose husband Thomas Sadowski welcomed their first child, a baby girl, in March
"A post shared by Janet Jackson (@ janetjackson) at 6:17 p.m. PDT 2 on April 14, 2017."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Mackie then added: “Going forward, no one gets paid more than the Queen.”Left Bank Pictures, which makes The Crown on behalf of Netflix, apologised for the pay disparity and subsequent fall out.”
“...by Olivia Colman in season 3 Netflix Prince Charles Portrayed by Josh O Connor in season 3 Netflix Prince Philip Portrayed by Tobias Menzies in season 3 Netflix Lord Mountbatten Portrayed by Charles Dance in season 3 Netflix The Duke of Windsor Portrayed by Derek Jacobi in season 3 Netflix...”
“Foy was paid a lower wage than Smith, who played Prince Phillip, despite having the leading role as Queen Elizabeth II in the hit Netflix drama.”
“Smith has now spoken out, saying he supports “best friend” Foy and suggesting that producers have since rectified the pay gap.”
“Speaking at the premiere of his latest film Mapplethorpe he told Hollywood Reporter: “Claire is one of my best friends, and I believe that we should be paid equally and fairly and there should be equality for all.”
“( Anger: Fans were fuming after it was revealed Claire Foy earned less than Matt Smith )“I support her completely, and I'm pleased that it was resolved and they made amends for it because that what's needed to happen.”
“Going forward I think we should all bear in mind that we need to strive to make this better and a more even playing field for everyone involved but not just in our industry in all industries His comments come weeks after fans of the royal drama launched a petition...”
“...calling on Smith to make up for the sexist pay gap by donating the difference in his and Foy s paychecks to The Time s Up movement which aims to stamp out inequality and harassment in the work place...”
“The Crown cast and their real life counterparts In pictures 1 25 The Crown cast and their real life counterparts In pictures Queen Elizabeth II Portrayed by Olivia Colman in season 3 Netflix PA The Queen Mother and Princess Margaret Marion Bailey as the Queen Mother and Helena Bonham Carter...”
“...as Princess Margaret in season 3 Netflix Getty Images Princess Anne Erin Doherty as Princess Anne in season 3 Netflix Getty Images Prince Charles Josh O Connor as Prince Charles in season 3 Netflix PA Prince Philip Portrayed by Tobias Menzies in season 3 Netflix PA Queen Elizabeth II Portrayed...”


McKee added: "looking to the future, no one will be paid more than the queen." Left bank pictures, which represented Netflix in the crown, apologized for the pay gap and subsequent row
“… Olivia Coleman plays Prince Charles in season 3 Netflix, Prince Philip in season 3 Netflix, Lord montbarton in season 3 Netflix, Charles dans in season 3 Netflix, Duke of Windsor in season 3 Netflix and Derek Jacoby in season 3 Netflix... "
Foy's salary is lower than Smith's, who plays Prince Philip, even though he plays Queen Elizabeth II in the popular Netflix show
Smith has now said he supports "best friend" foy and hinted that the producers have corrected the wage gap
"Claire is one of my best friends, and I believe we should be paid equally and fairly, and everyone should be equal," he told a Hollywood Reporter at the premiere of his latest film, maplesop
"(anger: when Claire foy's income was lower than that of Matt Smith, fans were angry)" I'm totally behind her and I'm glad it's settled and they've made up for it because it has to happen. "
"Looking to the future, I think we should all bear in mind that we need to work hard to make this better and create a more level playing field for all participants, not just those in all our industries. He made this comment a few weeks after the petition from fans of the Royal Theater... "
“… Calling on Smith to make up for the sex discrimination wage gap by donating the difference between his and foy's wages to the progressive movement of the times, which aims to eliminate inequality and harassment in the workplace... "
"The crown actors and their real-life counterparts in photo 125, the crown actors and their real-life counterparts Queen Elizabeth II, portrayed by Olivia Coleman in the third season, the queen mother and Princess Margaret Marion Bailey as the queen mother and Helena Bonham Carter..."
“… As Princess Margaret in season 3 Netflix Getty image Princess Anne Irene Doherty as Princess Anne in season 3 Netflix Getty image Prince Charles Josh O'Connor as Prince Charles in season 3 Netflix PA Prince Philip portrays Tobias Menzies in season 3 Netflix PA Queen Elizabeth II portrays... "



**Something goes wrong**
“...family Board of director Jewelry designer Jennifer Meyer who divorced Tobey Maguire last year rocked a pair of her own earrings with a white floral mini dress and beige suede booties The women of the hour...”
“B W beauty Mission Impossible Fallout actress Michelle Monaghan looked chic in a white collared black midi dress and sensible ballet flats Giving The 42 year old Golden Globe nominee who has two kids with graphic artist husband Peter White presented the FRAME bag of goodies to her adopted Baby2Baby...”
“While at the bash, Alba posed with Grey Lady actress Rebecca Gayheart, who filed for divorce from her husband - The Last Ship star Eric Dane - in February after 14 years of marriage.”
“L.A.'s Finest marks Jessica's first small-screen role since playing genetically-enhanced supersoldier Max Guevara/X5-452 in Dark Angel, which ran for two seasons (2000-2002) on Fox.”
“...in a 13 episode Bad Boys spin off L A s Finest which starts streaming next spring on Spectrum...”
“The No Activity guest star and Gabrielle Union L will play LAPD detectives Nancy McKenna and Syd Burnett in Spectrum s 13 episode Bad Boys spin off L A s Finest pictured Monday The No Activity guest star and Gabrielle Union will play LAPD detectives Nancy McKenna and Syd Burnett...”
“It's so meaningful to the families we serve'Starts streaming next spring!”
“...our annual baby2baby holidayparty...”
“...and she wore a black blazer purse and booties Enlisted the Glam App Hairstylist Brittney Ryan coiffed Alba s Brigitte Bardot inspired hairdo while make up artist Brittany Spyksma Howard applied her dramatic liner The Pomona born beauty wrote on Instagram Thank you frame montagebh for helping us w throw...”
“Met on the 2004 set of Fantastic Four The married couple of over a decade are also parents of seven year old daughter Haven 2 L and 10 year old daughter Honor 2 R Styles herself Jessica tucked a silky green camisole into unflattering blue jeans featuring cut off hems...”


“…… Jewelry designer Jennifer Meyer's family board of directors divorced Tobey Maguire last year and designed her own pair of earrings, paired with a white floral miniskirt and beige Suede Boots "women in fashion"... "
"Michelle Monaghan, the 42 year old Golden Globe nominees and graphic artist husband Peter white, looks fashionable in a white-collar black MIDI dress and ballet flats Having two children, she presented her adopted baby with a frame bag containing candy
At the ball, Alba took a picture with grey actress Rebecca gaehart, who, after 14 years of marriage, filed for divorce with her husband, the last shipping star, Eric Dane, in February
"Dark angel" is Jessica's first small screen role as gene enhanced super singer Max Guevara / x5-452 after two seasons of fox (2000-2002)
“… In a 13 episode bad boy derivative Los Angeles best, next spring starts streaming spectrum... "
"Inactive guest and Gabriel alliance l will play LAPD detectives Nancy McKenna and Syd Burnett in spectrum s 13 episode bad boy stripping LA's best painting Monday, inactive guest and Gabriel Eugene will play LAPD detectives Nancy McKenna and Syd Burnett..."
"It's so meaningful for the families we serve" will be on next spring
“… Our annual baby vacation party
“… She wore a black coat, purse and boots, joined the glam app hairstylist Brittney Ryan, hairstylist Alba's Brigitte Bardot inspired hairstyle, and makeup artist Brittany spyksma Howard applied her dramatic lines. The Pomona born beauty wrote on instagram, "thank you frame montagebh for helping us throw..."
"We met in 2004's four men of dreams. The couple, who have been married for more than 10 years, are also the parents of their 7-year-old daughter haven 2 L and 10-year-old daughter Honor 2 R styles. Jessica tucks a green silk vest into an unattractive blue jeans, and the bottom of the pants is cut off..."



**Something goes wrong**
“We want to thank Stephen, the cast and the crew for everything they’ve done to make You’re the Worst one of the best comedies on TV.””
“Stephen’s singular vision for the series has been its guiding force from the start and our decision, while difficult, will allow the series to end on its own terms and in a way most satisfying to its devoted fans.”
“...that spirit that we came to the mutual decision to end You re the Worst with its fifth season...”
“The announcement came November 15 2017 the same day as You re the Worst season 4 s finale FX co President of Original programming Nick Grad said in a statement Stephen Falk has been an extraordinary creative partner to work with over the past four years and it is in...”
“FXX announced that Stephen Falk’s relationship comedy, You’re the Worst, will be granted a fifth and final season to air in 2019.”
“All bittersweet things must come to an end.”


"We want to thank Stephen, the actors and the crew for everything they've done to make you one of the worst comedies on TV."
"Stephen's unique vision for this series has been its guiding force from the beginning. Although our decision is difficult, it will make this series end in its own way and in the way that most loyal fans are satisfied with."
“… We decided to end your spirit together, which is the worst in season five... "
"On November 15, 2017, on the same day that" you are the worst fourth quarter ending "was announced, Nick grad, CO president of the original show FX, said in a statement that Stephen Falk has been a very creative partner for the past four years and is now in..."
"FXX announced that Stephen Falk's romantic comedy" you are the worst "will air its fifth and final season in 2019."
"All bittersweet things must come to an end."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pizzolatto and Saulnier will executive produce along with Scott Stephens, Season 1’s Matthew McConaughey and Woody Harrelson, as well as Cary Joji Fukunaga, Steve Golin, Bard Dorros and Richard Brown.”
“The new season will mark Pizzolatto’s directorial debut; Jeremy Saulnier (Blue Ruin, Green Room) will also direct.”
“Pizzolatto has scripted the episodes for Season 3, co-writing Episode 4 with David Milch.”
“Ejogo will play a schoolteacher named Amelia Reardon, who is connected to two missing children.”
“Ali and Dorff will play partner detectives on the case of a macabre crime that spans three decades.”
“Stephen Dorff (Somewhere, Immortals) is set to play Arkansas State Investigator Roland West, joining Oscar winner Mahershala Ali and actor Carmen Ejogo (Selma, Fantastic Beasts and Where to Find Them).”
“Creator Nic Pizzolatto is taking his anthology series to the Ozarks for Season 3.”


"Pizzolatto and Saulnier will perform production with Scott Stephens, first season's Matthew McConaughey and woody Harrison, as well as Cary Joji Fukunaga, Steve Golin, Bard dorros and Richard Brown."
"The new season will mark pizorato's directorial debut; Jeremy solnier (blue ruins, green room) will also direct."
Pizzolatto is a screenwriter for the third season and co authored the fourth episode with David milch
"Ejogo will play a teacher named Amelia Reardon, who is associated with two missing children."
"Ali and dove will be co detectives in a 30-year appalling crime case."
Stephen doff (somewhere, immortal) will play Arkansas investigator Roland West, along with Oscar winner mahersala Ali and actor Carmen Ejogo (Selma, magical beast, where can I find them)
"Creator NIC pizzolatto will take his Anthology Series to ozak in season 3."



**Something goes wrong**
“Earlier this year, Kutcher gushed about his children during an appearance on The Tonight Show, revealing that Wyatt is already perfectly poised to be a world traveler because she speaks three languages.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Mila Kunis Opens Up About When She Realized There Was Something More with Ashton Kutcher!”
“The pair were photographed watching Khalifa’s set from atop a scaffolding structure.”
“Over the weekend, Kunis and Kutcher, 39, took in Budapest’s Sziget Festival, which included a performance by Wiz Khalifa.”
“Image zoom Credit: Noel Vasquez/GC ImagesKunis is currently filming new comedy, The Spy Who Dumped Me, in the city.”
“Other diners shared photos of the couple seated outside with friends and their children: daughter Wyatt, 2½, and son Dimitri, 9 months.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Alongside the image, the restaurant wished Kunis a happy birthday, and noted that she celebrated the special occasion during her visit on Monday.”
“In a photograph shared by the Vintage Garden restaurant in Budapest, Kunis and Kutcher smiled with two others for a selfie.”
“...the actress 34th birthday with a fun family outing to a restaurant in Hungary s capital city...”


Earlier this year, Kutcher gushed about her children on the tonight show, revealing that Wyatt is ready to become a world traveler because she speaks three languages
Related video: Mila Kunis made public when she realized Ashton Kutcher had more! "
"The two were photographed watching Khalifa's set on scaffolding."
Last weekend, Kunis and Kutcher, 39, took part in the xijit festival in Budapest, including a performance performed by Witz Halifa
"Photo scaling credit: Noel Vasquez / GC images Kunis is currently filming the new comedy" my spy dumped "in the city."
"Other diners shared photos of the couple sitting outside with friends and children: Wyatt, a two-and-a-half-year-old daughter, and Dimitri, a nine month old son."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In addition to this photo, the restaurant wishes Kunis a happy birthday and notes that she celebrated this special occasion during her visit on Monday
"Kunis and Kutcher smile and take a self portrait with two other people in a photo shared by the retro Garden Restaurant in Budapest."
“… On her 34th birthday, the actress's family went to a restaurant in the Hungarian capital



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I am…”
“You May Also Like The Secret to Burning More Calories Is...Boykin had a defibrillator implant for his heart.”
“In 2017, the loveable Boykin died.”
“He was only 45 years old.”
“If you ever watched the MTV reality series, then you knew how unpredictably funny the show and he was.”
“The reality series follows professional skateboarder Rob Dyrdek and his bodyguard, Big Black.”
“The two live together in the Hollywood Hills and hatch crazy plans.”
“One week they decide to teach Meaty the bulldog to skateboard and another they buy a miniature horse that they plan to keep in their backyard.”
“Full of practical jokes and funny stunts, Rob and Big are complete opposites who share with viewers their odd lives as best friends.”
“‘Rob & Big’ quickly established a digital fanbase, becoming one of MTV’s fastest and best-selling shows on iTunes.”


"I am..."
"The secret you may also like to burn more calories is Birkin implanted a defibrillator in his heart
"In 2017, the lovely boy died."
"He was only 45 at the time."
"If you've seen the MTV reality show series, then you know how interesting the show and he are."
"The reality TV series is about Pro skater rob deldek and his bodyguard big black."
"They live together in the hills of Hollywood and have crazy plans."
"One week, they decided to teach the meat Bulldog to skateboard. Another week, they bought a miniature horse and planned to raise it in the backyard."
"Full of pranks and funny stunts, rob and the big man are totally opposite. They share their strange life with the audience as best friends."
"Rob & big quickly built up a digital fan base and became one of MTV's fastest and best-selling shows on iTunes."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s that warm side of her that has made Meghan feel so at ease.””
“That’s one of the first things that brought her and Meghan closer.”
“...see in someone The insider noted She has a brilliant sense of humor...”
“Meghan quickly demonstrated that she is intelligent polite and keen to learn a source revealed in the new issue of Us Weekly adding that her enthusiasm towards living a life of service and humanitarianism excites the queen and it s just the type of vim and vigor she likes to...”
“The Queen and Meghan have struck up a quick bond – even before the former actress wed Harry, 33, on May 19.”
“On Tuesday, Prince Harry joined them as they attended the Young Leaders Reception.”
“She celebrated her birthday with the royal family earlier this month and was joined by Duchess Meghan, 36, for their first solo event together in Cheshire, England, on June 14.”
“Queen Elizabeth II, who turned 92 in April, has been keeping busy as of late.”
“She wore Ralph & Russo couture as she was photographed waving to onlookers.”
“Although she was not on hand, Angelina Jolie did attend the service in London.”


"It's her warm side that makes Megan feel so comfortable."
"It's the first thing that brings her closer to Megan."
“… I saw an insider say that she has a good sense of humor... "
"Megan quickly proved that she was smart, polite and keen to learn from one of the sources revealed in the new issue of American weekly, adding that her passion for service and humanitarian life excited the queen, which was the kind of energy and energy she liked..."
"The queen and Megan quickly reached an agreement - even before the former actress married Harry, 33, on May 19."
On Tuesday, Prince Harry joined them at the youth leaders reception
Earlier this month, she celebrated her birthday with the royal family, and the 36 year old Duchess of Megan took part in her first personal event in Cheshire on June 14
"Queen Elizabeth II, who turned 92 in April, has been very busy recently."
"When she was photographed waving to the onlookers, she was dressed in Ralph and Russo."
Although Angelina Jolie was not present, she did attend the ceremony in London



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Apparently t's still awesome being semi-secretly with British boyfriend of over a year, Joe Alwyn.”
““She seems to be in a great place both career and love wise,” a source told the outlet.”
“Alwyn tries to attend her concert dates when he can, the source added.”
“Footage of him there hasn't really been shared on social media, except for at the first show—a testament to how undercover these two can keep things.”
“Alwyn is really the best though, the source made abundantly clear: “Joe is just an amazing boyfriend.”
“He is very supportive.”
“Taylor adores his family.”
“She’s in a very good place.”Swift and Alwyn were last photographed out together on a North London pub date at the end of May.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Obviously, it's great to be semi secret with my British boyfriend, Joe Alvin, who has been in love for more than a year."
"She is outstanding in both her career and her love," a source told the paper
"Alvin tries to attend her concerts whenever possible," the source added
"His footage there has not really been shared on social media except on the first show - which proves how these two undercover agents keep things."
"However, Alvin is really the best, and the source said very clearly," Joe is just a great boyfriend
"He's very supportive of me."
"Taylor worships his family."
Swift and Alvin were last photographed dating at a bar in North London at the end of May



**Something goes wrong**
“You May Also Like: This Body-Positive Clothing Line Will Change How You Think About Wedding Dresses...”
“I love imperfection, and I love 'imperfect' bodies — they all tell stories."”
“Caroline Wozniacki for one approaches both with the same attitude I don t really care what other people think she said in a video filmed during her totally stripped down photoshoot for the cover of ESPN The Magazine s 2017”
“Body Issue...”
“Wozniacki, 26, joins several other elite athletes in gracing the cover—fully nude—of the ninth annual Body Issue, which hits newsstands on July 7.”
“The super-inspiring edition of the magazine will also feature the NFL's Ezekiel Elliott and Julian Edelman, Chicago Cubs infielder Javier Báez, NBA star Isaiah Thomas, softball's A.J.”
“Andrews San Jose Sharks teammates Brent Burns and Joe Thornton WNBA MVP Nneka Ogwumike soccer s Julie Johnston Ertz and her football player husband Zach Ertz New Zealand rugby player Malakai Fekitoa freestyle skier Gus Kenworthy figure skater Ashley Wagner...”
“MMA fighter Michelle Waterson and several members of the U S Women s National Hockey Team according to ESPN”
“Marine Corps Sgt.”
“Kirstie Ennis a snowboarder and mountaineer will also appear as the Body Issue s first ever featured veteran and Novlene Williams Mills a four time Olympic track and field medalist from Jamaica will be the first breast cancer survivor featured...”


"You may still like it: the dress line on the front of your body will change your view of wedding dress..."
"I like imperfections, I like 'imperfect' bodies - they all tell stories."
"Caroline Wozniacki approached these two people with the same attitude, and I really don't care what others think of what she said in the fully armed photo taken for the cover of ESPN 2017."
"Physical problems..."
Wozniacki, 26, joined several other top athletes on the cover of the ninth issue of naked, which hit newsstands on July 7
"The super inspiring edition of the magazine will also feature Eliot and Julian Edelman of NFL, Javier baes of Chicago Cubs, Isaiah Thomas of NBA and A.J. of softball."
"Andrews San Jose Sharks teammate Brent burns and Joe Thornton WNBA MVP enneka ogwumike's Julie Johnston eltz and her footballer husband Zac eltz New Zealand rugby player Malakai fajitoya freestyle skier Gus Kenworthy figure skater Ashley Wagner..."
"According to ESPN, MMA boxer Michelle Watson and several members of the US women's national hockey team"
"Marine Sergeant"
"Kirstie Ennis, a skier and mountaineer, will also appear in the body of the first functional veteran and novlene Williams mills, a four time Olympic track and field medal winner, Jamaica will be the first breast cancer survivor to function..."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow her on Twitter, @arr_scott...”
““Someone tried to kill me the other day.”
“The former child star sat down for separate interviews Monday morning with Matt Lauer and Megan Kelly, respectively.”
“In both interviews, Feldman talked about the prevalence of pedophilia in Hollywood and his desire to make a feature-length film that will tell the true story of his own experience with molestation as a child actor in the 80s.”
“The interviews follow the Indiegogo campaign that Feldman launched on Wednesday.”
“The campaign aims to raise $10 million for the film and features a YouTube video of Feldman issuing a warning about the dangers of child molestation in Hollywood.”
“This is much bigger than raising finance for a film this is about the balance of Good and Evil in very real terms reads the description of The Truth Campaign Ever since Corey announced he was working on a plan to come forward with more information he has been arrested...”
“...had a near death event and his band quit with no explanation other than saying they were afraid to continue Both Lauer and Kelly pushed back against Feldman asking him repeatedly why he was waiting to release the names...”
“Feldman claims that he is afraid for both his physical and legal well-being.”
“I have been arrested.”


"Follow her on twitter, @ arr / u Scott..."
"Someone tried to kill me the other day."
The former child star was interviewed by Matt Raul and Megan Kelly on Monday morning
"In both interviews, Feldman talked about the popularity of paedophilia in Hollywood and his desire to make a feature film about his real experience of being indecent as a child actor in the 1980s."
"The interviews followed the indiegogo campaign launched by Feldman on Wednesday."
"The campaign aims to raise $10 million for the film and broadcast a video of Feldman warning on youtube, warning Hollywood of the dangers of child molestation."
"It's much bigger than raising money for a movie. This is a true portrayal of the balance between good and evil. Since Corey announced that he was working on a plan to provide more information about his arrest, he has been reading the description of the truth movement... "
“… There was a near death incident and there was no explanation for his band's resignation, except that they were afraid to continue Raul and Kelly pushing Feldman down and repeatedly asked why he had to wait for the name to be announced... "
"Feldman claimed that he was afraid of his physical and legal health."
"I'm under arrest."



**Something goes wrong**
“WEEI”
“...easy to mock...”
“...check that up you have to go check out that older club it s pretty good will um here s mike freeman with a tweet it s very interesting about josh mcdaniel s in nfc gm said quote it s...”
“...a whole movie dedicated to one story because you know there s so many in game thrones or star wars not not a fan but definitely go check out we go check out this altered cardina you have to go...”
“...we before but i d be interested in that i d be interested they just made a movie about you know like a stand one movie a whole movie dedicate will because each episodes like a movie anyway but like...”
“...history of the target dynasty made me there s gonna be a whole uh maybe there s a whole series dedicated to the target of the united states mcaleese to the no way before she was born like her grandfather...”
“...know there s a deep history of the the world right of game of thrones whether it s roberts rebellion or now ray garden the on his love stories lot of things going on there we can hear the whole...”
“...much rather watch game of thrones movies right what are these prequels i mean what what are they gonna do or you can tell the story that led up to what we ve seen and game of thrones we all...”
“...works aiming for a 2019 one to wrap up work is also underway on five proposed game of thrones prequels five different prequels are in the works i would rather watch why does make more stalwarts movies duda i d...”
“Listen Telli Swift Gets Her Dream Proposal and Kaylin Jurrjens Considers Motherhood on the Season Finale of WAGS Atlanta Of game of thrones is complete game of thrones is now in production on its final season with six supersized episodes...”


"Wye"
“… It's easy to laugh at... "
“… Check, you have to check, old club, it's pretty good will, well, this is Mike Freeman with Twitter, it's very interesting Josh McDaniel at NFC General Motors said, quote it... "
“… A whole movie is for a story, because you know there are so many in-game thrones or Star Wars who are not fans, but definitely go to see us to see this change, cardina. You have to go to... "
“… We've seen it before, but I'm very interested, I'm very interested, they just made a movie about you, like an independent movie, a complete movie, because every episode is like a movie, but it's like... "
“…… The history of the target Dynasty reminds me that before she was born like her grandfather, there will be a complete, er, maybe a complete series dedicated to the goal of the United States, mccallis, for the dead end. "
“…… We know that game of Thrones has a long history. Whether it's Roberts' rebellion or ray garden, we can hear everything in his love story. "
“… I prefer the game of Thrones movie, right? What are these prequels? I mean, what are they going to do? Or you can tell a story that leads to what we see and game of thrones, all of us... "
“… As one of the objectives of the work in 2019, the summary work is also in progress for the five proposed power game prequels. The five different prequels are at work. I would rather see why do more determined films like "Duda I d..."
"Listen, Teri Swift has got her dream proposal. In the last season of game of power, Kylie uljans thinks motherhood is complete. Now game of power is produced in the last season, with six Super episodes..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“On Tuesday, the 26-year-old actress shared a selfie that showcased a necklace that had a charm of the Bachelor in Paradise star's first initial.”
“She also tagged Adams in the Instagram image.”
“In defense of her accessory, Hyland captioned the pic with a lyric from Taylor Swift's new song, "Call It What You Want," off her upcoming Reputation album.”
“MORE: Sarah Hyland Slams Plastic Surgery Rumors, Confirms Her 'Modern Family' Character Is Bisexual in Twitter Rant"Call it what you want ?”
“#notbecauseheownsme," she wrote.”
“The Modern Family star -- who's a self-proclaimed fan of Bachelor Nation -- seems to be keeping a sense of humor about her rumored relationship with Adams.”
“After the two dressed up together for Halloween and shared some cuddly photos on Instagram one of Hyland s fans dug up a tweet from 2012 in which she wrote Those who think I have a thing for any of the guys on The Bachelorette think again and stop reading...”
“...into things I say...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"On Tuesday, the 26 year old actress shared a self portrait showing a necklace with the charm of the first letter of a bachelor in paradise."
"She also tagged Adams in instagram pictures."
To protect her accessories, Helan captioned the photo with a line from Taylor Swift's new song "call it what you want," a song from her upcoming album
More: Sarah Helan attacks cosmetic rumors, confirms that her "modern family" role is bisexual, and snarls "whatever you want" on twitter
"It's not because we're together," she wrote
"This modern-day family star - who claims to be a fan of the bachelor's country - seems to have a sense of humor about her affair with ADAMS."
"After dressing up for Halloween together and sharing some lovely photos on instagram, a fans of Hyland found a microblog in 2012. In this microblog, she wrote," those who think I like any of the bachelors, think again, don't look at it any more... "
“… Become what I say... "



**Something goes wrong**
“The Associated Press contributed to this report.”
“Over the course of five decades, Peruzovic found himself opposite icons such as Hulk Hogan and Bruno Sammartino and made sporadic appearances in WWE as recently as 2014.”
“The Iron Sheik and Volkoff won the WWF tag team championship at the first WrestleMania in March 1985.”
“He famously sang the Soviet Union's national anthem while the Iron Sheik taunted and stoked the anger of crowds around the world by playing upon real-life conflicts.”
“Blassie...”
“Peruzovic s most famous run came as part of the then WWF s explosion in popularity in the mid 1980s as he teamed with the Iron Sheik to form one of the most successful heel teams in the history of pro wrestling while being managed by the legendary Classy Freddie...”
“In reality, Peruzovic was born in what was then Yugoslavia and now stands as part of Croatia.”
“Peruzovic, who was inducted into the WWE Hall of Fame in 2005, was best known in the world of professional wrestling for his over-the-top Soviet/Russian character during his time in the World Wide Wrestling Federation (later the WWF) in the 1960s, '70s, '80s and '90s.”
“Peruzovic's wife, Lynn, said Sunday that he has had heart problems and that when she went to give him medicine he was not responsive.”
“He was 70.”


"The associated press contributed to this report."
"In the past 50 years, peruzovic has found himself in opposition to Hulk Hogan and Bruno sammartino, and has made sporadic appearances on WWE in 2014."
"Iron chief and Volkov won the WWF tag team championship in the first wrestling competition in March 1985."
"He sang the National Anthem of the Soviet Union, and the iron chief was famous for mocking and inciting the anger of people all over the world by playing with conflicts in real life."
"Brasi..."
"Peruzovic's most famous run was in the mid-1980s, part of the World Wide Fund for nature's (WWF) explosion of popularity, when he teamed up with iron Sheik to form one of the most successful heel teams in the history of professional wrestling and was managed by legendary Freddie..."
"In fact, peruzovic was born in Yugoslavia at the time and is now part of Croatia."
Peruzovic was elected to the world wrestling Hall of fame in 2005. During his tenure at the World Wrestling Federation (later WWF) in the 1960s, 1970s, 1980s and 1990s, he was famous in the world professional wrestling world for his extraordinary Soviet / Russian role
Peruzovic's wife, Lynn, said Sunday that peruzovic had a heart attack and did not respond when she went to give him medication
"He's 70 years old."



**Something goes wrong**
“More from AOL.com:Scott Disick, 34, allegedly 'hooking up' with 19-year-old starAnthony Michael Hall from 'The Breakfast Club' convicted of assaultKylie Jenner goes bra-less in white bodysuit: See the racy Instagram snap...”
“The "Sabrina the Teenage Witch" star tried to do some damage control by deleting the post and sharing kind words to Puerto Ricans and this post labeled: “...a little light humor."”
“Hurricane Maria left 3 million people living in Puerto Rico completely without power and over a dozen dead in Dominica.”
“"I think you should be more concerned with the people that live there instead of your meaningless vacation," one user responded.”
“"Such a bummer but we plan to hit the @nickresortpuntacana resort another time this year.”Many bashed Hart on social media in response to the post, claiming it was tone-deaf.”
“SEE ALSO: Gwyneth Paltrow reveals plans for Goop TV show, slams haters: 'If you want to f**k with me, bring your A-game'“And just like that, our family vacation is canceled," she captioned the screenshot.”
“Hart, 41, apparently complained that Hurricane Maria ruined her family’s vacation plans by sharing a screenshot of a weather alert she received notifying her of the travel changes caused by the Category 5 storm.”
“Actress Melissa Joan Hart is being criticized for an Instagram post she shared during the aftermath of the deadly Hurricane Maria.”


"More from AOL: Scott disc, 34, is suspected of" hooking up "with Anthony Michael Hall, a 19-year-old star from the breakfast club, who was convicted of assault. Kylie Jenner is wearing a white tights and a brassiess: a sexy snapshot of instagram... "
The star of "Sabrina the sorceress" is trying to control harm by deleting a post and sharing words of goodwill with Puerto ricans, and the post is labeled as " A little light humor. "
"Hurricane Maria completely cut off power to 3 million people living in Puerto Rico and killed more than a dozen people in Dominica."
"I think you should care more about the people who live there than your meaningless vacation," one user replied
"It's a bad luck, but we plan to go to @ nicklesortpuntacana resort again this year." Many people criticized Hart on social media as deaf
"See also: Gwyneth Paltrow revealed a plan for a goop TV show, and the hater said," if you want to play with me, bring your game. "So our family vacation was cancelled," she wrote in the screenshot
"Hart, 41, apparently complained that hurricane Maria disrupted her family's holiday plans because she shared a screenshot of a weather alert she received informing her of the travel changes caused by a category 5 storm."
"Actress Melissa Joan Hart has been criticized for sharing instagram posts after the deadly hurricane Maria."



**Something goes wrong**
“Eminem’s last album was the disappointing 2017 record, Revival.”
“(Read: Eminem on Trump: “A Fucking Turd Would Have Been a Better President)Check out fan-caught clips below as Em’s set was not part of Coachella’s official YouTube live stream.”
“Interestingly enough, both Rihanna and Beyoncé (obviously) were in attendance this weekend and in theory could’ve participated in Em’s set.”
“Rexha replaced RiRi on “The Monster”.”
“Grey provided vocals for Dido on “Stan”, Beyoncé on “Walk on Water”, and Rihanna on “Love the Way You Lie”.”
“Meanwhile, 50 Cent brought out a medley of songs which included hits “In Da Club” and “My Life”.”
“Dre and Em delivered collaborative renditions of “Still D.R.E.”, “Nothin’ but a G Thang”, 2Pac’s “California Love”, and “Forgot About Dre”.”
“Skylar Grey and Bebe Rexha also dropped in.”
“He didn’t come to Indio by his lonesome, however, as his set featured special guests Dr. Dre and 50 Cent.”
“Eminem and Dr. Dre at Coachella 2018Eminem was the final act to take the Coachella stage Sunday night, marking the Detroit native’s first headlining gig at the festival.”


"Eminem's last album was the disappointing 2017 album Renaissance
"(read: Eminem to trump:" a damn shit would have been a better president) take a look at the clip captured by the fans below, because Eminem's setup is not part of cochella's official YouTube live stream. "
"Interestingly, both Rihanna and Beyonce (obviously) were in this weekend's show, and theoretically they could have been in EM's show."
Lexia replaced Riley in monster
Gray sang for Dido's Stan, Beyonce's water walk and Rihanna's the way to love you and lie
At the same time, 50 cents also launched a set of songs, including popular songs "in the talent club" and "my life"
"Still d.r.e.," nothing'but a G thang, "2pac's" California love "and" forget about dre "were performed by DRE and em
"Skylar grey and Bebe Rexha are here, too."
"But he didn't come to India because he was lonely, because his crew had a special guest, Dr. Drey, and 50 cents."
"Eminem and Dr.Dr "Eminem is the last act on the stage of cochella on Sunday night, marking the first headline performance of the Detroit native at the festival," he said



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“They didn't announce the breakup on social media or anything, but Beckham did just introduce the paparazzi to Moretz's successor, 19-year-old model Lexi Wood.”
“They were photographed kissing in the window of Honorable Society Tattoo Parlor in West Hollywood Saturday, where Beckham was getting a new tattoo of a pinup girl.”
“BACKGRIDThis content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Meanwhile, Moretz shared an Instagram story of herself listening to Cardi B's "Be Careful" the day the kissing photos surfaced.”
“The chorus of that song goes per Genius Be careful with me do you know what you doin Whose feelings that you re hurtin and bruisin You gon gain the whole world But is it worth the girl that you re losin Be careful with me Yeah it s not...”
“...a threat it s a warnin...”
“She followed that up with three cute photos of herself...coincidence or secret message?”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"They didn't break up on social media, but David just introduced the paparazzi to morritz's successor, 19-year-old model Lexy wood
"They were photographed kissing in the window of the glory society tattoo shop in West Hollywood on Saturday, where David got a beautiful girl's new tattoo."
"Backgrid this content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
Meanwhile, Moretz shared a story on instagram about listening to Cardi B's "be careful" on the day the kiss photo was exposed
"The chorus of that song is every genius. Be careful with me. You know what you're doing, whose feelings you're hurting and bruising. You can get the whole world, but it's worth losing the girl. Be careful with me. Yes, it's not..."
"One threat, one warning"
"She then took three lovely pictures of herself Coincidence or secret information? "



**Something goes wrong**
““And she feels responsible for them being here because she prayed for them.””
““She feeds them,” Knowles Lawson added.”
“Knowles Lawson told Us last month that her new grandbabies are “adorable and just beautiful and healthy” and Blue is “excited” to help look after them and pick out their outfits.”
“One thing’s for sure, Blue is a doting big sister to her siblings.”
“...their birth they ve been kept under wraps since then so it remains to be seen which of their parents they resemble...”
“Lena Dunham a card carrying member of the Beyhive told Us in February shortly after the Grammy winner announced that she was expecting twins that Blue Ivy is an icon Beyoncé welcomed twins Sir and Rumi in June and while the singer shared a pic of the babies shortly after...”
““Beyonce says Blue changes every day and looks just like Jay now,” Fiona told Us in 2012.”
“R&B singer Melanie Fiona previously told Us Weekly that when Blue was a baby she resembled the rapper.”
“A lot of people have remarked over the years how much Beyoncé and husband Jay-Z’s oldest child looks like her daddy, but this pic proves that the 5-year-old takes after both her mom and her dad.”
“Getting her braids done by Toni❤️ A post shared by Tina Knowles (@mstinalawson) on Oct 7, 2017 at 12:40pm PDTCommenters agreed with her, writing, “Omg thought it was blue!” “Twins!” wrote another.”


"She felt responsible for them being here because she prayed for them."
"She feeds them," Knowles Lawson added
Knowles Lawson told us last month that her new grandchildren were "lovely, beautiful and healthy" and that Blu was "excited" to help look after them and choose their clothes
"One thing is for sure. LAN is a big sister who dotes on her brothers and sisters."
“…… Since then, their birth has been kept secret, so we'll see what their parents look like. "
"Lena Dunham told us in February, shortly after the Grammy winner announced that she was pregnant with twins, that blue Ivy was an idol, that Beyonce welcomed the twins jazz and rummy in June, and that the singer soon shared a picture of a baby..."
"Beyonce said blue changes every day and now looks like Jay," Fiona told us in 2012.
Melanie Fiona, an R & B singer, told us earlier that when blue is a baby, she's like a rap singer.
"Over the years, a lot of people have said how much Beyonce and her husband jay z's eldest child looks like her father, but this photo proves that a five-year-old looks like both his mother and his father."
"Tony braided her hair ❤️  Tina Knowles (@ mstinalawson) shared a post at 12:40 p.m. on October 7, 2017, and the PDT comment agreed with her, saying: "my God, I thought it was blue! "Twins! "Another one."



**Something goes wrong**
“Sugar Bear Hair?”
“(Diff Eyewear?”
“Thus the narrative is both interesting to watch and the movie equivalent of comfort food.”
“You know that a couple will face adversity and probably part ways for a time but in the end will find their way back to each other.”
“The reason romantic comedies are so highly watchable is that they follow a familiar arc that still integrates conflict.”
“Even Hallmark wouldn’t air a rom-com with this little narrative tension.”
“Finally, he chooses one of them, and they get engaged and live happily ever after.”
“They each want an exclusive commitment.”
“He cares for them both.”
“Imagine a movie, for example, in which a man is dating two women.”


"Sugar bear hair?"
(different glasses
"Therefore, this kind of narrative is both interesting and equivalent to the comfort food in the film."
"You know a couple will face adversity, may break up for a while, but eventually find each other's home."
"The reason why romantic comedies are so popular is that they follow a familiar arc, which is still fused with conflict."
"Even hallmark would not play a ROM com with this little narrative tension."
"In the end, he chose one, they got engaged and lived happily ever after."
"Each of them wants an exclusive commitment."
"He's both concerned."
For example, imagine a movie in which a man is dating two women



**Something goes wrong**
“I especially want the new mamas out there to hear that, because we see so much of how glossy motherhood can be and not enough of how real 3D life is always complicated (and better for it)."”
“Every day has moments of total splendor and also a decent number of WTFs.”
“"There is no bounce-back, it's all onwards and upwards.”
“"Seven weeks post-partum, still looking three months pregnant," she captioned a mirror selfie of herself in a black bra and underwear.”
“In the Instagram caption, Daphne, who welcomed her third child in December, shares that there’s no such thing as bouncing back.”
“Daphne Oz, former co-host of The Chew, is getting positive feedback for posting an honest bathroom mirror selfie about her post-baby body.”


"I especially want new moms to hear that because we've seen so much about how glamorous mothers are and how complex (better for it) real 3D life is," he said
"Every day has its moments of glory, and there are quite a number of wtfs."
"There is no rebound, everything is forward and up."
"Seven weeks after birth, she looks like she's still three months pregnant," she wrote in a self portrait in a mirror wearing a black bra and underwear
"In the title of instagram, Daphne, who had her third child last December, shared that there was no rebound."
"Daphne Oz, a former co host of chew, got positive feedback for releasing a self portrait of her baby body in a real bathroom mirror."



**Something goes wrong**
“But despite the formation of this unprecedented league of heroes - Batman, Wonder Woman, Aquaman, Cyborg and The Flash - it may already be too late to save the planet from an assault of catastrophic proportions.'”
“'Together, Batman and Wonder Woman work quickly to find and recruit a team of metahumans to stand against this newly awakened threat.”
“In a synopsis, Warner Bros explained: 'Fuelled by his restored faith in humanity and inspired by Superman's selfless act, Bruce Wayne enlists the help of his newfound ally, Diana Prince, to face an even greater enemy.”
“Warner Bros also gave an insight into the upcoming Justice League.”
“You know, it's a really talented group of people.'”
“...who s in it...”
“To come The film already stars Ben Affleck as Batman Gal Gadot as Wonder Woman Ezra Miller as The Flash Ray Fisher as Cyborg Jason Momoa as Aquaman Amber Heard as Mera and Henry Cavill as Superman But yeah I think so and I love it and I love everybody...”
“I don't know what I'm allowed to say, because I feel like there's probably some drone following me from DC, and if I say anything wrong I get, you know, picked off.”
“Speaking at the time, Jesse said: 'I'm kind of in wait [mode].”
“Jesse hinted back in May at the MCM London Comic Con that Luthor would be back in Justice League, although he was cautious not to reveal too much.”


"But while this unprecedented League of heroes has been formed - Batman, wonder woman, Aquaman, cyborgs and flash - it may be too late to save the planet from catastrophic attacks."
"Batman and wonder woman quickly found and recruited a superhuman team to confront this new awakening threat."
"Inspired by his renewed confidence in human nature and superhuman selflessness, Bruce Wayne sought the help of his new ally Diana Prince to face a bigger enemy," Warner Bros. explained in a brief
"Warner Brothers also has a deep understanding of the coming justice alliance."
"You know, this is a very talented group of people."
“… Who's in there... "
"The next movie is Ben Affleck as Batman, Gail gado as wonder woman, Ezra Miller as flash, Fisher as cyborg, Jason momoya as Aquarius, amber as Myra and Henry Carvel as Superman, but yes, I like it, I love everyone..."
"I don't know what I can say, because I think maybe some drones are following me from Washington. If I say something wrong, you know, I'm fired."
"Jesse said at the time: 'I'm a bit waiting (mode),"
"Jesse hinted at the MCM comics conference in London in May that Luther would return to the Justice League, although he was careful not to reveal too much."



**Something goes wrong**
“RELATED VIDEO: Alicia Vikander is White Hot During Brazilian VacationThe newlyweds made their public debut as a couple at the 2016 Golden Globe Awards but have kept their longrunning relationship largely under wraps.”
“The couple was also spotted touring Verona and Florence, where they stopped to take a few photos with fans.”
“Image zoom Credit: Following Vikander and Fassbender’s under-the-radar wedding, the pair honeymooned in Italy.”
“...she added...”
“He would be like I m stuck what should I do and I would say You re asking me That was such a sweet thing Life is about a lot more than work but if it s also your biggest passion of course it s something you enjoy talking about...”
““Of course he’d done more films than me, but immediately when we started to work together he was so open to wanting me to chip in new ideas and thoughts,” she continued.”
“...character...”
“After calling her husband one of the absolute best actors I ve worked with the Academy Award winning actress explained how even though he had more experience than she did when they began filming the movie he never looked down on her and even asked her for advice on his...”
““We had a great experience, apart from the fact that we…,” Vikander told Vogue before glancing down at her wedding ring with a laugh.”
“Image zoom Credit: Karwai Tang/WireImageThe star of the upcoming Tomb Raider reboot went on to admit that the pair — who met in late 2014 while filming The Light Between Oceans — might even consider working together again under the right circumstances.”


"Related video: Alicia vikander is very popular during her holiday in Brazil. The newlyweds made their debut at the 2016 Golden Globe Awards, but their long-term relationship has been basically kept secret."
"The couple were also found touring Verona and Florence, where they stopped to take a few pictures with their fans."
"Credit for image zooming: the two honeymooned in Italy after vicander and faspinder's secret wedding."
“… She added
"He will feel that I am trapped, what should I do? I will say that you are asking me, life is not just work, what a wonderful thing it is, but if it is also your greatest passion, it is certainly something you like to talk about..."
"Of course, he made more movies than I did, but when we started working together, he was happy to let me add new ideas and ideas," she continued
“… Character... "
"After calling her husband one of the absolute best actors I've ever worked with the Oscar winning actress, she explained that although he had more experience in making the film than she had, he never looked down on her and even asked her for advice about him..."
"We have a good experience, except in fact, we..." Vicander told vogue and looked down at her wedding ring with a smile
"Image scaling credit: the two people Karwai Tang / WireImage, the star of the upcoming Tomb Raider, met when shooting light of the sea later in 2014, may even consider working together again if appropriate."



**Something goes wrong**
“28 American Genius Brain Games Season 3 4 The Catch Season 1 Cesar 911 Season 1 I Am Ali Miami SWAT Season 1”
“Kiss II Leaving Feb 16 Our Last Tango Save the Date Leaving Feb 17 Freakonomics Leaving Feb 19 An Idiot Abroad Season 1 3 Leaving Feb 20 Aziz Ansari Dangerously Delicious Leaving Feb 21 Enron The Smartest Guys in the Room Leaving Feb 24 Jane Got a Gun Leaving Feb...”
“Chicago Leaving Feb 10 Dragonheart The Shadowed Claw Leaving Feb 11 A Little Bit of Heaven Leaving Feb 12 Honeymoon Leaving Feb 14 Family Guy Season 1 8 Leaving Feb 15 12 Dog Days Till Christmas Before I Go to Sleep Burn Notice Season 1 7 Christmas Belle A Christmas...”
“Stranger Project X Silver Streak Stranger by the Lake Tin Man Top Gear Series 19 23 Voyage to the Bottom of the Sea Leaving Feb 2 A Ballerina s Tale Leaving Feb 3 The Texas Chainsaw Massacre The Beginning Leaving Feb 4 Hannibal Buress Animal Furnace Hannibal Buress Live from...”
“Leaving Feb 1 The Benchwarmers Brubaker Corpse Bride Day Watch Desk Set Enquiring Minds Everyone s Hero The Five Heartbeats The Fury Hard Candy How to Steal a Million King Arthur The Longest Day Magic City Season 1 2 The Nightmare Before Christmas Night Watch Open Season Scared Silly Perfect...”
“Take a look below at the complete list of movies and TV shows leaving Netflix in February.”
“Netflix's February additions were just announced.”
“As a number of titles are leaving, a variety of films and TV shows will be added throughout the month.”
“Two Tim Burton films, Corpse Bride and The Nightmare Before Christmas, are also expiring.”
“Seasons one through eight of animated series Family Guy will be taken off, along with seven seasons of Burn Notice.”


"28 American genius brain games Season 3 Episode 4 Season 1 Cesar 911 Season 1 I'm Ali Miami SWAT Season 1"
"Kiss II leaves February 16, our last tango reservation date leaves February 17, Freakonomics leaves February 19, foreign idiots Season 1 3 leaves February 20, Aziz Ansari leaves February 21, the smartest person in Enron's room leaves February 24, Jane leaves February with a gun..."
"Chicago leaves Longxin on February 10, leaves a little paradise on February 11, leaves honeymoon on February 12, leaves family on February 14, season 1, 8, leaves February 15, 12 dog days until Christmas I burn before I go to bed notice Season 1, 7 Christmas beauty, Christmas..."
"Stranger project x silver striped stranger lakeside tin man top gear series 19 23 sail to the bottom of the sea leave February 2 a ballet dancer's story leave February 3 Texas Chainsaw Massacre start leave February 4 Hannibal braith animal stove Hannibal braith life from..."
"Leave the bench on February 1st Knight Brubeck corpse bride's day stand set ask everyone's hero five heart beating hard candy how to steal millions of King Arthur's longest day Magic City Season 1 Season 2 nightmares before Christmas Eve watch open season frighten perfect..."
"Take a look at the full list of movies and TV shows that left Netflix in February."
"Netflix's new membership list for February has just been announced."
"With many films coming out one after another, all kinds of films and TV plays will be added throughout the month."
Tim Burton's two movies, the corpse bride and the Nightmare Before Christmas, are about to expire
"The first to eighth seasons of the animated series" family boy "will be cancelled, and there will be seven seasons of Burn Notice."



**Something goes wrong**
“It seems they inadvertently caught the couple while they were on a vacation Radar!”
“Memorable night! "”
“Thank you for sharing your ideas about sustainable supply chains _ The kitchen _ and its whole concept is a model to follow.”
“...in Taringa.”
“The legend of the restaurant said: "What an inspiration to have had Kimbal Musk and his family with us".”
“The photo showed the co-founder and CEO of Tesla and the American actress sitting next to each other, at a table with Elon's brother, famous South African restauranteur Kimbal Musk .”
“Looky-loos on Instagram noticed that the ex were at the bottom of a photo, which was published yesterday by the official account of El Taringa restaurant in Santiago.”
“A week after discarding reports that they are not a couple, Amber Heard and Elon Musk were seen having dinner together in Chile on Friday night.”


"It seems that they caught the couple by accident on the holiday radar!"
"Unforgettable night!"
"Thank you for sharing your thoughts on sustainable supply chain (kitchen), the whole concept of which is a model to follow."
“… In tallinga. "
The legend of the restaurant said: "it's an inspiration to have musk kinbar and his family with us."
"The photo shows Tesla's co-founder and CEO sitting with the American actress at a table with Elon's brother, South Africa's famous restaurant owner, kimbal musk."
"Look looks on instagram noticed that her ex was at the bottom of a photo released yesterday by the official account of El taringa restaurant in San Diego."
"A week after denying that they were not lovers, people saw amber Hurd and Elon Musk having dinner in Chile on Friday night."



**Something goes wrong**
“Can we give him the best boyfriend award already?”
“Meghan was not in attendance at the ceremony per royal protocol, but Harry made the three-hour round trip to Kensington Palace, where his date was staying, picking her up for the wedding reception.”
“...she shared.”
“"So, my cup runneth over and I’m the luckiest girl in the world!"”
“Her closing quote, while cryptic, sure said a lot.”
“November 1, 2016: A Cryptic QuoteCanada's Vancouver Sun published a Q&A in which Meghan discussed her collection for retailer Reitmans.”
“That very day, Meghan posted an adorable banana couple hugging on her Instagram page, followed by a high-tea snap on November 1.”
“The Sunday Express reported that Prince Harry had been secretly dating the Suits star, and according to one source the royal was "happier than he’s been for many years."”
“October 31, 2016: The Secret's OutThe day it all began—at least for the public.”
“Matchmaker, matchmaker, make us a royal match next time, OK?”


"Can we award him best boyfriend?"
"Megan didn't attend the wedding in accordance with royal etiquette, but Harry went back and forth for three hours to Kensington Palace where his date was staying to pick her up for the wedding banquet."
“… She shared
"So, I'm running out of glasses. I'm the luckiest girl in the world!"
"Her conclusion, though obscure, did say a lot."
"November 1, 2016: Canada's Vancouver Sun published a mysterious quote in which Megan discussed her collection for retailer reitmans."
"On that day, Megan posted on her instagram website the news of a lovely banana couple embracing each other, followed by a snapshot of the climax on November 1."
The Sunday Express reported that Prince Harry had been secretly dating the suit star and that he was "happier than he has been for many years," according to a source
"October 31, 2016: the secret is finally revealed, at least for the public."
"Matchmaker, matchmaker, will you give us a royal wedding next time?"



**Something goes wrong**
“The world failed.”
“Your smile was one in a million.”
“Sophie had also talked about her boyfriend on Twitter just two days ago, calling him the love of her life.”
“(Image: ITV)Sophie had been tweeting along with the current series and supporting her pal Ellie Brown, who joined the show last week.”
“Her Love Island friends shared a string of moving tributes after the shock news of her death emerged.”
“The words: "In loving memory of Sophie Gradon" were accompanied by a picture of the late 32-year-old smiling.”
“A tribute was paid to former Love Island star Sophie Gradon just before Thursday's episode.”
“A representative for Love Island said: "The whole ITV2 and Love Island team are profoundly saddened to hear the news about Sophie, and our deepest sympathies and thoughts go to her family and friends."”
“(Image: ITV)But she found wider fame as part of the 2016 Love Island cast.”
“The reality star, who hailed from Newcastle, was crowned Miss Great Britain in 2009 and was also a former Miss Newcastle.”


"The world has failed."
"Your smile is one in a million."
"Sophie tweeted about her boyfriend two days ago, calling him the love of her life."
"(picture: ITV) Sophie has been tweeting with the current series and supporting her friend Elle brown, who joined last week's show."
"After the shocking news of her death came out, her friends on Love Island shared a series of moving mourning."
"The phrase:" in the memory of love, Sophie bin Laden "is accompanied by a photo of the late 32 year old smiling
"Just before the show starts on Thursday, people pay homage to the former love Island star Sophie gladen."
A representative of "Love Island" said: "hearing the news from Sophie, the whole ITV2 and Love Island team are deeply saddened. We express our deepest sympathy and thoughts to her family and friends."
"(photo source: ITV) but as a member of the 2016 Love Island crew, she gained a broader reputation."
The Newcastle reality star was crowned Miss England in 2009 and a former Miss Newcastle



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Despite their relationship strife, they were committed to fighting for each other, their marriage and their family.”
“That scarred me.”Finding Trust AgainThe couple, who has been open about their experience with couples therapy, participated in a season of WE tv’s Marriage Boot Camp: Reality Stars, and viewers watched as the couple just couldn’t seem to put their past behind them.”
“Image zoom Credit: Kendra Wilkinson/Instagram“It got pretty bad, [but] not to the point where I would harm my family,” she told PEOPLE in 2011.”
““Hank’s dad and his grandfather were both named Hank, so it was very important to us to carry on the family tradition.”After giving birth, Kendra opened up about her battle with postpartum depression.”
““We’ve already decided to name our son Hank Baskett IV,” she previously said.”
“Becoming ParentsSix months after tying the knot, Kendra and Hank welcomed their son.”
“Later that month, the former Playmate married Hank at her onetime residence, the Playboy Mansion, in Los Angeles.”
“That’s all that matters,” the former NFL star told PEOPLE about helping Kendra balance pregnancy and wedding planning.”
““I want her to enjoy this wedding because if she’s happy, I’m happy.”
“...first child together in December...”


"Despite the conflict in their relationship, they are committed to fighting for each other, marriage and family."
"It scares me a lot." The couple made public their experience of husband and wife treatment and participated in a season of we TV marriage training camp: Reality TV stars. The audience watched the couple as if they could not forget their past
"The credit for image zooming: Kendra Wilkinson / instagram," she told people in 2011, "it's getting pretty bad [but] not to the point where I'm going to hurt my family."
"Hank's father and grandfather are both called hank, so it's very important for us to inherit the family tradition." After giving birth, Kendra talked about her struggle with postpartum depression
"We have decided to name our son Hank Basquet IV," she said earlier
Ten months after their marriage, Kendra and Hank became parents for their son
Later that month, the former playmate married hank at the Playboy building in Los Angeles, where hank used to live
"That's the most important thing," the former NFL star told people, helping Kendra balance her pregnancy and wedding plans
"I want her to enjoy the wedding, because if she's happy, I'm happy too."
“… In December, the first child was together... "



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Ariana Grande Offers Love and Support to Manchester One Year After Tragic BombingAriana Grande Is ‘Casually Dating’ 'SNL' Star Pete Davidson Following Mac Miller Split, Source SaysAriana Grande Wows in First TV Performance Since Mac Miller Breakup at 2018 Billboard Music Awards...”
“"Let's please stop doing that," she continued.”
“Miller has talked openly about his sobriety in the past.”
“A short time later, Miller was arrested without incident at 1:50 a.m. for a misdemeanor DUI.”
“According to the official, Miller and his two passengers fled the scene on foot.”
“An official for the Los Angeles Police Department told ET last Thursday that 26-year-old Miller was the driver involved in a traffic collision with a power pole at 12:50 a.m. that morning in the San Fernando Valley in California.”
“I will continue to pray from the bottom of my heart that he figures it all out and that any other woman in this position does as well."”
“"Of course I didn't share how hard or scary it was while it was happening but it was.”
“I have cared for him and tried to support his sobriety & prayed for his balance for years (and always will of course) but shaming/blaming women for a man's inability to keep his sh** together is a very major problem."”
“"I’ve spent a good time very sober and now I’m just, like, living regularly I think it’s important," he told W magazine.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Ariane Grande provides love and support for Manchester a year ago, after the tragic bombing, Grande was' casual dating 'after SNL' star Pete Davidson, and Mike Miller split, the source said, after Mike Miller broke up at the 2018 Billboard Music Awards in her first TV show
"Let's not do that again," she continued
"Miller has talked publicly about his lucidity in the past."
Shortly after, Miller was arrested at 1:50 a.m. for drink driving misdemeanor
"According to officials, Miller and two of his passengers fled the scene on foot."
"A Los Angeles police officer told et on Thursday that Miller, 26, was the driver who had a 12:50 a.m. crash with a power pole in the San Fernando Valley, California
"I will continue to pray from the bottom of my heart that he will find out everything, and any other woman in this position will do the same."
"Of course, I didn't tell you how hard or terrible it was when it happened, but it was."
"Over the years, I've been caring for him, trying to support his lucidity, praying for his balance (and will always be), but it's a very serious problem to humiliate / blame women for keeping men out of health."
"I've had a good time awake and now I'm just, like, living a regular life and I think it's important," he told W magazine



**Something goes wrong**
“It’s really a blessing,” he said.”
“...year old son Mason shared a video of her baby girl s feet on Instagram Story Monday writing She s so noisy when she eats lol 2weeksoldtoday mylovemylife Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements plus celebrity mom blogs...”
“Ronnie Ortiz-Magro revealed his daughter’s name to Us Weekly on Tuesday, two weeks after he welcomed his first child with girlfriend Jen Harley on April 3.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“A rep for Ortiz-Magro, 32, did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
““When we first started dating in the beginning, we’d joke around saying, ‘What if we had a kid?”
“It’d be crazy and good looking!’ And we’d say ‘What would we name it?’ We joked that we liked Ariana,” the new dad told Us.”
“When she found out she was pregnant we looked at each other and we re like Guess we re naming the baby Ariana if it s a girl Next thing you know we find out the gender and we re like Guess so Harley who is already mom to 11”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“...one step at a time It s going to be a really really good year with the baby coming and the show coming back...”


"It's a blessing," he said
“… On Monday, Mason, a 14-year-old son, shared a video of her baby girl's feet on instagram story. She wrote that when she ate lol, it was too noisy. Today, two weeks later, I love my life. I want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blog... "
"Ronnie Ortiz Magro revealed his daughter's name to us weekly on Tuesday. Two weeks ago, he had his first child with his girlfriend Jen Harley on April 3."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A representative of Ortiz Magro, 32, did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
"When we start dating, we joke, 'what if we have a child
"That would be crazy and beautiful! We're going to say, "what do we name it?"? "We joked that we liked Ariana," the new dad told us
"When she finds out she's pregnant, we look at each other, and we think we name the baby Ariana, and if it's a girl, the next thing you know, we find the gender, and we're like guessing Harley who's mother 11."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
“… Step by step, it will be a very, very good year, with the baby coming and the show coming back... "



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““And they both realized they could fix what was broken.””
“She was pretending she was okay with not having a kid, he was pretending he absolutely couldn’t and wouldn’t budge on that point.”“They both got a wake-up call once they canceled the wedding,” added the insider.”
“In a clip from the upcoming episode of Total Bellas, Nikki is left with mixed feelings after her ex-fiancé gives an emotional interview on the Today show.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s kinda confusing right now watching John’s interview on the Today show because last we talked, that pretty much was it,” she says.”
““If I wanna be a mom, there’s no John.”During the interview, which took place in February before the couple officially announced the end of their year-long engagement, Cena, 41, admitted he and Nikki, 34, were going through a rough patch.”
““You have two choices, you either jump ship and start a new relationship or move forward and try and work through it,” he said.”
““We are going to move forward and try to work through it.”
“After watching the interview, Nikki says she’s more confused than ever.”
““He says we haven’t jumped ship yet — I don’t know what that means,” she says.”


"They all realize that they can fix things that are broken."
"She pretended that she had no problem without children, and he pretended that he could never and would never give in to that." "They were all woken up after cancelling the wedding," the person familiar with the matter added
"In the upcoming total Bellas, Nicky's ex fiance gave an emotional interview on the today show, and she was in a mixed mood."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's a bit confusing to watch John's interview on today's show now, because last time we talked about it, that's about it," she said
"If I wanted to be a mother, there would be no John." In the interview, senna, 41, admitted that he and Nicky, 34, were going through a tough time. The interview took place in February, before they officially announced the end of their engagement
"You have two choices, either to change jobs and start a new relationship, or to move forward and try to get through it," he said
"We have to move forward and try to get through the difficulties."
"After reading the interview, Nicky said she was more confused than ever before."
"He said we haven't jumped yet - I don't know what that means," she said



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Glow on, Brittany!”
“She added: "I also started going to classes at Sweat Garage and it helped to keep me focused and have direction instead of trying to go to the gym and workout on my own."”
“For the past year, the Vanderpump Rules SURver been on a serious health kick and the results of her lifestyle transformation are amazing.”
“The Kentucky beauty, who is currently planning a wedding with fiancé Jax Taylor, revealed that she's lost 25 pounds.”
“While the upcoming marital ceremony has given Brittany a new source of motivation, she told E!”
“...that her main focus is to be "happy and healthy."”
“"Being healthy and fit makes me feel so much more confident and happy with myself.”
“It feels really great when you start seeing results and your old clothes start to fit again," she said.”
“So what exactly are Brittany's secrets to a healthy lifestyle?”
“The newly-engaged SURver said that running and interval training "really helped jumpstart my weight loss."”


"Come on, Brittany!"
She added: "I also started going to sweat garage classes, which helped me focus and have direction, instead of trying to go to the gym to exercise myself."
"In the past year, van der Pugh's rule has been seriously healthy and the result of her lifestyle change is amazing."
The Kentucky beauty, who is planning a wedding with her fiancee, Jax Taylor, revealed that she has lost 25 pounds
"Although the upcoming wedding gave Brittany a new source of motivation, she told e!"
“… Her main concern is "happiness and health."
"A healthy body makes me more confident and happy about myself."
"It's really great when you start to see the results and your old clothes start to fit," she said
"So what's Brittany's secret to a healthy life?"
Running and interval training "really helped me start losing weight," the newly engaged supervisor said



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Big news?”
“There has been days of rampant speculation if the 35-year-old singer had given birth at a Los Angeles medical center.”
“We are incredibly grateful that our family will be growing by two, and we thank you for your well wishes.”
“'We have been blessed two times over.”
“She wrote at the time: 'We would like to share our love and happiness.”
“Another woman was seen heading to the hospital with pink and blue balloonsThe power couple - who got married in 2008 - announced they were adding to their brood in February when the Formation hitmaker posted a photograph of her burgeoning baby bump on her social networking sites.”
“Love, Granddad'One of each: This rather telling balloon and floral gift was delivered to the hospital on Sunday with a card which read: 'To B and J' following speculation the couple had a boy and a girlAnother batch of balloons!”
“His post: Taking to Twitter, Mathew posted a picture of a birthday note which read: 'Happy Birthday to the twins!”
“A source later told People magazine: 'Bey and Jay are thrilled and have started sharing the news with their family and closest friends.'”
“Showbiz 411 first reported on Saturday the power couple welcomed two children on Monday night or Tuesday morning.”


"Big news?"
"If the 35 year old singer was born in a Los Angeles Medical Center, speculation is rampant these days."
"We are very grateful that our family will triple, and we thank you for your good wishes."
"We were blessed twice."
"We are willing to share our love and happiness," she wrote at the time
"Another woman was seen going to the hospital with pink and blue balloons. The power couple got married in 2008, and in February this year, the power couple posted a picture of her new lump on the social networking site, announcing that they would contribute to their children. "
"Dear, grandfather, one for each: This convincing balloon and flower gift was sent to the hospital on Sunday. There is a card on it, which says:" for B and J ". It is speculated that the couple have a boy and a girl, and another batch of balloons!"
Matthew posted a photo of a birthday note on twitter that said, "Happy Birthday to the twins!"
A source later told people magazine: "Bei and Jay are very excited. They have started to share the news with their family and closest friends."
"Acting circle 411 first reported on Saturday that the power couple had two children on Monday night or Tuesday morning."



**Something goes wrong**
“...their relationship along opting to keep separate homes...”
“He has cut down on work RELATED VIDEO New Parents Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott Together in First Photo Since Welcoming Daughter Stormi And while the couple who have been dating since April 2017 are committed to one another another source told PEOPLE they re in no rush to speed...”
““Travis is able to do his own thing during the day as well, but he helps Kylie out at night,” the insider explained.”
“Image zoom Travis Scott and Kylie Jenner | Credit: Bob Levey/GettyA source revealed to PEOPLE recently that the new mom and dad “are a good team” when it comes to taking care of their newborn daughter.”
“...at a restaurant in Miami earlier this month...”
“Jenner and Scott are still making time for their relationship since becoming parents stepping out on a lunch date with friends and family at Nobu Malibu in February where Jenner showed off her luxe push present a black Ferrari La Ferrari and snuggling together on a boat as they arrived...”
“The 20-year-old makeup mogul and her 25-year-old rapper boyfriend continued their couple time that night at West Hollywood eatery Sweet Chick, Just Jared reports.”
“The outlet added that they ordered two small Aloha Pineapple smoothies as well as an oatmeal.”
“The duo started their morning by stopping at a Jamba Juice in West Hollywood, according to photos obtained by TMZ.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


“… Their relationship has always chosen to live separately... "
"He cut down on work-related videos, the first photo taken by new parents Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott after welcoming their daughter, stormi. Although the couple, who have been dating since April 2017, have been promising each other, another source told people that they are not in a hurry to speed up..."
"Travis can do his own thing during the day, but at night he will help Kelly out," the person familiar with the matter explained
Photo zooming Travis Scott and Kylie Jenner | source: Bob levy / gettya recently revealed that new parents "are a good team" in taking care of their new daughter
“… At a restaurant in Miami earlier this month
"In February, Jenna and Scott had lunch with family and friends in Nobu Malibu. Jenna showed off a luxury push gift of a black Ferrari La Ferrari and nestled in a boat when they arrived. Since then, Jenna and Scott are still making time for their relationship..."
According to Jared, the 20-year-old make-up tycoon and her 25-year-old rap boyfriend continued their courtship with sweet chick at the West Hollywood restaurant that night
"The store added that they ordered two small Aloha pineapple smoothies and an order of oatmeal."
"According to the photos obtained by TMZ, the two stopped at a Jamba juice store in West Hollywood in the morning to start their morning
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...says “The theme to our wedding is ‘Life has a beautiful crazy design.’ It’s a line from our first dance that we feel relates so much to our lives and how we got to where we are today.””
“It was a very refreshing feeling.”RELATED VIDEO: Inside Bachelor in Paradise Stars Carly Waddell and Evan Bass’ Tropical NuptialsWhen it came to her nuptials, Bischoff worked with Keri Ketterer of Always Yours Events to plan a celebration “that felt personal to us as a couple,” Bischoff.”
“I felt back to normal.”
“I didn’t feel like I needed to put on a facade.”
“And I could be myself with him.”
““I was in a very raw emotional state after my breakup.”
““As soon as I met Ricky, I knew,” Bischoff says.”
“Bischoff met Angel, 31, in 2015 on the dating website Bumble (“Girls’ choice!” she joked in 2016).”
“The couple exchanged rings by Sam Rafidia of European jewelry, as fellow Bachelor alums Kaitlyn Bristowe, Shawn Booth, Evan Bass and Carly Waddell looked on.”
“Her beauty look was co-designed by hairstylist Jennifer Tawa and makeup artist Amanda McCarthy Beauty, from the angel wings in the bride’s chignon to the highly customized airbrushed makeup.”


“…… "The theme of our wedding is" life has a beautiful and crazy design. ". This is a line from our first dance, and we think it has a lot to do with our lives and how we get to where we are today. "
"It's a very refreshing feeling." Related video: in "Bachelor of paradise", when Carly Waddell and Evan bass star in "tropical wedding" talk about her wedding, Bischoff and Kerry Kettler work together to plan a "it's a couple for us" celebration, "Bischoff"
"I feel normal again."
"I don't think there's a need for a facade."
"I can be with him."
"I was very primitive after the breakup."
"I knew as soon as I saw Ricky," Bischoff said
In 2015, Bischoff was on bumble ("girl's choice! "She joked in 2016."
The couple exchanged rings with Sam lafidia from the European jewelry industry, while then single alumni Kaitlyn Bristow, Shawn booth, Evan bass and Carly Waddell watched
"Her beauty is designed by hair stylist Jennifer tava and makeup artist Amanda McCarthy, from angel wings in the bride's Chinon to highly customized spray gun makeup."



**Something goes wrong**
“The the report added that Salling had a “history of depression since his conviction for procession of child pornography in 2017.”If you or someone you know is in emotional distress or suicidal crisis, please call the Lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255).”
“Prior to his death, Salling was awaiting sentencing after pleaded guilty to possession of child pornography in December 2017.”
“The decedent was on house arrest and his roommate for the tracking device down the street from the residence.”Us confirmed at the time that Salling’s family reported him missing before his body was discovered.”
“Sometime after midnight on January 30, “the decedent’s mother woke up and noticed the decedent and his vehicle were gone.”
““The decedent was last known to be alive watching television with his father, in the living room,” the report reads.”
“The autopsy also detailed the timeline of events leading up to officers finding Sailing’s body.”
“He was 35 years old.”
“He was pronounced dead of an apparent suicide at the scene, and the coroner confirmed on February 1 that his cause of death is asphyxia by hanging.”
“As previously reported, the Los Angeles Coroner office confirmed to Us on January 30 that Salling was found dead by a riverbed in the Sunland-Tujunga neighborhood of L.A.”
“(The legal limit for driving is 0.080.)”


The report also said that sarin "has a history of depression since he was convicted of child pornography march in 2017.". If you or someone you know are in emotional distress or suicide crisis, please call lifeline 1-800-273-TALK (8255)
"Before her death, sarin was awaiting a verdict after admitting to possession of child pornography in December 2017."
"The deceased was under house arrest and his roommate searched the streets near his home for tracking devices." The United States confirmed at the time that sarin's family had reported that he was missing before his body was found
"Sometime after midnight on January 30," the mother of the deceased woke up to find that the deceased and his car were missing
"The last time the deceased was found was watching TV in the living room with his father," the report said
"The autopsy also detailed the timetable for the events before the officers found swilling's body."
"He was 35 at the time."
"He was declared to have committed suicide on the spot, and the coroner confirmed on February 1 that the cause of his death was strangulation."
"As mentioned earlier, the Los Angeles coroner's office confirmed to us on January 30 that sarin was found dead near the riverbed of the Sunland Tujunga community in Los Angeles."
"The legal limit for driving is 0.080."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...s popular fire filter...”
“Image zoom Kylie Jenner and daughter Stormi Credit Kylie Jenner Instagram Image zoom Stormi Webster Credit Kylie Jenner Instagram Jenner gave her followers the first full glimpse of her baby girl s face on Saturday Snapchatting an adorable video of Stormi sucking on a purple pacifier while wearing the app...”
“She’s definitely leaning towards pink hues and having fun with the fact that she’s having a girl,” another insider told PEOPLE in December.”
““Kylie is having a lot of fun picking out items for her baby.”
“Image zoom Stormi Webster’s room | Credit: Kylie Jenner/SnapchatThe Kylie Cosmetics pro had baby Stormi’s nursery ready to go by late January, a source close to Jenner revealed to PEOPLE at the time.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““I love her room,” Jenner, 20, wrote on the image shared on Snapchat.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“...front...”


“… S popular fire filters... "
"Image zooming Kylie Jenner and her daughter, stormi credit Kylie Jenner instagram image zooming stormi Webster credit Kylie Jenner instagram Jenner let her followers see her baby girl's face completely for the first time on Saturday, and played a lovely video of stormi sucking a purple pacifier while wearing the app while chatting..."
Another person familiar with the matter told people in December last year: "she definitely tends to be pink and is happy to have a girl."
"Kelly is very happy to choose things for her baby."
"Zoom in and out of Tommy Webster's room | credit: Kelly Jenner / snapchat Kelly cosmetics professionals are ready to baby Tommy's nursery in late January, a source close to Jenner revealed to people at the time."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"I love her room," Jenner, 20, wrote in a picture shared by snapchat
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“… In front of... "



**Something goes wrong**
“But given the size of Disney, it was bound to happen eventually.”
“...the announcements...”
“It intends to launch the service in 2019.”
“The move is a real blow to Netflix, which secured a valuable streaming deal with Disney back in 2012 — before streaming had really taken off.”
“The deal only kicked into effect last year, so Netflix is barely seeing any benefit here.”
“At the same time, it’s a natural step for Disney, which has a huge library of valuable movies and shows to offer.”
“Disney already makes it hard to get a lot of its top movies — requiring people to purchase, rather than rent, a film for instance — so it makes sense that we’re seeing the company try to draw even bigger profits from streaming.”
“Netflix won’t lose its Disney movies right away.”
“Disney says it plans to cut Netflix off starting with the studio’s 2019 films, and Netflix says it’ll be able to keep all the Disney movies it gets through the end of that year.”
“That means Netflix should be able to stream the next two Star Wars movies, but it’ll miss out on the new trilogy’s final installment.”


"But given the scale of Disney, it will definitely come true in the end."
“… Announcement... "
"It intends to launch the service in 2019."
"This is a real blow to Netflix. As early as 2012, Netflix reached a valuable streaming media deal with Disney, and streaming media had not really taken off at that time."
"The deal only came into effect last year, so Netflix sees little benefit."
"At the same time, it's a natural step for Disney because it has a huge and valuable Library of movies and shows to offer."
"It's hard for Disney to get a lot of top movies, for example, asking people to buy rather than rent a movie, so we see that the company is trying to make more profits from streaming media, which makes sense."
"Netflix won't lose Disney movies right away."
"Disney said it plans to cut off Netflix's business from its films in 2019, and Netflix said it will be able to keep all Disney films by the end of that year."
"That means Netflix should be able to stream the next two Star Wars movies, but it will miss the last of the new trilogy."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If the preview on Twitter is a hint of what’s to come, then his fans are definitely going to be happy!”
“Dedicated fans of the rapper are waiting anxiously to see what types of tracks he’s going to drop.”
“The album has caused Kanye a lot of stress.”
“She wants to be supportive so he can finish his album.”
“At the time, a source close to the family told People that Kardashian was content to join him as he worked:Kim happily joined Kanye in Jackson Hole.”
“Here’s a look at what West tweeted about getting rid of his cell phone:West’s wife, Kim Kardashian, reportedly joined the 40-year-old rapper in Wyoming in early May 2018.”
“He’s clearly committed to his craft.”
“Can’t blame him for drowning out the noise to focus on the music.”
“So, basically, he has ditched mobile communication in favor of cultivating his inherent talent and musical genius.”
“...in Jackson Hole Wyoming trying to focus all his energy on his upcoming album...”


"If the notice on Twitter is a hint of the future, then his fans will be very happy!"
"The rapper's loyal fans are anxiously waiting to see what kind of repertoire he will give up."
"This album puts a lot of pressure on Kanye."
"She wants to support him so he can finish his album."
"At that time, a source close to Kardashian's family told people that Kardashian was very content to work with him through difficult times: King was very happy to join Kanye in Jackson Hole."
"Let's take a look at what West tweeted about getting out of jail: West's wife, Kim Kardashian, is reported to have joined the 40 year old rapper in Wyoming in early May 2018
"He's obviously true to his craft."
"I can't blame him for drowning out the noise in order to concentrate on the music."
"So, basically, he gave up mobile communications to cultivate his talent and musical talent."
“… In Jackson Hole, Wyoming, he tried to focus all his energy on his upcoming album



**Something goes wrong**
“Exactly.”
“So has he gone through a lot of the same hard psychological work that Rebecca has?”
“So the idea is that it’s a first-person show: It’s all very much filtered through her perception.”
“We felt like we had an opportunity to do something different, and do it the way that works for our show.”
“But we had always wanted to continue telling his story, and their story, and so when we were [writing] this season, we thought, “We could…”We didn’t want to do it just to recast.”
“So we had a bunch of stuff we wanted to do with Greg, and then Santino needed to move back to New York, so we accelerated all of that storyline at the beginning of Season 2 and wrapped it up.”
“Much like Josh and Nathaniel, their stories don’t end when they’re not sleeping with Rebecca.”
“We probably would’ve taken all of Season 2 to do that.”
“Well, we had always thought their love relationship would die somewhere during Season 2, but we were going to continue his journey towards figuring out that he was an alcoholic, and towards sobriety.”
“When did you first decide he had to come back, in some form?”


"That's right."
"So, did he go through a lot of psychological work as hard as Rebecca?"
"So the idea is, it's a first person show: it's largely filtered through her perception."
"We feel we have the opportunity to do something different and do it in a way that suits our program."
"But we always wanted to continue to tell his story, and their story, so when we were in this season, we thought," we can... " We don't want to just recast. "
"So we have a lot of things we want to do with Greg, and then Santino needs to move back to New York, so we speeded up all the storylines at the start of season two and brought it to an end."
"Like Josh and Nathaniel, their story doesn't end without sleeping with Rebecca."
"We may have spent the whole second season doing it."
"Well, we always thought that their relationship would disappear sometime in the second season, but we're going to continue his journey to find out that he's a drunkard and go to soberness."
"When did you first decide to let him come back in some form?"



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But no, I will not stop acting.””
“...fun because you re in the middle of all these different creative people...”
“...quality filled way Franco also insists that he will continue to act saying I ve got to say of all the things that I ve done and I ve done a lot the actual process of directing is the most...”
“And for me after going back to school and trying to do all these other things this new chapter with surfing and dancing is really about slowing down and trying to focus on fewer things but in a deeper more...”
““Most actors come to a point in their lives where they have to reassess what they’re doing and why they’re doing it.”
“I was very work-addicted, and addicted to other things — not substances, I got over that a long time ago — but I’ve recently changed my life, and this is part of my therapy," he added.”
““I’ve started a new chapter of my life.”
“On the surface my life seems pretty good — I have a career and everything — but I feel isolated and lonely’.”
“And then after, like, 10 years of that, at age 27, I realised, ‘Man, I’m so depressed.”
““I really threw myself into it, and that became everything, to the point where I didn’t even socialise.”


"But no, I won't stop acting."
“… It's fun because you're with these different creative people... "
“… High quality way Franco also insisted that he would continue to act and said, "I've said all things, I've done a lot in the actual process, and the director is the most..."
"For me, after going back to school and trying to do all the other things, the new chapter in surfing and dancing is to slow down and try to focus on fewer things, but more deeply..."
"Most actors come to a stage in their lives and have to reevaluate what they are doing and why they are doing it."
"I'm very addicted to work, addicted to other things - not substances, I gave up a long time ago - but recently I've changed my life, and that's part of my treatment," he added
"I've started a new chapter in my life."
"On the surface, my life seems good - I have a career and everything - but I feel lonely and lonely."
"Then, about 10 years later, at the age of 27, I realized, 'man, I'm so depressed.'"
"I'm really involved, and that's everything. I don't even have social skills."



**Something goes wrong**
“We love each other."”
“You have no idea what your life will look like and where you'll be.'”
“Horror Story actress is 32 years younger than her 75 year old partner but she has fiercely defended the lesbian love they share insisting it is a magical romance...”
“Speaking to Modern Luxury about their relationship, Sarah said: "If anyone wants to spend any time thinking I'm strange for loving the most spectacular person on the planet, then that's their problem.”
“I'm doing just fine."”
“Sarah who began dating Two and a Half Men actress Holland in 2015 after first meeting her at a dinner party a decade ago also opened up about aging insisting she has no intention of ever slowing down and is...”
“...focused on the present...”
“She explained: "If being older means all the roles I'm getting to play now because of all the ups and downs and hills and valleys proceeding it, I say bring it on.”
“Every once in a while I'll go, 'Wow, 43.”
“That's seven years shy of 50.'”


"We love each other."
"You don't know what your life will be like, where you will be."
"The horror story actress is 32 years younger than her 75 year old partner, but she defends lesbian love and insists it's a magical romance..."
Speaking about their relationship, Sarah said: "if it's strange that someone wants to take the time to think that I love the most charming people on the planet, it's their problem."
"I'm fine."
"Sarah first met two-and-a-half-man actress Holland at a dinner party ten years ago and started dating her in 2015. She also disclosed her age and insisted that she had no intention of slowing down, and that she was..."
“… Focus on the present... "
"If being older means that all the roles I'm going to play now are due to all the ups and downs, then I say play it," she explained
"Occasionally I say, 'Wow, 43.'"
"Seven years from 50."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be sure to join our Teen Mom Facebook group to chat about all the latest updates and juicy gossip!”
“"Kail was never my friend," the mother-of-two previously tweeted.”
“In a trailer for the upcoming new episodes, Chelsea Houska, Kailyn Lowry, and Leah Messer threaten to quit the MTV reality series if the drama with their co-stars Jenelle Evans and Briana DeJesus doesn't end.”
“Watch the video above to find out what went down!”
“It's no secret the girls have had their issues through the years — but lately, the nonstop fights are beyond intense.”
“The girls called out Jenelle's husband, David Eason, for tweeting insensitive comments about the LGBT community, which eventually got him fired from the show.”
“The married couple has been firing back ever since, from branding Chelsea as "boring" and questioning Leah's parenting choices after she allowed her daughter to wear a full face of makeup for her cheerleading competition.”
“On the other hand, Briana and Kail had issues after Bri started dating Javi Marroquin.”
“"I was always closer to Javi.”
“Love Teen Mom?”


"Be sure to join our teen mom Facebook group and share all the latest updates and interesting gossip!"
"Kyle has never been a friend of mine," the mother of two tweeted earlier
"In the upcoming trailer for the new series, Chelsea hosca, kyleen lorry and Leah Mayer threaten to quit the MTV reality show series if their partners, Janel Evans and Briana DeJesus, don't end their plots."
"Watch the video above and see what happened!"
"It's no secret that girls have had their own problems over the years - but lately, the constant bickering has gone beyond the intensity."
"The girls yelled, and jennell's husband, David Ethan, tweeted insensitive comments about the LGBT community, which eventually led to his dismissal."
Since then, the married couple have been fighting back, from labeling Chelsea "boring" to questioning Leah's parenting choice after she allowed her daughter to make up for cheerleading matches
"On the other hand, Briana and Kyle had problems after brie started dating Harvey malakun."
"I'm always closer to Javier."
"Do you love mom?"



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They celebrated afterwards with a restaurant reception.”
“FROM PEN: A Marilyn Monroe Impersonator Made an Appearance at Luann de Lesseps’ WeddingThe couple originally tied the knot in February in a small courthouse wedding in Brooklyn.”
“Other guests also shared snaps of the lively celebration on Instagram, including shots of Kirke in her beige wedding dress.”
“: @therealdebramessing,” Hargitay wrote.”
“#HeresToLoveAndLife #HeresToLoveYourWholeLife.”
““#HappySunday #JoyfulWeekend #JoyfulWedding #Congrats to @PennBadgley and @DominoKirke.”
“Image zoom Credit: Source: Darren Will/InstagramCelebrity guests to the outdoor ceremony included Mariska Hargitay, Zac Posen and Debra Messing, the latter of which snapped a stunning photo of the Law & Order: SVU star during the dinner.”
““You only get married twice, once” Kirke — the sister of Girls star Jemima Kirke — captioned a shot of a dapper Badgley on Sunday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The duo — who originally got married in February — held a second wedding celebration on Saturday, according to social media posts.”


"Then they held a reception in the restaurant to celebrate."
"Excerpt from pen: Marilyn Monroe's character appears at the wedding of Luan de Lesseps. The couple first got married at a small courthouse wedding in Brooklyn in February."
"Other guests also shared a snapshot of the celebration on instagram, including photos of Kirk in beige wedding dress."
"It was a pleasant moment," Hagrid wrote
"Love and life, love your life."
"Happy Sunday, happy weekend, happy wedding congratulations to @ pennbadgley and @ domino kirke."
Photo zooming: photo source: Darren will / instagram celebrity guests at the outdoor ceremony included Mariska Hargitay, Zac Posen and Debra messaging, who took an amazing photo of law and order: the star of SVU at the dinner party
"You've only been married twice, once." Kirk, sister of actress Jamie Kirk, took a picture of the dashing Begley on Sunday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to a social media post, the two were originally married in February and held their second wedding ceremony on Saturday."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...of experts...”
“When her father passed away six years ago, she grew closer than ever to her mother and two sisters.”
“Shawniece Jackson and Jephte PierreImage zoom Credit: Courtney Hizey Photography & Emily MaultsbyJackson, a 29-year-old entrepreneur and cosmetologist, is the eldest of 10 brothers and sisters and loves having a big family.”
“His perfect match is a woman who is energetic and driven with a sense of humor and passion for adventure.”
“While many of his close family and friends view him as a pragmatic soldier, Francetic admits to having a romantic and sensitive side.”
“Though his parents divorced when he was a teenager, the 28-year-old learned how to be independent from his mother, who also instilled in him the importance of compromise and unconditional love in a marriage.”
“An Army veteran and financial associate, Francetic grew up in Florida with his parents but now lives in the suburbs of Boston.”
“Duff has been in several long-term relationships over the past few years, but she has yet to find “the one.” She’s looking for a man who is funny, hard-working and loyal.”
“The 25-year-old has always looked to her parent’s marriage as a great example of love and devotion.”
“For more on Married at First Sight pick up this week s issue of PEOPLE on stands Friday Image zoom This season Dr Jessica Griffin a psychologist based in Boston will be featured on the show along with sociologist Dr Pepper Schwartz and Pastor Calvin Roberson as the series panel...”


“… Experts... "
"When her father died six years ago, she was closer than ever to her mother and two sisters."
"Thanks to the zooming and zooming of shotney Jackson and jeffert pearey: Courtney heathy and Emily Moresby Jackson, 29, entrepreneur and beautician, are the eldest of 10 siblings who like to have a big family."
"His perfect match is an energetic, humorous and adventurous woman."
"Although many of his family and friends consider him a pragmatic soldier, francetti admits that he has a romantic and sensitive side."
"Although his parents divorced when he was a teenager, at 28 he learned how to be independent from his mother, who also taught him the importance of compromise and unconditional love in his marriage."
Francetti, a veteran and financial assistant, grew up with his parents in Florida but now lives in suburban Boston
Duff has had several long-term relationships in the past few years, but she hasn't found that yet. She is looking for an interesting, diligent and loyal man
"At 25, she has always regarded her parents' marriage as a great example of love and dedication."
"To learn more about getting married at first sight, listen to this week's" people on stands Friday "this season. Boston psychologist Dr. Jessica Griffin will work with sociologist Dr. Pepper Schwartz and pastor Calvin Robertson this season Roberson) as a series of special groups... "



**Something goes wrong**
“It...”
“I invite you to step into my world and enjoy MY LOVE AND FLARE FOR FASHION AND STYLE!”
“I am very optimistic about what life has to offer, I go for the best in life andI believe in aspiring to inspire other women with the same zeal that I have.”
“My siblings call me "ndomma" meaning“beautiful”, some of my friends call me "catalog", my husband calls me "my fashionista wife" and Icall myself “Kartia Velino”.”
“My parents have ten children of which I am the sixth child.”
“My three boysare all grown: 21, 16, and 14; and I am at that point in my life where I am actually able to follow mydream.”
“), Ihonestly believe that this is the perfect time for me to showcase my love and flare for fashion andstyle with the perfect backdrop of the maturity and self-confidence that I now possess.”
“Looking forwards however (notice how I didn’t say looking backwards?”
“...it remained just a dream for quite a long time tucked away someplace in my heart waiting to blossom...”
“Anyway I had always wanted to be a model back then but because I never had the support or professional guidance that was required to transform this dream into reality I was never able to do much about it and...”


"It..."
"I invite you to come into my world and enjoy my love and shine for fashion and style!"
"I am very optimistic about what life can offer, I pursue the best things in life, and I believe I am willing to inspire other women with the same enthusiasm."
My brothers and sisters call me "dermma", which means "beautiful", some of my friends call me "catalog", my husband calls me "wife of fashion geek", and I call myself "kartia Velino"
"My parents have ten children, and I'm the sixth."
"My three sons are all grown up, 21, 16 and 14; and I'm at a time in my life when I can really realize my dreams."
"), I firmly believe that this is the best time for me to show my love and shine for fashion and style. I now have a perfect background of maturity and confidence."
"But look forward (notice why I didn't say look back?"
“…… It's just a dream, hidden somewhere in my heart, waiting to bloom... "
"Anyway, I always wanted to be a model at that time, but because I never got the support or professional guidance to make this dream come true, I haven't been able to do a lot of things, and..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Ahem.”
“I don't even know that she told that story!”
“Yes, the happily married actor has a pet peeve when it comes to his wife.”
“Apparently, Bell blabs.”
“During a visit to "Jimmy Kimmel Live," Shepard related a recent example.”
“"I was at a restaurant last night — this is the truth, the honest truth — and this stranger comes up to me and he says, 'Hey, I just read your kids walked in on you having sex,'" he recalled.”
“"I was like, 'What are you talking about?'”
“He goes, 'Yeah, I saw a headline.”
“Your wife said your kids walked in on you having sex.'”
“I don't know what version she told of it."”


"Ahem."
"I didn't even know she told that story!"
"Yes, the well married actor is always annoyed when he talks about his wife."
"Obviously, the bell rang."
During a visit to "the Jimmy Kimmel scene," Shepard gave a recent example
"I was in a restaurant last night - it's true, it's true - a stranger came up to me and said, 'Hey, I just saw your child come in and find you're having sex,'" he recalled
"I thought," what are you talking about? "
"He said," yes, I see a headline. "
"Your wife said your child found out you were having sex."
"I don't know what she said."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'He's about to hit the road again and there wont be a break until December.”
“Quality time The Fetish singer and her Grammy winning beau above on Sunday are soaking up their time together before he hits the road again to continue his Star Boy tour The Canadian rapper showed off his signature style in a hip jacket with rolled up sleeves and a simple...”
“And on Tuesday, Selena Gomez happily shared a shot of her and boyfriend The Weeknd enjoying a relaxed date night.”
“In the Polaroid-style picture, the 25-year-old brunette beams at the camera while her 27-year-old year old other half wraps a loving arm around her and gazes off to the side.”
“Night out!”
“Selena Gomez shared a sweet photo of date night with her love The Weeknd Tuesday on InstagramThe actress/fashionista was dressed down in the photo, which appeared to be taken from the comfort of an upscale restaurant.”
“The Texas gal looked relaxed in an oversized tee as she rested her chin on her arm and flashed a content smile at the camera.”
“Selena added a shiny gold watch and big hoops for a bit of sparkle.”
“Next to the former Disney darling sat her Star Boy beau, who appeared to be at ease as he wrapped his arm around his love.”
“...necklace...”


"He's on his way again. He won't have a rest until December."
"On Sunday, the fetishist spent time with her Grammy award-winning boyfriend, and then he went on his" star boy "tour again. The Canadian rapper wore a fashionable jacket with rolled up sleeves and a simple..."
"On Tuesday, Selena Gomez happily shared a picture of her and her boyfriend enjoying a relaxed date night on a weekend."
"In this Polaroid style photo, the 25-year-old brunette shines in front of the camera, while her 27 year old partner puts a loving arm around her and stares to one side."
"Go out at night!"
"Selena Gomez shared a sweet picture of her date night with her lover on instagram. The actress / fashionista in the photo, dressed in plain clothes, seems to have been shot comfortably from an upscale restaurant. "
"This Texas girl is wearing a big T-shirt with her chin on her arm. She smiles at the camera and looks relaxed."
"Serena added a glittering gold watch and a big hoop to make her look bright."
"Sitting next to the former Disney darling is her male star Bo, who is very comfortable when he hugs his lover."
“… Necklace... "



**Something goes wrong**
“[Image via Instagram.]”
“...s all you can hope for...”
“It s very hard for us to enjoy the moment As for what she wants to teach her kids Kelly explained I hope with our two girls and our two boys they see their parents as successful loving and respectful people because that s what we want for them That...”
“Because I think in life, as adults, it’s very hard for us to be still.”
“...their little piano or taking the time...”
“It s so hard to not drink your punch and I think a lot of people fall prey to that I think that my children taught me to just look around me and notice the things that are really important even if it s just hanging with them playing on...”
“Not only me at home, but me sitting here with y’all.”Adding:“I think when you’re younger and, especially in this kind of industry where everybody’s always applauding you or even if they’re talking bad or good, they’re still talking about you.”
“I know it sounds really silly, but kids teach you to be a better human because they’re watching every moment.”
“And they teach me.”
“They say something and you’re like, ‘Damn.’ They’ll call you out.”


"[picture via instagram. ]”
"That's what you want..."
"It's hard for us to enjoy this moment because she wants to teach her children something," Kelly explained. "I want our two girls and two boys who think their parents are successful, loving and respectful people, because that's what we want from them..."
"Because I think in life, as adults, it's hard for us to keep quiet."
“… Their little piano or spend time... "
"It's too hard not to drink your wine. I think many people will be your victims. I think my children have taught me to look around and pay attention to what's really important, even if it's just playing with them..."
"Not only am I at home, but I'm sitting with you." He added: "I think when you are young, especially in an industry where everyone applauds you, even if they are talking about good and bad, they are still talking about you."
"I know it sounds silly, but the kids teach you to be a better person because they watch it all the time."
"They taught me."
"Whatever they say, just say 'damn it' and they'll call you out."



**Something goes wrong**
“Next: Does a police officer put the blame on Victim B?”
“And she said, ‘Oh my God, Danny just raped me.’ She was freaking out and crying.”According to the police report, Victim B also said that Masterson choked her and assaulted her while she was unconscious.”
“This move created a domino effect, making it so the other claims are taken more seriously.”
“Remini reportedly encouraged Victim A to file a reportThe actress has been working closely with multiple people in order to tell their Scientology horror stories, so it’s not surprising that she encouraged a woman who some are calling “Victim A” to file a police report.”
“2.”
“In response to the claim, Scientology leaders said Scobee “cannot be trusted as a reliable source.”Next: Remini’s involvement with Victim A.”
“After this was reported to the organization, no one told her parents or the police.”
“On Leah Remini: Scientology and the Aftermath, ex-Scientologist Amy Scobee claimed that her boss at the Scientology Celebrity Centre took advantage of her sexually when she was 14 years old.”
“This isn’t the first time Scientology has been accused of covering up such situations.”
“The alleged victims are also Scientologists, who claim they were pressured to not go to the police after the crimes.”


"Next: did the police put the blame on victim B?"
"She said," my God, Denny just raped me. " She cried in horror. "According to the police report, victim B also said that Masterson strangled her while she was in a coma and beat her."
"This move has produced a domino effect, making other claims more serious."
"It's reported that Rimini encouraged victim a to submit a report. The actress has been working closely with many people to tell their Scientology horror story, so it's not surprising that she encouraged a woman known as victim a to submit a police report."
“2.”
In response to this statement, Scientology leaders said that Scobie "cannot be considered a reliable source of information.". Next step: ramini's relationship with victim a
"After the incident was reported to the organization, no one told her parents or the police."
In Leah ramini: Scientology and the aftermath, former Scientology scholar Amy Scobie claims that when she was 14, the owner of the Scientology celebrity center used her sexual advantage
"This is not the first time Scientology has been accused of covering up this situation."
"The victims are also alleged to be Scientologists, who claimed that they were under pressure not to report to the police after the incident."



**Something goes wrong**
“For the latest beauty and style trends subscribe to our new podcast ‘Get Tressed With Us’ below!”
“Us Weekly receives compensation from the manufacturer of the products we write about when you click on a link and then purchase the product feature in an article.”
“Kim Kardashian revealed a topless photo of herself sporting Calvin Klein undergarments while on vacation in Turks and Caicos.”
“The 37-year-old reality star shared the sensual snapshot in an app post on Tuesday, April 17, 2018, as she also dished on her favorite at-home spa treatments for keeping her skin vibrant and healthy.”
“See the at-home spa treatments:Tria Smoothbeauty Laser — $99.99 off for Black Friday!”
“PMD Personal Micoderm Pro — 30% off for Black Friday!”
““I love indulging in spa treatments, but they can be so time-consuming and pricey!” Kardashian explained.”
““There are a ton of at-home alternatives that are quick to use and less expensive.”As for her go-tos?”
““I swear by Dr. Ourian’s laser treatments, but this tool is the next best thing,” the KKW Beauty founder said of the Tria Smoothbeauty Laser.”
““It helps rebuild collagen to make your skin look more youthful and radiant.”The social media maven also takes care of her skin by undergoing microdermabrasion treatments.”


"To learn about the latest beauty and fashion trends, please subscribe to our new podcast 'grow with us'!"
"When you click on a link and buy a product feature in an article, American weekly will receive compensation from the manufacturer of the product we wrote about."
"Kim Kardashian revealed a nude photo of herself on holiday in the Turks and Caicos Islands wearing Calvin Klein underwear."
"The 37 year old reality star shared this sexy snapshot in an app post on Tuesday, April 17, 2018, while introducing her favorite home spa to keep her skin alive and healthy."
"Check out the spa at home treatment: tria smoothbeauty laser - Black Friday $99.99 off!"
"PMD personal micoderm pro - Black Friday 30% discount!"
"I like to indulge in spa, but they are too time-consuming and expensive! "Kardashian explained
"There's a lot of alternatives at home, fast and cheap." What about her goal? "
"I swear by Dr. ourian's laser treatment, but this tool is the next best thing," the kkw beauty founder said of the tria smoothbeauty laser
"It helps to rebuild collagen and make your skin look younger and radiant." Social media experts also take care of her skin by receiving microdermabrasion treatment



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Serena Williams Plays First Tennis Match Since Giving Birth, Reflects on 'Amazing' Moments of 2017 This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“On Tuesday, the Reddit co-founder shared with his Instagram followers that he had several billboards put up in celebration of Serena Williams' return to the court following her maternity leave.”
“All the billboards feature the couple's newborn daughter, Alexis.”
“"These just went up on alongside I-10 into Palm Springs.”
“@olympiaohanian & I wanted to welcome her back to tennis.”
“Designed them myself, with some help from Jr.," he captioned the photo stream, along with the hashtag "#GMOAT," which stands for Greatest Mother of All Time.”
“InstagramWilliams, 36, responded to the photos in the comments section, writing: "Literally am crying.”
“This is so sweet.”
“I love you."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Serena Williams took part in her first tennis match after childbirth, looking back at the 'wonderful' moments of 2017. This video is not available because we can't load sponsor information. "
"On Tuesday, reddit's co-founder shared with instagram followers several billboards he posted to celebrate Serena Williams' return to court after her maternity leave."
"The couple's newborn daughter Alexis is on all the billboards."
"These cars are on Interstate 10 for Palm Springs."
"@ olympiaohanian & I want to welcome her back to tennis."
"I designed it myself, with the help of Jr," he added the label "#gmoat" under the title of the photo stream, which represents the greatest mother ever
Instagram Williams, 36, replied to the photos in the comments section, saying, "I really cried."
"It's so sweet."
"I love you."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can read his full message here:”
“Falahee then goes on to list some things he plans on doing, such as donating money to a number of nonprofits including the Trevor Project, the ACLU, the Southern Poverty Law Center, and a number of others.”
“Now more than ever, I want to offer my support to the community as an ally.”
“I feel that I’ve sacrificed my ability to support the community for a more theoretical discussion about sexuality.”
“Ultimately, I think that my stance has been unhelpful in the fight for equality.”
“Opponents to my ambiguous answers to questions surrounding my sexuality argued the importance of visibility.”
“However, in the past I’ve declined to discuss my own sexuality in an attempt to try and dismantle the closet.”
“Falahee writes:While I’m not gay, on HTGAWM I play a character who’s in an interracial relationship with an HIV positive man.”
“...message posted on Twitter...”
“...he has consistently batted the conversation away he says in an attempt to try and dismantle the closet On Tuesday spurred by the election of Donald Trump and the emotional reaction of a gay friend of his the actor talked openly about his sexuality for the first time in a...”


"You can read all his information here:
Farah then listed some of the things he planned to do, such as donating to non-profit organizations, including the Trevor project, the American Civil Liberties Union, the Southern Poverty Law Center, and others
"Now more than ever, I want to support society as an ally."
"I feel like I've sacrificed my ability to support the community for a more theoretical discussion about sex."
"At the end of the day, I don't think my position is conducive to equality."
"People who object to my vague answers to questions about my sexual orientation think visibility is important."
"In the past, though, I refused to discuss my sexuality and tried to tear down my wardrobe."
"Farah wrote: when I was not gay, I played a role on htgawm, he had an interracial relationship with an HIV positive man
“… News posted on twitter... "
“…… He said he had been trying to tear down the wardrobe on Tuesday because of Donald Trump's election and the emotional reaction of one of his gay friends. "This is the actor's first public talk about his sexual orientation..." he said



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“As well as calling it a "long day," Khloé shared some adorable snaps of the little cousins napping together and holding hands:This content is imported from Instagram.”
“At the event, Kim revealed that her youngest child, Chicago West, had gone to Cleveland with Khloé Kardashian because of illness at home.”
“Khloé shared several sweet Snapchats of Chicago and her own daughter, True Thompson hanging out together, revealing that it had been a "long day."”
“Kim Kardashian West stepped out in Calabasas, California, this week to launch KKW Fragrance in Ulta Beauty.”
“And according to People, Kim revealed to Extra during the launch, “Yesterday was a hard day because we have the flu going around."”
“So Kim's solution to stop baby Chicago from getting sick?”
“"I sent her to Cleveland with Khloé," Kim revealed.”
“"I said, 'Khloé, please take her for, like, four days, because she’ll get sick [at home] with everyone.'"”
“Khloé Kardashian seemed pretty happy to be babysitting her niece for a few days, and posted several photos on social media revealing that True and Chicago had been chilling out together.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
In addition to calling it "a long day," khlo é shared some lovely photos of little cousins dozing together and holding their children's hands: this content was imported from instagram. "
"During the event, Kim revealed that her youngest child, Chicago West, went to Cleveland with heloe Kardashian because of illness at home."
Khlo é shared several sweet snapshots of Chicago with her own daughter truetompson, revealing that it was a "long day"
"This week, Kim Kardashian West launched KKW Beauty perfume for Ulta Beauty in Calabasas, California (Calabasas)," Kardashian said.
"Yesterday was a tough day because the flu spread everywhere," Kim told extra at a press conference, according to people
"So, King's solution to prevent the baby from getting sick in Chicago?"
"I sent her to Cleveland with heroy," King revealed
"I said," khlo é, please take her for about four days, because she will be ill with everyone. "
"Carlo Kardashian seems to be happy to take care of her niece for a few days, and has posted several photos on social media revealing that true and Chicago have been in the cold together."



**Something goes wrong**
“And while this training is clearly only a beginning, it is the only way that we will begin to address the problems: working nation by nation to raise standards and increase effectiveness.””
““If civilians do not have confidence in you as peacekeepers your mission will not succeed.”
“It is about military effectiveness,” Jolie continued in her speech.”
““It meant a lot to hear military gender advisors and officers say what they believe and what they want others to understand, that this is not simply about law and human decency.”
“Since its founding, the program has trained over 17,000 military and police personnel on sexual violence issues, and the PSVI team of experts has been deployed more than eight times.”
“Hague of Richmond...”
“How do you approach her will affect her whether she is able to begin to recover or if more damage will be done Image zoom Credit Mark Henley UNHCR Jolie meeting with survivors in Kenya Jolie started the Preventing Sexual Violence Initiative in 2012 alongside former Foreign Secretary Lord William...”
“As peacekeepers you need to be absolutely clear what to do, because that girl will be frightened, especially of a man with a gun.”
““The reality is that a peacekeeper may be the first person one of those traumatized girls encounters after their abuse.”
“Image zoom“The reality is that women and girls, as well as men and boys, can still be raped with near-total impunity in conflict zones around the world,” Jolie, 42, said in a speech exclusively obtained by PEOPLE.”


"Although this training is obviously just the beginning, it is the only way for us to start to solve the problem: improve the standards and improve the efficiency country by country."
"If civilians don't trust you as a peacekeeper, your mission won't succeed."
"It's about military effectiveness," Julie continued in her speech
"It means a lot to hear military gender advisers and officers say what they believe and what they want others to understand. It's not just about the law and human dignity."
"Since the establishment of the project, more than 17000 military and police officers have been trained on sexual violence, and the psvi expert group has deployed more than eight times."
"The Hague, Richmond..."
"How you approach her will affect whether she can start to recover, or whether it will cause more harm." photo zooming credit card Henry Julie of the United Nations refugee agency meets survivors in Kenya. Julie launched the sexual violence prevention initiative with former Foreign Secretary Lord William in 2012... "
"As a peacekeeper, you have to be very clear about what to do, because that girl will be scared, especially a man with a gun."
"The reality is that a peacekeeper may be the first person these traumatized girls meet after being abused."
"The reality is that in conflict areas around the world, women and girls, as well as men and boys, can still be raped with almost total impunity," Julie, 42, said in a speech exclusively won by people



**Something goes wrong**
“And while the “Cranes in the Sky” singer may be struggling, she is determined to begin the new year with a focus on herself.”
“Image zoom Credit: Dimitrios Kambouris/GettyThe younger sister of Beyoncé had canceled two shows this year, including one in November at Florida State University’s homecoming show which she said was due to a medical condition.”
“Knowles revealed previous festivals had known about her health and kept it “confidential,” thanking them for their support and for keeping the news to themselves.”
“WORD I will come back with AfroPunk and deliver this performance as it is so extremely important to me to connect with the people who have so closely inspired me in so many ways she added...”
“I can t put into words how saddened and sorry I am that I am unable to perform for you guys this NYE there is simply no other place I wanted to be than there with my family to bring in 2018 with you but I give you my ABSOLUTE”
“RELATED VIDEO: Beyoncé & JAY-Z Take Snapshot in Elevator Years After the Infamous IncidentKnowles — who is mom to a 13-year-old son — also apologized to the fans who were excited to see her perform at Afropunk, promising that she would return to give them a show.”
“While the singer did not share what type of autonomic disorder she was diagnosed with, people afflicted with it usually have trouble regulating their heart rate, blood pressure, digestion and body temperature as the disorder occurs in the nervous system, according to the Mayo Clinic.”
“...such an extended lengthy flight and doing a rigorous show right after she wrote...”
“It s been a journey that hasn t been easy on me Sometimes I feel cool and other times not so cool at all Knowles explained that her diagnosis was complicated and that she is still learning so much myself But right now my doctors are not clearing me for...”
“Afro Punk this NYE She continued The past five months I have been quietly treating and working through an autonomic disorder...”


"Although the singer may be struggling, she is determined to start the new year by focusing on herself."
"Image zooming credit: Beyonce's sister, Dimitrios kambouris / gettyth, canceled two performances this year, one of which was a homecoming performance at Florida State University in November because of her physical condition," she said
Knowles revealed that previous film festivals knew about her health and kept it "secret" thanks to them for their support and for keeping their information secret
"I'll come back with African punk because it's very important for me to connect with people who inspire me in many ways." She added
"I can't express my sadness and regret in words. I can't perform this Nye for you. I just want to bring you with my family in 2018, but I give you absolute support."
"Related video: Beyonce and Jay-Z took a snapshot in the elevator for several years. After the infamous accident, Knowles - the mother of a 13-year-old son - apologized to the fans who were excited to see her perform in African punk, promising that she would come back to perform for them."
According to the Mayo Clinic, although the singer has not been diagnosed with any type of autonomic nervous disorder, people with the disorder usually have difficulty adjusting their heart rate, blood pressure, digestion and body temperature because the disorder occurs in the nervous system
“…… After such a long flight, and after she wrote... "
"It's not an easy journey for me. Sometimes I think it's cool, sometimes it's not cool at all. Knowles explained that her diagnosis is very complicated and she has learned a lot, but now my doctor hasn't cleaned it up for me..."
"This black punk, she goes on, I've been quietly treating and treating an autonomic nervous disorder for the past five months..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Unfortunately, he had a little bit more facial hair than I like.””
“...bi your side a line that the star had included but didn t realize was going to be so telling he said to Billboard...”
“...about his sexuality...”
“The “I’m Yours” singer, 41, revealed in an interview with Billboard that his wife of three years, Christina Carano, helped him embrace his sexual identity, which he explored during their relationship.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’ve had experiences with men, even while I was dating the woman who became my wife,” he said.”
““It was like, ‘Wow, does that mean I am gay?’ And my wife laid it out for me.”
“She calls it Two Spirit which is what the Native Americans call someone who can love both man and woman the Waitress alum continued adding I really like that In June Mraz penned a Pride themed poem writing I am...”
“Image zoom Jason Mraz Credit Jimmy Fontaine Two Spirit was coined in the early 1990 s at a conference for gay and lesbian Native Americans as an umbrella term with no specific description of gender or sexual orientation according to...”
““Right before I moved to California he gave me a pretty strong-willed kiss goodbye, which I have never experienced before.”


"Unfortunately, his facial hair is a little more than I like."
“… You have a line written by a star, but he didn't realize that what he said to the billboard would be very convincing... "
“… About his sexual orientation... "
The 41 year old "I'm yours" singer revealed in an interview with billboard that his wife of three years, Christina kalano, helped him accept his sexual identity, which he explored in their relationship
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I've had experiences with men, even when I was dating the woman who became my wife," he said
"It's like, 'Wow, does that mean I'm gay? "My wife prepared it for me."
"She called it two spirits. This is what native Americans call a person who can love both men and women. "I really like that," added the waitress, Arum. In June, mlaz wrote a poem with the theme of pride, which said, "I am..."
"Image zooming Jason mlaz credit Jimmy Fontaine two spirits were created at a conference in the early 1990s by gay Native Americans as an umbrella term with no specific description of gender or sexual orientation based on..."
"Just before I moved to California, he gave me a very firm goodbye kiss, which I had never experienced before."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There was a lot of talk around how we break the cycle of addiction, mental health and homelessness.””
“...make you out to be a zombie stereotype figure...”
“If you re on the streets it doesn t get much worse but if you re on the streets and then you re taking something that literally one puff could hospitalise you in some cases lead to your death or...”
““How cheap it is to just get, how readily available it is, I think they were shocked and I think it really brought home this is a drug that targets the poorest of the poor.”
““I think they genuinely get it in terms of the stuff they’ve done around, say, Heads Together (mental health campaign) and I think they really appreciated hearing first hand the terrible effects of Spice.”
“...care about the poorest in society and they take their responsibility to raise those issues to give it the profile that s needed very seriously...”
“Getty After giving the couple a private briefing on Spice Mr Clarke said There was real empathy that came from both the duke and duchess they very much care about the issue and I think it marks the way they...”
“The Passage carried out a survey of its homeless clients and found 50% had tried the drug at least once in 2016 – when this study was repeated this year the figure had increased to 70%.”
“...synthetic drug is seen as a growing problem and the biggest challenge the homeless charity faces is that it is cheap readily available and can exacerbate existing problems like poor mental health...”
“Getty Getty During the visit the Duke told Mick Clarke chief executive of The Passage The fact it was a legal high and that young people were allowed to take it and it leads to addiction is just terrible The...”


"There's a lot of talk about how we can break the vicious circle of addiction, mental health and homelessness."
“… Make you a zombie... "
"If you're on the street, it won't get worse, but if you're on the street, and then you eat, you can actually be hospitalized in one bite, which in some cases can lead to your death or..."
"I think they were shocked by how cheap it was and how easy it was to get, and I think it really took home, which is a drug for the poorest of the poor."
"I think they really get it from what they do, for example, working together (mental health campaign), and I think they really appreciate the terrible effect of hearing spices directly."
“…… Caring for the poorest people in the society, they have the responsibility to raise these questions, so that the society can get the attention we need so much.... "
"After Getty gave the couple a private briefing on spices, Mr. Clark said that the Duke and Duchess have real compassion, they are very concerned about this issue, and I think it marks that they..."
"This article conducted a survey of homeless clients and found that 50% of them had tried the drug at least once in 2016 - the number had risen to 70% when the study was conducted again this year."
“…… Synthetic drugs are seen as a growing problem, and the biggest challenge for homeless charities is that they are cheap, easily accessible, and exacerbate existing problems such as poor mental health... "
"During the visit, the Duke told Mick Clark, the chief executive of this passage, that it was a legal climax, that young people were allowed to take it, that it would lead to addiction, and that was terrible..."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...my pregnancy was one I chose not to do in front of the world … for my little life and our happiness.””
“I understand you’re used to me bringing you along on all my journeys.”
“She chose to keep her pregnancy private, explaining in an Instagram post on Sunday, “I’m sorry for keeping you in the dark through all the assumptions.”
“April...”
“Another wrote With all the emphasis on butterflies I m guess ing Kylie is naming the baby Monarch Queen Multiple sources confirmed to Us Weekly in September 2017 that the Keeping Up With the Kardashians star was expecting her first child with boyfriend Travis Scott whom she began dating that...”
“It’s butterfly related AND bougie af, the perfect mix,” one user tweeted.”
““I’m calling it right now, Kylie is going to call the baby Monarch.”
“Over on Twitter, fans continued the butterfly-themed name speculation, with many placing their bets on Monarch.”
“...letter...”
“Some Instagram users speculated that Posie can be used as a nickname for Mariposa a Spanish word that translates to butterfly In addition the K in the product s name could either be a middle initial or even an homage to Kylie s sisters all whose names begin with the...”


“… My pregnancy is something I choose not to do in front of the world For my little life and our happiness. "
"I know you're used to taking you with me every time I travel."
On Sunday, she explained in an instagram post, "I'm sorry to let you get caught up in all the assumptions."
"April..."
"Another article emphasizes butterfly. I guess Kylie is naming the baby queen. In September 2017, several sources confirmed to us weekly that the" Kardashian "star is looking forward to her first child with her boyfriend Travis Scott, and she has been dating since then..."
"It's a perfect combination of butterfly and Buji AF," one user tweeted
"I'll call it now. Kelly's going to call it little prince."
"On twitter, fans continue to speculate on the name of the butterfly theme, and many are betting on monarch."
“… Letter... "
"Some instagram users speculated that Posie could be used as a nickname for Mariposa, a Spanish word translated into butterfly. In addition, the K in the product name can be the initial in the middle, or even a tribute to the Kelly sisters, whose names are all marked with.... "



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m so grateful to be having our baby, but I’m cognizant of how it’s going to change our lives and the systems we have in place.”Simmons and Abrams tied the knot in 2008.”
““Once we decided, it took a minute, as I’ve never been the person that could sneeze and get pregnant.”
“Back in March, Simmons admitted that having another child wasn’t “a cut-and-dry decision.”“We’ve loved the last four years with Dahlia, so it was a big move to consider going from one to two kids,” she said during an interview with HATCHland at the time.”
“They are already parents of daughter Dahlia Rae, 4.”
“#mamaoftwo.”Us Weekly confirmed in December 2017 that Simmons and her husband, Jeremy Abrams, were expanding their family.”
“So far it’s been beautiful chaos.”
““Thank you friends far and wide for all your love and support.”
“Please excuse the social media silence but I’ve been busy ogling this little guy who barreled into our lives Wednesday morning,” Simmons, 42, captioned the Instagram pic.”
“And he’s a keeper.”
““He’s here!”


"I appreciate having our children, but I know how this will change our lives and our existing system." Simmons and Abrams married in 2008
"It took us a minute to make a decision, because I was never the kind of person who would sneeze and get pregnant."
"Back in March, Simmons admitted that having another child was not a" once and for all decision. " "We really enjoyed our four years with dahlia, so it's a big change to think about going from one child to two," she told hatchland at the time
"They are the parents of Dahlia Rae, a 4-year-old daughter."
"Mama of wo." US weekly confirmed in December 2017 that Simmons and her husband Jeremy Abrams are expanding their family size
"So far, it's a beautiful mess."
"Thank you for your love and support."
"Please forgive the silence of social media, but I've been busy staring at the little guy who broke into our lives this Wednesday morning," Simmons, 42, wrote in the title of the instagram picture
"He's a keeper."
"Here he comes!"



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here s what we can tell you about TheRiseofSkywalker when the film picks up about a year after the end of The Last Jedi Rey Finn and Poe are all finally in the same place for the first time since The Force Awakens https t co cbjHB1IDSd pic twitter com...”
“Boyega in one of the photos riding into battle on creatures known Orbaks...”
“Final trailer and ticket salesThe final trailer for Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker (see above) premiered — much like past trailers for the episodic installments of the franchise — during a broadcast of the NFL’s Monday Night Football on October 21.”
“Yes, they can fly now.”
“They weren’t your usual First Order troops, however, as the stormtroopers took to the sky using jetpacks in the 30-second clip, prompting some surprise from the hero characters.”
“They can fly nowDisney released a clip from The Rise of Skywalker on November 25 featuring Rey, Finn, Poe, and a few more familiar characters racing across a desert while being pursued by stormtroopers.”
“At the very least, the clip shows that The Rise of Skywalker makes a concerted effort to tie together all three trilogies to bring the Star Wars saga to a close.”
“Of course, without additional context, it’s impossible to say definitively what’s going on here and that, naturally, is the point of the teaser.”
““I have been every voice you have ever heard inside your head,” the Sith voices hiss at Kylo, implying that Palpatine’s powers may have conquered death long enough to pull the strings for the rise of the First Order.”
“Emperor Palpatine’s voice joins that of Vader, as are the voices of Supreme Leader Snoke, taunting Kylo Ren.”


"That's what we can tell you about the rise of Skywalker. When the movie was released a year after the last Jedi, Rey Finn and Poe were in the same place for the first time after the force awakened. HTTPS t Co cbjhb1idsd pic twitter com..."
"In one of the photos, boyga rides a creature called obach to fight..."
The final Trailer for Star Wars: the rise of Skywalker (see above) premiered on a radio broadcast of the NFL's Monday night football game on October 21, much like the old trailer, which is divided into several parts
"Yes, they can fly now."
"However, they are not your usual first-class soldiers, because the stormtroopers use jets to fly into the sky in a 30 second clip, causing some surprises for the heroes."
On November 25, Disney released a clip of Skywalker rise, in which ray, Finn, Poe and several familiar characters ran in the desert and were chased by the stormtroopers
"At least, this video shows that Skywalker's rise has brought together three trilogy to end the Star Wars saga."
"Of course, it's impossible to say exactly what's going on here without additional background, which is naturally the point of provocation."
"I'm every voice you hear in your head," hiss' voice booed kilo, suggesting that Palpatine's power may have conquered death long enough to bridge the rise of the first class
"The voice of Emperor Palpatine is the same as that of Vader, and the voice of the supreme leader snooker is the same, mocking kilo Jen."



**Something goes wrong**
“Check it out below.”
“We now have our first full trailer.”
““We start again with season four in August,” Colman confirmed following her Oscar win in February.”
“But it shouldn’t be another two-year wait for the next instalment, as season four is already in production.”
“While season one was released in November 2016 and season two in December 2017 – just in time for Christmas – Netflix was always anticipating a longer break in between seasons two and three due to the introduction of the brand new cast.”
“All ten episodes of The Crown season three are available to stream on Netflix now.”
“The Crown season three was released on Sunday 17th November 2019 at 8am (GMT).”
“Find out everything we know about The Crown season three below…What date and time is The Crown season three released on Netflix?”
“For more information about how we hold your personal data, please see our privacy policy.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”


"Look down there."
"We now have the first full trailer."
"We're going to start season four again in August," Coleman confirmed after winning an Oscar in February
"But the next season shouldn't wait another two years, because the fourth quarter is already in production."
"Although the first season was released in November 2016 and the second season in December 2017, just in time for Christmas, Netflix has been expecting a longer break between the second and third seasons due to the introduction of a new cast."
"All 10 episodes of crown Season 3 are now available on Netflix."
"Crown Season 3 will be released at 8 a.m. (GMT) on Sunday, November 17, 2019."
"Take a look at what we know about season 3 What's the date and time to launch the third season of the crown on Netflix? "
"For more information about how we save your personal data, please refer to our privacy policy."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'Queer Eye' Fab Five Dish on What to Expect In 'Emotional' Season 2 (Exclusive)Two Looks, One Star: Major Celeb Hair Transformations!”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:'Queer Eye:' The Fab Five Open Up on 'Emotional' Fan Mail and Dream Guest Experts (Exclusive)'Queer Eye' Season 2 Trailer Is Here -- Watch!”
“While Corden lamented that plant picking sounds "depressing," Berk easily decided on an Arabian Nights theme for the drab space.”
“I pick them when I go for a walk."”
“"I have them at my house.”
“I collect them," Young told Berk, 36, of his aesthetic.”
“"We like succulents.”
“Clad in a hoodie and an ill-fitting T-shirt and pants, Young first met with Berk about transforming his sad outdoor space at work.”
“Corden replied, referencing Porowski's not-so-secret love of avocados.”
“How would making guacamole help with his life?"”


"The expectation of the second season (exclusive) of" emotion "in fab 5: two styles and one star: the main celebrity's hairstyle change!"
"Embedded code restart related content: 'queer eye:' the Fab five open on'emotional'fan mail and dream guest experts (exclusive) 'queer eye' Season 2 trailer is here - Watch!"
While Corden laments that plant picking sounds "depressing," Burke easily sets the theme for "one thousand and one nights" for the monotonous space
"I picked it when I went for a walk."
"I have it at home."
"I collect them," young, 36, told Burke of his aesthetics
"We like succulent plants."
"Yang was wearing a hoodie, an ill fitting T-shirt and trousers. When he first met Burke, he talked about how to transform the sad outdoor space where he worked."
Cordon replied that he mentioned Borowski's less secretive love for avocados
"How does making avocado help him in his life?"



Number  201
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Unless you have one of those amazing closet computers like Cher in “Clueless,” in which case, you’ve pulled me back in.”
“Or how long it would take to find the pair you want.”
“...a competition and the man with the best cheesy metaphor for her beauty wins her heart...”
“But just like that the attention is off of our darling Rachel and onto the horde of testosterone filled big headed men who literally howl from the limousine and endlessly gush about how sexy Rachel is as if it s...”
“Ugh.”
“Get off of this terrible reality show and come be my best friend please, because yes.”
“Giiirl.”
““I’m ready to focus on the part of my life that I’m just so talented at neglecting,” Rachel pledges.”
“...not to sleep with all of em Aye aye grandma...”
“But then we finally got back to the live footage of Rachel being the every girl as admitted to feeling like she was in the movie clueless while pulling onto Rodeo Drive before allowing an old lady to advise her...”


"Unless you have a magic closet computer like Cher in ignorance, then you'll pull me back."
"Or how long it will take to find the pair you want."
“… A competition, with the most vulgar metaphor to describe her beautiful man won her heart... "
"But in this way, the attention shifted from our dear Rachel to a large group of big headed men full of testosterone. They howled from the limousine and talked endlessly about how sexy Rachel was, as if..."
"Ah."
"Stop watching this bad reality show and be my best friend, because yes."
"Jill."
"I'm ready to focus on the parts of my life that I'm good at ignoring," Rachel promised
“… Don't sleep with them. Yes, grandma... "
"But then we finally got back to the scene. Rachel was one of all the girls. She admitted that she felt like a fool in the movie when parking on Rodeo Avenue, and then asked an old lady to give her advice..."



Number  202
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Like this: Like Loading...”
“Following the events of Justice League, Arthur Curry, the reluctant ruler of the underwater kingdom of Atlantis, is caught between surface dwellers that are always polluting the globe and his own people who are ready to invade the surface.”
“Of course the new Aquaman took the to the water and bared his muscular chest while smiling and having a good time.”
“The Daily Mail grabbed some photos and gushed over the beach bod and wavy locks of the Aquaman star.”
“And who wouldn’t get a little giddy with some shirtless Jason Momoa photos?”
“His star turn as DC superhero Aquaman will hit the big screen in a stand-alone adventure in December.”
“And Jason Momoa looked right at home in the water as he took part in the Jr Lifeguard Championships in Kauai, Hawaii last week.”
“The hunky actor, 39, flaunted his chiselled physique as he took a dip with a clinging silver jersey, before ditching his shirt to show off his washboard abs.”
“Jason teamed his sporty attire with black swimming shorts and happily took selfies with locals at the event.”
“The Game Of Thrones stud highlighted his gym-honed physique in the clinging ensemble, and exhibited his intricate body ink when he removed his drenched shirt in the water.”


"Like this: like loading..."
"After the Alliance for justice incident, Arthur curry, the reluctant ruler of the underwater kingdom of Atlantis, fell between the surface dwellers who always pollute the earth and the people he himself prepared to invade the surface."
"Of course, the new aquarium brought the fish into the water, showed his muscular chest, and had a good time smiling."
The daily mail caught some pictures and talked about the body and wavy hair of the Aquarius star on the beach
"Who else wouldn't be a little dizzy with photos of some shirtless Jason Momo?"
"His star transformation as Washington superhero aquiman will be on the big screen in an independent adventure in December."
"Jason Moya was watching his home in the water last week at the JR lifeguard championship on Kauai, Hawaii."
The 39 year old shows off his well-defined physique, dips a silver Jersey in water and then takes off his shirt to show off his washboard ABS
"Jason paired his sportswear with black swimsuits and happily photographed himself with local people during the event."
"The game of Thrones" highlights his physique as he worked out in a tight ensemble, and shows his complex body ink as he takes off his wet shirt in the water



Number  203
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Mark shared a photo with his son and his friend on March 17, wearing a big smile as he posed with the duo: “Spot the old guy who’s crashing the young Californians.””
“His project received Official Selections at more than 35 film festivals around the world and won at eight of those, according to his website.”
“Last week, the Touched by an Angel actress, 57, shared a series of Instagram posts that revealed her 20-year-old stepson, Cameron Burnett, had been hospitalized.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Cameron is Mark’s son from the reality TV producer’s previous marriage to Dianne J. Burnett, with whom he also shares son James.”
“Mark and Downey married in 2007 at their Malibu home.”
“In an exclusive statement to PEOPLE provided by a Burnett family spokesperson, the couple said Monday, “Our family is so thankful for all the prayers over the last few days.”
“We are relieved to have Cameron back home with us and we are so incredibly grateful for the amazing care he received at UCLA.”Cameron’s recent hospitalization comes four years after he underwent brain tumor surgery in 2014.”
“At the time, Pastor Rick Warren tweeted and asked people to pray for the then-teenager following complications from the operation.”
““PRAY for my friend Cameron Burnett in ICU with serious complications from brain tumor surgery.Cam is Mark Burnett’s son,” Warren tweeted.”


Mark shared a photo with his son and friends on March 17. When he took a picture with them, he had a big smile on his face: "find out the old guy who crashed with a young man in California."
According to his website, his projects have won official awards at more than 35 film festivals around the world, eight of which have won awards
"Last week, the 57 year old Angel actress posted a series of posts on instagram, revealing that her 20-year-old stepson, Cameron Burnett, has been hospitalized."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Cameron is Mark's son. He is the ex-wife of the reality TV producer and Diana J. Burnett. He and Diana J. Burnett also have a son, James."
"Mark and Downey got married at Malibu's in 2007."
In an exclusive statement provided by a Burnett family spokesman, the couple said Monday: "our family is very grateful for all the prayers of the past few days."
"We are very happy to have Cameron back home with us, and we are very grateful for the amazing care he received at UCLA." Cameron was recently hospitalized four years after his brain tumor surgery in 2014
"At that time, the pastor Rick Warren tweeted, asking people to pray for the teenagers who had complications after the operation."
"Pray for surgery for my friend Cameron Burnett's severe brain tumor complication in the intensive care unit. Cam "is mark Burnett's son," Warren tweeted



**Something goes wrong**
“No matter what the caption means, she's obviously getting along with Ashley a lot better than she did with Thomas' previous girlfriend Kathryn Dennis.”
“These are just some of the things that Landon has going on these days.”
“She endured speculation about a romance with Thomas Ravenel, tried to start a travel website, and of course, got caught up in other assorted reality TV drama.”
“It makes perfect sense that she would leave the show, but what is Landon Clements doing in 2018 now that she's no longer part of the series?”
“Before getting into everything she has going on these days, let’s address something she is not taking part in: Southern Charm Season 5.”
“In September 2017, Landon responded to a hater's comment on one of her Instagram posts to defend herself, and she ended up breaking the news that she would not be on the show during the next season.”
“According to a report from Page Six, Landon wrote, “Girl code?”
“Thats so silly I’ve never been anything but friends with all of those boys and actually that really hurt my feelings that Chelsea [Meissner] said that as for Shep we fight like brother and sister.”
“I won’t be returning this season and heading back to California to pursue my career in real estate.” Obviously, that wasn’t a formal announcement, but it was the first time that viewers heard the news.”
“Landon officially confirmed her departure with an official statement to Bravo's The Daily Dish.”


"No matter what the title means, her relationship with Ashley is obviously much better than her relationship with Thomas' ex girlfriend Katherine Dennis."
"These are just some of the things that have happened to Langdon recently."
"She endured romantic speculation with Thomas ravennell, tried to set up a travel website and, of course, got involved in other reality TV shows."
"It makes sense for her to leave the show, but what did Langdon Clements do in 2018, and now she's no longer part of it?"
"Before we get to know more about what she's been doing recently, let's talk about something she wasn't involved in: Southern glamour season 5."
"In September 2017, Langdon defended herself by responding to a hater's comment on an instagram post, and finally revealed that she would not be on the show next season."
According to the report on page 6, Langdon wrote, "girl code?"
"It's silly, I only made friends with those boys, in fact it really hurt my feelings," said Chelsea (Meisner). As for Shep, we fight like brothers and sisters
"I'm not going back to California for real estate this season." Obviously, this is not a formal statement, but this is the first time the audience has heard the news
"Langdon officially confirmed her departure in an official statement in Bravo's daily menu."



**Something goes wrong**
“Photo Credit: Shutterstock...”
“Kenya’s hostility with RHOA’s producers began after she secretly eloped and married her husband Marc Daly without informing Bravo.”
“Page Six is the latest and perhaps most notable media outlet to now confirm Kenya s departure from RHOA as their report confirms earlier reports from other media outlets that Bravo fired her from her full time role but gave her the opportunity to return to the show for its...”
“...upcoming season in a part time role...”
““[Producers] offered her [a] part-time [role] and she didn’t want the reduction in pay.”
“So she’s out,” an insider told Page Six on July 11.”
“Blogger Tamara Tattles is also confirming the same thing, stating Kenya was unwilling to sign a contract for a part-time role and that Bravo refused to budge.”
“Due to this, the July 9 deadline that Bravo gave Kenya to sign her contract for a smaller role on the show came and went, and it is now a done deal that Kenya will not appear on RHOA’s upcoming season in any capacity.”
“Since then, Kenya’s husband has been hesitant to film for the show, only appearing in one scene last season, which led to producers being frustrated.”
“Then, at the end of season 10 earlier this year, Kenya confirmed she and Marc were expecting their first child together.”


"Image source: shutterstock..."
"Kenya's hostility to the RhoA producer began when she eloped secretly without informing Bravo and married her husband, mark DALY."
"The sixth page is the latest and perhaps the most famous media that confirmed Kenya's departure from RhoA, because their reports confirmed earlier reports by other media that Bravo fired her full-time role, but gave her the opportunity to return to the show and participate in its..."
“… The coming part-time role season... "
"(producer) offered her a part-time job and she didn't want to cut her salary."
On July 11, a person familiar with the matter told page 6: "so she's out."
"Blogger Tamara tattles also confirmed this, saying that Kenya is not willing to sign part-time contracts, Bravo refused to give in."
"Because of this, Bravo's deadline for Kenya on July 9 has come and gone for her to sign a small role in the play. Now it has been agreed that Kenya will not appear in the upcoming season of RhoA in any capacity."
"Since then, Kenyan husbands have been hesitant to shoot for the show, and last season there was only one scene, which frustrated the producers."
"Then, at the end of season 10 earlier this year, Kenya confirmed that she and mark were pregnant with their first child."



Number  206
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Any eyebrow myths we missed?”
“Basically, it works by increasing the amount and length of hair that grows during your eyebrow’s growth phase, and slows down their natural shedding process.”
“If you’re not waxing a bad arch or over-tweezing, you’re letting stragglers grow wild, or worse, developing a unibrow.”
“Ew.”
“So we asked an eyebrow expert, Joey Healy, what we really need to know about grooming brows.”
“Here he clears up four myths about eyebrows, things even we confess to believing.”
“Get The Perfect Summer BrowsMyth 1: Tweezing, waxing, and threading all cause hair to grow back differently.”
“In all instances, hair follicles are being removed from the root.”
““While I have a strong preference toward tweezing in terms of creating the best shape, this method will not result in different hair re-growth than waxing or threading,” says Joey, who is New York City-based.”
“Each method rids hair for approximately four weeks, which is the average time it takes for eyebrow hair to reach the surface of the skin.”


"Did we miss out on any beauty myths?"
"Basically, it works by increasing the number and length of hair during eyebrow growth and slowing its natural shedding process."
"If you don't wax a bad bow or use excessive tweezers, you make the stragglers wild, or worse, single eyebrows."
"Well."
"So we asked Joey Healy, a beauty expert, what we really need to know is how to groom our eyebrows."
"Here, he clarified four myths about eyebrows, even things we all admit to believe."
"How to make perfect summer eyebrows 1: tweezers, waxing and threading all lead to hair regrowth in different ways."
In all cases, hair follicles are removed from the root
"While I love using tweezers to create the best shape, it doesn't lead to hair regrowth that's different from waxing or threading," joy said
Each method combs the hair about four weeks, which is the average time for the eyebrows to reach the surface of the skin



Number  207
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[4]MTV Generation Award [ edit ]MTV Trailblazer Award [ edit ]Multiple nominations [ edit ]Film [ edit ]The following movies received multiple nominations:Television [ edit ]The following television series received multiple nominations:”
“[3] Winners are listed first, in bold.”
“[2]Winners and nominees [ edit ]The full list of nominees was announced on May 3, 2018.”
“[2]Presenters [ edit ]The first few presenters were revealed on May 23, 2018 with the performers.”
“[1]Performers [ edit ]MTV announced the first few performers on May 23, 2018.”
“The ceremony was hosted by Tiffany Haddish.”
“It was the 27th edition of the awards and the second to jointly honor movies and television.”
“Similar to the 2016 MTV Movie Awards, the event was not aired live and was pre-recorded on June 16 prior to its June 18 broadcast date.”
“The 2018 MTV Movie & TV Awards was held on June 16, 2018, from the Barker Hangar in Santa Monica, California, U.S. and was broadcast on June 18, 2018.”


"[4] MTV generation Award [editor] MTV Pioneer Award [editor] multiple nominations [editor] film [editor] the following films won multiple non award threats: TV series [editor] the following TV series won multiple nominations:
[3] The winners are shown first in bold
"[2] the full list of winners and nominators [editors] nominators was announced on May 3, 2018."
"[2] host [editor] the first batch of hosts were announced with the performers on May 23, 2018."
"[1] performer [Edit] MTV announced the first batch of performers on May 23, 2018."
"The ceremony was presided over by Tiffany hadish."
"This is the 27th golden statue award and the second time that film and television works have been jointly commended."
"Similar to the 2016 MTV Film Awards, the event was not broadcast live, and was prerecorded on June 16 before the broadcast date of June 18."
"The 2018 MTV film and Television Awards will be held on June 16, 2018 in the Barker hangar in Santa Monica, California, and broadcast on June 18, 2018."



Number  208
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Fox Photos / Stringer / Getty Images]”
“Let us know in the comments section below.”
“Will you watch Diana, Our Mother: Her Life and Legacy?”
“...of a unique person who touched the lives of millions according to the Telegraph...”
“Princess unique contribution to public life including her charitable and humanitarian work ITV s Jo Clinton Davis said that the new film would offer a fresh and revealing insight into Princess Diana s personal life with intimate reflections of her two sons friends and family to create a definitive portrait...”
“...their mother almost two decades ago Prince Harry got emotional saying that she still is our mum He added that Diana smothered us with love that s for sure Oxford Film and Television is producing the documentary film and said that the Royal siblings also offer their perspective on the...”
“William turned to his brother in the promo and said that they were both in the photo pointing at a picture of a pregnant Diana saying that Harry was in the tummy The Royals remembered Princess Diana as being very informal and enjoying laughter and fun Although the men lost...”
“In the new documentary, Diana, Our Mother: Her Life and Legacy, William and Harry reminisce over old childhood photos with their mom.”
“Prince Harry, 32, was just 12 when he lost his mother and Prince William, 35, was 15.”
“Reminiscing over childhood memoriesThe Princess of Wales was easily one of the world’s most beloved royals who unfortunately died in a car crash in Paris at the age of 36.”


"[fox photos / stringer / Getty pictures]
"Please let us know in the comments section below."
"Would you look at Diana, our mother: her life and legacy?"
“… A unique person who moved millions of people's lives, according to the telegraph... "
"Princess Diana's unique contribution to public life, including her charitable and humanitarian work, ITV s Joe Clinton Davis said that the new film will provide a new and enlightening perspective on Princess Diana's personal life through the intimate reflection of her two sons, friends and family, so as to create a decisive portrait..."
"Almost 20 years ago, their mother, Prince Harry, said excitedly that she was still our mother. He also said that Diana killed us with love, which must be a documentary produced by Oxford film and television, and that the royal brothers and sisters also provided their support for... "
"William turns to his brother in the promo, saying that they all point to a picture of pregnant Diana in the picture and that Harry is in the stomach. The royal family remembers that Princess Diana is very casual, enjoying laughter and fun, even though the men lose..."
In the new documentary Diana, our mother: her life and legacy, William and Harry recall old childhood photos with their mother
"Harry, 32, was only 12 when he lost his mother, and William, 35, was 15."
"Recalling her childhood, the princess of Wales easily became one of the most popular royal family members in the world. Unfortunately, he died in a car accident in Paris at the age of 36."



**Something goes wrong**
“Additionally, according to the episode’s official synopsis, Alaric brings along a “crucial artifact that could help in [the Mikaelsons’] fight against the Hollow.”Drink that photo in, then drop a comment with your thoughts below.”
“(The question is: Will she also become the newest student at Alaric and Caroline’s school?)”
““The idea of the school as a safe haven for young supernatural beings certainly has a lot of relevance for Hope Mikaelson.”So it should come as no surprise that our first-look photo finds Alaric meeting the youngest member of the Mikaelson clan.”
“...who told us that Alaric s trip to New Orleans falls probably more in line with the timeline of that last scene with Klaus letter In fact Alaric is the one who shows up and actually tells Klaus about the school Plec said...”
“And now we ve got your exclusive first look at his meeting with the two most important women in Klaus life Following the Vampire Diaries finale during which Caroline and Alaric s new school for supernatural kids received a sizable donation from Klaus TVLine spoke with TVD showrunner Julie Plec...”
“As TVLine previously reported, TVD vet Matt Davis will guest-star in the May 12 episode of The Originals (The CW, 8/7c).”
“Two months after The Vampire Diaries‘ series finale, one of Mystic Falls’ finest is making his way to the Big Easy.”


In addition, according to the official synopsis of the episode, Alaric brings a "key artifact that can help the mikelsons fight the valley." Drink that picture and write down your thoughts below
"The question is: will she ever be a freshman at Alaric and Caroline?"
"The idea that schools are safe havens for young supernatural beings certainly has a lot to do with hope mikelson." So it's no surprise that the first photo we saw showed Alaric meeting the youngest member of the mikelson family
“…… Who told us that Alaric's trip to New Orleans may be more in line with the schedule of the last act of Claus letter. In fact, Alaric is a school that appears and actually tells Claus that "Pleck said
"Now, we have your exclusive first glimpse of his meeting with two of the most important women in Klaus' life. In the last episode of the vampire diaries, Caroline and Alaric's new supernatural children's school received a large donation from Klaus tvline and TV host Julie PleC..."
"As tvline previously reported, TVD veterinarian Matt Davis will guest star in the May 12 episode of the origins (CW, 8 / 7C)
Two months after the final of the Vampire Diaries series, one of mysteries falls's best movies is coming out easily



Number  210
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Lionsgate produces the series for Netflix.”
“The series stars Taylor Schilling, Uzo Aduba, Kate Mulgrew, Laura Prepon, Laverne Cox, Dascha Polanco, Danielle Brooks, Selenis Leyva, Taryn Manning, Yael Stone, Jackie Cruz, Lea DeLaria, Adrienne C. Moore, Elizabeth Rodriguez Michael Harney and Nick Sandow.”
“As part of the deal, series showrunner Jenji Kohan will remain in that role through Season 7.”
“Netflix renewed the Lionsgate-produced series for three seasons ahead of the Season 4 premiere in 2016.”
“A Litchfield prison bus seen through the window drives away before the words “To the Max” appear onscreen, possibly hinting that the women of Litchfield could be sent to the seldom seen maximum security section of the prison as the minimum security section is rebuilt.”
“In a brief teaser for Season 6, the Litchfield cafeteria remains in ruins in the aftermath of the riot.”
“Viewers of the show will remember that Season 5 saw the inmates take over Litchfield in a riot that was sparked by the death of Samira Wiley’s character, Poussey.”
“The news comes almost exactly one year after the release of Season 5, which debuted on June 9 last year.”
“The new season will drop on July 27, Netflix announced Tuesday.”
“Season 6 of the Emmy-winning Netflix prison dramedy finally has a premiere date.”


"Lion Gate makes series for Netflix."
"The series is composed of Taylor Schilling, uzzo aduba, Kate murgrove, Laura eppen, Lavine Cox, Dasha polanko, Danielle Brooks, Celine Leva, taline Manning, Yar stone, Jackie Cruz, Leah de laria, Adrian C. Moore, Elizabeth Rodriguez Michael Hani and Denis Starring Jack sander
"As part of the deal, series producer jenji kohan will continue to play the role in the seventh season."
"Netflix renewed the lion gate series for three seasons before its premiere in the fourth quarter of 2016."
"A Lichfield prison bus seen through the window has left, and the words" to the highest point "have not appeared on the screen, which may imply that with the reconstruction of the lowest security zone, women in Lichfield may be sent to the highest security zone rarely seen."
"In a short tease in season 6, the Lichfield cafeteria is still in ruins after the riots."
"Viewers of the show will remember that in season five, the death of Samira Willie's character pussy caused a riot, and the prisoners took over Lichfield."
"It's almost exactly one year after the premiere of season five on June 9 last year."
"The new season will air on July 27, announced by Netflix on Tuesday."
"Emmy winner" Netflix prison de la medi "Season 6 finally has a premiere date



Number  211
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Every time it’s time for her to escape she is always flipping fiddling around #HandmaidsTale — Tonya McCoy (@Tonya_Mc201) July 11, 2018”
“Also Read Handmaid s Tale Creator Explains Exactly What Is and Isn t Part of Gilead But not everyone was irritated with Moss character to giving up yet another chance at freedom with one writing I m pissed that I have to wait a year to find out what happens...”
“...to Emily Alexis Bledel and stay behind in Gilead to try and get her older daughter Hannah back...”
“Oh, and that was after a whole mess of Marthas helped her get away from the Waterford house in an epic Underground Railroad-fashion and she convinced Serena Joy (Yvonne Strahovski) to let her and the infant go.”
“And while it s pretty impossible to tell what you would do when faced with a conundrum like that escape a dystopian regime with one child or remain in danger to have a chance to possibly save another plenty of viewers who saw the Hulu series sophomore season closer were...”
“...not here for Offred s choice...”
“Also Read: 'Handmaid's Tale' Creator Says Serena Joy May Come to Regret Her Last-Minute Decision“And once again June worked my last damn nerve,” one fan tweeted.”
““The end of #HandmaidsTale had me screaming at my tv in anger at June, crying for Serena, and cheering for Emily,” another wrote.”
““June annoys me so bad!!!!!”
“Every time it’s time for her to escape she is always flipping fiddling around,” one said.”


"Every time it's time for her to run away, she's always fiddling with the story - Tonya McCoy (@ Tonya_ Mc201) July 11, 2018 "
"After reading the maidservant's story, the creator explained what is and is not a part of Gilead, but not everyone was angry with Moss's character and gave up another chance of freedom. I was very angry. I had to wait a year to know what happened..."
“…… To Emily Alexis Bradell, stay in Gilead and try to get her eldest daughter Hannah back... "
"Oh, that's after the chaos, Martha helps her leave her house in Watford in an epic way of underground railway. She persuades Serena joy (Yvonne strahovsky) to let her go with her children."
"When faced with such a difficult problem, it's hard to judge what you would do: take a child to escape an anti Utopian regime, or have a chance to save another child, still in danger, but many viewers see the second season of" snore series "sophomore is closer to..."
“… Not for Alfred's choice. "
One fan tweeted: "I also read: 'the creator of the maid's story says Serena joy may regret her last-minute decision." Joan broke my last nerve again. "
Another netizen wrote: "at the end of handcraft story, I screamed angrily at the TV, crying for Serena and cheering for Emily."
"June is so annoying to me!!"
"Every time it's time for her to run away, she's always fooling around," one said



**Something goes wrong**
“Being a young girl who was really active in dance, theatre and on the swim team, the salon was a kind of safe haven.””
““The decision to amend the photograph was taken for layout purposes, but plainly we made the wrong call and we have offered our unreserved apologies to Solange.”The airbrushed image on the cover of ES Magazine.”
“The singer, whose songs include Don’t Touch My Hair, was featured in the magazine discussing her upcoming album, as well as the “art form” and cultural legacy for black women of braiding their hair.”
“It emerged on Friday that the newspaper, which is edited by the former chancellor George Osborne, had digitally removed Knowles’ braids from the cover of its ES Magazine.”
“Knowles called out the publication on social media, posting a picture of the original, unaltered image on Instagram with the caption “dtmh” – an abbreviation of Don’t Touch My Hair, a track on her critically acclaimed 2016 album A Seat at the Table.”
“...dtmh @eveningstandardmagazine A post shared by Solange (@saintrecords) on Oct 19, 2017 at 9:25am PDTWhen the Standard posted its image of the cover, with the braids removed, fans attacked the publication, accusing it of racism for editing out a core part of the singer’s cultural identity.”
“The paper has now offered “unreserved apologies” to Knowles, saying the image was changed for “layout purposes”.”
“In a statement, the Standard said: “We were delighted to have the chance to interview the wonderful Solange Knowles and photograph her for this week’s edition of ES.”
““It is therefore a matter of great regret that the finished cover artwork caused concern and offence.”
“Photograph: Daria Kobayashi RitchThe journalist who interviewed Knowles has also asked for her name to be removed from the article and publicly disowned it.”


"As a young girl who is very active in dance, drama and swimming teams, salon is a kind of haven."
"The decision to change the photo was for typesetting, but it was clear that we had the wrong number, and we apologized to Solange unreservedly."
The singer's songs include don't touch my hair, her upcoming album in the magazine, and the "art form" and cultural heritage of knitting hair for black women
"It was reported on Friday that the newspaper, edited by former chancellor of the exchequer George Osborne, had digitally removed Knowles' pigtails from the cover of ES magazine."
"Knowles published the publication on social media and posted an original, unmodified image on instagram titled" dtmh "- short for don't touch my hair, a track from her acclaimed 2016 album a seat at the table."
“… dtmh@eveningstandard In a post published by the magazine Solange (@ saintrecords) at 9:25 a.m. on October 19, 2017, when the standard magazine released the cover picture, it removed its hair braid, and fans attacked the magazine, accusing it of editing the core part of the singer's cultural identity, which is racism. "
The newspaper has now offered Knowles an "unreserved apology," saying the change was for "typesetting."
"We are very pleased to have the opportunity to interview the outstanding sorange Knowles and take pictures of her for this week's es magazine," the standard said in a statement
"Therefore, it is very regrettable that the finished cover art has attracted attention and offence."
"Photo: Daria Kobayashi Ritch, a reporter who interviewed Knowles, also asked to remove her name from the article and publicly denied it."



**Something goes wrong**
“The couple then first stepped out together publicly at the beginning of the year, when they attended the FIFA Football Awards in Zurich.”
“The model 22 stepped out in Madrid on Friday without her 32 year old beau showcasing her washboard stomach in gym gear Pictured with a bump in September She gave birth to her first child and Cristiano Ronaldo s fourth on the 12th November Cristiano who welcomed twins Eva and...”
“I want to see it in the flesh.'”
“Natacha, 21, claimed he had been messaging her and that he wrote: 'I love your bum.”
“The announcement came just hours after model and reality TV star Natacha Rodrigues claims the pair had sex in March while he was in a committed relationship with Georgina.”
“We are all very happy!'.”
“Both Geo and Alana are doing great!”
“On the 13th November he then confirmed on his Instagram page: 'Alana Martina is just born!”
“Mateo in June as well as being father to Cristiano Junior 7 by surrogate confirmed he was expecting his first child with Georgina in July...”
“Turning heads!”


"At the beginning of this year, the couple came together publicly for the first time at the FIFA Football Awards ceremony in Zurich."
"When the 22-year-old model appeared in Madrid on Friday, her 32 year old boyfriend didn't show her washboard stomach in fitness equipment. In the photo, she gave birth to her first child in September and Cristiano Ronaldo's fourth child on November 12. Cristiano welcomed twins EVA and..."
"I want to see it with my own eyes."
Natasha, 21, claimed he had been texting her and wrote, "I love your butt."
"Just hours before the announcement, model and reality star natacha Rodrigues claimed that they had sex with Georgina in March."
"We're all happy!"
"GIO and Alana are doing great!"
On November 13, he confirmed on instagram: "Alana Martina has just been born!"
"Mario was Cristiano's seventh grade father in June, and his surrogate mother confirmed that he was pregnant with Georgina's first child in July..."
"Turn around!"



Number  214
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...foot home run sounded like literal thunder NBA fans owed Marcus Morris an apology after he shut down LeBron in Game 1”
“MORE LeBron James described what went wrong for the Cavs in stunning detail Nebraska baseball coach pulls player for celebrating monster HR with a majestic bat flip 4 things we learned from Celtics Game 1 rout LeBron can t carry the Cavs against this team Bryce Harper s mammoth 448”
“Congratulations to the Earnhardt family!”
“She is adorable - although these photos might be all the internet gets for a while, as Dale Jr. recently hinted on his podcast that they might not be posting a lot.”
“And for the perfect Mother's Day posts, the new parents each shared the first photos of Isla with the internet on their Instagram accounts.”
“Isla was born on April 30, and Dale recently shared the actual birth story and how they decided on her name, as well as a dozen things he's since learned about his newborn daughter.”
“Michelle R. MartinelliAmy Earnhardt celebrated her first Mother's Day on Sunday, just shy of two weeks after giving birth to Isla Rose, her and Dale Earnhardt Jr.'s first child.”


“… Script softball sounds like thunder, NBA fans owe Marcus Morris an apology after he closed LeBron in the first game
"More LeBron James describes in amazing detail what's wrong with the Cavaliers. The Nebraska baseball coach pulls the players over with a magnificent bat to celebrate the monster hr. Four things we learned from the Celtics' first game defeat LeBron can't carry the Cavaliers against Bryce Harper's mammoth 448"
"Congratulations to the enhardts!"
"She's cute - although these photos may be all the photos on the Internet for some time, as Dell recently hinted in his podcast, they may not publish too much."
"For the perfect mother's day post, each new parent shared Isla's first photo with the Internet on their instagram account."
"Isla was born on April 30, and dale recently shared the true birth story, how they decided her name, and more than a dozen things he learned about his new daughter since then."
Michelle R. Martinelli and Amy enhart celebrated their first mother's day on Sunday, less than two weeks after their first child, Isla Ross



Number  215
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Or do you think it’s a pass?”
“Do you think it was stunning?”
“Kim Kardashian risked a massive wardrobe malfunction, but pulled off a shirtless look while on the red carpet!”
“No shirt?”
“No problem.”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, didn’t need anything underneath her suit coat when she walked the carpet at the Las Angeles County Museum of Art’s Art+Film Gala in Los Angeles on Nov. 4.”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashian seemed to defy gravity – and dress codes – as she left her shirt in the car.”
“Whoever designed her double-sided tape probably deserves an award, because Kim managed to get through the event without a nip slip or another embarrassing malfunction.”
“Technically, does she have cleavage if she’s not wearing a bra or a shirt?”
“This year’s event honored Star Wars creator George Lucas and artist Mark Bradford, according to Daily Mail.”


"Or do you think it's a pass?"
"Do you think it's beautiful?"
"Kim Kardashian risked a huge wardrobe breakdown, but she took off her shirtless look on the red carpet!"
"No shirt?"
"No problem."
"On November 4, 37 year old Kim Kardashian walked on the carpet at the art + Film Festival at the Los Angeles County Museum of art, and she didn't need anything under her suit."
"When Kardashian left her shirt in the car, keeping in touch with Kardashian seemed to violate gravity and the dress code."
"No matter who designed her double-sided tape, she deserves an award because Kim successfully passed the event without paper jam or other embarrassing faults."
"Strictly speaking, if she doesn't wear a bra or shirt, does she have cleavage?"
This year's event honors Star Wars creator George Lucas and artist Mark Bradford, the Daily Mail reported



Number  216
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo: Getty Images...”
“The lesson is keep things a little more to yourself.”
“Just ask Anna Faris who, as we all know, split from Chris Pratt in August 2017.”
“Earlier this week, Chris made comments about how "divorce sucks" and yesterday, Anna responded to those remarks for the first time.”
“In addressing the whole "divorce sucks" thing, she also revealed the lesson she learned through her split as well as some insight to what her life looks like now.”
“Though Anna is said to be dating cinematographer Michael Barrett, she has not spoken about their relationship publicly and that seems to be very on purpose.”
“"I think it's a lesson learned a little bit in terms of keeping relationships a little more private, potentially, even though I pride myself on being a pretty open person.”
“But, I don't know, it's tough when you're under the scrutiny."”
“I mean, of course!”
“And I think that applies to anyone - not just celebrities - these days.”


"Photo: Getty pictures..."
"The lesson is, give yourself more time."
"Ask Anna Faris, we all know who broke up with Chris Pratt in August 2017."
Earlier this week, Chris made comments about "the divorce is terrible." yesterday, Anna responded to those comments for the first time
When talking about the divorce, she also revealed the lessons she had learned from the divorce, as well as her views on her current life
"Although Anna is said to be dating photographer Michael Barrett, she doesn't talk publicly about their relationship, which seems to be intentional."
"I think it's a lesson I've learned to make relationships more personal, even though I'm proud of being a fairly open person."
"But, I don't know, it's hard when you're censored."
"I mean, of course!"
"I think it applies to anyone today - not just celebrities."



**Something goes wrong**
“While the brunette beauty has certainly earned this day of pampering, we can not say that she deserves what followed …”
“News.”
“"It was such a fun experience – meeting Arie and Becca K. as they were part of their date – it was really quite surreal," Rachel E told!”
“It was one of the most epic dates of the season.”
“On his return, Arie completed her look with diamonds.”
“Becca got the full Rachel Zoe treatment, complete with a shimmery dress, high heels and the perfect bag.”
“To her surprise, she arrived at a mansion where the famous stylist and curator of the Box of Style awaited her with a full staff.”
“Rachel Zoe has returned to Becca Kufrin 's page as a new star of The Bachelorette continues her Looking for LoveLast season at The Bachelor Arie Luyendyk Jr. selected the Minnesota-born man to be a very special date.”


"Although this brunette must have won the favor of this day, we can't say that she is worthy of what happens next..."
"News."
"It was a very interesting experience - meeting Ellie and Becca K. Because they're part of the date - it's really surreal, "Rachel E told me!"
"It's one of the most epic days of the season."
"As soon as he came back, Ellie finished her look with diamonds."
"Becca received a comprehensive treatment from Rachel Zoe, with a shiny dress, high heels and the perfect bag."
"To her surprise, she came to a mansion where famous stylists and curators of fashion box were waiting for her."
"Rachel Zoe is back on Becca Coughlin's website as the single woman's new star continues her last season's love quest with single man Ariel luyandick Jr. She chose a Minnesota born man as a very special date



**Something goes wrong**
“) #ThisIsUs pic.twitter.com/8ahak1fjqJ — Sterling K Brown (@sterlingkb1) July 13, 2017After Emmy nominations were announced on Thursday , stars took to social media to express their gratitude and shock at being nominated, some some even reacted with a little humor.”
“Thank you @TelevisionAcad for honoring us all (& my sister!”
“...alongside these powerful women https t co aFSiTaPZDf Viola Davis violadavis July 13 2017 Me and my two dads are going to the emmys...”
“This means https t co eZVrztdpOF Laverne Cox Lavernecox July 13 2017 Very happy and sad and proud and messed up and delighted about our friend Carrie Fisher s nomination robdelaney catastrophe_tv https t co BfYHVGjWW8 Sharon Horgan SharonHorgan July 13 2017 Thank you to the TelevisionAcad for nominating me...”
“I received my 2nd #EmmyNomination this morning.”
“Thanks to all the fans pic.twitter.com/5acNwqFw9m — Reese Witherspoon (@RWitherspoon) July 13, 2017I am still in shock and so much joy.”
“The cast & crew worked so hard to make this happen!”
“So thrilled about the #Emmys Nominations for #BigLittleLies!”
“Wow!”


This is us pic.twitter.com/8ahak1fjqJ -Sterling K Brown (@ sterlingkb1) after the announcement of Emmy nominations on Thursday, July 13, 2017, stars expressed their gratitude and shock to the nominees on social media, and some even reacted with a little humor. "
"Thank you @ television Acad for respecting all of us & my sister!"
“…… On July 13, 2017, my two dads and I are going to the Emmy Awards ceremony... "
"This means that on July 13, 2017, HTTPS t Co ezvrztdpof Laverne Cox lavernecox nominated our friend Carrie Fisher for robdelaney disaster TV. On July 13, 2017, HTTPS t Co bfyhvgjw8 Sharon Horgan Sharon Horgan was very happy, sad, proud, confused and happy. Thank you for nominating me..."
"I got a second email this morning."
"Thanks to all the fans pic.twitter.com/5acNwqFw9m -Reese Witherspoon (@ rwitherspoon) July 13, 2017, I'm still shocked and happy. "
"The actors and staff have made great efforts to achieve this goal!"
"I'm so excited about Emmy nominations!"
"Wow



Number  219
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



**Something goes wrong**
“Moving on: Last week, Dewan returned to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band posing in lingerie photos...”
“Last week, Dewan returned to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band.”
“And on Sunday Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since the separation at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Birmingham, Alabama.”
“The actor who has ditched his wedding ring was hanging out at the race track with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Scroll down for video Hanging out Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since his split from Jenna Dewan at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Alabama Sunday...”
“...with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Tatum served as grand marshal for the event and took a spin with Luyendyk in the official pace car that led the field to the start...”
“'Such a great dude!'”
“Luyendyk Jr., 36, said of the actor, 37, as he posted pics of them in their matching red and black Honda racing suits to his Instagram.”
“Tatum also posted several snaps to his Instagram, returning to the platform for the first time since his marriage breakup.”
“'Crazy fast couple laps in the rain!!”
“Thanks @ariejr!'”


"Continue: last week, Dewan went back to social media, removed Tatum from her name, and didn't put a wedding ring in her underwear photo..."
"Last week, Dewan went back to social media and removed Tatum from her name without a wedding ring."
Chanin Tatum made his first public appearance at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Birmingham, Alabama, on Sunday
"The ring throwaway actor strolls on the track with the bachelor Ali luyandick Jr. in the video, he and Channing Tatum make their first public appearance after breaking up with Jenna Dewan at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Alabama on Sunday..."
“… With a bachelor's degree, Ali Luyan Dick Jr. Tatum served as Grand Marshal of the event and took a spin with Luyan Dick at the official speed of the car, leading to the beginning of the field
"What a great guy!"
"Luyendyk Jr., 36, said of the 37 year old actor that he posted pictures of them in red and black honda racing suits on instagram."
"Tatum also posted several snapshots on his instagram, which is the first time he has returned to this platform since his marriage broke down."
"Ran a few crazy laps in the rain!"
"Thank you @ ariejr!"



**Something goes wrong**
“I really do believe that she’s going to thrive outside of prison and I would just urge him to please pardon her.””
“...proud of and we don t think all the way through...”
“Kim Kardashian has spent months advocating for convict Alice Marie Johnson’s release and President Donald Trump has finally granted her clemency.”
“Mic reports that Trump, 71, freed Johnson, a first-time nonviolent drug offender serving a life sentence without parole, on Wednesday, June 6.”
““Best news ever!!!!”
“So grateful to @realDonaldTrump, Jared Kushner & to everyone who has showed compassion and contributed countless hours to this important moment for Ms. Alice Marie Johnson.”
“Her commutation is inspirational & gives hope to so many others who are also deserving of as second chance,” Kardashian, 37, tweeted on Wednesday.”
““I hope to continue this important work by working together with organizations who have been fighting this fight for much longer than I have and deserve the recognition.”She added: “The phone call I just had with Alice will forever be one of my best memories.”
“Telling her for the first time and hearing her screams while crying together is a moment I will never forget.”Johnson’s lawyer, Shawn Holley, shared an update on the situation in a statement to Us Weekly.”
““I just got off the most wonderful, emotional and amazing phone call with Alice, Kim and Alice’s lawyers.”


"I really believe that she will thrive outside prison, and I just want to urge him to forgive her."
“… Proud of us, but we don't think all the way... "
"Kim Kardashian spent months advocating the release of criminal Alice Mary Johnson, and President Donald Trump finally gave her leniency."
"Mic reports that trump, 71, released Johnson on Wednesday, June 6, as a first-time nonviolent drug abuser, serving a life sentence without parole."
"The best news ever!!"
"Thank you very much to @ realDonaldTrump, Jared Kushner & everyone who showed compassion and contributed so much time to this important moment for Ms. Alice Mary Johnson."
"Her commutation is very encouraging and gives a lot of hope to others, who also deserve a second chance," Kardashian, 37, tweeted on Wednesday
"I hope to continue this important work and cooperate with organizations that have been fighting for a long time and deserve recognition." "The phone call I just made with Alice will always be one of my best memories," she added
Johnson's lawyer, Shawn Holley, revealed the latest in a statement to us weekly: "tell her for the first time that I'll never forget hearing her cry together."
"I just had the most wonderful, exciting, amazing phone call with Alice, Kim and Alice's lawyer."



**Something goes wrong**
“This story first appeared on Billboard.com.”
“Dr. Luke's team is attempting to manipulate the truth and draw press attention to their case by exaggerating Lady Gaga's role and falsely accusing her of dodging reasonable requests."”
“...process...”
“A representative for Lady Gaga released the following statement As Lady Gaga s legal team will present to the court she has provided all of the relevant information in her possession and is at most an ancillary witness in this...”
“"This motion has become necessary because Dr. Luke's counsel has not been able to obtain, despite repeated request, a deposition date from Lady Gaga."”
“"Dr. Luke's counsel served a subpoena on Lady Gaga because she has relevant information regarding, among other things, false statements about Dr. Luke made to her by Kesha," Luke's lawyers wrote in a statement.”
“Instead, the singer proposed the use of a "sword affidavit from her in lieu of deposition testimony."”
“Court documents state that Luke's side had offered to limit the deposition to three hours and conduct it at a location of Gaga's choosing.”
“The move comes after Gaga failed to appear for her deposition on an earlier date and chose not to provide an alternative deposition date.”
“Luke's lawyers claim Gaga joined Kesha's "smear campaign" against the producer and “spread negative messages," including a statement urging Sony Music to cut ties with Luke, according to court docs.”


"This story first appeared in Billboard.com Website. "
"Dr. Luke's team tried to manipulate the truth by exaggerating Lady Gaga's role and mistakenly accusing her of evading reasonable demands to attract media attention to their case."
“… Process... "
"A representative of Lady Gaga made the following statement, and Lady Gaga's legal team will submit all relevant information in her possession to the court, at most auxiliary witnesses in this regard..."
"This motion is necessary because Dr. Luke's lawyers, despite repeated requests, were unable to obtain the date of the testimony from Lady Gaga."
"Dr. Luke's lawyer served a subpoena on Lady Gaga because she had information about Kesha's misrepresentation of Dr. Luke," his lawyer wrote in a statement
Instead, the singer proposed "the sword testimony she gave instead of the testimony."
"According to the court documents, Luke's side offered to limit the time of testimony to three hours and conduct it in the place chosen by gaga."
"Previously, Gaga failed to testify in advance and chose not to provide other dates for testifying."
"Luke's lawyers claim that Gaga joined Kesha's" defamation campaign "against the producers and" spread negative information, "including a statement urging Sony Music to sever its relationship with Luke, according to court documents."



**Something goes wrong**
“The 2018 Winter Olympics air on NBC.”
“It’s having a loyal and faithful companion that’s by your side no matter what.”To learn more about Kenworthy, visit teamusa.org.”
“… To me, having a dog is having a best friend.”
“They love each other and it’s nice.”
““But it’s good.”
““My mom likes the dog more than my brothers, and so I’ve been replaced,” Kenworthy previously told Us.”
“Since then, the Colorado native and his mother, Pip, have continued to care for the momma dog, Mamuchka, while pups Jake and Mishka live with Macdonald in Vancouver.”
“One dog died before the couple left Sochi, and another died shortly after arriving in New York City.”
“...four stray puppies and their mother in addition to arranging kennels and vaccinations...”
“It s pretty likely I ll bring one back with me Four years ago Kenworthy and his then boyfriend Robin Macdonald stayed behind in Sochi for more than a month after the Olympics ended so that the athlete could rescue...”


"NBC broadcasts the 2018 Winter Olympics."
"No matter what happens, you have a loyal partner by your side." To learn more about Kenworthy, visit team usa.org. "
“… For me, having a dog means having a best friend. "
"They love each other. It's good."
"But it's good."
Kenworthy told us earlier: "my mother liked the dog better than my brother, so I was replaced."
Since then, the Colorado native and his mother PIP have continued to care for mamuka, while the puppies Jack and Mishka live in Vancouver with MacDonald
"One dog died before the couple left Sochi and the other shortly after arriving in New York."
“…… Four stray puppies and their mothers, in addition to arranging kennels and vaccinating... "
"I will probably bring one back four years ago. Kenworthy and his then boyfriend Robin MacDonald stayed in Sochi for more than a month. After the Olympic Games, the athletes can save people..."



Number  224
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[9]International broadcasters [ edit ]Television [ edit ]Notes [ edit ]^ Ages at the time of the pageant...”
“Judges [ edit ]Contestants [ edit ]Contestant stats provided via the Miss Universe Organization.”
“It was held on May 21, 2018 at the Hirsch Memorial Coliseum in Shreveport, Louisiana.”
“Nick Lachey and Vanessa Lachey hosted for the first time, while Carson Kressley and Lu Sierra served as commentators.”
“[1] Additionally, it featured performances by 98 Degrees and Lee Brice.”
“[2] Kára McCullough of District of Columbia crowned her successor Sarah Rose Summers of Nebraska at the end of the event, becoming the first woman from her state to win the title.”
“Summers represented the United States at the Miss Universe 2018 pageant on December 17, 2018 in Bangkok, and placed in the top 20.”
“The pageant was held at the same venue that was used for Miss USA 1997.”
“[3]For the first time, the Miss Teen USA 2018 pageant was held concurrently, with the finals of the Teen competition being held just prior to the Miss USA competition.”
“[4]Background [ edit ]Location [ edit ]On March 19, 2018, the Miss Universe Organization (MUO) confirmed that the pageant would be held on May 21 at the Hirsch Memorial Coliseum in Shreveport, Louisiana, this was the fifth time Louisiana hosting the pageant, and Shreveport was hosted twice, in 1997 and 1998.”


"[9] IBC [editor] TV [editor] notes [editor] ^ age at beauty contest..."
"Contestant data provided by judges [editors] contestants [editors] through Miss Universe."
"The meeting will be held on May 21, 2018 at the Hirsch Memorial Stadium in Shreveport, Louisiana."
"Nick roach and Vanessa roach are the hosts for the first time, and Carson cresley and Lou Cera are the commentators."
[1] In addition, it has 98 degrees and libris performance
At the end of the event, K á RA McCullough of the District of Columbia crowned her successor, Sarah rose summers of Nebraska, as the first woman in the state to win the championship
"Summers represented the United States in the 2018 Miss Universe beauty contest held in Bangkok on December 17, 2018, and entered the top 20."
"The beauty contest was held in the same place as the Miss America contest in 1997."
"[3] in 2018, the Miss America youth beauty contest was held simultaneously for the first time, and the final of the youth contest was held just before the Miss America contest."
【4】 Background [editor] location [editor] on March 19, 2018, the Miss Universe Organization (MUO) confirmed that the beauty contest will be held on May 21 at the Hirsch Memorial Stadium in Shreveport, Louisiana. This is the fifth time that Louisiana has held a beauty contest. Shreveport held two beauty contests in 1997 and 1998



**Something goes wrong**
“'””
““I wasn’t gonna tell Snoop not to smoke in my house, so I was like, ‘Okay, Snoop, do what you want.”
“Get out, get out!” she says.”
“I was like, wait a second, I just wanted to have a couple people over to hang out!”In true Snoop Dogg form, Lovato’s home was soon “filled with pot smoke everywhere.”“I was like, no smoking inside!”
“Dave O. knows everybody, so French Montana was there and Ty Dolla $ign and Wiz Khalifa and all these people were there.”
““All of a sudden, a couple hours later, Snoop Dogg was there.”
“The star phoned her friend Dave O. to “just invite people over” and didn’t expect the guest list to be packed with celebrities.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“I wanna meet people!” she told Jimmy Fallon Monday night on The Tonight Show.”
“I’m newly single.”


“'””
"I didn't want to tell snoop not to smoke in my house, so I said," OK, snoop, do whatever you want. "
"Get out, get out! "She said
"I thought, wait a minute, I just want to find a few people to play with! Lovato's house soon became "full of marijuana" and "I thought, no smoking in it!"
"Dave O. knows everyone, so Montana, France, is there. Tedora, Witz Halifa and all these people are there."
"Suddenly, a few hours later, the Snoopy dog showed up."
The star called her friend, Dave O., and said, "please come here." unexpectedly, the guest list was full of celebrities
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I want to see people! "She told Jimmy Fallon on the tonight show on Monday night."
"I'm just single."



Number  226
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I never did anything wrong to be publicly humiliated, and I don’t want to cause that kind of pain to somebody else.””
““I know what it’s like to be publicly humiliated,” she said.”
““I do [have an NDA], but I can talk.”
“I’m bold.”
“I don’t want to cause pain, you guys,” Curry, 61, told Stephen Colbert on “The Late Show” on Monday.”
“While the former “Today” anchor giggled at “somewhere Ann Curry” memes and tweets, her guilt got the best of her enjoying Lauer’s comeuppance.”
““The truth is that I was raised Catholic by a Buddhist,” she said.”
““So think about the Catholic guilt, mixed with the karma, worries, the intensity of that.”
“It was like, all of a sudden my brain — think ‘Game of Thrones’ — the wall, it went up.”
“There was this whole wall of, ‘Uh-uh, you can’t talk like that.”


"I've never done anything wrong and been publicly humiliated, and I don't want to cause that kind of pain to others."
"I know what it's like to be publicly humiliated," she said
"I have a confidentiality agreement, but I can say it."
"I'm bold."
"I don't want to cause pain, you guys," curry, 61, told Stephen Colbert on Monday's evening show
Although the former "today" anchor giggled on meme and twitter of "somewhere in Ann curry," her guilt made her enjoy Raul's retribution
"In fact, I was a Catholic raised by a Buddhist," she said
"So think about Catholic guilt, mixed with karma, worry, and its intensity."
"It's like, all of a sudden, my brain - think about the power game - wall, and it's climbing up."
"There's a whole wall saying," well, you can't talk like that. "



Number  227
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...on the Red Carpet During 2018 BAFTAs This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“RELATED CONTENT EXCLUSIVE Naomi Watts Talks Incredible Friendship With Nicole Kidman We ve Been Through Stuff Together NEWS Naomi Watts Reportedly Dating Gypsy Co Star Billy Crudup NEWS Mary Louise Parker Finally Opens Up About Billy Crudup Leaving Her for Claire Danes Kate Middleton Jennifer Lawrence and More Stars Wow...”
“See more on the 2018 BAFTAs below.”
“Crudup has a 14-year-old son, William, from a previous relationship with actress Mary Louise Parker, and has also dated Claire Danes.”
“The couple had been together for 11 years and share two children, Samuel and Alexander.”
“BackgridWatts split from her ex-husband, Liev Schreiber, in September 2016.”
“The pair's interlocked fingers were hard to miss as they left the bash.”
“Watts wore all black in support of the Time’s Up movement, while Crudup went tie-less in a white shirt and grey suit.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
“… On the red carpet of BAFTA in 2018, this video is not available because we can't load sponsor information... "
"Exclusive content Naomi Watts and Nicole Kidman talk about incredible friendship we've been through a lot together news Naomi Watts and Gypsy co star Billy Crudup's date news Mary Louise Parker finally made it public that Billy Crudup left her to Claire Danes Kate Middleton, Jennifer Lawrence and more stars..."
"For more information on BAFTA in 2018, see below."
Crudup has a 14-year-old son, William, who had a relationship with actress Mary Louis Parker and dated Claire Dennis
The couple have been together for 11 years and have two children, Samuel and Alexander
"Backgridwatts broke up with her ex husband, liev Schreiber, in September 2016."
"It's hard to miss the interlocking fingers when they leave carnival."
Watts wore all black to support the progress of the times, while Crudup wore a white shirt, a gray suit and no tie



Number  228
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RETROspective: How the red carpet became the runway:”
“...fashionista scores that Gucci gown for a steal...”
“My body size is literally normal and healthy but when you put me next to a model I look obese Related Videos But the fashion industry s loss for not dressing an actress as gorgeous as Rachel Bloom is about to become the internet s win tomorrow when some lucky...”
““A lot of fashion houses are reluctant to lend clothes that aren’t in the sample sizes of 0 and 2, so it’s getting harder and harder for me to find clothes without buying them... That’s the whole problem with the fashion industry.”
““What has become apparent when I have to get clothes for these events is that I have a normal body,” Bloom wrote at the time.”
“And this is not the first time she’s opened up about having to dress herself for red carpets before: Bloom previously revealed in an essay for Wealthsimple that she spends upward of $3,000 for her red-carpet looks.”
“J. Merritt/Getty ImagesBloom’s empowering and practical take on purchasing (and reselling) her own ensemble is certainly refreshing.”
““Take a look on The RealReal for this dress tomorrow,” she said with a laugh.”
“Bloom continued to keep it real with Rancic, saying that “it’s OK” that she had to shell out for her own dress (which retails{: rel=nofollow} for $3,500) since she can afford it and is planning on reselling it anyway.”
“Most American women, however, are not{: rel=nofollow} those sizes.”


"Review: how red carpet became a runway"
“… Fashion experts regard Gucci's dress as stolen... "
"I'm really in good shape, but when you put me next to a model, I look like a video about obesity. However, the loss of the fashion industry for not dressing up actresses as gorgeous as Rachel bloom is going to be the winner of the Internet. Tomorrow, I'll be some lucky people..."
"Many fashion stores are not willing to lend the clothes whose sample sizes are not in size 0 and 2 to others, so it's more and more difficult for me to find clothes without buying them... That's the whole problem with fashion. "
"When I had to buy clothes for these activities, my body was obviously normal," bloom wrote at the time
"And it's not the first time she's publicly required to wear the red carpet: bloom previously revealed in an article in fortune that she spent more than $3000 on her red carpet look."
"J. Merritt / Getty Images Bloom's powerful and practical actions in buying (and reselling) her own ensemble are undoubtedly refreshing."
She said with a smile, "wear this dress tomorrow to see the real gold and silver."
Bloom continued to be truthful with ranch, saying "it's OK" because she could afford her own skirt, so she had to pay for it (retail $3500)
"However, most American women are not in the size of {: rel = nofollow}."



**Something goes wrong**
“Woods hasn’t played a competitive round since January.”
“Earlier this week Tiger’s lawyer entered a not guilty plea following his DUI arrest after falling asleep at the wheel which he claimed was down to a mix up with prescription drugs.”
“— Tiger Woods (@TigerWoods) August 10, 2017The article also claimed that Smith “went crazy” after finding out about Woods’ arrest in late May but the 41-year-old has denied the pair were even together at the time.”
“Contrary to the false Daily Mail article, Kristin Smith and I are no longer dating and haven’t since last year.”
“The article claimed the pair set sail on the 14-time major champion’s yacht earlier this week but Woods moved quickly to address the issue.”
“On Thursday, during the opening round of the PGA Championship, Woods took to Twitter to respond to an article published in the Daily Mail to claim he and personal stylist Smith are no longer an item.”
“Google “Tiger Woods Kristin Smith” and you’ll be presented with plenty of gossip and not a lot of fact.”


"Woods hasn't played a round since January."
"Earlier this week, tiger's lawyer pleaded not guilty after falling asleep while drunk driving, claiming that it was because he was mixed with prescription drugs."
"- Tiger Woods (@ Tiger Woods) also claimed in its August 10, 2017 article that Smith was" Crazy "after learning of woods' arrest at the end of May, but Smith, 41, denied that the two were even together at the time."
"Contrary to the fake article in the daily mail, Christine Smith and I don't date anymore. We haven't dated since last year."
"This article claims that the two set sail on a 14 time major champion yacht earlier this week, but woods soon set out to solve the problem."
"On Thursday, in the first round of the PGA Championship, woods responded to an article in the daily mail on twitter, saying that he and private stylist Smith are no longer a project."
"Google" Tiger Woods Christine Smith "you'll see a lot of gossip, not a lot of facts."



**Something goes wrong**
““She read about it in the press which was devastating and after that, needed to work on herself and digest everything and be self-reflective.”“The lawyers are speaking on both sides and Luann is hoping for a speedy resolution because she loves her children very much,” the source added.”
““Due to the trauma of being sued by her kids and ex husband, Luann decided to set the reset button and check herself into rehab,” the insider said.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Thank you so much for all of your support,” de Lesseps, 53, wrote on Instagram, captioning a video of the cabaret.”
““I wanted you to know I’m doing great and I hope you’ll come and see me.”
“… Looking forward to being back on stage!!”
“!”De Lesseps is scheduled to take the stage at The Paramount in Long Island, New York, on Aug. 4 and then again at the Music Box Theater at The Borgata in Atlantic City, New Jersey, on Aug. 24.”
“After her cabaret, “she will continue her out-patient treatment” before returning to film the next season of the Bravo series, a source close to the star tells PEOPLE.”
“Says the insider: “Luann feels a lot better.”
“Bravo has been so supportive.”PEOPLE broke the news exclusively on July 16 that she had returned to rehab for a second time, with costar Bethenny Frankel calling the decision “brave and honest.”In turn, she missed the taping of the RHONY season 10 reunion.”


"She read about it in the media, it's devastating, after that, she needs to work hard, digest everything, and reflect on herself." "Lawyers on both sides are speaking, and Luan hopes to solve it as soon as possible, because she loves her children very much," the source added
"Due to the trauma of the child and ex husband's prosecution, Lu an decided to press the reset button and go to the rehab center for examination himself," the insider said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Thank you very much for your support and for adding subtitles to a video of cabaret," the 53 year old wrote on instagram
"I want you to know that I'm doing well and hope you can come and see me."
“… Looking forward to returning to the stage! "
"!" dreisepps is scheduled to appear at the paramount theater on Long Island, New York, on August 4 and again at the music box theater in Borgata, Atlantic City, New Jersey, on August 24. "
A source close to the star told people: "after her singing and dancing performance, she will continue her outpatient treatment" before returning to the next season of the Bravo series
"Luan is feeling much better," a person familiar with the matter said
"Great." On July 16, exclusive coverage of her second return to rehab, starring Bethany Frankel, called the decision "brave and honest.". In turn, she missed the recording of Ronnie's 10th season reunion



Number  231
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...the ground...”
“...their service to this country...”
“Last night’s Men Tell All didn’t reveal who the next Bachelor would be, so it’s no surprise that #DeanforBachelor was trending on Twitter during the episode.”
“Moving on.”
“Yeah, okay, you get it.”
“To compete on his season.”
“But also me.”
“And by me I mean him.”
“Let’s see… he doesn’t have a speech impediment, isn’t a raging misogynist, and also isn’t responsible for anyone’s death as far as we know, so sign me tf up.”
“Oh yeah, this dude began his Bachelorette tenure with a vaguely racist comment and he would STILL be a better Bachelor than the last like, five dudes we’ve had (minus Ben, you’re perfect).”


“… The ground
“… Their service to this country... "
"Last night's men tell everyone didn't reveal who the next bachelor would be, so it's no surprise that Dean for bachelor is so popular on twitter in this episode."
"Go on."
"Yes, well, you see."
"Play in his season."
"And me."
"I mean him."
"Let me see He has no language barrier, is not an angry misogynist, and as far as we know, he is not responsible for anyone's death, so please register for me. "
"Oh, yes, this guy started his bachelor career with a racist remark, and he'll still be a better bachelor than the last one, like the five guys we've had (except Ben, you're perfect)."



Number  232
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Ramona S Diaz Quest Jonathan Olshefski BEST INTERNATIONAL FILM BPM Beats Per Minute A Fantastic Woman I Am Not a Witch Lady Macbeth Loveless...”
“...casting director and ensemble cast Mudbound Director Dee Rees Casting Directors Billy Hopkins Ashley Ingram Ensemble Cast Jonathan Banks Mary J Blige Jason Clarke Garrett Hedlund Jason Mitchell Rob Morgan Carey Mulligan BEST DOCUMENTARY The Departure Lana Wilson Faces Places Agnés Varda JR Last Men in Aleppo Feras Fayyad Motherland...”
“The 2018 Film Independent Spirit Awards nominees have been announced, honoring achievements in the realm of independent movies.”
“These awards are a stepping stone toward the Oscars for films like Get Out and Call Me By Your Name, which earned more nominations than any other films this year.”
“But there’s plenty of love for Good Time, Lady Bird, and others as well.”
“Check out the full list of nominees below, and find out what was snubbed along the way.”
“Luca Guadagnino’s sumptuous Italian romance Call Me By Your Name leads the pack with six nominations in categories like Best Feature, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Editing, and Best Male Lead (Timothee Chalamet) and Best Supporting Male (Armie Hammer).”
“Elsewhere, Jordan Peele’s Get Out and the Safdie Brothers’ Good Time tied for the second highest number of nominations with five each, Lady Bird and The Rider earned four each, and I, Tonya, Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri, and Columbus pulled in three nods apiece.”
“You can read the full list below, but for me, some of the biggest snubs center around The Big Sick.”
“The movie earned two nominations one for Best First Screenplay for co writers Kumail Nanjiani and Emily V Gordon and one for Best Supporting Female for Holly Hunter but if I were in charge Nanjiani and co star Zoe Kazan would have been nominated for their performances and Michael Showalter...”


"Ramona's journey to Diaz Jonathan olshevsky's best international film BPM beats a magical woman every minute I'm not a witch Macbeth loveless..."
“… Casting director and ensemble actor muddy director Derris casting director Billy Hopkins Ashley Ingram ensemble actor Jonathan banks Mary Briggs Jason Clark Garrett hedron Jason Mitchell rob Morgan Kerry Mulligan best documentary Lana Wilson faces the place Agnes Walda little last man in fairas Fayyad, Aleppo, the motherland... "
"The list of nominations for the 2018 film Independent Spirit Award has been announced, in recognition of achievements in the field of independent film."
"These awards are stepping stones to the Oscars for films like" go out "and" call me your name, "which has received more nominations this year than any other film."
"But there are a lot of people who love good times, Mrs. bird, and others."
"Please check the list of nominees below to find out why you were left out along the way."
"Luca guadagnino's gorgeous Italian love film call me by your name has six nominations for best feature film, best director, best photography, best editing, best leading actor (timothye chalamet) and best supporting actor (Armie hammer)"
"Elsewhere, Jordan Peel's" going out "and the Saffi brothers'" good time "tied for second place, each with five nominations," Lady Bird "and" Rider "each with four nominations, while I, Tonya, three billboards outside ibin, Missouri, and Columbus each received three nominations."
"You can read the full list below, but for me, some of the biggest indifference is focused on the big patients."
"The film has received two nominations, one for best first screenplay by CO writers Kumar nanjani and Emily v. Gordon, and the other for best supporting actress by Holly hunt, but if I'm in charge of nanjani and co star Zoe Carson, Michael showart will be nominated..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Kristin Cavallari Says She’d ‘Love’ a ‘Hills’ Reunion on Spencer Pratt & Heidi Montag’s PodcastHeidi Montag and Spencer Pratt Celebrate 9-Year AnniversaryBen Affleck's Girlfriend Lindsay Shookus Addresses the Attention on Her Since Dating HimRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 34-year-old The Hills alum posted a gushing video on Instagram with Affleck, clearly excited and nervous to meet the actor, and stumbling over his own words at times.”
“"Dang!”
“Oh my God, actually I have chills in real life," he wrote.”
“"First time I've ever been real star struck -- besides Taylor Swift last weekend -- sorry to do this to you on family day.”
“This is a real legend, he had a great attitude.”
“Trippin'."”
“Affleck took it all in stride and looked happy to have made Pratt's day.”
“"Thank you brother," Affleck responded after the gushing intro.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Christine Cavallari said she enjoyed holding a "hills" party on the podcast of Spencer Platt and Heidi Montag. Heidi Montag and Spencer Platt celebrated their 9th anniversary. Ben Affleck's girlfriend Lindsay schokus introduced her attention since dating him... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 34 year old hill alumnus and Affleck have posted a voluble video on instagram. It's obvious that they are both excited and nervous to see the actor, sometimes tripping over his own words."
"Damn it
"Oh, my God, I'm actually a little chilly in real life," he wrote
"For the first time, I'm fascinated by real stars - except for Taylor Swift last weekend - and I'm sorry to do that to you on family day."
"It's a real legend, he has a great attitude."
“Trippin”“。”
"Affleck took it easy and seemed happy to be Pratt's day."
"Thank you, brother," Affleck replied after a long introduction



**Something goes wrong**
““They believe she’s going to marry Harry.””
“...s staying on the show much longer a second insider told Us...”
“They will be engaged by the end of summer a source exclusively told Us of Harry and Markle in March adding They see a life together For the time being the Los Angeles native has continued to film her USA Network legal drama though no one gets the impression she...”
“The affair marks the first event Markle has attended with the royal family.”
“As Us Weekly previously reported, the Suits actress did not attend Middleton, 33, and Matthews’ wedding at the St. Mark’s Church in Englefield, Berkshire, England, but Harry made a 100-mile round-trip to Kensington Palace to pick up his girlfriend for the reception later in the day.”
“The picture, which is the first to emerge of the pair together over the weekend, does not show what Markle wore to the reception.”
“The low-key couple, who began dating last June, were all smiles as they pulled up to the Middleton family’s 18-acre estate in a gray Audi, with Harry, 32, behind the wheel and Markle, 35, sitting in the passenger seat.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle were photographed arriving at Pippa Middleton and James Matthews‘ wedding reception in Bucklebury, England, on Saturday, May 20.”
“There they are!”


"They believe she will marry Harry."
“… He's been on the show longer, another insider told us... "
"They will be engaged at the end of the summer. A source told us exclusively that Harry and Marcel added in March that they saw a time when local Los Angeles people continued to shoot her American online legal drama, although no one got the impression that she
"This event marked the first time that markel and the royal family attended together."
"As US weekly previously reported, the suit actress did not attend the wedding of 33 year old Middleton and Matthews at St. Mark's Church in engerfield, Berkshire, but Harry traveled 100 miles to meet his girlfriend at Kensington Palace later in the day."
"This is the first time the two have been together over the weekend, but it doesn't show what Marcel was wearing at the reception."
"The low-key couple started dating in June last year, driving a gray Audi to the 18 acre Middleton estate, with Harry, 32, sitting behind the steering wheel and marcel, 35, smiling in the co driver's seat."
Prince Harry and Megan Marcel are photographed arriving at Pippa Middleton's wedding banquet with James Matthews in buckbury, England, on Saturday, May 20
"Here they are



**Something goes wrong**
“Much Creator edit YouTwoTV AmandaRachLee Jaclyn Forbes Candace Leca Mike on Much...”
“When indigenous group A Tribe Called Red won video of the year for "R.E.D.''”
“It was hosted by Joe Jonas and Alessia Cara.”
“[1] Initial announcements were made on April 26, 2017.”
“[2]Highlights of the broadcast included a red carpet ceremony where Marianas Trench marked their 10th year at the MMVAs by arriving covered in dozens of colourful balloons.”
“Lead singer Josh Ramsay emerged from a cardboard cake dressed in a faux whip cream bikini.”
“3 During the opening monologue Joe Jonas who hosted the show eight years earlier with the Jonas Brothers referenced the pending legalization of marijuana in Canada saying This time next year it will be completely legal for Canadians to be blem for real referring to the Drake song Blem which...”
“...uses slang for getting high...”
“[4]The broadcast also had recurring themes of diversity and acceptance brought up by numerous presenters and winners.”
“...guest rapper Narcy spoke out about representation.”


"A lot of creators edit youtwotv amandarach Lee Jaclyn Forbes Candace LecA Mike about a lot of..."
"When the aboriginal tribe, a tribe called red, won the video of the year award for" r.e.d. "
"This is hosted by Joe Jonas and alexia Carra."
"[1] the initial announcement was issued on April 26, 2017."
"[2] highlights of the broadcast included a red carpet ceremony in which the Mariana Trench was covered with dozens of colorful balloons, marking their 10th year in MMVAs."
"Lead singer Josh Ramsay came out of a cardboard cake in a margarine bikini."
"3 in his opening remarks, Joe Jonas mentioned the pending issue of legalizing Canadian marijuana in a program hosted by Jonas Brothers eight years ago. He said that it is completely legal for Canadians to become a real stain at this time next year, referring to Drake song's stain..."
“… Use slang to describe excitement... "
"[4] there are also many themes of diversity and acceptability raised by hosts and winners."
"Specially invited rapper Naxi has the right to speak up."



**Something goes wrong**
“[6] This is Minka Kelly's final appearance in the show.”
“During much of the show, she is frequently seen around Tim and Jason, the three having known each other since childhood.”
“Her parents' messy divorce and her father's affair being made public takes a toll on her and, during the father-daughter dance, she takes out her anger at her father's infidelity by vandalizing her father's car dealership and the cars on sale.”
“[2] For some time, the relationship between her and Jason is strained, but they get back together as he admits that he still loves her despite everything that has happened[3] and he proposes to her.”
“Jason catches them in an intimate moment and asks Lyla if she has been spending a lot of time with Tim, which she quickly denies.”
“After Jason's accident, she has an affair with Tim Riggins, his best friend, while Jason is in the hospital.”
“[1]Storylines [ edit ]Season 1 [ edit ]In the pilot episode, Lyla is introduced as the girlfriend of star quarterback, Jason Street.”
“After her affair with Tim, things between her and Jason are tense, but by season three, they are on speaking terms, as she is the first person he confides in about moving to New York City.”
“Her parents divorce, causing her to fall down the social hierarchy and become a target of ridicule amongst her schoolmates and fellow cheerleaders.”
“[4] She eventually quits the cheerleading squad after being incessantly ridiculed by her peers at school and does some soul-searching.”


"[6] this is the last time Minka Kelly is on the show."
"She's been around Tim and Jason for most of the show, and they've known each other since childhood."
"Her parents' messy divorce and her father's extramarital affair were made public, which made her pay the price. In the process of dancing with her father and daughter, she vented her anger at her father's infidelity by destroying his car dealer and selling cars."
"The relationship between her and Jason has been tense for some time, but they have come together again, because Jason admits that despite everything, he still loves her and proposes to her."
"Jason caught them at an intimate moment and asked if Lyra and Tim had spent a lot of time, which she quickly denied
"After Jason's accident, she had an affair with his best friend, Tim rickins, and Jason was in the hospital."
"[1] storyline [Edit] Season 1 [Edit] in the pilot episode, Lyra is introduced as the girlfriend of star quarterback Jason Streeter."
"After her affair with Tim, the relationship between her and Jason was very tense, but by the third season, they had already talked about it, because she was the first person he disclosed to him that he was going to move to New York."
The divorce of her parents made her fall in the social hierarchy and become the object of ridicule by her classmates and cheerleaders
"[4] being ridiculed by her peers in school, she finally quit the cheerleading team and had some introspection."



**Something goes wrong**
““Labor is hard,” she later told PEOPLE.”
“Originally due to deliver on Nov. 1 (coincidentally her one-year anniversary with Ben), Jessa went through 10 hours of contractions that almost forced her to change her plan of having an all-natural home birth.”
““We’re so happy that she’s doing so well,” Michelle told PEOPLE at the time.”
“She finally returned home for good two months later, once she had grown to a “chunky” 9 lbs., 1 oz.”
“After nearly four months in neonatal intensive care, Josie left the hospital — only to be rushed back a few days later after her vital signs dropped.”
“We are so grateful for the ability to help her.”“It is incredible what the doctors and nurses can do to save the life of this little person,” added Michelle.”
““Years ago, a baby this small wouldn’t have lived an hour.”
““Josie is walking a daily tightrope to keep her vitals stable and the nurses and the whole team here has been wonderful,” said Jim Bob at the time.”
“At the time, her physician Dr. Robert Arrington, co-director of the neonatal intensive care unit, told PEOPLE that Josie “developed a spontaneous bowel perforation.” She responded to placement of an abdominal drain, plus antibiotics, and did not require an open operation — wonderful news for her frightened parents.”
“The micro-preemie was rushed from the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences in Little Rock, Arkansas, the hospital where she was born, to Arkansas Children’s Hospital, her parents at her side.”


"Labor is hard," she later told people
"Originally scheduled for delivery on November 1 (which happened to be her and Ben's first anniversary), Jesse experienced 10 hours of contractions, which almost forced her to change her plan of natural delivery at home."
"We're glad she did so well," Michelle told people at the time
Two months later, when she reached nine pounds and an ounce of "chunky," she finally came home
After nearly four months in NICU, Josie left the hospital. A few days later, her vital signs dropped and she was driven back
"We are very grateful for our ability to help her." "It's amazing what doctors and nurses can do to save this little guy's life," Michelle added
"A few years ago, such a small baby couldn't live for an hour."
"Josie was walking the tightrope every day to keep her vital signs stable, and the nurses and the whole team were excellent," Jim Bob said at the time
"At the time, her doctor, Dr. Robert Arlington, CO director of NICU, told people that Josie" had spontaneous intestinal perforation. " She responded to the placement of the abdominal drainage tube, plus antibiotics, without the need for open surgery - which is good news for her frightened parents. "
"The baby was rushed to Arkansas Children's Hospital from the University of Arkansas School of medicine in Little Rock, Arkansas, where she was born, with her parents by her side."



**Something goes wrong**
““Like those scenes are already so uncomfortable to film but then doing it trying to do this face was the most bizarre thing you could ever imagine.””
“...shoot she said while laughing...”
“The cool part about this movie is we are obviously people trying to escape this game but we also get to play the bad guy and my possessed scene is also my sex scene so it was really interesting to...”
“...also possessed...”
“So it sort of has that style but there are some moments that are pretty twisted and dark And by twisted and dark she means her sex scene in the film which she had to film whilst her character was...”
““This is such a fun movie to watch, it reminds me a lot of a movie I watched growing up: Final Destination.”
““There’s quite a few [jump scares],” Lucy shared of the film, reassuring us it's not too scary to see.”
“In the film, Tyler and Lucy play Lucas and Olivia, two college seniors who, while on spring break in Mexico, get sucked into a life-or-death game of truth or dare that ends up following them back home.”
“...get a sneak of in the Truth or Dare trailer...”
“The duo stopped by On Air With Ryan Seacrest on Friday April 13 Friday the 13th to make it all the better and dished on everything from their belief in paranormal and witches to that creepy possessed sex scene we...”


"It's like those scenes are already uncomfortable, but trying to photograph this face is the strangest thing you can imagine."
“… She said with a smile
"The cool thing about this movie is that we obviously want to escape from the game, but we can also play bad guys. The scene I'm obsessed with is also my sex scene, so it's really interesting..."
“… And have
"So it's a bit like that style, but some moments are very distorted and dark, through which she refers to her sex scene in the film, she has to shoot, and her role is..."
"It's a very interesting movie. It reminds me of a movie I saw when I was growing up: the final destination."
"There's quite a lot of (jumping fear)," Lucy shares the story of the movie, assuring us it doesn't look too scary
"In the film, Taylor and Lucy play Lucas and Olivia, two senior college students who are involved in a life and death game about truth or courage during their spring vacation in Mexico, and finally follow them home."
“… Get a secret in the truth or courage Trailer... "
"The couple aired with Ryan Seacrest on Friday and Friday, April 13, to make everything better, from their belief in supernatural phenomena and witches to the gruesome scenes of enchanted sex, we..."



Number  239
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Marvel’s Runaways returns Dec. 21 on Hulu.”
““So everything you’d want from every era is hiding in that closet.” No one wants to be dressed in sweats when you’re saving the world.”
“The Hulu superhero series, from executive producers Josh Schwartz and Stephanie Savage (Gossip Girl), returns for its second season on Dec. 21 and EW has an exclusive look at the new trailer above.”
“At the end of season 1, the titular band of teens, after discovering their parents are supervillains, finally ran away from home.”
““This year is much more the cat-and-mouse [game] and the two sides going to war,” says Savage.”
“So, naturally, season 2 begins with the friends finding a new place to hide as they strategize on how to deal with their diabolical parental units.”
““It’s in Griffith Park,” Savage explains of the hideout, which is called the Hostel in the comics that inspired the streaming series.”
““It was originally built in the 1920s by a magician.”
“It was lived in for many years but perhaps sometime in the 60s or 70s there was an earthquake or mudslide that made it uninhabitable Adds Schwartz We wanted it to be our equivalent of like the Batcave Teenagers really need a place to hang out even if it s...”
“...an underground dust filled mansion...”


"Marvel's fugitives returned to Hulu on December 21."
"So everything you want from every era is hidden in the closet." When you save the world, no one wants to wear a T-shirt
Directed by executive producers Josh Schwartz and Stephanie savage, the Hulu superhero series will return to season 2 on December 21, with EW focusing exclusively on the new trailer
"At the end of the first season, the infamous teenage band finally ran away from home after discovering that their parents were super villains."
"This year is more like a cat and mouse game," savage said
"So, at the beginning of season two, friends will find a new hiding place and make strategies on how to deal with their evil parents."
"It's in Griffith Park," savage explains, the hideout, which is called the hostel in the comics that inspired the stream series
"It was originally built by a magician in the 1920s."
"It has lived here for many years, but maybe some time in the 1960s or 1970s there was an earthquake or a debris flow that made it unfit to live," Schwartz added. "We want it to be our kind, just like bat cave teenagers really need a place to go out and play, even if it is..."
“… A dusty underground building... "



Number  240
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Scott Disick SnapchatOver the weekend, the loved-up pair packed up their bags yet again and headed to Malibu with two of Disick’s children (with ex Kourtney Kardashian), son Mason and daughter Penelope, to enjoy some much-needed R&R.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The 19-year-old star posted a photograph of her beau on Instagram on what appeared to be a hotel bad decorated with a surprise rose petal heart.”
“‘Omg,’ she captioned the adorable photo.”
“During their holiday, the father-of-three also took to Instagram to cosy up to his ‘#1’ love, Mason, on the beach.”
“The couple’s latest holiday comes exactly a month after the pair jetted off to Mexico with Disick’s children – a decision which reportedly annoyed Kourtney.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Scott disc snapchat last weekend, the couple packed up again and took disc's two children (former Courtney Kardashian), son Mason and daughter Penelope to Malibu to enjoy some much-needed R & R."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"The 19-year-old star posted a picture of her boyfriend on instagram, which seems to be a hotel decorated with a surprise rose petal heart."
"My God," she added a title to the lovely picture
"During their vacation, the father of the three also went to instagram to get in touch with his" 1 "lover Mason on the beach."
"The couple's most recent holiday came just a month after they flew to Mexico with desik's children - a decision that, according to reports, angered Courtney."



Number  241
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I am totally head over heels in love with you.”
“You are everything I could ever want in a woman, a wife, a person.”
“These two are obviously the experts in finding love in unexpected and (some would say) hopeless places.”
“Get those emotions out of everybody and make the most out of every relationship you have with each woman.”
“Just lay it out there.”
“He said,Put your heart on your sleeve.”
“Bryan luckily had a few more tidbits to share.”
“It may seem effortless for someone like Rachel who is beautiful, smart, and classy, but what if "being yourself" doesn't come as easily to Arie?”
“Such clear and straightforward advice.”
“You can't go wrong with that.”


"I'm totally in love with you."
"You are everything I want in a woman, a wife, a person."
"These two people are obviously experts looking for love in unexpected and (some would say) hopeless places."
"Take these emotions out of everyone and make the most of every relationship you have with every woman."
"Just put it there."
"Put your heart on your sleeve," he said
"Brian is lucky to have more gossip to share."
It seems easy for a beautiful, smart and elegant person like Rachel, but what if it's not so easy for Ellie to be herself
"Such a clear and straightforward proposal."
"You can't be wrong."



**Something goes wrong**
“Spencer and Heidi began their romance in 2007 after being introduced on The Hills and eloped in Mexico on November 20 2008.”
“Blonde beauty: Heidi, 31, showed off her enviable physique in tight off-white jeans and a pink T-shirtOh baby!”
“And Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt looked like they couldn't be any happier as they doted on their little boy earlier this month in a series of sweet family snaps taken in Aspen, Colorado.”
“The Hills stars sipped champagne and lavished Gunner with kisses during the photo shoot.”
“One happy family Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt looked like they couldn t be any happier as they doted on their little boy earlier this month in a series of sweet family snaps taken in Aspen Colorado Heidi 31 showed off her enviable physique in tight off white jeans and...”
“...a pink T shirt...”
“The blonde beauty opted to go barefoot for the shoot, which took place in the gorgeous gardens of The Little Nell ski resort.”
“At one point she and her reality TV star husband shared a kiss over glasses of champagne.”
“Spencer, 34, meanwhile was decked out in distressed jeans and a baby blue T-shirtSpencer, 34, meanwhile was decked out in distressed jeans and a baby blue T-shirt.”
“What happened to them?'”


"Spencer and Heidi started their relationship after being introduced to the mountains in 2007 and eloped in Mexico on November 20, 2008."
Blonde: 31 year old Heidi shows off her enviable physique in tight white jeans and pink t-shirto baby
"Heidi Montague and Spencer Pratt look happy as they dote on their little boy in a series of warm family photos taken in Aspen, Colorado, earlier this month."
"During the filming, the stars of hills sipped champagne and kissed the shooters."
"Earlier this month, Heidi Montague and Spencer Platt took a series of sweet family photos in Aspen, Colorado. Heidi showed her enviable physique in tight white jeans on the 31st. They dote on their little boy, which makes a happy family look very happy..."
“… A pink t-shirt... "
"Blondes choose barefoot to shoot in the gorgeous garden of little Nell ski resort."
"Once, she and her reality TV star husband were kissing on a champagne glass."
Spencer, 34, was wearing ripped jeans and a light blue T-shirt. Burns, 34, was wearing ripped jeans and a light blue T-shirt
"What happened to them?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week, a group of people found out on reddit that Gamestop's share price had soared, leading to the ban of a multi billion dollar hedge fund. Read more, peloton's Cody Rigsby explains that his recent absence shows him
"The 24-year-old social star revealed in the latest podcast that he has invested about $50000 in Gamestop stock."
"Today, yellowfin tuna chews 200 hooks at the losunoso resort," Connor wrote in the photo
"Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman's 26 year old son recently shared a rare picture on instagram of him holding a big fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
“… Life... "
"A very famous actor and director in this industry gave me very bad advice, which helped me a lot, because I just read more about Tom Cruise's son, Connor, who posted his own rare photos on instagram. Connor Kidman cruise rarely saw him..."
"Now, the 36 year old actress and director is explaining the policy and revealing to the outside world what prompted her to adopt it in her film set."
“… There was no policy he violated... "
"A few hours ago, Haley Hyde read more and Olivia Wilde explained her ban policy on the set. As you may remember, Olivia Wilde fired Shiite rabov from the movie "don't worry, honey" last year, when there were several reports that she had a... "
"When Haley arrived at the restaurant, she was wearing a black mask and was safe."



Number  244
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kaitlyn Bristowe, who was third on Chris's season, is currently starring as The Bachelorette on the 11th instalment of the spin-off show.”
“'And now [this process is] getting really intense.”
“The couple, who had been engaged for six months, released a joint statement on Wednesday.”
“'Whitney Bischoff and Chris Soules have mutually and amicably decided to end their engagement,' they told Us Weekly.”
“Scroll down for videoOver: Whitney Bischoff and Chris Soules, pictured here at the DWTS finale party on May 19, have spit'They part with nothing but respect and admiration for one another and will continue to be supportive friends.”
“They wish to thank everyone who has supported them through this journey.'”
“The Bachelor creator Mike Fleiss was the first one to break the news, tweeting on Thursday morning: 'Sad news to report: @souleschris and @whitbisch are no longer engaged...'Chris, 33, and Whitney, 29, have so far remained quiet about the split on their respective social media accounts.”
“The moment she said yes: The Bachelor proposed to Whitney six months ago, and the happy moment aired during the show's season finale in MarchThe pair were last seen together on May 19, celebrating the end of Dancing With The Stars.”
“The Bachelor star also posted a photo with Whitney and his parents to Instagram that day, along with the words: 'Post-show pic with the fam.”
“I truly am the world's luckiest guy.”


Caitlin Bristow, third in season 3 of Chris, is currently a bachelor in Episode 11 of the spin off show
"Now [the process] has become very intense."
"The couple, who have been engaged for six months, issued a joint statement on Wednesday."
"Whitney Bischoff and Chris sules have kindly decided to end their engagement," they told weekly
"Scroll down to watch the video: Whitney Bischoff and Chris sules take a picture at the DWTS final party on May 19. They break up with nothing but mutual respect and admiration, and they will continue to be supportive friends."
"They want to thank everyone who supported them on this journey."
"Bachelor creator Mike Fleiss, who was the first to reveal the news, tweeted on Thursday morning:" the unfortunate news to report: @ souleschris and @ whitbisch are no longer engaged... " Chris, 33, and Whitney, 29, have so far been silent about the breakup on their respective social media accounts. "
"The moment she agreed: the bachelor proposed to Whitney six months ago, and happy hour was broadcast at the end of the season in March. The couple last met on May 19 to celebrate the end of dancing with the stars
"The bachelor star also posted a photo with Whitney and her parents on instagram on the same day, with the words:" take a picture with your family. "
"I'm really the luckiest person in the world."



Number  245
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe the next time we see Meghan's signature it will be on a birth certificate?”
“People magazine quoted her as saying, "I’m sure at some point we’ll need the whole thing."”
“Just look at the focus on her face as she puts pen to paper.”
“I mean, photographers were there, she had to sit in a fancy chair... yada, yada.”
“But damn, it does look nice.”
“Sure, she probably took her time signing Higgins' book because it was a whole to-do and everything.”
“...and rushing it to their tattoo parlors to get stamped on their bodies now...”
“Pool Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images WPA Pool Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images Here is the full dated image from the President s guestbook WPA Pool Getty Images Entertainment Getty Images I can just see fans blowing up the graphic...”
“Next to it is Meghan's fancier, more controlled signature in Higgins' guestbook from July on the right.”
“Below, you can see a picture of an old signature Harry and Meghan left during a previous visit to Northern Ireland in March.”


"Maybe next time we see Megan's signature on the birth certificate?"
People magazine quoted her as saying, "I believe that at some point, we will need the whole thing."
"Just look at the focus on her face when she puts the pen on the paper."
"I mean, the photographer was there, and she had to sit in a beautiful chair... Yada, Yada. "
"But damn it, it looks good."
"Of course, she might take the time to sign Higgins's book because it's a complete to-do list and everything."
“… Now send it to the tattoo shop and stamp it on them. "
"Billiards picture entertainment WPA billiards picture entertainment here is the complete date picture on the president's message book. WPA billiards picture entertainment I can only see the pictures praised by fans..."
"Next to it is Megan's preferred signature. On the right side of Higgins's July message book, the signature is more controlled."
"Below, you can see a picture of Harry and Megan, the old signers, who left it on their last visit to Northern Ireland in March."



**Something goes wrong**
“Meghan's dog got to ride in a car with the Queen.”
“It looks like Markle and the Queen have great taste.”
“Getty ImagesAlso in the post-engagement interview, Prince Harry noted that the Queen’s beloved corgis have never liked him—but they love his fiancée.”
“She added, "When I met her I had such a deep understanding and, of course, incredible respect for being able to have that time with her, and she’s an incredible woman.”The Queen’s corgis love her.”
“I think to be able to meet her through his lens, not just with his honor and respect for her as the monarch but the love that he has for her as his grandmother, all of those layers have been so important for me."”
““It’s incredible.”
“In the couple’s big post-engagement interview, Meghan said she had met the Queen “a couple of times” and Harry had prepared her for what the meeting would be like.”
“And it turns out that was the first of several meetings.”
“Us Weekly reported that Meghan first met the Queen in September 2017 at Balmoral Castle, and things apparently “went well," leaving Harry pleased about how his girlfriend got along with his loved ones.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


"Megan's dog is going to ride with the queen."
"It seems that Marcel and the queen have good taste."
Prince Harry pointed out in an interview after his engagement that the Queen's beloved kogis never liked him, but they loved his fiancee
She added: "when I met her, I had such a deep understanding of her that, of course, I felt incredible respect for being with her. She was an incredible woman." The Queen's korgis likes her
"I think to be able to meet her through his lens is not only because of his respect and respect for her as a monarch, but also because of his love for her as a grandmother, all of which are very important to me."
"It's incredible."
"In a big post engagement interview with the couple, Megan said she had" met the queen several times "and Harry was ready to meet her."
"It turned out to be the first of several meetings."
"US Weekly reported that Megan met the queen for the first time in Balmoral Castle in September 2017, and things obviously" went well ", which made Harry happy with his girlfriend and relatives."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“It's just life."”
“The Hollywood megastar, who is currently locked into a custody battle over their six children, was investigated by Children's Services following an alleged incident on a private flight, but was cleared of any wrongdoing.”
“And recent interviews left fans worrying that Pitt was struggling under the weight of the situation.”
“But, talking to Associated Press, the actor and producer talked of how he is "keeping the ship afloat" and figuring out how to work on a "new configuration".”
“"Kids are everything.”
“Kids are your life.”
“They're taking all the focus, as they should anyway," said Brad.”
“He then laughed: "I'm not suicidal or something.”
“There's still much beauty in the world and a lot of love.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"This is life."
"The Hollywood superstar is currently in trouble over custody of six children. Children's services investigated him after an alleged incident on a private flight, but he didn't do anything wrong."
"And recent interviews have worried the fans that Pete is struggling in this situation
But in an interview with the associated press, the actor and producer talked about how he "maintains the status quo" and how he designs "new configurations."
"Children are everything."
"Children are your life."
"They put all their attention on themselves, and that's what they should do," Brad said
He then said with a smile, "I'm not suicidal or anything."
"There is still a lot of beauty and love in the world."



**Something goes wrong**
““To the core of my being, I know what it’s like to feel like there is no way I can win this, so where do I even begin,” she reflects.”
“Wardrobe Styling by Shibon Kennedy.”
“I have very high standards for sci-fi and horror films—I expect to startle and gasp and cover my eyes—and this movie didn’t just clear my very high bar; it vaulted over it.”
“But to be honest even if it had failed to register on my scare o meter I would have loved it for what it is at its heart in Rodriguez s words a human story and bad bitches going into action In the film which lands in theaters nationwide on...”
“Friday February 23 Rodriguez plays Anya Thorensen a paramedic who has volunteered to explore The Shimmer a mystifying dangerous ever expanding territory...”
“Those who go into The Shimmer often don’t return.”
“Venturing into the force field alongside Anya are women toting guns, ammo, and advanced degrees in STEM: biologist Lena (Natalie Portman), physicist Josie (Tessa Thompson), geologist Cass (Tuva Novotny), and psychologist Dr. Ventress (Jennifer Jason Leigh).”
“Together, they’re determined to do what practically no one else has: enter The Shimmer, discover what it is, and return unscathed.”
“The role fit Rodriguez like Anya’s well-worn fatigues.”
“The classic roles that are afforded to me here Gina this is what you re capable of doing are usually roles I don t even relate to she says explaining that she identifies more with layered parts like the main character in Lady Bird than with parts inscribed by one...”


"Deep down in my heart, I know what it's like that I can't win this game, so where should I start?" she reflected
"Shibon Kennedy's fashion design."
"I have high standards for science fiction and horror films - I want to scare, gasp, cover my eyes, and this film didn't clear my high threshold; it crossed the threshold."
"But to be honest, even if it's not registered on my fear list, I'll like it, because it's Rodriguez, a human story and a movie of bad bitches into action, on the land where it's shown all over the country..."
"On Friday, February 23, Rodriguez plays a paramedic, Anya Sorensen, who volunteers to explore glimmer - a mysterious and dangerous area that is growing..."
"Those who enter the twilight tend not to come back."
"The women who venture into the force field with Anya are those with guns, ammunition and advanced stem degrees: biologist Lina (Natalie Portman), physicist Josie (Tessa Thompson), geologist Kass (Tuva Novotny) and psychologist Dr. Ventress (Jennifer Jason Lee)."
"Together they are determined to do what no one else has: go into the shimmer, find out what it is, and come back unscathed."
"It's a good role for Rodriguez, just like Anya's old clothes."
"Here's my classic character Gina. That's what you can do. It's usually a character I don't even deal with. She explains that she prefers layered characters like the protagonists in Lady Bird to characters carved by one person..."



**Something goes wrong**
“...and will be available for live streaming on YouTube.”
“How to Watch: The show will be broadcast on E!”
“When: The People's Choice Awards will air on Sunday, Nov. 11 at 9/8c.”
“Awards this fall...”
“Unlike the awards season favorites to follow the PCAs give voice to the public so if you want to tune in to see your peers picks for the best films and small screen series of the year here s what you need to know about watching the People s Choice...”
“You may unsubscribe at any time.”
“By signing up, you agree to our Terms of Use and acknowledge the data practices in our Privacy Policy .”
“TV Guide editors handpick the shows that are actually worth watching and deliver daily recommendations straight to your inbox.”
“Watch This Now Looking for your next binge?”
“...best animal star...”


“… And it will be live on YouTube. "
"What do you think: the program will be broadcast on the Internet!"
"Time: the people's Choice Award will be broadcast on Sunday, November 11, at 9 / 8."
"Award this autumn..."
"Unlike the awards season, the most popular PCA provides a voice for the public, so if you want to watch the best film of the year and small screen series from your peers, here's what you need to know about watching audience choices..."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"By registering, you agree to our terms of use and acknowledge the data practices in our privacy policy."
"TV guide editors carefully select programs that are really worth watching and send daily recommendations directly to your in box."
"Now let's see this for your next carnival?"
“… Best animal star... "



**Something goes wrong**
“It looks like Lindsay's Bad Decision Adventure Club tees are already a go-to in her wardrobe, and I can't blame her for re-wearing shirts as comfy as these look.”
“Talk about versatile.”
“There's no denying the reality TV star looked insanely glam during her entire season of The Bachelorette, but like most people, she loves her comfy clothes, too.”
“There s one brand of T shirts Lindsay has been living in over the past few weeks and you re going to want to know the secret behind all the comfy oversized tees and tanks she s been rocking on...”
“...social media lately...”
“Lindsay first clued fans into her fave brand on Instagram in July, and she's been spotted sporting the tees and tanks several times since.”
“So what's the brand?”
“It's Los Angeles-based Bad Decision Adventure Club, which sells organic, eco-friendly, unisex, made-in-LA clothing at its website, welikebad.com.”
“Lindsay is a fan of the brand's peach oversized Johnny Tee and Johnny Muscle Tank, both of which are made with a super soft jersey material.”
“The oversized fit looks adorable half-tucked into shorts or jeans, but it also means that Lindsay can actually wear the pieces as a dress, too.”


"It seems that Lindsay's bad decision, the Adventure Club T-shirt has become a hot spot in her wardrobe. I can't blame her for putting on these comfortable looking shirts again."
"Say versatile."
"It's undeniable that the reality TV star looks bright throughout the single season, but like most people, she also likes her comfortable clothes."
"In the past few weeks, Lindsay has been wearing a brand of T-shirt, and you will want to know the secret behind the comfortable oversized T-shirt and vest she has been wearing..."
“… Recent social media... "
"Lindsay attracted fans to her favorite brand for the first time on instagram in July, and she has been repeatedly found wearing T-shirts and vests since then."
"What is the brand?"
"This is the Los Angeles based bad decision Adventure Club, which sells organic, environmentally friendly, Unisex Los Angeles clothing on its website, welikebad.com Website. "
"Lindsay is a fan of the brand's Pink oversized Johnny T-shirt and Johnny muscle vest, both of which are made of super soft material."
"This oversized dress looks cute, half tucked into shorts or jeans, but it also means Lindsay can actually wear these clothes as a dress."



**Something goes wrong**
“WATCH the clip at the 5:50 mark (below):[Image via The Ellen Show/YouTube.]”
“It was just this young kid that works for me, he wanted a picture of JAY-Z, Nas, and Kendrick.”Sadly, because of the controversy, some of Diddy’s friends haven’t been speaking to him for two weeks!”
“And sometimes my photography editor, he doesn’t let me know when he’s taking people out of the pictures… There were people that were taken away that didn’t deserve to be taken away, I had nothing to do with it.”
“According to the 48-year-old:“I take a lot of pictures with a lot of different celebrities ‘cos we’re all just family and stuff.”
“On Thursday’s episode of Ellen DeGeneres‘ talk show, the Bad Boy founder opens up about the harsh edits, and says he isn’t the one clipping people out!”
“Nine months ago, the Sean John designer axed Kendall and Kylie Jenner out of a pic taken at the 2017 Met Gala.”
“As seen here:However, that wasn’t the first time the hip-hop mogul — who jokingly changed his name to “Love” for one day — has been savage with the crop tool!”
“Related: Diddy Says He’s Down For Kids With Girlfriend Cassie!”
“As we reported, after the 2018 Grammys, Diddy was called out when he shared a snap on his Instagram page completely cropping Fabolous and Photoshopping French Montana out of a pic with JAY-Z, Kendrick Lamar, and Nas!”
“Raise your hand if you’ve been personally victimized by the #DiddyShop OR #DiddyCrop!”


"Watch the video clip at 5:50 (below): [image from Ellen show / YouTube. ]”
"This is the young man who works for me. He wants a picture of Jez, NASS and Kendrick." Sadly, because of the controversy, some of Didi's friends haven't spoken to him for two weeks! "
"Sometimes my photo editor doesn't let me know when he takes people out of the picture Some people who have been taken away are not worthy of being taken away. I have nothing to do with them. "
According to the 48 year old, "I've taken a lot of pictures with a lot of different celebrities because we're just a family."
On the Ellen DeGeneres talk show on Thursday, the founder of the bad boy made public the harsh editors and said he was not the one to delete people
"Nine months ago, Sean John's designers cut Kendall and Kylie Jenner out of a photo taken at the 2017 metropolitan celebration."
"As you can see here: but it's not the first time this hip-hop tycoon has used this tool savagely - he jokingly changed his name to" love "one day!"
Related reports: didi said he had a baby with his girlfriend Cathy
"As we reported, after the 2018 Grammy Awards, Diddy shared a photo on instagram, and cut out the photo of French Montana completely with Jay-Z, Kendrick Lamar and NAS in one photo, which surprised him!"
"If you have been hurt by diddyshop or diddycrop personally, please raise your hand!"



**Something goes wrong**
“See more of Bethenny's thoughts on Jill, below.”
“I cried.”
“What Would Jill Zarin Say to Bethenny Frankel Today?”
“The Beginning of the End of Bethenny and JillWhat Does Bethenny Have to Do to Not Hear This Question?”
“Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!”
“We weren't sure if we'd ever see the day when Bethenny Frankel and Jill Zarin completely squashed their years-long beef.”
“But that day may come sooner than we think.”
“Jill recently posted a lovely message about Bethenny on Instagram, and it seems as though the ice has thawed somewhat between these former friends-turned-foes.”
“"I’m sitting around going thru photos and put together a collage of @bethennyfrankel with my family," Jill wrote in a post that featured photos of Bethenny with her, her late husband Bobby Zarin, her daughter Ally Shapiro, and her mother Gloria Kamen.”


"Let's see more of what Bethany thinks of Jill."
"I cried."
"What will Jill zarin say to Bethany Frankel today?"
"The beginning of the end of bessney and Jill, what does bessney have to do to avoid hearing this question?"
"Create a free profile to get unlimited exclusive videos, raffles, etc!"
"We're not sure if there will be a day when Bethany Frankel and Jill zalin will squash their beef for years."
"But that day may be faster than we think."
"Jill recently posted a lovely news about besseini on instagram. It seems that these former friends have become enemies, and the relationship between them has thawed a little."
Jill wrote in a post: "I'm sitting there flipping through photos and organizing a collage of @ bethennyfrankel and her family, including photos of Bethenny and her, her late husband, Bob zalin, her daughter, Ellie Shapiro, and her mother, Gloria Carmen."



**Something goes wrong**
“#engaged #isaidyes #fiancé.”Ferrara played Turtle on the dramedy from 2004-11.”
“Both are smiling at the camera as Ferrara, whose left hand now carries a wedding band, points to the lens.”
“The Entourage star tied the knot with his longtime girlfriend, Breanne Racano, on Friday, a rep for the actor confirmed to PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Ferrara’s former costar, Kevin Dillon, also revealed the exciting news in an Instagram photo.”
““They did it!”
“Congratulations to the Ferraras!” 51-year-old Dillon, who played Johnny “Drama” Chase on the series, captioned a glowing photo of the couple on their wedding day.”
“In the photo, Ferrara sports a black, two-button, notch lapel tuxedo, shirt, and bowtie (all by Ermenegildo Zegna Made to Measure) while his blushing bride dons a strapless white wedding gown and veil.”
“Ferrara, 37, got engaged to the actress, who also had a role in Entourage in 2011, in August of last year.”
“Racano also shared the same shot, writing, “I am so lucky to marry this man.”


"Engaged" isaidyes "fiance" Ferrara played a turtle on the dramedy in 2004-11
"When Ferrara pointed the wedding ring in her left hand to the camera, both of them were smiling at the camera."
A representative of the star's entourage confirmed to people magazine that he married his longtime girlfriend Brian lacano on Friday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Ferrara's former partner, Kevin Dillon, also revealed this exciting news in instagram's photo."
"They did it!"
"Congratulations to the Ferrara family! Dillon, 51, who plays Johnny's "drama" chase in the series, inscribes a photo of the couple on their wedding day
"In the photo, Ferrara is wearing a black double button cardigan, shirt and bow tie (all made by Ermenegildo Zegna), while his blushing bride is wearing a white wedding dress and veil without shoulder straps."
Ferrara, 37, was engaged to the actress in August last year, who also starred in the entourage in 2011
Lakano shared the same photo, which he wrote: "I'm very lucky to be married to this man."



Number  254
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...they have a net worth of about $5 million, but considering how much we all love them and the fact that they have a spin-off in the works, that is likely to increase over the next few years.”
“According to E!”
“As for Chip and Joanna Gaines, don’t worry that they won’t be able to put their kids through school.”
“They haven’t written books or launched any spin-off series, but still manage to rake in some big bucks.”
“The second biggest money earner the stars of Love It or List It, interior designer Hilary Farr and real estate agent David Visentin, who have a collective net worth of $7 million.”
“The results will have you picking up your sledgehammer and wallpaper swatches and pitching your own home renovation show ASAP.”
“Online took an in-depth look into how much money and fame comes with being an HGTV star.”
“E!”
“In fact, they are a distant third to some of HGTV’s other bigger star— Property Brothers and Love It or List It.”
“Even if he has to split the proceeds with his brother, Jonathan Scott is undoubtedly earning more than he did as an award-winning magician.”


“…… Their net assets are about $5 million, but given how much we all love them and how much they are splitting up, that number is likely to increase in the next few years. "
"According to e!"
"As for chip and Joanna Gaines, don't worry they can't get the kids through school."
"They didn't write a book, they didn't launch any derivative series, but they managed to make some big money."
"The second biggest earners are favorite or public stars, interior designer Hillary Farr and real estate agent David vicentin, with total assets of $7 million."
"The result will let you pick up the sledgehammer and wallpaper samples to promote your home decoration exhibition as soon as possible."
"There's an in-depth study online of how much money and fame it takes to become a HGTV star."
“E！”
"In fact, they are far behind HGTV's other bigger star real estate brothers by a third, and they like it, or list it."
"Even if he had to share the proceeds with his brother, Jonathan Scott certainly made more than he did as an award-winning magician."



Number  255
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And for those unfamiliar, curling is the sport where you are allowed to kneel.”
““Give it up for the U.S. men’s curling team, they also took home gold.”
“Me?”3.”
“Who does he think he is?”
“I mean, why do people keep talking about this guy who isn’t winning?”
“Sort of I guess.”
““Tiger Woods is back.”
“Through the self-deprecating humor Patrick promised, she took a shot at Tiger Woods and herself — but also her trolls on social media who constantly questioned why people cared about her NASCAR and IndyCar careers when she only won one race in 14 years on the track.”
“Tiger back?”
“I haven’t seen a Russian this pleased with Washington since, well, two days ago.”2.”


"For those unfamiliar, curling is a sport that allows you to kneel down."
"Give up for the U.S. men's curling team. They won the gold medal."
"Me?" 3.”
"Who does he think he is?"
"I mean, why do people always talk about this guy who didn't win?"
"Probably."
"Tiger Woods is back."
"With Patrick's promised self mocking humor, she shot Tiger Woods and herself - and also the social media villains, who constantly question why people care about her NASCAR and indyka careers, while she has won only one race in 14 years on the track."
"The tiger is back?"
"I haven't seen a Russian like Washington since two days ago."



Number  256
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...pop duo group performance for her Zedd collab Stay...”
“I ll stop talking now RELATED VIDEO Kesha Delivers Emotional Performance of Praying with Cyndi Lauper Camila Cabello at Grammys In addition to best new artist Cara was up for song of the year and best music video for Logic s 1 800 273 8255 also featuring Khalid and best...”
“She began by explaining that she had “no control over” her win and didn’t submit herself or as to be submitted for the award knowing “there are other artists that deserve the acknowledgment.”That said, Cara still felt happy about her nomination and win.”
““I am not going to be upset about something I’ve wanted since I was a kid, not to mention have worked really hard for,” she wrote.”
“I will not let everything I ve worked for be diminished by people taking offense to my accomplishments and feeling the need to tell me how much I suck In her acceptance speech Cara who many felt was snubbed for a Grammy in 2017 urged fans to support musicians who...”
“...might not be recognized at awards shows...”
““There are some incredible artists out there that are making incredible music that deserve to be acknowledged that don’t always get acknowledge because of popularity contests or numbers games.”
“And that’s kind of unfortunate,” she said.”
““So I just want to encourage everyone to support real music and real artists because everyone deserves the same shot.”“I meant everything I said about everyone deserving the same shot,” she added on Instagram.”
““There is a big issue in the industry that perpetuates the idea that an artist’s talent and hard work should take a back seat to popularity and numbers.”


“… Her pop group performance during her stay in Zedd Lab... "
"I'm going to stop talking about the related video now that Kesha offers an emotional expression of praying with Cindy Lauper Camilla Cabello at the Grammy Awards ceremony. In addition to the best new artist Carla is for the song of the year and the best music video logic s 1 800 273 8255, also includes Khalid and the best..."
From the beginning, she explained that she "couldn't control" her own awards, didn't give in to herself, and didn't get nominated because she knew "there are other artists to admit.". In other words, Carla is still happy with her nomination and award
"I don't feel uneasy about what I've wanted since I was a child, let alone work hard for it," she wrote
"I won't let everything I give for it, because people are offended by my achievements and feel it necessary to tell me how bad I was in her acceptance speech. Kara was snubbed by many people at the 2017 Grammy Awards ceremony, and she urged her fans to support those..."
“… May not be recognized at the award ceremony... "
"There are some incredible artists who have created incredible music that deserves recognition, but it's not always recognized because of popularity contests or digital games."
"It's a bit unfortunate," she said
"So I just want to encourage everyone to support real music and real artists, because everyone deserves the same opportunity." "Everything I say is serious and everyone deserves the same opportunity," she added on instagram
"There is a big problem in this industry, that is, the talent and efforts of artists should fall behind popularity and numbers."



Number  257
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He spent a great deal of 2017 doing what many perceived as "acting out" to get back at Kourtney for moving on with her life.”
“"Scott knows it’s going to get straight back to Kourtney and mess with her head."”
“"Scott and Sofia are inseparable and seem happy."”
“But looking after the kids hasn't thrown a wet blanket over their romance.”
“"Scott's kids have stayed busy with lots of swimming and playing in the water."”
“Mason, Penelope, and Reign are all having a blast, too.”
“And we're not just talking about Scott and Sofia.”
“"They've been spending their days by the pool relaxing and enjoying the warm weather."”
“It sounds like they've all been soaking up the sun and generally enjoying the lifestyle of the idle rich.”
“And to L.A. folks, weather in the 60s is "cold."”


"In 2017, he spent a lot of time doing what many people think is" acting "in order to go back to Courtney and continue her life."
"Scott knew it would go straight back to Courtney and make her head a mess."
"Scott and Sophia are inseparable. They look very happy."
"But taking care of children doesn't pour a layer of cold water on their love."
"Scott's children have been busy swimming and playing in the water."
"Mason, Penelope and raven had a good time, too."
"We're not just talking about Scott and Sophia."
"They relax by the pool every day and enjoy the warm weather."
"It sounds like they're all basking in the sun and generally enjoying the lifestyle of the idle rich."
For Los Angeles people, the weather in the 1960s was "cold"



Number  258
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is big and tall and handsome.’”
“Advertisement‘He was an additive for me to go out with.”
“On Andy Cohen’s 50th birthday, his best pal John Mayer made sure to post his best wishes before the party tonight!”
“The rocker posted a pic of the two in an elevator, captioning it: ‘Happy 50th Birthday @bravoandy!”
“It’s been about 30 minutes since I started writing this caption.”
“Congratulations, I have no words.”
“You have done it.”
“Can’t find ‘em right now.”
“They are all scattered in a flurry of love and memories OH HERE THEY COME.’Mayer went on: ‘In conclusion, I love you, and you are such a special person that I am sure you are known throughout the universe.”
“See you tonight.’ Aw…such cute bromance!”


"He's tall and handsome."
"He's an additive to my dating."
"On Andy Cohen's 50th birthday, his best friend John Mayer must send his best wishes before tonight's party!"
"The horn shaker posted a picture of them in the elevator, which said:" happy 50th birthday @ bravoandy! "
"I've been writing this title for 30 minutes."
"Congratulations, I have nothing to say."
"You did it."
"I can't find it now."
"They are all scattered in the chaos of love and memory. Oh, here they are." Mayer went on: "in short, I love you. You are such a special person that I believe you are well known throughout the universe."
"See you tonight." Ah What a lovely Browns



Number  259
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Is There a Pre-Show?”
““iHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so to get to be part of this celebration is a huge honor,” the deejay previously told iHeartRadio.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will broadcast live from the Forum in Los Angeles on Sunday, March 11th at 8 p.m.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTVEverything You Need to Know About the 2018 iHeartRadio Music AwardsGet ready to pop off your couch and dance the night away right from your living room!”
“The iHeartRadio Music Awards celebrates the most popular artists and biggest hits over the past year as determined by listeners tuning into iHeartMedia radio stations nationwide and on iHeartRadio, iHeartMedia’s digital music platform.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTV.”
“Here’s everything you need to know.”


"Is there a preview?"
"IHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so it's a great honor to be able to participate in this celebration," the host told iHeartRadio earlier
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will be broadcast live on the forum in Los Angeles at 8pm on Sunday, March 11."
"About TBS, TNT and truTV, everything you need to know about the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards, please be ready to jump off the sofa and dance in the night away from the living room!"
"The iHeartRadio music award is to celebrate the most popular artists and songs of the past year, which is decided by the audience listening to iheartmedia National Radio and iHeartRadio, iheartmedia's digital music platform."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Et on TBS, TNT and truTV."
"That's all you need to know."



**Something goes wrong**
“And now the diva may be slipping that rock back on because according to People, they are very much back together.”
“I am so excited to be here 'cause Nicole has been dreaming about this moment forever, so hopefully we find the one'So many choices: There were even wedding dresses with pink in themBut the 41-year-old action star wouldn't take it, a source told UsWeekly.”
“Forced smile: The curvy wonder also said, 'And like for me, there's just something that's not feeling right'That is when she remarks that she doesn't feel 'excited.'”
“Break out the champagne!"'”
“Not feeling it: 'I thought you're supposed to be excited for this,' said the bombshellGlass half empty: She added, 'Like when you watch the movies or all I'll hear from my friends is like, "Oh my gosh, greatest day!”
“The first dress looks spectacular on Nikki showing off her impressive curves, but she doesn't have that pre-wedding glow.”
“I am so excited to be here 'cause Nicole has been dreaming about this moment forever, so hopefully we find the one.'”
“Brie begins, 'Finally, my sister is trying on wedding dresses!”
“Even the veils are intricate and eye-catching.”
“The dresses are showstoppers with intricate lace and rhinestones and full skirts.”


"And now the heroine may have put that stone back, because, according to people, they've got a good bond."
A source told us weekly: "I'm very happy to be here, because Nicole has been dreaming of this moment, so I hope we can find a" so many choices: even a pink wedding dress, but the 41 year old action star won't accept it. "
"Forced smile: curve wizard also said," just like me, there's something wrong with it. "That's when she said she didn't feel" excited. "
"Open the champagne!"
"I didn't feel: 'I thought you should be excited about it,'" said the half empty glass bottle, adding: 'it's like when you're watching a movie, or what I hear from a friend, it's all,' oh my God, the best day
"The first dress looks spectacular on Nikki, showing her impressive curves, but she doesn't have that premarital shine."
"I'm very happy to be here, because Nicole has been dreaming about this moment, so I hope we can find that one."
"Bree began to say," at last, my sister is trying on her wedding dress! "
"Even the veil is complicated and eye-catching."
"These skirts are decorated with complex lace and Rhinestone, and they are very full."



**Something goes wrong**
“He didn’t just say to love the cute and cuddly animals – he tried to get people to understand and respect the animals like crocodiles and snakes and really break down those barriers,” she shared.”
“Early last year, Robert stopped by The Tonight Show to talk about his famous “Crocodile Hunter” dad, who passed away over a decade ago, and share his own experiences in growing up surrounded by animals.”
“The 14-year-old son of the late Steve Irwin revealed Thursday that he is recovering after going under the knife on New Year’s Day to have his appendix removed.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kicking off the new year with emergency surgery,” he captioned a smiling photo of himself laying in a hospital bed while giving two thumbs up.”
““I’m recovering well and feeling so much better without my pesky appendix!”
“” he added.”
“Robert’s mother, Terri Irwin, shared the same image on Twitter, and thanked the team of medical professionals who cared for her son.”
““The team at McKenzie-Willamette Hospital did a fantastic job removing Robert’s pesky appendix on New Year’s Day.”
“#NationalThankYouDay,” she wrote.”


"He's not just talking about loving cute animals, he's trying to get people to understand and respect animals like crocodiles and snakes, and really break these barriers," she said
"Early last year, Robert talked about his famous father, crocodile hunter, on the tonight show. He died more than ten years ago and shared his experience of growing up surrounded by animals."
"The 14-year-old son of the late Steve Owen revealed on Thursday that he was recovering from a surgical appendectomy on New Year's day."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The new year begins with emergency surgery," he wrote on a photo of a smiling face with two thumbs up as he lay on his bed
"I'm recovering very well. I feel much better without my pesky appendix!"
"He added
Robert's mother, Terri Irwin, tweeted the same picture and thanks the team of medical experts who took care of her son
"The team at McKenzie Willamette hospital had a great operation on New Year's day to remove Robert's pesky appendix."
"National Thanksgiving," she wrote



**Something goes wrong**
“Sza, Chrissy Teigen, Cardi B and More Celebrities on the Red Carpet at the Grammy AwardsKendrick Lamar Opens the 2018 Grammys in Nike Cortez SneakersRihanna Wears Red Gown and Matching $900 Rhinestone Heels for a Festive Look...”
“Want more?”
“CREDIT: SplashClick through to see all the celebrities who hit the 2018 Grammys after-parties.”
“The Grammy winner’s rumored boyfriend, Hassan Jameel.”
“CREDIT: SplashMeanwhile, Jameel was dressed in casual attire for the evening, wearing a gray T-shirt under a black hoodie with navy trousers and white laceless sneakers.”
“Rihanna in New York.”
“A miniature tan bag, bold purple eye shadow and a golden choker that matched her shoes pulled her look together.”
“CREDIT: SplashWatch on FNThe “Anti” singer also wore an oversized black coat and eye-catching suede black mule sandals bearing a metallic leather multistrand band and a skinny black strap across the toes, courtesy of Aquazzura.”
“Rihanna leaving the Grammys after-party.”
“...black semisheer printed skirt featuring metallic accents...”


"On the red carpet of the Grammy Awards ceremony, Sasha, Chris tegan, Katie B and more celebrities wear Nike Cortez sneakers to kick off the 2018 Grammy Awards ceremony. Rihanna wears a red robe and $900 Rhinestone high heels to show her holiday style..."
"Want more?"
"Image source: click Browse to see all the celebrities who have won the 2018 Grammy Awards after the party."
"The rumored boyfriend of the Grammy winner, Hassan Jamil."
Credit: at the same time, Jamie wore casual wear at night, a gray T-shirt, a Black Hoodie, Navy Pants and white shoeless sneakers
"Rihanna is in New York."
"A tiny brown bag, eye-catching purple eye shadow and a gold necklace matching shoes make her look very harmonious."
Credit: the "anti" singer on splash watch is also wearing an oversized black coat and striking suede black mule sandals with a metal leather multi strand strap and a thin black strap on the toe, provided by aquazzura
"Rihanna left Grammy after the party."
“… Black translucent print skirt with metallic elements... "



Number  263
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“During her guest appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...on Tuesday, the Australian model revealed a hilarious story about how her 7-year-old son, Flynn, asked her if she was having a baby the day after she tied the knot to Evan Spiegel last May.”
“"Evan and I had been together for a while and he was like, 'When are we going to have another baby brother or sister?'"”
“Kerr recalled of a conversation she had with Flynn, whom she shares with her ex-husband, Orlando Bloom.”
“"And we were like, 'Look, we've got to get married first.'"”
“"So, the day after the wedding," she continued, "he comes running in and he's like, 'Mommy, is it in there?'”
“I was like, 'Honey, give it a minute.'"”
“Luckily, Flynn's dreams of being a big brother have come true, as Kerr is currently pregnant.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"While she's guest at the scene of Jimmy Kimmel!"
“…… On Tuesday, the Australian model revealed a funny story when her 7-year-old son Flynn asked Evan spear if she had children the day after he married him in May last year
"Evan and I have been together for a while, and he thinks," when are we going to have another brother and sister? "
Cole recalled a conversation with Flynn, who was with her ex husband, Orlando Bloom
"We said," listen, we have to get married first. "
"Well, the day after the wedding," she continued, "he ran in and said," Mom, is it in there? "
"I said," honey, wait a minute. "
"Fortunately, Flynn's dream of being big brother has come true because Cole is pregnant now."



Number  264
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The last-night talk show host appeared on the show with a cast on his hand, explaining that he suffered the severe finger injury in a fall.”
“Strahan’s injury recalls a similar one suffered by “Tonight Show” host Jimmy Fallon back in 2015.”
“'”“There’s going to be a lot of jokes for a while, but I’m OK and glad to be back,” he said.”
““A guy before just said, ‘Michael, we pinky swear.”
“Also Read: Julian Edelman, Von Miller, Michael Strahan Set to Appear at Nickelodeon 'Kids' Choice Sports' Awards“I didn’t realize how much of a joke I was going to be around here today,” he said.”
““I had a little accident, lost a little bit of my pinky,” he said, waving his bandaged finger in the air.”
“The former NFL player did not fully explain the injury beyond describing it as an “accident.”
“Michael Strahan returned to “Good Morning America” on Wednesday wearing a bandage on his hand, explaining that he had missed Tuesday’s show because of a hand injury that cost him part of his pinky finger.”


"Last night's talk show host appeared on the show with a cast on his hand. He explained that he fell and his finger was seriously injured."
"Strahan's injury is reminiscent of the similar experience of 2015 tonight show host Jimmy Fallon."
"There will be a lot of jokes for a while, but I'm fine and happy to be back," he said
"Someone used to say," Michael, we swear by little finger. "
"I also read that Julian Edelman, von Miller and Michael Strahan will appear in the children's choice Sports Award of nicoloden." "I don't know how many jokes I'm going to make here today," he said
"I had a little accident and lost a little bit of my little finger," he said, waving his bandaged fingers in the air
The former NFL player did not fully explain the cause of the injury except for describing it as an "accident."
Michael Strahan returned to "Good Morning America" on Wednesday with a bandage on his hand, explaining that he missed Tuesday's performance because of a hand injury and the loss of part of his pinkie



**Something goes wrong**
“Brown, Combs, Midland, Michaels, Pardi, Pearce and Wallen will make their debut on the CMA Fest special.”
“Special guest collaborations will include Lauren Alaina with Brown; Julia Michaels with Urban; Morgan Wallen with Florida Georgia Line; and Dwight Yoakam with Bentley.”
“Keith Urban and Brett Young...”
“The three hour broadcast will feature performances by Jason Aldean Ballerini Dierks Bentley Brothers Osborne Kane Brown Bryan Luke Combs Dan Shay Brett Eldredge Florida Georgia Line Sam Hunt Dustin Lynch Midland Old Dominion Jake Owen Jon Pardi Carly Pearce Rhett Darius Rucker Blake Shelton Chris Stapleton Cole Swindell Underwood...”
“Additionally, Kelsea Ballerini and Thomas Rhett will host the 2018 CMA Fest concert special on Aug. 8 on ABC.”
“The nominations will broadcast live on ABC’s Good Morning America.”
“Luke Bryan, Dan + Shay and Sugarland will help reveal the final nominees live from Bryan’s 32 Bridge Food + Drink restaurant and bar on Nashville’s Lower Broadway on Aug. 28.”
“This marks the dynamic duo’s 11th time to host the event.”
“Carrie Underwood and Brad Paisley will co-host the 52nd annual CMA Awards live from Nashville’s Bridgestone Arena on Nov. 14.”


"Brown, combs, Midland, Michael, paddy, pierce and Warren will make their debut at the CMA special event."
"Special guest collaborations will include Lauren Alena and brown, Julia Michaels and urban, Morgan Warren and the Florida Georgia line, Dwight jokham and Bentley."
"Keith Urban and Brett young..."
"Three hours on the air will be Jason aldian Ballerini Dirks Bentley brothers Osborne Kane Brown Blaine Luke combs Dan Shay Brett eldrich, Sam hunt Dustin lynchmidland, Georgia, Florida, Jack Owen Jon paddy Carly pierce reed Darius rook ·Blake Sheldon Chris Stapleton Cole swindler Underwood's performance... "
"In addition, Kelsey Ballerini and Thomas Reid will hold a special concert at the 2018 CMA Festival on ABC on August 8."
"The nomination will be broadcast live on ABC's Good Morning America."
"Luke Bryan, Dan Shea and Scotland will unveil the final nominations on August 28 at Bryan 32 Bridge Restaurant and bar in Nashville off Broadway."
"This marks the 11th time that this dynamic pair has held this event."
"Carrie Underwood and Brad Paisley will co host the 52nd Annual CMA awards ceremony at Bridgestone stadium in Nashville on November 14."



Number  266
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His music was enjoyed by sisters Vanessa and Stella Hudgens.”
“Carter’s fiancé, Brody Jenner, was also in attendance as the party’s deejay.”
“Upon arrival, Mitchell posed for photos with her stylists, Marie-Lou and Chloe Bartoli.”
“...mansion s very own backyard lake...”
“The Pretty Little Liars actress made her way over to the VELOCITY BLACK x 1OAK Up Down Beach Club where partygoers attending the bash snacked on Catch LA sushi and desserts refueled with massages by Zeel and IV drips and even had the opportunity to jet ski in the mega...”
“Image zoom Credit: Jerod Harris/GettyBut that was just Mitchell’s first stop of the day.”
“Ferg and attendees including Shay Mitchell and Olivia Culpo...”
“The leading online retailer threw a House of Harlow 1960 x REVOLVE brunch hosted by the one and only Nicole Richie at hotelREVOLVE at the Arrive Hotel in Palm Springs followed by The Blonde Salad Pool Party hosted by blogger Chiara Ferragni with a special performance by rapper A AP”
“Friday, April 14Don’t put it past REVOLVE to keep the parties going into the weekend.”
“The singer then surprised guests at The Saguaro in Palm Springs for the vodka brand’s “Find Otherness” party.”


"Vanessa and the Stella Huggins sisters love his music."
"Carter's fiance Brody Jenner also attended the wedding as the host of the party."
Upon arrival, Mitchell and her stylists, Mary Lu and Chloe Bartoli, took a group photo
“… The backyard lake of the mansion... "
"This beautiful little cheater actress came to the velocity black x 1oak up down Beach Club, where the party participants ate catch La sushi and desserts, massaged with zeel and IV drops, and even had a chance to ski in Mega."
"Thanks to jerod Harris / Getty, but that was Mitchell's first stop of the day."
"FERG and attendees include Shay Mitchell and Olivia culpo..."
"The leading online retailer hosted a house of Harlow 1960 x revolve brunch at the arrize hotel in Palm Springs, hosted by the only Nicole Richie in hotel revolve, followed by a blonde salad pool party hosted by blogger Chiara ferragni, with a special performance by rapper a AP."
"On Friday, April 14, don't put it in the past. Let the party last until the weekend."
The singer then surprised guests at the vodka brand's "find something different" party in saguro, palm springs



Number  267
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...my jersey before it s embarrassing...”
“I just never want to blow it for the last six or seven MCU movies I have done by dropping the ball because I decided to go do it one more time he continued I just want to hang up...”
“I have to start over every time but I am starting over with a pretty solid base.”
“Everybody stop.’ But to me it’s always about people and opportunities, like the Russos [Avengers directors Anthony Russo and Joe Russo], who I adore.”“Everyone says to me it’s like a glove that fits so well.”
““I could have said when the first Avengers came out: ‘It’s never going to get any better than that.”
““It’s this cyclical thing,” Robert told News Corp Australia Network in an interview posted Sunday.”
“Fans have speculated that it could be his final film in the Marvel Cinematic Universe.”
“The actor made his debut as the Marvel superhero in the surprise monster hit Iron Man in 2008 and will reprise his role for the eighth time in the upcoming Avengers: Infinity War.”


“… My jersey before embarrassment... "
"I just don't want to lose the ball in the past six or seven MCU movies, because I decided to go again. He continued that I just want to hang up..."
"I have to start over every time, but I've got a solid foundation."
"Everyone stops." But for me, it's always about people and opportunities, like the Avengers directors I adore, Anthony Russo and Joe Russo. "Everyone said to me, it's like a glove, it fits perfectly."
"When the First Avenger came out, I could have said: 'there's nothing better.'
"It's a cyclical thing," Robert said in an interview with News Corp
"Fans speculate that this may be his last film in marvel."
"The actor starred in 2008 as the miracle superhero in the unexpected monster killer" Iron Man "and will play his role again for the eighth time in the upcoming" Avenger: Infinite War. "



Number  268
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ratings [ edit ]See also [ edit ]”
“1 Classical Crossover Album) were discontinued.”
“The Billboard Music Awards show had been held annually since 1990 and the event was formerly held in December[1] until it went dormant in 2006.”
“The awards returned in 2011 and are now held annually in May.”
“2 Awards process edit Unlike other awards such as the Grammy Award which determine nominations as a result of the highest votes received by the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences the Billboard Music Awards finalists are based on album and digital songs sales streaming radio airplay touring and...”
“...social engagement...”
“These measurements are tracked year-round by Billboard and its data partners, including Nielsen Music and Next Big Sound.”
“The 2018 awards are based on the reporting period of April 8, 2017 through March 31, 2018.”
“[3] Awards are given for the top album, artist and single in a number of different music genres.”
“Awards [ edit ][8] This field shows winners of "Artist of the Year" (awarded from 1995 to 2006), and "Top Artist" (awarded since 2011).”


"Rating [Edit] see also [Edit]"
"1 Classic Crossover Album) has been stopped."
"The Billboard Music Awards ceremony has been held once a year since 1990. The event was previously held in December [1] until it went to sleep in 2006."
"The 2011 awards are now held every May."
"The process editor of the two awards is different from other awards, such as the Grammy Awards. It decides that the result of nomination is the highest number of votes won by the National Academy of recording arts and Sciences. The final of Billboard Music Award is based on album and digital song sales, streaming radio shows, touring and..."
“… Social participation... "
"Billboard and its data partners, including Nielsen music and next big sound, track this data throughout the year."
"The awards for 2018 are based on the reporting period from April 8, 2017 to March 31, 2018."
[3] Top albums, artists and singles from different genres will be awarded
Awards [editor] [8] this column shows the winners of "artist of the year" (1995-2006) and "top artist" (2011)



Number  269
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Celebrating Take Our Sons and Daughter to Work Day, here are 11 pictures of the lucky celebrity offspring watching mom and dad in lavish action!”
“Because, for these famous parents, a Super Bowl halftime show and the finale of the UEFA Champions League is their version of work.”
“...to Disneyland...”
“On the other hand when mommy is a music goddess or a fashion guru or when daddy is a soccer superstar or the best quarterback in history visiting them at work suddenly becomes a thousand times better than a trip...”
“But when dad or mom works in a small cubicle of a boring office, it doesn’t matter how much you love them, there simply isn’t anything exciting about Take Your Kids To Work Day.”
“We’re sure they’re all hardworking people.”
“Listen—we have nothing against lawyers, accountants, and teachers.”


"To celebrate the day of taking our son and daughter to work, here are 11 pictures of lucky celebrity offspring looking at their parents' luxurious actions!"
"Because, for these famous parents, the Super Bowl midfield show and the Champions League final are their working versions."
“… To Disneyland... "
"On the other hand, when mom is a goddess of music or a fashion guru, when dad is a football superstar or the best quarterback in history, visiting them at work suddenly becomes thousands of times better than traveling..."
"But it doesn't matter how much you love your mom or dad when they work in a cubicle in a boring office. It's not exciting to take your kids to work every day."
"We're sure they're hardworking people."
"Listen, we have no objection to lawyers, accountants and teachers."



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow the AllAboutTRH Podcast on iTunes & Soundcloud – Remember to Rate, Comment & Subscribe!”
““I think my storyline speaks for itself, the fact that I’m one of the most Google’d people on the show and, one might say, one of the most relevant,” Kenya told E!”
“During an appearance on E!’s Daily Pop was asked about her recent tweet that alluded to one of her Real Housewives of Atlanta co-stars being fired.”
“Kim clarified that now infamous “Poof!”
“#LostYourPeach,” tweet, which was geared toward co-star Kenya Moore, who has been fighting firing rumors for months.”
“But for now, Kim’s keeping her lips sealed while still alluding that Kenya has lost her peach for good.”
“Sometimes saying nothing or very little speaks volumes.”
““I will get in so much trouble if I tell you.”
“Nope.”
“I cannot tell you!”


"Follow allaboutthh podcasts on iTunes and Soundcloud - remember ratings, reviews and subscriptions!"
"I think my story is self-evident. In fact, I'm one of the most Google searched people on the show, and one might say I'm one of the most relevant people," Kenya told e! "
"When it appears on e! Daily Pop was asked about her latest tweet, which implied that she was fired for CO starring a real housewife in Atlanta
Kim clarified that now the infamous "poof!"
"Lost your peach" is a tweet about co star Kenya Moore, who has been battling layoff rumors for months
"But for now, Kim is still silent, suggesting that Kenya has lost her peach forever."
"Sometimes saying nothing or saying very little explains the problem."
"If I tell you, I'll have a lot of trouble."
"No
"I can't tell you!"



Number  271
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Growing family: Kim and Kanye pictured with two-year-old daughter North West in April...”
“See more from Kim Kardashian as she and Kanye vow that Saint will not appear in KUWTK To our fans The reality star announced the baby s moniker via her subscription based website And a statement read Kim Kardashian West and Kanye West welcomed the arrival of their son this...”
“According to TMZ, the married couple have decided not to allow their second child to appear on reality show, Keeping Up With The Kardashians, for the foreseeable future.”
“North, two, was kept off the programme for the first year of her life and the family only allowed her to appear on 'special episodes' under tightly controlled conditions.”
“Scroll down for video Taking care He might be only three days old but Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have already decided to keep their baby son Saint out of the limelight for a while The site adds that the birth was not filmed for the show either as Kim...”
“35 and Kanye 38 wanted to keep things private...”
“Kim's baby arrived 20 days early and her website was soon updated as she told her followers the happy news.”
“'KANYE AND I WELCOME OUR BABY BOY!'”
“...said the posting and they also confirmed his weight; 8lbs 1oz.”
“...morning...”


"Growing family: in April this year, Kim Jong Il and Kanye took a picture with their two-year-old daughter in the Northwest..."
"See more from Kim kardashan West because she and Kanye vowed that the saints will not appear in our fans kutke reality show star announced through her subscription website and a statement that Kim kardashan West and Kanye West welcome their son to this..."
"According to TMZ, the married couple decided not to let their second child appear on reality TV in the foreseeable future to keep up with the kardashians."
"Two year old North was banned from the show in the first year of her life, and her family only allowed her to appear in" special episodes "under strict control."
"Scroll down the video and notice that he may be only three days old, but Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have decided to keep their youngest son, saint, out of sight for a period of time. The website adds that birth was not made for the show either, because Kim..."
"35 and Kanye 38 want to keep it a secret..."
"Kim's children arrived 20 days early, and her website was updated quickly because she told her followers the good news."
"Kanye and I welcome our little boy!"
“…… "They also confirmed his weight; 8 pounds, 1 ounce," the Post said
“… Good morning... "



Number  272
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“After the breakup, Harris called out the 27-year-old “Reputation” singer out for trying to “bury [him] like Katy.””
“I was just down to do it.”Harris split from Perry’s nemesis and “Swish Swish” muse, Swift, last summer.”
“Then he played me this one part for this new song called ‘Feels’ and I was like, ‘Oh yeah.’ This is like my favorite song off the record.”
““I came to the studio and he played me a bunch of unfinished but really solid moments for his new record.”
“It was time to put all that behind us,” she told “On Air with Ryan Seacrest” on Wednesday.”
“We’d had some public Twitter spats … Eight years or so had passed.”
““We’d had little falling outs here and there.”
““It’s fine, I’m used to you cancelling on me, it’s become ur staple!”Perry, who collaborated with Harris on the track “Feels” this year, is now willing to let bygones be bygones.”
“...to be perfectly fine for New Young Pony Club Yelle Robyn Marina The Diamonds to name a few Perry retorted...”
“...in on the fun and has CANCELLED last minute Harris responded Sorry to all who wanted to see me with Katy her team suddenly moved the goalposts and I was to appear on stage with no production The goalpost seems...”


After the break-up, Harris yelled at the 27 year old "fame" singer for trying to "bury (him) like Katie."
Harris broke up last summer from Perry's arch enemy and swish's Muse swift
"Then he gave me a role in the new song" feeling, "and I said," Oh, yes. " This is my favorite song
"I came to the studio and he played me a series of unfinished but very solid moments for his new record."
"It's time to forget about it," she said on Wednesday in a live broadcast with Ryan Seacrest
"We had a public fight on twitter About eight years have passed. "
"We hardly quarrel here or there."
"It doesn't matter. I'm used to you canceling me. It's your staple food!"! "Perry is working with Harris on the track this year to 'feel' and is willing to let bygones be bygones."
“…… It can't be better for the new club, yel Robin marina. Diamond is one of them. Perry retorts
“… In the fun and cancellation of the last minute, Harris responded to all who wanted to see Katie and me and her team suddenly move the goalposts and I appeared on the stage without producing the goalposts as if... "



Number  273
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hear more of his comments in the video below.”
“So, it's super special to her and special to be a part of it and see them grow with that in their eyes."”
“They're born into it, you know?”
“"It's so special to see her legacy sharing the stage with her, just to get that essence.”
“...he said, after helping the singer's twins onto the stage to join their mom during "Always Be My Baby."”
“"It's magical for her and the kids, you know?"”
“Earlier this month, ET spoke with Tanaka after Carey's show at the Hollywood Bowl about his special bond with the songstress and her family.”
“Meanwhile, the twins were "excited, having fun and really enjoying themselves" and Carey ordered a cheeseburger with no bun and sipped on a vodka soda.”
“They were really enjoying time with the twins."”
“Eyewitnesses tell ET that during their night out, Carey and Tanaka "stayed super close, giving each other a couple of hugs throughout the night but they weren't kissing or anything.”


"Hear more of his comments in the video below."
"So, it's very special for her to be a part of it, and it's special to see them grow up with that feeling in their eyes."
"They were born, you know?"
"It's very special to see her legacy perform with her in order to get that essence."
“… He said in helping the singer's twins get on the stage and join their mother in "always be my child."
"It's amazing for her and the kids, you know?"
Earlier this month, et interviewed Tanaka after Kelly's Hollywood Bowl performance and talked about his special relationship with the singer and her family
Meanwhile, the twins were "excited, had a good time, really enjoyed themselves." Kelly ordered a cheeseburger without bread and drank a vodka soda
"They really enjoy their time with twins."
Witnesses told et that when they went out at night, Kelly and Tanaka "kept a super close relationship, hugged each other all night, but they didn't kiss or anything."



Number  274
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Hospital Foundation BC Children s Hospital Foundation This isn t the first time Depp has dug out his Caption Jack costume and surprised fans...”
“Actor Johnny Depp dressed up as his popular alter ego from Pirates of the Caribbean before visiting BC Children’s Hospital.”
“WATCH: Johnny Depp Shows Up at Disneyland’s ‘Pirates of the Caribbean’ RideThe 54-year-old star kicked off his visit with an arrival tour from three former patients, Aidan Chin, Madison Kertcher and Logan Layand, and was later the guest of honor at a pirate party.”
“Depp then spent more than five hours hanging out with sick young kids and their families in the oncology, general pediatrics and neurology wards.”
““Meeting Captain Jack was a dream come true for my daughter,” Sarah Kertcher, mother of 7-year-old “First Mate” Madison said.”
““He never broke character once and was so generous with his time.”
“He was truly here for the kids and it brought tears to my eyes to see how special he made each one feel NEWS Johnny Depp Charlie Sheen and Kevin Dillon Have Platoon Reunion 30 Years Later BC Children s Hospital Foundation BC Children s Hospital Foundation BC Children s...”
“In April, a group of Disneyland visitors got the surprise of their lives when midway through the Pirates of the Caribbean ride, Depp appeared in character!”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Hospital Foundation BC Children's Hospital Foundation, this is not the first time Depp dug out his subtitle Jack's costume, which surprised the fans..."
"Actor Johnny Depp, before visiting BC Children's Hospital, dressed up as another of his popular selves in Pirates of the Caribbean."
"Watch: Johnny Depp appears in the Pirates of the Caribbean At Disneyland. The 54 year old star begins his visit with the arrival of three former patients, Aidan chin, Madison ketcher and Logan Leon, who later became a guest of honor at the Pirate Party."
Depp then spent more than five hours in oncology, general pediatrics and neurology wards with the sick child and his family
"It's a dream come true for my daughter to see Captain Jack," said Sarah ketcher, the mother of seven year old first mate Madison
"He hasn't broken his character once. He's generous with his time."
"He's really here for the children, and I can't help tears when I see how special news he made everyone feel. Johnny Depp Charlie Sheen and Kevin Dillon held a platoon leader party at the British Columbia Children's Hospital Foundation, British Columbia Children's Hospital Foundation, British Columbia Children's hospital 30 years later. "
"In April this year, a group of Disneyland tourists got a surprise in their life during the ride of Pirates of the Caribbean. Depp played the role!"
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



**Something goes wrong**
“Gal Gadot and Ezra Miller hits theaters Nov 17”
“It is not a question of if I should shave it is a question of how we can possibly be victorious against such a beast without bringing our own doom raining down upon us Justice League also staring Ben Affleck...”
““There has been no discussion over whether to shave or not to shave for the [‘Justice League’] reshoots, simply a relentless campaign to put an end to the seemingly inexorable conquest of this despotic ‘stache.”
“He facetiously clarified the actual reasoning in his post.”
“Paramount reportedly would not allow Cavill to shave his facial hair while production was taking place, so his mustache will have to be digitally removed from “Justice League” in post-production.”
“...projects...”
“Cavill grew a mustache for his character in Mission Impossible 6 which was supposed to finish shooting before Cavill needed to return as Superman in Justice League However Justice League re shoots have required him to simultaneously bounce between both...”
“Instagram...”
“Pictured above is not a set on MI6 but is in fact the latest in a series of weapons being designed by Warner Bros and Paramount Studios to combat the entity known as Henry Cavill s Moustache he joked on...”
“The dispute in question stemmed from Variety‘s report that tied extensive “Justice League” reshoots to his facial hair.”


"Gayle gadote and Ezra Miller on November 17"
"It's not a question of whether I should shave, it's a question of how we can defeat such a beast without bringing us our own bad luck. The justice alliance is also looking at Ben Affleck..."
"The comeback of [justice alliance] did not discuss whether to shave or not. It was just a merciless movement, aiming to end the seemingly merciless conquest of this autocratic" Stacy. "
"He jokingly clarified the actual reason in his post."
According to reports, paramount does not allow Carvel to shave his beard during the production process, so in post production, his beard must be digitally removed from justice alliance
“… Project
"Carver grew a beard for his character in impossible task 6. He should have finished shooting before he returned to Justice League as Superman, but justice league's re shooting requires him to jump between the two at the same time..."
“Instagram…”
"The picture above is not the scene of MI6, but it's actually the latest weapon in a series of weapons being designed by Warner Brothers and Paramount Studios. These weapons are used to deal with Henry Carville's beard, he joked..."
The controversy stems from a report in variety that linked a large number of photos of justice alliance to his facial hair



Number  276
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There are dragons,” joked EP Daniel Palladino, making a Game of Thrones reference.”
“Buzz has been that there’s an episode set in Paris, as well as one in the comedy stomping ground of the era, the Catskills.”
“Season 2 is “about opening Midge’s world up,” says Palladino.”
“...listening to her father s story about Greenwich Village and opening up for Johnny Mathis and Dinah Washington...”
“We can look back at 1959 and see that today women aren t wearing corsets anymore but the problems still exist The entire late 50s comedy era is Oz for Sherman Palladino having grown up in the San Fernando Valley...”
“I’m glad it’s a character that still resonates.”
“...taking trolls down...”
“You never set out to drive a political message through your show it just won t work said Sherman Palladino You gotta love the show love your characters it was an interesting fluke that Maisel came out when we were...”
“The media was quick to observe how the show about a newly-separated single woman who is vying to become a stand-up in a male-dominated late 1950s world, just rang so loudly with the times.”
“...of the MeToo movement...”


"There are dragons," jokes EP Daniel Palladino, who is playing a game of power
"There's a rumor that one episode is set in Paris, and another is set in a Catskill comedy."
Palladino said the second season was "about opening up the world of Mickey."
“…… Listen to her father tell the story of Greenwich Village, open up for Johnny Matisse and Dinah Washington... "
"We can look back to 1959 and see that today's women no longer wear corsets, but the problem still exists. The whole comedy era in the late 1950s was Sherman Palladino growing up in Oz in the San Fernando Valley..."
"I'm glad it's a character that still resonates."
“… Kill trolls... "
"You've never intended to send a political message in your show, and it doesn't work," Sherman Palladino said. "You have to love the show, love your character, Messier in us It's an interesting coincidence that they appear at the same time
"The media soon noticed how this drama about a newly separated single woman competing to be a one-man in a male dominated world in the late 1950's became loud with the development of the times."
“… "The beauty of the meto movement."



**Something goes wrong**
“Love will always win.”Watch Ellen’s speech in the clip above.”
““Good will always win.”
““The world is full of amazing people,” DeGeneres reassured her audience.”
“...the world from simple acts like a diner waitress serving breakfast on the house to two firefighters to a crowd of people lifting a burning car to rescue a man trapped underneath...”
“And that is what we have to focus on Also Read Jason Aldean on World After Las Vegas Massacre I m Afraid to Raise My Children To provide comfort for her viewers DeGeneres played a six minute montage of people who have appeared on her show who do good in...”
“I always say that there’s a lot more good in the world than there is bad, and I continue to believe that.”
““It’s very easy to lose hope, but we cannot do that.”
““I don’t know about you, but I feel sad, I feel anxious, I feel helpless,” said the daytime TV host.”
“On Tuesday’s episode of “The Ellen Show,” which was taped on Monday just hours after the deadly shooting in Las Vegas, Ellen DeGeneres asked her audience to not lose hope, and to remember that there is still goodness in the world.”


"Love always wins." Look at Alan's speech in the above clip
"The good always wins."
"The world is full of great people," said DeGeneres, comforting her audience
“… The world starts with simple acts, like a restaurant maid serving breakfast in the house, two firefighters in the crowd holding up a burning car to save a man trapped below... "
"That's what we need to pay attention to. I read Jason Alden's" the world after the Las Vegas massacre, I'm afraid to raise my children "to comfort her audience. DeGeneres spent six minutes on montage to bring up those who performed well in her program
"I always say that there are more good things than bad things in the world, and I still believe that."
"It's easy to lose hope, but we can't do it."
"I don't know about you, but I feel sad, I feel anxious, I feel helpless," the daytime TV host said
On the "Ellen show" recorded on Monday, hours after the shooting in Las Vegas, Ellen DeGeneres asked her audience not to lose hope and to remember that there is goodness in the world



Number  278
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Real Talk: Jada Pinkett Smith Remembers The Times She Had Suicidal Thoughts was originally published on globalgrind.comAlso On Praise 104.1:”
“Find out how Jada was able to overcome her struggles in the clip below starting at the 5:16 mark!”
““I was just sharing on my Instagram the other day of those times that I was in such deep despair that I’ve also thought about taking my life,” she said.”
“Jada brought some of her therapeutic flavor to Megyn Kelly Today where she even talked about her own struggles with mental & emotional health.”
“Jada — with the assistance of her mother Adrienne Banfield-Norris and daughter Willow — discusses everything from sex to friendship, to mental health.”
“The Facebook show leaves nothing off the table.”
“If you haven’t tuned into Jada Pinkett Smith‘s gem of a show Red Table Talk, you’re missing some powerful TV.”


Real conversation: Jada pinkert Smith remembers that the times first published her idea of suicide globalgrind.com Also "clause 104.1":
"From 5:16, find out how Jada overcame her struggle in the following clip!"
"I said on instagram the other day that I was desperate and wanted to commit suicide," she said
"Jada brought some therapeutic experience to Megan Kelly today, and she even talked about her struggle with mental and emotional health."
With the help of his mother Adrian Banfield Norris and daughter willo, Jada discussed everything from sex to friendship to mental health
"There's nothing left on Facebook."
"If you don't watch Jada pinkert Smith's talk at the red table, you're missing some powerful TV shows."



Number  279
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch Game of Thrones for FREE with a no-risk, 7-day free trial of Amazon Channel...”
“Obviously, we don’t want to do that so we’re very much stepping up everyone’s game which is very apparent, at least to me.”
“No one wants the show to trip as it approaches the finish line.”
“Anyway, with the show wrapping up in 2019, expectations are high.”
“Just kidding.”
“Stop it, Kit, you’re embarrassing yourself.”
“In my life it’s pretty significant thing that’s happened to me, and coming to the end of it is understandably quite emotional.”
“And I’ve never been in a situation, a show, that’s lasted this long.”
“I didn’t know at the beginning if this would be a show that no one would watch or if it would be a show that a lot of people would watch.”
“But, really, eight years of your life is a long time to connect with anything.”


"Watch the game of power for free, Amazon channel 7 days free trial, no risk..."
"Obviously, we don't want to do that, so we are strengthening everyone's game, which is very obvious, at least for me
"No one wants the show to trip near the finish line."
"Anyway, with the end of the show in 2019, expectations are high."
"Just kidding."
"Stop it, KITT, you're embarrassing yourself."
"In my life, this is a very important thing that happened to me, and its end is understandable and quite emotional."
"I've never been in such a situation, such a performance, lasting for such a long time."
"At first, I didn't know whether it was a show that nobody watched or a show that many people would watch."
"But, seriously, eight years of your life is a long time to touch anything."



Number  280
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Production on Season 4, which is expected to premiere this summer, had already wrapped ahead of the unanticipated hiatus.”
“He looks forward to returning.”The Last Ship, which has already been renewed through Season 5, is currently in the midst of shooting its fourth and fifth seasons back-to-back.”
““[Eric] suffers from depression,” the statement continues, “and has asked for a few weeks of downtime, and the producers kindly granted that request.”
“Memorial Day...”
“In a statement released to our sister site Variety a rep for the Last Ship lead Grey s Anatomy alum confirms that he requested a break to deal with personal issues forcing the show to hit pause on production through...”
“TNT’s The Last Ship has halted production as series lead Eric Dane battles depression.”


"The production of the fourth quarter is expected to premiere this summer, and it's over before the unexpected suspension."
"He's looking forward to coming back." The last ship has been in season five and is currently filming season four and five in a row
"The producers gladly agreed to [Eric] who suffered from depression and asked to stop work for a few weeks," the statement continued
Memorial Day
"In a statement to our sister website variety, a representative of anatomy alumni, starring gray in the last boat, confirmed that he asked for a break to deal with personal problems and forced the production of the play to suspend because..."
"TNT's last ship has been shut down because Eric Dan, the leader of the series, is fighting the great depression."



Number  281
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But at this point, about halfway to 2020, it appears late night is above all united by the shared pressure of being forced to turn one of the country’s most harrowing administrations into comedy—and as Colbert, Fallon, and O’Brien have proven, there’s strength in numbers.”
“Each late-night host has his or her own way of dealing with this administration, and as we’ve seen, some methods resonate more than others.”
“Stephen Colbert and Jimmy Fallon opened The Late Show and The Tonight Show using the same cold open, which also guest starred Conan O’Brien, whose own program on TBS is on hiatus this week.”
“The clip finds Colbert typing his monologue for the night when he receives a call from Fallon.”
““Hey, Lowlife,” Fallon says as Colbert answers.”
“The comedian’s response?”
“Hey Lost Soul They ve borrowed those nicknames from Donald Trump s speech in South Carolina Monday night where the president continued his anti late night tirade a feud he first ignited earlier this week when he slammed Fallon for saying that he regrets mussing Trump s hair on air...”
“...in 2016”
“In the clip, Colbert and Fallon chat about the president’s comments before calling O’Brien to join the party.”
“(Since he’s on hiatus, the bit depicts the Conan host in the middle of shaving his beard and chest.)”


"But at this point, by about half of 2020, it seems that the most important thing is common pressure, forced to turn one of the country's most painful governments into a comedy, as Colbert, Fallon and O'Brien have proven, powerful figures."
"Every late night host has his own way of dealing with this administration, and as we have seen, some resonate more than others."
"Stephen Colbert and Jimmy Fallon started the evening show and tonight show with the same cold start. Conan O'Brien is also a guest star, and his own TBS program is suspended this week."
"This video shows that Colbert is making his monologue that night when he receives a call from Fallon."
"Hey, despicable man," Fallon said when Colbert answered
"The comedian's reaction?"
"Hey, lost souls, they borrowed Donald Trump's nickname from his speech in South Carolina on Monday night, and the president continued his anti late night long speech, which was his attack on Fallon earlier this week that he regretted having messed up Trump's hair..."
"2016"
"In this video, Colbert and Fallon talk about the president before calling O'Brien to join the party."
(as Conan is resting, this paragraph describes Conan's master shaving and chest.)



Number  282
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Or Michelle Obama -- those two would be awesome.””
“The Jordyn Woods lip kit comes in a cool red shade, and Woods says watching it come to life has been a thrill.”
““People always ask, ‘What does she do besides be someone’s best friend?’ And I do a lot,” Woods told Moneyish.”
““I’m working; I started my own business.”
“I think eventually, people will start to see that whole title kind of switch over.”The Gen Zers reportedly met as pre-teens at a mutual friend’s party where they exchanged numbers; they’ve remained inseparable ever since.”
“Their friendship led to Woods, a 20-year-old Los Angeles, Calif., native, appearing on “Keeping Up with the Kardashians” and its spinoff reality show “Life of Kylie” alongside her bestie Jenner.”
“In recent years, Woods has gained her own stardom as a plus-size model signed with Wilhelmina International’s Curve division, propelling her to influencer status with more than 5 million Instagram followers.”
“It’s all proof that she can hold her own as a household name -- but it’s not fame that she’s after.”
““I don’t really care to be known,” she said while promoting St. Ives beauty products at an event in New York City.”
““I just want to be successful and happy.”Jordyn Woods at the St. Ives Mixing Bar in Flatiron creating custom scrubs and lotions in New York City.”


"Or Michelle Obama - those two will be great."
"Jordyn Woods' Lip Gloss Set has a cool red shadow, and woods says it's exciting to see it resurrect."
"People always ask, what does she do besides being someone else's best friend? "I did a lot," Woods told monish
"I'm working. I started my own business."
"I think eventually, people will start to see the whole title change." According to reports, the zess generation met in their teens at a party of mutual friends, where they exchanged numbers; since then, they have been inseparable
Their friendship made woods, a 20-year-old from Los Angeles, California, appear on "keep up with Kardashian" and its spin off reality show "Kelly's life" with her good friend Jenna
"In recent years, woods has become famous by signing a contract with the curve Department of Wilhelmina international. With more than 5 million instagram fans, woods has promoted her to become an influential model."
"It all proves that she can be a household name - but she's not after fame."
"I really don't want to be known," she said at an event in New York City promoting St. Ives beauty products
"I just want to be successful and happy." Jordan Woods created custom made scrub and emulsion in St Ives's Flatiron mixed bar in New York.



**Something goes wrong**
“Madonna went on Virgin Tour with Beatle Boys performing as an opening act.”
“Madonna appeared in movies in 1985 with appearing as a singer in Vision Quest which was a romantic drama and she had her 2 soundtracks in that movie.”
“Madonna also took the ballet lessons and convinced her father to allow her to take these lessons.”
“When Madonna finished her graduation she got a scholarship at University School of Michigan of Music, Theatre, and Dance.”
“She went to Rochester Adams High School where she was a star student and also a member of the cheerleading squad.”
“She did not like her father for marrying another woman and always rebelled him for this very reason.”
“In 1966, her father married the family housekeeper Joan Gustafson with whom he had 2 children named Jennifer and Mario.”
“She was not able to grasp the fact that her mother is gone now.”
“Her mother died at the age of 30 of breast cancer and she noticed that she was having some changes in her behavior and life.”
“Madonna used to reside in the Detroit suburbs of Pontiac.”


"Madonna and the Beatles boys are on their maiden tour as an opening performance."
"Madonna appeared in 1985 as a singer in the romantic drama visual exploration, in which she had two soundtracks."
"Madonna also took ballet lessons and convinced her father to allow her to take them."
Madonna graduated with a scholarship to the University of Michigan School of music, drama and dance
"She went to Adams High School in Rochester, where she was a star student and a cheerleader."
"She didn't like her father marrying another woman, so she always betrayed him."
In 1966, her father married Joan Gustafson, the housekeeper, and had two children named Jennifer and Mario
"She can't understand the fact that her mother is not here now."
"Her mother died of breast cancer when she was 30, and she noticed that her behavior and life were changing."
"Madonna used to live in a suburb of Detroit in Pontiac."



Number  284
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Comedian Kevin Hart will headline the player introductions, with Pharrell Williams’ N.E.R.D set to perform during the game’s halftime show.”
“For the real NBA pros’ big game on Sunday night, Fergie will sing the U.S. national anthem, while rock band Barenaked Ladies will perform the Canadian national anthem.”
“Image zoom Justin Bieber | Credit: Shareif Ziyadat/GettyImage zoom Justin Bieber | Credit: Splash NewsRELATED: WATCH: Kanye West, Lamar Odom and More Stars Came Out for Kobe Bryant’s Final NBA Game!”
“The 23-year-old was previously named MVP of the Celebrity All-Star basketball game during NBA All-Star weekend in 2011 for scoring eight points on 3-of-11 shooting, grabbing a pair of rebounds and dishing out four assists.”
“While Bieber knows how to serenade behind the mic, he also knows how to slay on the court.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Bieber will be throwing on a jersey for the 67th Annual NBA Celebrity All-Star Game taking place on Friday, Feb. 16 at the Los Angeles Convention Center.”
“The “Sorry” singer will be dunking for Team Lakers going up against Team Clippers, the NBA confirmed in a statement Thursday.”
“The "Sorry" singer was previously named MVP in 2011Justin Bieber is trading center stage for center court.”


"Comedian Kevin Hart will make the headlines for the player introduction, and Farrell Williams' n.e.r.d. will perform at halftime."
"For the real NBA Pro on Sunday night, Ferguson will sing the U.S. National Anthem and the rock band naked girls will sing the Canadian National Anthem."
"Picture zoom Justin Bieber | credit: Sharif ziyadat / gettyimage zoom Justin Bieber | credit: splash ne wsRELATED:WATCH Kanye West, Lamar Odom and more stars in Kobe Bryant's last NBA game
"The 23-year-old was previously named the MVP of the 2011 NBA all star weekend celebrity all star basketball game. He scored 8 points on 3 of 11 shots, grabbed a pair of rebounds and sent out four assists."
"Although Bieber knows how to serenade behind a microphone, he also knows how to kill on the court."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Bieber will put on his shirt at the 67th NBA all star game at the Los Angeles Convention Center on Friday, February 16
The NBA confirmed in a statement on Thursday that the "sorry" singer will dunk for the game between the Lakers and the Clippers
The "sorry" singer was named MVP in 2011, and Justin Bieber is on the stage at the Trade Center Stadium



Number  285
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Enjoy a cringe-less shopping experience as we break down the best affordable basics at H&M according to seven different categories.”
“Starting at just $5, you can stock up on wardrobe necessities at the prices you love.”
“Ahead, we're bringing you one of our favorite places to shop for cheap basics—H&M.”
“There are certain pieces in your wardrobe that we would advise putting a little more of a long-term investment behind, but others don't carry the same weight, e.g., plain T-shirts, knitwear, leggings, and a few others.”
“Okay, so maybe no one likes spending money, but some people aren't necessarily frugal, and in case you are, well, do we have the shopping roundup for you.”


"We classify H & M's most affordable basic models into seven different categories, so that you can enjoy a relaxed and unrestrained shopping experience."
"From $5, you can stock up on wardrobe essentials at the price you like."
"Next, we will bring you one of our favorite shopping places - H & M."
"In your wardrobe, we suggest investing more long-term investment in some clothes, but the weight of other clothes is different, such as ordinary T-shirt, knitwear, tights, etc."
"Well, maybe no one likes to spend money, but some people are not necessarily frugal. If you are frugal, then do we have a shopping summary for you?"



Number  286
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Netflix Golden Globes After-Party at Waldorf Astoria Beverly Hills: Angelina Jolie and Jennifer Aniston Both AttendNetflixBrad Pitt's exes both attended this soiree.”
“The actor playfully danced with his kids and snapped PDA pics with Schmidt.”
“Kerry Washington, Emma Watson and Michelle Williams were also at their table, and all sang along with the actresses to Madonna.”
“The women of Big Little Lies, Reese Witherspoon, Laura Dern, Zoe Kravitz and Shailene Woodley, were seen toasting at a table together following the show's big win.”
“Pregnant supermodel Miranda Kerr even did a little jig while putting her baby bump on display.”
“Even before the A-listers stepped into the soiree, they were letting loose in the elevator.”
“InStyle and Warner Bros. Golden Globe Post-Party at Beverly Hilton Hotel: Major Star SightingsGetty ImagesA slew of stars hit up this party on Sunday night!”
“The two were seen kissing while waiting to get into the video booth, and Hyland even danced a little bit to Justin Bieber's "Sorry."”
“Also spotted at the bash was Modern Family star Sarah Hyland and her boyfriend, Wells Adams.”
“The 36-year-old socialite was seen showing off her new engagement ring that she was wearing over lace gloves.”


"After the Waldorf Astoria Beverly Hills party, the net flying golden ball: Angelina Jolie and Jennifer Aniston were present at the party."
"The actor jokingly danced with his children and took pictures with Schmidt."
Kelly Washington, Emma Watson and Michelle Williams were also at their table, and they all sang for Madonna with the actresses
"After the show's big win, people see Reese Witherspoon, Laura Dean, Zoe krawitz and Shawn Woodley, the big lying women, toasting at the table."
"Pregnant supermodel Miranda Kerr even made a little jump when showing off her little lump."
"Even before A-listers walked into the party, they relaxed in the elevator."
"Inter and Warner Bros. Golden Globe party at the Beverly Hilton Hotel: major star witness, Getty igsa and other stars attended the party on Sunday night!"
"They were seen kissing while waiting to enter the video booth, and Helan even danced a little in Justin Bieber's" I'm sorry. "
The party also saw modern family star Sarah Helan and her boyfriend wells Adams
"The 36 year old socialite was seen showing off her new engagement ring in lace gloves."



Number  287
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We'll be updating this gallery as more photos and product details emerge throughout the night.”
“Go ahead and click on through every look you won't want to miss—and be sure to check back.”
“Lastly, Exhibit C: This year's Met Gala 2017, which we're happy to report, lived up to the hype.”
“Exhibit B: Any of these top most memorable Met Gala beauty moments from red carpets past (Beyoncé in body glitter, enough said).”
“Exhibit A: Last year's red carpet, birthplace of Taylor Swift's platinum hair debut and punk alter ego.”
“And unlike traditional awards shows, the looks are anything but a snooze.”
“But for those of us as equally excitable about celebrity hair and makeup, today is the unofficial anniversary for major celebrity makeovers.”
“...the Metropolitan Museum of Art Gala—is such a big deal for the fashion-obsessed it's earned itself nicknames like "the East Coast Oscars" and "Fashion Prom."”
“The annual Costume Institute Benefit—a.k.a.”
“Few red carpets bring it like the Met Gala.”


"We will update this gallery as more photos and product details appear overnight."
"Go ahead, click on every shape you don't want to miss and make sure you look back."
"Finally, exhibit C: we are very happy to report that this year's Metropolitan party in 2017 has lived up to expectations."
"Exhibit B: one of the most unforgettable moments on the red carpet in the past (Beyonce shines, enough."
"Exhibit a: last year's red carpet, Taylor Swift's platinum haircut debut and the birthplace of punk transformation."
"And unlike traditional awards ceremonies, these shapes are by no means napping."
"But for those who are also excited about celebrity hairstyles and makeup, today is an informal anniversary of celebrity transformation."
“…… The Metropolitan Museum of art event is a big event for fashion fans. It has won the nicknames of "East Coast Oscar" and "fashion ball"
"The annual benefits of the clothing Institute - also known as the
"There are few red carpets that bring it like the metropolises."



Number  288
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“These are women who have not only influenced my personal career, but my life.”
“I am blown away by the other women in this category!”
“No!”
“So I texted Kenya and said, “Congratulations” and I meant to touch the cartwheel emoji, but I accidentally touched the broken heart, and I was like, “Oh, God!”
“It was actually really funny.”
“And then I called my best friends and Kenya [Barris, the show’s creator].”
“I called my parents and then I called my sisters and my brothers, there’s so many of us.”
“And so I started making phone calls to all my loved ones.”
“It was pretty quick.”
“I was like I think this is a good thing I think this is a good thing So how quickly did your mood change from serenity to excitement...”


"These women have influenced not only my career, but also my life."
"I'm fascinated by other women of this kind!"
"No!"
So I texted Kenya and said, "congratulations." I wanted to touch the expression of the cart, but I accidentally touched my broken heart and thought, "Oh, my God!"
"It's really interesting."
"Then I called my best friend and Kenya."
"I called my parents, and then my sisters and brothers, so many of us."
"So I started calling all my family."
"Pretty fast."
"I think it's a good thing. I think it's a good thing. How fast does your mood change from calm to excitement..."



**Something goes wrong**
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Mo'Nique Says She Was 'Blackballed' After Winning 'Precious' Oscar, Lee Daniels Responds This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“"I want to work with her again.”
“...he said.”
“"But I'm her friend and I love her and I want to work her, you know what I mean?"”
“VIDEO: Mo'Nique Says She Was 'Blackballed' After Winning 'Precious'That being said, he still has a lot of love for the 47-year-old The Parkers star, who won Best Supporting Actress for the 2009 drama.”
“You know, you were making demands.'"”
“And I said, 'You pissed a lot of people off.”
“"What I told her was, she asked me, 'Why haven't I worked?'”
“"Maybe she could construe it that way," Daniels told ET's Nischelle Turner at the Uptown Pre-Oscar Gala in Los Angeles on Thursday night.”


If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Mo'Nique said she was" blacklisted "after winning the" precious "Oscar, and Lee Daniels responded that the video was not available because we were unable to load the sponsor's information."
"I want to work with her again."
“…… He said
"But I'm her friend, I love her, I want to work for her, you know what I mean?"
"Video: Monique said she was" blacklisted "after winning" treasure. ". Nevertheless, he still has a deep affection for the 47 year old parks star, who won the best supporting actress award for his 2009 TV series
"You know, you're asking."
"I said," you've pissed off a lot of people. "
"What I said to her was that she asked me, 'why don't I work?'"
"Maybe she can explain that," Daniels told et's nischer Turner at the Oscars in Los Angeles on Thursday night



**Something goes wrong**
“Vicki started the confrontation by calling Kelly a “loud mouth.”Kelly fired back, “Big a** mouth.”
“Then came the bombshell of all bombshells!”
““Did you start the show knowing that your marriage was over,” Andy asked Gina, 34.”
“The next topic of conversation was new cast member Gina Kirschenheiter‘s mysterious divorce from husband and baby-daddy, Matt Kirschenheiter.”
“Vicki raised her hand, “Season 14!” she screamed.”
““Who thinks that Vicki and Steve are getting married?” asked Andy.”
“After a long discussion on the matter, the entire cast agreed that Steve was overbearing on Vicki, at which point the star herself revealed that couple’s therapy was looking necessary.”
“But they all voiced how they didn’t like how he controlled her party-girl behavior!”
“Tamra, 51, jumped in, telling the cast that she approved of Steve.”
““What was interesting was Steve trying to keep a lid on her behavior because Steve told her to behave,” said Shannon.”


Vicky called Kelly "big mouth" when she started the confrontation. Kelly hit back and said, "big mouth."
"And then the bomb of all the bombs!"
"Did you start acting when you knew your marriage was over?" Andy, 34, asked Gina
"The next topic is the mysterious divorce of the new actress Gina kirchhatt and her husband and baby father Matt kirchhatt."
"Wiki raises her hand," Season 14! "She screamed."
"Who thinks Wiki and Steve are going to get married?"? "Andy asked
"After a long discussion, all the actors agreed that Steve was too bossy to wiki. At this time, the star himself revealed that the treatment of the couple seemed necessary."
"But they all say they don't like how he controls the behavior of her party girl!"
Tamra, 51, jumped in and told the crew that she supported Steve
"It's interesting that Steve tried to cover up her behavior because Steve told her to behave," Shannon said



Number  291
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I didn’t want Shania Twain,” Zalaznick recalled.”
“But she wasn’t quite there yet when Isaak tried to convince his colleagues to place her in the same lineup as Franklin, Carey, Dion and Estefan.”
“The Origins Or On The First Day God Created Céline Heading into 1998 a VH1 executive by the name of Wayne Isaak who d spent more than a decade as a publicity guru at A M Records was courting Céline Dion for a big concert event that would appeal to...”
“1.”
“KMazur via Getty Images Gloria Estefan, Mariah Carey, Aretha Franlin, Carole King, Céline Dion and Shania Twain perform at "Divas Live" 20 years ago.”
“Or a little holy water.”
“Grab some popcorn.”
“...exaltations...”
“So ahead of the event s 20th anniversary I called up five producers who put together the first three Divas shows 2000 s was a Diana Ross tribute featuring Carey Hill Donna Summer Destiny s Child and RuPaul to see just how much gossip I could marshal about these glittery...”
“As almost any large-scale production can attest, putting at least half a dozen superstars on the same bill doesn’t happen without a few hitches ― and altercations ― along the way.”


"I don't want Shania Twain," zaraznik recalled
"But when Isaac tried to persuade his colleagues to put her in the same line-up as Franklin, Carey, Dion and Estefan, she didn't quite do it."
"Origin or God created C é line. On the first day of 1998, a VH1 executive named Wayne Isaak, who has been a master propagandist at am records for more than ten years, is courting C é line Dion for a big concert, which has attracted..."
“1.”
Twenty years ago, Gloria Estefan, Maria Kelly, Aretha Franklin, Carol king, Celine Dion and Shania Twain performed on divas live
"Or a little holy water."
"Have some popcorn."
“… Upgrade... "
"So before the 20th anniversary of the event, I gathered five producers, who presented the first three divas shows 2000 as a gift of Diana Ross, with Carey hill, Donna summer's children and rupaul as the protagonists, to see how much gossip I can make up for these shining stars..."
"Almost any big movie can prove that it is impossible to have at least six stars on the same list without a few episodes and quarrels along the way."



Number  292
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...in countless attempts to nail the killer behind one of America s longest and most baffling true crime whodunits...”
“Now that we ve supposedly been given all the information we ll probably get here s a review of the alleged perps ranging from her own parents to a child pornographer on the lamb in Thailand who have come up...”
“As it stands, the list of people linked to JonBenét's murder is as winding as the spiral stairs that led to her corpse in the basement.”
“But aside from hype and bombast surrounding its 20-year anniversary, no one seemed to be able to offer much but more theories.”
“This fall, several television networks raced to reveal new information in what's become the ultimate cold case.”
“The family friend dressed as Santa who seemed a little too eager to visit his "special friend" on Christmas?”
“The emotionally disturbed older brother with a flashlight to the face?”
“Was it her mother in the basement with a paint brush for a garrote?”
“Over the years of relentless and sensationalized coverage that immortalized JonBenét in tawdry pageant photos, the search to find her killer has turned into a massive game of media Clue.”
“...her there for her family to find...”


“…… Countless attempts have been made to pin the murderer behind one of the longest and most puzzling real crimes in the United States, and these people... "
"Now that we've got all the information we can get, let's review the so-called criminals, from her own parents to a child pornography writer in Thailand, who all appeared..."
"At the moment, the list of people involved in the JonBenet murder is like a spiral staircase leading to the body in the basement."
"But apart from the hype and hype surrounding its 20th anniversary, no one seems to be able to offer more theories."
"This autumn, several TV networks competed to disclose new information, which has become the final cold case."
Family friends dressed as Santa Claus who seem a little too eager to visit his "special friends" at Christmas
"Is the brother in a bad mood facing his face with a flashlight?"
"Is it her mother who uses a paintbrush to make a throat in the basement?"
"Over the years, people have reported relentlessly and sensationally on Joe Bennett's immortal image in the gaudy beauty pageant photos, and the process of finding the killer has become a large-scale game of media clues."
“… She's there waiting for her family to find... "



**Something goes wrong**
“See all of Ashley's stunning photos from SI Swimsuit 2018:”
“Shop the fierce new looks here to ensure you're as hot as Ashley when you hit the beach this summer!”
“The nine-piece collection was inspired by the art deco style reminiscent of the 1920s and features a variety of go-to black swimsuits, ranging from gold beaded bikinis to cut out-out one pieces.”
“"I hope these images instill a fearless belief in everyone to be happy in their own skin and enjoy living in the moment, no matter who is watching."”
“"This campaign is different than any other I have worked on throughout my entire career," Ashley explained.”
“"I have nothing to hide when it comes to my body."”
“"Being authentic is beautiful," Ashley said in a statement.”
“...instead...”
“The body positivity advocate has grown accustomed to being followed by paparazzi as she travels the world for work and as the model and crew for Swimsuits For All found themselves surrounded by cameras during her latest campaign shoot they started floating the idea of using those all natural photos...”
“The "Power of Paparazzi" campaign features unedited and unretouched paparazzi photos of Ashley modeling her new suits in Miami.”


"See all the great photos of Ashley's 2018 Si swimsuit":
"Shop for fierce new looks here to make sure you're as hot as Ashley on the beach this summer!"
"The nine piece set is inspired by the art deco style reminiscent of the 1920s, and has launched a wide range of popular black swimsuits, from gold pearl bikini to tailored one-piece swimsuits."
"I hope these pictures can instill in everyone a fearless belief that they can feel happy on their own skin and enjoy living in the present, no matter who is watching."
"This campaign is different from any other campaign I've been running throughout my career," Ashley explained
"When it comes to my body, I have nothing to hide."
"Reality is beautiful," Ashley said in a statement
“…… On the contrary... "
"The body initiative advocate is used to being followed by paparazzi because she travels around the world to work, and when everyone's swimsuit models and staff find themselves surrounded by cameras in her recent campaign shoot, they start to come up with the idea of using all natural photos..."
"Paparazzi power" features unedited and unmodified paparazzi photos as Ashley models her new suit in Miami



Number  294
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Last Step to create Emily Ratajkowski’s glitter eyeTo get Ratajkowski’s glitter eye add a shimmering blush and nude lip, then you’re holiday party-ready!”
“STEP 3Apply a nude tone, darker than your complexion a base on the lid and into the crease.”
““You want to be as unexpected as possible,” style influencer Morgan Stewart suggested during the holiday edition of Happy Hour with Morgan Stewart.”
““You want to wear things that will surprise people.”If your wardrobe is relatively simple or classic, makeup is the best way to level up your ensemble without breaking the bank.”
“Case in point: Ratajkowski’s glitter eye brilliant makeup.”
“The best part: While her makeup is stunning, it’s easy to recreate.”
“And, don’t worry, the glitter won’t get all over the place by adding one simple hack.”
“STEP 1 to create Emily Ratajkowski’s glitter eyeAfter finishing your foundation and concealer, prep the eyes with an eyeshadow primer for long-lasting wear.”
“STEP 2To prevent glitter fallout from sticking to your makeup, apply a heavy coat of translucent powder under the eye.”
“STEP 4Apply a royal blue eyeshadow to the eyelid.”


"The last step is to create Emily Latajkovski's sparkling eyes, let Lata Jankowski's sparkling eyes add bright blush and naked lips, so you are ready for the holiday party!"
"The third step is to paint the eyelids and wrinkles with a naked color deeper than the skin color."
"You want to be as unexpected as possible," suggested fashion influencer Morgan Stewart in the Holiday Edition of "happy time with Morgan Stewart."
"You want to wear clothes that surprise people." If your wardrobe is relatively simple or classic, make-up is the best way to improve the overall level without breaking the shackles
"A good example: ratajkovsky's shining eye makeup."
"The best part: although her make-up is amazing, it's easy to reappear."
"And, don't worry, plus a simple hacker, the flash won't be everywhere."
"The first step is to create Emily Ratajkowski sparkling eyes after finishing your foundation and concealer, and keep your eyes in the eye shadow primer for long lasting wear."
"Second, in order to prevent the flash dust from sticking to your cosmetics, apply a thick translucent powder under your eyes."
The fourth step is to apply blue eye shadow on the eyelids.



**Something goes wrong**
“Larry Klein, Barry Adelman and Mark Bracco are producers.”
“Allen Shapiro and Mike Mahan are executive producers.”
“The 2017 American Music Awards is produced by dick clark productions.”
“The Chainsmokers, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, Ed Sheeran and The Weeknd tied with five nominations each, while Justin Bieber, Daddy Yankee and Luis Fonsi received four nominations each.”
“Bruno Mars leads with eight nominations, including Artist of the Year, Video of the Year and Favorite Male Artist – Pop/Rock.”
“Other previously announced performers include BTS, Alessia Cara & Zedd, Kelly Clarkson, Selena Gomez, Niall Horan, Imagine Dragons & Khalid, Demi Lovato, Pink and Portugal.”
“Christina Aguilera also will pay tribute to Whitney Houston and music from The Bodyguard with a performance in honor of the film’s 25th anniversary, which falls on the same week as the awards ceremony.”
““And I’m especially thrilled to host this year when my mother is receiving the American Music Award for Lifetime Achievement.”ABCAs previously announced, honoree Ross will take the stage for a rare performance at the AMAs.”
““I am thrilled to host this special night which honors some of the greatest musical talents in our industry,” said Ross.”
“ABC will air the ceremony live from LA’s Microsoft Theater this Sunday, November 19.”


"Larry Klein, Barry Adelman and mark Blake are producers."
"Alan Shapiro and Mike Mahan are executive producers."
"The 2017 American Music Awards were produced by Dick Clark."
"Smoker, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, ed Sheeran and weekend each received five nominations, while Justin Bieber, Yankee dad and Louis fonsey each received four."
Bruno Mars received eight nominations, including artist of the year, video of the year and pop / rock, the most popular male singer
"Other performers previously announced include BTS, Alessia Cara & Zedd, Kelly Clarkson, Selena Gomez, Niall Horan, imagine dragons & Khalid, Demi Lovato, pink and Portugal."
"Christina Aguilera will also perform in the same week as the awards ceremony to commemorate the 25th anniversary of the film, paying tribute to the music of Whitney Houston and bodyguards."
"This year, when my mother won the American music Lifetime Achievement Award, I was particularly excited." ABCAS had previously announced that winner Ross would be on stage for a rare performance on AMAS
"I'm very happy to host this special evening in recognition of some of our greatest musical talents," Rose said
ABC will broadcast the awards live at the Microsoft theater in Los Angeles on Sunday, November 19



**Something goes wrong**
“Miley Cyrus Says She and Demi Lovato Are 'Friends Forever' in Sweet PostRelated Gallery...”
“"I never intended for any of this to happen and I apologize to my fans who I care so deeply about."”
“The 25-year-old “Malibu” singer spent her Sunday tweeting some adorable throwback pics of herself, but things took a turn when she shared an old New York Post cover.”
“The image which featured a photo of her from a 2008 Vanity Fair photo shoot had the headline Miley s Shame TV s Hannah apologizes for near nude pic Cyrus tweeted the image writing I M NOT SORRY F K YOU 10yearsago The Annie Leibovitz image featured Cyrus bare back...”
“...exposed with her body wrapped in a satin sheet...”
“She was 15 when the photo was taken.”
“IM NOT SORRYFuck YOU — Miley Ray Cyrus (@MileyCyrus) April 29, 2018When the image originally came out in the Vanity Fair piece, the then-Disney star brushed it off, saying, “I mean I had a big blanket on.”
“And I thought, ‘This looks pretty and really natural.’ I think it’s really artsy.”Shortly after the image was released, Cyrus issued a statement, apologizing for posing in such a manner.”
““I took part in a photo shoot that was supposed to be 'artistic' and now, seeing the photographs and reading the story, I feel so embarrassed," she said at the time.”
“At the time Leibovitz also released a statement on the subject, saying, “I’m sorry that my portrait of Miley has been misinterpreted.”


"Miley Cyrus said that she and Demi Lovato were" forever friends "at the sweet post gallery
"I never thought that would happen. I apologize to my beloved fans."
The 25-year-old "Malibu" singer tweeted some lovely retro photos of herself on Sunday, but things changed when she shared an old cover of the New York Post
"The title of a 2008 Vanity Fair photo is Millie's shame. Hannah of TV station apologizes for the photo close to nude." Cyrus wrote on Twitter: I don't apologize for you. For 10 years, Anne Leibowitz's photo is Cyrus's naked back... "
“… Exposed, body wrapped in satin... "
"She was only 15 when she was photographed."
"I'm not sorry to fuck you - Millie ray Cyrus (@ Miley Cyrus) on April 29, 2018, when this picture first appeared on the vanity fair film, the Disney Stars at that time ignored it and said," I mean I'm wearing a big blanket. "
"I thought," it looks beautiful and natural. " I think it's really artistic. " Shortly after the photos were released, Cyrus issued a statement apologizing for the gesture
"I took part in a photography that was supposed to be" art, "she said at the time." now when I see the photos and read the stories, I feel very embarrassed. "
"At that time, Leibowitz also issued a statement on this, saying," I'm sorry that my portrait of Millie has been misinterpreted. "



Number  297
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:A Riverdale Costar Says Lili Reinhart and Cole Sprouse Have "Great Chemistry"”
“The teasing continues with the Riverdale cast's new Entertainment Weekly cover.”
“Are they dating?”
“Are they just gaslighting America?”
“If they are an item, does Reinhart approve of the ridiculous shirts Sprouse wears on the reg?”
“Do they hang out at Dylan Sprouse's meadery in Brooklyn and talk about fan theories?”
“These are the thoughts that run through my head on a daily basis.”
“The twosome, who play Betty and Jughead on the show, haven't confirmed or denied their relationship.”
“Sprouse said some vague nonsense about how the rumors he and Reinhart are dating are "very pleasing," but that's the only thing on record.”
“Everything else is just speculation.”


"Related story: Riverdale co stars Lily Reinhart and Cole spruce" have a good chemistry "
"The banter on the cover of Riverdale's new entertainment weekly continues."
"Are they Dating?"
"Are they just cheering for America?"
"If they are a project, does Reinhardt agree with the ridiculous shirt Strauss wears in registration?"
"Will they hang out at Dylan spruce's in Brooklyn and talk about fan theory?"
"These thoughts are in my head every day."
"The two people who play Betty and pig head in the play do not confirm or deny their relationship."
"Strauss said some vague nonsense about how" very pleasant "the rumors about his date with Reinhart were, but it was the only thing on record."
"Everything else is just speculation."



**Something goes wrong**
“Scroll through to see McNamara’s exclusive New York Comic Con diary for InStyle.”
“...about the show s upcoming second season...”
“We teamed up with McNamara for a behind the scenes look at her entire Comic Con experience from primping with her glam squad hairstylist Sami Knight and makeup artist Megan Lanoux to hitting the Hammerstein Ballroom stage for a panel with her Shadowhunters co stars during which they dished all...”
“But at New York Comic Con this weekend, the 20-year-old actress traded in the uniform of her badass human-angel hybrid character, Clary Fray, and was instead surrounded by fans decked out in fantastical getups of their own.”
“As the star of Freeform’s supernatural series Shadowhunters, Katherine McNamara is no stranger to wearing cool costumes.”


"Scroll through McNamara's New York comics conference diary for InStyle."
“… About the coming second season... "
"We worked with McNamara, from dressing with her Glam square hairstylist Sami knight and makeup artist Megan lanoux, to starring in her shadow hunters on the stage of the Hammerstein ballroom and attending a panel discussion, during which they brought everyone together
"But at this weekend's New York comics conference, the 20-year-old actress changed into the uniform of her half blood demon character Clary Frey, and instead, fans dressed around her in their own fancy clothes."
"As the star of the free form supernatural series shadow hunter, Catherine McNamara is no stranger to wearing cool clothes."



Number  299
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A rep for Antin told PEOPLE she had no additional comment.”
“No other members have confirmed or denied the accusations.”
“...a prostitution ring claiming that she was consistently exploited and forced to sleep with whoever they say during her time in the girl group...”
“Kaya Jones took to Twitter on Friday to accuse managers and executives of taking advantage of the music troupe she joined as a teenager in 2003.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““My truth.”
“I wasn’t in a girl group.”
“I was in a prostitution ring,” she wrote.”
““Oh & we happened to sing & be famous.”
“While everyone who owned us made the $”Image zoom Credit: Steve Granitz/WireImageThe singer, 33, continued, “How bad was it?”


"A representative of Antin told people that she had no other comments."
"No other members have confirmed or denied these charges."
“…… A prostitution Gang claimed that she had been exploited and forced to sleep with anyone during her stay in the women's League.... "
"Kaya Jones tweeted on Friday accusing managers and executives of using the band she joined as a teenager in 2003."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"My truth."
"I'm not in the girls group."
"I'm in a prostitution ring," she wrote
"Oh, we happen to be famous for singing."
"When all the people who own us make dollars," photo zooming credit: singer Steve granitz / Williams, 33, continues, "how bad is it?"



Number  300
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(2 p.m.-4 a.m. Wednesday, TLC)Chopped(3 p.m.-4 a.m. Wednesday, Food Network)M*A*S*H(4-8 p.m., TV Land)”
“Best 6 11 a m USA Network The Zoo 6 a m 1 p m Animal Planet Parks and Recreation 6 30 a m 3 30 p m E”
“While some networks like Freeform, AMC and TBS/TNT will be heavy on the holidays movie marathons, Santa will also deliver a boatload of other TV marathons this Christmas too!”
“Here's a list of all the TV marathons airing this Christmas Eve and Christmas Day (all times eastern).”
“Watch This Now Looking for your next binge?”
“TV Guide editors handpick the shows that are actually worth watching and deliver daily recommendations straight to your inbox.”
“By signing up, you agree to our Terms of Use and acknowledge the data practices in our Privacy Policy .”
“You may unsubscribe at any time.”
“Monday Dec 24 Charmed 3 10 a m TNT Doctor Who 3 a m midnight BBC America Homicide Hunter Lt Joe Kenda 3 a m midnight ID Fast N Loud 4 a m 4 a m Tuesday Discovery Say Yes to the Dress 4 a m noon TLC Chrisley Knows...”
“Expedition Unknown 7 a m 10 p m Travel Channel Impractical Jokers 7 30 a m 3 a m Tuesday TruTV Friends 8 a m 1 p m TBS Rocky film series 8 a m 3 a m Tuesday Paramount Ancient Aliens 8 a m 4 a m Tuesday History...”


(2:00 p.m. to 4:00 a.m. on Wednesday, TLC) chopped (3:00 p.m. to 4:00 a.m. on Wednesday, food network) m * a * s * H (4:00 p.m. to 8:00 a.m., TV station)
"Best 6:11 a.m. U.S. online zoo 6:00 a.m. 1:00 p.m. Animal Planet Park and entertainment 6:30 p.m. 3:30 p.m."
"Even though internet companies like freeform, AMC and TBS / TNT have done well in the holiday movie marathon, Santa Claus will also send a boat of other TV marathons this Christmas!"
"Here's a list of all the TV marathons on Christmas Eve and Christmas (all time in the East) this year."
"Now let's see this for your next carnival?"
"TV guide editors carefully select programs that are really worth watching and send daily recommendations directly to your in box."
"By registering, you agree to our terms of use and acknowledge the data practices in our privacy policy."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"December 24, Monday, charming 3.10m TNT doctor, 3:00 midnight, BBC America, homicide hunter, lieutenant, Joe Kenda, 3:00 midnight, ID card, fast, loud, 4:00 a.m., 4:00 a.m., Tuesday, discovery, say yes to clothes, 4:00 a.m., clarisley knows..."
"Explore the unknown 7 am 10 PM travel channel impractical clown 7 30 am 3 am Tuesday truTV friends 8 am 1 pm TBS rock series movie 8 am 3 am Tuesday paramount ancient alien 8 am 4 am Tuesday history..."



Number  301
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I believe in being open and trusting each other and respecting each other completely.”Congrats to the happy couple, and may they forever take each other’s breath away.”
““I’m in a happy relationship ― that’s all that matters … I believe in commitment.”
“I love taking care of people,” she said.”
““I absolutely want to have children, whether I have my own or adopt.”
“Speaking with Women’s Health in 2011, Kournikova revealed that while kids were part of her game plan, marriage wasn’t “important” in her eyes.”
“A post shared by Enrique Iglesias (@enriqueiglesias) on Dec 15, 2017 at 2:02pm PSTA post shared by  Anna Аня (@annakournikova) on Dec 15, 2017 at 1:38pm PSTThe couple did, however, share some posts from Miami over the last few days looking happy in the sun.”
“While Kournikova sported some serious bling on her ring finger in a snap from 2016, they’ve never confirmed that they are married.”
“The two have been together since 2001.”
“Despite making themselves mighty comfortable in that public bathroom for Iglesias’ “Escape” music video all those years ago, the pop star and former tennis pro are famously private and rarely appear in public together.”
“Representatives for Iglesias and Kournikova did not return HuffPost’s request for comment.”


"I believe in honesty, mutual trust and mutual respect." Congratulations to this happy couple and may they hold each other's breath forever
"I'm in a happy relationship - that's what matters I believe in commitment. "
"I like to take care of people," she said
"I absolutely want children, whether they're my own or adopted."
In an interview with women's health in 2011, Kournikova revealed that although children are part of her game plan, marriage is not "important" in her eyes
"An article shared by Enrique Iglesias (@ Enrique Iglesias) at 2:02 p.m. on December 15, 2017, and an article shared by Anna a я (@ annakournikova) at 1:38 p.m. on December 15, 2017. The couple did share some posts from Miami in the past few days and looked very happy in the sunshine."
"Although Kournikova put some serious jewelry on her ring finger for a moment in 2016, they never confirmed that they were married."
"The two have been together since 2001."
Although Iglesias' escape video made him comfortable in the public bathroom a few years ago, the pop star and former tennis pro are known for their privacy and rarely appear in public together
"Representatives of Iglesias and Kournikova did not respond to requests for comment from the hofpost post."



Number  302
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Us Weekly reports Portwood gave birth to little James in the early hours of Tuesday morning, and he weighed 7 pounds, 11 ounces.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Portwood and Glennon met while filming Marriage Boot Camp with her then-fiancé, Matt Baier, and their relationship hit a snag back in September when she discovered two of Glennon’s exes served him with restraining orders.”
“But by November, Portwood announced her pregnancy by writing a message in the sand.”
““I’m very excited for my future with Andrew and our little family we are starting together,” she wrote on Instagram.”
““When I first found out [about the pregnancy], I was a little scared,”she told Us Weekly.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
Portwood gave birth to James Jr. early Tuesday morning, weighing 7 pounds and 11 ounces, US Weekly reported
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Portwood and Glennon met when they were filming" marriage boot camp "with their then fiance, Matt Baier. Their relationship ran into obstacles in September when she found out that Glennon's two ex girlfriends had issued a restraining order to him."
But in November, porterwood wrote a letter on the beach announcing that she was pregnant
"I'm very excited about the future of Andrew and me and our little family, and we're going to start together," she wrote on instagram
"When I first found out [about pregnancy], I was a little scared," she told us



Number  303
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Have a look in our large gallery under.”
“Earlier than the present begins, nevertheless, we’ve to speak concerning the star-studded purple carpet and the trendy seems to be seen on our favourite stars.”
“As for who will obtain the NAACP “Entertainer of the Yr” award, you will simply have to observe tonight at 9 p.m. on TV ONE.”
“Widespread and Andra Day are anticipated to carry out whereas Danny Glover will obtain the “President’s Award” for his humanitarian efforts from the Pasadena Civic Auditorium.”
“Brown, Michael B. Jordan, Yara Shahidi, Issa Rae and lots of others serving as presenters.”
“The glamorous award present, hosted by Black-ish star Anthony Anderson, is predicted to be a star-studded affair with Sterling Okay.”
“When you did not already guess, we’re simply hours away from the annual occasion that celebrates the accomplishments of individuals of colour within the fields of tv, music, literature and movie.”


"Take a look at our big gallery."
"However, as early as now, we have talked about the purple carpet full of stars, and our favorite stars seem to have seen fashion."
As for who will win the NAACP's "artist of the year" award, you just need to watch it on TV at 9 o'clock tonight
"Extensive and Andra day is expected to take place, while Denny Glover will receive a" Presidential Award "for his humanitarian efforts from the public auditorium in Pasadena."
"Brown, Michael Jordan, Yala shahidi, Issa ray and many others are the hosts."
"The glamour awards, hosted by black star Anthony Anderson, is expected to be a star affair for sterling okay."
"Before you know it, we're only a few hours away from the annual celebration of the achievements of people of color in television, music, literature and film."



Number  304
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After a brief hiatus from acting, the former child star has signed on for the second season of Sick Note, a British comedy series that also stars Harry Potter’s Rupert Grint, Hot Fuzz’s Nick Frost and former Miami Vice star Don Johnson.”
“Lohan also shared more pictures from her recent trip to Turkey.”
“...s already shared behind the scenes looks at recent photo shoots including videos from a subway shoot with a male model...”
“...expect from the site saying they ll get access to personal diaries video updates exclusive personal photos breaking news fashion and beauty tutorials shopping guides behind the scenes content and much more FROM PEN Anna Chlumsky Reveals Why She Had to Pull Back from Show Business as a Teen She...”
“I am in a period of renewal and that s why I deleted all my posts from Instagram the 30 year old actress explained on her first post to the site while telling fans on Twitter to come see what I m really up to Lohan outlined what fans can...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“99 monthly subscription...”
“Much like Gwyneth Paltrow before her who has become a lifestyle guru through her high profile site the actress announced on her social media Tuesday that she is launching a new Preemium site aimed to give fans access to her life beauty secrets and lifestyle tips all for a 2”
“Lindsay Lohan Launches Lifestyle Site: 'I Am in a Period of Renewal'Lindsay Lohan is Goop-ing up her life.”
“The Next Goop?”


After a brief break in his acting career, the former child star has signed up for the second season of sick notes, a British comedy series starring Harry Potter's Rupert Grint, spice girls' Nick frost and former Miami Deputy Don Johnson
"Rohan also shared more photos of her recent trip to Turkey."
“… S has shared recent photos behind the scenes, including a video taken with a male model in the subway... "
“… Looking forward to saying from the website that they will get personal diary video updates, exclusive personal photos, breaking news, fashion and beauty tutorials, shopping guide behind the scenes content and more from pen Anna Chlumsky to reveal why she had to quit acting career as a teenager... "
"I'm in an update period, which is why I deleted all my posts from instagram, the 30-year-old actress explained in her first post to the website, and told fans on Twitter to see what I'm doing and Rohan outlined what fans can do..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"99 month subscription..."
"Like Gwyneth Paltrow before, she has become a lifestyle guru through her famous website. On Tuesday, the actress announced on social media that she will launch a new preemium website designed to give fans access to beauty tips and lifestyle skills in her life for $2. "
"Lindsay Lohan launched a lifestyle website:" I'm in the process of updating. "Lindsay Lohan is fooling her life."
"The next fool?"



Number  305
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Are you disappointed by the show’s untimely demise, or were you prepared for the worst?”
“Our Cable TV Renewal Scorecard has been updated with The Royals‘ cancellation.”
“...with no scripted programming currently on the air, though the cable net did hand a pilot order to the dramedy Juicy Stories in March.”
“Coupled with The Arrangement‘s cancellation in May, The Royals‘ axing leaves E!”
“More than 20 members of the show’s cast and crew, including Park, released a statement in November accusing Schwahn of misconduct.”
“Many fans suspected that The Royals wasn’t long for this world when creator/showrunner Mark Schwahn was investigated — and eventually fired — over allegations of sexual harassment.”
“Helena also kicked her latest boy toy out of her bed… but that’s nothing to celebrate.”
“...their baby, and Cyrus at last reuniting with Violet.”
“The Royals‘ fourth (and final) season ended with Robert marrying Willow, Eleanor and Jasper getting pre-engaged, Liam and Kathryn discussing the future of (gasp!)”
“The Royals also starred William Moseley as Prince Liam, Alexandra Park as Princess Eleanor, Max as Prince King Robert, Tom Austen as Jasper and Jake Maskall as Cyrus.”


"Are you disappointed at the premature death of the play, or are you prepared for the worst?"
"Our cable renewal scorecard is updated with the cancellation of the royal family."
“…… Although the cable network issued a trial order in March to "the story of the dramedeto juice", there is no script program yet
"Coupled with the cancellation of the May agreement, the Royal axing left e!"
"More than 20 cast members, including Park Geun hye, issued a statement in November accusing Schwann of misconduct."
"Many fans suspect that when creator / actor mark schwahn was investigated for sexual harassment charges and eventually dismissed, the royal family did not stay in the world long."
"Helena also kicked her latest boy toy out of bed But it's nothing to celebrate. "
"Their child, Cyrus, is finally reunited with violet."
"The fourth (and final) season of the royal family is over. Robert is married to willow. Eleanor and Jasper are engaged. Liam and Catherine discuss the future (gasp!)"
"The royal family also plays William Mosley as Prince Liam, Alexandra Parker as Princess Eleanor, Max as Prince Robert, Tom Austin as jasper, and Jack maskar as Cyrus."



Number  306
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of the divorce...”
“In the past two years Angelina has driven a wedge between Pitt and the kids from controlling their phone calls to telling the kids they don t need to see him and picking times he can see them when she knows he s working said a source with intimate knowledge...”
“.”
““Several things have happened that have caused [her] to say ‘I better .”
““I think Angelina thought, ‘I don’t like where this is going, let’s get tough,’ ” Walzer said of the actress’ decision to bring in more hired guns.”
“They join Wasser, who, according to the family source, advised the star not to go nuclear on Pitt.”
“...cases and San Francisco based Samantha Bley DeJean...”
“She s furious that he s not chasing after her and that fury is now ruining her image Jolie s latest round of fire also comes this month when she hired two new attorneys Hollywood bigwig Joseph Mannis who has represented celebrities Halle Berry and Dennis Hopper in contentious family...”
““She doesn’t want Brad to move on,” said the family source.”
“Some say it’s an act of revenge by Jolie, who was, of course, the first to make the public strike in the split.”


“… Divorce... "
"In the past two years, Angelina has created a rift between Pitt and the children, from controlling their phone calls to telling them they don't need to see him, and choosing when he can see them when she knows he's at work," one person familiar with the matter said
“.”
"Something happened that made (her) say, 'I'm much better.'"
"I think Angelina thought," I don't like the development of this, let's be tough, "Walzer said of the actress's decision to bring in more hirers
"They joined Wasser, who, according to family sources, advised the star not to use nuclear weapons against Pete."
“… The case and Samantha bly de Jean in San Francisco... "
"She's angry because he didn't pursue her, and this anger is now undermining her image. Julie's latest round of fire is also this month, when she hired two new lawyers, Hollywood tycoon Joseph mannish, who represent celebrities Halle Berry and Dennis Hopper in the disputed family..."
"She didn't want Brad to leave," the family source said
"Some people say it's Julie's retaliation. Of course, Julie is the first one to go on strike in the split."



Number  307
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Dude is still sharing transphobic content on Twitter, despite the major backlash from fans and TLC.”
“For starters, she could be trying to distract from Dillard's recent behavior on social media.”
“By the looks of it, Jill is showing off a nose ring in the family pic.”
“Then on Sunday, the Dillard Family Facebook page shared a very interesting picture of Jill holding her second son, Samuel.”
“Either way, the move caused a big stir.”
“Fans wondered if Jill donned the pants to deflect from Dillard's controversial behavior, or if it was more of a personal decision to reflect her growing independence.”
“Not to mention she's married to Derick Dillard, a very religious and conservative guy who recently caught flak for tweeting transphobic remarks to Jazz Jennings, the star of TLC's I Am Jazz, according to Us Weekly.”
“This sighting really rocked the Counting On universe, especially since Jill is arguably the most traditional out of all the Duggar kids.”
“And just when you thought things couldn't get any more wild, Jill was spotted in pants on Nov. 11.”
“It's not everyday that you see a Duggar woman wearing trousers, that's for sure.”


"Dodd still shares cross fear content on twitter, despite strong opposition from fans and TLC."
"First of all, she may be trying to divert Dillard's attention from his recent behavior on social media."
"Outwardly, Jill shows off a nose ring in a family photo."
"Then on Sunday, the Dillard family shared a very interesting picture on Facebook, Jill holding her second son, Samuel."
"In any case, it caused a big stir."
"Fans want to know if Jill is wearing these pants to avoid Dillard's controversial behavior, or if it's more like a personal decision to reflect her growing independence."
"Not to mention that she married Derek Dillard, a very religious and conservative man, who was recently attacked for tweeting to the star of TLC's I am jazz, jazz Jennings."
"This discovery really shocked the whole universe, especially Jill, who can be said to be the most traditional of all dagger children."
"Just when you thought things wouldn't go crazy anymore, Jill was found wearing pants on November 11."
"You certainly don't see a fat woman in pants every day."



Number  308
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“BUT IS SHE??”
“First, let's look at the evidence — which is just this picture that the paps snapped while Kylie was out and about with bestie Jordyn Woods on Saturday afternoon.”
“BACKGRIDKylie also shared some video of the rings:This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“And uh... that's all the evidence we have.”
“Back in early March, Kylie sparked rumors that she was engaged when she wore a band on her ring finger, but that turned out just to be a ring.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"But is she?"
"First, let's look at the evidence - this picture was taken by Dad while Kelly and Beth Jordan woods were out on Saturday afternoon."
Backgridkylie also shared some rings: this content was imported from instagram. "
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
This content was imported from {embedded name}
"Er... This is all the evidence we have. "
"As early as the beginning of March, when Kelly was wearing a ring on her ring finger, there were rumors of engagement, but it was just a ring."



Number  309
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was brilliant…”Odell’s career included small roles on Private Practice, Modern Family, iCarly and Arrested Development.”
““We are now going to try to make sense of our immeasurable loss privately.”
“The 20-year-old’s family and friends said farewell to the musician in a private funeral service, E!”
“News reports.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Goldbergs actor was found dead in a Los Angeles sober living home on Friday, the L.A. County Coroner’s Office told PEOPLE.”
““There was no paraphernalia or legal drugs found on the scene,” Assistant Chief Coroner Ed Winter told PEOPLE at the time.”
““He was found unresponsive.”Odell’s cause of death is pending an autopsy.”
“His family released a statement on his Twitter page following his death.”
““The Odell family has lost our beloved son and brother, Jackson Odell, on Friday,” the statement read.”


"He's very smart..." Odell's career includes private practice, modern family, iCarly and small roles in development
"Now we're going to try to figure out in private what we can't measure."
"The family and friends of the 20-year-old said goodbye to the musician at a private funeral, e!"
"News coverage."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The Goldberg actor was found dead Friday in a sober home in Los Angeles, the Los Angeles County coroner's office told people
Assistant chief coroner ed winter told people at the time: "no utensils or legal drugs were found at the scene."
"He was found unresponsive." The cause of oder's death is awaiting autopsy
"His family made a statement on his twitter after his death."
"The oders lost their beloved son and brother, Jackson oder, on Friday," the statement said



Number  310
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the video above.”
“We didn’t see that coming.”
“Somehow, Corden set the best race time of the day.”
“Later, at the track, the fellas traded in Corden’s white Range Rover for a Porsche SUV.”
“Levine even balanced a life-sized cardboard cutout of Corden on his chin, which led to an obvious joke or two.”
“Also Read: Melissa McCarthy Crashes Christina Aguilera's 'Carpool Karaoke' to Spit Redman's 'Dirrty' Bars (Video)A bit before that happened, the CBS personality stopped the car so the rock star could prove that he can balance anything on his face.”
“At one point in the pre-taped sketch, the duo got pulled over by the cops for “causing a traffic hazard.” They were let off with a warning.”
“Along the way, the “Voice” mentor and the “Late Late Show” host sung some of Levine’s Maroon 5 hits, as well as a B-side or two.”
“Self-proclaimed “two cool dads” Adam Levine and James Corden did a little joy-riding on last night’s “Carpool Karaoke” — both on the highways of Los Angeles and on a local racetrack.”


"Watch the video above."
"We didn't expect that."
"Somehow, cordon made the best time of the day."
"Later, on the track, the boys traded the white range rover of Corden for a Porsche SUV."
Levin even put a life size piece of cardboard cut out of rope on his chin, which apparently caused a joke or two
"Also read: Melissa McCarthy smashed Christina Aguilera's carpool karaoke and spat at Redman's deerty bar (video), before that, CBS characters stopped so that the rock star could prove that he could balance anything on his face."
In the pre recorded sketch, the two were stopped by the police for "causing a traffic accident" and warned to let go
"Along the way, the voice tutor and the host of the late show sang some of Levin's" chestnut 5 "hits, as well as one or two B-side songs."
Adam Levin and James cordon, who call themselves "two cool dads," had a good time on last night's carpooling karaoke - both on the Los Angeles freeway and at the local racetrack



Number  311
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To see such human growth and connection—I live for those moments.”The On the Run II Tour is up for several Billboard Live Music Awards, including Top World Tour and Top U.S. Tour.”
“When Jay and I sang our final song, we saw everyone smiling, holding hands, kissing, and full of love.”
“Less than 90 years later, two black people performed to a packed, sold-out stadium.”
““This is a site that was used to promote the rhetoric of hate, racism, and divisiveness, and it is the place where Jesse Owens won four gold medals, destroying the myth of white supremacy.”
““One of the most memorable moments for me on the On The Run II tour was the Berlin show at Olympiastadion, the site of the 1936 Olympics,” Bey said in her September Vogue cover story.”
“The most lucrative stop was the two-night event at Atlanta’s Mercedes-Benz Stadium, grossing $14.1 million.”
“Billboard reports Bey and Jay’s tour, which featured special guests DJ Khaled and Chloe x Halle, sold 2,177,000 tickets over its four-month run, with each show grossing an average of $5.28 million.”
“The latter leg was proceeded by the release of the couple’s Everything Is Love album, a nine-track effort that recently won Album of the Year at the BET Hip Hop Awards.”
“The tour kicked off in early June and went on to make 18 stops in Europe, followed by 30 more in North America.”
“Weeks after the world trek wrapped up in Seattle, Billboard reports that the Carters’ co-headlining event racked in $253.5 million—about $144 million more than what the original earned in 2014.”


"To see such human growth and connection - I live for those moments." The on the run II tour will receive several billboard live music awards, including top world tour and top US tour
"When I finished the last song with Jay Chou, we saw everyone smiling, hand in hand, kissing, full of love."
"Less than 90 years later, two black people are performing in a crowded stadium."
"It's a website for hate, racism and divisive speech, and it's where Jesse Owens won four gold medals, destroying the myth of white supremacy."
"For me, the most memorable moment was the Berlin performance at Olympia Stadium, the site of the 1936 Olympic Games," bey said in the cover story of vogue in September
"The most profitable stop was the two night race at the Mercedes Benz stadium in Atlanta, with a total revenue of $14.1 million."
"The billboard reports that special guests DJ Khalid and Chloe x Halley were invited to the tour of bey and Jay, and a total of 2.177 million tickets were sold in four months, with an average box office of $5.28 million per performance."
"The second half was carried out by the release of the couple's" everything is love "album, which has nine tracks and recently won the album of the year award at the hip hop gambling awards."
"The tour started in early June with 18 stops in Europe, followed by 30 in North America."
"A few weeks after the world tour ended in Seattle, billboard reported that the cartel's joint headline campaign earned $253.5 million, which was $144 million more than the original revenue in 2014."



Number  312
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“I don t think that anybody can ever predict what s going to happen with this family so I ve learned long ago to not really make my judgment on the different couple relationships when there s a rift especially with Scott because Scott s like my family the momager...”
“The two are not looking to get back together following her split from Younes Bendjima, a source tells Us Weekly exclusively.”
““Nothing with Scott is rumored or even remotely on the horizon at all, so while people will inevitably try to spin it and say he’ll try and get back with her, they aren’t going to,” the insider explains.”
““He and Sofia [Richie] are happy where they are now and they’re simply doing their own thing, and Scott and Kourtney are coparenting their kids as they have been with great success.” (The exes share Mason, 8, Penelope, 6, and Reign, 3.)”
“The source adds: “Scott will always love and be there for Kourtney and is just happy that they are on good terms for the sake of their kids.”
“He has Sofia and doesn’t want to be bothered with any drama.”Us confirmed on Tuesday, August 7, that Kardashian, 39, and Bendjima broke up the same day photos surfaced of the 26-year-old model with another woman in Mexico.”
“He denied being unfaithful, though the reality star’s sisters, Kim Kardashian and Khloé Kardashian, called him out on social media on Tuesday.”
““She ended it because it just wasn’t working anymore,” a source told Us.”
““There wasn’t any dramatic moment.”Just last month, Kris Jenner opened up about the possibility of her eldest daughter reuniting with Disick, 35.”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"I don't think anyone can predict what will happen in this family, so I learned a long time ago that when there is a rift, don't judge different marital relationships, especially with Scott, because Scott is like my family - mother..."
"After she broke up with yones bengima, they don't intend to get back together," a source told weekly exclusive
"Nothing about Scott is rumored or even on the horizon at all, so although people will inevitably try to turn the tables and say he will try to get back together with her, they will not," the person familiar with the matter explained
"He and Sophia are happy now. They are just doing their own business. Scott and Courtney are raising their children together because they have achieved great success."
"Scott will always love Courtney and be with him, and he's happy that they get along well for their children," the source added
"He has Sophia and doesn't want to be bothered by any drama." The United States confirmed on Tuesday, August 7 that Kardashian, 39, and benjima broke up on the same day that a picture of a 26 year old model and another Mexican woman surfaced
"He denied infidelity, but the reality TV star's sisters Kim Kardashian and khlo é Kardashian called him out on social media on Tuesday."
"She put an end to it because it no longer works," a source told us
"There are no dramatic moments." Just last month, Chris Jenner made public the possibility of her eldest daughter reuniting with 35 year old Disick



Number  313
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Last February, Swift served as maid of honor for her childhood friend Britany Maack as she wed her husband Benjamin LaManna in Pennsylvania.”
““There were tons of people, all ages,” the source continued.”
“On Saturday, the star stood by her longtime friend’s side in Martha’s Vineyard, Massachusetts, as she wed photographer Matt Lucier at Old Whaling Church in Edgartown.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Anderson wore a stunning light pink and white gown and Swift — who served as a bridesmaid — was seen helping her with her dress.”
“For her own part, Swift wore a burgundy dress which she paired with matching lipstick.”
““She looked gorgeous,” one local on the scene told PEOPLE.”
““She had dark red lips, and carried her friend’s train as they went into the church.”
“Security asked the crowd not to rush her.”A group of children and adults had gathered outside the church, hoping to catch a glimpse of Swift.”
““Lots of tourists who wandered by and were like ‘oh, Taylor Swift?”


In February last year, when swift married her husband Benjamin LamanA in Pennsylvania, she served as a bridesmaid for Brittany mark, her childhood friend
"There are a lot of people of all ages," the source continued
"On Saturday, the star stood beside old friends at Martha's Vineyard in Massachusetts and married photographer Matt Lucille at the old whaling Church in edgarton."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Anderson was wearing a beautiful light pink and white robe, and swift - she was the maid of Honor - was seen helping her dress."
Swift himself wore a Burgundy dress with lipstick.
"She looks beautiful," a local on the scene told people
"Her lips were red and she went into church with her friend's train on her back."
The security guard asked the crowd not to rush her. "A group of children and adults gathered outside the church, hoping to catch a glimpse of swift."
"A lot of tourists hang around and say, 'Oh, Tyler swift



Number  314
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maci Bookout struggled to preserve her relationship with Ryan Edwards’ wife, Mackenzie, as he spent time in rehab.”
“Catelynn and Tyler Baltierra worried about Butch’s mental health as he got off of parole after his history of drug abuse.”
“During the MTV reality show’s season 7 premiere on Monday night, Amber Portwood struggled to figure out whether to end things with fiancé Matt Baier after the season 6 reunion.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Portwood, 27, revealed she was afraid she’d be letting go of the wrong guy to an MTV producer while in New York City after the reunion took place.”
““Nothing’s changed at all,” the mother of one said.”
““It’s hard.”
“I just feel like I’m trickling down a little bit with the relationship, I’m slowly going down as he treats me like s—.”She continued, “I’m just kind of feeling my way through this right now, in any way that I can.”
“It s nothing but stress When a friend who was with her asked if Portwood was afraid to be alone the reality star said I m scared that I developed this relationship with this guy that I loved and am I making a mistake if I let him go Returning...”
“...to the home she shares with Baier he tried to make amends with Portwood after the various arguments they had in season 6 including the rift between them that began when Baier a recovering addict offered Catelynn Lowell Baltiera a Xanax during the previous season...”


"When Ryan Edwards' wife Mackenzie spent some time in rehab, Macy bookett tried to maintain a relationship with him."
"Catlin and Tyler baltira are worried about Butch's mental health, because he has a history of drug abuse, so he was paroled."
"At the premiere of MTV Reality Show Season 7 on Monday night, amber Portwood wrestled with whether to end her relationship with fiance Matt Baier after the reunion of season 6."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Portwood, 27, revealed that after the reunion, she was worried that she would give the wrong person to MTV producers when she was in New York."
"Nothing has changed," said the mother of one child
"It's hard."
"I just feel like I have a little bit of a relationship with this relationship, and he treats me like an S -," she continued. "I just feel like I'm going through it now, in any way I can."
"When a friend with her asked Portwood if she was afraid of loneliness, she said," I'm afraid that I've developed this relationship with the person I love. If I let him go back, did I make a mistake... "
“…… Back at the home she shared with bell, he tried to apologize to Portwood for their disputes in the sixth season, including the rift between them. Last season, bell was a recovering drug addict, and he offered a kind of xanax to Catlin Lowell baltira... "



Number  315
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And when we do that, we will be able to make of this old world a new world.”
“...discover the power of love the redemptive power of love...”
“While there are several residences on the Windsor estate that could have served as a last-night base for Harry and Meghan, they chose to stay at Coworth Park and Cliveden House luxury hotels respectively.”
“However it’s all different this time around.”
“Although Kate stayed with her family at The Goring Hotel, William was at Clarence House the night before his big day, along with his brother Harry.”
“Cliveden House Courtesy Cliveden HouseRoyal couples usually spend the night before their wedding at royal residences.Prince Charles and Prince Andrew both stayed at Buckingham Palace the night before their weddings, and their brides nearby at royal residence Clarence House.”
“Getty ImagesThe bride and groom spent the night before their wedding in separate hotels.”
“Because Harry and Meghan aren’t getting married in London, there was no balcony appearance–but that didn't stop them from sharing a kiss for the cameras in Windsor.”
“Then in 1981, Charles and Diana were the first royal couple to share a kiss in front of the cheering crowds, later followed by Andrew and Sarah, and William and Kate.”
“Ever since the weddings of Queen Victoria’s children, it has been customary for royal couples to take to the balcony at Buckingham Palace to acknowledge the crowds below.”


"When we do that, we can turn the old world into a new one."
“… Discover the power of love, the redeeming power of love... "
"Although Windsor manor has several residences that could have served as a base for Harry and Megan for their last night, they chose to stay in cowers Park and cleveden house luxury hotel respectively."
"But this time it's all different."
Although Kate and her family are staying at the Goering Hotel, William and his brother Harry are at the Clarence House the night before big day
The royal couple usually spend their apartment at the Royal Hotel the night before the wedding. Prince Charles and Prince Andrew live in Buckingham Palace the night before the wedding, and their bride lives in Clarence palace, the royal residence nearby
"The bride and groom spend the night before the wedding in different hotels."
"Harry and Megan didn't show up on the balcony because they didn't plan to get married in London - but that didn't stop them from kissing in front of Windsor."
In 1981, Charles and Diana became the first royal couple to kiss in front of cheering crowds, followed by Andrew and Sarah, and William and Kate
"Since the wedding of Queen Victoria's children, the royal couple have been used to greeting the people below on the balcony of Buckingham Palace."



Number  316
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The reason why is because they want something unrealistic.”Watch Dr. Dubrow talk about the most botched surgery he’s ever come across.”
“In fact, 30 percent of my patients who sat down yesterday,” Dr. Nassif said.”
““Many times.”
“Outside of their show, the surgeons admitted they don’t always agree to treat potential patients, and regularly turn people away if they’re not good candidates.”
“...transplanted onto her eyebrows...”
“The doctors said they also had to treat a man who had most of his nose bitten off by a dog while the most bizarre case of the series goes to the first ever woman to get her pubic hair...”
““So she went home on his advice and stabbed her breasts, and it turned into a giant disaster.”
“...rupture them the implant company will pay...”
“This season on Botched I had a patient who had a really bad breast problem and didn t have enough money to have it fixed so the plastic surgeon said Well if you go home and stab your implants and...”
“But basically it meant that she couldn’t eat normal food.”Dr. Dubrow said his was a female patient who’d stabbed her own breast implants on the advice of a surgeon.”


"The reason is that they want something unrealistic." Watching Dr. dubro talk about the worst surgery he's ever had
"In fact, 30% of my patients sat down yesterday," Dr. nasif said
"Many times."
"Outside of their show, surgeons admit that they don't always agree to treat potential patients, and they often turn them away if they're not good candidates."
“… To her eyebrows... "
"Doctors said they had to treat a man who had been bitten off most of his nose by a dog, and the strangest case in the series was the first woman to get pubic hair..."
"So she took his advice and went home, stabbed herself in the chest, and it turned out to be a huge disaster."
“… Take them apart and the company will pay... "
"This season I had a patient with a very serious breast problem and didn't have enough money to fix it, so the plastic surgeon said if you go home and stab your implant and
"But basically, it means she can't eat normal food." Dr. dubro said he was a female patient who had stabbed her breast augmentation on the advice of a surgeon



Number  317
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““They’ve been unhappy for a while.””
““Vanessa is very close to her family and very private and does not like all this attention on her family,” a source told Us.”
“Us exclusively revealed that the pair had been dealing with marital issues since Donald Sr.’s presidential campaign in 2016.”
“They married in November 2005 at his father President Donald Trump’s Mar-a-Lago estate in Palm Beach, Florida.”
“We ask for your privacy during this time.”Donald and Vanessa met at a fashion show in New York City in 2003.”
“We have five beautiful children together and they remain our top priority.”
““We will always have tremendous respect for each other and our families.”
““After 12 years of marriage, we have decided to go our separate ways,” the estranged couple said in a statement to Us Weekly.”
“As previously reported, the former model, also 40, filed for an uncontested divorce in Manhattan Supreme Court on Thursday afternoon.”
“He and Vanessa are also the parents of Kai, 10, Donald III, 9, Tristan, 6, and Spencer, 5.”


"They've been unhappy for a while."
"Vanessa is very close to her family, very private and doesn't like to focus all her attention on her family," a source told us
"The United States has revealed exclusively that the two have been dealing with their marriage since Donald Sr. ran for president in 2016."
"They married in November 2005 at his father, President Donald Trump's malago estate in Palm Beach, Florida."
In 2003, Donald and Vanessa met at a fashion show in New York. "We ask you to keep your privacy during this time."
"We have five beautiful children together, and they are still our top priority."
"We will always honor each other and our families."
"After 12 years of marriage, we decided to go our separate ways," the estranged couple said in a weekly statement to us
"As previously reported, the same 40 year old former model filed an undisputed divorce petition in Manhattan's Supreme Court on Thursday afternoon."
"He and Vanessa are also parents of Kay, 10, Donald III, 9, Tristan, 6, and Spencer, 5."



Number  318
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out our exclusive video from inside Chloe‘s party below..”
“Needless to say, Chloe‘s birthday bash was an amazing evening!”
“After Chloe‘s mom presented her with a gorgeous flower cake, some party-goers decided to start a dance party that ended with Ricky getting thrown in the pool!”
“Guests also had the chance get their nails done, take pics in the photo booth and get flash tattoos!”
“During the party, guests noshed on delicious mini hamburgers, chicken fingers and mac and cheese, and sipped on custom mocktails.”
“Other guests included Noah Urrea (who just hosted his own amazing Sweet 16), Madisyn Shipman, Ethan Wacker, Joshua Rush and Dylan Bernard.”
“Chloe invited all of closest friends, including Forever In Your Mind‘s Ricky Garcia and R5‘s Rydel Lynch, and JJJ even scored an invite!”
“The birthday girl and Dance Moms star hosted a sweet 16 bash on Wednesday night (June 7) at a super chic mansion in the Hollywood Hills.”
“Chloe Lukasiak just turned 16 and she celebrated the milestone in a major way!”


"Take a look at the exclusive video inside Chloe's party below..."
"Needless to say, Chloe's birthday party was a wonderful night!"
"After Chloe's mother gave her a gorgeous flower cake, some party goers decided to start a dance, and finally Ricky was thrown into the swimming pool!"
"Guests also have the opportunity to do nails, take photos in the photo booth, and flash tattoos!"
During the party, guests snack delicious Mini hamburgers, chicken fingers, Macs and cheese, and sip customized cocktails
"Other guests include Noah Uriah (who has just hosted his own sweet 16), Madison Shipman, Ethan Wacker, Joshua rush and Dylan Bernard."
"Chloe invited all his closest friends, including Ritchie Garcia from forever in your heart and Riddell Lynch from R5. JJJ even received the invitation!"
"The birthday star and dancer held a sweet 16-year-old party at a super chic mansion in Hollywood hill on Wednesday night."
"Chloe lukasiac has just turned 16, and she celebrates this milestone in an important way!"



Number  319
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Aside from that, the couple also owns homes in Massachusetts, Montana, and Costa Rica, according to the Observer.”
“Last year, Brady and Bündchen reportedly purchased a nearly $30 million home at the Robert A.M. Stern Architects-designed 70 Vestry, in Tribeca.”
“Residents in the building also have access to amenities like an indoor pool, steam room, and fitness center.”
“The new owner of their apartment can look forward to floor-to-ceiling windows, and 360 degree views of the city.”
“The couple had purchased the full-floor apartment back in 2014 for $11.7 million.”
“The couple wasn’t able to find a buyer at that price, so earlier this year, they slashed the price on the condo to $13.95 million, and that seemed to do the trick.”
“Bündchen and Brady first listed this apartment, which has sweeping NYC views, for $17.25 million, in 2016.”
“The New York Observer was the first to report on the sale of the four bedroom home that’s located in the Flatiron District.”
“Two years after they first listed it on the market, celebrity couple Tom Brady and Gisele Bündchen have finally managed to sell their One Madison apartment.”


In addition, the couple own homes in Massachusetts, Montana and Costa Rica, the Observer reported
Last year, Brady and banchen bought a house worth nearly $30 million at Robert a.m. stern architects designed 70 vestry in Tribeca, according to reports
Residents in the building can also use indoor swimming pool, steam room, fitness center and other facilities
"The new owner of the apartment can see French windows and a 360 degree view of the city."
"The couple bought the full story apartment for $11.7 million as early as 2014."
"The couple couldn't find a buyer at that price, so earlier this year, they reduced the price of the apartment to $13.95 million, which seems to have worked."
"Bonchen and Brady listed the New York panoramic apartment for the first time in 2016 for $17.25 million."
"The New York Observer is the first to report on the sale of a four bedroom house in flatiron."
"Two years after their debut, the star couple Tom Brady and Giselle bonchen finally sold their Madison apartment."



Number  320
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Telling his nephew that boys don’t wear princess dresses His nephew looked so cute and happy in his Princess dress He can wear whatever he likes!” another user tweeted.”
““Why are you wearing a princess dress?”
“I meant no harm and did not mean to offend anyone at all.”
“I love that my nephew feels free to express himself as we all should,” Hamilton began in a series of tweets on Tuesday, December 26.”
““My deepest apologies for my behaviour as I realise it is really not acceptable for anyone, no matter where you are from, to marginalise or stereotype anyone,” the British driver continued.”
“I have always been in support of anyone living their life exactly how they wish and I hope I can be forgiven for this lapse in judgement Hamilton 32 is referring to a now deleted video posted to his Instagram...”
“Story on Monday December 25”
““I’m so sad right now.”
“Look at my nephew,” he said in the video before turning the camera to the little boy, who was wearing a pink and purple dress and holding a wand.”
“Is this what you got for Christmas?”


"Tell his nephew that the boy doesn't wear Princess Costume, and his nephew looks lovely and happy in princess costume. He can wear whatever he likes! "Another user tweeted."
"Why are you dressed as a princess?"
"I don't mean to hurt anyone, I don't mean to offend anyone."
"I love that my nephew can express himself as freely as all of us," Hamilton said in a series of tweets on Tuesday, December 26
"I apologize for my behavior because I realize that no one, no matter where you come from, can accept marginalization or stereotypes of anyone," the British driver continued
"I have always supported anyone to live according to their wishes. I hope I can forgive Hamilton's mistake in judgment No. 32, which refers to a deleted video posted on his instagram..."
"The story of Monday, December 25"
"I'm very sad now."
"Look at my nephew," he said in the video, then turned to the little boy, who was wearing a pink and purple dress and holding a magic wand
"Is this your Christmas present?"



Number  321
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And what film is this?”
“Taylor and Dakota Johnson in NYC on October 12, 2016 Getty Images12 November 2016:Taylor is papped going to watch a film with her mother and two of the Haim sisters Este and Alana in Los Angeles.”
“...what it s like if we write this song together...”
“This was the first time we had a conversation where I came in and I was like Hey this could be really weird and we could hate this so could we just because we re in quarantine and there s nothing else going on could we just try to see...”
“"It was a step that we would never have taken because why would we have ever written a song together?”
“And I just was like, 'Hello,'" Taylor said.”
“She later revealed, "I just heard Joe singing the entire, fully formed chorus of 'Betty' from another room.”
“And Joe, Joe plays piano beautifully, and he's always just playing and making things up and kind of creating things."”
“He's not a real person... William Bowery is Joe, as we know.”
“Joe plays piano beautifully [...] #exile was crazy because Joe had written the entire piano part.” pic.twitter.com/WK3m4iCIiG — louise  (@tangledwithaug) November 25, 2020"There's been a lot of discussion about William Bowery and his identity.”


"What kind of movie is this?"
"On October 12, 2016, Taylor and Johnson of Dakota filmed Getty Images in New York. November 12, 2016: Taylor is going to see a movie in Los Angeles with her mother and Haim's two sisters Esther and Alana."
“… What if we write this song together... "
"This is the first time we have a conversation, I come in, I think hey, this may be really strange, we can hate this, so we can just because we are in isolation, nothing else happens, we can try to have a look..."
"It's a step we'll never take, because why do we write a song together?"
"I just said, 'Hello,'" Tyler said
She later revealed, "I just heard Joe singing the whole" Betty "chorus in another room."
"Joe, Joe plays the piano very well. He's always playing, editing and creating."
"He's not a real person... We know that William Barry is Joe
"Joe plays the piano very well ]#Exile is crazy because Joe wrote the whole piano part pic.twitter.com/WK3m4iCIiG -Louise (@ tangledwithaug) November 25, 2020 "there is a lot of discussion about William Barry and his identity."



Number  322
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She is your twin,” one fan wrote before another added, “Two beauties… baby Chicago is her mommy’s twin.” Kim just keeps winning.”
““Wow!”
“Kim Kardashian is on the cover of Vogue India looking flawless as usual.”
“However, it’s the shade from the KUWTK star that has fans buzzing.”
“Kim took the time to share what she hates most about each of her siblings — and she did not hold back.”
“In her defense, she does start off by listing the traits she loves about her family, including Rob Kardashian‘s sense of humor, Khloé Kardashian‘s “I-don’tgive-a-f–k attitude,” and Kendall Jenner‘s sweetness.”
“Then things quickly go left.”
““Maybe… Kourtney [Kardashian]’s stubbornness.”
“And Khloé’s getting too sensitive,” she told the magazine of her siblings’ flaws.”
“I would take away Kendall s anxiety Kylie s I don t care I know what I m doing thing and probably my brother s moodiness The only family member exempt from Kim s critique was momager Kris Jenner who the reality star deemed perfect Pettiness aside this is the...”


"She's your twin," one fan wrote before the other, "two beauties The Chicago baby is her mother's twin Kim always wins
"Wow
"Kim Kardashian is as flawless as ever on the cover of vogue India."
"However, it is the shadow of Kuyt's star that makes the fans buzz
"Kim took the time to share every sibling thing she hated most - she didn't flinch."
"When defending herself, she did list her favorite family traits, including rob Kardashian's sense of humor, heloe Kardashian's" I don't love other people's attitude "and Kendall Jenner's sweetness."
"Then things will soon turn to the left."
"Maybe Courtney's stubbornness. "
"And Heroe has become too sensitive," she told the magazine of her siblings' shortcomings
"I'll get rid of Kendall's anxiety, Kelly. I don't care. I know what I'm doing. Maybe my brother's moody. The only family member who won't be criticized by Kim is Chris Jenner's mother. She is regarded as a perfect cheapskate by reality TV stars. This is..."



**Something goes wrong**
“And while the heartfelt messages are nice, some are wondering who Nikki could be relying on during this difficult time.”
“Soon after the news broke, stars including Nicole "Snooki" Polizzi, WWE's Renee Young and Torrie Wilson, and more stars showed their support for the newly single star in the comments section.”
“"We ask that you respect our privacy during this time in our lives."”
“"While this decision was a difficult one, we continue to have a great deal of love and respect for one another," the couple said in a statement posted onto Instagram.”
“Just a few days ago, the Total Bellas star and called off their engagement after nearly six years together.”
“When times get tough, just gets tougher.”


"Although the message from the heart is good, some people want to know who Nicky can rely on in this difficult time."
"Shortly after the news came out, stars including Nicole" snooki "Polizzi, Renee young and Torre Wilson of WWE, and more, expressed their support for the new single star in the comments section."
"In the meantime, please respect our privacy."
"Although it was a difficult decision, we still have love and respect for each other," the couple said in a statement on instagram
"Just a few days ago, Bellas and the star cancelled their engagement after nearly six years together."
"When times get tough, they just get harder."



Number  324
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the US call 1-800-273-TALK or chat online.”
“...band Linkin Park had scheduled dates for a new tour when news of his death broke Getty Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered The singer had long suffered from alcohol and drug addiction Getty Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Bennington s band was formed in 1996 and...”
“A Los Angeles County Coroner's Office report - obtained by E!”
“News - reveals that the singer, who died by suicide in July, did test “presumptive positive” for ecstasy, however, two additional tests failed to detect the drug.”
“Bennington did also have minor traces of alcohol in his system at the time of his death.”
“The report states that his wife Talinda told authorities that Bennington “would have suicidal ideations after consuming alcohol” and that an “apparent biography” written by the singer was found in his bedroom.”
“She also revealed that he made a suicide threat back in 2006.”
“Bennington was found dead in his Los Angeles home on the 53rd birthday of his close friend Chris Cornell, the Soundgarden frontman who died by suicide in May - a fact prevention experts believe may bear some importance.”
“The Nu-metal pioneer's was confirmed as suicide by hanging.”
“Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Show all 14 1 14 Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered The Los Angeles coroner said it appeared the musician had taken his own life Getty Chester Bennington dead Linkin Park singer remembered Bennington s...”


"In the United States, please call 1-800-273-TALK or chat online."
“… The Lincoln Park band has arranged a new tour date. When the news of his death comes out, the singer of Lincoln Park remembers the singer's long-term alcohol and drug addiction. The singer of Lincoln Park remembers that the band of Bennington was founded in 1996 and
Los Angeles County coroner's office report - by E! "
"News - revealed that the singer, who died of suicide in July, did test" presumed positive "for ecstasy, however, two additional tests failed to detect drugs."
"When Bennington died, he did have a slight alcohol residue in his body."
His wife, talinda, told authorities that Bennington had "suicidal thoughts after drinking" and found an "obvious biography" of the singer in his bedroom, the report said
"She also revealed that he had threatened suicide as early as 2006."
"Bennington was found dead at his home in Los Angeles on the 53rd birthday of his good friend Chris Cornell, the leader of Soundgarden, who died of suicide in May - a fact that prevention experts believe may have some significance."
"Nu Metal pioneer is confirmed to have hanged herself."
"Chester Bennington is dead, Lincoln Park singer remembers all 1414 performances, Chester Bennington is dead, Lincoln Park singer remembers Chester Bennington is dead, Lincoln Park singer remembers, Los Angeles coroner said, it seems that the musician committed suicide, Getty Chester Bennington is dead, Lincoln Park singer remembers, Bennington



Number  325
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“• @hannagoldfied [Twitter]• All Pop Culture Coverage [E]”
“The identity of the restaurant remains a mystery, but if you have any guesses — or any other great stories about POS notes concerning celebrities and/or wannabe VIPs — please share them in the comments of this post.”
“...notes on guests...”
“Soothing my anxiety by slowly savoring this spreadsheet of notes on customers that a restaurant accidentally attached to an email blast pic twitter com X4oXBXPqpY Hannah Goldfield hannahgoldfield July 7 2017 Here are a few takeaways from this epic Twitter thread Goldfield remarks that this spreadsheet has over 30 000”
“Case in point: This weekend, New Yorker writer Hannah Goldfield intercepted an accidental leak of a guest notes spreadsheet from an unnamed celebrity hot spot, and many of these notes are hilariously strange.”
“It’s no secret that restaurants all over the world keep notes on their guests using POS systems like OpenTable — and sometimes, these messages offer juicy glimpses at the eccentricities and inflated egos of the people passing through these dining rooms.”


"· @ hannagoldfied [twitter] · all popular culture reports [e]"
"The identity of the restaurant is still a mystery, but if you have any guesses or any other great stories about celebrities and / or POS notes who want to be VIP, please share them in the comments on this post."
“… Notice to guests... "
"Slowly savor this E-form about customers' notes to ease my anxiety. This E-form is a picture of a restaurant accidentally attached to an email. The picture is twitter com x4oxbxpqpy Hannah Goldfield Hannah Goldfield On July 7, 2017, here are some takeaway Goldfield comments from this epic twitter post, with more than 30000 entries in this spreadsheet. "
"For example: Hannah Goldfield, author of the new Yorker, intercepted an unexpected leak of a spreadsheet of guest notes from an unknown celebrity hotspot this weekend, many of which are very strange."
"It's no secret that restaurants all over the world use POS systems such as OpenTable to keep records of their guests - sometimes this information gives people an interesting glimpse of the eccentric and inflated selves of people passing through these restaurants."



Number  326
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Play slideshow Victoria's Secret 1 of 88 Adriana Lima and Alessandra Ambrosio flaunt peachy bottoms in eye-popping lingerie shoot...”
“It wasn’t until she got backstage that the tears were flowing.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“Victoria’s Secret 2018 takes place tonight in New York city with models including Kendall Jenner and sisters Gigi and Bella Hadid walking the catwalk.”
“The famous runway, which showcases the latest underwear from the Victoria’s Secret brand, will captivate audiences around the world.”
“But what is more memorable than the underwear?”
“It's the falls, trips and slips live on TV, of course.”
“The same fans who will tune in tomorrow night will remember last year’s show in Shanghai where the undoubtably stunning Ming Xi had a minor mishap on the runway.”
“Ming Xi, a Victoria’s Secret model, tripped over on the catwalk after catching her foot in the train of her outfit - and hit the floor with her hands and knees.”
“Model Ming Xi fell over on the Victoria's Secret catwalk in 2017The Chinese model, 28 at the time, was left red-faced when her boot heel became caught in her long flowing cape.”


"Slide 88 Victoria's Secret 1 Adriana Lima and Alexandra Ambrosio show off peach bottoming in stunning underwear shooting..."
"It wasn't until she got backstage that tears came out."
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"Victoria's Secret 2018 will be held in New York tonight, with models including Kendall Jenner and sister Gigi and Bella Hadid taking catwalk."
"This famous runway shows the latest underwear of Victoria Secret brand, which will attract audiences all over the world."
"But what's more memorable than underwear?"
"Falls, trips and slips, of course, live on TV."
"Fans watching the party will remember the performance in Shanghai last year. There is no doubt that the amazing Ming Xi had a little accident on the T-stage."
"Mingxi is Victoria's Secret model. She tripped a foot on the train and fell on the floor with her hands and knees."
"Model Mingxi fell down on Victoria's Secret Fashion Show in 2017. The 28 year old Chinese model at that time was red with the heels of her boots in her long flowing cloak."



Number  327
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Matt Damon added his insight in an interview with Entertainment Tonight:“He’ll be great, he’ll be a mess, but [Amal] will take care of everything."”
“Friends are already weighing in on how the 56-year-old will be as a brand new father.”
“The boy and girl are the first children for the attorney and her husband, George Clooney.”
“Clooney's rep has also already weighed in with some humor:Julie Chen, a friend of the couple, first announced the Clooney’s pregnancy news on her CBS show, The Talk, in February.”
“Since then Amal Clooney has been spotted with her husband at the Cesar Awards in February and at the United Nations in March she has been continuing her work as a human rights lawyer which she has done since the...”
“...early 2000s...”
“George Clooney who was one of Hollywood s most famous bachelors before marrying Amal in September 2014 at the age of 53 told People in February that his friends whose children are all grown and in college had taken to...”
“...jokingly ribbing him about his late in life fatherhood...”
“Despite the quips from his pals, Clooney was ready to take on the challenge.”
““Look, it’s exciting,” Clooney said.”


Matt Damon added in an interview with Entertainment Tonight: "he's going to be great, he's going to be a mess, but [Amar] is going to take care of everything."
"Friends are already weighing how the 56 year old father will become a new father."
"The boys and girls are the first children of the lawyer and her husband, George Clooney."
"Representatives of Clooney have also considered a number of issues: Julie Chen, a friend of the Clooney couple, first announced that Clooney was pregnant on CBS's talk in February
"Since then, Amar Clooney has been found to have participated with her husband in the Cesar prize in February and continued her work as a human rights lawyer at the United Nations in March since She's been doing that for the last two years. "
“… At the beginning of the 21st century
"George Clooney is one of the most famous bachelors in Hollywood. In September 2014, he married 53 year old Amar. In February this year, he told people that his friends' children have grown up and are going to college..."
“… Jokingly ridicule his fatherhood in his later years... "
"Despite the banter of his friends, Clooney is ready for the challenge."
"Look, it's exciting," Clooney said



Number  328
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And maybe that’s a good thing.”
“It’s some form of fan art… I guess.”Seeing as del Toro designed the creature, he has the final say over how its manly parts look.”
“The product which has been dubbed The Jewel of the Amazon was clearly a huge success as it sold out in less than twenty minutes and I don t want to think about what the buyers must be doing with...”
“...them...”
“Anyway, you can learn more about the, um, dildo in an interview with the creators here.”
“However, del Toro has made it clear that he’s not a fan of the rather naughty piece of merchandise.”
“Speaking to The Wrap, he said that the toy, which depicts the creature’s manhood, was not an accurate depiction of how its genitalia would actually look.”
“He was quoted as saying the following:“I don’t think it’s an accurate representation.”
“So if he says the dildo’s incorrect, it’s incorrect.”
“Despite all its success, we’ll probably never truly know what the creature’s penis really looks like.”


"Maybe that's a good thing."
"It's some form of fan art I guess Seeing del Toro design the creature, he has the final say in its masculinity
"This product, known as Amazon's treasure, is obviously a great success, because it sold out in less than 20 minutes. I don't want to think about what the buyer must be using..."
“… They... "
"Anyway, you can learn more about penises by interviewing the creators here."
"However, Del Toro has made it clear that he is not a very naughty commodity fan
"He told the packaging that the toy depicted the masculinity of the animal, but it did not accurately describe the actual appearance of its genitals."
"I don't think it's an accurate statement," he said
"So if he says the penis isn't right, it's not right."
"Despite its great success, we may never really know what this creature's penis looks like."



Number  329
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s not about that.”Watch her latest explanation of “Swish Swish” on The Tonight Show above.”
“You have to follow your [heart emoji],” Rose wrote in a series of tweets.”
“Perry was even asked by Jimmy Fallon on The Tonight Show Friday whether this song, off her upcoming Witness album, was about “anyone we know.” While the pop diva remained cryptic, she explained the meaning of “Swish Swish” is “liberation” from bullies.”
““I think it’s a great anthem for people to use whenever someone’s trying to hold you down or bully you,” she said.”
“That s kind of what this record is about it s just like a 360 degree liberation If Chained to the Rhythm was about political liberation and Bon Appétit was a sexual liberation then Perry calls Swish Swish the liberation from all the negative that doesn t serve you Perry...”
“...directed her fans to the segment on social media Saturday morning...”
““Here’s some of the tea and a biscuit,” she tweeted.”
“Since “Swish Swish” dropped on Thursday, listeners, including Swift pal Ruby Rose, pointed to the lyrics as a diss track.”
““I’ve always stood up for the people I love and against things I think are cheap or mean spirited.”
“That’s not new.”


"That's not the problem." Take a look at her latest explanation of "whoosh" on the tonight show
"You have to follow your [inner expression]," Rose wrote in a series of microblogs
On Friday's "Tonight Show," Jimmy Fallon even asked Perry if the song from her upcoming witness album was about "anyone we know.". Although the pop diva is still mysterious, she explains that "whoosh" means "free from the bully."
"I think it's a great ode that people can use whenever someone tries to suppress you or bully you," she said
"This is the content of this record. It's like a 360 degree liberation. If rhythm is about political liberation and Bon app é tit is about personality liberation, then Perry calls it swish swish, liberated from all the negatives that don't serve you, Perry..."
"On Saturday morning, she brought her fans to social media..."
"It's some tea and biscuits," she said on Weibo
Since "swish swish" aired on Thursday, audiences, including Swift's friend Ruby Rose, have seen lyrics as diss tracks
"I've always supported the people I love and opposed what I thought was cheap or mean."
"It's not new."



Number  330
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a preview for TV One’s Uncensored, airing Feb. 18, the Girls Trip star recounts hanging out with the Lemonade singer and her husband, JAY-Z.”
“"I was talking to Jay-Z for a little bit, and there was another actress that was there who was also talking to JAY-Z," Haddish recalls.”
“"[The actress] touched JAY-Z’s chest and Beyonce came walking up like, 'B**tttchhh!’ -- but, she didn’t say that."”
“The 38-year-old comedian said she read the mother of three's body language, adding, "Her demeanor, her body from the way she walked up on them said, 'Get your hands off my man’s chest.'"”
“Your browser does not support iframes.”
“Careful not to share too much, not even the alleged actress' name, Haddish quips, "So then she also started talking to the other actress and some other stuff happened but I’m not gonna say nothin’ yet."”
“Haddish doesn't preface when this supposed incident occurred but she did recently snap a selfie with Beyonce while at a party, and claimed that while at the event, it was Queen Bey that held her back from getting into a fight.”
“"I’m not at liberty to say what had went down at the party, but Beyonce was just telling me to have a good time, and I was like, 'No, I’m gonna end up fighting this b***h!'"”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
In an uncensored TV one trailer broadcast on February 18, the girl's Travel Star recounts her experience with lemonade singer and husband Jay-Z
"I talked to Jay-Z for a while, and an actress also talked to Jay-Z," haddish recalled
(the actress) touched Jay-Z's chest, and Beyonce came over like 'b * * tttchh! "- but she didn't say that."
The 38 year old comedian said she had read the body language of the mother of three, adding: "her manner, from the way she walked up to them, her body said," take your hand away from my man's chest. "
"Your browser does not support iframe."
"Be careful not to share too much, not even the name of the so-called actress," hadish joked. "So she started talking to another actress, and something else happened, but I'm not going to say anything yet."
"Hadish didn't say when the so-called incident happened, but she did take a picture of herself with Beyonce at a party recently and claimed that queen Shelley stopped her fighting during the event."
"I can't just say what happened at the party, but Beyonce just told me to have a good time and I thought," no, I'm going to fight this asshole! "



Number  331
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Before their joint public appearance, Reed told Fit Pregnancy and Baby that she and Somerhalder vowed to take “one month of silence” after their daughter’s birth.”
“Also at the EIF event were Common, Chance the Rapper, Jesse Williams, Michael Ealy, and Miranda Cosgrove.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Inside the event, the father of one shared a selfie along with the caption, “What if we could reinvent high school?”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Reed, 29, and Somerhalder, 39, wed in April 2015 after first being spotted together the previous July and getting engaged that January.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The actors made their first public appearance at EIF’s XQ Super School Live in Santa Monica, Calif., on Friday, since welcoming their first child, daughter Bodhi Soleil, in July.”
“It’s a parents night out for Nikki Reed and Ian Somerhalder!”


Before their public appearance together, Reid told pregnancy and Baby magazine that she and summerhard vowed to be "silent for a month" after their daughter was born
"In EIF activities, rappers chance, Jesse Williams, Michael ealy and Miranda Cosgrove are also common."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"At the event, the father of a child shared a self portrait with a title:" what if we could reshape high school life? "Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Reed, 29, and summerhard, 39, got married in April 2015, were first found together in July of the previous year, and were engaged in January."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Since the arrival of their first child, Bodhi Soleil, in July, the actors made their first public appearance at the XQ super School of EIF in Santa Monica, California, on Friday."
"It's Nicky reed and Ian somerhard's parents' night!"



Number  332
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m being young.””
““Kendall and A$AP were inseparable all night.”
“Find out how more of the stars partied in the video above!”
“The 21-year-old supermodel, who stunned in a sheer, barely-there La Perla Haute Couture gown covered in thousands of crystals, wasn’t shy about showing PDA with the rapper, 28, during the New York City fashion event.”
“Kim Kardashian shared a Snapchat photo of A$AP Rocky grabbing Kendall’s butt while younger sister Kylie Jenner crouched down to take a photo of the couple.”
“Kendall and the “Wild for the Night” rapper also looked close in Kylie’s epic, star-studded bathroom selfie.”
“The duo snuggled up while posing with several other stars, including Kardashian, Brie Larson, Paris Jackson, Lily Aldridge, Diddy and Frank Ocean.”
“The pair stuck together at Rihanna’s Met Gala afterparty, too.”
“Kendall and A$AP Rocky were seen dancing together while partying at 1 Oak nightclub.”
“She was sitting with her back on his legs and dancing on him,” a party guest tells Us Weekly.”


"I'm still young."
"Kendall and AP were together all night."
"See how many stars are at the party in the video above!"
"The 21-year-old supermodel, wearing a transparent, almost nonexistent La Perla dress covered with thousands of crystals, showed off her PDA with the 28 year old rapper at New York fashion events
"Kim Kardashian shared a snapchat photo in which a $AP rocky grabs Kendall's ass and his sister Kylie Jenner squats down to take a picture of the couple."
In Kelly's epic, starry bathroom selfie, Kendall is close to the "wild one night" rapper
"They cuddled up and took pictures with other stars, including Kardashian, Bree Larson, Paris Jackson, Lily Aldrich, Diddy and frank ocean."
"Both of them were at Rihanna's wedding party."
"Kendall and rocky were seen dancing together at the oak club party."
"She sat on his lap and danced with her back to him," one party guest told us



Number  333
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Then, completed with an off-the-cuff low bun and pink lip.”
“Whereas vacationing within the Maldives for her “babymoon,” the star posted a photograph sporting a blue and white maxi kaftan with a excessive cut up from Camilla, a Gucci belt bag and gold hoops.”
“For those who want some inspiration, Rosie is objectives.”
“Whether or not you’ve got booked your tickets or not, it is time to begin interested by what you are taking in your 2018 travels.”
“Whereas most of us need to nod sure, anxious to get away from duties, climate woes and stresses, Rosie Huntington-Whiteley simply reminded us that dwelling your greatest life features a lovely journey wardrobe.”


"Then, with a ready-made bun and pink lips."
While on holiday in the Maldives, the star posted a picture of her wearing a blue and white Maxi Kaftan with Camilla's over cut, a gucci belt bag and a gold hoop
"For those who want some inspiration, Rosie is the goal."
"Whether you book or not, it's time to start interested in travel in 2018."
"While most of us need to nod our heads, eager to get rid of responsibility, climate disaster and stress, Rosie Huntington Whiteley just reminds us that living in your best life is a lovely journey."



**Something goes wrong**
“But the truth is we just weren’t getting along.””
“...on the show...”
“...couple officially split the 52 year old former countess was once again faced with rumors of Tom s infidelities from her fellow New York City Housewives this time allegedly taking place after the couple had said their I dos Get push notifications with news features and more...”
“Of course, Luann has a lot of experience knocking down these sorts of claims, having spent two seasons on the hit Bravo show defending their whirlwind romance.”
“But on the reunion, Luann showed a more vulnerable side — admitting that it alarms her to hear the constant rumors.”
“Asked what she would do if those claims ended up having validity, Luann gave a swift answer.”
““I would definitely leave,” she said in a clip of the reunion released Wednesday morning.”
““I would.”
“After I kill him.”
“I’d kill him first and then I’d leave.”


"But the truth is we don't get along well."
“… In the show
“… The 52 year old former countess, who is officially separated from the couple, is once again facing rumors of Tom's infidelity from a New York City housewife, this time after the couple said they "will receive news features and more tweets..."
"Of course, Luan has a lot of experience in refuting this claim. He spent two seasons on the hit Bravo show defending their whirlwind romance."
"But during the reunion, Luan showed a more vulnerable side - admitting that she was alerted by constant rumors."
"When asked what she would do if these statements worked out, Luan gave a quick answer."
"I will definitely leave," she said in a reunion clip released on Wednesday morning
"I will."
"After I killed him."
"I'll kill him first and then leave."



Number  335
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The evening looks like it was still a hit even though it wasn’t what the couple was planning.”
“Miley posted a video of her getting down in her wedding dress to Mark Ronson’s and Bruno Mars’ “Uptown Funk.”See more: Miley Cyrus' Brother Braison Cyrus is Engaged!”
“According to more posts from family and friends, everyone close to the couple was in attendance.”
“If that comment wasn't enough, another post from the bride reveals Hemsworth's new accessory—his wedding band!”
“Under a photo of Miley and Hemsworth kissing, a commenter wrote, “Congratulations you married the hottest man on Hollywood,” and the singer responded saying “I knooooowwwww right,” further confirming the two did indeed tie the knot.”
“The groom opted for a more casual look as well, pairing his black tux with white sneakers, which is apparently just what Miley likes.”
“News reports the entire wedding likely cost the couple around $17,500.)”
“(E!”
“People points out Tish even changed into jeans after the ceremony.”
“Despite the price tag on Miley's dress, the evening looked pretty relaxed.”


"It's not the couple's plan, but it looks very popular tonight."
Miley posted a video of her wearing a wedding dress downstairs to mark Ronson and Bruno Mars about "fear of going to town.". More information: Miley Cyrus's brother, Branson Cyrus, is engaged
"According to more posts from family and friends, people around the couple attended."
If that's not enough, another post from the bride reveals that Hemsworth's new accessory is his wedding ring
"Under a photo of Miley and hamsworth kissing, a critic wrote," congratulations on your marriage to the sexiest man in Hollywood. "The singer responded," I know you're right, "further confirming that they were married
"The groom also chose a more casual look, black evening dress with white sneakers, which is obviously what Miley likes."
"The news reports say the whole wedding may have cost the couple about $17500."
“（E！”
"People pointed out that tish even changed into jeans after the wedding."
"Despite the price tag on Miley's skirt, it looks easy tonight."



Number  336
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She has been very frank with her fans about her struggle to lose weight and how the stress from her bad marriage made her eat more.”
“Shannon also revealed David became distant from her when she gained 40lbs.”
“...and the word has spread around Newport Beach...”
“It s disgusting and cruel that David would be putting this out so publicly as their divorce is not yet finalized a source told People Falling apart Shannon 53 shared this inspirational quote to Instagram last week He s been seeing this woman for at least a few weeks now...”
“News at the time.”
“'David wasted no time and has already started dating again and has moved on entirely,' an insider told E!”
“It first emerged last month that David was no longer hiding his new love as he referred to himself as 'the lucky one' in the comments of Instagram photo Lesley shared of the two of them.”
“'He’s always been selfish and is clearly not thinking about how this will affect his children.'”
“...would be putting this out so publicly as their divorce is not yet finalized and they share three daughters together they added...”
“Moving on Lesley is a Newport Beach local who has two children of her own Taking the high road RHOC s Shannon Beador has been blindsided that ex David has a new girlfriend and is taking it publicly so soon after their split It s disgusting and cruel that David...”


"She was very honest with her fans about the hardships of losing weight and how the pressure of a bad marriage made her eat more."
"Shannon also revealed that when she gained 40 pounds, David became estranged from her."
“… The news has spread all over Newport Beach... "
"It's disgusting and cruel for David to say it so openly before their divorce is finalized. The source told" the man who broke up. "Shannon 53 shared this inspiring message with instagram last week. He has been dating this woman for at least a few weeks..."
"The news at the time."
"David didn't waste time, he's started dating again, and he's gone completely," one insider told e! "
"Last month, for the first time, it was reported that David no longer kept his new love secret because he called himself" lucky "in instagram photos, and Leslie shared the photos of them."
"He has always been selfish, obviously not thinking about the impact on his children."
“… It will be made public because their divorce has not been finalized and they have three daughters together, they added
"Leslie is a local from Newport Beach. She has two children and is on the highway. Shannon beador blindly believes that former David has a new girlfriend, and he made it public soon after their breakup, which makes David feel sick and cruel... "



Number  337
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...very much always in my corner supporting me Photo credit Instagram Lauren Bushnell...”
“I don t know if there s this perfect recipe for success but I think if anything the thing I appreciate most about him is that he is super supportive and he s always pushing me to do things that maybe I wouldn t have done and again he s...”
““I feel like we’re in the same circle ,so obviously I’m sure we both see what the other is doing and are aware of that,” Bushnell, 28, told PEOPLE.”
““I mean, there’s no bad blood, but we don’t talk all that often.”Bushnell revealed that she did text Higgins, 30, when he launched his Generous Coffee company.”
““I know that was something very important to him,” she said.”
““He had been working on it when we were together, so I shot him a text and congratulated him and all that.”
“But other than a text here and there, not a lot.”
“If I were to see him at an event like this or wherever, I don’t think it would be weird.”
“I would love to say hello and congratulate him because he’s doing so many great things and kind of catch up.”
“I think what we have going is working, and I think we both wish each other the best.”Bushnell and Higgins got engaged on season 20 of The Bachelor.”


“… Always in my corner to support my photo credit instagram Lauren Bushnell... "
"I don't know if there is such a perfect secret of success, but I think if what I appreciate most is his super support, he always pushes me to do things, maybe I won't do it, he will again..."
Bushnell, 28, told people magazine: "I feel like we're in the same circle, so it's obvious that I'm sure we all see what each other is doing and we all realize it."
Bushnell revealed that when Higgins, 30, started a generous coffee company, she did text him
"I know it's important to him," she said
"He was writing all the time when we were together, so I sent him a text message congratulating him and the others."
"But there are not many words except here and there."
"I don't think it would be strange to see him at events like this or anywhere."
"I'm happy to say hello to him and congratulate him, because he's done a lot of great things and he's catching up a bit."
Bushnell and Higgins are engaged in singles season 20



Number  338
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Either way, Kimmel better be on call.”
“Johnson is now ready to head to Shanghai and London on the press tour for Rampage, but he said the doctor gave him the okay; his newborn will likely stay put until her due date on April 25.”
““Frances, we’re gonna have to exchange numbers because — just between you and I, I know no one else is watching — we’re gonna get married,” he said.”
“The Oscar winner had taken the time on the Golden Globes stage to acknowledge Johnson’s 16-year-old daughter, Simone Garcia Johnson, who had been serving as Golden Globes ambassador.”
“The other day on The Ellen DeGeneres Show, the Rock star joked about bringing Frances McDormand into his relationship with Hashian.”
“One, “it’s patronizing” to act like you’re “the mayor and you’re cutting the ribbon.” The second reason, “I don’t want to screw up my kid’s bellybutton.”Johnson’s celebrity dream family is growing fast, not just with Kimmel.”
“I’ll get in there, I’ll scrub real good — I know how to wash my hands really, really well.”The one thing Kimmel won’t do, though, is cut the umbilical cord.”
“I will wear one of your outfits, the whole thing.”
“I’d be more than happy to fill in for yah.”
““Can I be honest with you?”


"Anyway, Kimmel had better be on call."
Johnson is now preparing to go to press conferences in Shanghai and London, but he said doctors agreed that his newborn might stay in place until her due date on April 25
"Francis, we have to exchange numbers because - between you and me, I know nobody's watching - we're getting married," he said
"The Oscar winner spent a lot of time on the Golden Globe stage thanking Johnson's 16-year-old daughter, Simone Garcia Johnson, who has been a golden globe ambassador."
"On Ellen DeGeneres the other day, the rock star joked about bringing Francis mcdorman into his relationship with hashian."
"First, pretend you're the mayor and you're cutting the ribbon. It's patronage." Second, I don't want to screw up my child's navel. "Johnson's celebrity dream family is growing rapidly, not just with Kimmel."
"I'll go in, I'll scrub well - I know how to wash my hands, really, really good." But one thing Kimmel won't do is cut the umbilical cord. "
"I'll wear your suit, the whole thing."
"I'd be happy to take your place."
"Can I tell you the truth?"



Number  339
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’ve got my life back.””
“But I know that I’m not going to Atlanta in July, that I’m staying [in LA]….”
“… I actually don’t know.”
“Is it death?”
“Asked about Cristal fate, Kelley, a Peruvian-born Australian actress, said, “Is it a coma?”
“The decision to make the stepmom Hispanic was an effort to bring the 1980s soap to the 21st century and better reflect the diversity of America today as well as add a race/class dimension to the family conflicts, though fan reaction to the character has been somewhat mixed.”
“The dynamic on the show already changed with the introduction of Nicollette Sheridan as Alexis Carrington late in Season 1.”
“It also was the case on the CW’s Dynasty, whose Season 1 key art featured Gillies, Kelley and Show.”
“...the CWCristal was a version of the Krystle Jennings character in the original series, played by Linda Evans, which was considered a female lead.”
“...soon to be stepmother Cristal Kelley a Hispanic woman marrying into this WASP family and America s most powerful class...”


"My life is back."
"But I know I'm not going to Atlanta in July, I'm going to stay in Los Angeles..."
“… I really don't know. "
"Is it death?"
Asked about Cristo's fate, Peruvian born Australian actress Kelly said, "is it a coma?"
"The decision to make stepmother Hispanic is to bring the soap opera of the 1980s into the 21st century, better reflect the diversity of today's America, and add an ethnic / class dimension to family conflict, although fans' reactions to the role are somewhat uneven."
"With Nicolette Sheridan as Alexis Carrington at the end of season one, the dynamics of the show have changed."
"The same is true of the CW Dynasty, whose major works of art in the first season include Geely, Kelly and the show."
“…… Cwcrystal is a version of the role of Krystle Jennings in the original series, played by Linda Evans and considered the heroine. "
“…… Kristal Kelly, a Hispanic woman who is about to become a stepmother, married the WASP family and the most powerful class in the United States... "



Number  340
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A Wrinkle in Time is set to be released to theaters in 2017.”
“Thanks to @DisneyStudios for breaking this glass with me.”
“DuVernay is now part of a select group of filmmakersDuVernay joined the production earlier this year, and in doing so, became one of a select group of filmmakers, ones who directed a major movie with a budget in excess of nine figures.”
“According to the LA Times, she’s also part of two much smaller groups: women who have directed a film of that scale, as well as directors of color.”
“The milestone is a notable one: it demonstrates the faith a studio has in its director, and puts DuVernay’s name before a wide audience.”
“The film will be written by Frozen co-director Jennifer Lee and will star Oprah Winfrey.”
“Winfrey is an executive producer for DuVernay's OWN show Queen Sugar.”
“DuVernay pointed out that she wasn’t the first woman of color to be capable of directing such a feature.”
“Not the first capable of doing so.”
“Not by a long shot.”


"The wrinkles of time will be shown in 2017."
"Thank you @ Disney Studios for breaking this cup with me."
"Duvinai is now one of a select group of filmmakers. Duvinai joined the production earlier this year and is one of a select group of filmmakers who directed a big movie with a budget of more than nine figures
According to the Los Angeles Times, she also belongs to two much smaller groups: one is a woman who has directed films of this size, and the other is a color film director
"This milestone is a remarkable one: it shows a studio's trust in the director and puts duelney's name in front of the audience."
"The film will be directed by Jennifer Lee, CO director of frozen, and starring Oprah Winfrey."
"Winfrey is executive producer of Duvernay's own show, Queen sugar."
"Duverne pointed out that she was not the first woman of color to be able to direct such a film."
"Not the first person to be able to do that."
"No way."



Number  341
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I have a container of organic L'Occitane shea butter ($39, Sephora) that has lasted me for three months and I use it regularly.”
“It also spreads well so you don't have to use a lot.”
“Shea butter is great to rub on your entire body, scalp included.”
“Jordyn didn't specify what brand she uses, but I recommend any formula that is made of 100 percent shea butter, instead of it simply being listed as a primary ingredient.”
“Shea butter is everything.”
““Shea butter is key!”For clarity, people who are not Black get ashy as well, but I get where Jordyn was going with her statement.”
“>> Click to buy“Yes, I’m Black, and yes, I get ashy,” she said during her Refinery 29 interview.”


"I have a container of organic oxiracetam shea butter (39 dollars, Sephora) that has been used for three months and I use it a lot."
"It also spreads well, so you don't have to use it a lot."
"Shea butter can be applied to the whole body, including the scalp."
"Jordan didn't specify what brand she used, but I recommend any formula made from 100% shea butter, rather than simply listing it as the main ingredient."
"Shea butter is everything."
"Shea butter is the key! "For the sake of clarity, people who are not black will be disheartened, but I understand what Jordan said."
"> > Click to buy" yes, I'm black, yes, I'm gray, "she said in an interview



Number  342
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Anyway, the two have probably forgotten they were ever even married to each other, so we can go back to pretending “The Newlyweds” never even existed.”
“What a mess.”
“And it only took 12 years!”
“While mostly it’s funny to think of either Simpson or Lachey as relevant these days, a producer of the long gone MTV series is going around exposing secrets.”
“She certainly bided her time!”
“Sue Kolinsky, who worked on the series all three seasons, dished some behind-the-scene secrets to Complex and basically, she maybe thinks Simpson wasn’t just acting like a dumb blonde.”
““There were times when we were like, ‘Hm, does she really not know what this means?”
“'” Kolinsky said.”
““I truly believe the whole ‘chicken & fish‘ situation was accurate.”
“She really did not know.”


"Either way, they may have forgotten that they were married, so we can go back and pretend that the 'newlyweds' don't exist."
"What a mess."
"It only took 12 years!"
"It's interesting to think that Simpson and ratch are related now, but a long lost producer of MTV series is going around revealing secrets."
"Of course she's waiting for the moment!"
"Sue collinsky has been working for three seasons of the series, and she tells complexity some of the secrets behind the scenes. Basically, she may think Simpson doesn't just act like a stupid blonde."
"Sometimes we say, 'well, doesn't she really know what that means?"
"Collinsky said
"I really believe that the whole 'chicken and fish' situation is accurate."
"She really doesn't know."



Number  343
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And to be there with her and click back into our genuine friendship and also our Stars Hollow friendship was… really mind-blowing.”Rewatch the alumni parade above and then tell us in the comments which GG: AYITL cameo was your favorite.”
“...the end of filming and I thought I already cried every tear that I had...”
“Leading lady Lauren Graham previously described McCarthy s 11th hour return was the final piece of the puzzle adding It was so important to me that she was part of this On the day the Lorelai Sookie reunion scene was shot Graham recalled being a complete mess That was near...”
“(Hey, it’s something!)”
“...week s DVD release...”
“While the two disc set does not boast any bonus material the 90 second cameo themed highlight reel above featuring glimpses of such Stars Hollow MVPs as Melissa McCarthy s Sookie Milo Ventimiglia s Jess Liza Weil s Paris and Jared Padalecki s Dean was created specifically to promote this...”
“On Tuesday — which is pretty much one year to the day that Gilmore Girls: A Year in the Life made its debut on Netflix — the four 90-minute installments will be available for purchase on DVD and Blu-ray.”
“The Gilmore Girls revival is the gift that keeps on giving — and, on Nov, 28, that will be the case quite literally.”


"With her, click back to our true friendship and our star's empty friendship It's really exciting. " Re watch the alumni parade above and tell us in the comments which GG: ayitl guest is your favorite. "
“… At the end of the shooting, I think I have cried all my tears... "
"The heroine Lauren Graham described McCarthy's 11 hour return as the last part of the puzzle before, adding that it was very important for me, and she was one of them on the day of the scene of Lorelai Sookie's reunion. Graham recalled that there was chaos and it was nearby..."
"Hey, that's amazing!"
“… DVD release week
"Although there is no extra material for this set of two disc records, the 90 second guest theme movie above shows people the figures of Mingxing and MVP, such as Melissa McCarthy's Suki Milo Ventimiglia's Jesse Lisa Weil's Paris and Jared padaleki's dean, which is specially made to promote this..."
"On Tuesday, almost a year before the premiere of Gilmore girl: a year of life on Netflix, the four 90 minute films will be available on DVD and Blu ray."
"The revival of Gilmore Girls is a gift that keeps giving - November 28, which will be very practical."



Number  344
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We got to get it all done up and trimmed and waxed and this and that and it’s all swollen and crazy and you’re just wondering, what just happened?””
““But, I care about it.”
““Your vajayjay does not look the same for a very long time,” she told the publication, adding that a friend told her not to worry about how her nether regions looked.”
“In the meantime, I just tried to enjoy my ability to feed my baby!”In a recent interview with USA Today, Rowland also tackled another body part that changed dramatically following Titan’s birth: her vagina.”
“...to see someone wink wink after I have my second kid...”
“Even with the silicon action it was like some of the air had been sucked out and they just sort of hung there like flapjacks she said noting I can t speak for everyone but I know I m going...”
“Rowland added that despite her previous breast augmentation, the size and shape of her breasts still changed drastically from breastfeeding.”
““My boobs themselves were so long and stretchy that I sometimes felt like I could’ve swung them over my shoulders,” the former Destiny’s Child singer continued.”
“(She and her husband, Tim Weatherspoon, welcomed their son Titan Jewell back in 2014.)”
“...tricky territory of parenthood...”


"We've got to fix it all, trim it, wax it. It's swollen like crazy. You just want to know what happened?"
"But I care."
"Your vajj looks different for a long time," she told the magazine, adding that a friend told her not to worry about how her lower body area looks
"In the meantime, I just want to enjoy my ability to feed my children! "In a recent interview with USA today, Roland also talked about another part of Titan's body that has changed dramatically since his birth: the vagina."
“… After I had my second child, I saw someone blink... "
"Even if it's silicon, it's like some air has been sucked out, they're just a little hanging there like pancakes," she said. "I can't represent everyone, but I know I'm going to..."
Roland added that despite her previous breast augmentation surgery, her breast size and shape had changed dramatically since breastfeeding
"My breasts are long and elastic, and sometimes I feel like I can swing them over my shoulders," the former son of destiny singer continued
"She and her husband Tim weatherspoon welcomed their son Titan Jewell in 2014."
“… The tricky area of parenting... "



Number  345
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We're told Hailey and Justin left the club around 3 AM holding hands.”
“Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media.”
“Justin goofed around a bit too ... busting out the Floss dance as the crowd cheered him on.”
“They were definitely not trying to keep things on the DL ... showing plenty of PDA for all to see.”
“Our sources say Justin and Hailey walked in together around 1 AM ... where they hung out on a VIP balcony, held hands and danced together.”
“The Biebs and Hailey were spotted hanging out down in M-I-A on Sunday ... first hitting up a church conference before chowin' down at the ritzy Casa Tua, and then hitting up LIV Nightclub at Fontainebleau.”
“Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin partied like it was 2015 ... looking very much like a couple turning up all over Miami.”


"We heard that Haley and Justin left the club hand in hand around 3 a.m."
"Waiting for your permission to load instagram media."
"Justin's a bit of a prank... When the crowd cheered for him, he flossed
"They definitely don't want things to go on... Show a large number of PDAs for everyone to see. "
"Our source said Justin and Haley came in at about 1 a.m... They hang out on the VIP balcony, hand in hand, and dance together. "
"On Sunday, somebody found Bieber and Haley hanging out at m-i-a... Before going to the luxurious casatua Hotel, first go to the church for a meeting, and then go to the liv nightclub in Fontainebleau
"Justin Bieber and Haley Baldwin revel like 2015... It looks like a couple in Miami



Number  346
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  347
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More:George Clooney to return to TV in 'Catch-22' miniseriesContributing: Andrea Mandell...”
“He will also direct the series with production partner Grant Heslov.”
“Clooney will portray Col. Cathcart (played by Martin Balsam in the film), marking Clooney's first TV role since he left NBC's ER in 1999.”
“Clooney is in Italy filming a "Catch-22" miniseries that will run on Hulu, based on Joseph Heller's 1961 novel that was also made into a 1970 film.”
“A figure appearing to be Clooney is thrown over the front of his bike and up in the air before landing on the asphalt, where the car driver and other witnesses come to help.”
“The video shows what is reported to be Clooney's scooter crashing into the car while another scooter alongside him manages to veer around it.”
“It shows a blue Mercedes veering into oncoming traffic, apparently to turn into a residential compound near Olbia.”
“"He is recovering at home and will be fine.”Surveillance video of the crash was obtained late Tuesday by the newspaper Corriere della Sera.”
““George was treated and released from an Olbia hospital," his representative Stan Rosenfield told USA TODAY.”
“He was taken to a hospital in Olbia, but his injuries were not serious and he was discharged.”


"More: George Clooney's return to television in Catch-22: Andrea Mandel..."
"He will also direct the series with his production partner grant Heslov."
Clooney will play captain keskat (played by Martin balsam in the film), marking his first TV role since leaving NBC's emergency room in 1999
Clooney is filming a mini play of Catch-22 in Italy, which will be based on Joseph Heller's 1961 novel, which was also made into a 1970 film
"A person who looks like Clooney was thrown in front of a bicycle, flew into the air, landed on the asphalt road, and the driver and other witnesses came to help."
"The video shows that Clooney's motorcycle is reported to have hit the car while another motorcycle next to it tries to get around it."
"It shows a blue Mercedes turning to an oncoming vehicle, apparently to a residential area near Olbia."
"He's recovering at home. He'll be fine." On Tuesday night, the Corriere della Sera newspaper obtained surveillance video of the crash
His representative, Stan Rosenfeld, told USA Today: "George was treated and discharged from orbia hospital."
"He was taken to a hospital in orbia, but the injury was not serious and he was discharged."



Number  348
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:-Kim Kardashian Uses This Drugstore Treatment to Keep Her Platinum Hair From Breaking-Kim Kardashian West Just Teased Her Next KKW Beauty Product-Kim Kardashian Just Chopped Her Hair Into a Blunt Lob...”
“Kim is pink, Kris is blond, Kylie has a $1.4 million push present—and we're all just still trying to keep up with those Kardashians.”
“On Sunday she took to social media to announce her newest shade: a bright, bright, bright pink.”
“We had a hint something was coming on Saturday, when she basically sounded an alarm for a future color drop: "I can't even tell you how over my blond hair I am!"”
“...she tweet-raged.”
“(As someone who is a very much dyed platinum blond too, I can attest that we all have those days.)”
“Kardashian West, however, did something about it.”
“A big something.”
“Although she hinted that she was a "brunette at heart" during a Create + Cultivate panel on Saturday, she definitely didn't go back to her roots with her recent dye job.”
“Instead, she went bold—and it's pretty great.”


"Related story: - Kim Kardashian used this drugstore's treatment to prevent her platinum hair from breaking. Kim Kardashian West just teased her about her next kkw beauty product. Kim Kardashian just cut her hair into an obtuse angle..."
"Gold is pink, Chris is gold, Kelly has $1.4 million in promotional gifts, and we're still trying to keep up with those kardashians."
On Sunday, she announced her latest color on social media: bright pink
"We got a hint on Saturday when she basically sounded the alarm for the future color decline:" I can't even tell you how much I like my blonde hair. "
“…… She was furious on twitter. "
(as a person with deep blonde hair, I can prove that we all have those days.)
"But Kardashian West did something."
"A big thing."
Although she hinted at the create + culture panel on Saturday that she was a "deep-seated brunette," she never went back to her recent hair dyeing work
"On the contrary, she became bold and wonderful."



Number  349
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Either way, Damon had nothing but kind things to say about his longtime friend, even as he was out promoting his own work, saying that Affleck is just “an amazing guy.””
“...usually highfalutin affair s Even though Ben Affleck and Matt Damon might not have had the chance to spend Thanksgiving together there is a chance that they may get to see each other for Christmas...”
“...on Thanksgiving it is likely that they will in fact be in the same area code during Christmas Matt Damon even said that whenever he can he does attempt to crash all of Ben Affleck s parties since they are...”
“Although the actor may not know what is happening for Christmas Damon joked that he tries to not see him as much as possible He went on to say that although they may not have been in the same state...”
“While the two actors may not have gotten to see each other for Thanksgiving, there is still Christmas to look forward to, only this time the man without plans happens to be Matt Damon.”
“It’s my fault that I left.” Simply put, there was just no way the two friends could see each other with Matt Damon being in a completely different state.”
“Damon jokingly blamed himself for the fact that they did not end up spending any time together on the holiday, saying “it is not his fault he didn’t spend Thanksgiving with me.”
“During his discussion about his holiday plans, Matt Damon laughed and said that it was definitely not Ben Affleck’s fault that they did not get to see each other this year for Thanksgiving.”
“The actor shared that rather than spend Thanksgiving in LA, he ended up flying back to Boston in order to spend the holiday with his family there.”
“According to Damon, it seems he actually had other plans for the holiday that led to him not being in Los Angeles.”


"In any case, Damon has only good words to say to his old friends, even though he's promoting his work, saying that Affleck is just a" great guy. "
“…… They are usually talkers. Even if Ben Affleck and Matt Damon don't have a chance to spend Thanksgiving together, they may see each other at Christmas... "
“… On Thanksgiving, they are likely to be in the same area code during Christmas, and Matt Damon even said that whenever possible, he would try to sabotage all Ben Affleck's parties because they are... "
"Although the actor may not know what will happen at Christmas, Damon joked that he tried not to see him. He went on to say that although they may not be in the same state..."
"Although the two actors may not have seen each other on Thanksgiving, Christmas is still something to look forward to, except that Matt Damon happens to be the one who has no plans this time."
"It's my fault I left." In short, Matt Damon is in a completely different state, and it's impossible for the two friends to see each other
Damon jokingly blamed himself for not having Thanksgiving together. "He didn't have Thanksgiving with me, it's not his fault," he said
"When discussing holiday plans, Matt Damon said with a smile that it's not Ben Affleck's fault that they didn't meet this Thanksgiving."
Instead of spending Thanksgiving in Los Angeles, the actor said, he flew back to Boston for a holiday with his family
"According to Damon, he really seems to have other holiday plans that lead to his absence from Los Angeles."



Number  350
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...p m Vikings History DECEMBER Wednesday Dec 6 Shut Eye Hulu Friday Dec 8 12 a m The Crown Netflix Sunday Dec 17 7 p m A Christmas Story Fox live musical telecast TBA The Punisher Netflix...”
“ET Monday Night Football ESPN 8 p m The Orville Fox Outlander Starz 9 p m The Deuce HBO Fear the Walking Dead AMC final season Top of the Lake China Girl Sundance TV Tuesday Sept 12 The Mindy Project Hulu final season Wednesday Sept 13 10 30 p m...”
“CBS Wednesday Sept 27 8 p m Empire Fox Survivor CBS The Blacklist NBC The Goldbergs ABC 8 30 p m Speechless ABC 9 p m Modern Family ABC Law Order SVU NBC SEAL Team CBS 9 30 p m American Housewife ABC 10 p m Criminal Minds CBS Designated...”
“The Good Doctor ABC The Brave NBC Tuesday Sept 26 8 p m Lethal Weapon Fox NCIS CBS 9 p m This Is Us NBC Bull CBS The Mick Fox 9 30 p m Brooklyn Nine Nine Fox 10 p m Law Order The Menendez Murders NBC NCIS New Orleans...”
“9 30 p m Talking Trek CBS All Access Monday Sept 25 8 p m The Big Bang Theory CBS The Voice NBC 8 30 p m Young Sheldon CBS 9 p m Kevin Can Wait CBS 9 30 p m Me Myself I CBS 10 p m Scorpion CBS”
“Up With the Kardashians 10th Anniversary Special E”
“House Netflix Transparent Amazon RELATED The Standout Performances of the 2016 2017 TV Season Celebrities you forgot were on Dancing With the Stars Saturday Sept 23 7 a m DuckTales Disney XD Sunday Sept 24 8 30 p m Star Trek Discovery CBS CBS All Access 9 p m Keeping...”
“ET 69th Primetime Emmy Awards CBS Monday Sept 18 8 p m Dancing With the Stars ABC Wednesday Sept 20 10 p m The Good Place NBC Thursday Sept 21 8 p m Gotham Fox 10 30 p m American Beauty Star Lifetime Friday Sept 22 12 a m Fuller...”
“Broad City Comedy Central Thursday Sept 14 Riviera Sundance Now Sunday Sept 17 5 p m PT 8 p m...”
“Friday, Sept. 812 a.m. – BoJack Horseman (Netflix)8 p.m. – Unplugged (MTV)Sunday, Sept. 103:55 p.m. PT/6:55 p.m.”


“… P M Viking history December Wednesday December 6 eyes closed Hulu Friday December 8 12:00 am crown Netflix Sunday December 17 7:00 a Christmas Story fox live music broadcast TBA Punisher Netflix... "
"Monday night football ESPN 8:00 p.m. Orville fox outlander stats 9:00 p.m. draw HBO fear of walking dead AMC last season Lake top Chinese girl Sundance TV Tuesday September 12 Mindy project Hulu last season Wednesday September 13 10:30 p.m.."
"CBS Wednesday, September 27, 8pm Empire fox survivors CBS blacklist NBC kimberg ABC 8pm silent ABC 9pm modern family ABC Legal Order SVU NBC seals CBS 9pm American housewife ABC 10pm criminal psychology CBS designated..."
"Good doctor ABC brave NBC Tuesday, September 26, 8pm lethal weapon fox NCIS CBS 9pm this is NBC bull CBS Mick fox 9pm Brooklyn 9pm fox 10pm legal order menedes murder NBC NCIS New Orleans..."
"9:30 p.m. conversation trek all CBS interviews Monday September 25th 8:00 p.m. big bang theory CBS voice CBS 8:30 p.m. young Sheldon CBS 9:30 p.m. Kevin can wait for CBS 9:30 p.m. myself CBS 10:00 p.m. scorpion Columbus "Biya Broadcasting Corporation"
"Kardashian 10th anniversary special"
"House Netflix transparent Amazon tells about the wonderful performances of the stars in the 2016-2017 TV season. You forget that they are dancing with the stars. Saturday, September 23, 7am, Ducktales, Disney XD, Sunday, September 24, 8pm, Star Trek discovery CBS, CBS all access, 9pm, keep..."
"CBS will dance with the stars at the 69th Emmy Awards ceremony on Monday, September 18, 8pm ABC Wednesday, September 20, 10pm the good place NBC Thursday, September 21, 8pm Gotham fox, 10pm 10:30pm American beauty star lifetime Friday, September 22, 12am fuller..."
"Guangcheng comedy center, Thursday, September 14, Riviera, Sundays, September 17, 5pm, 8pm..."
"Friday, September 8, 12:00 a.m. - bojack horseman (Netflix) 8:00 p.m. - Unplugged (MTV) Sunday, September 13, 103:55 p.m. / 6:55 p.m."



Number  351
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now, as Angelina begins her new life as a single mother, it seems she has forged a closer bond with the father she once despised.”
“'Angelina's OK. She's holding on,' he said, adding that he planned to spend the festive season with his grandchildren.”
“Twins Vivienne and Knox carry bags as they leave the restaurant the logo is from the fancy Beverly Hills Hotel Strained relationship Jon and Angelina had only sporadic contact during her childhood Single mother Pax follows Angelina out of the building Sisters Zahara and Vivienne are pictured heading back to...”
“It is not known what caused her to fall out with Voight, who played her father Lord Croft in the movie.”
“But, perhaps because she did not want to be seen as trading on her father's fame, she had dropped the Voight in favour of her middle name by the time she appeared as Lara Croft, a female version of Indiana Jones.”
“...only sporadic contact during her childhood yet in her early TV and film work she still used her full name of Angelina Jolie Voight...”
“Family dinner The father and daughter took her children Pax Zahara Vivienne and Knox to a sushi restaurant for dinner Family ties It is still rare that the 78 year old is seen with his grandchildren following his six and a half year estrangement from Angelina Jon and Angelina had...”
“The star still best known for his appearance in the 1969 movie Midnight Cowboy split from wife Marcheline Bertrand when their daughter was only an infant, with the two divorcing by the time Angelina turned four.”
“It is still rare that the 78-year-old is seen with his grandchildren, following the end of his six-and-a-half year estrangement from Angelina.”
“Jon, who wore a shirt and jacket, completed the family group.”


"Now, when Angelina starts her new life as a single mother, she seems to have a closer connection with her father, whom she once despised."
"Angelina is OK. "She stuck with it," he said, adding that he planned to spend the holiday with his grandchildren
"Twins Vivienne and Knox leave the restaurant with their bags. The sign comes from the chic Beverly Hills Hotel. The tense relationship between Jon and Angelina only has sporadic contact in childhood. Single mother Pax follows Angelina out of the building. Sisters Zahara and Vivienne are photographed back..."
"I don't know what caused her to fall out with Voith, who plays her father Lord Croft in the movie."
"But, perhaps because she didn't want to be seen as exploiting her father's reputation, when she appeared in Lara Croft, the female version of Indiana Jones, she gave up support for the middle name."
“…… In her early TV and film works, she still used her full name Angelina Jolie Voith.... "
"Family dinner: father and daughter take their children Pax Zahara Vivienne and Knox to a sushi restaurant for dinner. After six and a half years of estrangement from Angelina Jon and Angelina, the 78 year old family still rarely sees him with his grandchildren..."
In the 1969 movie midnight cowboy, he and his wife, marcheline Bertrand, split up when their daughter was very young and divorced when Angelina was four
"After six and a half years of estrangement with Angelina, it's still rare for the 78 year old to be with his grandchildren."
Jon, wearing a shirt and jacket, completed the task of the whole family



Number  352
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Anna Faris (@annafaris) on Apr 5, 2017 at 1:51pm PDT”
“I’m breaking into a sweat as we talk about it.”Unqualified is set to be released Oct. 24.”
“I feel like leaving the country for a while.”
“But please know, I am so scared.”
“She addressed her fans in the podcast by stating, “Dear listeners,” she began, “I would love it so much if you picked up my book.”
“...actress also admitted she is more terrified than ever...”
“I couldn t believe how revealing you were her podcast co host Sim Sarna shared because there was so much that you hadn t told me personally that I read in the book for the first time Although she is thrilled to share this side of herself the House Bunny...”
“The biggest question that fans have been wondering is whether Anna will discuss her failed relationship with Pratt.”
“News to be written by Chris Pratt.”
“It feels a little scary.”Anna’s entrance into the literary world has been described as “part memoir, part humorous, unflinching advice” on relationships and “finding love.” Another interesting chapter of the book will come through the foreword which was previously reported by E!”


"Post shared by Anna Faris (@ annafaris) at 1:51 p.m. PDT on April 5, 2017"
"When we talked about it, I was sweating." Unqualified will be released on October 24
"I want to leave this country for a while."
"But you know, I'm so scared."
She told her fans on the podcast, "Dear listeners," she began, "if you pick up my book, I'll love it very much."
“…… The actress also admitted that she was more scared than ever before... "
"I can't believe you're her podcast co host, SIM Sarna, because there are so many things you didn't tell me in person. I read them in the book for the first time, although she's very happy to share this side of her house..."
"The biggest question fans have always wanted to know is whether Anna will discuss her relationship with Pratt's failure."
"The news will be written by Chris Pratt."
"It's kind of scary." Anna's entry into the literary world is described as "a part of memoir, a part of humor, firm advice" and "looking for love". Another interesting chapter will be through the preface, which was previously written by E! "



Number  353
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“❄️ A post shared by Mary Elizabeth Winstead (@mewins) on Feb 19, 2017 at 9:24pm PST”
“Good night!”
“Pretty lovely Canadian Sunday.”
“I love you always, Riley.”In February, Winstead shared the photo with McGregor, below, on Instagram.”
“We are still ride or die, just in a different way now.”
“Winstead also split with her husband in May, writing on Instagram at the time, “We’ve decided to move on from our marriage, but we will stay best friends and collaborators for all our days.”
“The pair have four children together.”
“Shortly after the photos appeared, a source told People that McGregor and Mavrakis separated in May, but had kept the decision private.”
“The news broke when the British tabloid The Sun published photos of McGregor and his Fargo co-star Mary Elizabeth Winstead kissing at a London café.”
“Photo: David Livingston/Getty ImagesActor Ewan McGregor has split from his wife of 22 years, French production designer Eve Mavrakis, according to People.”


“ ❄️  Post shared by Mary Elizabeth Winstead (@ mewins) at 9:24 PM PST on February 19, 2017
"Good night!"
"Very lovely canadian Sunday."
"I love you forever, Riley." In February, Winstead shared the photo with McGregor on instagram
"We're still waiting to die, but in a different way."
Winstead also broke up with her husband in May, when she wrote on instagram: "we have decided to leave the marriage, but we will always be best friends and collaborators."
"They have four children."
"Shortly after the photos appeared, a source told people that McGregor and mavrakis separated in May, but kept the decision secret."
"The news came when the sun, a British tabloid, published pictures of McGregor and his Fargo partner, Mary Elizabeth Winstead, kissing in a London cafe
"Photo source: according to people magazine, David Livingston / Getty photo producer Ewan McGregor broke up with his wife of 22 years, French production designer Eve mavrakis."



Number  354
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
““And after the miscarriage, this is truly a blessing … like every child!”Teen Mom OG airs on MTV Mondays at 9 p.m.”
“Catelynn Lowell and Tyler Baltierra are expecting a daughter, the Teen Mom OG couple revealed exclusively to Us Weekly.”
““I was so shocked that it was a girl because I for sure thought it was a boy!” Lowell, 26, tells Us.”
““Tyler knew the sex before I did.”
“When we did our gender reveal, I was so shocked I almost cried because I wanted a boy so badly.”
“I’m super excited it’s a girl now.”
“Since our miscarriage I just am thankful to get another chance and as long as it s healthy that s all that matters As for trying for a boy in the future Lowell tells Us she and Baltierra 26 have...”
“...already talked about trying again We definitely want to have a boy but if God only wants us to have girls then that s just what it is she explains...”
““It will be a houseful of ALL girls!”


"Wait a minute."
"After the abortion, it's a blessing Just like every child! "Young mothers broadcast og on MTV at 9pm on Monday."
"Caitlin Lowell and Tyler baltira are pregnant with a daughter, the teenage mothers told us weekly exclusively."
"I was shocked. It was a girl, because I must have thought it was a boy! "Lowell, 26, told us."
"Taylor knew sex before I did."
"When we announced our gender, I was so shocked that I almost cried because I wanted a boy so much."
"I'm so excited. I'm a girl now."
"Since we had a miscarriage, I'm very grateful to get another chance, as long as it's healthy, that's the most important thing, because in the future to try a boy, Lowell told us that she and baltila 26 have..."
“… We've said we're going to try again. We definitely want a boy, but if God only wants us to have girls, that's what she explains... "
"It's going to be a house full of all the girls!"



Number  355
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Featured guests during the live-stream included James Corden, Sia, Dita Von Teese, and YouTube stars Liza Koshy and Gigi Gorgeous.”
“The broadcast followed Perry the entire time (including when she was sleeping), culminating in live performance of “Chained to the Rhythm” with Pentatonix.”
“And she live-streamed a YouTube-exclusive special, “Katy Perry – Witness World Wide,” which ran for 96 hours from June 8-12 that drew more than 49 million total views.”
“Perry also will be part of YouTube original series “Best.Cover.Ever,” the singing competition show from Ryan Seacrest Productions and Endemol Shine North America.”
“In addition, Perry recently landed a gig as a judge on ABC’s reboot of “American Idol,” and this week helped announce the audition schedule for the show.”
“Her “Witness” tour in the U.S. and Canada kicks off Sept. 9 and runs through February 2018.”
“...previously set with Roar...”
“Twitter congratulated Perry on reaching the milestone with a retrospective video of her tweets over the years She s also set new records on YouTube with the video for single Bon Appetit topping 16 8 million views in 24 hours after it was released last month breaking her own record...”
“CEO Jack Dorsey told Wall Street analysts in April that Twitter is continuing to battle bogus bots, which he said make up less than 5% of accounts.”
“Of course, how many millions of those followers are actually spam accounts or bots is unclear.”


"Featured guests during the live broadcast include James Colden, SIA, Dita von tis, as well as YouTube stars Lisa cosy and Gigi polans."
Perry was followed throughout the show (including when she was sleeping), and the live performances of "connected to rhythm" and "five tones" ended
She also broadcast YouTube's exclusive feature, "Katie Perry - witness the world," which lasted 96 hours from June 8 to 12, with a total of more than 49 million views
"Perry will also be part of the original YouTube series" the best cover "from Ryan Seacrest productions and endermore's North American singing contest."
"In addition, Perry recently won a judging concert on ABC's relaunched American Idol and helped announce the audition schedule for the show this week."
Her "witness" tour in the United States and Canada began on September 9 and lasted until February 2018
“… Previously set to roar... "
"Twitter congratulates Perry on reaching this milestone by reviewing her twitter videos over the years. She also set a new record on YouTube. The video she released last month broke her own record. Within 24 hours, the number of video visitors with good appetite exceeded 16.8 million.... "
"Chief executive Jack Dorsey told Wall Street analysts in April that Twitter continues to fight against fake robots, which account for less than 5% of all accounts," he said
"Of course, it's not clear how many followers are actually spam accounts or robots."



Number  356
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For obvious reasons, the Firths have never had any desire to make this matter public.”Firth, 57, and Giuggioli have two sons — Luca, 16, and Matteo, 15.”
“Subsequently, Mr. Brancaccia carried out a frightening campaign of harassment over several months, much of which is documented.”
“.”
“The Firths have since reunited.”
“During that time Livia briefly became involved with former friend Mr. Brancaccia.”
“The statement obtained by The Times confirmed the couple’s acknowledgment of the relationship: “A few years ago Colin and Livia privately made the decision to separate.”
“Brancaccia has denied the allegations and told people that Giuggioli, 48, was lying to conceal their affair, which took place between 2015 and 2016.”
“Film producer Giuggioli had claimed that Brancaccia, 55, had been leaving “frightening” messages for her, according to The Times.”


"For obvious reasons, the Firth couple never wanted to make it public." Firth, 57, and zhujili have two sons - Luca, 16, and Matteo, 15
"Then Mr. blancasia carried out a terrible harassment in a few months, most of which were recorded."
“.”
"The five brothers are reunited."
"During this time, Livia had a brief relationship with her former friend, Mr. blanchia."
The statement obtained by the times confirmed the couple's recognition of the relationship: "Colin and Livia made a private decision to separate a few years ago."
"Blancasia denied the charges and told people that the 48 year old was lying to cover up an extramarital affair between 2015 and 2016."
According to the times, filmmaker Giuggioli once claimed that blancasia, 55, had been leaving her a "terrible" message



Number  357
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the video below.”
“Next, it was Fallon's turn to try on the Leia headphones.”
“Daisy Ridley dropped by the Tonight Show on Tuesday to play a round of "Whisper Challenge" with host Jimmy Fallon.”
“Given the release of Ridley's latest film, The Last Jedi, in December, the game was Star Wars themed.”
“The game, a long-running bit on Fallon's show, has guests put on headphones and listen to loud music while Fallon says a phrase and they must read his lips.”
“In true Star Wars fashion, Ridley's headphones were adorned with hair buns the likes of Princess Leia.”
“The first clue Ridley dressed in a Ulla Johnson jumpsuit was challenged to guess was the famous opening lines from Star Wars films A long time ago in a galaxy far far away The Last Jedi star was quickly able...”
“...to get the last bit of the line shouting Something something far far away then succeeded in guessing correctly seconds later...”
“Ridley mouthed the name "Lando Calrissian," the ruler of Cloud City made famous by Billy Dee Williams in 1980's The Empire Strikes Back.”
“After several incorrect guesses of "pickle" and "Elmo," Fallon got it right.”


"Watch the video below."
"Next, it's Fallon's turn to try on the dalea headphones."
Daisy Redley had a "whisper challenge" with host Jimmy Fallon on Tuesday's tonight show
"With Redley's latest movie, the last Jedi, coming out in December, the game is Star Wars themed."
"The game is a long interlude in Fallon's show, where guests put on headphones and listen to loud music, while Fallon says a word, they have to read his lips."
"In real star wars style, Redley's headphones are decorated with Princess Leia's bun."
"Redley is wearing Yola Johnson's jumpsuit. The first clue is the famous opening line of the Star Wars movie that the last Jedi star in the distant galaxy can quickly guess a long time ago..."
“… In order to let the last point of the team shout out something far away, I guess it right in a few seconds. "
Redley's legendary name is "Lando Calrissian". He is the Cloud City ruler who became famous in "Empire Strikes Back" by Billy Di Williams in 1980
"After several false guesses about pickle and Elmo, Fallon got it right."



Number  358
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the new song below:”
“Aguilera will hit the road in support of her sixth studio album, stopping at Ontario’s Casino Rama on Oct. 11.”
“The track, reportedly produced by Jon Bellion, is off Aguilera’s forthcoming album Liberation, which has already spawned “Accelerate” and “Twice” and is set to drop June 15.”
““Little girls, listen closely / ‘cause no one told me / But you deserve to know / That in this world, you are not beholden / You do not owe them your body and your soul,” the duo declares.”
“Christina Aguilera and Demi Lovato on Wednesday released “Fall in Line,” a girl-power anthem they’ll perform live on Sunday night’s Billboard Music Awards on CTV.”


"See the new songs below:
"Aguilera will be on her way to support her sixth studio album, stopping at the Rama casino in Ontario on October 11."
According to reports, the song, produced by Jon belline, has nothing to do with aquilella's upcoming album liberation, which has spawned "acceleration" and "twice" and will be released on June 15
"Listen carefully, little girls / because no one told me / but you should know / in this world, you don't owe them your body and soul," they declared
Christina Aguilera and Demi Lovato released the women's National Anthem "queue" on Wednesday and will perform live at the CTV Billboard Music Awards ceremony on Sunday night



Number  359
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She later dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer after her divorce from Pitt.”
“”The couple announced that they split at the end of the last year, however, they celebrated the New Year together with their annual vacation to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico alongside a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family.”
“She was spotted standing outside the Hollywood venue chatting with Pharrell.”
“On Saturday, Aniston made an appearance at Ellen DeGeneres‘ birthday party without Theroux.”
“They have also had a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest.”
“Theroux was often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home.”
“The two spent quite a bit of time apart in recent months raising questions.”
“Image zoom Pharrell and Jennifer Aniston at Ellen DeGeneres’ birthday.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”
“Aniston celebrated in Malibu, California with a gathering including pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton-Smith and Kristin Hahn on Sunday.”


"Then she divorced Pete and dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer."
"The couple announced that they broke up at the end of last year. However, they celebrated the new year together, went on holiday in San Lucas, Cabo, Mexico, and had several close friends, including Jason Bateman and his family."
"She was found standing outside the Hollywood meeting and chatting with Farrell."
"Last Saturday, Aniston showed up at Ellen DeGeneres' birthday party without seru."
Aniston signed up with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and "Dun Prince" in Atlanta, while serrux, 46, made the comedy "the spy who left me in Budapest."
"Theroux is often found in New York City, far from Los Angeles."
"In recent months, the two have been separated for quite a long time and raised some questions."
"Zoom in on Farrell and Jennifer Aniston's birthday at Ellen DeGeneres."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other."
On Sunday, Aniston held a celebration in Malibu, California, with friends including Courtney Cox, Andrea bendwald, Lee kilton Smith and Christine Hahn



Number  360
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Walking Dead season 9 spoilers: Rick Grimes and Daryl Dixon back to backThe Walking Dead season 9 spoilers: Daryl fights Rick...”
“Daryl and Rick haven’t always been on the same page, but the two characters have an awful lot of respect for one another.”
“Despite Norman’s claims otherwise, it would make sense for Daryl to take the lead because he’s been around since the first season and The Walking Dead fans love his character.”
“Furthermore, season nine’s trailer teased Rick and Daryl being at odds in the upcoming season.”
“"Are we on the same side, Rick?"”
“Daryl asks in the trailer, to which Rick replies: "Well, you tell me."”
“Now, Norman has revealed at San Diego Comic-Con that Daryl and Rick will share a “f**king epic” scene in season nine.”
“Could this confrontational scene be what Norman is talking about?”
“Episode four of this season was one that Andy and I had a scene that was f king epic but it was really well written and we worked on it and we really fine tuned it and got it to a place where it became sort of effortless Norman revealed...”
“...during a Comic Con press conference...”


The walking dead season 9: Rick Grimes and Daryl Dixon back to back season 9: Daryl and Rick fight
"Daryl and Rick don't always agree, but they respect each other very much."
"Despite Norman's different opinions, it makes sense for Daryl to play the leading role, because he has appeared since the first season, and the walking dead fans like his role."
"In addition, the season 9 Trailer also jokingly says that Rick and Daryl are at odds in the coming season."
"Are we on the same side, Rick?"
Daryl asks in the trailer, and Rick replies, "well, you tell me."
"Now, Norman revealed at the San Diego comics conference that Daryl and Rick will share a" King's epic "scene in season 9."
"Will this confrontation be what Norman said?"
"The fourth episode of this season is a scene of Andy and me. It's an epic movie, but it's written very well. We adjusted it to a place where Norman has no difficulty..."
“… At the comic press conference... "



Number  361
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Image via Instagram/Brian To/WENN.]”
“Wishing them continued blessings!”
“But yeah, to answer your question, I’m really happy.”Good for her!”
“I need to keep some things mine for them to be special├óΓé¼ΓÇ¥and just to protect that.”
““├óΓé¼╦£Cause I feel like, for my sanity and for the sanity of the people I care about, you gotta keep some things sacred.”
“...love Camila responded coyly As far as that I have always been such a private person and the one thing that has been I think the hardest thing about this industry has been letting go of that privacy she said...”
“Related Camila Cabello Gets Candid About Her Departure From Fifth Harmony The Havana singer who said she felt like she was on cloud nine dished I am really really happy óΓé¼ ª I feel like I ve never been happier in my life When asked specifically if she was in...”
“As you know, this comes about a month after the former Fifth Harmony member was spotted smooching dating coach Matthew Hussey while on vacay.”
“Appearing on a recent episode of The Dan Wootton Interview podcast, the 21-year-old songstress couldn’t help but gush when asked if she was happy and in love.”
“Camila Cabello is living her best life!”


"[picture via instagram / Brian to / wenn.]"
"May they continue to be blessed!"
"But yes, I'm really happy to answer your question." How nice of her
"I need to keep something that belongs to me and make it special, just to protect it."
"Because I feel that for the sake of my reason and the reason of the people I care about, you have to keep something sacred."
“… I've always been such a private person. I think the most difficult thing in this industry is to let go of privacy. She said
"The related Camilla Cabello frankly said that she left the fifth harmonic singer in Havana. She said that she felt like she was on cloud nine. I was really, really happy. I felt that I had never been happier in my life when asked if she was..."
"As you know, it was about a month ago that the former fifth harmony member was found kissing coach Matthew housai while in wakay."
The 21-year-old singer, who appeared on a recent interview podcast with Dan Wootton, couldn't help gushing when asked if she was happy and in love
"Camilla Cabello lives her best life!"



Number  362
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Despite many encouraging him to revisit the series, Crane is not interested: “That’s why you don’t want to see more of it, because it’s all a happy ending.”advertisingSource: TheWrapShare Share Tweet EmailWandaVision’s Darcy Lewis Didn’t Disappear In Thanos’ Snapadvertising...”
“Over 5 million people tuned in to watch the finale where all the characters got their happy endings.”
“A staple of NBC's Thursday night 'Must See TV' lineup, Friends ran for 10 years before bidding fans farewell in 2004.”
“It made the series' stars Jennifer Aniston, Courteney Cox, Lisa Kudrow, David Schwimmer, Matthew Perry, and Matt LeBlanc household names and has spawned rumours of a spinoff ever since it went off the air.”
“With streaming services like Netflix now carrying the series and reruns airing on television, an entire new generation has been introduced to the hit show.”
“Talks of a Friends reboot or revival have made headlines every year or so, but with so many other shows being reimagined for a contemporary audience (like Will and Grace, Murphy Brown and Roswell), fans are still hoping for a Friends revival at some point.”
“...advertisingUnfortunately for Friends fan, it doesn't look like that revival is ever going to happen.”
“Crane was recently one of the panelists at TheWrap's Emmy Series comedy showrunners panel, when he put to rest any rumours of a Friends reboot happening.”
““Never happening.”
“Never.”


Although many people encouraged him to revisit the series, crane was not interested in it: "that's why you don't want to see more series, because it's a happy ending." Source: Darcy Lewis, who shares twitter and Avision with the wrapshare, didn't disappear in tanos's snapshot advertisement... "
"More than 5 million people watched the final episode, and all the characters got a happy ending."
"Friends, the main show on NBC's must see TV lineup on Thursday night, had been running for 10 years before saying goodbye to its fans in 2004."
"The TV series stars Jennifer Aniston, Courtney Cox, Lisa Kudrow, David Schwimmer, Matthew Perry and Matt LeBron are household names, and there have been rumors of a split since it went off the air."
"With streaming services like Netflix now starting to broadcast the series and replay it on TV, the hit show has introduced a whole new generation."
"The topic of friends're launch or comeback makes headlines every year, but as many other shows are re conceived for contemporary audiences (such as will and grace, Murphy brown and Roswell), fans still want friends to come back at some point."
“…… It seems that there will never be a revival of advertisements for fans and friends. "
"Crane was recently a member of the group of Emmy comedy hosts for the wrap when he calmed down any rumors about a friend's restart."
"It will never happen."
"Never."



Number  363
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although Kristen Bell led the 24th SAG Awards in January, becoming the ceremony’s first-ever host, no emcee has yet been announced for the 2019 incarnation.”
“In addition, TNT will present a special encore of the ceremony at 11 p.m. ET/PT.”
“TBS and TNT subscribers can also watch the SAG Awards live through the networks’ websites and mobile apps.”
“The 25th annual SAG Awards ceremony will be simulcast live on TNT and TBS on Sunday, Jan. 27, 2019 at 8 p.m. ET/PT.”
“Meanwhile, “The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel” and “The Handmaid’s Tale” are expected to be top contenders on the TV side.”
““A Star Is Born” and “Roma” are expected to win big in the film realm, although it’s too soon to count box office sensations like “Crazy Rich Asians” and “Black Panther” out of the running, especially in the ensemble category.”
“The live-stream can be found on the websites of TNT, SAG, and truTV; TNT’s Facebook, Twitter, and YouTube channel; TBS’ Facebook, Twitter, and YouTube channel; and TBS/TNT/truTV apps on iOS, Android, Roku, Amazon Fire, and AppleTV.”
“The announcement for acting nominations in five film and eight television categories will be carried live on TNT, TBS, and truTV.”
“The action performance nominees announcement will be live-streamed on the websites of both TNT and SAG, as well as both the TNT and TBS YouTube channels.”
“Prior to that announcement, SAG Awards Committee chair JoBeth Williams and SAG Awards Committee member Elizabeth McLaughlin will announce this year’s stunt ensemble action performance nominees at 9:50 a.m. ET/PT.”


"Although Kristen bell led the 24th sag awards ceremony in January this year and became the first host of the ceremony, he has not yet announced his 2019 incarnation as the host."
"In addition, TNT will present another special gift to the awards ceremony at 11 p.m. EDT / Pacific time."
"TBS and TNT users can also broadcast sag awards live through their websites and mobile applications."
"The 25th sag annual awards ceremony will be broadcast live at TNT and TBS on Sunday, January 27, 2019 at 8pm EDT."
Meanwhile, "the great lady Messer" and "the maid's story" are expected to become popular competitors in the TV industry
"The birth of a star and Rome are expected to be big winners in the film industry, but it's too early to exclude box office blockbusters like crazy rich Asians and panther, especially in ensemble."
"Live streaming can be found on TNT, sag and truTV websites; TNT's Facebook, twitter and Youtube channels; TBS's Facebook, twitter and Youtube channels; and TBS / TNT / truTV applications on IOS, Android, roku, Amazon fire and AppleTV."
"The nominations for five films and eight TV series will be broadcast live on TNT, TBS and truTV."
"The action performance nomination announcement will be broadcast live on TNT and sag websites as well as on TNT and TBS YouTube channels."
Prior to the announcement, sabeth Williams, chairman of the sag awards committee, and Elizabeth McLaughlin, member of the sag awards committee, will announce nominations for this year's stunt ensemble action performance at 9:50 a.m. Eastern time



Number  364
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More:Nick Carter is under investigation for sexual misconduct by Santa Monica PoliceMore:Backstreet Boys claim they turned down one of NSYNC's biggest hits...”
“We think the boys' Spice Girls impression is really Larger Than Life.”
“They also had fun dancing along to Say You'll Be There.”
“Audience members also shared footage of the group lip syncing to some Spice Girls hits, including Wannabe.”
“Richardson shared the same picture on his Instagram, adding, "Sometimes ya just gotta SPICE things up."”
“"Celebrating all of the girl power that’s kept us going for 25 years," they wrote.”
“Girl power, according to the band's caption.”
“The reason for the hilarious homage?”
“AJ McLean was Scary Spice in fierce cheetah print, Brian Littrell was Sporty Spice in track pants and Howie Dorough was Ginger Spice in a union jack dress.”
“Nick Carter channeled Baby Spice in a pink dress and pigtails and Kevin Richardson channeled Posh Spice in a black jumpsuit and sunglasses.”


"More: Nick Carter is being investigated by Santa Monica police for sexual misconduct. Backstreet Boys claim they turned down one of nsync's hottest shows..."
"We think boys are really more impressed with spice girls than they are with life."
"They danced happily and said you would be there."
"The audience also shared clips of this group lip synching Spice Girls' songs, including wannabe."
Richardson shared the same image on his instagram, adding: "sometimes you just want to spice things up."
"Celebrating the power of girls that has kept us going for 25 years," they wrote
"The power of girls, according to the band's instructions."
"Why salute him?"
"AJ McLean is the scary spice in the fierce cheetah print, Brian Littrell is the sporty spice in the sweatpants, and Howie Dorough is the ginger spice in the United Jack dress."
"Nick Carter flirts with babies in a pink dress and braids; Kevin Richardson flirts with fashion in a black jumpsuit and sunglasses."



Number  365
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Best Bangs for Every Face Shape...”
“Keep scrolling if you’re ready to take the plunge and finally let your stylist do the job.”
“We talked to celebrity hairstylists about their tips for choosing the best bangs for your face shape.”
“That’s where our handy guide comes in.”
“In other words, not all bangs are created equal, and it’s hard to figure out which ones are the best for you.”
“Along with the commitment of getting regular trims, bangs come in so many different shapes, layers, and forms.”
“We get it: There's a lot to consider.”
“If you’ve ever considered getting them, you’ve probably texted “Should I get bangs?” to all of the contacts you have saved in your phone.”


"Video: the best bangs for all kinds of faces..."
"If you're ready to take a risk and finally let your stylist do the work, please keep rolling."
"We talked to celebrity hairdressers about their tips for choosing the best bangs for your face."
"This is our convenient guide."
"In other words, not all bangs are born equal. It's hard to figure out which bangs are best for you."
"In addition to the promise of regular pruning, bangs come in many different shapes, layers and forms."
"We've learned: there's a lot to think about."
If you've ever thought about buying it, you might text and say, "should I buy bangs?"? "All contacts saved on your phone."



Number  366
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FROM PEN: Grammy News and Notes: Album of the Year Nominees“I told her that I might come down and sing to her; I don’t think she knew I was going to plop down next to her,” he added of the ACM performance.”
“Mid-way through his performance of “Body Like a Back Road,” Hunt ditched the stage and joined an adorably embarrassed Fowler in the audience.”
“Just weeks before the singer’s wedding day, he attended the Academy of Country Music Awards, where he surprise-serenaded his bride-to-be.”
“News.”
““It feels great — there’s a spiritual strength to it [the ring], and I feel a little bit taller now that I’m wearing it,” he told E!”
“Image zoom Credit: John Shearer/GettyThe country crooner married Fowler in an intimate Georgia ceremony in April, and he gushed about his newest accessory: his wedding band.”
“I did really good!” Hunt, 32, said on E!’s Live from the Red Carpet in Las Vegas.”
““She’s beautiful.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The country star opened up about life with his new wife, Hannah Lee Fowler, ahead of the Billboard Music Awards Sunday night.”


"From pen: Grammy news and notes: album of the year nominees," I told her that I might come down and sing to her; I don't think she knew I would plop next to her, "he added, adding ACM's performance
Hunter left the stage and joined an embarrassed fowler in the audience in the middle of his performance body like a path
Just a few weeks before the singer's wedding, he attended the Academy of country music award ceremony and sang a surprising Serenade for his bride to be
"News."
"It feels great - it (the ring) has a spiritual power, and now I feel a little higher with it," he told e! "
Photo: John Hiller / Getty, a country singer, married Fowler at an intimate wedding in Georgia in April this year. He talks about his latest accessory: wedding ring
"I did a good job! Hunter, 32, said on TV! Live on the red carpet in Las Vegas
"She's beautiful."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The country singer talked about his life with his new wife Hannah Lee Fowler before the Billboard Music Awards on Sunday night



Number  367
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Kylie Jenner Shuts Down Kylie Cosmetics Facility Due to California WildfiresLea Michele Reacts to California Wildfires Evacuation: 'I'm Still Shaking''Westworld' Shuts Down Production Due to California Wildfires, Cast Members React...”
“— Rob Lowe (@RobLowe) December 10, 2017Oprah, who was out of the county until Sunday, has also evacuated from her Montecito, California, enclave, telling ET, "just praying for the best for our little town."”
“The Ellen DeGeneres Show host tweeted to fans on Monday that she, her wife and their pets are safe after being forced from their Carpinteria, California, home due to fire danger.”
“"Our house is under threat of being burned.”
“We just had to evacuate our pets.”
“I’m praying for everyone in our community and thankful to all the incredible firefighters," the 59-year-old comedian wrote.”
“Our house is under threat of being burned.”
“I’m praying for everyone in our community and thankful to all the incredible firefighters.”
“The live stream is on https://t.co/FTcKVvHO16 — Ellen DeGeneres (@TheEllenShow) December 10, 2017In the week since it erupted, CBS Los Angeles reports that the Thomas fire has burned over 200,000 acres and has left more than 85,000 people without power.”


"Related content: Kelly Jenner closes Kelly cosmetics factory due to California wildfire. Michelle's response to the evacuation of California wildfire:" I'm still shivering. "The production of Western Hemisphere is closed due to California wildfire. Actor's response..."
"- Rob Lowe (@ roblowe) December 10, 2017A, Oprah was not in the county until Sunday, and she also withdrew from the enclave in Montecito, California, she told et," just pray for our town. "
"Ellen DeGeneres, the host of the show, tweeted to fans on Monday that she, her wife and their pets were forcibly evacuated from their home in cabentia, California, due to the fire danger and are now safe."
"Our house is in danger of burning down."
"We can only evacuate pets."
"I pray for everyone in the community and thank all the incredible firefighters," the 59 year old comedian wrote
"Our house is in danger of burning down."
"I pray for everyone in our community and thank all the incredible firefighters."
"It's live https://t.co/FTcKVvHO16-Ellen  DeGeneres (@ the EllenShow) December 10, 2017 CBS Los Angeles branch reported that the Thomas fire has burned more than 200000 acres of land, causing more than 85000 people to lose power. "



Number  368
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The family-friendly nature of the big gig is reportedly what drew Gwen to the idea as she shares three sons with her ex-husband, Gavin Rossdale.”
““Things are looking very good.”Stefani is said to be “very close” to finalizing a contract, seemingly taking over from J.Lo, who will take her final bow at Planet Hollywood’s Zappos Theatre, formerly known as The AXIS, in September.”
“Try refreshing your browser, or Gwen Stefani gets Las Vegas residency deal: Report Back to video“Her visit to Las Vegas this weekend was one of the final pieces of the puzzle,” the insider explains.”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
“News the excursion was arranged for Stefani to meet with venue bosses and work out a residency deal.”
“The Rich Girl hitmaker took a weekend trip to Sin City to check out Jennifer Lopez’s long-running All I Have show at the Planet Hollywood resort and casino, and now sources tell E!”
“Article contentGwen Stefani is reportedly ready to set up a second home in Las Vegas for a concert residency.”


"The family friendly nature of the big concert is reported to have attracted Gwen, who has three sons with her ex husband Gavin Rossdale."
"Things look good." Stephanie is said to be "very close" to the contract, apparently succeeding J. Rowe, who will make her final bow at the Zappos theater on the Hollywood planet in September
"Try refreshing your browser, or Gwen Stephanie will get the right of abode in Las Vegas: back to the video," the source explained. "Her visit to Las Vegas this weekend is the last part of the mystery."
“… Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"Sorry, this video can't be loaded."
"The news excursion was arranged for Stefani to meet with the venue owners and work out a accommodation agreement."
"This rich woman killer went to sin city this weekend to watch Jennifer Lopez's long-term show" I have it all "at Hollywood star resorts and casinos. Now we have a source to tell us!"
"Gwen Stephanie is reported to be building a second home in Las Vegas as a venue for the concert."



Number  369
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Another A-list client: Eva Longoria sat down with the young medium...”
“Tyler has also held readings with stars such as Khloe Kardashian and Eva Longoria, and the second season of Hollywood Medium is set to air on E!”
“In clips from the session, which will screen on the new season, Bobby can be seen with tears streaming down his face.”
“Tragic: Bobby broke down as Tyler discussed his late ex-wife Whitney Houston and late daughter Bobbi KristinaAccording to Tyler, the experience helped Bobby 'more than any therapist ever had.'”
“Bobbi Kristina came through with 'very specific validations of childhood memories,' while Whitney communicated medical details about her death.”
“During the psychic reading, both of the women, who died in tragic circumstances, were able to connect with Tyler.”
“Moved to tears: Mel B was able to connect with her grandfather during her reading with TylerThe psychic also held a reading with Bobby Brown, the ex-husband of Whitney Houston and father of the late Bobbi Kristina Brown.”
“Mel, who recently underwent a high-profile split from husband Stephen Belafonte, is just one in a long line of celebrities to sit down with Tyler.”
“Tyler also stated that during the reading he was able to reveal 'personal information that Mel B had never discussed publicly about some family matters.'”
“...of his program Hollywood Medium...”


"Another A-level client: Eva Longoria and the young media sat down..."
Taylor also held recitations with stars like Kardashian and Eva Longoria, and the second season of Hollywood media will also be broadcast on Kardashian! "
"In the clips of the game that will be shown in the new season, we can see that Bob's face is full of tears."
"Tragedy: when Taylor talks about his late ex-wife, Whitney Houston, and his late daughter, boby Christina, boby collapses. Taylor said the experience helped "more than any therapist."
"Bobbi Kristina passed a" very specific childhood memory test, "while Whitney conveyed the medical details of her death
"In the process of psychic reading, both women who died in tragedy can get in touch with Taylor."
Moved to tears: Mel B got in touch with her grandfather while reading with Taylor. The psychic also held a reading party with Whitney Houston's ex husband and the father of the late Bob Christina Brown
"Mel recently broke up with her husband, Stephen Belafonte, who is just one of a long list of celebrities sitting down with Taylor."
"Taylor also said that in the process of reading, he was able to reveal" personal information about some family issues that Mel B has never publicly discussed. "
“… His show is "Hollywood media..."



Number  370
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...our last conversation...”
“Not sure my heart will ever be the same.”
“Katharine McPhee returned to her starring role in the Broadway musical Waitress and dedicated her first show back to her late father, Daniel McPhee.”
““Dad, this one’s for you,” the Smash alum, 34, captioned an Instagram photo of herself backstage before the Tuesday, July 24, performance.”
““@waitressmusical here we go…”McPhee announced her father’s passing on July 16.”
““I can’t believe I’m even writing this.”
“But it is with heavy heart that I share that my sweet sweet Papa left this earth yesterday morning,” she wrote on Instagram at the time.”
“We as a family are completely heartbroken and devastated She continued He was my biggest fan my biggest champion always telling me to Give em hell kid He was so kind and caring and made sure we knew how much...”
“...he loved us...”
“I’m so sad he missed my broadway debut.”


“… Our last conversation
"I'm not sure my heart will never change."
Katherine McPhee returned to her starring role in the Broadway musical the waitress and dedicated her first performance to her late father, Daniel McPhee
"Dad, this is for you," the 34 year old super alumni added a title to his photo backstage on instagram before the show on Tuesday, July 24
"@ waitessmusic, let's go..." McPhee announced her father's death on July 16
"I can't believe I'm writing this."
"But it's with a heavy heart that I tell you that my dear dad left the earth yesterday morning," she wrote on instagram
"As a family, we are very sad and sad, she went on, he is my biggest fan, my biggest champion, always told me to give them hell kids, he is so kind and caring, and make sure we know how much..."
“… He loves us... "
"I'm sorry he missed my Broadway debut."



Number  371
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...the first half of 2019”
“You ll have to wait a bit to see it though Bloys said earlier this year the prequel won t debut until at least a year after the original GoT wraps up its final season which won t start until...”
“Martin as an executive producer.”
“...know In addition to writing the pilot Goldman X Men First Class will serve as showrunner and will join Game of Thrones author George R R”
“And only one thing is for sure from the horrifying secrets of Westeros history to the true origin of the white walkers the mysteries of the East to the Starks of legend it s not the story we think we...”
“Per the official logline, “the series chronicles the world’s descent from the golden Age of Heroes into its darkest hour.”
“We hope to be shooting sometime in the new year.”HBO ordered a pilot for the untitled prequel last month, with the action set thousands of years before the events of Game of Thrones.”
“We’re just starting the search for a director… we have to cast it.”
“With HBO exploring five different GoT spinoff concepts, “we’d be lucky to get one that we’re very, very excited about, and we did get that.”
““We are doing a pilot that Jane Goldman wrote,” HBO programming president Casey Bloys confirmed for reporters at the Television Critics Association summer press tour on Wednesday.”


“…… "First half of 2019"
"You're going to have to wait a while to see that, although broise said earlier this year that the prequel won't be released at least one year after the end of the last season of the original, and this season will have to wait..."
"Martin is the executive producer."
“… Know that in addition to writing about the pilot, Goldman Sachs X Men's first class will serve as showrunner and will join the power of game author George R
"Only one thing is certain, from the terrible secret of westero's history to the true origin of white walkers, from the mystery of the east to the legendary stark, this is not what we think of as a story..."
"Officially," the series records the world from the golden age of heroes to its darkest moments
"We hope to shoot sometime in the new year." Last month, HBO arranged a pilot for the untitled prequel, which was set thousands of years ago
"We've just started looking for Directors We have to choose. "
"As HBO explores five different got derivative concepts," we're lucky to have a concept that we're very, very excited about, and we did. "
"We're working on a pilot project written by Jane Goldman," HBO program chairman Kathy bloys confirmed to reporters on Wednesday at the TV Review Association's summer press tour



Number  372
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“DATES26 July 202025 July 202124 July 202223 July 202328 July 202427 July 202526 July 202623 July 202723 July 202822 July 202928 July 2030”
“Often the sleepless nights and worry seem endless.”
“No matter where our parents may be, this day serves to celebrate their important role in our lives.”
“In May we celebrated mothers, and in June we celebrated fathers.”
“It follows that in July we can bring all our parents together and show them some appreciation all at once.”
“Parents play a vital role in the lives of children.”
“From our birth, parents protect, teach, provide, and serve as role models.”
“As part of a family, we look to them for guidance.”
“We mirror their behavior and learn to be a core part of our communities.”
“Throughout our lives, our parents lead us to be independent thinking individuals.”


"Date 26 July 202025 July 202124 July 202223 July 202328 July 202427 July 202526 July 202623 July 202723 July 202822 July 202928 July 2030"
"Often sleepless nights and worries seem endless."
"No matter where our parents are, this day is to celebrate their important role in our lives."
"In May we celebrate mother, in June we celebrate father."
"That way, in July, we can bring all our parents together and express some gratitude to them all at once."
"Parents play a vital role in their children's lives."
"From the time we were born, our parents protected, taught, provided and set an example."
"As part of a family, we look forward to their guidance."
"We reflect their behavior and learn to be a core part of our community."
"In our life, our parents guide us to become independent thinking individuals."



Number  373
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Models feel they have to violate themselves to get ahead.”
“Sampaio admitted the challenging aspect of the industry is to know that other women out there are willing to pose in whatever position they’re told for fame.”
“Sampaio said models are “not respected,” despite the fact that the industry is female-dominated.”
“Sampaio said when women complain of being treated unfairly they are labeled as “difficult” and are subsequently blackballed from the scene.”
“If a model says she doesn’t want certain images published than organizations need to respect that.”
“Women can control how they are perceived, and it is up to them to decide which images are used.”
“The lesson she hopes to spread to other models in the industry is women have agency and control of their body, despite what the industry wants them to think.”
“She said, “I felt violated.”For Sampaio, the issue isn’t with nudity; it’s the fact that she doesn’t like exposing her body in men’s magazines.”
“Sara said the company told her the photographs would only show her “wet-skin” and not her nude body.”
“The model told the magazine that she didn’t want to pose nude but did so anyway, and they signed a contract stating they wouldn’t publish the images.”


"Models feel they have to go against themselves to succeed."
"Sampaio admits that the challenge in this industry is to know that other women are willing to pose whatever they are told to do for fame and fortune."
Sampaio said models were "not respected," even though the industry was dominated by women
Sampaio said that when women complain about being treated unfairly, they are labeled "difficult" and then expelled from the scene
"If a model says she doesn't want to post certain images, then the company needs to respect that."
"Women can control what people think of them and decide which images they want to use."
"What she wants to teach other models in the industry is that no matter what the industry wants them to think, women have agency and control over their bodies."
"She said," I feel violated. "For Sampaio, the problem is not nudity, but that she doesn't like to expose her body in men's magazines."
Sarah said the company told her the photos would only show her "wet skin" and not her nudity
"The model told the magazine that she didn't want to be nude, but she wanted to be nude anyway, and they signed a contract not to publish the photos."



Number  374
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And man, does she have a great face.”
“It forces us to take her at face value.”
“In the first half of the movie, we see Ally with nothing but a T-shirt on, to steal a line from Jessica Simpson.”
“And for me, it worked.”
“...character...”
“But Gaga s sorry Ally s refusal to look stylish or campy or dress any part besides her own is an extension of the makeup wiping myth It s a way of asking us to focus on Stefani Joanne Angelina Germanotta the talented American treasure rather than Lady Gaga the...”
“This is not a fashion movie, which you also probably knew.”
“They’re not.”
“This isn’t to say the clothes in A Star Is Born are great.”
“Which, of course, makes it highly remarkable.”


"Man, she's beautiful."
"It forces us to look at her with superficial value."
"In the first half of the movie, we saw Ellie wearing only a T-shirt and stealing a line from Jessica Simpson."
"For me, it worked."
“… Character... "
"But Gaga is sorry that ally refuses to look fashionable and chic, and refuses to dress up any part other than himself. This is an extension of the makeup myth. It's a way for us to focus on Stefani Joanne Angelina Germanotta, the treasure of genius in the United States, not Lady Gaga's...."
"It's not a fashion movie, as you probably know."
"They are not."
"That's not to say that the clothes in star birth are great."
"Of course, that makes it very compelling."



Number  375
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is big and tall and handsome.’”
“Advertisement‘He was an additive for me to go out with.”
“On Andy Cohen’s 50th birthday, his best pal John Mayer made sure to post his best wishes before the party tonight!”
“The rocker posted a pic of the two in an elevator, captioning it: ‘Happy 50th Birthday @bravoandy!”
“It’s been about 30 minutes since I started writing this caption.”
“Congratulations, I have no words.”
“You have done it.”
“Can’t find ‘em right now.”
“They are all scattered in a flurry of love and memories OH HERE THEY COME.’Mayer went on: ‘In conclusion, I love you, and you are such a special person that I am sure you are known throughout the universe.”
“See you tonight.’ Aw…such cute bromance!”


"He's tall and handsome."
"He's an additive to my dating."
"On Andy Cohen's 50th birthday, his best friend John Mayer must send his best wishes before tonight's party!"
"The horn shaker posted a picture of them in the elevator, which said:" happy 50th birthday @ bravoandy! "
"I've been writing this title for 30 minutes."
"Congratulations, I have nothing to say."
"You did it."
"I can't find it now."
"They are all scattered in the chaos of love and memory. Oh, here they are." Mayer went on: "in short, I love you. You are such a special person that I believe you are well known throughout the universe."
"See you tonight." Ah What a lovely Browns



Number  376
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In a preview for next week’s episode, Jacobs said she expects Ravenel to be cleared of all accusations.”
““There’s a big part of him that I really love and a little part that I don’t.”Ravenel’s girlfriend Ashley Jacobs will appear on part two of the reunion.”
“Part one of the Southern Charm reunion opened with host Andy Cohen reading a statement provided by Ravenel’s attorney.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Along with Bravo, our client made the mutual decision not to attend today’s reunion taping as there is a pending investigation.”
“Our client is fully cooperating with authorities on that investigation,” reads the statement.”
““He expects to be completely vindicated once the investigation is concluded.”
“He sends his best regards to his fans and his fellow castmates.”And while the rest of the cast agreed that Ravenel’s absence from the reunion was appropriate given the situation, his ex Kathryn Dennis declined to comment for the sake of their two children.”
““I’m not going to comment until it’s resolved,” she said.”
““What I am going to focus on is just the children and staying out of it.”The former couple shares Kensie, 4, and Saint, 2½.”


"In next week's trailer, Jacobs said she hoped ravennell would not be charged."
Ravennell's girlfriend, Ashley Jacobs, will appear in the second film of reunion
"The first part of the southern glamour party was Andy Cohen, the host, reading a statement from lawnell's lawyer."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Together with Bravo, our client decided not to attend today's party recording because of an outstanding investigation."
"Our client is fully cooperating with the authorities in the investigation," the statement said
"He wants a full defense after the investigation."
"He sends his best regards to his fans and his friends." While other actors agreed that ravennell's absence from the reunion was appropriate given the current situation, his former Catherine Dennis declined to comment for their two children
"I will not comment until the issue is resolved," she said
"I just want to focus on the children, don't get involved." The former couple shared a flat with 4-year-old kency and 2.5-year-old saint



Number  377
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Moore is repped by attorney Stephen Breimer at Bloom Hergott Diemer Rosenthal Laviolette Feldman Schenkman & Goodman.”
“Executive producers are Mark Gordon, Erica Messer and Breen Frazier.”
“Cook, Aisha Tyler, Kirsten Vangsness, Adam Rodriguez and Damon Gupton.”
““Criminal Minds” also stars Joe Mantegna, Paget Brewster, Matthew Gray Gubler, A.J.”
“According to insiders, tension ran high on set between Moore and Gibson.”
“Season 11 saw another cast shake-up with the departure of Thomas Gibson, who was fired after a series of contentious events, including an alleged physical altercation with a producer.”
“Moore’s return to “Criminal Minds” — even if just for one episode — will please fans, who were shocked by his exit last season.”
“...lieutenant — played by Moore — who is torn between loyalty to the streets and duty to his fellow officers when he’s tasked to run a highly-trained unit that’s the last stop for solving crimes in Los Angeles.”
“Based on the movie of the same name, the pilot follows a locally born and bred S.W.A.T.”
“Aside from guest-starring on “Criminal Minds,” Shemar Moore is at work on another CBS series, the pilot for a “S.W.A.T.” reboot, in which he is attached to star and serve as a producer.”


"Moore is represented by lawyers Stephen Bremer in bloom, Hergott, dimer, Rosenthal, LaViolette, Feldman, Shenkman and Goodman."
"The executive producers are mark Gordon, Erica Mayer and Brin Fraser."
"Cook, ISA Taylor, Kirsten Vanness, Adam Rodriguez and Damon guppton."
"Criminal psychology" also stars Joe mantegana, Paget Brewster, Matthew gray Gubler, and A.J
"According to people familiar with the matter, Moore and Gibson have a tense relationship on the set."
"Another set change in Season 11 is the departure of Thomas Gibson, who was fired after a series of controversial incidents, including physical conflict with the producer."
"Moore's return to" criminal consciousness "- even if it's just one episode - will make fans happy and they are shocked by his exit last season."
"Lieutenant Moore plays - who is split between loyalty to the street and his colleagues when he is sent to run a well-trained unit, which is the last stop in Los Angeles."
"Adapted from the movie of the same name, the pilot follows a local born and raised S.W.A.T."
"In addition to guest starring in criminal psychology, Sherma Moore is also a pilot in another CBS series, S.W.A.T. restart, in which he is associated with the stars and serves as a producer."



Number  378
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As a courtesy, they were placed on standby for another flight this morning from Las Vegas,” a rep for American Airlines told PEOPLE on Monday about the sold-out flights out of McCarran.”
“Image zoom Credit: Dia Dipasupil/Getty“A passenger on the evening of Sunday, Feb. 4, missed their flight at Las Vegas McCarran International Airport.”
“When police returned for the second time, Osment was nowhere in sight.”
“An hour after authorities responded to the call, Osment reportedly returned to the scene, this time making verbal threats.”
“News on Monday.”
“Police received a call about an “unruly passenger” but when authorities arrived on the scene Osment was not found, a McCarran Airport spokesperson confirmed to E!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“A rep for Osment did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“The actor, 29, got upset at the American Airlines gate after he missed his flight, according to multiple reports.”
“Haley Joel Osment allegedly got angry about missing his flight out of McCarran International Airport in Las Vegas on SundayHaley Joel Osment had a public verbal scuffle at McCarran International Airport in Las Vegas on Super Bowl Sunday.”


A representative of American Airlines told people on Monday that flights at McCarran airport had sold out. "Out of courtesy, they were arranged to stand by on another flight from Las Vegas this morning."
On Sunday night, February 4, a passenger missed his flight at Las Vegas McAllen International Airport
"When the police came back a second time, Osment was gone."
"It is reported that one hour after the authorities responded to the call, Osment returned to the scene, this time as a verbal threat."
"Monday's news."
Police received a phone call about "unruly passengers", but when the authorities arrived at the scene, Osment was not found, a spokesman for the McAllen airport confirmed that
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A representative of Osment did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
"According to a number of reports, the 29 year old actor felt uneasy boarding on American Airlines after missing his flight."
"Haley Joel Osment is said to be angry about missing a flight from Las Vegas's McCarran International Airport on Sunday. Super Bowl Sunday, Haley Joel Osment had a public spat at the McCarran International Airport in Las Vegas



Number  379
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“‘Thank y’all for listening & sending all the love to my beautiful momma.’”
“...explains a liver transplant can cure the diagnosis but she doesn t have enough time...”
“Accompanying the caption is a photo of his mother in the hospital.”
“Haynes, who got married in October, explains his mother has been in and out of the hospital since January.”
“Following numerous tests, doctors diagnosed her with chronic liver and kidney damage, leading to failure of the organs.”
“Doctors eventually told the family to focus on her quality of life, not the quantity.”
“‘My strong mother has always been the anchor of this family’‘My mom, Dana, always loves to laugh,’ Haynes writes.”
“Even when her liver kidney doctors gave us the worst news you could get my mom looked at us and said The best thing to do in these situations is to laugh She then chuckled so loud you could hear it to the other end of the hospital He further...”
“I’t’s heartbreaking.”
“It would mean the world to my family & I if we could make a massive donation to this incredible organization.”


"Thank you for listening and giving all your love to my beautiful mother."
“… It means liver transplantation can cure the diagnosis, but she doesn't have enough time... "
"Accompanied by the illustration is a picture of his mother in the hospital."
Haines, who married in October, explained that his mother had been in and out of the hospital since January
After many examinations, doctors diagnosed her with chronic liver and kidney damage, leading to organ failure
"The doctor finally told the family to focus on the quality of her life, not the quantity."
Haines wrote: "my strong mother has always been the pillar of the family, and my mother Dana always loves to laugh."
"Even if her liver and kidney doctor told us the worst news, my mother would look at us and say that the best way in this case was to laugh. Then she laughed so loudly that you could hear him go further on the other side of the hospital..."
"I don't know. It's heartbreaking."
"It means the whole world to my family & I hope we can make a huge donation to this incredible organization."



Number  380
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the trailer below:”
“The final installment of the franchise is set for release on Valentine’s Day.”
“Fifty Shades Freed is directed by James Foley and adapted by Niall Leonard (Freed author E.L. James’s husband).”
“On top of Steele transitioning into married life, taking on a new role as the fiction editor of a Seattle publishing firm and living in a new home, Steele must now protect her family from Hyde’s vengeance, all the while learning of a surprise pregnancy.”
“The third film begins with the couple basking in marital bliss, only to soon find themselves threatened by Steele’s former editor boss, Jack Hyde (Eric Johnson).”
“The final trailer begins with a montage reel of memorable moments from the previous two Fifty Shades films, chronicling the love story of Johnson and Dornan’s Anastasia and Christian.”
“It seems you’re pregnant, Mrs. Grey.” In a new trailer for Universal’s Fifty Shades Freed, Anastasia Steele (Dakota Johnson) is shocked to learn the surprising news that she is pregnant, after marrying billionare Christian Grey (Jamie Dornan).”
“Watch the trailer below.”
“The final installment of the franchise is set for release on Feb. 9, just ahead of Valentine's Day.”
“Fifty Shades Freed was directed by James Foley and adapted by Niall Leonard (Freed author E.L. James’ husband).”


"Watch the trailer below:
"The last issue of the special is set for Valentine's day."
Fifty shadows of freedom is directed by James Foley and adapted by Neil Leonard, the husband of E.L. James
"In addition to Steele's transition to marriage, her new role as a novel editor in a Seattle publishing company, and her new home, Steele now has to protect her family from Hyde's revenge and learn about the unexpected pregnancy."
"At the beginning of the third film, the couple are immersed in the happiness of marriage, but soon find themselves threatened by Jack Hyde (Eric Johnson), former editor and boss of Steele."
"The last Trailer begins with a montage scroll of two memorable episodes from the previous 50 tone films, recording the love story between Johnson and Donan's Anastasia and Christian."
"It looks like you're pregnant, Mrs. gray." In the new trailer of universal pictures the shadow of fifty freedoms, Anastasia Steele (Johnson, Dakota) is shocked to learn that she is pregnant after she marries billionaire Christian gray (Jamie Donan)
"Look at the trailer below."
"The final issue of the series will be released on February 9, just before Valentine's day."
Fifty shadows of freedom is directed by James Foley and adapted by Neil Leonard, the husband of E.L. James



Number  381
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He’s a lover, not a judger.””
““Justin is so supportive and I don’t think that he would honestly have a strong opinion in that way,” Upton said.”
“Model Kate Upton and Houston Astros Justin Verlander looked happier than ever walking down the aisle moments after saying their vows in a romantic Tuscan wedding on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple capped off their picture-perfect week by tying the knot in an intimate ceremony after Upton cheered Verlander on in a special Houston Astros necklace and rushing the field as his team took the final win in the World Series last week.”
“The Sports Illustrated cover model couldn’t help but share the excitement of becoming Mrs. Verlander with her fans on Instagram a few days after the ceremony.”
““I feel so lucky that I got to marry my best friend!!”
“@justinverlander Thank you to our family and friends for making this weekend so fun and magical!” Upton captioned a photo of the couple walking down the aisle.”
“Image zoom Credit: KT MerryFor the ceremony, Upton wore a beautiful and classic long-sleeved lace white Valentino gown with a long white veil and carried a bouquet of peach, light pink and ivory flowers.”
“Verlander looked dapper in a classic black tuxedo with a white flower pinned onto his lapel.”


"He's a lover, not a judge."
"Justin is so supportive of me that I don't think he really has such a strong opinion," Upton said
"After models Kate Upton and Houston's Astro Boy Justin Verlander made their vows at a romantic wedding in Tuscany on Saturday, the moment they went to the wedding seemed happier than ever."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Upton is wearing a special Houston astronomy necklace to cheer for willand. His team won the last World Series last week, and the couple put an end to their perfect week at an intimate wedding."
"A few days after the award ceremony, the Sports Illustrated cover model couldn't help sharing the excitement of becoming Mrs. Verlander with her fans on instagram."
"I feel very lucky, I married my best friend!"
"@ justinverlander thanks our family and friends for making this weekend so fun and amazing! "Upton added a title to a photo of a couple walking down the aisle."
"Credit for image zooming: at the ceremony, Upton was wearing a beautiful and classic white Valentino long sleeve lace robe with a long white veil and holding a bunch of peach, light pink and ivory flowers."
"Verlander looks smart in a classic black evening dress with a white flower pinned to his lapel."



Number  382
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He was appointed in 2007 as president of the hospital, a position previously held by his mother, the late Princess Diana.”
“Daniel Leal-Olivas / AFP - Getty ImagesThe prince also showed off his warm bedside manner when he chatted with patients in treatment at the hospital, including one patient who was a former Royal Marsden Hospital staff member.”
“Prince William speaks to a patient during his visit to the Royal Marsden Hospital.”
“The minimally invasive procedures, which use da Vinci robot surgical systems, reduce surgery times by hours and allow patients to recover more quickly and without visible scars.”
“WPA Pool via Getty ImagesHe also sat in on a highly complex robotic cancer operation to remove a tumor from a patient's esophagus.”
“The prince learned more about the technique used for the robotic surgery.”
“...pic.twitter.com/6Gq8dsoPa2 — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) January 10, 2018In one short clip, the prince can be heard asking a surgeon a question during a procedure on a patient with adenoid cystic carcinoma, a rare cancer.”
“The Duke joins Professor Vinidh Paleri and his team in theatre as they perform minimally invasive robotic surgery on a patient with adenoid cystic carcinoma.”
“WPA Pool via Getty ImagesKensington Palace shared several photos and videos from the prince's visit, and Doc William was clearly fascinated by the goings-on in the operating room.”
“The Duke of Cambridge was at the Royal Marsden Hospital in Chelsea, London, to view two pioneering robotic surgeries.”


"He was appointed president of the hospital in 2007, a position previously held by his mother, the late Princess Diana."
"Daniel Lille Olivas / AFP - Getty prince also showed his warm bedside attitude when chatting with patients treated at the hospital, one of whom was a former staff member of the Royal Marsden Hospital."
"Prince William spoke to a patient during a visit to Royal Marsden Hospital."
"This kind of minimally invasive surgery using the Da Vinci robotic surgery system can reduce the operation time by several hours, make the patients recover faster and have no obvious scars."
"She's also involved in a highly sophisticated robotic cancer surgery that removes tumors from the patient's esophagus."
"The prince knows more about the technology of robotic surgery."
“... pic.twitter.com/6Gq8dsoPa2 -Kensington Royal on January 10, 2018 in a short film, the prince can be heard asking a surgeon a question while operating on a patient with adenoid cystic carcinoma, a rare cancer
"Duke, together with Professor vinidh paleri and his team, performed minimally invasive robotic surgery in the operating room for patients with adenoid cystic carcinoma."
"WPA pool via Getty Images Kensington Palace shared several photos and videos of the prince's visit, and Dr. William was clearly fascinated by what happened in the operating room."
The Duke of Cambridge watched two pioneering robotic operations at Royal Marsden Hospital in London's Chelsea



Number  383
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch below:”
“WATCH: Bill Cosby's Accusers: A Timeline of Alleged Sexual Assault ClaimsCosby's trial surrounding Constand's allegations is set to begin on June 5.”
“In a new interview with NNPA Newswire, the 79-year-old embattled comedian says he's now blind.”
“Cosby recalls waking up one morning two years ago, and telling his wife, Camille, that he "can't see."”
“Doctors then told him there was nothing they could do to repair his sight.”
“Cosby didn't discuss the pending criminal sexual assault case against him.”
“Cosby is charged with three counts of aggravated indecent assault for allegedly drugging and sexually assaulting former Temple employee Andrea Constand in January 2004 at his mansion in Elkins Park, Pennsylvania.”
“He has pleaded not guilty to all charges, and has repeatedly denied similar claims from other women.”
“WATCH EXCLUSIVE Holly Madison on Bill Cosby Hugh Hefner Lawsuit It Makes Me Feel Sad to Hear Other Stories Like That However Cosby did say that he misses performing and that he s looking forward to the next phase in...”
“...his career...”


Watch below:
"Watch: Bill Cosby's accuser: schedule of alleged sexual assault charges. Scosby's trial on the Constantine charges is scheduled to begin on June 5."
"In a recent interview with NNPA news agency, the 79 year old comedian said he is now blind."
Cosby recalled one morning two years ago when he woke up and told his wife Camille that he "couldn't see."
"Then the doctors told him they couldn't fix his vision."
"Cosby did not discuss the criminal sexual assault case against him."
"Cosby has been charged with three counts of gross indecency for drug and sexual assault on Andrea constant, a former Temple employee, at the Elkins Park mansion in Pennsylvania in January 2004."
"He has pleaded not guilty to all the charges and has repeatedly denied similar charges against other women."
"Watching the exclusive Holly Madison vs. Coase vs. Hugh Hefner lawsuit made me sad to hear other similar stories, but Coase did say that he missed the show and he was looking forward to the next stage..."
“… His career... "



Number  384
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“EntertainmentRead next The chicest nail art designs to try at home Nail Art The chicest nail art designs to try at home From alternative Frenchies to statement cuticles.”
“Youtube / E!”
“...goodbye Advertisement When asked if she found it difficult to carry another couple s baby she explained I like being pregnant...”
“As campaigners call for reforms to surrogacy laws one woman reveals what it s really like to carry another lady s baby and say goodbye Pregnancy As campaigners call for reforms to surrogacy laws one woman reveals what it s really like to carry another lady s baby and say...”
“Read next Here's a healthy pancake recipe that makes for a delicious at-home breakfast or dessert Food Here's a healthy pancake recipe that makes for a delicious at-home breakfast or dessert Delish.”
“It's already a big deal."”
“It's amazing.”
“"Like, with all the women who do have pregnancy issues, that put so much trust in people like me.”
“I'm so proud of doing it in general.”
“Kris thanked La'Reina for the gesture, to which she responded:"Thank you.”


"Read the following most unique nail art design for entertainment try the nail art at home try the most unique nail art design from the French to the cuticle at home."
“Youtube/E！”
“… When asked if it was difficult to conceive another couple's child, she explained, "I like to be pregnant..."
"When the candidates called for the reform of the surrogacy law, a woman disclosed her true feelings of having another woman's child and saying goodbye to pregnancy; when the candidates called for the reform of the surrogacy law, a woman disclosed that she was pregnant with another woman's child and said..."
"Read the next page. Here's a healthy pancake recipe for a delicious family breakfast or dessert. Here's a healthy pancake recipe for a delicious family breakfast or dessert."
"It's a big deal."
"It's amazing."
"Like, all women have pregnancy problems, which makes people like me very trusting."
"On the whole, I'm proud to be able to do that."
Chris appreciated larena's gesture, and she replied, "thank you."



Number  385
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Michael Phelps’ Son Boomer Is Adorable in Adidas on the Kids’ Choice Sports Awards Red CarpetLindsey Vonn Sparkles in Rainbow Stripes at the Nickelodeon Kids’ Choice Sports AwardsCiara & Russell Wilson’s Adorable Family Just Stole the Show at the Kids’ Choice Sports Awards...”
“She accessorized with tiny black sunglasses that baby Sienna played with as the family posed for pictures.”
“Among the best dressed were those who took the kids component of the awards show to heart, bringing along their young ones as they posed on the red carpet.”
“For instance, Russell Wilson and Ciara brought her 4-year-old son, Future (her son with rapper Future), and the couple’s 1-year-old daughter, Sienna — and the whole family coordinated in white.”
“Ciara and Russell Wilson with their two children.”
“CREDIT: Rex ShutterstockWilson wore a white IH NOM UH NIT shirt, gray camo jogger suit pants by Dzojchen and white Nike Air Jordan sneakers.”
“See Also Ciara Upgrades Her Galaxy Leggings Crop Top With This Major Boot Trend Ciara Stuns in a Cherry Red Tuxedo Style Gown Latex Thigh High Boots Ciara Celebrates Black Pride in Rooted Music Video Bares Baby Bump in All Black Nikes Meanwhile Ciara pulled off a trendy look in...”
“...snow white Marc Jacobs workboots which she paired with a graphic T shirt from MM6 Maison Margiela and an RTA brand miniskirt...”
“Watch on FNCiara in a white ensemble and Marc Jacobs boots.”
“Want more?”


"Michael Phelps' son Boomer is cute on the red carpet of the adidas children's choice Sports Award. Lindsay von glitters on the Rainbow Stripes of the nicoloden children's choice Sports Award. The lovely family of Sheila and Russell Wilson just took the lead in the children's choice Sports Award..."
"She was wearing a pair of small black sunglasses that little Sienna and her family wore when they took pictures together."
"The best dressed are those who take the children part of the awards ceremony to heart, and they pose young people on the red carpet."
"For example, Russell Wilson and Sheila brought her 4-year-old son, the future (she and rapper's future son), and their 1-year-old daughter, Siena - all dressed in white."
"Sheila and Russell Wilson with their two children."
Photo source: Rex Wilson is wearing a white IH NOM uh nit shirt, dzojchen's grey camouflage jogging suit pants and white nike air jordan shoes
"Also see Ciara upgrade her Galaxy Leggings jacket with this main trend to guide Ciara vertigo in cherry red dress style dress Latex Thigh High Boots Ciara celebrate black pride rooted in music video naked baby bumps into all black nike shoes while Ciara Lala has a stylish look in..."
“… Snow White Marc Jacobs work boots with MM6 Maison Margiela T-shirt and RTA Mini Skirt... "
"Watch fnciara in a white suit and mark Jacobs boots."
"Want more?"



Number  386
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For now, we just have to wait and see!”
“Will the couple get together in the future, let’s hope so!”
“She was so engaged with making sure I got on the right path.”AdvertisementRos and Drake must get alone considering we all know how Drake loves his mother.”
“She explained, “But that’s the reason why I think I’m able to have success.”
“In 2015, the journalist revealed that her mother’s constant worrying was a factor in all of her achievements in life.”
“If that’s not all, the pair even shares Jewish backgrounds where they both have close relationships with their parents.”
“Drake obviously loves the sport himself; the Hotline Bling rapper serves as the “global ambassador” for the Toronto Raptors.”
“She was even honored as the Pac-10 Defensive Player of the Year while playing for Stanford University up until 2008.”
“A post shared by champagnepapi (@champagnepapi) on Dec 8, 2015 at 7:39am PSTRos and Drake will get along considering she knows what she’s talking about when it comes to basketball.”
“In his Instagram throwback, he wrote, “when the post game makes you forget about what happened during the actual game.”When the post game makes you forget about what happened during the actual game @rosgo21 ?”


"At present, we can only wait and see!"
"Will the couple be together in the future, I hope so!"
"She's busy making sure I'm on the right path." Advertisers Ross and Drake have to be alone because we all know how much Drake loves his mother
"But that's why I think I can make it," she explained
"In 2015, the reporter revealed that her mother's constant worry was a factor in all her achievements in life."
"If not, they even share a Jewish background, and they have a close relationship with their parents."
"Drake himself obviously likes the sport; the Raptors are the" global ambassadors "of the Toronto Raptors."
"Before 2008, when she was at Stanford University, she was even awarded Pac-10 defensive player of the year."
"Champagnepapi (@ champagnepapi) shared a post with Drake at pstros at 7:39 a.m. on December 8, 2015, thinking she knew what basketball she was talking about."
"When the end of the game makes you forget what actually happened in the game," he wrote in instagram's backtracking When the end of the game makes you forget what happened in the actual game, @ rosgo21? "



Number  387
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“SUBSCRIBEThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Chris Jackson Getty ImagesChris Jackson Getty ImagesBAZAARFor more royals and can't-miss fashion and beauty news, sign up for the Harper's BAZAAR Newsletter.”
“Queen Elizabeth, Prince Charles, and Camilla, the Duchess of Cornwall, are also in attendance at the important event, and will be stepping out tomorrow for two memorial services.”
“This year's event also celebrates 100 years since the end of the First World War.”
“...has lost their lives in combat...”
“Luckily you can still shop it in a number of colors including red dusty rose navy and black Celeste clutch bag Jimmy Choo farfetch com 994 99 Shop Now Alongside Meghan Markle Prince Harry and Prince William Kate Middleton is attending the annual Festival of Remembrance which commemorates everyone who...”
“...looks like the ideal purse for any Holiday Season party...”
“Sadly Kate s exact dress is currently sold out online per PerthsFashion but you can still shop similar Roland Mouret designs now Dunne asymmetric cutout crepe dress Roland Mouret net a porter com 1 396 50 Shop Now Kate accessorized the dress with a Jimmy Choo Celeste velvet clutch which...”
“Kate's dress is designed by Roland Mouret, one of Meghan Markle's go-to designers.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
Subscribe to this content, which is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Chris Jackson Getty Images Chris Jackson Getty Images bazaar to learn more about the royal family and the fashion and beauty news that can't be missed, please sign up for Harper's Bazaar newsletters."
"Queen Elizabeth, Prince Charles and Camilla, Duchess of Cornwall, also attended this important event and will hold two memorial activities tomorrow."
"This year's event also celebrates the 100th anniversary of the end of the first World War."
“… Killed in battle... "
"Fortunately, you can still buy a variety of colors, including red, grey rose, navy blue and black Celeste handbags. The store, Jimmy Choo farfit com 994 99, now joins Megan markel, Prince Harry and Prince William, Kate Middleton in the annual anniversary to commemorate everyone..."
“… Looks like the perfect wallet for a holiday party... "
"Sadly, Kate's dresses are sold out online by perthfashion, but you can still buy a similar Roland Murray design. Now Donne's asymmetrical cut crepe dress Roland Murray's Porter com 1 396 50 store now Kate's dresses are decorated with Jimi Joe Celeste velvet clutch, it..."
"Kate's dress was designed by Roland Murray, one of Megan markel's designers."



Number  388
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The guy doesn’t have a spray tan, speaks at a normal volume, and seems to be living a healthy life out on Staten Island.”
“And now, I know Vinny was “the relatable one,” but wow—is he the most normcore reality star of all time?”
“Despite being shockingly relatable, however, watching Family Vacation was still like being dropped into a strange country without any tour guide books.”
“Snooki and JWoww each have two children; Ronnie’s first child was born this week; Vinny is skinny; and Pauly D … all right, he hasn’t really changed—still very much a DJ.”
“Sure, the premiere episode still featured drunken tirades, but the reunion was also a group of people reconciling with “growing up” and the cruel passage of time that nobody—not even self-described guidos and guidettes—is immune to.”
“But Jersey Shore Family Vacation truly surprised me.”
“Admittedly, this undertaking was also a bit nerve-racking—enough stories about a man yelling about the arrival of taxis and a woman binge-eating ham will do that to a newbie.”
“...about...”
“The thing about reboots is they can be pretty good gateways for people who missed out on a particular show at the peak of its popularity and what better time to finally see what all the Jersey Shore fuss was...”
“Mountain are entertaining everyone just wants to see the thing those shows are copies of...”


"This guy doesn't have a tan, he speaks normally and seems to have a healthy life on Staten Island."
Now, I know that Winnie is "the most relevant one," but wow, is he the most common reality TV star ever
"Despite its amazing affinity, watching a family holiday is still like falling into a strange country without any guide books."
"Snowy and jwoww each have two children; Ronnie's first child was born this week; Winnie is thin; Paulie D Well, he hasn't really changed. He's still a DJ. "
"Of course, the plot of the premiere is still long and drunken, but this reunion is also a group of people who are reconciled with the growth and the cruel passage of time. Even those who claim to be Guido and guiders are not immune."
"But the family vacation on the Jersey coast really surprised me."
"Admittedly, this commitment is also a bit of a headache - a man yelling that a taxi is coming, and a woman eating and drinking Ham will do harm to a novice."
“… About... "
"For those who miss a show when it's most popular, it's a good way to get back on the air. What better time is there for them to finally understand what's the noise on the Jersey coast..."
"We're entertaining. Everyone wants to see copies of those shows..."



Number  389
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“God, I'm so ready for this."”
“"I just thought she loved me back."”
“Reality TV star Becca Kufrin will be walking down the aisle after all.”
“In the season finale, "The Bachelorette" viewers watched as Kufrin got engaged to Garrett Yrigoyen on a beach in the Maldives.”
“After Kufrin admitted to Yrigoyen that she was in love with him, the Reno, Nevada-based sales representative dropped to one knee and asked her to marry him.”
“"Sorry fellas, she's off the market, she's all mine!"”
“...he ecstatically told the cameras after.”
“"There's so much that I want to do with you!"”
“...she told her new fiancé.”
“"I want to get a Costco membership with you, and I want to have your kids...”


"My God, I'm ready."
"I just think she loves me, too."
"Reality star Becca Coughlin is going down the aisle."
At the end of the season, viewers of "Bachelor" see kuflin's engagement to Garrett iligoyan on a beach in Maldives
After kuflin admitted to iligoyan that she was in love with him, the sales representative in Reno, Nevada, knelt down and proposed to her
"I'm sorry, guys. She's not in the market anymore. She's all mine!"
“…… Then he told the camera with ecstasy
"I want to do too much with you!"
“…… She told her new fiance
"I want to be your Costco member, I want to have your children..."



Number  390
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Airing on Wednesdays behind Little Big Shots and its offshoot Little Big Shots: Forever Young, the comedy’s adults 18-49 ratings have stayed within the 0.7-0.9 in Live+Same Day.”
“Ratings-wise, The Carmichael Show has been relatively stable.”
“The network and studio announced the news shortly after creator and star Jerrod Carmichael revealed he was exiting the series as cast options were set to expire at the end of today.”
“Primetime Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight to Series orders See All The Carmichael Show from 20th TV which is the leading studio and Universal TV scored a dramatic eleventh hour renewal last year with a deal coming after NBC had announced its fall schedule and its executives...”
“...had faced questions about the show s uncertain future in light of its acclaim...”
“Carmichael released a statement to Deadline today through his publicist.”
““For three seasons (okay 2.5), I got to make a show that I love with my friends,” he said.”
““It’s something I’ve wanted to do since I was 13.”
“Now, I’m excited to go make other things that I love.”
“Thank you to every person who worked on or watched The Carmichael Show.“Just like last May, we heard renewal negotiation between NBC and 20th TV had been difficult, with the two sides far apart and talks going slowly.”


"The ratings of" behind the little man "and its branch" little man: always young "broadcasted on Wednesday, and the comedy" adults 18-49 "stayed between 0.7 and 0.9 on live +."
"In terms of ratings, Carmichael show has been relatively stable."
"Shortly after creator and film star Jerrod Carmichael revealed that he would withdraw from the series, television stations and studios announced the news because the cast is due to expire at the end of today."
"Prime time panic your pilot guide and direct to series orders to see all Carmichael shows from TV 20, which is the leading studio and universal TV made a dramatic last hour renewal last year with a deal after NBC has announced its fall schedule and its executives..."
“…… Due to the favorable comments, the future of the play is uncertain... "
"Carmichael released a deadline statement today through his pr
"For three seasons (good 2.5), I'm going to do a show I like with my friends," he said
"It's something I've wanted to do since I was 13."
"Now, I'm happy to do other things I like."
"Thank you to everyone who participated in or watched Carmichael show." Just like last May, we heard that the renewal negotiation between NBC and TV 20 is very difficult. The two sides are far apart and the progress of negotiation is slow



Number  391
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  392
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Don't mind me: Alexa blended with fellow travelers after returning to London from Paris...”
“MailOnline has contacted a representative for further comment.”
“The couple, who reportedly ended their two-year relationship last June, made their way across St. Pancras International train station after arriving in the English capital via Eurostar.”
“Alexa, 34, sported a hooded top beneath a fitted winter coat while walking alongside Alexander, 41, best known for his role in HBO fantasy drama True Blood.”
“Reunited Alexa Chung appeared to confirm her relationship with Alexander Skarsgaaard is back on after returning to London with the Swedish actor on Sunday The couple who have not been seen together since parting ways last summer linked arms as they exited the station and made their way onto the...”
“...street...”
“Idling on the pavement, Alexander slung a travel bag over one shoulder while chatting with Alexa as they waited for their car.”
“A source told Us Weekly: 'The two seemed happy but a bit tired.”
“They walked through the station holding hands.”
“Back on The couple who reportedly ended their two year relationship last June made their way across St Pancras International train station after arriving in the English capital via Eurostar Close The couple who have not been seen together since parting ways last summer linked arms as they exited the...”


"Don't mind me: after returning to London from Paris, Aleksa mingled with other travelers..."
"Mailonline has contacted a representative for further comments."
According to reports, the couple ended their two-year relationship in June last year and arrived in the British capital, St Pancras, via Eurostar（ St.Pancras ）International Railway Station
Alexa, 34, who is known for her role in the HBO fantasy show true blood, is walking side by side with Alexander, 41, wearing a fitting winter coat and a Hoodie
"The reunion of Alexa Chung seems to confirm that her relationship with Alexander skarsgaard was restored after returning to London with the Swedish actor on Sunday. The couple, who have not been together since their breakup last summer, left the TV station and walked on arm in arm
“… "Street..."
Alexander strolled on the sidewalk, hanging a bag on his shoulder, chatting with Aleksa and waiting for the bus
"They look happy, but a little tired," a source told us weekly
"They went through the station hand in hand."
"It is reported that the couple, who ended their two-year relationship in June last year, crossed the railway station after arriving at the international railway station in the British capital St Pancras via Eurostar. The couple, who have never been together since they parted ways last summer, left the railway station arm in arm... "



Number  393
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Paris Jackson on Self-Love and Giving Back: 'I'd Like to Be a Role Model That Parents Are OK With'Paris and Prince Jackson Make Rare Red Carpet Appearance Together...”
“RELATED CONTENT:Paris Jackson Pranks Taylor Lautner With an Australian Accent -- Watch!”
“For more on the Jackson family, watch the video below.”
“Paris also shared new photos of her travels on Monday, where it appears she’s enjoying a tropical getaway.”
“On Saturday, Prince shared a few silly snaps of himself while traveling through Switzerland.”
“Meanwhile, his two older siblings have taken to social media over the years to connect with fans.”
“Blanket, who continues to sport long black hair, has rarely been seen in public since his father, Michael Jackson, died in 2009.”
“It’s unclear when the photo was taken and if all three siblings spent the holidays together.”
““Happy Christmas from ours to yours #brahdas,” Paris captioned the photo, which also includes their family friend, Omer Bhatti.”
“Paris Jackson is in the holiday spirit and shared a rare photo with her two brothers, Prince Jackson, 20, and Blanket Jackson, 15, on Christmas Day.”


"Paris Jackson talks about self love and feedback:" I want to be a role model recognized by my parents. "Paris and Prince Jackson rarely appear on the red carpet together..."
"Related content: Paris Jackson pranks Taylor Lautner with Australian accent - look!"
"For more information about the Jackson family, watch the video below."
"Paris also shared new photos of her trip on Monday, as if she was enjoying a tropical holiday there."
"Last Saturday, the prince shared some stupid photos of himself while traveling in Switzerland."
"Meanwhile, his two older brothers and sisters have been in touch with fans on social media for years."
The blanket has long black hair and has rarely been seen in public since his father, Michael Jackson, died in 2009
"It's not clear when the photos were taken or whether the three brothers and sisters spent the festival together."
"We wish you a merry Christmas, bradas," Paris wrote under the title of the photo, which also includes their family and friend Omer Bhatti
"Paris Jackson is in a festive mood. On Christmas day, she shared a rare picture with her two brothers, Prince Jackson, 20, and Jackson blanket, 15."



Number  394
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You do look for inspiration amongst the people close to you.””
““Other characters have been based around friends, some family, some godchildren.”
“The London Metropolitan Police told Us that officers were called to Neilson’s address on Thursday, July 12, after a woman had been “found deceased at the location.” Neilson’s death is not being treated as suspicious, per the police.”
“Neilson appeared on seasons 1 and 2 of the Bravo hit before announcing her departure from the series in 2015.”
““Good buy to Ladies of London these are the ladies I love and are my real friends!”
“!” Neilson wrote alongside an Instagram photo of herself and Kate Moss in November 2015.”
““im blessed and greatfull to say fair well!!”
“I wouldn t say it s been a ride possibly a disappointment but we all make mistakes See you on the other side out Neilson starred alongside full time cast members Caroline Stanbury Marissa Hermer Juliet Angus Caprice Bourret and Noelle Reno for the first season of Ladies of London...”
“...which aired in 2014”
“Julie Montagu and Caroline Fleming joined the cast for season 2.”


"You do find inspiration in the people around you."
"Other roles are based on friends, some families, some parenting."
London's Metropolitan police told us that on Thursday, July 12, after a woman was "found dead at the site," police received a call from Nelson. According to police, Nelson's death is not considered suspicious
"Nelson appeared in the first and second seasons of great before he announced his exit from the series in 2015."
"Buy a good thing for the ladies in London. These are the ladies I love and my true friends!"
"!" in November 2015, Nelson wrote a picture of himself and Kate Moss on instagram. "
"I'm very lucky and happy to speak very well!"
"I won't say it's a trip that may be a disappointment, but we'll all make mistakes to see you on the other side of Nelson starring full-time actress Caroline Steinberg, Marissa Helmer, Juliet angstro, priscille burlet and Noel Renault's first season Londoners..."
“… "Broadcast in 2014"
"Julie Montague and Caroline Fleming are on the cast for season two."



Number  395
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a new interview with Glamour, the Witness singer talks about settling down, starting a family and turning her focus inward after a couple of years of disappointments in her life.”
“"I had a lot of expectations at the end of 2015 and the end of 2016 that weren’t met," the 33-year-old artist admits.”
“"That was the first time, in a long time, that I didn’t get my way.”
“I think it was the universe’s way of testing me, of saying, 'We’re going to see if you really do love yourself.'"”
“"That was challenging for me, because I didn’t realize how much I relied on the outside validation," she adds.”
“"I thought that I didn’t, but once you get kicked down the mountain a little bit, you realize that the weather really is better at the top.”
“It’s been really necessary for me to go through that."”
“Emma Summerton/ GlamourUltimately, Perry says the challenges have her thinking about the next chapter of her life -- family.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"In a new interview with glamour magazine, the witness talked about settling down, forming a family and turning her attention to the heart after years of disappointment in her life."
"At the end of 2015 and 2016, a lot of my expectations didn't come true," said the 33 year old artist
"It was the first time in a long time that I didn't do things my way."
"I think it's the way the universe tests me, which is to say," we're going to see if you really love yourself. "
"It was challenging for me because I didn't realize how much I relied on external validation," she added
"I thought I didn't, but once you get kicked down a little bit, you'll realize that the weather is really better at the top of the mountain."
"I really need to go through this."
"Emma somerton has a lot of glamour, and Perry says these challenges make her think about the next chapter in her life - family."



Number  396
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2 Zolciak Biermann and Leakes face off about their troubles in a heated battle that appears to lead to Zolciak Biermann walking off the reunion stage in anger...”
“Leakes responded with her own slams calling Zolciak Biermann racist and claiming she and her daughter Brielle don t like black people RELATED VIDEO RHOA s Kim Zolciak Says She Received Death Threats After NeNe Leakes Called Her Racist In a preview for Sunday s RHOA season 10 reunion part...”
“Shortly after Andy Cohen said Zolciak-Biermann’s days on RHOA were over, the 39-year-old told TMZ on Saturday that she would “never, never” be returning to the Bravo series.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“When asked to explain why she was done with the show, the 39-year-old said it was “too much stress — unneeded stress” but that fans could still check her out on Don’t Be Tardy, which Bravo recently confirmed would be coming back for a seventh season.”
“Image zoom Credit Paras Griffin Getty Images Kim Zolciak Biermann Recounting the tension between Zolciak Biermann and her longtime rival NeNe Leakes while filming the most recent RHOA season reunion Cohen added Kim walked out of that reunion and I said Yeah I ve seen the last of that wig...”
“...at these reunions Though a rep for Bravo previously had no comment to PEOPLE casting decisions are typically made after a season s reunion wraps...”
“Image zoom Credit: Moses Robinson/BravoKim Zolciak-Biermann, Andy Cohen and NeNe LeakesZolciak-Biermann was one of the original Atlanta Housewives when the show first premiered in October 2008, before deciding to leave RHOA halfway through season 5.”
““[RHOA] can be very combative.”
“A lot of negativity,” she told PEOPLE in July, when looking back on her time on the show.”


"2. Zorchak Bierman and Alex confront each other about their troubles in a fierce battle, which seems to lead zorchak Bierman down the stage of reunion angrily..."
"Alex responded that her own grand slam called zorchakbilman racist and claimed that she and her daughter Blair didn't like the black related video. RhoA's Kim zorchakh said she received death threats after nenelix said she rehearsed racism in the 10 th season of RhoA on Sunday..."
Shortly after Andy Cohen said zorchak Bilman's days at RhoA were over, the 39 year old told TMZ on Saturday that she would "never, never" return to the series
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When asked why she ended the show, the 39 year old said it was" too much pressure - unnecessary pressure, "but fans can still see her on don't be late, and Bravo recently confirmed that she will return in the seventh season
"Image source: Griffin Getty Images Kim zolciak Biermann describes the tense relationship between zolciak Biermann and her longtime competitor Nene leakes when filming the reunion of RhoA in the latest season. Cohen added that Kim walked out of that reunion and I said yes, I saw the last wig..."
“… At these gatherings, although a representative of Bravo has not commented on people before, decisions are usually made after the end of a season's gatherings... "
"Image zooming credit: mose Robinson / bravokin zolchak Bilman, Andy Cohen and Nene Rix zolchak Bilman were among the original crew when the show premiered in October 2008, and then decided to leave Roya midway through the fifth season."
"[Roya] can be very aggressive."
"A lot of negative things," she told people magazine in July, when she reviewed her time on the show



Number  397
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The two were later spotted at a movie theatre, a vegan restaurant and a supermarket.”
“Watson wore a white and red printed feminist “Marchin” T-shirt and black capris, while Overstreet wore a black printed tank top and ripped jeans.”
“...actress and the 29 year old Glee alum and musician who recently released the single Carried Away were seen in a parking lot locking lips and they also took selfies while Overstreet also snapped photographs of Watson posing next to one of the vehicles...”
“Emma Watson and Chord Overstreet were photographed kissing earlier this week in Los Angeles marking the clearest sign that they are romantically involved less than a month after reports said they had split after dating for a few months The 28 year old Harry Potter and Beauty and the Beast...”
“At least that is what we think.”
“It’s official!”


"They were later found in a movie theater, a vegetarian restaurant and a supermarket."
Watson was wearing a white and red print feminist "March" T-shirt and black Capris, while Overstreet was wearing a black print vest and ripped jeans
“…… Some people saw actresses, 29 year old glee alumni and musicians in the parking lot. They closed their lips and took pictures of themselves, while ovestritt also took pictures of Watson taking a group photo beside one of the cars.... "
"Emma Watson and chord ovestritt were photographed kissing in Los Angeles earlier this week, marking the most obvious sign that they have been in love for less than a month, after reports that they broke up a few months after dating 28 year old Harry Potter and the beauty and the beast..."
"At least that's what we think."
"It's official!"



Number  398
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the age of President Trump and constant self-promotion and validation on social media, a strong voice that's focused on what's new and never seen before is a mythical thing.”
“Rihanna climbed towards the Met entrance in another bulbous Comme des Garçons creation, and like Lasichanh, let what she was wearing do the communicating.”
“A stranger to the scene would have hardly known she was an important guest at the A-list circus that is the annual Costume Institute Gala, let alone the star of the whole show.”
“The reclusive designer, who founded label Comme des Garçons in 1969, is the focus of the museum’s latest exhibit and a rare bird in an industry full of peacocks.”
“She scarcely gives interviews, doesn’t have personal social media accounts and won’t measure her success on praise from others.”
“Her designs speak for themselves.”
“And in that way, her ethos was the unifier of a disparate and relatively quiet blue carpet.”
“Guests to the yearly fundraiser held in honor of the exhibit are encouraged to channel the subject of the new showcase, which typically happens with varying degrees of success.”
“The attendees who best hit Monday's theme — channeling Kawakubo through her own creations or by working with another designer in attendance — made their way up the steps of the Met without much fuss.”
“Helen Lasichanh, the wife of co-host Pharrell Williams, hit the carpet early in a look from one of Kawakubo’s most recent collections which experimented with silhouettes and bound the body without armholes.”


"In an era of President trump and constant self promotion and validation on social media, a strong voice focused on new things and never seen before is a myth."
"Rihanna climbed up to the gate of another bulbous galons commune, like lassia, and let her wear clothes to communicate."
"A stranger who came to the scene hardly knew that she was an important guest of the A-class circus at the annual fashion academy event, let alone the star of the whole show."
"The reclusive designer founded the comme des Gar à ons brand in 1969, which is the focus of the museum's latest exhibits and a rare bird in the peacock industry."
"She rarely gives interviews, doesn't have a personal social media account, and doesn't measure her success based on praise from others."
"Her design speaks for itself."
"In this way, her atmosphere has become a very different, relatively quiet unity of the blue carpet."
The annual fund-raising activities held to commemorate the exhibition encourage visitors to introduce the theme of the new exhibition, which usually leads to varying degrees of success
"Those who are most in line with Monday's theme - through her own creation or working with another designer present to guide Kawaguchi to the steps of metropolis without panic."
"Helen rasishan, the wife of co host Farrell Williams, has been on the carpet for a long time. This is a recent series of Kawaguchi Baihui. She tried silhouette and tied her body to the place without armhole."



Number  399
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“13”
“...that Marylynn Is Toxic 01 02 Week 3 Sneak Peek Victoria Makes Some Enemies 04 07 Sarah Opens Up to Matt About Her Family 03 29 This Season on The Bachelor 2021 with Matt James 04 40 Meet the New Bachelor Matt James 01 47 Queen Victoria Has Arrived 03”
“Up Drama 03 24 Katie and Sarah Have an Emotional Talk About Family and Priorities 03 41 Serena P Is Falling Into Like with Matt James 04 45 Sarah Tells Matt She s Leaving 04 17 The Ladies Confront Sarah About Interrupting the Group Date 04 16 Victoria Tells Matt...”
“Hair for Black Women in America 00 54 Week 5 Sneak Peek Matt Makes Big Decisions to Quell Big Drama 03 32 The Fall In Love Fest Obstacle Course 03 45 New Arrival Michelle Makes a Quick Connection with Matt James 01 16 Week 4 Sneak Peek New Arrivals Stir...”
“04 03 Victoria Feels So Sorry for Matt in Her Fiery Goodbye 03 15 Kit Is Falling in Love with Matt 01 06 Week 6 Sneak Peek A Familiar Face Returns 04 39 New Arrivals Shake Up the House in Week 4 01 29 Chelsea Explains the Emotional Side of...”


“13”
“… Marilyn poison 01 02 week 3 peeping at Victoria making some enemies 04 07 Sarah reveals her family to Matt 03 29 Bachelor of the season 2021 meet new Bachelor Matt James 04 40 Queen Victoria has arrived 03 "
"Play 03 24 Katie and Sarah have an emotional conversation about family and priorities 03 41 Serena P falls in love with Matt James 04 45 Sarah tells Matt she's leaving 04 17 ladies face Sarah about breaking group appointments 04 16 Victoria tells Matt..."
"Black American women's hair 00 54 week 5 peeking at Matt makes a big decision to calm down drama 03 32 falling in love festival obstacle course 03 45 new Michelle and Matt James establish quick contact 01 16 week 4 peeking at the new exciting..."
"04 03 Victoria is very sad for Matt. She falls in love with Matt in her fiery farewell uniform 03 15 team uniform 01 06 week 6 peeks at a familiar face and returns 04 39 the new comer changes in week 4 01 29 Chelsea explains the emotional side..."



Number  400
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...deal breaker although maybe it should be he said...”
“My gut sense is that if people are willing to overlook that what they re watching is not real in the way that it is advertised as real then this is kind of a funny situation where the allegation doesn t strike me as being a game changer or a...”
“The studio said on Sunday that it has halted production on the popular ABC unscripted series in the middle of Season 4 following “allegations of misconduct” and that an investigation is underway.”
“It appears to involve questions about whether a sexual encounter occurred between two cast members, and whether one of them was too inebriated to give consent.”
“Mike Johansson, a senior lecturer for the School of Communication at the Rochester Institute of Technology who has closely followed reality shows, believes that viewers will continue to tune into the “Bachelor” franchise, even if something terrible occurred.”
“Also Read: 'Bachelor in Paradise' Alum Leah Block Rips 'Trashy' Show Amid Production Shutdown“It goes back to the old P.T.”
“Barnum thing — there’s no such thing as bad publicity, and this will make people want to watch this particular show even more,” he told TheWrap.”
“Johansson doesn’t expect the series to enact any significant changes or to limit contestants’ access to booze.”
“He said the only potential impact might be that networks make it harder for productions to grind to a halt mid-season.”
““You’d like to think that [a change in alcohol access] would happen, but honestly I think the only change that might come out of this is watertight contracts,” he said.”


“… Deal breaker, maybe he should say... "
"My intuition is that if people are willing to ignore that what they see is not real, as the advertisement says, then it's an interesting situation, in which case I don't think it's a game changer or a..."
The studio said on Sunday it had stopped production of the popular ABC unpublished Series in the middle of the fourth quarter following "misconduct charges" and was investigating
"It seems to involve whether the two actors have had sexual contact and whether one of them is drunk and unwilling to agree."
"Mike Johansson, a senior lecturer at the school of communication at the Rochester Institute of technology, who closely follows the reality show, believes that even if something terrible happens, audiences will continue to watch the bachelor series."
"Also read: 'bachelors in heaven' aluria block tearing 'junk' show in production shut down" it goes back to the old P.T. "
"The Barnum thing - no bad publicity, it's going to make people want to watch this particular show more," he told the wrap
"Johnson does not expect any major changes to be made to the series, nor does he expect to restrict the drinking of competitors."
"The only potential impact, he said, may be that the Internet makes it harder for production to stop in the middle of the season."
"You might think [the change in the supply of alcohol] will happen, but to be honest, I think the only change that could come about is an impeccable contract," he said



Number  401
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just months before his passing, he and son Adam, 61, collaborated on what became the documentary, For the Love of Spock,as the father-son pair became very close over last seven years of Leonard’s life.”
“Love ya all!” the bride tweeted on Monday.”
“On Monday, which would’ve been Leonard Nimoy‘s 87th birthday, his son Adam wed Star Trek: Deep Space Nine actress Terry Farrell in San Francisco, California.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple, who announced their engagement in August 2017, shared their wedding selfie with film critic Scott Mantz who tweeted the happy news, writing, “Adam Nimoy & Terry Farrell got married today at a civil ceremony at City Hall in San Francisco!”
“Today is the birthday of Adam’s father #LeonardNimoy!”
“Big CONGRATS to the happy couple!”
“!”Following the wedding, Farrell, 54, added, “Mrs.”
“Adam Nimoy,” to her bio on Twitter.”
““Freakin AWESOME day!!”


"Just a few months before his death, he and his 61 year old son Adam collaborated on this documentary for the love of Spock, because the father and son became very close in the last seven years of Leonard's life."
"Love you! "The bride tweeted on Monday."
Leonard Nimoy's son Adam married Star Trek: Deep Space 9 actress Terry Farrell in San Francisco, California, on Monday, his 87th birthday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The couple announced their engagement in August 2017 and shared their wedding selfie with film critic Scott Mantz, who tweeted the good news:" Adam nemoy and Terry Farrell got married today at a civil ceremony at San Francisco City Hall! "
"It's Adam's father's birthday, Leonardo nemoy!"
"Congratulations to the happy couple
"After the wedding, Farrell, 54, added," Ma'am. "
"Adam nemoy," she tweeted
"Today is great!"



Number  402
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He then took to his Instagram story to share a photo with his kids, after his safe return to the Earth after his jump.”
“The music mogul took to Instagram this afternoon with a video that showed him wearing a custom skydiving suit, talking about his big jump.”
“On Sunday evening the rapper had a party at his Los Angeles mansion - which was bought in 2014 for $40m - where 200 people showed up and made plenty of noise, according to TMZ.”
“But police put a damper on the blowout as they arrived on the scene asking the singer's private security to shut it down or they would.”
“Diddy's team handled the situation.”
“Bday boy: Diddy sure wanted to celebrate his 49th birthday to the fullest.”
“On Sunday evening the rapper had a party at his Los Angeles mansion where 200 people showed up and made plenty of noise according to TMZ seen in October Nice digs But police put a damper on the blowout as they arrived on the scene asking the singer s private...”
“...security to shut it down or they would...”
“Diddy's team handled the situationThe party was described by the site as a 'wild rager.'”
“The neighbors placed 'several calls' to police complaining of noise and the 50 cars that were parked all up and down the street.”


"He parachuted back to earth safely and shared a photo with the children on instagram."
"The music mogul went to instagram this afternoon with a video showing him wearing a custom parachute suit and talking about his parachute jump."
According to TMZ, the rapper held a party at his mansion in Los Angeles on Sunday night, when 200 people showed up and made a lot of noise. The mansion was bought for $40 million in 2014
"But the police restrained the blowout when they arrived at the scene and asked the singer's private security to shut it down, otherwise they would shut it down."
"Didi's team solved the problem."
"Little boy: Diddy really wants to celebrate his 49th birthday."
"On Sunday night, the rapper held a party in the luxury house in Los Angeles, 200 people were present and made a lot of noise. According to TMZ's report in October, it was a good excavation, but the police suppressed the explosion when they arrived at the scene to ask about the singer's privacy..."
“… Security shut it down, or they'll... "
"Didi's team dealt with it, and the party was described by the website as a 'wild thug'," he said
"The neighbors called the police and complained about the noise. All the 50 cars parked on the street kept going up and down."



Number  403
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Public appearance: The couple looked smitten as they took to the red carpet of the Gala for the Global Ocean in Monte-Carlo, Monaco...”
“It s official This comes after the pair made their first public appearance together on the red carpet for the Monte Carlo Gala for the Global Ocean event on Wednesday Katy who spent over 11 months on tour finally wrapping things up in late August was heard branding Orlando her...”
“And on-off couple of two years Katy Perry and Orlando Bloom looked closer than ever as they enjoyed a romantic getaway together in Corfu, Greece, on Thursday.”
“The singer, 33, wrapped her arms around her actor beau, 41, as they took in the sights and the stunning landscapes of the Greek island.”
“Smitten Katy Perry wrapped her arms around Orlando Bloom as the loved up pair enjoyed a break away in Corfu on Thursday after making their red carpet debut as a couple Katy was the picture of summer chic in a pink floral co ord suit which she paired with flip...”
“...flops that had a dramatic eye print...”
“She complemented her look with a pair of pink-tinted sunglasses and gold hooped earrings, while accentuating her features with a glamorous palette of make-up.”
“The I Kissed A Girl hitmaker kept her cropped blonde locks hidden underneath a straw hat, while she finished off her colourful look with a pink handbag.”
“Stylish: Katy was the picture of summer chic in a pink floral co-ord suit, which she paired with flip-flops that had a dramatic eye printOrlando cut a casual figure in loose-fitting black jeans, which he paired with a simple white T-shirt.”
“He accessorised with a black baseball cap, and completed his look by wearing a pair of white slip-on shoes without socks.”


"Public appearances: when the couple stepped onto the red carpet of the Monte Carlo global ocean event in Monaco, they looked very infatuated with..."
"According to the official news, this is after the two made their first public appearance on the red carpet of the Monte Carlo Global Ocean Festival on Wednesday, Katie spent more than 11 months on the tour and finally completed her mission in late August when she was heard to have branded Orlando..."
"Two years on end, Katie Perry and Orlando Bloom spent a romantic holiday in Corfu, Greece, on Thursday, closer than ever before."
The 33 year old singer hugged the 41 year old actor Bo while enjoying the beautiful and charming scenery of the Greek island
"The infatuated Katie Perry hugs Orlando Bloom, and the couple enjoyed a break-up after their debut on the Corfu red carpet on Thursday. Katie is a couple. She's wearing a suit with pink flowers and matching it with flip to show the fashion of summer... "
“… A flip flop with dramatic eye print... "
"She complements her look with a pair of pink sunglasses and gold earrings, and highlights her features with a charming make-up."
The hero of I kiss a girl hides her irregular blonde hair under a straw hat, while she ends up with a pink handbag
"Trendy: Katie is dressed in a pink floral suit, paired with eye-catching flip flops, which is a portrayal of summer fashion. Orlando is dressed in loose black jeans to cut a casual figure, and he is paired with a simple white T-shirt."
He finished his look with a black baseball cap and a pair of white flat shoes without socks



Number  404
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Don’t worry if you have trouble remembering that, it’ll be mentioned no fewer than six times by Shamari this episode.”
“In case you forgot, Porsha and Shamari went to the same high school.”
“She’s going to spend an afternoon working with Dennis.”
“She’s also trying to get to know Dennis’s mom but shows up in a catsuit to The Original Hot Dog Factory.”
“Porsha starts the episode off by saying she’s keeping her pregnancy a secret.”
“Let’s get to it.”
“If I wanted to watch a bunch of black women over 30 arrange a trip, I WOULD JOIN AN ADULT CHAPTER OF DELTA SIGMA THETA, OKAY?”
“I would definitely watch it over a bunch of grown women figuring out a trip.”
“I WOULD WATCH IT.”
“Maybe we’ll end up somewhere interesting, like a seven-person non-monogamous sexual relationship.”


"Don't worry, if you don't remember, shamari will mention it at least six times in this episode."
"In case you forget, Posha and shamari went to the same high school."
"She's going to spend the afternoon working with Dennis."
"She also wanted to meet Dennis's mother, but she showed up at the original hot dog factory in tights."
"Bertha said from the beginning that pregnancy was a secret."
"Let's start."
"If I want to see a group of black women over 30 arrange a trip, I'll join delta sigma theta's adult club, OK?"
"I'm sure I'll see a group of adult women planning a trip."
"I'll see it."
"Maybe we'll end up in an interesting place, like a seven person non monogamous relationship."



Number  405
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(AFP PHOTO/Alberto PIZZOLI)”
“While Bella Hadid sported a wavy bob, Emily had her hair swept up in an updo.”
“Both the models’ looks featured thigh-high slits, long trains and Bulgari jewellery apart from the figure-hugging silhouettes in muted shades.”
“Style (@EOnlineStyle) May 17, 2017Bella was wearing a rose-tinted strapless satin gown by Alexandre Vauthier , while Emily opted for a similar silken number by Simona Barbieri.”
“Bella Hadid and Emily Ratajkowski are twinning at Cannes and the photos are so stunning: https://t.co/1Rnlv6Xmxt pic.twitter.com/bCrx8BpeqQ — E!”
“On the opening day of the fest, models Bella Hadid and Emily Ratajkowski ended up twinning, and they looked elated that they did .”
“And sometimes, two fashionable minds think alike.”
“From the biggest designer labels and gorgeous jewellery to killer luxe heels — celebs go all-out to ensure that their look is on point.”
“As much as the Cannes Film festival is about cinema, it’s also about celebrities and all the fashion they serve.”


"(AFP Photo / Alberto pizzoli)"
"When Bella Hadid waves Bob, Emily curls her hair up."
Both models have thigh high slits, long trains and Bulgari jewelry, in addition to embracing the silhouette in soft tones
Style (@ eonlinestyle) on May 17, 2017, Bella wore a rose Strapless satin dress designed by Alexandre vauthier, while Emily chose a similar silk dress designed by Simona Barbieri
"Bella Hadid and Emily ratajkovsky are twins in Cannes. The photos are amazing: https://t.co/1Rnlv6Xmxt company pic.twitter.com/bCrx8BpeqQ -E！”
"At the opening ceremony of the festival, model Bella Hadid and Emily ratajkovsky became twins, and they looked very happy."
"Sometimes, two fashionable people think the same thing."
"From the biggest designer brands and gorgeous jewelry to killer luxury high heels, celebrities go all out to make sure they have the right look."
"The Cannes Film Festival is about movies, but also about celebrities and all the fashions they serve."



Number  406
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A spokesperson for Louis confirmed that the charges have been dropped.”
“However, while Louis won't face charges, Ana previously claimed she would sue the star.”
“The One Direction singer was arrested following the bust-up on March 3 at Los Angeles International Airport when he was travelling with his girlfriend Eleanor Calder.”
“5 Louis Tomlinson will not be charged fro his airport brawl involving a photographer Credit: Radar Online / Coleman RaynerBut the Los Angeles City Attorney’s Office said the 25-year-old will only be called to a hearing before the authority.”
“A spokesman said: “Each of the parties will be interviewed regarding the incident and advised of the law and ways to avoid similar incidences in the future.”
“Typically there is no further action taken by our office after the hearing though we do reserve the right to file charges up to one year from the date of the original incident should additional information or future actions require additional measures MOST READ IN TV SHOWBIZ SOULFUL SINGER How...”
“...old is Gabrielle and what are her biggest songs...”
“...tongue twister Katie Price s REAL name revealed and it s quite the mouthful Exclusive he was so brave Katie Price s joy as her son Harvey gets the Covid vaccine early heartbroken Engelbert Humperdinck s wife Patricia is dead after contracting Covid FEARS FOR PADDY Paddy Doherty rushed back...”
“...to hospital and put on oxygen after Covid battle TAKING CHAIR OF IT Cheryl Baker selling her furniture after lockdown left her broke WHO S THAT BEHIND THE MASK”
“The Masked Singer stars unmasked as experts give verdict zoom zoom Holly Willougby forced to cancel 40th birthday and will party on Zoom instead Exclusive BACKSPLASH The Chase star defends swimming with dolphins after disgusting scene backlash GREASE IS THE WORD Grease cast then and now where are Danny and...”


"A spokesman for Lewis confirmed that the charges had been dropped."
"However, although Lewis will not face charges, Anna has previously said that she will sue the star."
"The singer was arrested while traveling with his girlfriend Eleanor Calder at Los Angeles International Airport on March 3."
"5 Louis Tomlinson will not be charged for a fight with a photographer at the airport. The photographer's name comes from radar online / Coleman Reiner, but the Los Angeles City prosecutor's office said the 25-year-old man would only be summoned to the authorities' hearing. "
"Both sides will be interviewed about the incident and informed of the law and ways to avoid similar incidents in the future," a spokesman said
"Normally, our office will not take any further action after the hearing. Although we reserve the right to make accusations within one year from the date of the initial incident, if more information or future actions require more measures, most affectionate singers in the TV show industry will read how to..."
“…… Gabrielle is old. What's her biggest song... "
“… The tongue twister exposed Katie Price's real name, which is quite a big exclusive. He was so brave that Katie Price was very happy because her son Harvey got the coved vaccine. Early heartbreak Engelbert hampdink's wife Patricia died, and coved worried that paddy Doherty would rush back... "
"After the battle of coved, she went to the hospital for oxygen. Cheryl Baker sold her furniture after being blocked. Who's behind the mask?"
"Masked singer star unveiling experts give a verdict that zoom zoom holly willougby was forced to cancel his 40th birthday party and take an exclusive back shot of zoom chasing the star to defend the disgusting scene after swimming with dolphins. The word" grease "was and is used by Denny and Harry at that time



Number  407
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Congratulations Eagles for winning the Super Bowl, what a game that was!” she wrote on Instagram.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Philadelphia Eagles Fly to Their First-Ever Super Bowl Win in Stunning Victory Against PatriotsBündchen extended an olive branch to the Eagles while also praising her husband and his team for their “commitment” and “sacrifice” after the Super Bowl.”
“Image zoom Credit: Tom Brady/InstagramThough the source added that “nobody really knows what’s next for him now,” it’s likely Brady won’t be retiring.”
““Gisele always supports Tom no matter what,” a source close to the couple said.”
“Gratitude to my teammates for the incredible effort given all season regardless of the challenges we faced.”Although Bündchen supported her husband during football’s biggest game, but a source recently told PEOPLE the mother of two, 37,would still like to see him retire.”
“And the number one feeling I have had the past 4 days is gratitude.”
“And they are all part of learning and growing in this journey of life.”He continued, “Learning turns everything into a positive.”
““There are many emotions when you come up short of your goal.”
““It has taken me a few days to reflect on our SB loss as well as the great season our team had,” Brady wrote.”
“...along with a message of gratitude to everyone who supported him and his team...”


"Congratulations to the eagles for winning the super bowl. What a wonderful game it is!"! "She wrote on instagram."
"Related video: the Philadelphia Eagles fly to their first ever Super Bowl victory, reaching out an olive branch to the eagles in their amazing victory over Patricia otsbanchin, and praising her husband and his team for their" commitment "and" sacrifice "after the super bowl
Credit for image zooming: Tom Brady / instagram although the source added that "no one really knows what he's going to do next now," Brady is unlikely to retire
"Giselle always supported Tom anyway," a source close to the couple said
"Thanks to my teammates, no matter what challenges we face, they have worked incredibly hard throughout the season Although ban Chen supported her husband in the most important game in football history, a source recently told people that the 37 year old mother of two still wants to see him retire
"In the past four days, my first feeling has been gratitude."
"On the journey of life, they are all part of learning and growing up," he added. "Learning turns everything into a positive side."
"There are a lot of emotions when you don't get there."
"It took me a few days to reflect on our sb defeat and the great season our team had," Brady wrote
“…… At the same time, thanks to all those who support him and his team.... "



Number  408
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As well as his cameo on Game Of Thrones, Ed has also appeared as himself in the movie Bridget Jones' Baby and US NBC sitcom Undateable.”
“The movie's release date is slated for December 20 2019.”
“And now Ed Sheeran, 27, could be set for one of his biggest acting roles to date as he is said to have landed a cameo in the upcoming Star Wars movie.”
“According to The Sun, the Thinking Out Loud star will play a stormtrooper in Episode IX which is currently filming in Pinewood Studios.”
“Actor Ed Sheeran 27 could be set for one of his biggest acting roles to date as he is said to have landed a cameo in the upcoming Star Wars movie Ed s reported cameo in the flick is being kept a secret and as the storm trooper s are...”
“...suited soldiers fans won t get to catch a glimpse of the flame haired singer when the film hits screens...”
“MailOnline has contacted a representative of Ed for comment.”
“Episode IX will be the third and final film in the Star Wars sequel trilogy which began with 2015's The Force Awakens and was followed by 2017's The Last Jedi.”
“Directed by JJ Abrams, it is also said to be the final film of the main Star Wars film franchise, which began in 1977 with the eponymous film.”
“The movie will star Daisy Ridley, John Boyega, Domhnall Gleeson and Lupita Nyong'o.”


"In addition to appearing in the game of thrones, ed also starred in the movie Bridget Jones' baby and NBC's sitcom indestructible
"The movie's release date is set for December 20, 2019."
"Now 27 year old ed Sheeran is likely to become one of his biggest acting roles so far, because he is said to have a cameo role in the upcoming Star Wars movie."
According to the sun, the thinking superstar will play a member of the Stormtrooper team in the ninth episode currently being filmed at Songlin studios
"Actor ed Sheeran may become one of his biggest acting roles so far on the 27th, because he is said to have a cameo role in the upcoming Star Wars movie. According to ED Sheeran, the cameo role in the movie has always been a secret, and so has storm commando."
“…… When the film came out, fans of soldiers in uniform couldn't see the flaming red haired singer at a glance... "
"Mailonline has contacted Ed's representative for comments."
"Episode 9 will be the third and final film in the Star Wars sequel trilogy, which starts with the force awakening in 2015 and then the last Jedi in 2017
The film, directed by JJ Abrams, is said to be the last in the Star Wars series, which began in 1977 with the film of the same name
The film will feature Daisy Redley, John boyga, domnal Grayson and Lupita nion o



Number  409
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yes they’re magic, they would fit me all times.”Superstore returns January 4, at 8 p.m. on NBC.”
“...know what magic means Stephen...”
“America Ferrera told Stephen Colbert about those traveling pantsAmerica Ferrera Reveals What She Won't Name Her Baby — and If Those Sisterhood Jeans Still FitAmerica Ferrera made her first late-night talk show appearance as a mother-t0-be!”
“The expectant actress, 33, talked all about her baby news during Wednesday’s Late Show with Stephen Colbert during which she revealed baby name ideas and how she’s feeling about pregnancy.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I feel good, I feel really good, aside from a completely sober New Year’s Eve,” Ferrera told host Stephen Colbert.”
““But my dear husband built me a club in the apartment which just means he got lights and a fog machine.”
“I was stone cold sober so it just felt like a junior high party.”
“Everyone else was having a great time.”The Superstore star and husband Ryan Piers Williams both confirmed they are expecting their first child in coordinating social media posts on New Year’s Eve.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"Yes, they are magic, they will fit me all the time." Super store returns January 4, 8 p.m. on NBC
“… You know what magic means, Stephen... "
"American Ferrera tells Stephen Colbert what those trips are revealing, and she won't name her children - if those sister jeans still fit American Ferrera makes her first late night talk show as a mother!"
"The 33 year old actress to be talked about her baby news on the show with Stephen Colbert late Wednesday, where she revealed her baby's name and how she felt about being pregnant."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's a completely sober New Year's Eve and I feel good, I feel really good," Ferreira told host Stephen Colbert
"But my dear husband built me a club in his apartment, which means he has lights and fog lights."
"I was very conscious, so it felt like a junior high school party."
"Everyone else had a good time." Both the superstar and her husband, Ryan piers Williams, confirmed that they would have their first child on New Year's Eve, coordinating social media posts
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  410
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It was always about the country.”CNN’s Dan Merica and Jim Acosta contributed to this report.”
““I felt like I was serving my country, not serving (Trump),” she said.”
“In the clip, Manigault-Newman said she joined the administration out of a sense of duty.”
“She denied that a dramatic confrontation with Kelly led to her departure.”
“She reportedly had a tense relationship with White House chief of staff John Kelly; both Kelly and former chief of staff Reince Priebus wanted to let her go, a former White House official told CNN.”
“She has no contact now.”Manigault-Newman resigned from her position in the White House in December.”
““She had limited contact with the President while here.”
““Omarosa was fired three times on ‘The Apprentice,’ and this was the fourth time we let her go,” he said.”
“Manigault-Newman described the situation inside the White House as “bad.” Asked whether the nation should be concerned about the administration, she nodded, adding, “it’s going to not be OK.”White House principal deputy press secretary Raj Shah dismissed Manigault-Newman’s comments at a news briefing Thursday.”
“Manigault-Newman claimed that when she attempted to reason with President Donald Trump about some of his tweets, she was “attacked” and denied access by “all of the people around him,” including Trump’s son-in-law, Jared Kushner, and daughter Ivanka Trump.”


Dan merica and Jim Acosta of CNN contributed to the story
"I feel like I'm serving the country, not [trump]," she said
"In the clip, manigalt Newman said she joined the government out of a sense of responsibility."
"She denied that the dramatic confrontation with Kelly led to her leaving."
"She is reported to be in a tense relationship with White House chief of staff John Kelly; both Kelly and former chief of staff Raines pribas want to let her go, a former White House official told CNN."
"She doesn't have any contact right now." Manigalt Newman resigned from her white house job last December
"She had limited contact with the president when she was here."
"Omarosa was fired three times for apprentice, and this is the fourth time we've let her go," he said
"Manigalt Newman described the situation inside the White House as" bad. ". Asked if the United States should care about the government, she nodded, adding, "it won't be good." Raj Shah, the White House's Chief Deputy press secretary, refuted manigalt Newman's comments at a news conference on Thursday
"Manigalt Newman claimed that when she tried to reason with President Donald Trump about some of his tweets, she was" attacked "by" everyone around him "and refused to visit, including Trump's son-in-law Jared Kushner and daughter Ivanka trump."



Number  411
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...that she had gotten drunk and stripped down to nearly nothing in Kris’ closet.”
“Of course, instead of getting Kris an actual Porsche, Lawrence gifted a toy one — which fit perfectly next to the mother of six’s beloved giant metal-and-glass red polar bear (named “Christmas”) in her elegant foyer, decorated with rainbow-themed decor for the holidays.”
“So close, in fact, that she gave the KarJenner momager a car for Christmas!”
“Well, sort of.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Kris, 62, revealed all on Instagram Saturday, posting a shot of the holiday present.”
“Image zoom Credit: Kris Jenner/Instagram“My BFF #Jenniferlawrence asked me what i wanted for Christmas and of course I said a Porsche, DUH.”
“My girl didn’t disappoint,” Kris wrote.”
““Thank you Jen I love you!!”
“In November, Lawrence revealed before interviewing Kim on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”


“…… She's drunk and she's wearing almost nothing in Chris's closet
"Of course, Lawrence didn't buy Chris a real Porsche, but a toy car - in her elegant foyer, this toy was placed with the giant metal and glass red polar bear (named" Christmas ") beloved by the mother of six children, and decorated the festival with rainbow theme."
"So close, in fact, she gave mother kajana a car as a Christmas present!"
"Well, sort of."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Chris, 62, exposed all this on instagram on Saturday, posting a picture of a holiday gift."
"Credit for image zooming: Kris Jenner / instagram." my boyfriend, Jennifer Lawrence, asked me what I wanted for Christmas. Of course, I was talking about Porsche
"My daughter didn't disappoint me," Chris wrote
"Thank you, Jane, I love you!"
In November last year, Lawrence revealed before a live interview with Kim by Jimmy Kimmel



Number  412
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But we go through them together as a family and that’s the most important thing for me.””
““It’s been a tough decision for us to make.”
“Cheryl Cole confronted reports that her mother, Joan Callaghan, influenced her split from Liam Payne.”
““I hate responding to stuff esp at such difficult times but I cannot sit here and listen to such nasty, false articles regarding my mam.”
“I don’t know why they involve her in stores about me,” the “Call My Name” songstress, 35, tweeted on Monday, July 2.”
““I can assure you she has absolutely nothing to do with any of it.”
“I am a grown woman who is capable of dealing with my own life.”
“She is a soft and kind woman who doesn’t deserve to be dragged into something that has nothing whatsoever to do with her.”Cole’s statement comes one day after she and Payne, 24, revealed their split.”
““We are sad to announce that we are going our separate ways,” the X Factor judge tweeted onSunday, July 1.”
“We still have so much love for each other as a family.”


"But it's the most important thing for me that we experience together as a family."
"It was a difficult decision for us."
"Cheryl Cole faces reports that her mother, Joan Callahan, influenced her to break up with Liam Payne."
"I hate to respond to these things at such a difficult time, but I can't sit here listening to those dirty, fake articles about my mother."
"I don't know why they brought her into the store to talk about me," the 35 year old singer tweeted on Monday, July 2
"I can assure you that she has nothing to do with it."
"I'm a mature woman with the ability to handle my life."
"She is a gentle and kind woman and should not be involved in things that have nothing to do with her." Cole's statement came one day after she and 24-year-old Penn announced their separation
"We are sad to announce that we will go our separate ways," judge X factor tweeted on Sunday, July 1
"As a family, we still love each other so much."



Number  413
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Time will tell if A-listers will be escorted by anti-gun-violence activists or women's rights activists on the Oscars red carpet as well.”
“Also at the Golden Globes, several stars swapped their significant others for women's rights and LGBTQ advocates who used their turn on the red carpet to speak about the causes they represented.”
“Michael Bloomberg's New York-based gun-control advocacy group Everytown for Gun Safety has created an anti-gun-violence pin for celebrities to wear to the Oscars on Sunday, sources tell The Hollywood Reporter.”
“Since the Parkland, Florida, high school massacre that left 17 dead last month, thousands of young people have called upon the organization to support their efforts to advocate for more stringent gun-control laws and other public-safety issues.”
“According to one Hollywood stylist, the pins have been sent to The Wall Group and other key Hollywood agencies to dole out prior to the red carpet.”
“The pins will likely display #NeverAgain, the rallying slogan for the movement.”
“Everytown for Gun Safety has not yet responded to THR's request for confirmation.”
“Time's Up pins, which were first worn at the Golden Globes in January, are also expected to be worn on the red carpet in support of the legal defense fund that assists those fighting sexual harassment.”
“Earlier this week, Gucci announced that it would join Oprah Winfrey, George and Amal Clooney, Jeffrey and Marilyn Katzenberg and Steven Spielberg and Kate Capshaw in contributing $500,000 to support the "March for Our Lives" anti-gun-violence rally to be held in Washington, D.C., on March 24.”
“While it s not uncommon for stars to wear pins supporting organizations like the ACLU Planned Parenthood or GLAAD especially following the 2016 election and President Donald Trump s subsequent immigration ban the buzz about not only gun violence and sexual harassment but equal pay and other gender issues is...”


"Time will tell the front-line stars whether they are escorted by anti gun violence activists or feminists on the Oscar red carpet."
"Also at the Golden Globe Awards, several stars exchanged their important figures for advocates of feminism and LGBTQ, and they talked about the cause they represented on the red carpet."
"Michael Bloomberg's New York based gun control advocacy group, everytown for gun safety, has created an anti gun violence pin for celebrities to wear at the Oscars on Sunday," the source told Hollywood reporters
"Since last month's parkland high school massacre in Florida killed 17 people, thousands of young people have called on the organization to support their efforts to advocate stricter gun control laws and other public safety issues."
"According to a Hollywood stylist, these pins have been sent to the Wall Street Group and other important Hollywood institutions for distribution in front of the red carpet."
"These pins are likely to show the slogan of the movement," neveragain said
"The city wide gun safety agency has yet to respond to thr's request for confirmation."
"The time badge, which was first worn at the Golden Globe in January, is also expected to be worn on the red carpet to support the Legal Defense Fund for those who fight sexual harassment."
"Earlier this week, gucci announced that it would spend $500000 with Oprah Winfrey, George and Amar Clooney, Jeffrey and Marilyn Katzenberg, Steven Spielberg and Kate kapshaw to support the March 24" March 24 March March March 24 March March March March 24 March March March March 24 March March March March 24 March 24 March March March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24 March 24
"While it's not uncommon for stars to wear pins from support groups like ACLU's planned parenthood or GLAAD, especially after the 2016 election and the subsequent immigration ban imposed by President Donald Trump, rumors about gun violence and sexual harassment, as well as equal pay for equal work and other gender issues are..."



Number  414
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...false...”
“It also looks like the two had a daddy-daughter dance party to MJ that same morning, and #FOMO alert.”
“Nah, but his next photo shows that North loves playing with it, which is cute and strange and wonderful in so many ways we didn’t even know existed.”
“On April 24th, Kanye tweeted a photo of a Michael Jackson doll alongside a doll that looks surprisingly like him (at least in terms of wardrobe) and captioned it “me and Mike.” falseShould it shock any of us that Kanye has a doll of his own likeness?”
“Let’s backtrack.”
“She plays with her cousins, sometimes has trouble sharing with her brother, and plays with dolls…dolls shaped like her dad.”
“And it looks like four-year-old daughter North is just like any other kid.”
“And while that’s all fantastic, we personally love seeing Kanye in dad mode, especially when he and wife Kim Kardashian share photos of their three beautiful babies.”
“It certainly seems like Kanye has been hard at work on new music, as many of his tweets discuss his creative process and give insight into his innermost thoughts.”
“So when Kanye returned to Twitter on April 13th, fans were intrigued…especially because he also announced he’s releasing not one, but two new albums in June.”


“… Error... "
"It looks like they had a father daughter dance for MJ on the same morning, and" fomo alert. "
"No, but his next photo shows that North likes to play with it, which is lovely, strange and wonderful in many ways, and we don't even know it exists."
On April 24, Kanye tweeted a picture of a Michael Jackson doll and a doll that looks strangely like him (at least in the closet), with the title "Mike and I". Kanye has a doll that looks like him. Is that going to shock any of us? "
"Let's go back."
"She plays with her cousins, sometimes shares difficulties with her brother, and plays with dolls It's shaped like her father's doll. "
"It looks like a four-year-old daughter, north, is like the rest of the kids."
"Although it's all great, we personally like to see Kanye as a father, especially when he and his wife Kim Kardashian share photos of their three beautiful babies."
"It seems that kenye really works hard in new music, because many of his microblogs are discussing his creative process, giving him insight into his inner thoughts."
"So when Kanye returned to twitter on April 13, fans were interested Especially because he also announced that he would release two new albums in June instead of one



**Something goes wrong**
“That's my go-to.”
“I apply it to my face.”
“Believe in finding the One...workout"I love doing intervals, like running and sprinting, and I see great results with that versus the 30 or 45 minutes of steady cardio I used to do on the treadmill.”
“Listen in as Eva expands on the life philosophies that keep her healthy and radiantly happy.”
“"I'll never stop devouring them."”
“"My mom makes the best black beans in the world," she says.”
“And then there's her mother's delicious Cuban cooking.”
“"The mini ones and the big ones with the filling," she says.”
“One of Eva's top treats: Cadbury eggs.”
“She tries to eat "as clean as possible" but also digs into her favorite indulgences with gusto.”


"That's my goal."
"I put it on my face."
"Believe in finding one I like to do interval exercises, such as running and sprinting, which I think is better than the 30 or 45 minute aerobic exercise I used to do on the treadmill
"Listen to Eva's life philosophy to keep her healthy and happy."
"I'll never stop eating them."
"My mother made the best black beans in the world," she said
"And her mother's delicious Cuban food."
"The small and the big have fillings," she said
"One of EVA's top delicacies: Cadbury eggs."
She tried to eat "as clean as she could," but also relished her favorite indulgence



Number  416
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Teen Mom OG Tyler Baltierra Flaunts 40 Pound Weight Loss Reality star is looking fighting fit after getting in shape.”
“Teen Mom OG Tyler Baltierra is in great shape.”
“The latest evidence came after he posted an image of his 40 pounds weight lossBaltierra, 26, told his fans: Hard work is paying off!”
“It’s been 6 months since completely changing my eating habits, I dropped 40lbs & now it’s time to cut it all up with these workouts, BOOM!”
“??????”
“Baltierra, who is married to Catelynn Baltierra, has been shedding weight in 2018 and the results are for all to see.”
“And he has been posting images via social media to update his fans on his amazing progress.”
““26lbs DOWN!!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Teenage mom og Tyler baltierra shows off her 40 pound weight-loss reality show star looks healthy after being shaped."
"My teenage mom, Ogg Tyler baltira, is in great shape."
The latest evidence comes after he released a 40 pound photo. Baltiella, 26, told his fans: "hard work pays off!"
"It's been six months since I completely changed my eating habits, and I've lost 40 pounds & now it's time to lose weight with these exercises, bang!"
“??????”
"Bartila, who married Caitlin bartila, has been losing weight in 2018, and the results are obvious to all."
"He's been posting pictures on social media to tell fans about his amazing progress."
"Down 26 pounds!"



Number  417
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The latter will see the former Fly Girl, along with Derek Hough and Ne-Yo, search for the world’s next top dance act.”
“Jennifer and Marc have maintained a close friendship since their split in 2011, and it looks like Alex has no problem watching the duo work together in such close quarters.”
“The mother of two was spotted heating up the dance floor with her boyfriend Alex Rodriguez while on vacation in the Dominican Republic on Sunday (Apr.”
“16).”
“...afterparty jlo arod altosdechavon casadecampos dominicanrepublic onesir nicksilva the_concept A post shared by Miami Luxury Realtor susydunand on Apr 16 2017 at 4 47pm PDT The former Yankees star s sister Suzy posted a video on Instagram of the couple having the time of their lives as they smiled and...”
“...laughed together while swaying to the music with fellow partygoers...”
“The Shades of Blue star was in the Caribbean to perform a sold-out show with her ex-husband Marc Anthony at the Los Altos de Chavon theatre in La Romana on Saturday (Apr.”
“15).”
“The all-star athlete was spotted supporting the “Dance Again” singer while she performed on stage with Marc during the dress rehearsal and final show.”
“It appears the 47-year-old is determined to spend any free time she has with Alex, in between working on her hit series Shades of Blue and preparing for the debut of her new dance competition series World of Dance.”


"The latter will see the former flyer, along with Derek Hoff and Neo, looking for the next top dance show in the world."
"Jennifer and mark have maintained a close friendship since their breakup in 2011. It seems that Alex can see the two working so closely together."
"The mother of two was found warming up on the dance floor with her boyfriend Alex Rodriguez while on holiday in the Dominican Republic on Sunday (April 1),"
“16).”
“… After the meeting, JLO arod Altos decavon casadecampos Dominican Republic onesir nickselva the U concept, Miami luxury real estate agent susydunand shared a post at 4:47 p.m. on April 16, 2017. Suzy, a former Yankees star, posted a video on instagram describing the couple's life with a smile... "
“… Laugh with the music with other people at the party... "
"The shadow of the blue star" and ex husband Mark Antony performed in the Caribbean At Los Altos de Chavon theatre in La Romana on Saturday (April 1), and the performance has sold out
“15).”
The all star athlete was found supporting the "dance again" singer while performing with mark in rehearsals and finals
"It seems that the 47 year old is determined to spend all her free time with Alex, during which she will work for her popular series blue shadow and prepare for the premiere of her new dance competition series dance world."



Number  418
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Generally we get those kids medication now.””
““I think she was like, ‘They sound like they’re OK.’“The host quipped, “Torturing animals is one of the signs of a sociopath.”
“...mum had four kids...”
“Read Baaghi 2 movie review Goa bears Tiger Shroff s wrath and so do we She however admitted It was awful Colbert then asked Were there adults watching you do this at the time To which the actor replied My...”
“The roof is falling in!’ I’d dive and I’d rescue Tigger - and Tigger would just be, like... (in a daze),” Blunt said.”
“And I’d be like, ‘Get Tigger!”
“We would sort of hide Tigger under a sofa cushion, and then I’d sort of pretend the roof was coming in.”
“...have died because of what I put him through...”
“My friends were like That sounds lame but I ll go along with it because I m at your house and I kinda have to do it I had this lovely hamster called Tigger who probably died before he should...”
““I quite enjoyed rather dramatic role-play game.”


"Generally speaking, we're giving those children medicine now."
"I think she said, 'they sound good.'" The host joked, "animal abuse is one of the signs of antisocial people."
“… Mother has four children... "
"We were the same after watching the film review of Baji 2, the roar of the GOA bear. She admitted that it was terrible, and then asked Colbert if an adult was watching you do this at that time. The actor answered me..."
"The roof has collapsed! "I can dive, I can save Tigger - Tigger club, like... (in a daze) "said Bronte."
"I'll say, 'catch the Tigger
"We'll hide the Tigger under the cushions, and then I'll pretend the roof's coming in."
“… Because of what I let him go through... "
"My friends think it sounds lame, but I'll agree, because I'm in your house and I have to do it a little bit. I have a lovely hamster named Tigger, who probably died before he died..."
"I love this rather dramatic role-playing game."



Number  419
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We are real people,” he told Jones.”
““We were never a celebrity couple – we were a couple that happened to be celebrities.”
“The key to working through marital difficulties, regardless of one’s fame, is having “the tools to move forward,” Jay-Z emphasized.”
“To break that cycle for black men and women,” he added.”
“To give our kids a different outcome.”
“For our family.”
““For us, we chose to fight for our love.”
“ET on CNN.”
“...the show which airs Saturday at 7 p m...”
“Asked by Jones during the premiere of The Van Jones Show why he chose to fight for his marriage Jay Z replied that his wife was simply my soul mate the person I love Couples experiencing problems can either address it or pretend until it blows up he said on...”


"We are real people," he told Jones
"We've never been a celebrity couple - we're a couple who happen to be celebrities."
Jay-Z stressed: "no matter how well-known a person is, the key to overcoming marriage difficulties is to have" tools to move forward. "
"To break this cycle of black men and women," he added
"Give our children a different result."
"For our family."
"For us, we chose to fight for love."
"CNN"
“… On Saturday at 7pm... "
"At the premiere of the Van Jones Show, when Jones asked him why he chose to fight for his marriage, jay z replied that his wife is just my soul mate - the one I love - couples who encounter problems can solve problems, or pretend until problems erupt - he said in the program..."



Number  420
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lauren Conrad, Lo Bosworth, and Kristin Cavallari have opted not to participate in the returning reality series.”
“Whitney added: 'I'm really trying to not plan right now and just enjoy the moment and not put the pressure on myself to make the decision.'”
“The 33-year-old reality star, who appeared makeup free, donned grey sweatpants and a muted pink bomber jacket on the outing.”
“This sighting comes just days after Port told E!”
“News that fashion went out the window once she became a mom.”
“Quality time: Whitney Port was spotted out and about with husband Tim Rosenman and their one-year-old son Sonny on Sunday in Los Angeles'I usually look like a slob, honestly.”
“I just care less now,' she told Carissa Culiner.”
“'When I'm with Sonny, I just want to be comfortable.'”
“The Hills star also addressed the hot topic of baby number two.”
“'I do get easily overwhelmed by things,' she admitted.”


Lauren Conrad, Ron Bosworth and Christine cavalari chose not to take part in the back to reality series
Whitney added: "I really don't want to make plans now. I just want to enjoy the moment instead of putting pressure on myself to make decisions."
The 33 year old reality TV star went out without make-up, wearing grey sweatpants and a pink baseball uniform
"This witness happened when Porter told e!"
"When she became a mother, fashion disappeared."
Good time: Whitney Potter, her husband Tim Rosenman and their one year old son Sonny were found out walking in Los Angeles last Sunday. To be honest, I usually look like a slob
"I don't care now," she said to calissa Kulina
"When I'm with Sonny, I just want to be comfortable."
"Hill star also talked about the hot topic of baby two."
"I'm really overwhelmed by things," she admits



Number  421
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I honestly felt that if I didn’t stand firm I would have regretted it my entire life and I would have thought my entire life ‘I should have sued!’””
““I did the right thing by filing a lawsuit.”
“The former Teen Mom OG star shared photos of her vacation in Dubai alongside her 9-year-old daughter, including one photo of Sophia enjoying a gold-flaked apple juice that was posted to the girl’s Instagram account.”
“The bottle of juice is reportedly worth $150 a bottle, according to Lovin Dubai.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““@burjalarab this should never end ,” the caption read.”
“The mother-daughter duo got to sip on the specialty drink at the top of the Burj Al Arab, one of the most luxurious hotels in the world, at the Skyview Bar just one day before Abraham’s 28th birthday.”
“In a second post, a video shared to Sophia’s Instagram account, Abraham is heard saying, “Some sparkling apple in a gold bottle for Miss.”
“Sophia.”
“They have some great sparkling juices here with real gold in it.”


"I really think that if I don't take a firm stand, I will regret it all my life, and I will think that I should be prosecuted all my life."
"I was right to sue."
"The former teenage mom, an og star, shared with her 9-year-old daughter photos of her holiday in Dubai. One of the photos was of Sofia enjoying gold leaf apple juice, which was posted on the girl's instagram account."
"It's reported that this bottle of juice is worth $150 a bottle, according to Rowan Dubai."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"@ burjalarab, this will never end," the headline reads
"Just before Abraham's 28th birthday, the mother and daughter had a special drink at the sky view bar on top of the Arabian tower, one of the most luxurious hotels in the world."
In the second post, a video shared with Sophia's instagram account, Abraham said, "there is a shining apple in the golden bottle for the lady."
"Sophia."
"They have some great sparkling juice with real gold in it."



Number  422
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(This article has not been edited by DNA's editorial team and is auto-generated from an agency feed.)”
“They were smiling and having a good time," a source said.”
“It was just a normal, happy day.”
“"They seemed very normal.”
“Randall also complimented his lady love in grey shirt layered with a green jacket and a pair of ripped jeans.”
“Bullock, 52, looked casual in a plaid jacket and a pair of ripped jeans.”
“Online.”
“The pair seemed to be in love with each other as they were spotted shopping at Whole Foods, reported E!”
“Sandra Bullock and Bryan Randall enjoyed grocery shopping arm-in-arm during their private family vacation in Wyoming.”


"(this article was not edited by the DNA editing team, but was automatically generated from an organization's feed.)
"They smile and have a good time," one source said
"It was just a normal, happy day."
"They look normal."
"Randall also praised his daughter for wearing a grey shirt, a layered green jacket and a pair of worn jeans."
Brock, 52, looks casual in a plaid jacket and ripped jeans
"Online."
"When they were found shopping in whole foods, they seemed to fall in love," e said
"Sandra Bullock and Brian Randall went hand in hand to the grocery store during their private family vacation in Wyoming."



**Something goes wrong**
““Sometimes the bees get stung by the birds because they want to eat all their food.”“I thought the birds and the bees were about sex,” said Honey Boo Boo.”
“I’m white.”
“I m white Honey Boo Boo said in a video posted to Instagram Alana Honey Boo Boo Thompson has responded after she was accused of acting black The 12 year old daughter of June Mama June Shannon took to her Instagram Story to issue a response captured by Viral Box...”
“...to her followers about the accusations that were made about her on social media...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Let me just tell y’all.”
“Someone just told me to stop acting black in my comments,” Honey Boo Boo began.”
““Honey, the last thing I am is black honey.”
“Look at my face hun.”


"Sometimes bees get stung by birds because they want to eat all the food." "I thought birds and bees were about sex," midudu said
"I'm white."
"I'm white honey boob. In a video posted on instagram, I said that Alana honey boob Thompson had responded after being accused of playing a black man. June Mama's 12-year-old daughter, June Shannon, released the response captured by VirtualBox through her instagram story..."
“… To her followers about the charges against her on social media... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Let me tell you."
"Someone just told me not to be black in my comments," Dear boo began
"Honey, I'm black honey."
"Look at my face, huh."



Number  424
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“‘It's something we wanted to keep personal to us, but you will see bits and pieces of that experience.’”
“The singer made a funny face as she stooped down, facing the blonde.”
“Country singer Jessie James shows off her trim post-baby body at CMT Awards... just three months after giving birthJessie James didn't waste any time getting back into a LBD.”
“On Wednesday at the Country Music Television Awards in Nashville, the 26-year-old singer stunned in a very form-fitting dress just three months after giving birth to her daughter Vivianne.”
“But her mind didn't seem to be on her waistline at the star-studded event - rather, she seemed more interested in her 27-year-old football player husband Eric Decker who she snuggled up to on the carpet.”
“The beauty captioned a cute shot with her spouse that she posted to Instagram, 'With my love.'”
“Scroll down for videoBouncing back!”
“Jessie James displayed her streamline figure in a slinky black dress while attending the CMT Music Awards in Nashville Tennessee on Wednesday less than three months after giving birth The long sleeved dress featured a plunging neckline and a knee length skirt which the Blue Jeans singer dressed up with...”
“...towering nude platform pumps...”
“She glammed up the look with sparkling bangle bracelets and a silver pendant necklace .”


"It's something we want to keep secret from ourselves, but you'll see every bit of it."
The singer made a funny look as she bent over to face the blonde
Country singer Jesse James showed off her slim baby figure at the CMT awards ceremony... Just three months after giving birth, Jesse James didn't waste any time to get LBD again. "
"At the country music television awards in Nashville on Wednesday, the 26 year old singer was stunned three months after giving birth to her daughter Vivian, wearing a dress that fits perfectly."
"But in this star studded event, her mind doesn't seem to be on her waistline - on the contrary, she seems to be more interested in 27 year old footballer husband Eric Decker, who nestles on the carpet."
"The beauty posted a lovely picture of her spouse on instagram with the title of 'love with me.'"
"Scroll down video bounce!"
"Jessie James showed off her streamlined figure in a tight black dress at the CMT Music Awards in Nashville Tennessee on Wednesday. This long sleeve dress features a drooping neckline and a knee length skirt. The blue jeans singer wears this skirt... "
“… High naked platform pump... "
"She decorated the look with a sparkling bracelet and a silver pendant necklace."



Number  425
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Life is really good.””
“I’m very happy.”
“He’s so cute!”
“Ellen DeGeneres Show telling the host Isn t he cute...”
“Vasconcelos most recently shared a photo of them on April 17 captioning the snap I miss you soo much In April Lovato who s also busy gearing up for the release of her YouTube documentary I Am Demi Lovato later this year gushed about Vasconcelos during her appearance on The...”
“...their Instagram accounts...”
“Bomba is a good guy but the relationship just ran its course Image zoom Credit Guilherme Vasconcelos Instagram Over the last few months the No Promises singer and the fighter who rang in the New Year together made their relationship social media official posting cute photos of each other on...”
““It wasn’t a dramatic split,” says the source.”
“...they split...”
“Lovato who was named one of Time s 100 Most Influential People of 2017 and announced Monday morning she s teaming up with Fabletics to create a capsule collection that reinforces female empowerment and body positivity briefly dated UFC fighter Luke Rockhold afterwards but rekindled her romance with Vasconcelos after...”


"Life is really wonderful."
"I'm very happy."
"How lovely he is!"
"Alan DeGeneres told the host he was cute..."
"Vasconcelos recently shared a photo of them on April 17, titled Lovato, a snapshot of" I miss you so much in April ". She is also busy preparing to release her YouTube documentary" I'm Demi Lovato ". When she appeared on YouTube later this year, she talked a lot about Vasconcelos..."
“… Their instagram account... "
"Bomba is a good person, but their relationship is just on the right track. In the past few months, Guilherme Vasconcelos instagram has released a picture of the singer who has no commitment and a fighter who is on the phone to celebrate the Chinese new year, so that their relationship officially publishes a lovely picture of each other on social media.... "
"It's not a dramatic split," the source said
“… They're separated... "
"Lovato was named one of the 100 most influential people in 2017 by time magazine. On Monday morning, she announced that she would work with fabletics to create a series of capsules to strengthen women's empowerment and physical initiative. After that, she dated UFC boxer Luke rockholder briefly, but then rekindled her relationship with vas consellos..."



Number  426
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo credit: Getty / Jeff Kravitz...”
“"Incredibly proud of my wife...when she thought she had no choices left, she reached out & decided to LIVE today!"”
“"My god!”
“My wife looks absolutely beautiful in this [Happy Thanksgiving] [Teen Mom] clip," Baltierra tweeted on Thursday.”
“"It’s going to be a rough holiday without being able to kiss her & tell her how thankful I am for her, but we have a strong resilience crafted by our past, we got this!"”
“My god!”
“My wife looks absolutely beautiful in this #HappyThanksgiving @TeenMom clip!”
“It’s going to be a rough holiday without being able to kiss her & tell her how thankful I am for her, but we have a strong resilience crafted by our past, we got this!”
“ https://t.co/OEOrnywp4J — Tyler Baltierra (@TylerBaltierra) November 23, 2017Last week, Lowell told fans on Twitter that she is seeking professional help after experiencing suicidal thoughts.”
““Well today I thought of every way to kill myself… so I’m going to treatment,” Lowell wrote.”


"Image source: Getty / Jeff Kravitz..."
"I'm very proud of my wife When she thought she had no choice, she reached out and decided to live today! "
"My God
"My wife looks absolutely beautiful in this [happy Thanksgiving] [teenage mom] clip," she tweeted on Thursday
"If we can't kiss her, it's going to be a tough vacation. Tell her how grateful I am to her, but we have a strong resilience created by the past, and we get this!"
"My God
"My wife is here# HappyThanksgiving@TeenMom It looks very beautiful in the clip
"If we can't kiss her, it's going to be a tough holiday, tell her how much I appreciate her, but we have a strong resilience from our past and we got this!"
“  https://t.co/OEOrnywp4J- Taylor baltierra (@ Tyler baltierra) on November 23, 2017, Lowell told fans on twitter last week that she was seeking professional help after experiencing suicidal thoughts
"Today I think of all kinds of ways to commit suicide So I'm going to treat it, "Lowell wrote



Number  427
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Dialectical Behavior Therapy was first developed by psychologist Marsha M. Lineham in the 1980s and has proven to be effective for many patients over the years.”
“And we’ve just met through our manager.”
“According to Hollywood Life, Jen’s heart ‘hurts’ after seeing the young actress and singer in despair and has gone to great lengths to help.”
“‘Selena has received an avalanche of support, as she is very well loved in Hollywood,’ a source close to Jen said.”
“Both actresses, seen here at a 2015 Golden Globe Awards party, have been friends for yearsThe insider also said: ‘She is very protective of Selena and has close ties to her because they share a manager.”
“‘Jennifer is an extremely caring person.”
“It hurts her heart to know that Selena is struggling like this and she is absolutely there to offer advice and support.”
“She sees Selena like a little sister and is doing all she can to help her.’Jennifer and Selena have reportedly been friends for close to a decade.”
“They met at the Women in Film 2009 Crystal and Lucy Awards and later helped to narrate the 2015 documentary Unity.”
“In a December 2014 Instagram post Selena spoke highly of the Friends actress and their friendship writing I have not only been following her career as a fan since I was eight and now get to watch her completely transform in her new movie Cake I have gotten to have...”


"Dialectical behavior therapy was first developed by psychologist Marsha M. lineham in the 1980s, and has been proved to be effective for many patients for many years."
"We met through the manager."
"According to Hollywood life, when she saw the young actress and singer in despair, her heart broke and she tried her best to help her," she said
"Serena has a lot of support because she's very popular in Hollywood," said a source close to Jennifer
"The two actresses were friends for many years at the 2015 Golden Globe Awards. "She is very protective and close to Serena because they share the same manager," the person said
"Jennifer is a very loving person."
"It's sad to know that Selena is struggling like this. She will definitely provide advice and support there."
"She sees Serena as a little sister and does everything she can to help her." It is reported that Jennifer and Selena have been friends for nearly ten years
"They met at the 2009 women's crystal awards and the Lucy Awards, and later helped narrate the 2015 documentary unity
"In December 2014, in a post on instagram, Selena spoke highly of the" friends "actress and their friendly writing. I not only began to pay attention to her fan career since I was 8 years old, but now I have seen her completely change in the new film cake. I have got..."



Number  428
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I thought it was all about me, and when I realized literally hundreds of thousands of people, men and women, talking about being a part of this unfortunate club.”
“On the show, she described the powerful post-traumatic stress she experienced upon seeing the hashtag trending:I saw #MeToo and my arm went numb.”
“She went on to reveal that she had been assaulted by a director when she was 16 years old talking about the anger that I felt at the agents and the producers who made me feel that silence was a condition of my employment She added I ve had multiple...”
““I have my own experiences that have come back to me very vividly, and I have found it hard to sleep, hard to think, hard to communicate,” she said.”
“She was there to introduce her Big Little Lies co-star Laura Dern, but, like many women who have been reliving every horrible thing that ever happened to them over the past couple of weeks, Witherspoon was having trouble thinking about anything besides the Harvey Weinstein allegations.”
“Reese WitherspoonLast night, Reese Witherspoon spoke at the Elle Women In Hollywood Awards.”
“The real numbers are actually much higher.”
“If it all seems overwhelming, remember: This is only a small fraction.”
“AdvertisementWe’re also sure this list will have to be updated as more of these stories come out.”
“...that you yes you know...”


"I thought it was all about me when I realized that thousands of people, men and women, were talking about being part of this unfortunate club."
In the show, she described the huge post-traumatic stress trend she experienced after seeing the label: I saw my arm numb. "
"She went on to reveal that she was beaten by a director when she was 16 years old. She talked about my anger at the agents and producers, who made me feel that silence was a condition of my employment. She added that I had many..."
"I have my own experiences, which are vividly reflected in my mind, and I find it difficult to fall asleep, to think, to communicate," she said
"She's here to introduce her little lie partner, Laura Dean, but, like many women who revisit every terrible thing that has happened to them in the past few weeks, Witherspoon has trouble thinking about everything except Harvey Weinstein's accusations."
"Reese Witherspoon last night, Reese Witherspoon spoke at the Al women's awards ceremony in Hollywood."
"The actual number is much higher."
"If it all seems overwhelming, remember: it's just a small part."
"We are also convinced that with the increase of these reports, this list will have to be updated."
“… You know... "



Number  429
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click here to subscribe to the People Food newsletter.”
“Want the ultimate dish on the latest celebrity food news, plus exclusive recipes, videos and more?”
“From PEN: Try Our Amazing Never Watered Down Bloody MaryRousey announced her engagement to the UFC fighter in April after two years of dating with a photoshopped imaged of her in a black suit carrying Browne in a white wedding gown.”
“The couple kiss before the athlete welcomes a few more helpers in the kitchen: her two dogs Mochi and Ani.”
“She is all business until the middle of her cooking session when she gets an adorable surprise from Browne as he hugs her from behind and Rousey’s face clearly lights up.”
“The 30-second video shows Rousey looking casual in leggings and a t-shirt as she cooks eggs and bacon behind the stove in her home kitchen.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Cooking breakfast for my #MCM @travisbrownemma ❤️,” she captioned the clip on Instagram.”
“The mixed martial artist recorded a time-lapse video of herself whipping up a meal for her fiancé, Travis Browne, on Monday.”
“Rousey announced her engagement to the UFC fighter in April after two years of datingRonda Rousey is quick on her feet—not only in the ring, but also in the kitchen.”


"Click here to subscribe to people's food news."
"Want the ultimate dish on the latest celebrity food news, with exclusive recipes, videos, etc
"From pen: try our amazing never fade bloody Marius announced that she was engaged with UFC fighter in April after a two-year date, and her photo shows her in a black suit and brown in a white wedding dress."
"Before the athlete welcomed several helpers in the kitchen, the couple gave a kiss: her two dogs, Mocky and Arnie."
"She was busy until she was cooking. When brown hugged her from behind, she got a lovely surprise. Lucy's face lit up obviously."
"This 30 second video shows Lucy in tight pants and T-shirt, cooking eggs and bacon behind the stove in her kitchen, looking very casual."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"For my sake# MCM@travisbrownema Make breakfast ❤️ "She subtitled the video on instagram."
"The half breed martial artist recorded a delayed video of her preparing a meal for her fiance Travis Browne on Monday."
"Rossi announced his engagement to the UFC in April this year after two years of contact with the aircraft. Rosie is quick not only in the ring, but also in the kitchen



Number  430
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Proud Danielle is the proud mother to daughters Christine and Jillian Happening She began I mean with any engagement there s planning of weddings nuptials and ceremonies and collisions of families and personalities so all that wonderful stuff is really happening Continuing Me personally I m very lucky because who...”
“We're very lucky to have found that with one another at this stage of our lives.”
“'When people speak about people the way she spoke about me I just fold my arms and sit back and say that says more about you then it does me,' she shared.”
“The raven-haired beauty added that Dolores' accusations say more about her then they do about Danielle.”
“...year old was jealous of her...”
“Hitting back Speaking exclusively to MailOnline the reality star initially hit back at her fellow Real Housewives of New Jersey co star admitting that her meddling only brought her and former foe Teresa Giudice closer together Reflecting on Dolores furious claims and comments the glamorous star insisted that the 47”
“They're going to rebel and spent a lot more time with that person.'”
“What are they going to do?”
“'It's like when you tell your children, "You can't see that boy, I don't like that boy, I don't like this and I don't like that".”
“It was probably what pushed us even closer.'”


"Proud Danielle is the proud mother of her daughter Christina and Gillian. She's engaged. I mean, planned weddings, weddings, rituals, family and character collisions, so all these wonderful things continue to happen. Personally, I'm very lucky, because who..."
"We are very lucky to find that at this stage of our lives, we are all like each other."
"When people talk about people the way she talks about me, I just pull my arms up and sit down and say, it means you're more important than me," she said
"The raven haired beauty added that Dolores' accusation speaks more about her than their accusation against Danielle."
“… One year old is jealous of her... "
"Fight back" in an exclusive interview with the daily mail, the reality TV star initially hit back at her co Star Real housewife in New Jersey, admitting that her interference will only bring her closer to her former rival, Theresa Judith, reflecting Dolores' angry remarks and comments. The glamorous star insists that
"They will resist and spend more time with that person."
"What are they going to do?"
As you tell your child, "you can't see that boy, I don't like that boy, I don't like this and I don't like that."
"It may be the reason why we are getting closer."



Number  431
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Exclusive)EXCLUSIVE: 'Shahs of Sunset' Star Mercedes 'MJ' Javid Teases 'Hot Mess' New Season and Upcoming WeddingRelated Gallery...”
“ET caught up with Javid last year at the Associates for Breast and Prostate Cancer Studies' annual Mother's Day luncheon, where she opened up about what she wanted on her big day.”
“The Shahs of Sunset star and her fiancé, Tommy Feight, tied the knot at the Jeremy hotel in West Hollywood, California, on Saturday, ET has learned.”
“The couple was surrounded by their closest friends and family, including Javid's Bravo co-stars.”
“The 45-year-old reality star got engaged to the marketing professional in 2015 after over a year of dating.”
“Shortly after the news became public, Javid showed off her massive sparkler on her Instagram account.”
“"Long a$$ day ?”
“...of fun with wit my bae," she wrote alongside a selfie and her boyfriend.”
“The couple had been planning their perfect wedding for quite some time now.”
““We know so far it’ll be 200 guests, hopefully less,” Javid spilled at the time.”


(exclusive) exclusive: 'King of Sunset' star Mercedes' Mead Johnson 'Javed teases' hot chaos' new season and upcoming wedding related gallery... "
"Et caught up with Javed at the annual mother's Day Luncheon of the Association for breast and prostate cancer studies last year. At that luncheon, Javed opened up and talked about what she wanted on her big day."
The king of sunset star and her fiance, Tommy Fett, married on Saturday at the Jeremy hotel in West Hollywood, California
"The couple are surrounded by their closest friends and family, including Javed's co star."
"The 45 year old reality star was engaged to a marketing professional in 2015 after more than a year of dating."
"Shortly after the announcement, Javed showed off her big flash on her instagram account."
"Long days?"
"My Bae is very interesting," she wrote with a self portrait and her boyfriend
"The couple have been planning their perfect wedding for a long time."
"So far, we know there will be 200 guests, hopefully less," Javed said at the time



Number  432
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Leslie Jones Reveals the Celebrities She Wants to Kiss MostAs Jones busts a move the profanity-laces track, her friend — who opted to wear clothes and not a robe — gives her dance skills a run for their money.”
“WARNING VIDEO BELOW CONTAINS EXPLICIT LANGUAGEIn the video, the star dances around in her bathrobe while holding what looks like a cake.”
“!” the Saturday Night Live star tweeted.”
““IM 50 BITCHES!!”
“Wearing a white robe and carrying what appeared to be a slice of cake, Jones danced to Trap Beckham’s “Birthday Bitch.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Leslie Jones rang in her 50th birthday Wednesday with a dance-off with a friend.”
“Fifty looks pretty good.”


"Related video: Leslie Jones revealed that the celebrity she wanted to kiss, mostas Jones, broke the track of blasphemous lace movement, and her friends - she chose to wear clothes instead of robes - let her dance skills run for their money."
"The warning video below contains clear language. In the video, the star is wearing a bathrobe and dancing with something that looks like a cake."
"!" the live star said on Weibo on Saturday night. "
"I'm 50 bitches!"
Jones, wearing a white robe and holding a cake in his hand, danced to catch David's "birthday bitch". Get news, feature, etc
"Leslie Jones called on her 50th birthday on Wednesday and had a dance with a friend."
"Fifty looks good."



Number  433
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think the world could do with a few more women at the center of it.””
“Six decades on, the presenter has ‘evolved’ somewhat, as has the technology she described.” Don’t let the third person fool you, the Queen is talking of herself here, and of a moment Foy embodied beautifully for Netflix.”
“According to those reports, in fact, the Queen enjoyed the series though clucked her tongue, predictably at some of the “heavily dramatized” historical liberties.”
“The Crown star Claire Foy didn t trust the rumors telling Vanity Fair I will believe it when I see it is all I ll say Well perhaps after this year s Christmas speech in which the Queen appears to...”
“...have included a cute little nod to Season 2 Foy will believe she has a royal fan...”
“In the fifth episode of the most recent season of The Crown, Foy’s version of The Queen gives a disastrous and stiff speech to workers at a car factory.”
“At the time and as depicted in the episode, royal critic Lord Altrincham suggested one solution to the Queen’s communication difficulties was to televise her annual Christmas message—which she has done ever since.”
“In this year’s speech, many suspect, the Queen paid direct homage to that Season 2 plot.”
“The Queen opened by saying: “Sixty years ago today, a young woman spoke about the speed of technological change as she presented the first television broadcast of its kind.”
“She described the moment as a landmark.”


"I think there should be more women in the world as the center."
"60 years later, the host has" evolved "to some extent, and so has the technology she describes. "Don't let a third party fool you. The queen is here to talk about herself. For a moment, foy is perfect for Netflix."
"According to these reports, in fact, the queen loves the series and, despite her cackle, is predictably happy with some" highly dramatic "historical freedom."
"Crown movie star Claire foy doesn't believe the rumor about vanity fair. When I see all this, I will believe it. Maybe after this year's Christmas speech, the queen seems to..."
“… Including a cute little nod, season 2 foy will believe she has a real fan... "
"In the fifth episode of the most recent season of crown, foy's version of the queen delivered a disastrous, blunt speech to a car factory worker."
"At that time, as described in this episode, the Royal critic Lord Altrincham suggested that one way to solve the Queen's communication difficulties was to broadcast the Queen's annual Christmas address on television, which she has been doing since then."
"In this year's speech, a lot of people suspected that the queen paid a direct tribute to the plot of the second season."
"60 years ago today, a young woman talked about the speed of technological change when she introduced the first such TV show," the queen said in her opening remarks
"She described the moment as a milestone."



Number  434
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He is a director at Gladstone 64, the Gladstone Gallery’s Upper East Side location in the famed Edward Durell Stone House.”
“Maroney works in the New York art scene and reps clients such as Lena Dunham’s father, Carroll.”
“EventA source told PEOPLE at the time the two “looked very comfortable.”“She is smiling like I have never seen her do with any of her previous boyfriends,” the source said, adding the two have “great chemistry” and were “holding hands and laughing” while spending time together.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Jennifer Lawrence Supports Ex and ‘Very Good Friend’ Darren Aronofsky at N.Y.C.”
“And while visiting Paris and Rome earlier this month, the lovebirds were seen holding hands.”
“Last Thursday, the actress was photographed kissing Maroney outside of John F. Kennedy International Airport.”
“The couple have been showing a lot of PDA in recent weeks.”
“Maroney did the same, sporting a white Pretty Woman-themed sweatshirt and khaki pants.”
“The Red Sparrow actress went casual for the outing, covering her hair with a newsboy cap and wearing a black jacket over a white t-shirt.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"He's the director of Gladstone 64, the Gladstone gallery on the upper east side of the famous Edward Durrell stone residence."
"Maroni works in the art world in New York, representing clients like Lina Dunham's father Carol."
"Eventa sources told people at the time that the two" looked comfortable. " "She smiles like I've never seen her and her ex boyfriend before," the source said, adding that the two were "very chemical" and "hand in hand, laughing" when they were together
"Related video: Jennifer Lawrence supports her ex girlfriend and 'very good friend' Darren Aronofsky in New York."
Earlier this month, during a visit to Paris and Rome, the couple were seen holding hands
On Thursday, the actress was photographed kissing Maroni outside Kennedy International Airport
"The couple have been showing off a lot of handheld computers in recent weeks."
"Maroni did the same thing, wearing a white beauty themed sweatshirt and khaki pants."
The red sparrow actress was very casual when traveling, wearing a newspaper cap, a white T-shirt and a black jacket
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  435
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, a followup three years later, mostly set in Abu Dhabi, had an uneven reception.”
“I just hate the cornball shit and I thought it was just really sentimental and overly romantic without any feet in realism.”The first Sex and the City film enjoyed enormous commercial success and relatively friendly reviews.”
“James Miller’s three-part special about the series on his Origins podcast uncovered that one of Cattrall’s reported sticking points was that the script for the third film gave her character, Samantha, little to do.”
“The film was largely concerned with grief rather than female friendship or shoes.”
““People close to Kim believe the script didn’t have a lot to offer Samantha,” said Miller.”
“They point to the fact that it calls for Mr Big to die of a heart attack in the shower relatively early on making the remainder of the movie more about how Carrie recovers from Big s death than about...”
“...the relationships between the four women I hope when you read this script you ll see the beauty the joy the heartbreak in it Sarah Jessica Parker Cattrall s turning down the third film and its subsequent stalling led to...”
“...a disagreement on social media between her and Sarah Jessica Parker...”
“Parker recently denied any rift, saying the breakdown of pre-production was simply a business matter.”
““We negotiated in good faith,” she said.”


"However, a follow-up three years later, mainly with Abu Dhabi as the background, has different repercussions."
"I just hate conball's shit, I think it's really sentimental and overly romantic without any feet in realism." The first time and city films enjoyed huge commercial success and relatively friendly reviews
"James Miller's three episode feature on the series in his origin podcast reveals that one of the cruxes of katlar's story is that the script for the third film leaves her character Samantha with little to do."
"The main focus of the film is sadness, not women's friendship or shoes."
"People close to Kim don't think the script does much good to Samantha," Miller said
"They point to the fact that the big shot died of a heart attack relatively early in the shower, which makes the rest of the film more about how Carrie recovered from the big shot's death than about..."
“… The relationship between four women, I hope that when you read this play, you will see the beauty, joy and heartbreak in it. Sarah Jessica Parker Carter rejected the third film, and the subsequent delay led to... "
“… Her disagreement with Sarah Jessica Parker on social media... "
"Parker recently denied any cracks, saying the collapse of pre production was just a business problem."
"We negotiated in good faith," she said



Number  436
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kate’s jeans are not yet IDed.”
“The frock is also offered at Debenhams, where it is £71, roughly $100.”
“Kate receives a posy from a little girl on the couple’s next stop of the day at a community center in Clerkenwell, London pic.twitter.com/p5cwoEAB5N — Simon Perry (@SPerryPeoplemag) March 22, 2018Kate and William spent time with those who use the center.”
“Simon Perry of People posted this video of the couple arriving and being given a posy by 4-year-old Rhea Richards.”
“#GC2018 pic.twitter.com/CXhY5Ln0jZ — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) March 22, 2018The second stop was at St. Luke’s Trust, a community center located in Clerkenwell, London.”
“Today’s visit comes less than a month before the 2018 Commonwealth Games get underway on the Gold Coast of Australia.”
“The Duke and Duchess get involved in a Commonwealth Quiz!”
“There was a quiz this morning testing everyone’s knowledge of the Commonwealth.”
“The charity also helps develop other vital skills for professional athletes by providing media training, nutritional advice and performance lifestyle guidance.”
“Back to the Recorder story:Annually, SportsAid supports more than 1,000 athletes, mainly teenagers, with money towards training and competing costs.”


"Kate's jeans haven't been confirmed yet."
"The dress is also available at the Debenham hotel for 71 pounds, or about $100."
Kate accepted a proposal from a little girl at a community center in klekenville, London pic.twitter.com/p5cwoEAB5N -Simon Perry (@ sprrypeoplemag) on March 22, 2018, Kate and William spend time with the people who use the center
Simon Perry of People magazine released the video about Rhea Richards, 4, giving them a beautiful gift when the couple arrived
"In 2018 pic.twitter.com/CXhY5Ln0jZ -The second stop of Kensington Royal on March 22, 2018 is St. Luke trust, the community center in klekenville, London
"Today's visit is less than a month before the 2018 Commonwealth Games are held on the gold coast of Australia."
"The Duke and Duchess took a federal test!"
"There's a test this morning to test everyone's understanding of the Commonwealth."
"The charity also helps professional athletes develop other important skills by providing media training, nutritional advice and performing lifestyle guidance."
"Back to the recorder story: every year, sports aid funds more than 1000 athletes, mainly teenagers, for training and competition



Number  437
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It primes, sets, and refreshes makeup for a natural, healthy-looking glow in just one spritz.”
“This facial spray checks more boxes than one.”
“As we said, face mists are generally designed to help provide skin with a little boost of hydration, giving you an instantly refreshed feeling.”
“Wondering what exactly the difference is between all the types of face mists or sprays and setting sprays?”
“WHAT IS THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN SETTING SPRAYS AND FACE MISTS?”
“Really, the options out there are always expanding!”
“There are face mist sprays with shimmer to give your skin a glow boost, and self-tanning waters that can be spritzed onto your face for bronzed skin.”
“There are sunscreen sprays for your face that apply just like a regular face mist, but also offer sun protection.”
“There are also face mists that do more than help hydrate.”
“These hydrating face mists may be formulated with nourishing ingredients like coconut water, rose water, or aloe.”


"It can make up look natural, healthy and radiant in one eruption."
"There are more than one box of facial spray."
"As we said, facial mist is generally to help the skin replenish moisture, so that you instantly look new."
"What is the difference between all types of facial spray or spray and stereotyping spray?"
"What's the difference between setting up a sprayer and facial mist?"
"Really, the choice is always expanding now!"
"With a low gloss face spray, your skin will shine, and you can also spray yourself on your face to make your skin look bronzed."
"You have sunscreen on your face, just like ordinary cream, but it also acts as a sunscreen."
"The mist on your face doesn't just help replenish the water."
These moisturizing cream can be made from coconut water, rose water or aloe vera.



Number  438
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I kicked myself over and over again about that.””
““[I] just adapted, which was just the dumbest [thing to do].”
““I fainted one time in the gym, I started having these dizzy spells and I just kind of overlooked them,” he recalled to Cohen.”
““There was a piece of paper from the doctor that said, ‘Cause of death: cardiac arrest.’ That’s a wake up call!”Earlier this month, Harper said on the Today show that he had a “6 percent survival rate” and that he didn’t take prior warning signs seriously enough.”
““I technically died,” Harper replied.”
““When I heard that you had cardiac arrest I didn’t know that meant that you technically died,” Cohen said on Tuesday night.”
“He was given CPR and was rushed to a nearby hospital.”
“...gym on February 12”
“Beth was like You re gonna give him another heart attack I love him When asked if he received well wishes from any Biggest Loser stars he added I heard from almost everyone As previously reported the personal trainer stopped breathing after he finished a workout with friends at the...”
““Then Howard sent me a video of naked men doing yoga.”


"I blame myself again and again."
"(I) just got used to it. It's the stupidest thing."
"Once I fainted in the gym, and I started to have these vertigo symptoms, and I just kind of ignored them," he recalled to Cohen
"The doctor wrote on a piece of paper," cause of death: cardiac arrest. "It's a wake-up call!"! Earlier this month, Harper said on the today show that he had a "6% survival rate" and that he didn't take warning signals seriously
"Strictly speaking, I'm dead," Harper replied
"When I heard about your cardiac arrest, I didn't know it meant you were technically dead," Cohen said on Tuesday night
"He received cardiopulmonary resuscitation and was rushed to a nearby hospital."
“… February 12 "Gym"
"When asked if he received any blessings from a big loser star, Beth was like you were going to give him another heart attack. I love him. He added: 'I've heard from almost everyone that, as previously reported, the personal trainer stopped breathing after finishing training with his friends... "
"Then Howard sent me a video of naked men doing yoga."



Number  439
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom...”
“If this bird is the newest permanent member of Jenner’s pet gang — which includes Italian greyhounds Norman and Bambi and their puppies — she joins a select, growing club of celebrity chicken moms.”
“Image zoomAnother Snap shows Jenner carrying the pet like a prized clutch before planting a sweet kiss on the chicken’s head.”
““I love you Eddie,” you can hear Jenner coo off-camera in one of the clips, which features the bird pecking food out of a set of manicured hands.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“It appears a chicken named Eddie is the makeup guru’s newest fluffy friend, given that late Sunday, Jenner posted several Snapchat videos of a puffy, white chicken known as a Silkie Bantam, a popular breed in poultry shows.”
“Kylie Jenner shared several videos of a fluffy chicken known as a Silkie on her SnapchatKylie Jenner Appears to Be the Proud New Mom of a Ridiculously Fluffy ChickenPet parent Kylie Jenner may have just added another to her brood.”


Image zoom
"If this bird is the latest permanent member of Jenner's pet gang - including Norman and Bambi, the Italian Greyhound, and their puppies - she will join a select and growing Club of celebrity chicken mothers."
"Zoomanother's photo shows Jenna holding the pet like a precious clutch and then putting a sweet kiss on the chicken's head."
"I love you, Eddie," you can hear Jenna cooing out of the camera in one of the clips, one of which features a bird pecking from a trimmed hand
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It seems that a chicken named Eddie is the latest fluffy friend of the make-up artist, given that later on Sunday Jenner released several snapchat videos about a white chicken called Silkie Bantam, which was very popular at the poultry show."
"Kelly Jenner shared a few videos of a fluffy chicken called silky chicken on her snapshot. Kelly Jenner seems to be a proud new mom. She's a funny furry chicken pet parent. Kelly Jenner may have just added another one to her cub



Number  440
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He was limited in practice on Thursday after missing Wednesday’s session with an Achilles injury, but is expected to suit up for Sunday’s tilt against the Miami Dolphins at Gillette Stadium.”
“Brady shouldn’t have a hard time burning off all of that deliciousness when the Patriots hit the practice field early Friday morning.”
““Smothered in butter and syrup” certainly doesn’t sound like something you’d find in The TB12 Method, but no one will criticize Brady from veering away from his diet on Thanksgiving Day.”
““My biscuits don’t taste nearly as good as hers but after being smothered in butter and syrup, it’s tougher to know the difference,” Brady wrote.”
“It’s a tradition he’s continued with his own kids, as he and his wife Gisele Bundchen showed off Brady’s baking abilities on Instagram and Facebook.”
“Brady shared a personal story about his favorite part of Thanksgiving as a boy: Heading to grandma’s house for some delicious biscuits.”
“Known for his strict diet just as much as his clutch performance in big games, Brady took to social media on Thursday to share some thanks with his followers.”
“BOSTON (CBS) — Even Patriots quarterback Tom Brady can enjoy a cheat day on Thanksgiving.”


"He missed Wednesday's training with an Achilles tendon injury and was restricted on Thursday, but is expected to play against the Miami Dolphins at Gillette Stadium on Sunday."
"When the Patriots arrive at the training ground on Friday morning, Brady shouldn't have a hard time burning all the delicacies."
"Choking in butter and syrup" certainly doesn't sound like the TB12 method, but no one will criticize Brady for changing his eating habits at Thanksgiving
"My biscuits don't taste as good as hers, but it's hard to tell the difference between butter and syrup," Brady wrote
He and his wife Giselle bonchen showed Brady's baking skills on instagram and Facebook, a tradition he and his children share
"Brady shared a personal story about his favorite part of Thanksgiving as a child: eating delicious biscuits at Grandma's house."
"Brady, known for his strict eating habits and his grip in big games, shared some thanks with his followers on social media on Thursday."
"Boston (CBS) - even Patriots quarterback Tom Brady can enjoy cheating on Thanksgiving Day."



Number  441
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can read more about Luke Wilson's heroic deeds over at People Magazine.”
“From what it sounds like, everybody involved is lucky that there was only one fatality at the scene.”
“Haas was the passenger in a Ferrari that reportedly clipped a few cars, including Wilson's SUV, and then crashed into a pole at a high speed.”
“The driver of the Ferrari died at the scene and Haas suffered some pain and leg swelling and has since gone home to South Carolina to recuperate.”
“After Luke Wilson's SUV had been clipped, he and another driver got out of their vehicles to help a woman whose car had flipped after hearing her cry for help.”
“According to Sean Heirigs, Luke Wilson instantly got out of his car to rush to the assistance of the woman whose car had been flipped over from the accident.”
“Heirigs says that Wilson led the rescue, directing him on what to do after they noticed that the woman's leg was pinned underneath her steering wheel.”
“Wilson was reportedly scared that the Ferrari was going to catch on fire and possibly explode.”
“Sean Heirigs says that Luke Wilson came up with the plan to get the unidentified 50-year old woman out of the car.”
“Heirigs recalls that he went to the passenger side door to try and calm the woman down while Wilson figured out a way to free her from the vehicle.”


"You can read more about Luke Wilson's heroic deeds in people magazine."
"As it sounds, all the people involved are very lucky. Only one person died at the scene."
"Haas was a Ferrari passenger who was reported to have caught several cars, including Wilson's SUV, and then hit a pole at high speed."
"Ferrari's driver died on the spot, Haas developed some pain and leg swelling, and then returned to his home in South Carolina to recuperate."
"After Luke Wilson's SUV got caught, he and another driver got out of the car to help a woman whose car overturned after hearing her call for help."
"According to Sean heiliggs, Luke Wilson immediately got out of the car and asked the woman who capsized in the accident for help."
The heirs said Wilson led the rescue operation and instructed the woman after they noticed that her leg was pressed under the steering wheel
"Wilson is reported to be afraid that Ferrari will catch fire and possibly explode."
"Sean heiliggs said Luke Wilson had come up with a plan to get the unidentified 50 year old woman out of the car."
"He went to the passenger side door to try to calm the woman down, and Wilson came up with a way to get her out of the car," he recalled



Number  442
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“However, we have a feeling that the mysterious man's target is actually Titus.”
“Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt fans were already thinking that six new episodes just weren't enough before the excellent first half of season four only went and ended on a cliffhanger, leaving everyone desperate for more.”
“The final season has been split in two as a result of Tina Fey launching her Tony-nominated Mean Girls musical and we'll have to wait until January 25, 2019 for the final episodes, meaning that's eight whole months of speculating about just what "Phase Two" is.”
“To recap, episode six 'Kimmy Meets an Old Friend!'”
“...ends with Kimmy (Ellie Kemper), Titus (Tituss Burgess), Lillian (Carol Kane) and Jacqueline (Jane Krakowski) watched by a mysterious foreign man who calls someone to say: "I have eyes on the target.”
“Moving to Phase Two."”
“Netflix That mysterious man is voiced by none other than The Punisher himself Jon Bernthal so while we re not entirely ruling out a surprise Marvel crossover after all the show does exist in the same world as Orange Is the New Black it s likely that we haven t...”
“...come across this character before and the initial assumption is that the target must be Kimmy...”
“During the first half of season four, Kimmy comes across a true-crime documentary Party Monster: Scratching the Surface.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"However, we have a feeling that the target of the mysterious man is Titus."
"The unbreakable fans of Kimmy Schmidt have been thinking that six new episodes will not be enough before the end of the excellent first half of the fourth quarter, which makes everyone eager to want more."
"With Tina Fey's Tony nominated" mean girl "musical, the final season is split in two, and we won't have the final episodes until January 25, 2019, which means we've been speculating for eight months about what stage two is."
"To recap, Episode 6:" Kimmy met an old friend! "
“…… It ends with Jimmy (Ellie Kemper), Titus (Titus Burgess), Lillian (Carol Kane) and Jacqueline (Jane Krakowski) being seen by a mysterious foreign man who calls someone and says, "I see the target."
"Enter the second stage."
"The mysterious person of Netflix is voiced by the punisher Jon Bernthal himself, so although we don't completely rule out the intersection of Marvel comics, after all, this program does exist in the same world, orange is the new black, but it's very likely that we haven't yet..."
“… I have encountered this character before. The initial assumption is that the target must be Kimmy... "
"In the first half of the fourth season, Kimmy met a real crime documentary party Monster: scratch face."



Number  443
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I believe in people being able to have their own opinions, even if really different from mine.””
“...this But this is HIS opinion she continued...”
““My wife just called me and she wanted me to make this clear to everyone,” he wrote.”
“...writing my MAGA hat is signed A short while later West said that he had spoken to his wife Kim Kardashian West about his previous tweets...”
“For people in my life the idea of Trump is pretty much a 50 50 split but I don t tell a Hillary supporter not to support Hillary I love Hillary too West later tweeted a closeup photo of his MAGA hat signed by Trump with over 30 fire emojis...”
“Ye being Ye is a fight for you to be you.”
“And we have the right to independent thought.”Image zoom Kanye West steps out in a ‘Make America Great Again’ baseball cap | Credit: BAHE / BACKGRIDHe continued, “If your friend jumps off the bridge you don’t have to do the same.”
“That’s what makes us individuals.”
“I don’t agree with everything anyone does.”
“I love everyone.”


"I believe that people can have their own views, even if they are really different from me."
“… But that's his opinion, she continued
"My wife just called me and she wanted me to tell you about it," he wrote
“… Writing about my magahahat was signed shortly after West said he had talked to his wife Kim Kardashian West about his previous tweets... "
"For people in my life, Trump's idea is almost fifty-five percent, but I didn't tell Hillary's supporters not to support Hillary. I love Hillary too much. Later, West tweeted a close-up picture of Trump's signature Maga hat with more than 30 fire expressions on it..."
"You are you, you are fighting for you, you are fighting for you."
"We have the right to think independently." Image zooming Kanye West comes out wearing a baseball cap that "makes America great again." source: Bahe / backgrid he goes on, "if your friend jumps off a bridge, you don't have to do the same thing."
"That's why we are individuals."
"I don't agree with what anyone has done."
"I love everyone."



Number  444
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She is facing up to 40 years in prison.”
“﻿According to the New York Post, Mack’s Smallville co-star, Kristin Kreuk, introduced Mack to NXIVM in 2006.”
“Photo Albert L Ortega Getty Images Allison Mack first achieved fame in the early aughts when she was cast as an original character on the TV series Smallville the second time her name started popping up in the news with increasing frequency was in April 2018 when she was arrested...”
“...by the FBI for her suspected involvement in NXIVM an organization that allegedly brainwashed manipulated and blackmailed women into being sex slaves In the past year the emerging details surrounding the case many of which have involved Mack have only only grown increasingly disturbing including allegations that she recruited women...”
“...to be sex slaves in an internal secret society where she branded them with founder Keith Raniere s initials and blackmailed them...”
“Most recently, on April 8, Mack tearfully pleaded guilty to one charge of racketeering conspiracy and and charge of racketeering in Brooklyn federal court.”
“Below, here’s everything you need to know about Allison Mack’s involvement.”
“First things first: How do you say “NXIVM”?”
“It’s pronounced “Nexium.”And what exactly is it?”
“It’s an Albany-based cult with connections all over the world that reportedly masquerades as a “self-help” organization meant to empower women.”


"She faces 40 years in prison."
According to the New York Post, Mike, who co stars with Smallville, was introduced to nxivm in 2006 by Christine crook
"Photo Albert L. ortegagetty photo Alison Mack first became famous in early August when she played an original role in the TV series small town. The second time her name appeared in the news was in April 2018, when she was arrested... "
“…… The FBI has accused her of being involved in nxivm, which is suspected of brainwashing, manipulating and blackmailing women into sex slaves in the past year. The new details surrounding the case - many of which involve Michael - are just becoming more and more disturbing, including her accusation of recruiting women... "
“…… As a sex slave in an inner secret society, she branded them with the abbreviation of Founder Keith Ranier and blackmailed them... "
"Most recently, on April 8, Michael tearfully admitted a charge of extortion conspiracy and extortion in federal court in Brooklyn."
"Here's everything you need to know about Allison Mack's involvement."
First thing: how do you say "nxivm"
It's pronounced "Nexium." what is it? "
"It's an Albany based cult with connections all over the world, and it's reported to be disguised as a 'self-help' organization aimed at empowering women."



Number  445
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Did you see anything else you absolutely loved?”
“Kaia Gerber's Playful Pastel Two-Piece, Selena Gomez's Coach Ensemble & More Best Dressed Stars of the WeekWhat did you think of this week's best dressed stars?”
“She paired the designer dress with Irene Neuwirth jewelry.”
“Hayek, 51, looked radiant in a custom green lace plisse Gucci gown with pink beaded straps, featuring embellished butterfly details and a pink trompe l'œil sequin bow.”
“Salma HayekFrazer Harrison/Getty Images for Palm Springs International Film FestivalThe Beatriz at Dinner star packed a punch at the 29th Annual Palm Springs International Film Festival Awards Gala on Jan. 3 in Palm Springs, California.”
“For this two-toned combo, Gadot wore the same strappy nude heels, had her tousled hair down and finished with a red lip.”
“...she dressed to impress in a bright pink suit with a plunging red corset from Oscar de la Renta s Spring 2018 collection...”
“It s an entirely new adventure together that we couldn t be luckier to do Rich Fury Getty Images for Palm Springs International Film Festival The following day the 32 year old brunette bombshell attended Variety s Creative Impact Awards and 10 Directors to Watch Brunch in Palm Springs where...”
““We’re actually making a totally different film with a lot of the same, similar like things that we love, but it’s its own movie completely, so it’s not ‘[Wonder Woman] 2’ to us,” Jenkins told ET.”
“Embed Code Restart Gal Gadot and Patty Jenkins Tease 'Different' 'Wonder Woman 2' (Exclusive)ET caught up with Gadot, who was honored with the Rising Star Award, and director Patty Jenkins at the ceremony, where they talked about the new adventure the heroine will embark on.”


"What else do you see that you absolutely like?"
"Kaia Gerber's playful pastel two piece suit, Selena Gomez's coaching ensemble & Best Dressed star of the week what do you think is the Best Dressed star of the week?"
"She paired the designer's dress with Irene norworth's jewelry."
"Hayek, 51, looks radiant in a custom green lace plisse Gucci dress with Pink Beaded shoulder straps, butterfly details and pink troupe L'il Sequin bows."
On January 3, Salma Hayek Frazer Harrison / Getty Images presented a gift to Palm Spring International Film Festival at the 29th Palm Spring International Film Festival Awards party in Palm Spring, California
"For this combination of hues, gadote wore the same lace up nude heels, combed his shaggy hair and painted red lips."
“…… She was wearing a bright pink suit from Oscar de la Renta's spring 2018 collection, with a red corset hanging down to make a deep impression... "
"It's a brand new adventure for us to be together. Fortunately, the next day we made a lot of angry Getty films for Palm Spring International Film Festival. The 32 year old brunette attended the creative influence award of variety, and 10 directors watched brunch in Palm Spring, where..."
Jenkins told et: "in fact, we're making a completely different movie with a lot of the same and similar things that we like, but it's totally our own movie, so it's not wonder woman 2 for us."
"Gail gado and Patty Jenkins joked about" the different wonder woman 2 "(exclusive). Et caught up with the New Star Award winner gado and director Patty Jenkins at the award ceremony. They talked about the new adventure that the heroine will start."



Number  446
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I loved that Bourdain didn't do a cooking show, he did a culture show.”
“Our thoughts are with his family at this difficult time.”A number of food critics and reporters were also shocked and saddened at Bourdain's death.”
““Remember that help is only a phone call away,” he added, also including the number of a suicide hotline.”
“Restaurateur and “Hell’s Kitchen” star Gordon Ramsay stated that he was “stunned and saddened by the loss” of Bourdain.”
“Restaurateur Marcus Samuelsson, who also appeared as a coach/judge alongside Bourdain on "The Taste," added that Bourdain would be "missed terribly" and shared the telephone number of a suicide hotline, along with many other mourners.”
“Am going off twitter for a while.”"I am forever indebted to this passionate great man," wrote Lefebvre.”
““Unbearable for his family and girlfriend.”
““Heartbroken to hear about Tony Bourdain’s death,” Lawson wrote.”
“...of a spoon tattoo Bourdain and he shared...”
“You will always travel with me Nigella Lawson and Ludo Lefebvre Bourdain s co judges on ABC s The Taste both tweeted that they were heartbroken to learn of his death with Nigella saying she would be taking a break from Twitter as a result and Lefebvre sharing a photo...”


"I like that bourdon doesn't do cooking, he does culture."
"We are with his family at this difficult time." Some food critics and journalists were also shocked and saddened by bourdan's death
"Remember, it's just a phone call for help, including the number of the suicide hotline," he added
Gordon Ramsey, owner of the restaurant and star of hell kitchen, said he was shocked and saddened by the loss of buldan
Restaurant owner Marcus Samuelsson, who also coached / judged bourdan on the taste, added that bourdan would "miss it very much" and shared the number of the suicide hotline with many other mourners
"I'm going to leave twitter for a while." "I am forever grateful to this great man of passion," wrote Lefebvre
"His family and girlfriend can't stand it."
Lawson wrote: "I'm sad to hear about Tony Bowden's death."
“… A spoon tattoo, Borden shared with him... "
"You will always travel with me. Nigella Lawson and Ludo Lefebvre Bourdain, the co judge of ABC, the taste, both tweeted that they were sad to learn about his death. Nigella said that she would rest on twitter for this reason. Lefebvre shared a picture..."



Number  447
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“Getty ImagesAttending the royal baby's christening at The Chapel Royal, St James’s Palace, the mother-of-three looked stunning an over-the-knee dress with a exaggerated shoulder detailing (similar available here).”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“She teamed the look with a hat by Jane Taylor (similar here).”
“Getty ImagesAfter a brief service, Kate gave royal fans another glimpse of her stunning look.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"This content was imported from twitter."
"Getty Images, the mother of three, wore a knee length dress with exaggerated shoulder details at the Royal Chapel of St James' palace for the Royal baby's baptism
This content was imported from {embedded name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"She paired it with Jane Taylor's hat."
"After a short service, Kate let the Royal fans see her amazing appearance again."



**Something goes wrong**
“!”The pair are already parents to daughter Philomena Bijou, 3, and son Jovan Jr., 17 months.”
““Philo and JJ will be the best big siblings!”
“John and I are overjoyed to be adding to our family with a baby girl later this winter,” she wrote alongside the photo, which showcased her burgeoning belly.”
““Party of 5!!”
“Oz — a New York Times bestselling author who is the oldest child of television physician Dr. Mehmet Oz and recently became a brand ambassador for Dress Barn — confirmed on her Instagram page in June that she and her husband, John Jovanovic, would be welcoming another child this winter.”
“Though Oz, 31, is saying goodbye to her post on the ABC program, she will soon be saying hello to motherhood — for the third time!”
““Thank you for being the BEST audience, and for spending your lunch time with me ,” she concluded.”
““It has been an incredible 6 seasons with the @abcthechew crew, and I am honored to always be a part of this wild family of 5!” she captioned a smiling photo of herself cutting a cake on The Chew stage alongside her co-hosts.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The TV host took to Instagram on Friday to announce that she would be leaving the weekday cooking talk show after six seasons.”


"!" they are the parents of three-year-old daughter Philomena Biru and 17-month-old son Jovan. "
"Philo and JJ will be the best brothers and sisters!"
"John and I are happy to join our family later this winter with a baby girl," she wrote next to the photo, which shows her developing abdomen
"A party for five people!"
"Oz, the New York Times best-selling author and the eldest son of TV doctor Mehmet Oz, recently became the brand ambassador of dress Barnes. She confirmed on instagram page in June that she and her husband John Jovanovic will have another child this winter."
"Although Oz, 31, is leaving her position on ABC, she will soon say hello to her mother - this is the third time!"
"Thank you for being the best audience and for having lunch with me," she concluded
"I've spent six incredible seasons with @ abcthechew, and I'm honored to be a member of this family of five! "She wrote in a smiling photo that she and her partner were cutting cakes on the chewing table."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The TV host announced on instagram last Friday that she would leave her usual cooking talk show after six seasons."



Number  449
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe I am too traditional, but men feel important when you ask for their help, instead of thinking you can do it all on your own.””
“You need to take a risk.”
“PORTER Every major model is currently in N Y C”
“...to hit the runway at New York Fashion Week, but one very notable catwalk star is missing — Miranda Kerr.”
“The 34 year old opened up about her decision to take a step back from modeling in her cover interview for Net a Porter s digital magazine The Edit saying she s focusing now on her organic skincare line Kora Organics thanks to a push from her new hubby Snapchat...”
“CEO Evan Spiegel...”
“So how is she adjusting to life away from the cameras and inside the Kora offices?”
“Kerr talks all about her newlywed life and the more feminine and masculine roles she and Spiegel (respectively) take on at home.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Photographed by Raf Stahelin, courtesy of The EDIT, NET-A-PORTER“Evan inspired me,” Kerr old the magazine of her decision to take a break from modeling.”


"Maybe I'm too traditional, but when you ask for their help, men will feel that they are important, not that you can do it all by yourself."
"You need to take risks."
"Every major vehicle is currently in New York"
“…… On the runway at New York Fashion Week, but a very famous runway star is missing - Miranda Cole. "
"In an interview with the cover of net a porter digital magazine, the 34 year old said publicly that thanks to her new husband snapchat, she is now focusing on her organic skin care series KORA organics..."
"CEO Evan Spiegel..."
"So how did she get used to living away from the camera and in the Koran office?"
"Kerr talked about her newlywed life and the more feminine and masculine roles she and Mingjing (respectively) play at home."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Image zooming credit: shot by Raf stahlyn, provided by the editor, net-a-porter" Evan inspired me, "Kerr decided to take a break from the models."



Number  450
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nothing mattered.””
““I wake up everyday now so grateful to see Bobby getting stronger.”
“Bobby, who is battling cancer, and his reality TV star wife dined at Tony Di Napoli with Real Housewives of New Jersey alums Kathy and Richie Wakile.”
““Thank you @kathywakile and Richie for taking us out last night for Bobby’s first real meal in 5 weeks.”
“His recovery is nothing short of miraculous,” the Real Housewives of New York City star captioned a photo with her husband on Instagram on Sunday, August 6.”
““Bobby’s will to live and love, incredible Doctors, @melissamcmedium , YOUR PRAYERS around the World!”
“!and @novartis #novartis Chemo pills I don’t think Bobby would have ever left the hospital,” she continued.”
““Thank you to our family and friends who have shown up everyday to help, give a kiss, bring food or send pajamas.”
“My heart is filled with such emotion everyday it’s hard to express.”“From the initial shock to the new ‘normal’ it’s been the most emotional time in our lives and couldn’t have gotten to where we are without help from many,” she concluded.”
“I’ll give another update soon but wanted to share that it is never too late and you have to Live to Live!”


"Nothing matters."
"Every day I wake up now, I'm happy to see that Bob is getting stronger and stronger."
Bobbie, who is fighting cancer, and his reality TV star wife have dinner with New Jersey housewives Kathy and Ritchie Wakil in Tony dinapolis
"Thank you @ kathywakile and Richie for taking us out last night for Bob's first dinner in five weeks."
"His recovery is a miracle," the real housewife of New York City Star posed with her husband on instagram on Sunday, August 6
"Bobbie's life and will to love, incredible doctor, @ melissamcmedium, your prayers all over the world!"
"!" and Novartis, Novartis chemotherapy drugs, I don't think Bob will ever leave the hospital, "she continued
"Thanks to our family and friends who come every day to help, kiss, bring food or deliver pajamas."
"My heart is filled with such emotions every day. It's hard to express them." "From the initial shock to the new 'normal', this is the most emotional moment in our lives. Without the help of a lot of people, we could not have reached the present state," she concluded
"I'll give you another update soon, but I want to share it with you. It's never too late. You have to live to live!"



Number  451
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She told another fan that her biggest craving during her pregnancy were Eggo waffles.”
“In fact, she revealed that the toughest part was not being able to eat sushi.”
“"But in general, health providers advise weight gain based on the patient's body weight at the start of pregnancy."”
“"The question of weight gain in pregnancy is often a point of controversy," Gaither told INSIDER.”
“The average amount of weight a woman should gain during pregnancy ranges from 25 to 40 pounds, according to gynecologist Dr. Kecia Gaither.”
“Kylie Jenner/YouTubeRecommended weight gain for pregnant women is based on each person's body and individual needs.”
“Jenner's doctor also advised her to engage in more cardio.”
“"Yeah, so, eight more pounds," the reality star replies.”
“@kyliejenner/TwitterJenner was previously seen discussing her weight in her viral pregnancy announcement video, in which her doctor seemed to advise 28-35 pounds as an average total weight gain, noting that Jenner had gained 20 pounds at that time.”
“The face-palm emoji was a nice touch.”


"She told another fan that her biggest desire during pregnancy was waffles."
"In fact, she revealed that the hardest part is not to eat sushi."
"But in general, health workers recommend weight gain based on the patient's weight at the beginning of pregnancy."
"Weight gain during pregnancy is often a controversial issue," Geiser told inside magazine
Gynecologist Dr. Kathia Geiser said women should gain an average of 25 to 40 pounds during pregnancy
"The weight gain recommended by Kylie Jenner / YouTube pregnant women is based on everyone's physical and personal needs."
"Jenna's doctor also advised her to do more aerobic exercise."
"Yeah, well, eight pounds more," the reality star replied
"@ kyliejenner / twitterjenner was previously seen discussing her weight in a viral pregnancy announcement video, in which her doctor seemed to recommend an average total weight gain of 28-35 pounds and pointed out that Jenner had gained 20 pounds at that time."
"The palm of my face is very good."



Number  452
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So he was like, ‘Hey, you wanna go together?’ And I was like ‘Yeah, okay, let’s go together.’ It ended up working out.”Photo Credit: Getty / Jackson Lee...”
“They re flirtatious and have been hanging out and text all the time the source said adding that the pair s relationship is still very casual Chopra also sparked rumors after she commented on one of Jonas Instagram posts last week responding to the 25 year old s snap of...”
“On Saturday, Chopra used the platform to share a photo of herself enjoying a burger with friends, smiling over a plate of In-N-Out.”
“"Burgers and Chanel...my favourite combo with my fav girls," she wrote.”
“(Photo: Instagram / @priyankachopra)Fans quickly zeroed in on one comment left under the Quantico star's beaming snap, with Jonas having used his own account to write "That smile," along with a heart emoji.”
“(Photo: Instagram / @priyankachopra)The flirty comment comes after Chopra and Jonas were reported to have enjoyed dinner together at Toca Madera in West Hollywood, California, on Thursday.”
““They were very affectionate with each other and seemed to not care who saw,” a source told People.”
““Priyanka ran her hands through his hair at one point and they were laughing and even dancing to the music.”The duo reportedly dined on guacamole, ceviche and tacos and “seemed really into each other,” according to the source.”
““They were very cute.”Last week, Chopra and Jonas attended Beauty and the Beast Live in Concert at the Hollywood Bowl before reportedly spending the rest of the Memorial Day weekend together.”
“An insider said that the two had stayed in touch after meeting last year, but have recently been "heating up."”


"So he said," Hey, do you want to come? "I thought, 'OK, let's go together.' It turned out that everything went well. " Photo source: Getty / Jackson Lee
"They're flirting and texting all the time." The source said that Chopra's comments in response to a post from 25-year-old Jonas instagram last week that the relationship between the two is still very casual also triggered rumors
On Saturday, Chopra shared a picture with her friends on the platform, in which she was eating hamburgers with them, smiling and eating a plate of food in and out
"Hamburgers and Chanel My favorite combination with my favorite girls, "she wrote
(photo: instagram / @ priyankachopra) fans quickly focused on a comment left under the jubilant snapshot of the Quantico star. Jonas wrote "that smile" and a heart chart on his account
(photo: instagram / @ priyankachopra) it was reported that Chopra and Jonas had dinner together in Toca Madera, West Hollywood, California, on Thursday, before Chopra made the flirtatious comment
"They are very close to each other and don't seem to care who sees them," a source told people
"Priyanka once stroked his hair with his hands, they laughed and even danced to the music." According to reports, the two ate avocado, Chewie and tortillas and "seem to really like each other," the source said
"They're very cute." Last week, Chopra and Jonas attended the live beauty and the beast concert at the Hollywood Bowl. It is reported that Chopra and Jonas spent the rest of Memorial Day weekend together
"The two have been in touch since they met last year, but have been" warming up "recently," a person familiar with the matter said



Number  453
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Click through to shop them all.”
“And because most of her looks sell out as soon as she wears them, we also rounded up some alternative options that are sure to get the Meghan stamp of approval.”
“In the spirit of channeling her style, we're rounding up all of Meghan's signature pieces and where to shop them.”
“Whether she's wearing a little black dress or a plush wrap coat, the royal brings a bit of understated elegance to all of her looks.”
“From her first public outing with Prince Harry, the Duchess of Sussex has crafted a minimal, chic, and ultra-modern royal wardrobe.”
“At this point, it's no secret that we're royally obsessed with Meghan Markle's style.”


"Click all."
"And because most of her clothes will be sold out when she puts them on, we've also collected some other choices that will definitely be recognized by Megan."
"In the spirit of grooming her style, we are collecting all of Megan's signature items and where to buy them."
"Whether she is wearing a small black dress or a plush coat, the royal family has brought a hint of low-key elegance to all her looks."
The Duchess of Sussex and Prince Harry went out for the first time in public. She meticulously created a simple, chic and ultra modern Royal costume
"At this point, it's no secret that we're fascinated by Megan markel's style."



Number  454
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“We must never forget the burden they bore, for the country they made.”
“Trudeau, the royal brothers and their father Prince Charles gathered at Vimy Memorial Park in northern France on Sunday for a ceremony marking the 100th anniversary of the World War I battle.”
“France's president François Hollande led the ritual, which included speeches from Trudeau and Prince Charles.”
“An estimated 20,000 Canadians were in attendance.”
“Getty ImagesBoth Prince William and Prince Harry laid down a pair of boots to commemorate those who fought in battle.”
“Getty Images"Canada was born here," Trudeau said in his remarks.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Full remarks from #Vimy100: pic.twitter.com/URXTTJBOQF — Justin Trudeau (@JustinTrudeau) April 9, 2017The Battle of Vimy marks a significant turning point in Canadian history.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"We must not forget the burden they have borne for our country."
Trudeau, his royal brothers and their father, Prince Charles, gathered at the Vimy Memorial Park in northern France on Sunday to mark the 100th anniversary of World War I
French President Francois Hollande presided over the ceremony, including speeches by Trudeau and Prince Charles
"An estimated 20000 Canadians are present."
"Getty pictures Prince William and Prince Harry put down a pair of boots in memory of those who fought on the battlefield."
"Canada was born here," Trudeau of Getty pictures said in his speech
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Complete notes for vimy100: pic.twitter.com/URXTTJBOQF -Justin Trudeau (@ Justin Trudeau) the battle of Vimy on April 9, 2017 marks an important turning point in Canadian history. "



Number  455
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She later posted an Instagram of her and McClard embracing in their wedding attire with the simple caption “NY” and two engagement rings.”
“I got married today.”ny A post shared by Emily Ratajkowski (@emrata) on Feb 23, 2018 at 1:32pm PSTSocial media star Josh “The Fat Jew” Ostrovsky was among the small group of friends who joined the happy couple at city hall for the ceremony.”
“As Us reported, she announced the nuptials on her Instagram Story with a trio of photos from the intimate ceremony, writing, “Soooo I have a surprise.”
“Ratajkowski has always kept us guessing with her super sexy style, so we love that she chose to mix things up with a fun menswear-inspired look for the big day.”
“The groom, meanwhile, looked hip in a light blue suit jacket, black shirt and scruffy beard.”
“But our favorite part of the look was undoubtedly the super chic wide-brimmed black hat with netting that served as a modern take on a veil.”
“She paired the top with matching flared trousers that sell for $69 and cute black strappy sandals.”
“We have a feeling the cute two-piece ensemble won’t be around for long, but Ratajkowski looked fab in the mustard yellow double-breasted jacket, which retails for $129, that she cinched at the waist with a coordinating belt.”
“The 26-year-old model and her producer beau tied the knot at a courthouse in New York City, where she forewent a traditional wedding dress in favor of a cute ‘70s-inspired pantsuit from Zara that rings in at just $200.”
“Emily Ratajkowski surprised us on Friday, February 23, when she shared on social media that she had just married her new boyfriend, Sebastian Bear-McClard.”


She later posted on instagram a picture of her and mclard embracing in a wedding dress that simply said "NY" and two engagement rings
"I'm married today." On February 23, 2018, at 1:32 p.m. New York time, social media star Josh "the fat Jew" Ostrovsky shared a post with a small group of friends who attended the wedding with the happy couple at the city hall
According to US media reports, she posted the wedding news on instagram and attached three intimate wedding photos, which read: "soooo, I have a surprise."
"Ratajkowski's super sexy style is always hard for us to guess, so we like her choice of fun men's inspired style to mix and match in big day."
At the same time, the bridegroom was dressed in a light blue suit coat, a black shirt and a shaggy beard, which made him look very fashionable
"But our favorite look is undoubtedly the super chic wide brimmed black net hat, which serves as a modern look for the veil."
"She paired the top with flared pants for $69 and lovely black lace up sandals."
"We have a feeling that the cute two-piece set won't be around for a long time, but ratakikovsky is wearing a mustard yellow double breasted jacket, retailing for $129, and she looks beautiful with a coordinated belt around her waist."
The 26 year old model married her producer Bo in a New York City courthouse, where she introduced a traditional wedding dress and replaced it with a cute 1970s style pair of trousers from Zara for just $200
On Friday, February 23, Emily ratajkovsky surprised us by saying on social media that she had just married her new boyfriend Sebastian bell mcclard



Number  456
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Things didn't go as planned, but life keeps going on.'”
“Believing I was heading that way, I got ahead of myself.”
“She later posted a photo of herself posed with her sisters Willow, 23, and Piper, 16, and her female cousins, calling them 'some of my favs.'”
“'HAPPY BIRTHDAY TO MY MOMMA thank you for being my voice of reason, my strongest supporter, and my greatest friend [cheers emoji] to 54 #54how #bionic,' she captioned the image, which also shows Tripp eating a piece of cake.”
“Just two days before, Bristol posted a snapshot of her mother, Sarah Palin, holding up a cake in honor of her 54th birthday.”
“Bristol was in Alaska with all three of her children when the news broke on February 13.”
“...this photo of her mother celebrating her 54th birthday with her son Tripp The news was first reported by TMZ which later stated that Dakota filed for divorced from Bristol on January 29 in Texas using only their initials...”
“Support system Bristol shared a photo of herself posed with her mother sisters and cousins less than a week after it was reported her husband Dakota Meyer had filed for divorce Grandma s big day Two days after it was revealed that Dakota 29 had filed for divorce Bristol posted...”
“Bristol also has a nine-year-old son, Tripp, from her relationship with her former fiancé Levi Johnston.”
“They have two daughters together, Sailor and their nine-month-old Atlee Bay, who was born in May.”


"Things didn't go as planned, but life went on."
"I believe I'm going in that direction, so I'm ahead."
"Later, she posted a picture of herself with her 23-year-old sister willow, 16-year-old piper and her cousins, calling them 'some of my favorites.'"
"Happy Birthday to my mom, thank you for being the voice of my reason, my strongest supporter, and my greatest friend (cheers, emoticons)," she wrote under the title of the picture, which also showed Tripp eating a piece of cake
Just two days ago, Bristol posted a snapshot of her mother, Sarah Palin, holding a cake to celebrate her 54th birthday
"When the news came out on February 13, Bristol and her three children were in Alaska."
“…… This photo of her mother and her son Tripp celebrating their 54th birthday was first reported by TMZ. Later, TMZ reported that Dakota filed for divorce from Bristol in Texas on January 29, using only their abbreviations.... "
"Support system Bristol shared a photo of herself with her mother, sisters and cousins. Less than a week ago, it was reported that her husband Dakota Meyer filed for divorce with her grandmother on her happy day two days after it was revealed that Dakota had filed for divorce with Bristol on the 29th..."
Bristol also has a nine year old son, Tripp, who is in love with her former fiance, levy Johnston
"They have two daughters together. One is a sailor and the other is nine month old Attlee Bay, who was born in May."



Number  457
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He has used his entire career to humanize all age groups, races, genders and religious groups and he’ll continue to do that as he moves on with his life.”Additional reporting by Jason NewmanWatch everything we know about the Bill Cosby sexual assault trial.”
““We just ask that our supporters be respectful and not engage or incite anything … He has been consistent that people respect each other.”
“...a judge declared Bill Cosby s sexual assault case a mistrial the embattled actor comedian is gearing up to get back to work On Thursday Cosby s rep Andrew Wyatt told Good Day Alabama host Janice Rogers that the actor is planning to hold a series of town hall meetings...”
“...starting sometime in July to help educate young men and women about sexual violence specifically the threat of being accused of inappropriate behavior...”
““This is bigger than Bill Cosby,” Wyatt said on the show.”
““This issue can affect any young person, especially young athletes, of today, and they need to know what they’re facing when they’re hanging out and partying, when they’re doing certain things they shouldn’t be doing.”
“And it also affects married men Wyatt s reference to married men is a nod to the primary argument made by Cosby s defense attorney Brian McMonagle that Cosby was a man who had been unfaithful to his wife but not a perpetrator of sexual assault as accuser Andrea Constand...”
“...had testified...”
“Added Ebonee Benson, a spokeswoman for Camille Cosby, “Laws are changing, the statute of limitations for victims of sexual assault are being extended, so this is why people need to be educated on … a brush against the shoulder.”
“Anything at this point can be considered sexual assault.”


"He has humanized all age groups, races, genders and religious groups throughout his career, and he will continue to do so because he continues to live his life." Jason Newman's observations add everything we know about Bill Cosby's sexual assault trial
"We just ask our supporters to respect others and not to participate in or incite anything He has always insisted that people respect each other. "
“…… A judge ruled out Bill Cosby's sexual assault case. The embattled comedian is preparing to return to work on Thursday. Representative Andrew Wyatt of Cosby told Alabama host Janice Rogers that the actor is planning a series of town hall meetings... "
“… Starting in July, help educate young men and women about sexual violence, especially the threat of alleged misconduct... "
"It's bigger than Bill Cosby," Wyatt said on the show
"This problem will affect any young people today, especially young athletes, who need to know what they are facing when they hang out and party, when they do something they shouldn't do."
"This also affects the married man Wyatt's reference to the married man's agreement with the main argument put forward by Brian mcmonagall, Cosby's defense lawyer. He thinks that Cosby is a man who is unfaithful to his wife, but not the perpetrator of sexual assault, because the plaintiff, Andrea konstand..."
“… I've testified... "
Camille Cosby's spokeswoman, ebony Benson, added: "the law is changing and the statute of limitations for victims of sexual assault is being extended, so that's why people need to be educated, to learn Put a brush on your shoulder. "
"At this point, anything can be considered a sexual assault."



**Something goes wrong**
“VIDEO Dwayne The Rock Johnson s Daughter Simone honored as first Golden Globe Ambassador It Makes Me So Happy...”
“Going into it our focus is far more on the worlds that make these films and less on anything that s happening in Washington Image zoom Dwayne The Rock Johnson and Simone Alexandra Johnson at the 2016 Golden Globes Credit Alberto Rodriguez NBC NBCU Photo Bank via Getty Images RELATED”
“...of sexual misconduct...”
“With the monologue as far as talking about anything in the news right now it seems like this year more than ever Hollywood has its own internal politics that obviously deserve to be talked about he said referencing the headlines made by Harvey Weinstein and other major entertainment figures accused...”
“Be sure to check out PEOPLE’s full Golden Globes coverage to get the latest news on Hollywood’s big night.”
“The 44-year-old host of Late Night with Seth Meyers recently told PEOPLE how he planned to handle the hosting gig in the wake of the sexual harassment scandals that have rocked Hollywood in recent months.”
“Seth Meyers will take the stage as host of the 2018 Golden Globe Awards.”
“ET — the Globes, awarded by the Hollywood Foreign Press Association, will honor nominees in film and TV.”
“ET while NBC’s begins at 7 p.m.”
“Red Carpet starts 6 p.m.”


"Simone, daughter of rock star Dwayne, was awarded the first Golden Globe Award ambassador, which made me very happy..."
"Into it, our focus is more on the world, making these movies, rather than anything that happens in Washington, D.C., at the 2016 Golden Globe credit Alberto Rodriguez NBC through Getty pictures related to NBC pictures of kudwayne's rock Johnson and Simon Alexandra Johnson."
“… Sexual misconduct... "
"As far as anything in the news is being talked about right now, Hollywood seems to have more internal politics of its own this year than ever before, which is clearly worth talking about," he said. Referring to the headlines of Harvey Weinstein and other major entertainers, he said
"Be sure to check out people's full coverage of the Golden Globes and get the latest news on Hollywood night."
"The 44 year old host of" late at night with Seth Meyers "recently told people how he plans to handle the hosting concert after the sexual harassment scandal that has rocked Hollywood in recent months."
"Seth Meyers will be the host of the 2018 Golden Globe Awards."
The global award, presented by the Hollywood Association of foreign journalists, will go to nominees in the field of film and television
"Eastern time, NBC starts at 7 pm."
"The red carpet starts at 6pm."



Number  459
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He wants Selena to be happy.””
“Selena is very close with her mom, so it’s stressful for her.”
“This needs to happen!”
“The Colombian star was recently asked if there was anything brewing between them and is definitely excited to make it happen.”
““Selena, please, what’s the status!”
“?” he asked, laughing in an interview with ET.”
““We were in touch!”
“I told her that I wanted to work with her and I don’t know why the things [froze].”
“She was working on her album I don t know but it would be a pleasure to have the opportunity to work with her If a collab doesn t happen with Gomez Maluma has other dream artists he would like to work with including Justin Timberlake Bruno Mars Ariana Grande...”
“...and Justin Bieber...”


"He wants Serena to be happy."
"Serena is very close to her mother, so it's very stressful for her."
"It's necessary!"
"The Colombian star has recently been asked if there is anything in the pipeline between them and he must be very excited to achieve that," he said
"Selena, what's the situation?"
"
"We're in touch!"
"I told her I wanted to work with her and I didn't know why things were (frozen)."
"She's making her album, I don't know, but if she doesn't work with Gomez maruma, it will be a pleasure to have the opportunity to work with her. He also wants to work with other dream artists, including Justin Timberlake Bruno Mars Arianna grand..."
“… And Justin Bieber... "



Number  460
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Louis Vuitton and Repossi jewelry Photo Getty Images Wiz Khalifa in Thom Browne Photo Getty Images Stacy Martin in Miu Miu Photo Getty Images...”
“Keri Russell in Rag Bone and David Webb jewelry and Matthew Rhys Photo Getty Images Yolanda Hadid and Anwar Hadid Photo Shutterstock Future in custom H M Photo Getty Images Thandie Newton in Monse Photo Getty Images Olivia Cooke and Lucas Hedges in Burberry Photo Getty Images Rila Fukushima in...”
“Lyons with Buccellati jewelry and Paul Feig Photo Shutterstock Aziz Ansari in Ermenegildo Zegna Couture Photo Shutterstock Natasha Poly in Michael Kors Collection Photo Getty Images Kate Bosworth in Tory Burch Photo Getty Images Frank Ocean in Balmain Photo BFA Shutterstock Alexander Skarsgård in Ermenegildo Zegna Couture Photo Getty Images...”
“Ysaunny Brito and Olivier Rousteing in Balmain Photo Getty Images A AP Rocky and Ashton Sanders in Calvin Klein by Appointment Photo BFA Shutterstock Celine Dion in Versace and Bulgari jewelry Photo Getty Images Kiko Mizuhara in Margiela Photo Getty Images Daria Strokous in Christian Dior Photo Getty Images Jenna...”


"Louis Vuitton & amp; rebosey jewelry Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set..."
"Kerry Russell in rag bone and David Webb in jewelry and Matthews in customized h m photography by Yolanda Hadid and Anwar Hadid by sandy Newton in Mons photography by Olivia cook and Lucas hedge by Burberry photography by Rila Fukushima in..."
Lyon with bucherati jewelry and Paul Figg photo shutterstock Aziz Ansari in Ermenegildo Zegna fashion photo shutterstock Natasha Pauli in Michael Coles collection photo Getty photo Kate Bosworth in toliburg photo Getty photo Frank ocean in balman photo BFA Shutterstock Alexandria scargas road in Ermenegildo Zegna fashion photography Getty "image..."
"Isani Brito and Olivier rostan in balman, Daria strokus in Christian Dior, Jenna, Daria strokus in Calvin Klein, Versace, Bulgari jewelry, margara mizuhara..."



Number  461
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...wedding...”
“An onlooker told Us at the time It was such a fun night and Joe and Sophie couldn t have looked happier Maisie Williams Turner s GoT costar and TV sister will be a bridesmaid at the couple s upcoming...”
“They celebrated the exciting news in November surrounded by family and friends, including Tom Holland, Ashley Graham and the DNCE singer’s brothers Kevin and Nick Jonas, at a star-studded party at Mamo restaurant in New York City.”
““But there’s a drive that comes with your career.”As previously reported, the happy couple, who began dating in 2016, announced their engagement in October 2017 with matching Instagram posts.”
“There’s a sense of peace that comes with finding your person,” the X-Men: Apocalypse star continued.”
“Not like I achieved anything, but I found my person, like I’d find a house that I love and want to stay in forever.”
“...s lovely to be engaged...”
“...and finding it within her work I ve always found that my career is something I work for and when I achieve something there s a sense that this is the greatest thing I ll do in my life It...”
“There s this weird misconception that being married is the greatest thing that ll ever happen to you The actress who has found worldwide fame while starring on the HBO series knows the difference between finding happiness in a relationship...”
“I’m engaged,’” the Game of Thrones star, 22, told Marie Claire for its May 2018 Fresh Faces issue.”


“… Wedding... "
"At that time, a bystander told us that it was such an interesting night that Joe and Sophie couldn't be happier. Maise Williams Turner got a partner, and TV sister would be the bridesmaid at the couple's upcoming wedding ceremony..."
Last November, they celebrated the exciting news at a star party at the Mamo restaurant in New York. Family and friends gathered around, including Tom Holland, Ashley Graham and Dnce singer's brothers Kevin and Nick Jonas
"But you also have motivation in your career." As previously reported, the happy couple started dating in 2016 and announced their engagement on instagram in October 2017
"X-Men: Apocalypse" goes on to say: "finding your people brings a sense of peace."
"It's not that I've achieved anything, but that I've found my people, just like I've found a house I love, and I want to live in it forever."
“… It's wonderful to be engaged... "
“…… In her work, I found that my career is my goal. When I achieve success, I will feel that this is the greatest thing in my life... "
"There is a strange misunderstanding that marriage is the greatest thing that happens to you - the actress who plays the leading role in the HBO series knows the difference between finding happiness in a relationship..."
"I'm engaged," power game star Mary Claire, 22, said in the May 2018 issue of fresh face magazine



Number  462
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch below:”
“Jeremy Meeks and Chloe Green Flaunt PDA on Beverly Hills Coffee RunSince then, Meeks and Green haven't been shy about packing on the PDA.”
“Shortly after the pictures surfaced, Meeks filed for separation from Melissa, after eight years of marriage.”
“Meeks was photographed kissing Green on a luxury yacht just off the coast of Turkey in July, though he was still married to his wife, Melissa, at the time.”
“Meeks, who became a model after his attractive mugshot went viral in 2014, has made headlines this summer due to his relationship with Topshop heiress Chloe Green.”
“Snapchat'Hot Mugshot Guy' Jeremy Meeks' Wife Says 'The Marriage is Over' After Chloe Green AffairIn earlier Snapchat posts, Chyna appears to be at a photo shoot, leading some to speculate the two are possibly starring in a campaign together.”
“Chyna donned a skintight lace-up orange dress, while Meeks kept it casual in a camouflage-print shirt and ripped jeans.”
“Chyna shared a picture of the two posing with their arms around one another on Snapchat on Wednesday night, both showing off their tattoos.”
“Looks like Blac Chyna and "hot felon" Jeremy Meeks may have something in the works together.”


Watch below:
"Jeremy Meeks and Chloe green are showing off their PDAs at Beverly Hills cafe. Since then, Meeks and green have not been shy of packing on their PDAs."
Shortly after the photo came to light, Mikes applied to live apart from Melissa and marry for eight years
In July, Mikes was photographed kissing green on a luxury yacht off the coast of Turkey, although he was still married to his wife Melissa
"Mikes became a model after his glamorous photo became popular in 2014 and made headlines this summer because of his relationship with Topshop heiress Chloe green."
"In Chloe Green's earlier snapchat post, Gina seems to be taking pictures, which has led some to speculate that the two may have starred in the campaign together."
"Zina was wearing an orange dress with a tight tie, while Mikes was wearing a camouflage print shirt and ripped jeans to stay casual."
"Gina shared a picture of two people taking a group photo with their arms around each other on snapchat on Wednesday night, and both showed their tattoos."
"It seems that Blake chener and Jeremy Meeks may have done something together."



Number  463
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News discounted the rumor Martin may walk Paltrow down the aisle, calling it “definitely false” and saying “no matter how conscious their uncoupling, they’re definitely not that chummy.”Check out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“Paltrow’s current and former flames are seen hanging out together in a November 2017 snap she shared on Instagram.”
“In fact, the 45-year-old actress might even have former husband Chris Martin walk her down the aisle, reports say.”
“Page Six says Paltrow will marry Hollywood producer Brad Falchuk in her Hamptons home at the end of summer, “after Labor Day.” The wedding would happen two years after her “conscious uncoupling” with the Coldplay lead singer.”
“The two were married for 10 years.”
“The wedding roles of Martin and their kidsThe lifestyle guru is considering asking Martin and film director Steven Spielberg to escort her down the aisle, Express reported.”
“Paltrow’s father, producer and director Bruce Paltrow, died from cancer in 2002 at age 58.”
““She’s toying with the idea of having both Spielberg and her ex-husband Chris give her away,” a source told the U.K. news outlet.”
“The source said Paltrow’s and Martin’s children, Apple, 13, and Moses, 12, will be flower girl and ring bearer.”
“The Goop owner also hopes Martin will join Mick Jagger to perform at her wedding, Express reported, adding the guest lists includes Julia Roberts, Madonna, and the Obamas.”


The news discount rumor Martin may walk Paltrow down the aisle, calling it "definitely wrong" and saying, "no matter how consciously decoupled, they are definitely not so friendly." Look at the memo on Facebook
"In November 2017, Paltrow shared a photo on instagram, in which Paltrow is now with the previous flame."
"In fact, the 45 year old actress may even have her ex husband Chris Martin accompany her up the aisle," the report said
Page 6 says Paltrow will marry Hollywood producer Brad falchuk at his home in Hampton after Labor Day in late summer. The wedding will take place two years after her "conscious decoupling" from Coldplay's lead singer
"They've been married for 10 years."
"Martin and their children's wedding character lifestyle gurus are considering asking Martin and film director Steven Spielberg to accompany her down the aisle," the Express reported
Patello's father, producer and director Bruce patello, died of cancer in 2002 at the age of 58
"She's playing with Spielberg and her ex husband Chris, and they're abandoning her idea," a source told the news of England
"Paltrow and Martin's children, apple, 13, and Moses, 12, will become flower boys and ring holders," the source said
According to the express, the "idiot" boss also wants Martin to perform with Mick Jagger at her wedding, with Julia Roberts, Madonna and the Obamas on the guest list



Number  464
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just last month, she drew attention — and caused controversy — for wearing a graffiti-style jacket that seemed to send a message as she set out to visit migrant children detained in Texas.”
“Of course, the first lady is no stranger to making headlines for her style.”
“ReutersMrs. Trump visited the Royal Hospital Chelsea and wore a flared Victoria Beckham day dress in bold stripes.”
“Melania Trump and Philip May, the husband of Britain's Prime Minister Theresa May, visit the Royal Hospital Chelsea, where they are met by veterans, in central London, July 13, 2018.”
“On Friday, Trump will come face-to-face with the queen at for tea at Windsor Castle, and while fashion fans will have to wait to see what she wears for that occasion, she already showed off another sold-out dress Friday morning.”
“For the public, it's only available in emerald (or it was, until it sold out).”
“ReutersThe design is part of J. Mendel's 2018 spring collection, but only the first lady gets this version.”
“President Donald Trump and first lady Melania Trump leave the U.S. ambassador's residence, Winfield House, on their way to Blenheim Palace for dinner with Britain's Prime Minister Theresa May and business leaders, in London, July 12, 2018.”
“Though the monarch didn't attend the dinner, according to WWD, Trump's stylist, Herve Pierre, said the pale yellow shade was selected to "pay homage" to the queen, as it's known to be a favorite of hers.”
“Instead it was a nod to Queen Elizabeth II.”


Just last month, she attracted attention and controversy in a graffiti style jacket that seemed to convey a message as she set out to visit immigrant children detained in Texas
"Of course, it's not strange for the first lady to make headlines in her style."
"Reuters. Trump visited the Royal Chelsea hospital and wore a Victorian David's day dress with striking stripes
"Melania trump and Philip may, husband of British Prime Minister Theresa May, visited the Royal Hospital in central London, where veterans met them."
"On Friday, trump will have tea face to face with the queen at Windsor Castle. Although fashion fans still have to wait to see what she will wear at the event, she has already displayed another dress that has sold out on Friday morning."
"For the public, only jadeite (or former jadeite, until sold out) is available."
"Reuters is part of J. Mendel's spring 2018 collection, but only the first lady gets this version."
"On July 12, 2018, in London, President Donald Trump and first lady Melania trump left the windfield building, the US ambassador's residence, for brunheim palace to have dinner with British Prime Minister Theresa May and business leaders."
"Although the queen didn't attend the dinner, according to WWD, Trump's stylist Herve Pierre said the light yellow hue was chosen to" salute "the queen because it is known to be the Queen's favorite."
"Instead, it's a nod to Queen Elizabeth II."



Number  465
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“According to Beyoncé’s Instagram, the names are Rumi and Sir Carter, two handles that are definitely unique enough to keep company with the likes of Blue Ivy.”
“Beyoncé announced that she and Jay Z would be expecting not one, but two new additions to the family in February of this year with an artistic Instagram photo of herself clad in a veil and an exposed baby bump that sent the Internet into a tizzy.”
““We would like to share our love and happiness.”
“We have been blessed two times over,” the “Lemonade” singer captioned the photo.”
“Beyoncé shared a series of photos throughout her pregnancy, many who featured their 5-year-old daughter, Blue Ivy Carter.”
“The twins’ birth was one of the most widely anticipated events of 2017, with Beyoncé’s avant garde Instagram pregnancy announcement breaking a Guinness World Record for most liked photo on Instagram.”
“The power couple, who married in 2008, welcomed Blue – who is now five – on January 7, 2012.”
“See the name announcement in all its glory below.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
Please enter a valid email address
"According to Beyonce's instagram, which is named rummy and Sir Carter, these two handles are absolutely unique enough to be compatible with plants such as blue ivy."
"Beyonce announced that what she and jay z are looking forward to is not one, but two new family members added in February this year. A veiled art photo of her on instagram and an exposed baby lump have thrown the Internet into chaos."
"We are willing to share our love and happiness."
"We've been blessed twice," the lemonade singer wrote in the title of the photo
"Beyonce shared a series of photos during her pregnancy, many of which were photos of their five-year-old daughter, Ivy Carter."
"The birth of the twins is one of the most anticipated events in 2017, and Beyonce's avant-garde instagram pregnancy announcement broke the Guinness world record for the most popular photo on instagram."
"The power couple got married in 2008, and on January 7, 2012, they ushered in blue, now five years old."
"Please see the name announcement below."



Number  466
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know on Twitter (@desireemurphy_ and @lizcalvario) what other regal news you'd like us to cover in the future.”
“For now, that's a wrap on this week's royals update.”
“"But that eye-watering price was befitting for a future queen, so it’s unlikely Meghan’s will be as expensive because it could be seen by some as being disrespectful,” Bromley added.”
“"It's going to be featured in the history books, so needs to stand the test of time.”The price may seem quite high, though that doesn't compare to Kate Middleton's custom Alexander McQueen design that cost around $400,000.”
“She Doesn't Want to Upstage 'Future Queen' Kate Middleton"Meghan’s dress is expected to cost hundreds of thousands of dollars," royal expert Melanie Bromley told Harper's Bazaar.”
“Embed Code Restart Meghan Markle Wedding Dress Details!”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“She Doesn't Want to Upstage 'Future Queen' Kate Middleton This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Meghan Markle Wedding Dress Details!”
“Another story circulating the web is that Meghan's gown -- rumored to be a custom Ralph & Russo Couture creation -- will cost approximately $135,600.”


"Please tell us on twitter (@ desireemurphy and @ lizcalvario) what else you want us to cover in the future."
"For now, this is a summary of the latest news from the royal family this week."
"But this dazzling price is suitable for the future queen, so Megan's price is unlikely to be so expensive because it may be seen as disrespectful by some," Bromley added
"It will go down in history, so it needs to stand the test of time." The price seems to be quite high, but it's not in line with the price of Kate Middleton's customized Alexander McQueen design (about $400000)
"She doesn't want to steal the limelight of Kate Middleton, the future queen. Megan's dress is expected to cost hundreds of thousands of dollars," Royal expert Melanie Bromley said in Harper's fair
Embed code to restart Megan markel wedding details
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"She doesn't want to be in the limelight of Kate Middleton, the future queen. This video is not available because we can't load sponsor information."
"Megan markel wedding details!"
"Another news circulating on the Internet is that Megan's dress - rumored to be a custom dress by Ralph and Russo - will cost about $135600."



Number  467
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So, here’s a #tbt of my hair and my best friend.””
““She truly has the biggest heart out of anyone I have ever met and deserves all of the good things in life.”
““In today’s world, it’s nearly impossible to come across someone with the elegance and class that this person does (not me, the pretty one on the left),” he captioned a selfie of the two.”
“Last Thursday, he took to Instagram to dedicate a sweet, supportive post in her honor ahead of the premiere.”
“But Biscardi has his girlfriend’s back.”
“Staaaaahhhhp!“)During the premiere, Ortiz-Magro also admitted to cheating on Giancola after they moved in together after Jersey Shore.”
“(“Rahhhhhnnnn!”
“...like her...”
“...premiere focused on her absence with quite a few jokes being made at her expense mostly stemming from the fact that Pauly DJ Pauly D DelVecchio brought in a custom life size doll wearing an I m in a really good place shirt and designed to look and talk just...”
“Their tumultuous on again off again relationship lasted eight years three of which were captured on the original run of Jersey Shore from 2009 12 RELATED VIDEO Jersey Shore Cast Reveals Why Night Out with Snooki Might Just Kill You Of course much of last week s two hour season...”


"So, this is my hair and my best friend's TBT."
"She's really the most loving person I've ever met. She deserves all the good things in life."
"In today's world, it's almost impossible to meet someone as elegant and tasteful as this person (not me, the beautiful one on the left)," he wrote in a self portrait of them
"Last Thursday, he published a thoughtful, supportive article on instagram, paying tribute to her before the premiere."
"But biscardi has the support of his girlfriend."
"Shh!) At the premiere, Ortiz Magro also admitted cheating giankola after he moved to the Jersey coast
"(" ah ha ha! "
“… Like her... "
“… The premiere focused on her absence with quite a few jokes being paid by her, mainly because, in fact, Paulie DJ Paulie d'erviccio brought a custom life size doll wearing a shirt I'm in a very good place, designed to look and speak just... "
"Their noisy, off and on relationship lasted eight years, three of which were filmed in the original operation of the Jersey coast in 2009. The Jersey coast crew revealed why the night with snooker might only kill you, of course, for most of last week's two-hour season..."



Number  468
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 33-year-old royal was a guest speaker at the Obama Foundation Summit in Chicago, Illinois, on Tuesday, where he spoke about when he realized that he could use his "position for good" and how his mother's death taught him about the importance of giving back.”
“"I think what happened to my mum probably put me a step back, thinking, 'How could someone who did so much for the world, and did so much for everyone else, be treated like that by a certain institution?'"”
“Prince Harry shared.”
“"It takes a bit of getting used to, but once you understand the privileged position that you're in, you then got to spend the rest of your life earning that privilege and giving back.”
“And also gaining the trust and respect of the general public, and using the position for good."”
“RELATED: Prince Harry and Michelle Obama Surprise Chicago High School Students -- Pics!”
“Princess Diana, who was known as the "People's Princess" and died when Harry was 12, continues to be a major inspiration for the prince.”
“"I think she had a lot in common with everybody but also she certainly listened in a very, very short space of time," Prince Harry said.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 33 year old royal was a guest speaker at the Obama foundation summit in Chicago, Illinois on Tuesday, where he talked about when he realized he could use his" status for good "and how his mother's death taught him the importance of reward."
"I think my mother's experience may make me step back. I'm thinking," how can a person who has done so much for the world and for others be treated like that by an organization? "
"Prince Harry shared it."
"It takes a little bit of habit, but once you understand your privileged position, you have to spend the rest of your life winning that privilege and giving it back."
"At the same time, it has won the trust and respect of the general public and made good use of this position."
Related report: Prince Harry and Michelle Obama surprise Chicago high school students
"Princess Diana, known as the 'Princess of the people', died when Harry was 12 and remains the prince's main inspiration."
"I think she has a lot in common with everyone, but she certainly listened in a short time," Prince Harry said



Number  469
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HGTV received the blueprints for the home as part of the sale.”
“Discovery Inc. CEO David Zaslav said the network plans to restore the house to its 1970s glory.”
“HGTV announced the purchase on an earnings call earlier in the week.”
“The bidders included stage and television producers, corporate parties and entertainers.”
“Despite reports that developers were looking at a potential tear-down, none of the bidders intended to destroy the home, according to listing agent Ernie Carswell.”
“The home received eight offers, according to the report, including singer Lance Bass, who thought he had submitted the winning bid, but was blown away when HGTV allegedly offered to top any bids.”
“.”
“The home was used for the exterior shots in the television show, with the interiors shot on a sound stage.”
“The Los Angeles Times reports the sale of the home at 11222 Dilling Street closed Friday at $3.5 million, or $1.6 million more than the listing price of $1.885 million.”
“The iconic Brady Bunch house in Studio City, California sold for almost twice its asking price, thanks to the entry of HGTV into the bidding wars.”


"HGTV received the design of the house as part of the sale."
"Discovery CEO David zaslav said the network plans to restore the house to its 1970s glory."
HGTV announced a earnings call earlier this week.
Bidders include stage and television producers, company parties and entertainers
"Despite reports that developers are considering a possible demolition, none of the bidders intend to destroy the house," according to housing agent Ernie Carswell
"It is reported that the house received eight offers, including singer lance bass, who thought he had submitted a winning bid, but was blown away when HGTV said it offered more than any bid."
“.”
"This house is used for the exterior of TV programs, and the interior is taken on the sound stage."
The house at 11222 dilling Street sold for $3.5 million on Friday, up $1.6 million from its listing price of $1.885 million, the Los Angeles Times reported
"Because of HGTV's participation in the bidding war, Brady Bunch, the iconic building of California studios, is selling for almost twice its asking price."



Number  470
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Carrie Underwood – “The Fighter””
“Ludacris – “The Champion”Dan + Shay – “Tequila”Jason Aldean – “You Make It Easy”Justin Timberlake feat.”
“Leading the pack are Carrie Underwood, Florida Georgia Line and Jason Aldean, with four nominations each.”
“Little Big Town, Chris Stapleton, Lauren Alaina and Thomas Rhett follow with two nominations each.”
“Underwood currently reigns as the musician with the most ever CMT Music Awards, a total of 17 wins.”
“Country outfit Little Big Town will host this year’s event, which airs on June 6, marking the group’s first time MC-ing an award show.”
“Another first for the franchise: pop artists are featured in the prestigious video of the year category as Bebe Rexha and Justin Timberlake picked up nominations for their collaborations with Florida Georgia Line and Chris Stapleton, respectively.”
“Both musicians are also nominated in the collaborative video of the year category.”
“Rounding out the video of the year nominees are Blake Shelton, Brett Young, Brothers Osborne, Carrie Underwood and Ludacris, Dan + Shay, Aldean, Kane Brown and Alaina, Kelsea Ballerini, Luke Combs, and Rhett.”
“Other musicians outside the country music world who landed nominations are Andra Day, Backstreet Boys, Common, and Earth, Wind & Fire.”


"Kelly Underwood –" fighter "
"Ludacris –" champion "Dan + Shay –" tequila "Jason Aldean –" you make it easy "Justin Timberlake feat
"The leaders are Carrie Underwood, the Florida Georgia line and Jason Alden, with four nominations each."
"Small town, Chris Stapleton, Lauren arena and Thomas Reid each received two nominations."
Underwood is currently the top musician in the CMT Music Awards, with 17 awards
This year's award ceremony will be held on June 6, the first time the organization has held an award ceremony
"Another initiative in the series: pop singers are included in the category of famous videos of the year, with Bebe Rexha and Justin Timberlake nominated for their collaboration with line, Florida, and Chris Stapleton, Florida, respectively."
"The two musicians were also nominated for the best collaboration video of the year."
"The nominees for video of the year include Blake Sheldon, Brett young, the Osborne brothers, Kelly Underwood and Ludacris, Dan Shea, Alden, Kane brown and Alena, Kelsey Ballerini, Luke combs and Rhett."
Other musicians nominated outside of country music are Andra day, backstreet boys, ordinary people and earth, wind and fire



Number  471
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the UK she relaxes by spending time in her own home, Ray Mill in Wiltshire, where she scrambles breakfast eggs on her Aga, and entertains her five grandchildren.”
“Charles and Camilla meet the Pope at the Vatican 1 10 Charles and Camilla meet the Pope at the Vatican Pope Francis Prince Charles and Camilla Duchess of Cornwall at the Vatican Rex Features Pope Francis C exchanges gifts with Britain s Prince Charles Prince of Wales and Camilla Duchess...”
“In a rare interview, she told the Mail on Sunday how she became a prisoner in her own home due to public animosity towards her.”
“"It was horrid.”
“It was a deeply unpleasant time and I wouldn’t want to put my worst enemy through it," she said.”
“"But the children came and went as normal – they just got on with it – and so did great friends.”
“( Happier times: The Prince of Wales and the Duchess of Cornwall / PA )Camilla says she passed the time reading and learning to paint.”
“"I couldn’t really go anywhere," she said.”
“WEST END FINAL Essential news, in your inbox 4pm daily Email Sign up Sign up Tick the box to be informed about Evening Standard offers and updates by email.”
“See terms here {{message}} {{message}}As she approaches her 70th birthday in July, Camilla spoke about her relationship with the Prince of Wales and the pressures of marrying into the Royal Family.”


In the UK, she spent time at ray mill's home in Wiltshire, where she fried breakfast eggs for her AGA and entertained five grandchildren to relax
"Charles and Camilla meet the pope at the Vatican 10 Charles and Camilla meet the Pope Francis at the Vatican Prince Charles and Camilla Duchess of Cornwall feature in Rex, Vatican Pope Francis C exchanges gifts with Prince Charles and Duchess of Camilla..."
In a rare interview, she told the Sunday post that because of public hostility, she became a prisoner in her home
"It's terrible."
"It was a very unpleasant time and I didn't want to get my biggest enemy through," she said
"But it's normal for children to come and go - they just get along well - and so are great friends."
"(happy time: Prince of Wales and Duchess of Cornwall / Pennsylvania) Camilla said she passed the time by reading and learning to draw."
"I can't go anywhere," she said
"West end final essential news, in your in box, register by email at 4 p.m. every day, check the box to inform you of the offers and updates of the evening standard by email."
"See the term {message}} {message}}} in July this year, Camilla will be celebrating her 70th birthday. She talked about her relationship with the prince of Wales and the pressure to marry into the royal family."



Number  472
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m impacted every day by these voices.”With reporting by Travis Cronin...”
“Whatever those communities may be.”Added the Star Trek actress, “Either by sharing their insight, by sharing their knowledge, by shedding light on organizations and movements and people that we should all be knowing about and talking about, because they’re bringing change to their local communities.”
““They’re giving back to their community.”
“Whether they were current at that time or still relevant today, or current today, not only are they using their talents to benefit their personal growth, but they’re giving back,” she gushed.”
““I’ve been impacted my whole life by trailblazers.”
“We need role models that reflect who we are in order for us to cultivate inspiration.”The Avatar starlet, who draws inspiration from the likes of Rosie Perez, Sigourney Weaver, Reese Witherspoon and Gina Rodriquez, hopes to influence positive change in the industry by showcasing diversity.”
“Because one thing that’s for certain, especially given this box office record breaking hit with Black Panther, is that we need heroes.”
““For some reason, these events and these personalities never made it into our history books … It is important for us to reflect on all kinds of role models and trailblazers that we’ve had past and present.”
“We liked it so much and we’re so passionate about this show because we’re gonna be exploring the contributions and social impact that people of color have been having in our nation’s history,” she dished.”
““We have a series [on the platform] called Hidden Figuras and obviously it is a play on the title of Hidden Figures, that movie.”


"I'm influenced by these sounds every day." Travis Cronin's Report
"No matter what these communities are," the Star Trek actress added, "either share their insights, share their knowledge, and reveal the organizations, movements, and people we should all know and talk about, because they are bringing change to the local community."
"They're giving back to the community."
"Whether they were on active service at that time, still relevant today, or now, they were not only using their talents to benefit their personal growth, but also giving back," she continued
"I've been influenced by pioneers all my life."
"We need role models that reflect who we are in order to develop inspiration." Inspired by such stars as Rosie Peres, Sigmund weaver, Reese Witherspoon and Gina rodriks, the star of avatar hopes to influence positive changes in the industry by demonstrating diversity
"Because one thing is for sure, especially considering the record breaking box office of panther, is that we need heroes."
"For some reason, these events and these characters have never entered our history books We must reflect on the past and present models and pioneers. "
"We love the show very much and we are very enthusiastic about it because we are going to explore the contribution and social impact of people of color in the history of our country," she said
"We have a series [on the platform] called hidden people, which is obviously a movie about hidden people."



Number  473
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Grisham added that her boss is calling on Democrats and Republicans to fix the nation’s immigration crisis.”
“We are doing everything we can to advocate on behalf of the thousands of children who are separated and alone and we are grateful for the generous support of George and Amal Clooney and the Clooney Foundation for Justice it could not be more vital at this time Image zoom...”
“...how children were taken from their parents who are caught illegally crossing the border...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““At some point in the future our children will ask us: ‘Is it true, did our country really take babies from their parents and put them in detention centers?’ And when we answer yes, they’ll ask us what we did about it.”
“What we said.”
“Where we stood,” the Clooneys said in an exclusive statement to PEOPLE.”
“We can t change this administration s policy but we can help defend the victims of it They added Today the Clooney Foundation for Justice will donate 100 000 to the Young Center for Immigrant Children s Rights The Clooney Foundation has also sponsored the resettlement of Syrian and Yazidi...”
“...refugees in the U S”
“Image zoom Amal and George Clooney | Credit: Albert L. Ortega/GettyThe Young Center’s Executive Director, Maria Woltjen, thanked the couple for their support during this “vital” time.”


"Grisham added that her boss called on Democrats and Republicans to solve the immigration crisis in the United States."
"We are making every effort to defend thousands of lost and lonely children, and we thank George and Amar Clooney and the Clooney justice foundation for their generous support. At this time, image zooming can't be more important..."
“…… How was the child taken away from the parents who were caught illegally crossing the border... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Some time in the future, our children will ask us," is this true? Has our country really taken our children away from their parents and put them in detention centers? "When we say yes, they will ask us what we have done about it."
"What we said."
"We're standing there," the clooneys said in an exclusive statement to people magazine
"We can't change the policy of this administration, but we can help protect the victims. They added today that the Clooney justice foundation will donate 100000 yuan to the Youth Center for migrant children's rights. The Clooney foundation also sponsored the resettlement of Syria and Yazidi... "
“… "Refugees in the United States"
Photo zoom Amal and George Clooney | photo source: Maria woltjen, executive director of Albert l.ortega/gettythe young center, thanks the couple for their support at this "critical" moment



Number  474
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“...tribute to late actor Paul Walker at the recent 2017 MTV Movie TV Awards...”
“Diesel gave the tribute as he accepted the MTV Generation Award for the "Fast and Furious" film franchise with his co-stars Michelle Rodriguez, Tyrese Gibson and Jordana Brewster.”
“While accepting the award, Diesel remembered his late friend Walker, who died in a fatal car crash in California on Nov. 30, 2013.”
“In his speech, the 49-year-old actor said he could never stand on the stage and talk about "Fast and Furious" without giving his love to his brother Pablo, referring to Walker.”
“"In 2002, I was standing on this stage, and MTV had given Paul Walker and I an award for Best Duo.”
“And now, 15 years later, I'm with my whole family, and you're giving us the Generation Award," he said in his acceptance speech, adding that he hopes he has made Walker proud.”
“For 16 years, Diesel has played Dominic Toretto in the film franchise.”
“That is why he could not help but reflect on his earlier days working with Walker, which earned them the Best Duo award way back in 2002.”


Submit
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"
“… Pay tribute to the late actor Paul Walker at the recent MTV film and Television Awards 2017... "
Diesel paid homage to the MTV generation Award for winning the "speed and passion" film series with his co stars Michelle Rodriguez, Thales Gibson and Jordana Brewster
"In accepting the award, diesel thought of his late friend walker, who died in a fatal car accident in California on November 30, 2013."
The 49 year old actor said in his speech that he would never be able to stand on stage and talk about "quickness and anger" without showing his love to his brother Pablo
"In 2002, I was on this stage, and MTV gave Paul Walker and me the best combination award."
"Today, 15 years later, I'm with my family and you've given us the generation award," he said in his acceptance speech, adding that he hopes to make Walker proud
"For 16 years, diesel has been playing Dominic torreto in the film series."
"That's why he can't help recalling his earlier collaboration with walker, which won them the best combination award in 2002."



Number  475
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And in between hosting, Rita also has her first global single coming out Friday that just so happened to be written by the one and only Ed Sheeran.”
“You know what I mean?"”
“As Rita Ora walked the red carpet Sunday night at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards, fans couldn't help but comment on the singer's outfit.”
“And by outfit, we definitely mean her backside.”
“While appearing on Live From the Red Carpet, the singer revealed that Cher was her inspiration behind the look.”
“"She's 71, you guys.”
“That's amazing," she told E!”
“News' Jason Kennedy.”
“"So that is probably why I have this situation going on.”
“She has the black thong on.”


During the hosting period, Rita's first global single, written by ED Sheeran, will also be released on Friday
"Do you know what I mean?"
"As Rita Ola walked down the red carpet of the 2017 Billboard Music Awards on Sunday night, fans couldn't help commenting on the singer's costume."
"When it comes to clothing, we definitely mean her back."
"When she appeared on the red carpet, the singer revealed that Cher was the source of inspiration behind her modeling."
"You guys, she's 71 years old."
"That's amazing," she told e! "
"Jason Kennedy news"
"So that's probably why I'm in this situation."
"She's wearing black thongs."



**Something goes wrong**
“Images via Getty/TMZ”
“Flip the page to see more pics of Travis’ and Kylie’s parquet love.”
“Does that look like platonic behavior to you?”
“Why they gotta be dating?”According to photos on TMZ, Travis was rubbing Kylie’s inner thigh.”
“For those of you saying: “Damn, two people can’t just go to a basketball game together?”
“Last night, the young swirlers were seen getting comfy and cozy while sitting court side at the game 5 of Houston Rockets and Oklahoma City Thunder playoff series.”
“Travis Scott And Kylie Jenner Go On Date To Houston Rockets GameThe other day we reported that Kylie Jenner and Rihanna’s former victim tryst Travis Scott were spotted hand-in-hand at Coachella.”


"Picture via Getty / TMZ"
"Turn the page and see more pictures of Travis and Kelly's favorite parquet."
"Do you think this is Platonic behavior?"
"Why are they Dating? "According to the picture on TMZ, Travis is rubbing Kelly's inner thigh."
You said, "Damn, can't two people go to the basketball game together?"
"Last night, in the fifth game of the playoffs between the Houston Rockets and Oklahoma City Thunder, the young whirlpool players sat on the sidelines and felt comfortable."
"A few days before Travis Scott and Kelly Jenner went on a date with the Houston Rockets, we reported that Travis Scott, the former victim of Kelly Jenner and Rihanna, was found holding hands in cochella."



Number  477
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The KUWTK star will also be peddling lip kits while on tour with Scott.”
“The 26-year-old further added a pair of black denim pants and Nike sneakers to his attire as he made his way to car service to join Kylie and her pal for the occasion.”
“And on Saturday, Kylie Jenner continued to spark engagement rumors after being spotted heading back to her Miami Beach hotel wearing a stunning diamond encrusted ring on her wedding finger.”
“The 22-year-old businesswoman appeared calm and collected while walking toward the building with best pal Jordyn Woods.”
“Again: Kylie Jenner continued to spark engagement rumors after being spotted heading back to her Miami Beach hotel wearing a stunning diamond encrusted ringKylie looked great in her ensemble, which consisted of a khaki trench coat with patent boots and an accompanying black handbag on her side.”
“Her blonde tresses had been styled in multiple waves that ran all the way down to her ends while effortlessly sporting a flawless dusting of makeup.”
“It wasn't long before Kylie had re-emerged – this time with her doting beau Travis.”
“Planning to marry soon?”
“The reality star is no stranger to wearing expensive rings on her wedding finger She always gets it right Her blonde tresses had been styled in multiple waves that ran all the way down to her ends while sporting a flawless dusting of makeup The Texas native who is currently...”
“...on his ASTROWORLD tour seemed rather shy as he exited the hotel and joined the leading ladies as they headed to Nobu for dinner...”


"The Kuyt star will also sell lipstick in the tour with Scott."
"Kelly, 26, added a pair of black jeans and Nike sneakers to her dress when she went to the car service center for a party with Kelly and her friends."
"Kylie Jenner continued to generate engagement rumors on Saturday after she was found wearing an amazing diamond ring on her wedding finger when she returned to the Miami Beach Hotel."
"The 22-year-old businesswoman appeared calm as she walked to the building with her good friend Jordyn woods."
"Once again: Kylie Jenner's engagement rumors continued after she was found wearing a beautiful diamond ring back to the Miami Beach Hotel. Kelly looks beautiful in a khaki windbreaker, a pair of patent boots and a black handbag
"Her golden hair is designed to be wavy all the way to the end, while effortlessly putting on the perfect make-up."
"It wasn't long before Kelly reappeared - this time with her beloved boyfriend Travis."
"Are you going to get married at once?"
"This reality TV star is no stranger to wearing expensive rings on her wedding ring. She always does it right. Her golden hair is designed in many wavy shapes, extending to the end of her, and at the same time, she is also dyed with a perfect layer of cosmetics. This native of Texas is now..."
“…… During his journey to the star world, he walked out of the hotel and went to Nobu for dinner with the heroines. He seemed a little shy... "



Number  478
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Khloe has fallen in love with him all over again, watching him be a dad to True, but [she also] knows she needs to really take a step back and make the right decision.’”
“When they see each other, it is all about the baby and parenting together.”
“Advertisement‘She hasn’t given up on him yet but also hasn’t really been focusing on their relationship.”
“‘She has one foot out the door but is also holding on to the fact that she and Tristan can make it work,’ the source claimed.”
“...regarding what’s been going on with Khloe, insiders claim that she has not given up on her relationship with Tristan, at least not yet.”
“We also heard that his first baby mama Jordan Craig is also angry because he has been neglecting his son since all this mess started.”
“...human being on this planet knows that he cheated on his baby mama Khloe Kardashian...”
“It seems that the papers have been filed on April 23 and they involve Athletic apparel namely shirts pants jackets footwear hats and caps being headware athletic uniforms We know that you re aware of the fact that Tristan s name has been all over the news and probably every...”
“News who managed to obtain the documents.”
“The basketball player has filed for a trademark (a letter T), according to E!”


"Khloe fell in love with him again and watched him become a real father, but also knew that she really needed to step back and make the right decision."
"When they meet, it's for their children to be with their parents."
"She hasn't given up on him, but she doesn't really care about their relationship."
"She has a foot outside the door, but also sticks to the fact that she and Tristan can make it work," the source said
“…… In Khloe's case, insiders claim that she has not abandoned her relationship with Tristan, at least not yet. "
"We also heard that his first mother, Jordan Craig, was angry because he had ignored his son since the chaos began."
“… People on this planet know that he betrayed his little mother, Khloe Kardashian... "
"These documents appear to have been submitted on 23 April and relate to sportswear, namely shirts, trousers, jackets, shoes and hats, which are headware's sportswear. We know, you know, Tristan's name has been all over the news, and probably every day... "
"Try to get a message about the file."
According to e! According to the report, the basketball player has applied for the trademark (letter T)! "



Number  479
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See what other antics they get into — below!”
“In another scene, the reality star muses, “Does no one really know it’s me?”The special will air Sept. 24 at 9 p.m. on E!”
““Can you believe those whores have lasted for 10 years?” Kourt, wearing blonde wig, asks two men.”
“Needless to say, a lot of interesting answers came up.”
“What other exes are coming?”Hosted by Ryan Seacrest, the special will also feature Kourtney hitting the streets in disguise — just like what Khloé, Kendall, and Kylie did to an unsuspecting group of tourists last year — to ask the public their opinions on the famous clan.”
“Meanwhile, Khloé quips, “Holy f*ck!”
““It’s like the shade room every day,” Kim teases in the sneak peek.”
“In it, the family — including Khloé Kardashian, Kourtney Kardashian, Kris Jenner, Kylie Jenner, and Kendall Jenner — throw shade and reflect on exes and weddings in the last decade since the show’s premiere.”
“As Kim Kardashian was spotted out grabbing lunch with Scott Disick in New York City Wednesday, the first teaser to the upcoming Keeping Up with the Kardashians 10 Year Anniversary Special was released.”
“The Kardashians are shady AF.”


"Look at their antics - down!"
In another scene, the reality TV star muses, "doesn't anyone really know it's me? "The special will be on e at 9pm on September 24!"
"Can you believe that the prostitutes have lived for 10 years? "Kurt, wearing a golden wig, asked two men."
"Needless to say, there are a lot of interesting answers."
"What else is coming? "The special, hosted by Ryan Seacrest, will also feature kurtany's disguised presence on the streets - as khlo é, Kendall and Kylie did last year for a group of unsuspecting tourists - to ask the public for their opinions on this famous tribe."
At the same time, helo quipped, "my God!"
Kim joked in peeping, "this is like a cool room every day."
"In the show, the family, including Carol Kardashian, Courtney Kardashian, Chris Jenner, Kelly Jenner and Kendall Jenner, cast a shadow over their predecessors and weddings in the past 10 years since the premiere of the show and reflect on them."
On Wednesday, when people sent cash Kardashian and Scott Disick to lunch in New York, the first joke of the upcoming "follow Kardashian 10th anniversary special" was made public
"The Kardashian family is dark."



Number  480
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Winter Olympics begin next Friday.”
“Marcus Nyman, who competed as a judoka in Rio, said: "A lot of athletes [used] the app."”
“This works out to 37 condoms per athlete for a two-week period.”
“The rise of dating apps like Tinder could be to thank for an anticipated increase of sexual activity in the athletes village.”
“Organisers of the 2018 Winter Olympics are stockpiling condoms in the athletes village.”
“Athletes at this year's games will be supplied with 110,000 condoms — that's over 37 per athlete for a two-week period.”
“CNN says this year's athletes village includes a fitness center, a dining area that is accessible 24 hours a day, and a multifaith area for worship.”
“There is also a large selection of shops.”
“But it is the sheer volume of condoms that has caught the local media's attention in South Korea, where the games will be held.”
“According to the Korea Biomedical Review, the condoms have been donated "mostly by domestic developer Convenience" and will be "the biggest amount ever distributed at the Winter Games."”


"The Winter Olympics will start next Friday."
"A lot of athletes [use] this app," said Marcus Niemann, who competed in judo in Rio
"This means that each athlete can use 37 condoms in two weeks."
"The rise of dating apps like tinder may be due to the expected increase in sexual activity in athletes' villages."
"Organizers of the 2018 Winter Olympics are hoarding condoms in the athletes' village."
"Athletes at this year's Olympics will get 110000 condoms - more than 37 condoms per athlete in two weeks."
CNN said this year's athletes village includes a fitness center, a 24-hour dining area and a multi faith worship area
"There's also a lot of choice for stores."
"But in South Korea, where the Olympic Games are held, the number of condoms has attracted the attention of the local media."
According to the Korea biomedical review, the condoms are "mainly donated by domestic developers" and will be "the largest distribution in the history of the Winter Olympics."



Number  481
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We had a little elf whisper in our ear, and apparently these are the top Hallmark Christmas movies with the highest household viewership...”
“The highest-rated, most-watched Hallmark movies dominate Christmastime with their small-town charm , revolving door of quirky, sweet-natured characters, and never-failing promise of a heart-warming romance—and we can't get enough.”
“...and will happily be watching again...”
“In addition to the 21 new original movies airing on the Hallmark Channel and the 12 new original movies airing on Hallmark Movies Mysteries this year there are still the faithful films we ve seen before perhaps more than once...”
“...chocolate and which all new movies from the 2017 lineup we re most in love with already gets increasingly more noticeable day by day...”
“We ve got our eye on the Countdown to Christmas pretty much all year long but we know it s getting close when our time spent thinking about which Hallmark movies we re most excited to watch with some hot...”


"We have an elf whispering in our ears. Obviously, these are the top iconic Christmas movies with the highest family ratings..."
"The new year's movie with the highest ratings dominates Christmas with its small town charm, grotesque, sweet character, revolving door and never failing promise of warmth and romance, which we can't satisfy."
“… And I'm happy to watch it again... "
"In addition to the 21 new original films broadcast on hallmark channel and the 12 new original films broadcast on hallmark movies mystery channel this year, we have seen loyal films more than once before..."
“… Chocolate and our favorite 2017 series of new movies have become more and more attractive... "
"We've been watching the countdown to Christmas almost all year, but we know that when we spend our time thinking about which movies we're most excited about, we'll watch them with some hot people..."



Number  482
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, he does have one stipulation for the moniker.”
“I don’t need a shark in my shark tank.”RELATED VIDEO: Kevin Hart and Wife Eniko Parrish Are Expecting Their First Child TogetherEarlier this month, the Philadelphia-born comedian revealed that he’s leaving the important task of naming his third child up to Parrish.”
“I don’t need no dolphins.”
““I want to sit on the couch and be able to yell into the kitchen, ‘Hey come on, let’s go outside and ride a bike!’ I like two dogs, I like a fence.”
““I don’t want to be in a mansion where I have to find my kids on the east wing,” he continued.”
““Regardless of my level of success, I don’t ever want to lose the family feeling of a home,” he said.”
“She shared on Wednesday that she had reached the six-month mark of her pregnancy, and was feeling “GREAT.”Hart previously told Entertainment Weekly he always puts his family first and never wants to let fame get in the way.”
“Image zoom Eniko Parrish and Kevin Hart | Credit: Kevin Hart/InstagramThe two lovebirds have never been shy about showing their affection for one another on social media, frequently posting sweet pics of each other from intimate family moments — including their engagement and wedding.”
“(Hart also has two children from a previous marriage: son Hendrix, 9½, and daughter Heaven, 12.)”
““We are overjoyed about our new addition to our family,” they said in a joint statement.”


"But he has a rule for the nickname."
"I don't need sharks in my shark tank." Related video: Kevin Hart and his wife, Eniko Parrish, are looking forward to their first child. Earlier this month, the Philadelphia born comedian revealed that he will give Parrish the responsibility of naming his third child
"I don't need dolphins."
"I want to sit on the sofa and yell at the kitchen," Hey, come on, let's go out for a bike ride! "I like two dogs. I like fences."
"I don't want to be in a mansion where I have to find children in the east wing," he continued
"No matter how successful I am, I don't want to lose the sense of home," he said
"She said on Wednesday that she was six months pregnant and feeling good." Hart told Entertainment Weekly that he always put family first and never wanted fame to get in her way
"Image zooming Eniko Parrish and Kevin Hart | image source: Kevin Hart / instagram, a couple who never shy away from expressing their love for each other on social media, often post sweet photos of each other in close family moments, including engagement and wedding."
(Hart also has two ex husband's children: son Hendrix, 9.5 years old, daughter heaven, 12 years old.)
"We are very happy with the new family," they said in a joint statement



Number  483
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...unknown in the weeks leading up to the birth Lowry revealed her wishes in a May 11 tweet writing I bought baby bows today JUSTTTTT in case we have a girl...”
“My boys are so excited those who love me are so excited and I hope that everyone can just be happy for me during this time RELATED VIDEO Teen Mom 2 s Kailyn Lowry Shows Off Growing Baby Bump on Beach Vacation with Sons Although the baby s sex was...”
““And like I say in my book — with a little bit of hustle heart, I can and I will survive anything.”She added, “Having another child is something I am so happy about and I just can’t wait.”
“I know this isn’t an ideal situation but I know everything will be okay,” she wrote in the February blog post.”
““This is the baby I thought I wasn’t sure if I could have.”
“The star, who graduated college in May, admitted earlier this year that she was nervous bout her third journey to motherhood.”
““Lincoln really just asked if I could open my belly so he could see the baby,” Lowry tweeted in May.”
“And it seems the boys are excited about welcoming a new sibling too.”
“Lowry is already parents to Isaac Elliot, 7 (whom she shares with ex-boyfriend Jo Rivera) and son Lincoln Marshall, 3 (whom she shares with ex-husband Javi Marroquin).”
“Lopez...”


“… A few weeks before delivery, I didn't know that Lowry tweeted her wish on May 11. I bought a baby bow today just in case we had a girl... "
"My children are so excited, those who love me are so excited, and I hope everyone can be happy for me. In this time related video, Karin lorry of teen Mom 2 shows her growing baby lumps with her sons on a beach holiday, even though the baby's gender is..."
"As I said in the book - as long as I have a busy heart, I can and I will survive." She added, "I'm very happy to have another child. I can't wait."
"I know it's not an ideal situation, but I know everything will be OK," she wrote in her February blog
"This is the child I'm not sure I can have."
The star, who graduated from college in May, admitted earlier this year that she was nervous about her third mother's trip
"Lincoln really just asked me if I could open my stomach and show him the baby," Lowry tweeted in May
"It seems that the children are also very happy to have a new brother and sister."
"Lori is the parent of 7-year-old Isaac Eliot (sharing with ex boyfriend Joe Rivera) and 3-year-old son Lincoln Marshall (sharing with ex husband Javier mallokin)
"Lopez..."



Number  484
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We will continue to update the situation if any more information is made available.”
“Kamala has had several health issues over the course of the past few years, including losing both of his legs due to complications from diabetes.”
“He’s still on Life support but he’s showing signs of improvement.”
“She later updated his condition, posting the following earlier today:A lot of people has asked me for updates on James Harris status the Doctor said he’s looking good this morning.”
“His buddy Coco B Wear is here.”
“He’s on life support.”
“Harris’ stepdaughter posted the following message on Facebook yesterday:FB friends and family please for my stepfather aka Kamala James Harris had emergency surgery this morning around 3am they didn’t think he would make it out of surgery but God.”
“WWE legend Kamala (James Harris) is currently hospitalized and on life support in Mississippi after being rushed to the hospital for an emergency surgery for an undisclosed illness, according to a post by his stepdaughter on Facebook.”


"If we have more information, we will continue to update the situation."
"Camara has had several health problems in the past few years, including the loss of legs due to complications of diabetes."
"He is still receiving life support, but there are signs of improvement."
She later updated his condition and earlier released the following information today: many, many people asked me about James Harris, and the doctor said he looked fine this morning. "
"Here comes his friend coco B wear."
"He's receiving life support."
Harris's stepdaughter posted the following news on Facebook yesterday: FB friend, my stepfather aka Kamala James Harris had an emergency operation around 3 a.m. today. They think he won't leave the operation, but God bless him. "
According to a Facebook post by her stepdaughter, WWE legend camara (James Harris) is rushed to hospital for emergency surgery due to an unknown disease and is currently receiving hospitalization and life support treatment in Mississippi



Number  485
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Benji enjoyed a spot of last-minute Christmas shopping as he hit Barney's New York on Monday afternoonPlenty to smile about: The former Good Charlotte rocker seemed in good spirits as he went about his day, no doubt buoyed by his recent engagement...”
“Not wasting time: Cameron and Benji, pictured in September, are reportedly planning a wedding in early 2015A source said: 'Cameron hasn't been this happy in a long time.”
“More details about their relationship have been revealed, including how she knew that The Madden Brothers singer was 'the one' thanks to his 'chivalrous ways,' with insiders telling UsWeekly that the musician 'swept her off her feet.'”
“Meanwhile her rumoured fiance Benji Madden was seen that day heading to Barney's to do some shoppingCameron and rocker boyfriend Benji Madden are reportedly engaged after a whirlwind seven-month romance.”
“Thirsty work: Cameron was seen sipping on an iced coffee during her outingBuying something for the 'bride'?”
“No matter how old you are, finding the guy who's in the same place as you are and wants to show up is the only way a relationship works, period.'”
“'You're never going to get him to be in that place.”
“'Timing is everything.”
“'If you get into a relationship where you want something the guy doesn't want, it's never gonna work,' the cover girl said.”
“...stayed mum on the engagement rumours Cameron shared some love advice in the latest issue of Cosmopolitan magazine...”


"On Monday afternoon, when Benjy came to Barney's New York to smile, he enjoyed the last moment of Christmas shopping: the former Charlotte rocker seemed to be in good spirits during the day's journey, which was undoubtedly influenced by his recent engagement..."
"Don't waste time: it's reported that the September photo of Cameron and Benji is planning a wedding in early 2015. "Cameron has not been so happy for a long time," the source said
"More details about their relationship have been revealed, including how she knew that the maiden brothers' singer was" that person "because of their" chivalrous style, "a person familiar with the matter told us weekly. The musician" surprised her. "
"Meanwhile, her rumored fiance, Benji Madden, was seen shopping at Barney's store on the same day. It is reported that Cameron and her rock music boyfriend, Benji Madden, were engaged after a seven month affair."
"Thirsty job: when Cameron goes out shopping for the bride, is he seen drinking iced coffee?"
"No matter how old you are, finding a man who is in the same place as you and wants to appear is the only way to have a relationship. Full stop."
"You'll never let him be in that place."
"Time is everything."
"If you're in a relationship where you want something a man doesn't want, it's never going to work," the cover girl said
“… Keep quiet about engagement rumors. Cameron shares some love suggestions in the latest issue of Cosmopolitan magazine



Number  486
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Other notable attendees to her party included Thirty Seconds To Mars’ Jared Leto and other members of the Hilton family, including Kathy, Ricky, and Paris Hilton’s Fiancée, Chris Zylka.”
“I was actually crazy.”AdvertisementParis is a different person now, as she has the support of her family and friends.”
“Recently, she shared a bit about that time saying “It was just self-hatred, low self-esteem, thinking that I couldn’t do anything right, not thinking I was worthy of living anymore, I’m a completely different person…I was crazy.”
“2013 was a heavy year for 15-year-old Paris, as she struggled to get out of her depression and anxiety that led to her attempted suicide.”
“Overall, it seems like Paris had a great birthday and is on the road towards positivity and growth as an aspiring model and actress.”
“She also had a beautiful custom birthday cake in which she enlisted the help of Chris Brown to blow out her candles.”
“Paris shined at her celebration in a retro 60’s inspired look with stand out pink hair.”
“A few people who were seen at her celebration included Chris Brown, her brother Prince Jackson, Paris Hilton, Ashlee Simpson and Evan Ross at HYDE Sunset in West Hollywood.”
“Paris Jackson turned 20 earlier this week, and she brought in her birthday among close family and friends.”


"Other celebrities at her party included Jared Leto of thirty seconds and other members of the Hilton family, including Kathy, Ricky and Paris Hilton's fiancee Chris zelka."
"I'm really crazy." Paris is a different person now because she has the support of her family and friends
"Recently, she shared an experience about that time. She said," it's just self hatred, self abasement, that I can't do anything right, that I'm not worth living, that I'm a totally different person I'm crazy. “
"2013 was a heavy year for 15-year-old Paris as she struggled to get rid of the depression and anxiety that led to attempted suicide."
"On the whole, Paris seems to have a great birthday. As an aspiring model and actress, she is on the way to positive growth."
"She also has a beautiful customized birthday cake with Chris Brown blowing out the candles for her."
"Paris is inspired by the retro style of the 1960s, with her striking pink hair, shining at her celebration."
"Several people appeared at her celebration, including Chris Brown, her brother Prince Jackson, Paris Hilton, Ashley Simpson and Evan Ross at the Hyde sunset party in West Hollywood."
Paris Jackson, who turned 20 earlier this week, celebrated her birthday with friends and family



Number  487
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please be kind to yourself and I hope that you will be comfortable sharing your story too.”Holt and Joblon got engaged in December 2017.”
“That I wasn’t broken forever.”
“On Sunday, the “Originals” star, 29, shared a photo of herself taken after she learned her baby had no heartbeat and prior to her dilation and curettage procedure.”
““I took this photo 10 days ago, as I waited for surgery after my sweet little baby lost its heartbeat.”
“I sent it to my fiancé [Andrew Joblon] in the waiting room to show him that I was ok.”
“I wasn’t.”
“I’ve never felt more broken in my life.”
“I debated sharing this so soon and I’m still frightened about making such a private struggle public, but I’m doing it anyway because it’s important,” she wrote in the emotional Instagram post.”
“Following the procedure, Holt says she spent hours on the internet in search of similar stories from women, desperately seeking a community where she could feel comforted.”
““After my D & C, I spent hours on the internet searching for women who had been through it.”


"Please be kind to yourself. I hope you can share your story easily." Holt and Joe Brent were engaged in December 2017
"I'm not broken forever."
On Sunday, the 29 year old "original" star shared a picture she took after learning that her child did not have a heartbeat and before undergoing dilation and curettage
"I took this picture 10 days ago when my lovely baby was waiting for surgery after losing her heartbeat."
"I gave it to my fiance in the waiting room to show him I was OK."
"I didn't."
"I've never been so sad in my life."
"I started talking about sharing so quickly, and I'm still afraid to make such a private struggle public, but I still do it because it's important," she wrote in a touching instagram post
After the surgery, Holt said, she spent hours searching the Internet for similar stories from women, desperately looking for a community where she could be comforted
"After D & C, I spent hours online looking for women I've experienced."



Number  488
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“The 36-year-old dancer said Amalya was just as excited to meet her baby brother.”
“The former Dancing With the Stars pro welcomed her second child, a son named Kaspyan Millan, over the weekend, ET confirms.”
“EXCLUSIVE: 'DWTS' Pro Anna Trebunskaya Talks Baby No.”
“2 and Boy NamesET caught up with Trebunskaya just last week, where she revealed that she and her longtime boyfriend, Nevin Millan, were in "nesting mode" -- and were planning an at-home delivery.”
“"I'm very excited to have a little guy in the family, but also a little bit nervous," Trebunskaya, who is already mom to 3-year-old daughter Amalya, expressed.”
“"Boys are just different from girls.”
“They tend to be more energetic and adventurous.”
“Nevin and I are looking forward to meeting our boy and getting to know him.”
“It's great to have a balance of both daughter and son and we are very grateful to experience that.”RELATED: 'Dancing With the Stars' Pro Anna Trebunskaya Expecting Baby No.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"The 36 year old dancer said that amaria was just as excited to see her little brother."
Et confirmed that the former "dance with the stars" Pro ushered in her second child, Caspian Mirren, over the weekend
"Exclusive: 'DWTS' Pro Anna trebenskaya talks about baby No."
"2 and boy nameset caught up with trebenskaya just last week, and she revealed that she and her longtime boyfriend, neven Mirren, are in" nesting mode "- and plan to deliver at home."
Trebenskaya, the mother of her three-year-old daughter amaria, said: "I'm excited to have a little guy at home, but I'm also a little nervous."
"Boys and girls are totally different."
"They tend to be more energetic and adventurous."
"Nevin and I are looking forward to seeing our child and getting to know him."
"It's nice to have a balanced daughter and son, and we're happy to have that experience." Related report: Anna trebunskaya, a professional from dance with the stars, is not expected to have children



Number  489
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She still isn’t giving up my son to me but I will fight again in the future when the time is right,” she concluded.”
“Advertisement“I’m really happy we could to a decision for Jace, but it doesn’t change my feelings towards my mom,” Jenelle said.”
“She doesn’t have any plans for some reconciliation or for an active relationship.”
“The actress also said that she hasn’t spoken to her mother since the ruling and she hasn’t even looked at her back then.”
““Barbara, you need to start thinking about the child and not yourself in the future,” Jenelle recalled him telling Barbara.”
“After both Barbara and Jenelle signed the agreement papers, she said that the judge addressed her mother with a warning.”
“She also said that she has no idea what she is going to do next.”
“He will be home one day but today wasn’t the day, sadly.”The 25-year-old actress described today’s scene as being very tense and she revealed the fact that she burst into tears the moment when she heard the judge’s decision in the conference room.”
“[I] just want to spend time with my son.”
““I’m not restricted to when my mom says I can have my son anymore,” Jenelle said, “and at the moment that’s all I care about.”


"She still hasn't given up my son to me, but I will fight in the future when the time is ripe," she concluded
"I'm really happy that we can make a decision for Jess, but it doesn't change my feelings for my mother," Jenner said
"She has no plans to reconcile or build a positive relationship."
"The actress also said that she had never spoken to her mother since the ruling, and she had never even seen her mother at that time."
"Barbara, you need to start thinking about your children, not about your own future," Jenner recalls, telling Barbara
After Barbara and Janel signed the agreement, she warned her mother
"She also said she didn't know what to do next."
"He will come home one day, but today is not that day. I'm sorry." The 25-year-old actress described the scene as tense and revealed that she cried when she heard the judge's verdict in the conference room
"(I) just want to be with my son."
"I'm not limited to the time when my mother said I could have my son again," jenel said. "Now that's all I care about."



Number  490
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““At some point I would love to play with them…David and I have talked about it in the past and we’ll see what comes up.’”
““We made very lucrative offers to those actors,” he added, while declining to name the dollar amount or how it compared to the salaries of series stars O’Loughlin and Caan.”
“...on which he is EP”
“Kim had been asked – again – to discuss his decision to exit the CBS procedural, a topic that has been covered long and often since it happened.”
“I ve known CBS Entertainment President Kelly Kahl and CBS SEVP Programming Thom Sherman for a while I know them and like them and am grateful to them for the words they said on their panel the other day That said it s possible to be grateful and respectful and...”
“...still maintain a steadfast sense of your self worth Kim said pointedly...”
“Related Story Taran Killam Joins Elizabeth Hurley Hannah Simone In CBS Comedy Pilot Welcome To Georgia Days earlier at TCA Kahl and Sherman took multiple questions about the controversial exits of Hawaii Five 0 s two Asian co stars Kim and Grace Park who sought parity with the show s...”
“...leads Alex O Loughlin and Scott Caan and left after not getting equal pay...”
““We never like to lose characters audiences love but that happens on long-running series,” Kahl had said that morning.”
“Kim and Park, whose roles had been conceived as supporting, had made less from the get-go; sources said they were offered salaries close to, but not equal to, that of the leads.”


"One day I'll really want to play with them David and I talked about it before, and we'll see what happens. "
"We offer these actors very lucrative treatment," he added, refusing to disclose the exact amount or how much it compares to the salaries of the series stars olaflin and Kahn
“… He's EP
"Kim Jong Il is once again asked to discuss his decision to withdraw from CBS, which is a topic that has been frequently discussed for a long time."
"I've known Kelly Kahl, President of CBS entertainment company, and Tom Sherman, host of CBS SEVP for some time. I know them and like them. I thank them for what they said at the forum the other day. They said that they may be grateful and respectful, and..."
“… Still maintaining a strong sense of self-worth, Kim said sharply
"Related reports: Taran kiram and Elizabeth Hurley Hannah Simona co starred in TCA Kahl and Sherman on Hawaii's 1950s Asian comedy" welcome to Georgia "a few days ago Park's controversial exit question answers a number of questions, and they seek to be on an equal footing with the show.... "
“…… Leading Alex olaflin and Scott Kahn, leaving without equal pay... "
"We never like to lose characters that audiences love, but it happens in long-term series," Kahl said that morning
"The roles of Kim Jong Un and park Geun hye were originally considered supporting roles, but they made less money from the beginning; the source said that their salaries were close to but not equal to those of the leaders."



Number  491
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Eva is ready to welcome her son with husband Jose Baston any day now...”
“Constant companion: The actress shared a total of 10 photos of Jinxy showing some of her favorite memories with the pupDog lover: Eva, 43, also has grey French bulldog PopeyeEva is ready to welcome her son with husband Jose Baston any day now.”
“The 43-year-old actress revealed on Friday that she'd cradled the pup in her arms as he died at the vets on Thursday after suffering a stroke at the grand age of 15.”
“'So the day I've been dreading happened last night.”
“Jinxy passed away in my arms at the vet.”
“He had a stroke that he just couldn’t come back from.'”
“...she wrote next to an image of her tearfully gazing down at the maltese.”
“'My baby': Eva Longoria said goodbye to her dog Jinxy on Thursday night after the little Maltese had a stroke'He was 15 years old (96 in dog years) and he filled those years with lots of love and laughter.”
“He was my baby before this baby in my belly came along.”
“I’m so sad but know that he’s out of his suffering.”


"EVA is ready to welcome her son and husband, Jose Baston, at any time..."
"Regulars: the actress shared 10 photos of jinxy, showing some good memories of her relationship with her dog lover: EVA, 43, still has a gray French Bulldog, Popeye EVA, ready to greet her son with her husband, Jose Baston."
"The 43 year old actress revealed on Friday that she held the puppy in her arms because it had a stroke at the age of 15 and died at the veterinary clinic on Thursday."
"So the day I was afraid of happened last night."
"Kinsey died in my arms at the vet."
"He had a stroke, but he couldn't come back."
“…… She wrote next to a photo that she was gazing tearfully at the Maltese
"My baby: on Thursday night, Eva Longoria said goodbye to her dog, Kinsey, after his stroke." he's 15 years old (96 years old in the year of the dog), and he's filled those years with love and laughter. "
"Before the baby in my stomach was born, he was my baby."
"I'm sad, but I know he's out of pain."



Number  492
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“News]Photo Credit: Getty / David Livingston...”
“Spelling has never been shy about discussing her financial issues.”
“A judge recently ruled that the couple will be forced to pay off a $220k judgment, according to legal documents obtained by E!”
“News.”
“The ruling came on the heels of Tori and Dean failing to make an appearance for a subpoenaed court hearing last week.”
“The Beverly Hills 90210 actress and her hubby are fighting a legal battle against City National Bank, who is suing the couple for allegedly failing to pay off a $400k loan from 2010.”
“The bank accused Tori and Dean of failing to pay $185,714 plus an additional $2,407 in interest.”
“The company also tacked on another $17,419, an amount that Tori allegedly overdrew this past September and has yet to pay.”
“Up Next: Watch: Tori Spelling and Jennie Garth Throw Shade at Tiffani Thiessen on 'RuPaul'This latest lawsuit is only one of many other financial snags that Tori and Dean have run into this past year.”
“Back in April, the IRS reportedly drained both Tori and Dean's bank accounts.”


"News] photo source: Getty / David Livingston..."
"Sperling is never shy about discussing her economic problems."
According to e! "
"News."
"The ruling was made after Torre and Dean failed to appear in court last week for a subpoena."
"Beverly Hills 90210 actress and her husband are in a lawsuit with city National Bank, which accused the couple of failing to repay their $400000 loan in 2010."
"The bank accused Torre and Dean of not paying $185714 plus $2407 in interest."
"The company also added $17419, which Torre is said to have overdrawn in September last year and has yet to pay."
"Next step: observation: Tori Sperling and Jennie Garth cast a shadow over Tiffany Tyson in the book Rupert, and this latest lawsuit is just one of many other financial hurdles tori and Dean have encountered in the past year."
"It's reported that as early as April, the IRS used up Torre's and Dean's bank accounts."



Number  493
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple announced that they were expecting in October 2017 followed by an adorable video that same month that revealed they would be welcoming another boy.”
“We are SO excited to meet him,” she wrote on Instagram along with an update on her growing bump.”
“Jessie James Decker and her NFL star husband Eric Decker welcomed their third child, son Forrest Bradley Decker, on Saturday, March 31, she announced Monday on Instagram.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We are so in love,” the new mom, 29, captioned her birth announcement featuring her holding her newborn son, who weighed in at 9 lbs.”
“The couple, who wed in 2013, is already parents to 4-year-old daughter Vivianne “Vivi” Rose and 2½-year-old son Eric “Bubby” Thomas Jr.“Welcome to this world Forrest Bradley Decker!”
“My heart is full!”
“#wolfpack completed with a 9lb lean, eating machine (& a Decker bucket head)!”
“Mommy sure knows how to grow some babies!”
“!” the new dad shared on Instagram.”


"The couple announced that they would welcome another boy in October 2017, with a lovely video showing that they would welcome another boy the same month."
"We're happy to meet him," she wrote on instagram, updating her growing lump
"Jessie James Decker and her NFL star husband Eric Decker have their third child, Forrest Bradley Decker, on Saturday, March 31," she announced on instagram on Monday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We love each other so much," the 29 year old new mother wrote in her birth announcement, carrying her 9-pound newborn son
The couple, who married in 2013, are the parents of their 4-year-old daughter Vivian "Vivian" Ross and their 2-and-a-half-year-old son Eric "Bubby" Thomas Jr. "Welcome to the world, Forrest Bradley Decker!"
"My heart is full!"
"Wolfpack is equipped with a 9-pound lean meat machine and a Decker bucket head!"
"Of course mother knows how to raise a child!"
"!" New Dad shared it on instagram. "



Number  494
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Foxx...”
“Similar to her Los Angeles show the reputation hitmaker brought out Ed Sheeran to perform their duet End Game This week Holmes has been in the Big Apple attending a handful of events including the opening of the Privé Revaux store which was launched by her long rumored partner Jamie...”
“Swift performed her hits “Shake It Off,” “…Ready for It?,” “I Don’t Want to Live Forever” and “Look What You Made Me Do” during her set.”
“Image zoom Credit: Theo Wargo/Getty Images for iHeartMediaOther A-listers in attendance included Broadway star Ben Platt and Lindsay Lohan.”
“Backstage, the pair were also spotted mingling with artists and celebrities with Holmes taking a photo with host Elvis Duran.”
“Holmes and Swift, 27, previously crossed paths working on the 2014 film The Giver.”
“The actress, 38, dressed casually chic in a long-sleeve ruffled white top with black pants and color coordinated heels while her only child wore a star-patterned dress with a big red bow in her hair.”
““She’s one of our favorite performers and who is it tonight?” Holmes said before Suri enthusiastically yelled: “Taylor Swift!”Image zoom Credit: Dia Dipasupil/GettyImage zoom Credit: Dia Dipasupil/GettyBefore going on stage, Suri was so excited she clapped, an onlooker tells PEOPLE.”
“While her mom kicked off the introduction, Suri helped by happily saying the pop star’s name right on cue.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Fox..."
"Similar to her performance in Los Angeles, this week's famous producer led ed Sheeran to perform their duet finale, and Holmes participated in some activities at big apple, including the opening of priv é revaux store, which was founded by her long-time rumored partner Jamie..."
Swift performed her hit song "get rid of it" are you ready? "I don't want to live forever" and "look what you made me do" on her set
"Photo zooming credit: Theo Wargo / Getty Images attended by iheartmedia other A-class stars, including Broadway stars Ben Platt and Lindsay Lohan."
"Backstage, the two were also found with artists and celebrities, Holmes and host Elvis Duran group photo."
Holmes, 27, and swift met in the 2014 film giver
The 38 year old actress was dressed in a casual chic long sleeve ruffled white top, black trousers and high-heeled shoes, while her only son was wearing a star pattern dress with a big red bow on her hair
"She's one of our favorite performers. Who's tonight? Sherlock Holmes said that Suri had called out enthusiastically: "Tyler swift! A bystander told people magazine: "the credit for image zooming: dia Dipper / Getty image zooming credit: Suri applauded excitedly before going on stage."
"When her mother introduced her, Suri was happy to say the name of the pop star."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  495
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Burke stepped away from social media following the news of his death but shared a touching Instagram tribute on him later on.”
“Before Lawrence proposed, Burke was excited to share her birthday celebrations on her Instagram Story, including a Cuisinart which she received as an early birthday gift.”
“The Dancing with the Stars coach shared news of her engagement to Lawrence, 38, on Instagram Thursday night with stunning photos of her glittering diamond ring at the Montage in Laguna Beach, CA.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Set against the light of the sunset, Burke covered half of her face with her ring finger as Lawrence kissed her on the cheek.”
“The proposal comes on her 34th birthday.”
““OMG!”
“So far so good for 34!”
“#amilliontimesyes Burke wrote in the caption.”
“The dancer shared several photos of herself with Lawrence, her happiness showing through in each one as she continued to give a close-up view of her diamond engagement ring.”


"Burke left social media after learning about his death, but then shared a touching instagram Memorial."
"Before Lawrence proposed, Burke was excited to share her birthday celebrations on instagram, including a Cuisinart she received as an early birthday present."
"The star dancing coach shared her engagement to 38 year old Lawrence on instagram on Thursday night and an amazing picture of her shining diamond ring in montage, Laguna Beach, California."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In the setting sun, Burke covered half of her face with his ring finger, and Lawrence kissed her on the cheek
"The proposal came on her 34th birthday."
"My God
"So far, 34 is not bad!"
"Amilliontimes yes Burke wrote in the title."
The dancer shared several photos of herself with Lawrence, each showing her happiness as she continued to feature her diamond engagement ring



Number  496
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I'm so proud of you."”
“"Strong W, especially after everything you've been through.”
“She's back!”
“In her first official match since giving birth to her first child, Serena Williams defeated Zarina Diyas of Kazakhstan at the Indian Wells BNP Paribas Open in California on Thursday, according to ESPN.”
“The final score showed Williams defeated 24-year-old Diyas 7-5, 6-3 in round one.”
“After the match, Williams, 34, told the Associated Press that getting back on the court "was incredible."”
“"It’s been over a year and a kid later and I get to go home to her now, and I’m excited about that," the tennis superstar continued.”
“"It definitely wasn’t easy.”
“We always have a couple tight sets.”
“It was good.”


"I'm so proud of you."
"Tough W, especially after you've been through so much."
"She's back!"
Williams beat Kazakhstan's Zarina DIAS at the Indian Wells BNP Paribas open in California on Thursday, her first official match since giving birth to her first child, ESPN reported
"The final score showed Williams beat 24-year-old Diaz 7-5, 6-3 in the first round
"After the game, Williams, 34, told the associated press that it was" incredible "to be back on the court
"More than a year later, a child is back, and I'm excited that I can go home to see her now," the tennis superstar added
"It's definitely not easy."
"We always have some tight sleeves."
"Good."



Number  497
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The duplex penthouse is located atop a seven-story building and has four bedrooms, four and a half bathrooms, and tons of outdoor space, including a couple of lovely rooftop terraces.”
“If it sells anywhere near its asking price, it will still be a lot more than the $8 million Myers shelled out in 2007 to purchase the pad.”
“The apartment was re-listed on the market for $3 million less last November, and that seems to have finally done the trick.”
“Myers tried to sweeten the deal with an additional unit in the building, but that didn’t take, and the penthouse has been trying to find a buyer ever since.”
“Myers listed the over 4,000-square-foot Mercer Street pad on the market in 2015 for just under $17 million.”
“Comedian Mike Myers’s Soho penthouse has finally gone into contract three years after he first listed it on the market, 6sqft reports.”
“The penthouse was last on the market for $14 million, so it wasn’t too far from its ask.”
“UPDATE 4/30/18: Mike Myers’s Soho penthouse sold for $13.2 million, The Real Deal has learned, based on property records.”


The penthouse is located on the top of a seven story building with four bedrooms, four and a half bathrooms and tons of outdoor space, including two lovely roof terraces
"If its price is close to its asking price, it will still far exceed the price miles paid for his $8 million pad in 2007."
"Last November, the apartment went back on the market for $3 million, which seems to have worked at last."
"Myers tried to add a unit to the building to make the deal more attractive, but it didn't succeed, and since then the loft has been trying to find buyers."
"Myers will list more than 4000 square feet of Mercer Street Apartments in 2015 for just under $17 million."
Comedian Mike Myers' SOHO loft has finally signed up three years after it went public, 6sqft reported
"The last listing of the top floor is 14 million yuan, so it is not far from its requirements."
"Update 4 / 30 / 18: Mike Myers' SOHO loft closed for $13.2 million, a real deal based on real estate records."



Number  498
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“Not only did he fall out of favor with fans when the footage was released, but it has many questioning whether he really has the capacity to change after so much shady behavior.”
“On Keeping Up with the Kardashians, Kris expressed that she believed Tristan’s apology wholeheartedly, but Kim didn’t buy it.”
“But People notes Kim was questioning Tristan’s sincerity after he showed remorse.”
“Kim doesn’t trust Tristan despite his apologiesIf all the Kardashians and Jenners forgave Tristan, perhaps fans would be more willing to give him a second chance.”
“The D.C. footage also allegedly occurred two weeks after Khloe’s pregnancy hit the media, too, making this act extra unforgivable.”
“And another video showed Tristan cheating on Khloe with two separate women while in a hookah lounge in Washington, D.C.”
“The first video released by Daily Mail Online showed Tristan kissing another woman in an NYC bar, says Cosmo.”
“The footage shared by Daily Mail Online and TMZ showed several occasions of Tristan all over other women during his relationship with Khloe, Cosmopolitan reports.”
“We’ll have to wait and see what the future holds.”


"Check out the memo on Facebook!"
"When this video was released, he not only fell out of favor with his fans, but also questioned whether he really had the ability to change after so many shameful behaviors."
"In keeping in touch with the kardashians, Chris said she fully believed in Tristan's apology, but Kim didn't buy it."
"But it has been noted that Kim Jong Il is questioning his sincerity after Tristan has shown remorse."
"King doesn't trust Tristan, although he apologizes. If all Kardashian and Jennings forgive Tristan, maybe the fans will be more willing to give him a second chance."
"The D.C. video is also said to have taken place two weeks after Khloe was pregnant, and the media also reported on it, which makes this behavior particularly unforgivable."
"Another video shows Tristan cheating with two separate women in a hookah lounge in Washington, D.C."
"The first video posted online by the daily mail shows Tristan kissing another woman in a New York bar," Kosmo said
"The video shared by Daily Mail Online and TMZ shows that Tristan appeared on other women many times during his relationship with Khloe," the International Metropolis Daily reported
"We can only wait and see what the future holds."



Number  499
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related:”
“Earlier this month, Miller announced that she was starting her third round of chemotherapy and last week indicated that she may be losing her hair as a result.”
“Over the weekend, the Dance Moms star updated her followers on her recovery process, sharing a photo on Instagram of the scars and stitches from her recent operations.”
“"After the 2nd surgery, My back is finally on the mend," Miller wrote on Instagram.”
“"I just wish the top section & bottom would hurry along too!”
“I had 52 staples perfectly aligned and now a bunch of crazy stitches are holding my neck & lumbar region together!"”
“...the dance instructor captioned the photo.”
“As seen in the picture, Miller has an incision running all the way from her neck to her lower back.”
“And while the majority of the cut has already healed over, stitches from the second surgery, at the top and bottom of her back, are still fully visible.”
“In April, a few weeks after her first surgery, Miller shared a photo of her post-op scar, and those "52 staples perfectly aligned," on Instagram.”


Related:
Earlier this month, Miller announced that she would start a third round of chemotherapy, and last week she said she might lose her hair as a result
"Last weekend, the dance mom star introduced her recovery to her fans and shared photos of her recent surgery scars and stitches on instagram."
"After the second operation, my back finally recovered," Miller wrote on instagram
"I just hope the upper and lower sections can go faster!"
"I have 52 staples in perfect alignment, and now a bunch of crazy stitches connect my neck and waist!"
"The dance teacher added a title to the photo."
As shown in the picture, Miller has an incision that extends from the neck to the lower back
"Although most of the wounds have healed, the stitches of the second operation, at the top and bottom of her back, are still clearly visible."
In April, a few weeks after her first operation, Miller shared on instagram a picture of her scar after the operation, as well as those "52 nails perfectly aligned" photos



Number  500
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I thank them for their patience and grace.””
“It was hard not to be here yesterday.”
““It was hard watching you all yesterday,” Bush Hager said to Today host Hoda Kotb.”
““When I started here, I remember someone saying, ‘NBC, the Today show, is a family.’ And that feels cliché.”
“That feels like something people just say.”
“But that’s true.”
“So, when something rocks your family, it rocks all of us.”"When something rocks your family, it rocks all of us."”
“@JennaBushHager on Matt Lauer's dismissal from NBC News.”
“...pic.twitter.com/joWL9P9ocv — Kathie Lee and Hoda (@klgandhoda) November 30, 2017As previously reported, Lauer’s former cohosts Savannah Guthrie and Kotb broke the news of Lauer’s termination, and allegations made against him by a colleague, during the opening of the Today show on Wednesday, November 29.”
“Since then, Variety and The New York Times have reported multiple other claims against the former NBC anchor.”


"I thank them for their patience and grace."
"It was hard not to be here yesterday."
"It was hard to see all of you yesterday," Bush Hager told host Hoda Kotb today
"When I started working here, I remember someone saying," NBC, today's show, is a family. " It feels old-fashioned. "
"It feels like what people just said."
"But that's true."
"So when your family gets hit, we all get hit." "When your family gets hit, we all get hit."
"@ Jenna bushhager about Matt Lauer's dismissal from NBC news."
“... pic.twitter.com/joWL9P9ocv -Kathie Lee and Hoda (@ klgandhada) November 30, 2017 as previously reported, Raul's former associates Savannah Guthrie and Kotb revealed Raul's dismissal and a colleague's charge against him at the opening ceremony of today show on Wednesday, November 29. "
"Since then, variety and the New York Times have reported a number of other charges against the former NBC anchor."



Number  501
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The singer, 41, and wife Brittany Kerr, 30, planned a sweet party for his two daughters and their 9-month-old son this weekend.”
“The couple, who announced the pregnancy last month, wanted to share the news with the kids in a special way.”
“"Jason and I already know what it is, so this is just for the girls to see their excitement," Brittany said in a post Jason shared on Instagram.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“In the video, fans get to see Jason's two daughters from his first marriage, Keeley, 15, and Kendyl, 10, both make their prediction about the gender.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
The 41 year old singer and his 30-year-old wife Brittany Cole are planning a sweet party for his two daughters and their 9-month-old son this weekend
"The couple who announced their pregnancy last month wanted to share the news with their children in a special way."
"Jason and I already know what this is, so it's just for girls to see their excitement," Brittany said in a post Jason shared on instagram
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
This content was imported from {embedded name}
"In the video, fans can see that Jason's two daughters in her first marriage, 15-year-old Kiley and 10-year-old Kendall, have made gender predictions."



Number  502
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Heaton was flying into the U.S. ahead of Netflix’s premiere party for Stranger Things second season, and the actor was noticeably absent on Thursday as his co-stars Millie Bobby Brown, Winona Ryder, Gaten Matarazzo and Noah Schnapp posed for pictures on the red carpet.”
“Editors at The Sun newspaper claim the actor was caught by sniffer dogs at the airport, and border officials later found traces of white powder on his personal items.”
“It was reported that a random baggage check uncovered trace amounts of the class A drug in his bag.”
“Authorities allegedly found cocaine on the actor, and he was detained but not arrested.”
“Try refreshing your browser, or 'Stranger Things' star Charlie Heaton denied entry to U.S. for cocaine possession: Report Back to videoA law enforcement official confirmed to the website that Heaton was denied entry into the United States and sent back to the United Kingdom the same day.”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
“The 23-year-old British actor, who plays Jonathan Byers on the hit Netflix show, was detained at Los Angeles International Airport on October 21, People.com reports.”
“Article contentStranger Things star Charlie Heaton was denied entry to the U.S. for alleged cocaine possession.”


"Heaton flew to the U.S. before the premiere of Netflix Season 2's strange things, and the actor was apparently absent on Thursday as his partners Millie Bobbie brown, Winona Ryder, gates matalazzo and Noah schnap posed on the red carpet."
The editor of the sun said the actor was captured by sniffer dogs at the airport and border officials later found traces of white powder on his personal belongings
"It is reported that a random luggage inspection found that he had traces of class a drugs in his bag."
Authorities are said to have found cocaine on the actor, who was detained but not arrested
"Try refreshing your browser, or 'stranger' star Charlie Heaton is denied entry to the United States for cocaine possession: report to the video that a law enforcement official confirmed to the website that Heaton was denied entry to the United States and returned to the United Kingdom on the same day."
“… Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"Sorry, this video can't be loaded."
"The 23-year-old British actor, who plays Jonathan Byers on the hit Netflix show, was detained at Los Angeles International Airport on October 21, people's Daily reported
Charlie Heaton in strange things is refused entry to the United States for suspected possession of cocaine



Number  503
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So sad,” Barker wrote.”
“Condolences & prayers to all.”
“I’ll cherish every time we hung out or rocked a stage together.”
““Absolutely heartbroken.”
“On Twitter, Blink-182 drummer Travis Barker paid tribute to Bennington in a pair of tweets.”
“Those two shows appear to remain on schedule but without Linkin Park.”
“Along the way, Linkin Park were set to perform two more dates on their co-headlining tour with Blink-182, the “Welcome to Blinkin Park” tour, on July 28th in Flushing, New York and July 30th in Hershey, Pennsylvania.”
“The North American trek was scheduled to conclude October 22nd with a concert at Los Angeles’ Staples Center.”
“Linkin Park, who recently wrapped a European tour, were scheduled to begin a North American leg in support of their chart-topping new LP One More Light starting June 27th in Mansfield, Massachusetts.”
“Our thoughts go out to all those affected.”The band has not released an official statement following Bennington’s death by suicide Thursday.”


"It's pathetic," buck wrote
"Mourn and pray to all."
"I will cherish every time we go out to play or shake the stage together."
"Very sad."
"On twitter, Blink-182 drummer Travis Barker paid tribute to Bennington on two tweets."
"These two shows seem to go on as planned, but there is no Lincoln Park."
"Along the way, Lincoln Park will perform with Blink-182" welcome to Blinkin Park "tour in flushing, New York on July 28 and Hershey, Pennsylvania on July 30
"The North American trek was originally scheduled to end with a concert at the Staples Center in Los Angeles on October 22."
Lincoln Park, which recently ended its European tour, was originally scheduled to start its North American tour in Mansfield, Massachusetts, on June 27 in support of their record one more light
"Our ideas are communicated to all those affected." The band has yet to make an official statement after Bennington committed suicide on Thursday



Number  504
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her full interview with TODAY airs on Monday and Tuesday.”
“One form, discoid lupus, only affects the skin.”
“The 25-year-old actress and pop star revealed in September that she had undergone a kidney transplant over the summer as a result of her battle with lupus.”
“Gomez said she has no doubt that her kidney donor, actress and close friend Francia Raísa, saved her life.”
““Because she did.”
“That’s it,” she told TODAY’s Savannah Guthrie in an interview clip that aired Friday.”
““I guess I got to the point where it was really kind of life or death.”Gomez revealed she had the transplant in an Instagram post that included a photo of her and Raísa, 29, holding hands and lying in side-by-side hospital beds following their surgeries.”
“There are two types of lupus, a chronic autoimmune disease.”
“Systemic lupus erythematosus, however, harms the skin, joints, kidneys and brain and may be fatal, according to the National Kidney Foundation.”
“She also took time off last year to deal with anxiety, panic attacks and depression prompted by the disease.”


"Her full interview with today will be broadcast on Monday and Tuesday."
Discoid lupus is a disease that affects only the skin
"The 25-year-old actress and pop star revealed in September that she received a kidney transplant in the summer because of her fight against lupus."
"Gomez said she had no doubt that her kidney donor, actress and close friend Francia Reza had saved her life."
"Because she did it."
"That's it," she told Savannah Guthrie today in an interview broadcast on Friday
Gomez revealed on instagram that she had received a transplant, and the photo shows her hand in hand with 29 year old lessa in a hospital bed
There are two types of lupus, a chronic autoimmune disease
However, according to the National Kidney Foundation, systemic lupus erythematosus has damage to the skin, joints, kidneys and brain, and can be fatal
"Last year, she took time off to deal with anxiety, panic and depression caused by her illness."



Number  505
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Change How Your Makeup Wears Courtesy Maybelline for Laquan Smith...”
““It is okay to layer; however light layers are the key.”
“...with sweating it off...”
“So to make this summer easier on you and your makeup routine, we reached out to prominent makeup artists for their best tips, tricks and product recs to keep your makeup looking good all season long.”
“Ahead, check out five summer makeup tips from some of our favorite makeup artists.”
“Change the Way You Use Your Primer“My favorite tip for wearing summer makeup is mixing a primer with your foundation.”
“It thins out your foundation for a more fresh wear,” explains Lilit Caradanian, Makeup Artist & Owner of Elcie Cosmetics.”
““Mix with Elcie Pearl Radiance Primer for the perfect glow from within look.”Opt for Cream Products Over Powder Ones“In the summer, it’s best to practice the “less is more” rule,” says Lancôme Beauty Advisor Jillian Jordan.”
““Lightweight makeup will hold up and work better in the sticky, muggy summer weather.”
“Dewy glowy skin is definitely in!”


"Change your make-up way, Maybelline will provide courtesy for Lacan Smith..."
"Layering is OK, but the light layer is the key."
“… Sweating... "
"So, to make you and your make-up habits easier this summer, we contacted famous make-up artists for their best tips, tips and product suggestions to keep your make-up beautiful throughout the season."
"Next, let's take a look at five summer makeup tips from some of our favorite makeup artists."
"Changing the way you use primers," I love summer makeup. The trick is to mix primers and foundation.
"It can provide you with a fresher dress," explains lilit caradanian, a makeup artist and owner of a cosmetics company
Jillian Jordan, Lancome beauty consultant, said: "mix with elcie pearl radiance primer to get the perfect shine from the inside. In summer, it is better to choose cream products instead of powdered products.
"Light makeup will last longer and work better in hot and humid summer weather."
"The skin with ruddy dew is absolutely there!"



Number  506
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Ben Affleck and I were in the corner literally not talking to anybody and then we were just jumping for joy, so last year was pretty darn good.”To ensure your own viewing party is an absolute hit, check out this list of 11 Super Bowl essentials.”
““It went from the worst Super Bowl party of my life to the best one,” Damon said at Stella Artois’ Super Bowl launch party.”
“But he’s hoping this year’s contest runs a little smoother than last year’s victorious comeback against the Falcons.”
“Courtesy of Stella ArtoisAs for 2018’s big matchup between the Eagles and the Patriots, Damon plans on keeping it low-key by rooting for New England from his living room.”
“Each festive glass features hand-crafted designs created by female artists from Mexico, India, and the Philippines.”
“Beer lovers can also purchase a limited-edition chalice on Amazon for $13, which will help provide five years of clean water to someone in need.”
“And for those watching the game at a bar or restaurant, each pint or bottle purchased will gift one month of clean water.”
“So from January 15 until April 15, every purchase of any Stella Artois 12-pack will help Damon’s nonprofit Water.org provide 12 months of clean water for one person in the developing world.”
“The 30-second ad titled “Taps” highlights the fact that instant access to safe water is often taken for granted by Americans while millions of people in developing countries are forced to walk up to six hours each day to collect the water they need to survive.”
“But on February 4, the 47-year-old actor is downsizing to the boob tube for a Super Bowl campaign in partnership with Stella Artois — and it’s all for a very good cause.”


"Ben Affleck and I didn't talk to anyone in the corner, and then we just jumped up happily, so last year was great." To make sure your own viewing party is absolutely successful, take a look at the 11 Super Bowl essentials listed below. "
"This party has gone from the worst Super Bowl party of my life to the best," Damon said at Stella atois's Super Bowl launch
"But he hopes this year's game will be a little smoother than last year's victory over the falcons."
"Thanks to Stella artoisas for coming to the eagles patriots game in 2018, Damon plans to cheer for New England in the living room and keep a low profile."
Each festival glass has handmade patterns by female artists from Mexico, India and the Philippines
"Beer lovers can also buy a limited edition Holy Grail on Amazon for $13, which will help to provide clean drinking water for people in need for five years."
For those who watch the game in a bar or restaurant, a month's worth of purified water will be given away for each pint or bottle of water purchased
"So every purchase of Stella Artois 12 gift pack from January 15 to April 15 will help Damon's nonprofit, water resources.org, provide a person in developing countries with clean water for 12 months."
"The 30 second ad, titled" faucet, "highlights the fact that Americans generally take immediate access to safe water for granted, while millions of people in developing countries are forced to walk six hours a day to collect the water they need to survive."
"But on February 4, the 47 year old actor is working with Stella Artois to shrink the chest tube for a Super Bowl campaign - all for a very good cause."



Number  507
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Zoë Kravitz On Nicole Kidman Revealing She Was Engaged To Her Dad Lenny: ‘I Think She Forgot That No One Knew That’In June, Kidman and Urban celebrated their 11th wedding anniversary.”
“..” Kidman said, laughing as she added that they did “other stuff” too.”
““He did some fireworks and.”
“...left kissing Alexander Skarsgard at the 2017 Emmy Awards Image zoom Nicole Kidman kissing her husband Keith Urban at the 2017 Emmy Awards Speaking of her husband Norton went on to ask the Australian actress what Urban did for her 50th birthday...”
“I ve got an amazing supportive husband who I love more than anything in the world and I gave Alex a congratulatory kiss and he s like a mannequin I mean not a mannequin Kidman said laughing at herself before declaring I m done Image zoom Credit CBS Nicole Kidman...”
“I also kissed my husband too I did kiss Skarsgard but you gotta understand I did everything with Alex explained Kidman who also won an Emmy that night...”
“You are so provocative Graham Kidman said after the TV host pulled up a picture of the kiss which occurred after Skarsgard learned he d won the Emmy for outstanding supporting actor in a limited series or movie for his work on Big Little Lies before defending herself by saying...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Kidman, 50, stopped by The Graham Norton Show last week and didn’t escape without the TV host bringing up her friendly kiss on the lips with costar Alexander Skarsgard — while her husband Keith Urban stood nearby.”
“...flustered talking about her big Emmy night smooch...”


"Related video: Zo è Kravitz said when Nicole Kidman revealed her engagement to her father Lenny:" I think she forgot that no one knew that. " In June, Kidman and urban celebrated their 11th wedding anniversary. "
"Kidman said with a smile," she added, adding that they also did "other things."
"He set off some fireworks and left."
“… Left kiss Alexander scargaard at the 2017 Emmy photo zooming Nicole Kidman kisses her husband Keith Urban at the 2017 Emmy talking about her husband Norton and then asking Australian actress urban what she did for her 50th birthday... "
"I have a husband who is very supportive of me. I love him more than anything in the world. I gave Alex a congratulatory kiss. He's like a mannequin. I mean, does a mannequin Kidman laugh at himself before declaring me finished?"
"I also kissed my husband, and I also kissed scarsgarde, but you have to understand that Alex and I did everything," Kidman explained, who also won an Emmy that night
"You're too provocative, Graham Kidman said after the TV host pulled up a picture of a kiss, which took place after scarsgarde learned that he won an Emmy Award as an outstanding supporting actor for a small lie in a limited series or movie, and then she defended herself by saying..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Kidman, 50, stopped on Graham Norton last week. No TV host mentioned her friendly kiss with her partner, Alexander Skarsgard, and she didn't escape - while her husband, Keith Urban, was standing nearby."
“… Talking flustered about her kiss on Emmy night... "



Number  508
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: Instagram / @bethennyfrankel...”
“She went on to share that the Puerto Rican government has “no official guidelines on what qualifies as a hurricane-related death.”With the official hurricane-related death toll at 51 in Puerto Rico, more than 900 bodies were cremated before medical examiners got a chance to look at them.”
“A month after the business mogul and Real Housewives of New York City star traveled to Puerto Rico with four planes packed with supplies for Hurricane Maria relief efforts, she's planning a return trip.”
“In fact, Frankel reveals she will spend her 47th birthday on Saturday on her return trip to help with continued hurricane relief.”
“"I'm going this weekend for my birthday to Puerto Rico.”
“I don't usually love my birthday.”
“I think it's an interesting way to give back on your birthday and a good way to reflect on my age and where I am," she told E!”
“News.”
“The Skinnygirl founder said she plans on returning to Puerto Rico "multiple times" and will also pay a visit to the U.S. Virgin Islands.”
“More: Jennifer Lopez Donating $1 million to Puerto Rico Hurricane Recovery Effort"We're sending a lot of relief to the U.S. Virgin Islands, particularly Dominica.”


"Image source: instagram / @ bethennyfrankel..."
She went on to say that the government of Puerto Rico "has no official guidelines on what hurricane related deaths are.". The official death toll from the hurricane in Puerto Rico is 51, with more than 900 bodies cremated for forensic examination
"A month ago, this business tycoon and New York City Star's real housewife took four planes full of Hurricane Maria relief supplies to Puerto Rico, and now she is planning to return."
"In fact, Frankel revealed that she will celebrate her 47th birthday on Saturday and return home to help continue the hurricane rescue."
"I'm going to Puerto Rico for my birthday this weekend."
"I don't usually like my birthday."
"I think it's an interesting way to give back your birthday and a great way to reflect on my age and where I am," she told e! "
"News."
The founder of skinny girl said she plans to return to Puerto Rico "several times" and will also visit the U.S. Virgin Islands
"More: Jennifer Lopez contributed $1 million to hurricane recovery in Puerto Rico." we provided a lot of relief to the U.S. Virgin Islands, especially Dominica. "



Number  509
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch Rippon and Johnson’s full trophy-winning performances below:”
““There were moments where I saw you (Adam) blank out a little bit.” The pair still ended up with a 28 out of 30.”
““I can’t fault you for what you did, but I feel like I was missing something,” said judge Carrie Ann Inaba.”
“Your timing and partner work is flawless.”Their second dance of the night, a gay-as-hell freestyle to DJ Kass’ “Scooby Doo Pa Pa” featuring vogueing, fan-snapping and more, did not impress the judges as much.”
““Technically, it was brilliant.”
““It was so exquisitely theatrical,” judge Bruno Tonioli told the pair.”
“Their first dance, a jazz routine to the Broadway classic “Anything You Can Do” from Annie Get Your Gun, was a stunning routine that brought the audience to their feet and received a perfect score from the judges.”
“The duo earned their trophy that night by excelling in their two performances.”
““Every day, to see him progress, I think he was supposed to be a dancer,” she said.”
“In another clip before their first dance routine of the evening, Johnson went as far as to say that Rippon should consider a career in dance.”


"Watch Lippen and Johnson win all the trophies below:
"Sometimes I see you (Adam) a little confused." The two ended up with 28 out of 30
"I can't blame you for what you've done, but I feel like I've missed something," said judge Carrie Ann inaye
"Your schedule and partner's work are perfect." Their second night's dance, a gay hell freestyle DJ Cass's "Scooby Doo pa" featuring fashion, fans snapping up and more, didn't leave much impression on the judges
"Technically, it's brilliant."
"It's so dramatic," judge Bruno tonioli told them
Their first dance is the jazz dance of Broadway classic "anything you can do", which is adapted from "Annie takes your gun". This is an amazing dance step, which makes the audience stand up and get full marks from the judges
"The two won the trophy with two excellent performances that night."
"Every day, seeing him improve, I think he should be a dancer," she said
"In another clip before their first dance show that night, Johnson even said that Rippon should consider a career in dance."



**Something goes wrong**
“Prior to his relationship with the acclaimed British songstress Robert dated fellow Twilight star Kristen Stewart.”
“Later on in 2015 they were rumoured to have got engaged, though neither has commented publicly on the prospect of them tying the knot.”
“(Image: Splash) (Image: Getty)The couple first sparked romance rumours back in 2014, before they became an official item in September of that year.”
““It’s a difficult situation but things have become tough between them for some time and they both know they were no longer working as a couple.”Mirror Online has contacted representatives of both Robert and Twigs for comment.”
“With so much ­history between them, though, there are still strong feelings there," they explained.”
“(Image: ABC)(Image: Splash)"Rob is tired of it, has called off their engagement and told friends they have split.”
“The source added that it was the London-born actor who had taken the decision to call an end to their reported engagement.”
“"But in recent months they have really started to drift apart and have been spending less and less time together."”
““They were almost inseparable for their first two years together," an insider told the newspaper.”
“(Image: WireImage)According to The Sun , The Lost City of Z star felt that the relationship had become too "tough" after they found themselves drifting apart.”


"Prior to his association with the acclaimed British singer Robert, he dated the twilight heroine Kristen Stewart."
"In late 2015, there were rumors that they were engaged, but neither of them commented publicly on their prospects for marriage."
(photo: splash) (photo: Getty) the couple first sparked romantic rumors as early as 2014, and it became an official project in September that year. "
"It's a difficult situation, but things have become difficult between them for a while, and they all know that they are no longer a couple." Mirror online has contacted representatives of Robert and Tevez for advice
"Despite so much history between them, there are still strong feelings," they explained
(picture: ABC) (picture: splash) "rob got tired of it, cancelled their engagement, and told his friends they broke up."
"The source added that it was the London born actor who decided to terminate their reported engagement."
"But in recent months, they have really started to alienate and spend less and less time together."
"They were almost inseparable for the first two years together," one person familiar with the matter told the paper
(photo: WireImage) the Sun reported that the lost city of Z star felt that their relationship had become too "difficult" after finding itself drifting away



Number  511
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“USA, or subscribe here...”
“To read the complete interview, buy this issue of HOLA!”
“USA magazine, available next February 16.”
“You can find all of this and more in this issue of HOLA!”
“Tommy + Thalia, share their magic formula for true love and we spill all the details and share exclusive images of Ana Boyer and Fernando Verdasco’s romance.”
“The beautiful Candela Ferro tells us: "Being a mother is the best thing that has ever happened to me".”
“...through her Miami...”
“Posing alongside his wife Águeda and their children Rocco and Mikaela Luis shows us what their life is like behind closed doors in addition to learning who has the final say in the household and why Águeda claims to have three children Also in this issue Natalia Jiménez takes us...”
“VIEW GALLERYRELATED: Luis Fonsi's daughter is the most adorable back up dancer"My family is my favorite number one," says a sincere Luis as a family man completely devoted to his role.”
“USA, on newsstands February 16, for an exclusive look into his private life.”


"America, or subscribe here..."
"To read the full interview, buy this issue of hola!"
USA, February 16, next year
"You can find all this and more in this issue of Hora!"
"Tommy + Talia, share their magic formula of true love, we divulge all the details and share exclusive romantic pictures of Anna Boyle and Fernando will Dasco."
The beautiful candela ferreo told us, "being a mother is the best thing in my life."
“… Through her Miami... "
"Taking a picture with his wife, agaeda, and their children, Rocco and Mikaela Lewis, shows us their life behind closed doors. Apart from knowing who has the final say at home and why agaeda claims to have three children, Natalia Jimenez also takes us to this question..."
"Gallery related point of view: Louis fonsey's daughter is the most adorable dancer." my family is my favorite number one, "said a sincere Louis, who is fully committed to his role as a family man
"In the United States, on February 16, at the newsstand, exclusive coverage of his private life."



Number  512
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She wants to pull the race card.”
“And I won’t allow it.”The Don’t Be Tardy star later revealed on RHOA that she received death threats after Leakes’ racist claims.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“I couldn’t even speak, my mind’s a f—— whirlwind!”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“Put yourself in my shoes — five African-American women — just hammered!”
“Because nobody is dumb enough to do that!”
““You know why you have not found another white woman to [join the cast]?”
“NeNe knows I’m not racist,” Zolciak-Biermann told Cohen.”
““That bitch knows I’m not racist.”
“A roach is a roach.”Image zoom Credit: Moses Robinson/BravoThough she appeared to shrug off the negativity during the ferocious fight, rolling her eyes and calming walking off set after it was done, Zolciak-Biermann broke down in tears while talking to Cohen after the show’s wrap.”


"She wants to play the rabbi."
"I won't allow it." The "don't be late" star later revealed on RhoA that she received a death threat after her racist remarks
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"I can't even speak. There's a whirlwind in my head! "Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"Put yourself in my shoes - five African American women - have just been beaten!"
"Because no one is stupid enough to do that!"
"Do you know why you didn't find another white woman to [join the cast]
"Nene knows I'm not a racist," zorchak Bilman told Cohen
"That bitch knows I'm not racist."
"A cockroach is a cockroach." Photo zooming credit: mose Robinson / Bravo although she seems to get rid of her negative emotions in the fierce battle, turning her eyes and calmly leaving the set after the battle, zorchak Bilman burst into tears when talking with Cohen after the show



Number  513
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Hey, there ain't no shame in returning to pastures old, sometimes you don't know what you've got until it's gone.”
“And, remember, she isn’t the only Hadid girl taking a romantic trip down memory lane - her elder sister Gigi has been spotted smooching her One Directioner ex out on the streets of Manhattan of late.”
“In a fan-snapped photograph, uploaded onto Instagram, we can see the pair together, apparently at a screening of Ash Is Purest White on Friday night at the annual film festival.”
“But now, only two months later, she back locking lips with the 28 year-old Canadian.”
“The 21 year-old Victoria’s Secret Angel quickly denied it that it was her in the picture though (it turns out it was Chantel Jeffries).”
“And, it was rumoured that they had, in April of this year at Coachella the Canadian singer was spotted with Bella and it looked like they were maybe kissing.”
“...so it only makes sense for Tesfaye and California-girl Hadid to patch things up, right?”
“By the end of 2017 Gomez was already back with ex Justin Bieber (keeping up?)”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Hey, there's no shame in going back to the ranch. Sometimes you don't know what you have until it disappears."
"And, remember, she's not the only Hadid girl to travel romantically along the path of memory - her sister, Gigi, was recently found on the streets of Manhattan making out with the ex boyfriend of one of her directors."
"In a picture taken by a fan uploaded to instagram, we can see the two together, obviously in the annual film festival on Friday night," ashes are the purest white. "
"But now, just two months later, she's back with the 28 year old Canadian."
"The 21-year-old Victoria's Secret Angel quickly denied that she was in the picture (it turned out to be Chantel Jefferies),"
"Moreover, there is a rumor that in April this year, in cochella, someone found the Canadian singer with Bella. They seem to be kissing."
“… So it makes sense for tesfield and California girl Hadid to fix things up, right? "
"By the end of 2017, Gomez has returned to the former Justin Bieber."



Number  514
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact the Samaritans For emotional support you can call the Samaritans 24-hour helpline on 116 123, email jo@samaritans.org, visit a Samaritans branch in person or go to the Samaritans website.”
“I felt like a little kid.”
“The Mummy actor previously claimed that the former president of the Hollywood Foreign Press Association Phillip Berk touched him inappropriately during an HFPA lunch at the Beverly Hills Hotel in 2003.”
“The 49-year-old has now said that he feels ‘optimistic’ about the change that is happening throughout Hollywood in regards to sexual harassment.”
“‘t just spoke my truth,’ he told E!”
“News.”
“A lot can happen and it s important to unburden yourself with the things you just don t need anymore Brendan added that he is also hopeful Picture REX He added I can go forward now and I feel good that I was inspired by others with courage and I”
“...was able to speak what I needed to say and it s a new time...”
“It’s a new era and I think some change that’s good is going to come about.”
“I’m optimistic.”


"To contact Samaritans for emotional support, you can call Samaritans 24-hour hotline 116 123, email jo@samaritans.org , visit the Samaritan chapter in person or visit the Samaritan website. "
"I feel like a child."
"The mummy actor had previously claimed that Philip Burke, former chairman of the Hollywood Foreign Journalists Association, improperly touched him at a HFPA lunch at Beverly Hills Hotel in 2003."
"The 49 year old now says he's' optimistic 'about what's going on across Hollywood in terms of sexual harassment."
"I didn't just tell the truth," he told e! "
"News."
"A lot of things can happen, and it's important to lighten your burden with what you no longer need." Brendan added that he was also hopeful of Rex. He added that I can move on now, I'm very happy, I'm inspired by others, I'm brave and I'm confident. "
“… It's a new era to be able to say what I want to say... "
"This is a new era, and I think some beneficial changes will emerge."
"I'm optimistic."



Number  515
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Black Panther will hit theaters Feb. 16.”
“For a full breakdown of the secret footage, check out EW’s recap here.”
“Serkis received a standing ovation when they premiered new footage from the upcoming superhero flick...”
“Nyong o stars in Black Panther as Nakia a covert agent from the fictional nation of Wakanda and she and her costars including Chadwick Boseman Danai Gurira Daniel Kaluuya Forest Whitaker Letitia Wright Michael B Jordan Winston Duke and Andy...”
“(Nyong’o voices the elderly alien in The Force Awakens.)”
“Nyong’o later shared a joyful video of her undercover antics on Twitter, set to Kendrick Lamar’s “i,” showing the actress dancing across the hall floor, posing with fellow cosplayers, and tracking down a Maz Kanata figurine.”
“...took to the convention floor...”
“The actress stopped by this year s Comic Con to tease the upcoming Black Panther movie and debut some top secret new footage but apparently when she wasn t on stage in Hall H she donned some pink spandex and...”
“If so, you probably saw Oscar-winner Lupita Nyong’o.”
“Black Panther type Movie genre SuperheroDid you spot a very excited pink Power Ranger dancing her way through San Diego Comic-Con this weekend?”


"Panther will be on February 16."
"For full details of the secret video, see EW's summary here."
"Serkis won a standing ovation at the premiere of the upcoming superhero movie..."
"Nyong o plays Nakia, a secret agent from the fictional vakanda state, and her partners include Chadwick boseman, Danai guira, Daniel Kaluuya Forest Whitaker, Letitia Wright, Michael B, Jordan Winston Duke and Andy..."
(nyong'o's voice the old alien in the force wakes up.)
"Nyong'o later shared a happy video of her undercover antics on twitter, with Kendrick Lamar's" me "in the background, showing the actress dancing on the hall floor, posing with other cosplayers and tracking a statue of maz Kanata."
“… Go to the meeting place... "
"The actress came to this year's comics conference to make fun of the upcoming panther movie and premiered some top secret new scenes, but apparently, when she was not on the stage in hall h, she wore some pink spandex and..."
"If that's the case, you might see Oscar winner Lupita nyong'o."
"Panther type movie type superhero have you seen a very excited pink electric Ranger dancing through the San Diego comics conference this weekend?"



Number  516
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“POPULAR VIDEO:”
“He chuckled as the man flubbed Haddish’s name.”
“The “Jimmy Kimmel Live!” host also asked one of the shocked guests to announce the next two presenters: Tiffany Haddish and Maya Rudolph.”
“He also joked that the theater smelled like marijuana.”
““We were talking about our appreciation for people who go to the movies, and those are you people, so thank you,” Kimmel said.”
“Denzel Washington even officiated a wedding during the skit.”
“The skit was similar to the memorable Oscar moment last year when Kimmel ushered a group of tourists into the Dolby Theatre to take selfies with nominees such as Ryan Gosling, Emma Stone, and Viola Davis.”
““This is so much better than the Oscars!” Gadot exclaimed.”
““We brought you some goodies,” Gadot told the crowd as Kimmel announced to the theater that they were on live television at the Oscars.”
“Hammer...”


Popular video:
"He giggled, and the man confused the name of hadish."
Jimmy Kimmel live! "The host also asked a shocked guest to announce the next two hosts: Tiffany hadish and Maya Rudolph."
"He also joked that the theater smelled like marijuana."
"We're talking about how grateful we are to the people who go to the movies, who are you, so thank you," Kimmel said
"Denzel Washington even hosted a wedding in a sketch."
"This sketch is similar to the unforgettable moment of last year's Oscar. Kimmel leads a group of tourists into the Dolby theater to take selfies with nominees such as Ryan Gosling, Emma stone and Viola Davis."
"It's better than Oscar! "Cried gadote
"We've brought you some good things," gadote told the audience, as Kimmel announced to the theater that they were broadcasting live at the Oscars
"Hammer..."



Number  517
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Then, the Avengers assemble again for the still-untitled fourth film, set for May 3, 2019.”
“Marvel’s Avengers: Infinity War is opening in theaters on April 27.”
“Christopher Markus & Stephen McFeely wrote the screenplay.”
“Louis D’Esposito, Victoria Alonso, Michael Grillo and Stan Lee are the executive producers.”
“RELATED: All of the Easter Eggs in the Avengers MoviesAnthony and Joe Russo directed the film, which is produced by Kevin Feige.”
“Holland Paul Rudd and Josh Brolin...”
“Confirmed cast members for Avengers Infinity War include Robert Downey Jr Chris Evans Mark Ruffalo Scarlett Johansson Chris Hemsworth Tom Hiddleston Anthony Mackie Paul Bettany Elizabeth Olson Jeremy Renner Chadwick Boseman Sebastian Stan Don Cheadle Chris Pratt Dave Bautista Zoe Saldana Pom Klementieff Benedict Cumberbatch Benedict Wong Sean Gunn Tom...”
“Everything the Avengers have fought for has led up to this moment – the fate of Earth and existence itself has never been more uncertain.”
“A despot of intergalactic infamy, his goal is to collect all six Infinity Stones, artifacts of unimaginable power, and use them to inflict his twisted will on all of reality.”
“As the Avengers and their allies have continued to protect the world from threats too large for any one hero to handle, a new danger has emerged from the cosmic shadows: Thanos.”


"Then the Avengers get together again, ready to make a fourth film on May 3, 2019."
"Miracle Avenger: Infinite War" will be released in cinemas on April 27
"Christopher Marcus and Stephen mcphery wrote the script."
"Luis desposito, Victoria Alonso, Michael Grillo and Stan Lee are executive producers."
"Related report: all the Easter eggs in the Avengers Movie, Anthony and Joe Russo directed this movie made by Kevin Figg."
"Dutch Paul Rudd and Josh Brolin..."
The actors in the endless war of the Avengers include Robert Downey, Chris Evans, mark rufaro, Scarlett Johnson, Chris Hemsworth, Tom sidleston, Anthony McKee, Paul Betty, Elizabeth Olsen, Jeremy Reiner, Chadwick, bossebastian, Stan, don chedel and Chris ·Pratt, Dave Bautista, Zoe Saldana, punk Clementine, Benedict, Cumberbatch, Benedict, Benedict, Benedict, Benedict, Benedict Tom... "
"All the Avengers fight for has led to this moment - the fate of the earth and of existence itself has never been so uncertain."
"He is a notorious tyrant in the interstellar world. His goal is to collect all six infinite stones, a work of art with unimaginable power, and use them to impose his twisted will on all realities."
"As the Avengers and their allies continue to protect the world from great threats that no hero can deal with, a new danger emerges from the shadow of the universe: tanos."



Number  518
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Too late.”
“Veronica also sees Archie as a ray of light and tells her father she wants him to be kept far away from the business.”
“This explains why the St. Clairs sent a gift even after everything that happened between the two families.”
“As Hermione points out, gifts are a way to try and get back into the family’s good graces.”
“Speaking of Veronica, she is being showered with gifts.”
“Too bad Archie is much more concerned with making sure that Veronica has a good Confirmation rather than taking down the mob.”
“So, Special Agent Adams sees Veronica’s Confirmation as the perfect place to use Archie to take down not only Hiram, but his entire crime family.”
“Anyway, the event means the entire Lodge family is coming to Riverdale, and this includes Hiram’s crime family, Yes, Hiram is now a mobster, just go with it.”
“(Of course, the real reason for the delay is plot).”
“Even though it is an event that usually happens when a person is 12 or 13, the Lodges waited because of the availability of the family priest.”


"It's too late."
"Veronica also sees Archie as a light and tells her father that she wants him to stay away from the company."
"That explains why even after what happened between the two families, the St. and Mrs. Clares gave a gift."
"As Hermione points out, gifts are a way to try to regain the favor of the family."
"Speaking of Veronica, she received a lot of gifts."
"Unfortunately, Archie is more concerned with making sure Veronica has a good confirmation than with beating down the thugs."
"So special agent Adams thinks Veronica's confirmation is the best place to use Archie to kill not only Harlem, but also his entire criminal family."
"Anyway, this event means that the whole Lodge family will come to Riverdale, including the criminal family of Hiram. Yes, Hiram is a Mafia now. Let it go."
"(the real reason for the delay, of course, is conspiracy."
"Although this is an event that usually happens when a person is 12 or 13 years old, the hotel will wait because of the presence of the family pastor."



Number  519
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It doesn't seem like Cardi B's reign over the music industry will end anytime soon, and the video for "Be Careful" is just the latest way her star power continues to flourish.”
“According to Spin, Jora Frantzis, a photographer and director, brought the themes from the song into the music video.”
“In the past, fans have speculated that the song is about her current partner.”
“In April, Cardi B performed "Be Careful" on Saturday Night Live and revealed during the performance that she was expecting her first child with fiancé Offset.”
“It borrows the desert church location, but the design of the music video is distinct to Cardi B's style and aesthetic.”
“The film is all about revenge, so it's a fitting reference for a song and video about a wronged lover.”
“As Spin notes, for this song, Frantzis seems to have taken a page from Quentin Tarantino's Kill Bill, which also features a similar wedding scene.”
“Frantzis has collaborated with Cardi B in the past, and is also behind the album art for her debut, Invasion of Privacy.”
“"I want you to live your life of course, but I hope you get what you dyin' for."”
“In an interview with Ebro Darden for Beats 1, she addressed the Offset rumors head on.”


"It seems that Katie B's reign in the music world will not end soon. The video of" be careful "is just the latest way for her star power to continue to develop."
According to spin, photographer and director Jora frantzis integrated the theme of the song into the music video
"In the past, fans speculated that the song was about her current partner."
"In April, Katie B performed" be careful "live on Saturday night and revealed that she was pregnant with her first child with her fiancee
"It borrows the location of the desert church, but the design of the music video is very different from the style and aesthetics of Katie B."
"The film is all about revenge, so it's a good reference for a song and video about a wronged lover."
"As a narrator, Franz seems to turn a page from Quentin Tarantino's Kill Bill, which has a similar wedding scene."
"Franz worked with Katie B in the past and was behind her debut album invasion of privacy."
"Of course I want you to live your life, but I want you to get what you want."
"In an interview with ebroden for beats 1, she spoke directly about offsetting rumors."



Number  520
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:'Bachelor Winter Games' Sneak Peek: Ben Higgins Breaks Down in Tears Over Lauren Bushnell Breakup (Exclusive)'Bachelor Winter Games': Ben Higgins' Meltdown Sets Off a String of Tearful GoodbyesEXCLUSIVE: Lauren Bushnell Opens Up About Feeling 'Alone' After Ben Higgins Split, Why She's 'Very Happy' Now...”
“"There's moments in this experience that really transcend even reality.”
“The Bachelor couple went their separate ways last May after a year and a half together, and by December, Higgins thought he was up to find love again on The Bachelor Winter Games.”
“But as Tuesday's episode of The Bachelor spinoff showed, the 29-year-old reality star wasn't ready for romance.”
“'Bachelor Winter Games' Sneak Peek: Ben Higgins in Tears Over Ex Lauren B (Exclusive) This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Embed Code Restart Bachelor Winter Games Sneak Peek Ben Higgins in Tears Over Ex Lauren B Exclusive To try to engage in relationships here and know that the last time I did this it was one of the best moments of my life my fear is not entering into a...”
“...relationship...”
“My fear is not pursuing somebody.”
“My fear is that if I were to be broken again, I'm not full enough right now to recover from that," Higgins cried in a heart-to-heart with Chris Harrison before packing his bags and heading home.”


"Related content: Bachelor Winter Games" peep: Ben Higgins tears over Lauren Bushnell's breakup (exclusive) "Bachelor Winter Games": the collapse of Ben Higgins triggered a series of tearful farewell interviews: Lauren Bushnell opened her heart after Ben Higgins broke up and said she felt 'lonely', why she is' very happy '... "
"In this kind of experience, some moments are even beyond the reality."
"After a year and a half together, the bachelor couple split up in May last year. In December, Higgins thought he was going to find love again at the bachelor Winter Games."
"But as the second episode of" Bachelor "showed on Tuesday, the 29 year old reality star is not ready to fall in love."
"Bachelor Winter Olympics peep: Ben Higgins tears for former Lauren B (exclusive) this video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The bachelor Winter Games secretly peeked at Ben Higgins's tears in the former Lauren B exclusive attempt to engage in the relationship here, knowing that I did it for the last time, this is one of the best moments in my life, and my fear is not to enter one..."
“… Relationship... "
"I'm not afraid to pursue someone."
"My worry is that if I get hurt again, I'm not full enough to recover from it," Higgins called out to Chris Harrison before packing up and going home



Number  521
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He didn't want to lose things that meant something to him."”
“"I think it made him relax.”
“The 52-year-old model said on Wednesday's episode of Watch What Happens Live that she connected with Jackson over the 19-year-old model's late dad, Michael Jackson, at New York Fashion Week this month.”
“Advertisement"I recently met Paris at the Calvin Klein show," Shields told host Andy Cohen.”
“"She turned to me and she said, 'So, you're my dad's friend.'”
“I'd only seen her when she was a baby and she didn't remember me.”
“I said, 'Yes, I am.'"”
“"Then I waited a while and I looked at her and said, 'I really miss your dad.'”
“She looked at me and she held mine and goes, 'Me too,'" she said.”
“"It was just a pure moment."”


"He didn't want to lose what meant to him."
"I think it made him relaxed."
"The 52 year old model said on Wednesday's" see what's going on "that she contacted Jackson at this month's New York Fashion week about the late father of the 19-year-old model, Michael Jackson
"Ad" shields told host Andy Cohen: "I recently met Paris on Calvin Klein's show."
"She turned to me and said," well, you're my father's friend. "
"I only saw her when she was a child. She doesn't remember me."
"I said," yes, I am. "
"Then I waited for a moment, looked at her and said," I really miss your dad. "
"She looked at me, hugged me and said, 'me too,'" she said
"It was just a moment."



Number  522
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While we strive to provide a wide range offers, Bankrate does not include information about every financial or credit product or service.”
“Other factors, such as our own proprietary website rules and whether a product is offered in your area or at your self-selected credit score range can also impact how and where products appear on this site.”
“Therefore, this compensation may impact how, where and in what order products appear within listing categories.”
“We are compensated in exchange for placement of sponsored products and, services, or by you clicking on certain links posted on our site.”
“Bankrate.com is an independent, advertising-supported publisher and comparison service.”
“We’re transparent about how we are able to bring quality content, competitive rates, and useful tools to you by explaining how we make money.”
“The content created by our editorial staff is objective, factual, and not influenced by our advertisers.”
“Our award-winning editors and reporters create honest and accurate content to help you make the right financial decisions.”
“Bankrate follows a strict editorial policy, so you can trust that our content is honest and accurate.”
“We continually strive to provide consumers with the expert advice and tools needed to succeed throughout life’s financial journey.”


"While we strive to offer a wide range of benefits, bankrate does not include information about every financial or credit product or service."
"Other factors, such as our own proprietary website rules and whether the product is provided in your region or within the credit rating range of your choice, will also affect how and where the product is displayed on this website."
Therefore, such compensation may affect the way, place and order in which products appear in the listing category
"We are compensated in exchange for placing sponsored products and services, or by you clicking on certain links posted on our website."
“ Bankrate.com Is an independent, advertising supported publisher and comparison service. "
"By explaining how we make money, we are transparent about how to provide you with high quality content, competitive prices and useful tools."
"The content created by our editors is objective and authentic, and is not influenced by advertisers."
"Our award-winning editors and journalists create honest and accurate content to help you make the right financial decisions."
"Bankrate follows a strict editorial policy, so you can trust that our content is honest and accurate."
"We constantly strive to provide consumers with the professional advice and tools they need to succeed throughout their life."



Number  523
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Before Rihanna, he was linked to British supermodel Naomi Campbell, while she dated Chris Brown, Leonardo DiCaprio and Drake.”
“As she was photographed smiling and posing on Monday at an event for the electric car maker Rivian - in which Jameel is an investor - observant commentators pointed out her former love in the background of the snaps.”
“And it seems the pop star picked the Italian eatery as the perfect spot to catch up with her billionaire Saudi Arabian ex-boyfriend Hassan Jameel on Tuesday night.”
“A source told DailyMail.com that the two arrived 'surrounded by bodyguards and entered the restaurant's private room through the back door, before spending three hours at dinner.'”
“Back on?”
“Rihanna enjoys a quiet dinner with billionaire ex boyfriend Hassan Jameel not pictured at her favorite Italian spot in Santa Monica on Tuesday night Undercover date night A source told DailyMail com that the two arrived surrounded by bodyguards and entered the restaurant s private room through the back door...”
“Pictures showed Rihanna dressed in a black coat and gold necklace her hair worn loose over her shoulders as she arrived...”
“Not pictured was Hassan, 30.”
“However he was seen by eagle-eyed fans at an event Rihanna attended the previous day.”
“As she was photographed smiling and posing at an event on Monday for the electric car maker Rivian in which Jameel is an investor observant commentators pointed out her former love in the background of the snaps he is seen third from left Keeping watch Rihanna poses with Rivian CEO”


"Prior to Rihanna, he was associated with British supermodel Naomi Campbell and she dated Chris Brown, Leonardo DiCaprio and Drake."
"On Monday, when she was photographed smiling and posing at an event of electric car manufacturer rivian (Jamil was one of the investors), observant commentators pointed out her old love in the background of the photo."
"It seems that the pop star has chosen an Italian restaurant as the best place to catch up with billionaire Saudi ex boyfriend Hassan Jamil on Tuesday night."
A source told the daily mail that the two arrived "surrounded by bodyguards, entered the private room of the restaurant through the back door, and then spent three hours having dinner."
"Go back?"
"Rihanna and her ex boyfriend, Hassan Jameel, enjoyed a quiet dinner at her favorite Italian spot in Santa Monica on a secret date night on Tuesday night. A source told dailymail com that the two arrived surrounded by bodyguards and entered the restaurant's private room through the back door..."
"The photo shows that Rihanna is wearing a black coat and a gold necklace, and her hair is scattered on her shoulders when she arrives..."
"There's no picture of Hassan, 30."
"However, in an activity Rihanna participated in the day before yesterday, he was seen by the sharp eyed fans."
"On Monday, when she was photographed smiling and posing at an event of electric car manufacturer rivian, yamir was one of the investors. Careful commentators pointed out that in the background of the photo, her former love affair, he was considered third from the left, closely following the group photo of Rihanna and rivian CEO."



Number  524
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Soldier of The Great War Known Unto God Their see becomes part of continuous celebrations prepared to mark the centenary of the Battle of Passchendaele...”
“The couple consulted with Commonwealth War Graves Commission interns who usually share stories of the buried servicemen with visitors During their journey the Duchess of Cambridge took a minute to lay a posey at the Grave of the Unknown Soldier while Prince William recited the engraving on the tomb A”
“Middleton invested the day with her hubby, Prince William, at Tyne Cot cemetery, where more than 5,000 World War I servicemen are buried.”
“Her ruffled fascinator likewise made its launching on Monday and style blog sites think the style is by Jane Taylor.”
“The Melrose coat retails for approximately $8,571.”
“A day later on, the mom of 2 is back in the shape, rocking a brand-new coat gown by Catherine Walker with a print decorating the hem.”
“Ever the stylish attire recycler, the royal marched on Sunday in Belgium sporting the Alexander McQueen coat gown she initially used at child Princess Charlotte’s christening in 2015.”
“It appears Duchess of Cambridge Kate Middleton is adhering to that mantra considering she’s been on a coat gown kick for the previous 2 days.”
“If it ain’t broke, do not fix it!”


"The soldiers of the great war known to God, their testimony became part of the ongoing celebration of the centenary of the battle of paschendale..."
"The couple consulted interns from the Commonwealth war graves Committee, who usually share stories of buried soldiers with visitors on their journey. The Duchess of Cambridge spent a minute burying a statue in front of the tomb of the unknown soldier, while Prince William recited the carving."
On the same day, Middleton and her husband, Prince William, were married at tyncourt cemetery, where more than 5000 World War I soldiers were buried
"Her irritating charm was also released on Monday, and fashion bloggers think it's Jane Taylor's style."
"Melrose coats retail for about $8571."
"A day later, the mother of two was back in health, wearing a brand new Catherine Walker coat and dress with a print on the hem."
"As a fashionable clothing recycler, the Royal member paraded in Belgium on Sunday, wearing Alexander McQueen's coat dress, which she originally used at the baptism of Princess Charlotte in 2015."
"It seems that Kate Middleton, the Duchess of Cambridge, has adhered to this belief because she has been wearing a jacket for the last two days."
"If it's not broken, don't fix it!"



Number  525
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...diet The 2018 Victoria s Secret Fashion show will air Dec 2 at 10 p m on ABC”
“...victoriassecret fittings today i can t wait for you to see all of the beautiful outfits i m so grateful to be a part of the show again feeling happier and healthier than ever all body types are different and react differently to a great workout routine and a healthy...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““You have to have such a great mental state when you’re going into this,” Hadid tells us.”
““I’ve been really sick for the past few years, and it was really hard for me to fully experience the whole show and have fun with it and be excited.”
“This year I really just feel like I am myself again and happy and healthy in all aspects of my life.”She adds, “I am just really happy.”
“Your mental state is honestly the biggest part about the whole process and the body kind of comes with being excited to work out Image zoom To prepare the model says she s been working out a ton and maintains a healthy diet but doesn t stop herself from enjoying...”
“...the foods she loves...”
“Looking for more style content?”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more“I’m not keeping myself from anything.”


“… The 2018 Victoria s Secret Fashion Show will be broadcast on ABC at 10 pm on December 2
“… Today, I can't wait for you to see all the beautiful clothes. I'm very grateful to be in the show again. I feel happier and healthier than ever. All the bodies are different. It's a great exercise program and a healthy life
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When you enter the world, you have to have a very good mental state," Hadid told us
"I'm really sick these years. It's really hard for me to fully experience the whole play and get fun and excitement from it."
"This year, I really feel like I'm back to myself, happy and healthy in all aspects of my life." She added, "I'm really happy."
"To be honest, your mental state is the most important part of the whole process, and this state of the body is accompanied by exciting work. Image zooming is to prepare for the model's saying that she has been exercising and eating healthily, but it doesn't stop her enjoying..."
“… The food she likes... "
"Looking for more style content?"
Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle press release for amazing discounts, beauty products and more "I won't keep myself away from anything"



**Something goes wrong**
“But, yeah, we want more babies, of course.””
“Love you all sooo much!!”
“The actress and singer, 26, is expecting her second child and first with husband Jamie Watson, she confirmed Sunday on Instagram.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Looks like we are starting off 2018 with another big milestone…sooo happy to announce that Maddie is FINALLY going to be a big sister,” wrote Spears alongside a family photo.”
“2017 was filled with some of the biggest challenges of my life as well as some of the biggest blessings so I made a choice to lay low this year to focus on truly becoming my best self as a person and as an artist She continued During that time...”
“I continued working on my music and telling my story which has created some of my most honest work and I CAN T wait to share that with you all very soon...”
“2018 is going to be filled with many milestones both personally and professionally.”“I appreciate each of you for your patience and support through I[it] all.”
“2018 has a lot coming, so GET READY…….. #12DaysofJLS.”The post was the final addition to her #12DaysofJLS social media countdown, during which the star shared 12 milestones from her life leading up to Christmas.”
“Spears’ bundle of joy on the way joins the star’s daughter Maddie Briann, her 9½-year-old daughter with ex-fiancé Casey Aldridge.”


"But, yes, we certainly want more children."
"I love you so much!"
The 26 year old actress and singer confirmed on instagram on Sunday that she is pregnant with her second child, the first of which is her husband Jamie Watson
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It seems that we have another milestone in 2018 So I'm glad to announce that Marty is finally going to be a big sister. "
"2017 is full of some of the biggest challenges in my life and some of the biggest blessings, so this year I choose to keep a low profile and focus on becoming the best myself. As an artist, she has been going on all this time..."
"I continue to create my music and tell my stories, which has created my most honest works. I can't wait to share with you soon..."
"2018 will be full of many personal and professional milestones." "I thank each and every one of you for your patience and support."
"There's a lot to do in 2018, so be prepared.. #This article is the last addition to her 12 day countdown to social media, during which the star shared her 12 milestones from life to Christmas
"Spears's happy journey joins the star's daughter, Maddie briann, who is nine and a half years old, with her former fiance, Casey Aldridge."



Number  527
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s almost perfect.”The MTV personality also shares 10-year-old daughter Leah with her ex-fiancé, Gary Shirley.”
“He just wants to make sure I’m loved.”
““He was afraid of postpartum depression, so he’s always checking up on me.”
““He is such an amazing man and loves taking care of James,” Portwood told Us.”
“Portwood, who has also struggled with borderline personality disorder, bipolar disorder and drug addiction, gushed about her man’s parenting skills to Us Weekly in June.”
“Nine months later, they welcomed son James.”
“The reality star and the cameraman, 34, made their red carpet debut at the MTV Video Music Awards in August 2017.”
““One year from yesterday I met this amazing man and it is truly a dream!” she wrote on Instagram at the time.”
“...met while Portwood was filming Marriage Boot Camp with ex boyfriend Matt Baier celebrated their first anniversary in August...”
“Yes I have heard about the fires in Malibu and Calabasas and my my hubby is freaking out because his mom s house is in Malibu and he has a lot of family that lives in that area he s freaking out because he s not there The couple who...”


"It's perfect." The MTV celebrity also shared her 10-year-old daughter, Leah, with her former fiance, Gary Shirley
"He just wanted to make sure I was loved."
"He's afraid of postpartum depression, so he always comes to check on me."
"He's such a great man and loves to take care of James," Portwood told us
"Portwood, who has also struggled with borderline personality disorder, bipolar disorder and drug addiction, told us weekly in June about her husband's parenting skills."
Nine months later, they had their son James
"The 34 year old reality TV star and photographer made his debut on the red carpet at the MTV Music Video Awards in August 2017."
"In the year since yesterday, I met this amazing person. It's really a dream! "She wrote on instagram at the time."
“… At Portwood, I met my ex boyfriend, Matt Bayer, when they celebrated their first wedding anniversary in August. "
"Yes, I heard about the fire in Malibu and Calabasas. My husband was scared because his mother's house was in Malibu. He had a lot of family living there. He was scared because he wasn't there. The couple..."



Number  528
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A Disney-Fox deal is estimated at more than $60 billion; Iger’s last major acquisition — the $4 billion purchase of Lucasfilm in 2012 — pales in comparison.”
“For some actors and directors, the move to create a unified cinematic universe in which every Marvel superhero can play in is a step in the right direction.”
“Bob Iger, Disney’s chief executive, told investors in a recent call that Disney, including subsidiaries like Lucasfilm and Marvel Studios, would never make a hard R-movie.”
“Both Deadpool and Logan benefited from the creative freedom to explore adult topics and use vulgar language, which many Marvel movies by definition can not.”
“There will be no action figures.”20th Century Fox found a lucrative business model in R-rated movies.”
““The real thing that happens when you make a movie rated R, behind the scenes, is that the studio has to adjust to the reality that there will be no Happy Meals.”
““If they’re actually changing their mandate, if what they’re supposed to do alters, that would be sad to me because it just means less movies,” Mangold told Deadline.”
“For others, including Logan director James Mangold, there is some concern about what this could mean for their future.”
“The company won’t have to rely on licensing to feature Wolverine in an Avengers movie.”
“Acquiring 21st Century Fox would give Iger the opportunity to release more mature movies under a different umbrella.”


"Disney's deal with fox is estimated to be more than $60 billion; Iger's last major acquisition, which was $4 billion for Lucas pictures in 2012, pales in comparison."
"For some actors and directors, it's a step in the right direction to create a unified film world in which every miracle superhero can participate."
"Disney CEO Bob Iger told investors in a recent conference call that Disney, including subsidiaries such as Lucasfilm and marvel studios, will never make hard r movies."
"Both Deadpool and Logan benefit from the freedom to explore adult topics and use vulgar language, which many Marvel movies by definition can't do."
In the 20th century, fox found a profitable business model in R-rated films
"When you make an R-rated movie behind the scenes, what really happens is that the studio has to adapt to the reality that there won't be a happy meal."
"If they did change their mission, if they should change, I would be very sad, because it only means fewer movies," Mangold told deadline
"For others, including Logan director James Mangold, they worry about what it means for their future."
"The company will not have to rely on a license to play Wolverine in the avenger movie."
"The acquisition of 21st century fox will give Iger the opportunity to release more mature films under different umbrellas."



Number  529
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Anything he needs me to do, I'll do it.”
“I'm not only there to be a pretty face -- I'm actually contributing to the tour, handling the merch, etc.”
“We can be around each other non-stop and not be at each other’s throats like, 'Oh my gosh, I gotta get away from you.'”
“He makes me laugh, which is really important.”
“We're also both adventurous, outdoorsy.”
“Family is really important to him and it's really important to me as well.”
“"I love the way he treats his family, he takes care of his mother, he takes care of his father.”
“"I'm always proud of him," she continued.”
“I ended up just giving in one day, and honestly, we've been inseparable ever since."”
“"He kept pressing our mutual friend like, 'Just tell her to come chill with me at the studio, I just want to meet her.'”


"I'll do whatever he wants me to do."
"I'm not just there to have a beautiful face - I'm actually contributing to the tour, dealing with merchandise and so on."
"We can be together all the time, not like, 'oh my God, I have to leave you.'"
"He makes me laugh, which is really important."
"We all like adventure and outdoor activities."
"Family is really important to him and to me."
"I like the way he treats his family, he takes care of his mother, he takes care of his father."
"I'm always proud of him," she continued
"One day I gave in. To be honest, we've been together ever since."
"He kept urging our mutual friend to say," tell her to go to the studio with me. Calm down. I just want to see her. "



Number  530
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“The majority of the accusations allege Franco pressured women into appearing nude on film sets.”
““The Deuce” creator and writer David Simon is assuring fans that James Franco was “entirely professional” on the set of the HBO porn drama following sexual harassment allegations made against the actor.”
“Franco stars in the show but also directed several episodes and serves as one of its producers.”
““I’m still reading it the same as everyone else, trying to discern what is or isn’t there,” Simon told Variety in a statement.”
““Personally I can only speak knowledgeably to ‘The Deuce.’ I’ve checked with all my fellow producers and other personnel.”
“We have no complainant or complaint or any awareness of any incident of concern involving Mr. Franco.”
“Nor has HBO been approached with any complaint.”
“Simon concluded: “In our experience, he was entirely professional as an actor, director, and producer.”The Los Angeles Times published a report on January 11 in which five women went on record accusing Franco of sexually inappropriate and exploitative behavior.”
“Four of the accusers are Franco’s former acting students.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Most of the charges allege that Franco forced women to appear naked on the set."
David Simon, the creator of go to hell, assured fans that James Franco was "completely professional" on the HBO scene after he was accused of sexual harassment
"Franco played in the play, but also directed several episodes and was one of the producers."
Simon told variety in a statement: "I'm still reading the book like everyone else, trying to tell what's real and what's not."
"As far as I'm concerned, I can only say something insightful about go to hell. I've checked with all the producers and other people
"We have no complainants or complaints, and we are not aware of any concerns about Mr. Franco."
"HBO has not received any complaints either."
Simon concluded: "based on our experience, he is completely a professional actor, director and producer. The Los Angeles Times published a report on January 11, in which five women publicly accused Franco of sexual misconduct and exploitation
"The four plaintiffs were Franco's former Acting students."



Number  531
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian, welcomed a baby girl named Chicago via a surrogatein January and her sister Khloe Kardashian is due to give birth in two months.”
“He was arrested after his concert and police claimed he "encouraged people to rush the stage" but his lawyer said video footage did not support the allegations so other charges of inciting a riot and endangering the welfare of a minor were dismissed.”
“On the same day her name was disclosed, it was revealed Stormi's father, rapper Travis Scott - real name Jacques Webster - had pleaded guilty to disorderly conduct for an incident last year at a concert in Arkansas.”
“Image: Pic: Kylie Jenner/YoutubeDuring her pregnancy there were several rumours which she chose not to address, only posting pictures on social media where her stomach could not be seen.”
“Jenner also shared an 11-minute video giving fans a peek into the last nine months, from the time she found out she was expecting until the baby's birth.”
“She said pregnancy had been the most "beautiful, empowering and life changing experience" of her life and she is "actually going to miss it".”
“Image: Pic: Kylie Jenner/YoutubeThe star has been in the spotlight since she was nine years old as part of the Jenner-Kardashian family on reality TV show Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”
“"I knew my baby would feel every stress and every emotion so I chose to do it this way for my little life and our happiness."”
“She said: "There was no gotcha moment, no big paid reveal I had planned.”
“Jenner apologised to fans for "keeping you in the dark" and said she kept the pregnancy private because she needed to "prepare for this role of a lifetime in the most positive, stress free, and healthy way I knew how".”


Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian, is expecting a baby girl named Chicago through a surrogate in January. Her sister, helo Kardashian, will give birth in two months
He was arrested after the concert, and police claimed that he "encouraged people to rush onto the stage," but his lawyer said the video did not support the charges, so other charges of inciting riots and endangering the welfare of minors were dismissed
On the same day that her name was revealed, Tommy's father, rapper Travis Scott (real name Jacques Webster), pleaded guilty to disorderly conduct at a concert in Arkansas last year
"Picture: picture: during Kelly Jenner / utu's pregnancy, there were several rumors that she chose not to publish, just posted some pictures of her belly on social media that she couldn't see."
"Jenna also shared an 11 minute video to give fans a glimpse of the past nine months, from her discovery of pregnancy to the birth of her baby."
She said pregnancy was the most "beautiful, powerful and life changing experience" of her life, and she "will actually miss it."
"Photo source: Kylie Jenner / youtube, a star who has been a member of the Jenner Kardashian family on the reality TV show" keep up with Kardashian "since she was nine years old, has been receiving much attention."
"I know my baby will feel every kind of pressure and emotion, so I choose to do it for my little life and our happiness."
"I didn't seize the moment, I didn't plan to expose," she said
Jenna apologized to fans for "keeping you in the dark" and said she kept pregnancy secret because she needed to "prepare for the role of her life in the most positive, stress free and healthy way I know."



Number  532
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Serena Williams U S Olympic Women s Ice Hockey Team...”
“Four Battle for Stardom OTHER Choice Comedian ChoiceComedian Ellen DeGeneres James Corden Jimmy Fallon Kevin Hart Lilly Singh The Dolan Twins Choice Male Athlete ChoiceMaleAthlete Adam Rippon J J Watt LeBron James Red Gerard Shaun White Stephen Curry Choice Female Athlete ChoiceFemaleAthlete Chloe Kim Lindsey Vonn Mikaela Shiffrin Mirai Nagasu...”
“Cardi B) – “Finesse (Remix)”Taylor Swift (feat.”
“Florida Georgia Line) – “Meant to Be”Bruno Mars (feat.”
“The Man – “Feel It Still”Why Don’t We – “Trust Fund Baby”Choice Collaboration (#ChoiceCollaboration)Bebe Rexha (feat.”
“At the Disco – “Say Amen (Saturday Night)”Portugal.”
“Zacari) – “Love.”Choice Song: Group (#ChoiceSongGroup)5 Seconds of Summer – “Youngblood”Imagine Dragons – “Whatever It Takes”Maroon 5 – “Wait”Panic!”
“Chris Stapleton) – “Say Something”Kendrick Lamar (feat.”
“Young Thug) – “Havana”Demi Lovato – “Sorry Not Sorry”Dua Lipa – “New Rules”Halsey – “Bad at Love”Taylor Swift – “Look What You Made Me Do”Choice Song: Male Artist (#ChoiceSongMaleArtist)Charlie Puth – “Attention”Childish Gambino – “This Is America”Drake – “God’s Plan”Ed Sheeran – “Perfect”Justin Timberlake (feat.”
“The Mantwenty one pilotsX AmbassadorsChoice Song: Female Artist (#ChoiceSongFemaleArtist)Ariana Grande – “No Tears Left To Cry”Camila Cabello (feat.”


"Serena Williams, American Olympic women's hockey team..."
The battle of four stars another best comedian best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete long beard... "
"Caddy B" - fine (mix) "Taylor Swift (feat)
"Florida Georgia line" - means "Bruno Mars" (feat)
"Men –" feel good "why don't we –" trust baby "choose to cooperate with Bebe Rexha (feat)"
"At the disco --" said amen (Saturday night) "Portugal."
Zakari - selected songs of love: Suite 5 seconds in summer - young man - imagine the Dragon - at all costs maroon 5 - waiting panic
"Chris Stapleton" - "say something" Kendrick Lamar (feat)
"Young thug" - "Havana" Demi Lovato - "I'm sorry, I'm not sorry" dualipa - "new rules" Halsey - "not good at love" Taylor Swift - "see what you make me do" selected songs: Male Artist Charlie putt - "attention" boyish Gambino - "this is America" Drake - "God's plan" ed Sheeran - "perfect" Justin· Timberlake (feat)
"No tears to cry" Camila Cabello (feat)



Number  533
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, this is one of the first times the effort has been coordinated among many attendees.”
“One of the most memorable instances occurred when Sacheen Littlefeather rejected Marlon Brando’s Academy Award for best actor in 1973 with a speech advocating for Native American rights.”
“According to a press release, the women were inspired by the Time’s Up movement, an initiative launched by hundreds of Hollywood women to advocate better workplace conditions and the end of sexual harassment.”
“Emma Stone will be accompanied by Billie Jean King the pro tennis player and activist that Stone portrays in Battle of the Sexes In addition to founding the Women s Sports Foundation and the Women s Tennis Association King has received the Presidential Medal of Freedom and is the founder...”
“...of the Billie Jean King Leadership Initiative...”
“Susan Sarandon will bring Rosa Clemente, an organizer, political commentator and independent journalist who campaigns for media justice, voter engagement among youth of color, third party politics, United States political prisoners and the right of Puerto Rico to become an independent nation.”
“Ai-jen Poo, the director of the National Domestic Workers Alliance and co-director of the Caring Across Generations Campaign, will attend with Meryl Streep.”
“Poo is listed as one of Fortune’s 50 World’s Greatest Leaders and is a 2014 MacArthur fellow.”
“Michelle Williams’ guest will be Tarana Burke, the founder of the #metoo movement and senior director at Girls for Gender Equity.”
“Burke is a gender and racial justice advocate who was based in Selma, Ala. for over a decade, leading to a consulting position on Ava DuVernay’s Oscar-nominated “Selma.”Mónica Ramírez, the co-founder of Alianza Nacional de Campesinas, will accompany Laura Dern.”


"However, this is the first time many participants have coordinated this work."
"The most memorable example is that in 1973, sacheen littlefeather rejected Marlon Brando's Oscar for best actor in a speech advocating Native American rights."
"According to a press release, these women are inspired by the progressive movement of the times, an initiative launched by hundreds of Hollywood women to promote better working conditions and an end to sexual harassment."
"Emma stone will be accompanied by Billie Jean King, who is a professional tennis player and activist created by stone in the battle of the sexes. In addition, she has set up the women's sports foundation, and the women's Tennis Association King won the general Medal of freedom and is the founder..."
“…… Billie Jean King led the initiative... "
"Susan Sarandon will bring Rosa clement, an organizer, political commentator and independent journalist, to promote media justice, the participation of young voters of color, third-party politics, American political prisoners and Puerto Rico's right to become an independent state."
"Pu AI Ren, director of the National Union of domestic workers and co director of the inter generational care movement, will be present with Meryl Streep."
"Pu is listed as one of fortune's 50 Greatest Leaders in the world and a research fellow of MacArthur in 2014."
Michelle Williams' guest will be Tarana Burke, founder of the Mayo movement and senior director of gender equality girls
Burke is an advocate of gender and racial justice. He has worked in Selma, Alabama for more than ten years and served as a consultant in EVA duelney's Oscar nominated film Selma. M ó Nica ram í rez, co-founder of Alianza Nacional de campesinas, will accompany Laura Dean



Number  534
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But it’s wonderful to see people pick up a diamond ring that’s made from recycled gold and go, ‘Oh wow, this doesn’t feel any less luxurious than any other diamond ring that I would pick up.’ ””
““We live such crazy nomadic lifestyles all over the place, on planes, and [we’ve had] to uproot and move.”
“...bustle but for Nikki Reed this year will be all about taking it slow...”
“Over the last few months, the actress has been occupied with preparing to open her first brick-and-mortar storefront for her sustainable lifestyle brand Bayou with Love.”
“All of her efforts came to fruition on Friday when the holiday pop up, created in collaboration with Earth + Element owner Elizabeth Di Prinzio, opened to the public in Los Angeles’ Silver Lake neighborhood.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We poured our hearts and souls into this store so it’s really nice to see everybody enjoying and appreciating and touching everything,” Reed, 30, tells PEOPLE.”
“The brick and mortar model is really sweet and I think part of what Liz and I are trying to do with our pop up is give different communities that same opportunity to come in and see things in person On top of the store opening Reed is busy as...”
“...a mom to her 16 month old daughter Bodhi Soleil whom she shares with her husband and former Vampire Diaries actor Ian Somerhalder...”
“At one point during her conversation with PEOPLE she jokingly admits I have a 1 year old putting together a sentence is challenging The former Twilight actress is notoriously private when it comes to sharing anything about her daughter in the public eye she has only ever shown her baby...”


"But it's great to see people pick up a diamond ring made of recycled gold and say," Oh, wow, it's no worse than any other diamond ring I'm going to pick up. "
"We're living a crazy nomadic life everywhere, and on the plane, we have to uproot and move."
“…… Busy, but for Nicky Reid, this year is going to be slow... "
"Over the past few months, the actress has been busy preparing to open her first physical store for her sustainable lifestyle brand, bayou with love."
"All of her efforts came to fruition on Friday, with the holiday pop-up window created by Elizabeth di prinzio, owner of earth + elements, open to the public in the Silver Lake community of Los Angeles."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We put our hearts and souls into this store, so it's great to see everyone enjoying, appreciating and touching everything," reed, 30, told people
"The physical store model is really good. I think part of what Liz and I want to do with our pop-up window is to give different communities the same opportunity to see things for themselves when reed, the store owner, is very busy."
“… A mother gives her 16 month old daughter, bhutti Soleil, to share with her husband and former vampire diarist Ian somerhold... "
"When talking to people, she once jokingly admitted that I had a 1-year-old child. She pieced together a sentence to challenge the privacy of the former Twilight star. When it comes to sharing anything about her daughter in public, she only showed her child..."



Number  535
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It was literally, like, ‘OK, life starts.’””
““Meeting her and getting married wasn’t life-changing, it was life-beginning,” he told CBS News.”
“We just make the rhythm work so we can be together.” boundariesBack in 2016, Keith gushed about the life he’s built with his adorable family.”
“And I’ll go to and from there.”
““We have a tutor that travels with us, so if Nic’s shooting a film for any long period of time, even if I’m touring, we can almost always relocate to wherever she is.”
“In fact, he even creates his schedule based around where she’s filming.”
“She had the bruises to prove it.”Getty ImagesDespite the agony he felt watching his wife, he’s very supportive of her craft.”
““I love how committed she is, though, in telling her stories.”
““It’s hard because she really tells her story,” Keith admitted to The London Evening Standard.”
“In a new interview, Keith admitted that he’s so head-over-heels for his wife that watching her character, Celeste Wright, be abused on the hit show Big Little Lies was difficult.”


"It's like, 'well, life begins.'"
"Meeting her and getting married is not a change in life, it's the beginning of life," he told CBS News
"We just let the rhythm work so we can be together." In 2016, Keith talked about the life he built with his lovely family
"I'll walk back and forth there."
"We have a mentor with us, so if Nick is going to make a movie for a long time, even if I'm on tour, we can move almost anywhere she's been."
"In fact, he even made a schedule based on where she filmed."
"The bruises on her prove it." "Despite the pain of looking at his wife, he was very supportive of her craft," Getty said
"But I love her determination to tell stories."
"It's hard because she really told her story," Keith admitted to the London Evening News
"In a new interview, Keith admits that he's so obsessed with his wife that it's hard to see her character Celeste Wright abused in the hit TV series little lies."



Number  536
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The comedian filed for divorce from Rounds in February 2015, and after Rounds filed for sole custody of Dakota in April, the exes became embroiled in a custody battle before reaching a settlement in October.”
“My thoughts and prayers go out to Michelle’s family, her wife and their child.”O’Donnell and Rounds wed quietly in June of 2012 at their home in Nyack, New York.”
““Mental illness is a very serious issue affecting many families.”
““I am saddened to hear about this terrible tragedy,” O’Donnell, 55, who shared 4-year-old daughter Dakota with Rounds, told PEOPLE in a statement.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Rosie O’Donnell’s Ex-Wife Michelle Rounds Dies at 46 of Apparent SuicideHer body was found the morning of Sept. 11.”
“The doctors who prescribed Rounds the medications will also be contacted to provide investigators with more information.”
“Suicide has not been ruled out as a cause of death, but additional toxicology tests are needed.”
“After completing an autopsy, the office didn’t find any external signs of trauma and is currently running tests to see whether Rounds had any drugs in her system at the time of her death.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Rounds, 46, was found at her home in bed with prescription pill bottles nearby, according to a statement obtained by The Blast from the District Nine Medical Examiner’s Office in Florida.”


"The comedian filed for divorce with rounds in February 2015. After rounds filed for separate custody in Dakota in April this year, the two ex girlfriends were involved in the custody dispute and reached a settlement in October."
"I send my thoughts and prayers to Michelle's family, wife and children." In June 2012, O'Donnell and roans quietly married at their home in nyak, New York
"Mental illness is a very serious problem affecting many families."
"I'm sorry to hear about this terrible tragedy," O'Donnell, 55, told people in a statement, sharing her 4-year-old daughter Dakota with Rawls
"Related video: Rossi O'Donnell's ex-wife, Michelle roans, was found on the morning of September 11 at the age of 46."
"We will also contact the prescribing doctor to provide more information to investigators."
"Suicide has not been excluded from the cause of death, but additional toxicological tests are needed."
"After the autopsy, no external signs of trauma were found in the office and tests are being carried out to determine if there were any drugs in her body at the time of death."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
According to a statement obtained from the office of the District 9 coroner in Florida, the 46 year old rounds was found on his home bed with a prescription bottle nearby



Number  537
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The couple will wed in less than a month, on June 23, according to a BBC report.”
“Per BBC: "A 23 June date has been posted at the Huntly registration office in Aberdeenshire.”
“The actress's father, councillor Seb Leslie, owns a castle in his West Garioch constituency."”
“Harington and Leslie, who first met in 2012 on the set of hit HBO drama, announced their engagement last fall with an official announcement in the newspaper, which was absolutely adorable and old-fashioned.”
“Getty Images"MR. K.C.”
“HARINGTON AND MISS R.E.”
“LESLIE.”
“The engagement is announced between Kit, younger son of David and Deborah Harington of Worcestershire, and Rose, middle daughters of Sebastian and Candy Leslie of Aberdeenshire," the announcement read.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"According to the BBC, the couple will get married on June 23 in less than a month."
"The Huntley registry in Aberdeen announced the date of June 23," the BBC reported
"The actress's father, Senator SEB Leslie, owns a castle in his constituency in segario."
"Harrington and Leslie met for the first time on HBO's hit TV series in 2012, and they officially announced their engagement in the newspaper last fall. It's absolutely lovely and old-fashioned."
Mr. K.C. "Getty Images"
"Harrington and miss R.E."
"Leslie."
"David's youngest son kit and Deborah Harrington of Worcestershire, and Ross, the middle daughter of Sebastian and Katie Leslie of Aberdeen, have announced their engagement," the announcement read



Number  538
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I feel like change is always scary, but that’s only because transition for anyone is new, and you wonder how things are going to go.”Watts and Schreiber first met in 2005 on set of their film The Painted Veil.”
““I feel, whether you’re famous or not, transitions are scary for anybody.”
“Those are my hopes for me and for all of us,” Watts told Australia’s Daily Telegraph in November.”
““I feel I’m in a good place in my life and I want to make sure my kids are healthy, my kids are happy and things are going to go well.”
“The pair are parents of sons Alexander “Sasha,” 8, and Samuel, 7.”
“So, that’s pretty much all I’ll say.”Us Weekly confirmed in September 2016 that Watts and the Ray Donovan actor, 49, split after 11 years together.”
“He’s fantastic dad, a wonderful, wonderful man, and we still want the absolute best for each other.”
“Liev and I are on great terms and we’re trying to do our absolute best for the sake of the children, and we hope to keep moving forward in that way.”
““There are good days and bad days.”
“I’m coparenting,” Watts, 48, said.”


"I think change is always terrible, but that's just because anyone's change is new and you want to know how things will go." Watts and Schreber met for the first time in the 2005 film veil
"I think, whether you are famous or not, transformation is terrible for anyone."
"This is the hope for me and for all of us," Watts said in an interview with the Australian Daily Telegraph in November
"I feel like I'm in a good place in my life. I want to make sure that the children are healthy, happy and everything goes well."
The couple are the parents of their sons, Alexander Sasha, 8, and Samuel, 7
"So that's what I'm going to say." In September 2016, US weekly confirmed that watts and actor ray Donovan, 49, broke up after 11 years together
"He's a great dad, a great, great man, and we still want to be the best of each other."
"Lev and I have a good relationship, we are trying to do our best for the children and we hope to move on in this way."
"There are good days and bad days."
"I'm a co parent," said watts, 48



Number  539
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Aaron Couch contributed to this report.)”
“Dec. 4, 7:10 p.m. Singer's statements added.”
“The pic has been shooting in London.”
“In announcing the shutdown last week, producers Fox, New Regency and Graham King initially said filming was being suspended because of Singer's "unexpected unavailability."”
“Denying he acted unprofessionally, Singer claimed the studio refused to allow him to tend to "a gravely ill parent" as well as to his own health.”
“I wanted nothing more than to be able to finish this project and help honor the legacy of Freddie Mercury and Queen he said in a statement but Fox would not permit me to do so because I needed to temporarily put my health and the health of my loved...”
“...ones first Trouble began when Singer went missing during production on several occasions...”
“His no-shows resulted in cinematographer Newton Thomas Sigel having to step in to helm some of the days while Singer was absent.”
“Tom Hollander, who plays Queen manager Jim Beach, also is said to have briefly quit the film because of Singer's behavior, but was persuaded to return, according to one source.”
“Malek complained to the studio, charging Singer with not being present on set, unreliability and unprofessionalism.”


"(Alan Koch contributed to this report.)
"At 7:10 p.m. on December 4, Singh's statement added
"This picture has been taken in London."
At the time of the announcement last week, producers fox, the new regent and Graham King initially said they were suspending filming because of the singer's "unexpected unavailability."
Singh denied that his behavior was unprofessional, claiming that the studio refused to let him take care of "seriously ill parents" and his own health
"I just hope to be able to complete this project and help commemorate the legacy of Freddie Mercury and the queen, but fox won't allow me to do so because I need to put my health and the health of the people I love first for a while," he said in a statement
“… The first trouble started when the singer disappeared in several performances... "
"Because he didn't perform, photographer Newton Thomas Segal had to take the helm in the absence of the singer for a few days."
"According to a source, Jim beach, the Queen's manager played by Tom Hollander, is also said to have quit the film for a short time due to the singer's behavior, but was dissuaded."
Marek complained to the studio, accusing the singer of being absent, unreliable and unprofessional



Number  540
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Prince Charles wore a wedding band stacked behind his pinkie signet ring when he married Princess Diana Getty Images And nowadays he wears a similar one as a symbol of his marriage to Camilla Getty Images Meanwhile Prince William s brother Prince Harry has been wearing a wedding ring since...”
“Look, here it is stacked next to her massive engagement bling:Getty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Prince William, on the other hand, wears approximately NOTHING on his finger.”
“Here he is meeting Paddington Bear, where you can see pretty clearly that he's not wearing a wedding band.”
“And yes, maybe I took this as an opportunity to post a photo of Paddington Bear.”
“No regrets.”
“Getty ImagesSo, now that we've established that William doesn't wear a ring, a couple of questions remain....1.”
“Did Kate Give Wills a Ring on Their Wedding Day?”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"When Prince Charles and Princess Diana got married, they wore a wedding ring folded behind a small fingerprint ring. Now he is wearing a similar ring as a symbol of his marriage to Camilla Getty. Meanwhile, Prince William's younger brother, Prince Harry, is also wearing a wedding ring.... "
"Look, this is where she's engaged bling:Getty Images This content was imported from {embed name}. "
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
Prince William, on the other hand, wore almost nothing on his fingers
"He's here to meet the Paddington Bear, and you can see clearly that he's not wearing a wedding ring."
"Yes, maybe I took this opportunity to post a picture of the Paddington Bear."
"No regrets."
"Getty Images so, now that we've made sure William didn't wear the ring, there are still a few questions to ask .1。”
"Did Kate give will a ring on their wedding day?"



Number  541
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And while Grant has sworn off marriage in the past, nailing parenthood is a different story.”
“...daughter Tabitha Xaio Xi 6 his children with ex Tinglan Hong...”
“I already had a grandchild since earlier and it s such fun to have another one Image zoom Hugh Grant and Anna Eberstein FROM PEOPLETV Former Bachelorette Ali Fedotowsky Manno Opens Up About Her Biggest Parenting Mishap The Paddington 2 star is also dad to son Felix Chang 5 and...”
“Image zoom Credit: Kevork Djansezian/NBC/NBCU Photo Bank/GettySaid Susanne of John in an email to the Aftonbladet in January 2014, “It is a wonderful little cute grandchild boy I have got.”
“The duo welcomed their daughter in December 2015, while son John was born in 2012.”
“Image zoom Credit: 247PAPS.TV/Splash NewsAnna Eberstein and Hugh GrantRELATED VIDEO: Here’s Why You Might Catch Hugh Grant Dancing at a StarbucksGrant and Eberstein, 39, attended Sunday’s Golden Globe Awards together.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“She’s due rather soon,” Eberstein’s mother Susanne reportedly told Swedish magazine Aftonbladet.”
““I’m very happy to be getting another grandchild.”


"Grant used to swear that he would never marry again, but parenting is another matter."
“… His daughter, Tabitha xaio Xi 6, his children and former Tinglan Hong... "
"I've long had a grandson who can have another picture of Hugh Grant and Anna of Ali fedotowsky mano, a former bachelor from peopletv Eberstein's group photo is really interesting. She tells about her biggest parenting disaster, Paddington No. 2 star and the father of her son Felix Zhang No. 5, and... "
"Image scaling credit: kevork djansezian / NBC / nbcu Photo Gallery / gettysaid Susan of John said in an email to Aftonbladet in January 2014," this is a lovely little grandson I got. "
"They met their daughter in December 2015, and their son John was born in 2012."
"Image scaling credit: 247 PAPS.TV/ Splash newsanna eberstein and Hugh Grant relatedvideo: that's why you might see Hugh Grant dancing at Starbucks, with 39 year old eberstein at the Golden Globes on Sunday. "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"She's going to be born soon," Susan, eberstein's mother, was reported to have told Swedish Afton Brad magazine
"I'm happy to have another grandson."



Number  542
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may stream the whole episode on Netflix here or the shorter version on YouTube here.”
“Can you believe?!”
“...bring some of the *most* delight to Netflix viewers — because come on, what’s better than makeovers and baking??”
“There’s nothing more heartwarming than watching the Fab Five transform people’s lives for the better, and there’s also nothing funnier than witnessing frustrated bakers’ desperate attempt to recreate complicated cakes and pastries.”
“Perhaps the only thing that would make both shows better is if they joined forces — and because Netflix is Netflix, the streaming site offered us the crossover episode we never even knew we needed.”
“Yep, a Queer Eye and Nailed It!”
“...crossover episode exists, released with the second season of the latter, and I don’t know about you, but it’s the most ambitious crossover event in HISTORY.”
“(No offense, Infinity War.)”
“In the episode, our BFFs Antoni Porowski, Jonathan Van Ness, Tan France, Bobby Berk, and Karamo Brown visit the Nailed It!”
“...crossover event is the best 12 minutes you’ll watch today.”


"You can play the whole episode on Netflix here, or you can play a shorter version on YouTube here."
"Can you believe it?"
“…… Bring some of the happiest things to Netflix audiences - because come on, what's better than make-up and baking? "
"Nothing is more relaxing than watching Fab five transform people's lives better, and nothing is more fun than witnessing frustrated bakers desperately trying to recreate complex cakes and pastries."
"Maybe the only way to make these two TV series better is for them to work together - and because Netflix is Netflix, streaming websites provide us with an interlude that we don't even know we need."
"Yes, a strange eye nailed it to death!"
“… Cross events exist, with the latter's second season release, I don't know about you, but this is the most ambitious cross event in history. "
(no offense, unlimited war)
"In this episode, our friends Anthony polovsky, Jonathan Vannes, Tan France, Bob Burke and karamo Brown visit nail house
“… The cross is the best 12 minutes you've seen today



Number  543
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pretty Little Liars...”
“It7.”
“Twitter released its year-end data, and the HBO drama once again topped the list of most-tweeted television shows.”
“Netflix was a big winner, too, with its supernatural drama "Stranger Things" landing at No.”
“2 overall and other originals like "13 Reasons Why," "Orange Is the New Black," and "House of Cards" dominating the streaming-only list.”
“In the movie category, the superhero blockbuster "Wonder Woman" lassoed the honors.”
“"La La Land" took second place, possibly after the mix-up that briefly awarded it the Oscar for Best Film (which was actually won by "Moonlight").”
“Here's the full list of most-tweeted movies and TV shows:Movies:1.”
“Wonder Woman2.”
“La La Land3.”


"Beautiful little liar..."
"Seven."
"Twitter released the year-end data, and HBO TV series once again topped the list of the most TV programs on twitter."
"Netflix is also a big winner, with its supernatural drama strange things at number one."
"Two whole and other original works, such as" 13 reasons why "," orange is the new black, "and" house of cards "dominate the only list of streaming media."
In the film category, the superhero blockbuster "Wonder Woman" won the honor
Laladi came in second, probably after a brief period of chaos, and it won an Oscar for best picture (actually by moonlight)
"Here's a complete list of the most popular movies and TV shows on Twitter: Movies: 1."
"Amazing woman 2"
"Laran three."



Number  544
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(The 10,000-square-foot home was listed for $3 million and featured 1.5 acres of extravagance, including a saltwater pool, a putting green, an outdoor kitchen and cabana, and a tennis and basketball court.)”
“The singer snapped up the 3,188-square-foot home last May after selling her Fort Worth, Texas, mansion in February of the same year.”
“She currently resides in a $2.5 million ranch house in Studio City, California, that features three bedrooms and two and a half bathrooms in the main house, with an additional bedroom and bathroom in a separate space that could be converted into a studio or guesthouse.”
“❤️”Gomez was born and raised in Grand Prairie, Texas, but made the move to Los Angeles when she was in her early teens after she landed the lead role of Alex Russo on Disney Channel’s Wizards of Waverly Place.”
“Thank you.”
“I love you Grand Prairie.”
“Even when I don’t know how to do it well or actually want it.”
“In many ways it very well could have been better than my life today, but I’m grateful for a voice that can enable change today.”
““I visit this place every chance I get.”
““The home I grew up in, from birth to 13... (no one was home when I knocked this time lol),” she captioned the photo of herself perched on the front stoop.”


(the 10000 square foot home, priced at $3 million and covering 1.5 acres, includes a salt water pool, a green, an outdoor kitchen and cabin, as well as a tennis court and basketball court.)
"Last May, the singer sold her mansion in Fort Worth, Texas, and bought the 3188 square foot house."
"She currently lives in a $2.5 million ranch villa in Studio City, California. The main house has three bedrooms and two and a half bathrooms. The other bedroom and bathroom are in a separate space that can be transformed into a studio or hotel."
“ ❤️ "Gomez was born and raised on the prairie in Texas, but as a teenager, she moved to Los Angeles after winning the lead role of Alex Russo in the Disney Channel's the wizard of Waverley square."
"Thank you."
"I love you prairie."
"Even when I don't know how to do it well or really want to."
"In many ways, it could have been better than my life today, but I'm grateful for a voice that can make a difference today."
"I'll go to this place whenever I get a chance."
"My family since I was a child, from birth to 13 years old... (no one was at home when I knocked on the door, ha ha), "she posted a picture of herself on the front porch."



Number  545
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here are the actors who have the most Emmy awards:”
“The total Emmy wins listed aren't exclusively for performances: some on this list have won for writing, directing, or producing — Bryan Cranston was a producer on "Breaking Bad," Julia Louis-Dreyfus is an executive producer for "Veep" — but the majority of the Emmys are for acting.”
“But she will likely win and break another record next year.”
“"Veep" didn't air its final season this TV season, so she's not up for another Emmy on Monday night.”
“Louis-Dreyfus is in a tie with Cloris Leachman for eight Emmy wins as a performer, and she already has the record for most overall when including her awards as a producer.”
“We collected a list of the actors with the most Emmys, from Mary Tyler Moore to Bryan Cranston to Julia Louis-Dreyfus.”
“And when there's a show or a performance Emmy voters love, it often gets multiple nominations and wins.”
“Winning an Emmy is the biggest award an actor can win for their work on the small screen.”
“The Emmys are pretty much the Oscars for television.”


"Here are the actors who won the most Emmy Awards:
"The total number of Emmy Awards is not just for acting: some of the people on the list are for writing, directing, or producing - Brian Cranston is the producer of going bad, Julia Louis Dreyfus is the executive producer of veep - but most of the Emmy winners are for acting."
"But next year she is likely to win and break another record."
Veep doesn't air the last season of the season, so she didn't take part in another Emmy on Monday night
"Louis Dreyfus and Chris Lichtman have been mediocre in eight Emmy Awards, and her record as a producer is already the most comprehensive."
"We've collected a list of the most Emmy winning actors, from Mary Taylor Moore to Brian Cranston to Julia Lewis Dreyfus."
"When there are Emmy voters' favorite programs or performances, they often get multiple nominations and win."
"Winning an Emmy is the biggest award an actor can get on a small screen."
"The Emmy is a television Oscar."



Number  546
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And in 2004, Timberlake took the stage with Janet Jackson to perform “Rock Your Body,” which ended in the infamous wardrobe malfunction dubbed “nipplegate.””
“He and former boy band ‘NSYNC joined a star-studded lineup (including Aerosmith, Britney Spears, Mary J. Blige and Nelly) in 2001.”
“JLo and A-Rod!”
“Gwen and Blake!”
“Celebs Cheer on the Patriots and Eagles at the Super BowlSome of the biggest names in Hollywood supported some of the biggest names in sports at Sunday’s Super Bowl LII.”
“As the New England Patriots got ready to square off against the Philadelphia Eagles at the U.S. Bank Stadium in Minneapolis, Minnesota, famous faces were spotted in the crowd.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Among the stars seen so far?”
“Philadelphia native and Eagles superfan Bradley Cooper, who was seen heading into the stadium ahead of the big game.”
“The 43-year-old star famously brought his Eagles fandom to his character in the 2012 film Silver Linings Playbook, and narrated a series of pre-Super Bowl videos for the team in green earlier this week.”


In 2004, Timberlake and Janet Jackson performed "rock your body" together, which eventually led to the infamous clothing failure, known as "nipplegate"
In 2001, he joined a star line-up with the former boy band "nsync" (including IO Smith, Britney Spears, Mary J. blaig and Nelly)
"JLO and A-Rod!"
"Gwen and black!"
"The stars cheered for the Patriots and eagles at super bowling, and some of Hollywood's big stars supported some of the big sports stars at the Super Bowl LII on Sunday."
"A famous face appeared in the crowd as the New England Patriots prepared to face the Philadelphia Eagles at Bank of America stadium in Minneapolis, Minnesota
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Among the stars seen so far?"
"Bradley Cooper, a Philadelphia native and hawks fan, was seen rushing into the stadium before the big game."
"The 43 year old star brought hawk fever to his character in the 2012 film" a glimmer of hope "and earlier this week told the team a series of pre Super Bowl videos in green



Number  547
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She confessed that she is blessed to have the support of her family in everything that she is doing.”
“AdvertisementAfter she became a mother, this is the most important thing in her life now as she often says that she enjoys being a mom and spending time at home with her family.”
“Just in time for Father’s Day, she released a brand new line of ‘Daddy’s Girl’ Kimoji merch, and it is entirely dedicated to fathers, zaddys, and daughters everywhere.”
“Her new line features everything from iPhone cases to t-shirts and a key chain complete with a photo of Little Keeks.”
“It also includes a gold Daddy Money Fidget Spinner.”
“DADDY'S GIRL DROP NOW AVAILABLE AT KIMOJI.COM ?”
“A post shared by KIMOJI (@kimoji) on Jun 16, 2017 at 12:09pm PDTMeanwhile, the new line comes just a few days after Kim talked about the strategy used for her apps, lines, and technology when she admitted that she is very hands-on in everything she puts out.”
“Just recently, she sat down with Steve Forbes and the Forbes Women Summit, and she revealed the fact that she is a hundred percent involved and this is very prideful to her.”
“Being a business owner is incredibly important for the star.”
“During the discussion which was titled Evolving the Empire: Kim Kardashian West on Reigning Supreme, she expressed the high importance of social media for her brand.”


"She said frankly that everything she did was supported by her family and she was very lucky."
"When she becomes a mother, it's the most important thing in her life now, because she often says that she likes to be a mother and stay at home with her family."
"Just in time for father's day, she released a new kimoji merch series of" father's daughter ", which is dedicated to fathers, zaddys and daughters all over the world."
"Her new product includes everything from an iPhone case to a T-shirt, as well as a keychain with a picture of little Kekes on it."
"It also includes a golden dad's money fidgeting spinning machine."
"Dad's daughter can be here now KIMOJI.COM Website? "
"Kimoji (@ kimoji) shared a post at pdtmeanwhile at 12:09 p.m. on June 16, 2017. Just a few days ago, Kim talked about her application, product line and technology strategy, and she admitted that she was very hands-on in everything. "
"Just recently, she sat down with Steve Forbes and the Forbes women's summit, and she revealed that she was 100% involved, which made her very proud."
"Being a business owner is very important for a star."
"In a discussion entitled evolution of Empires: Kim Kardashian West on supremacy, she expressed the high importance of social media to her brand."



Number  548
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I thought the only way for me to really sustain any kind of relationship was to give her the kind of credibility she deserves, which is little to nothing,” she bluntly said about Glanville.”
““I don’t have any understanding of her motives in any situation ever.”
“It was nasty and it was mean-spirited.”Specifically, Vanderpump had her falling out with Glanville, who helped turn the rest of the cast against the Vanderpump Rules star.”
“Speaking with PEOPLE in February 2015, Vanderpump said she “had a horrible season last year,” and added, “They threw everything at me last year, the other women.”
“...of RHOBH”
“...joked that she can rescue some dogs but I can t rescue all my friends WATCH Brandi Glanville Slaps Lisa Vanderpump On RHOBH During Glanville s time on the Bravo reality series audiences witnessed the highs and lows of her relationship with Vanderpump who she famously slapped during an episode...”
“Why is she the exception In Vanderpump s eyes Glanville takes it to a whole other level and I don t even want to kind of dignify that with an answer Though Vanderpump actively helps dogs she and her husband Ken Todd have opened their own rescue dog center she...”
“Okay, moving on.”Vanderpump added, “You know the answer to that question.”“Like you just said: there are certain people you butt heads with, there’s certain people you can have conflict with,” E!’s Catt Sadler said to Vanderpump.”
“Asked by E!’s Daily Pop “if there is any chance that you and Brandi would ever repair your guys’ relationship?” Vanderpump threw some shade at Glanville and responded with “Who?”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"I think the only way for me to really maintain any kind of relationship is to give her the credit she deserves, which is almost zero," she said
"Under no circumstances do I understand her motives."
"It's dirty, it's despicable spirit." In particular, van der PANP had her star fall out with Granville, who helped make the rest of the cast rule on van der PANP
"In an interview with people in February 2015, van der Pugh said that she" had a bad season last year "and added," they threw everything to me last year, other women. "
"RHOBH's"
“… Joking that she can save some dogs, but I can't save all my friends watching brandy Granville slap Lisa van der Pol at RHOBH in Granville's time in Bravo reality show series audiences witnessed the ups and downs of her and van der Pol who, her famous slap in the face in an episode... "
"Why is she a special case in van der Pugh's eyes? Granville has taken it to another level. I don't even want to show my dignity with an answer. Although van der Pugh actively helps dogs, she and her husband Kent have opened their own rescue dog center. She..."
"Well, go on," van der Pol added, "you know the answer to that question." "As you just said: some people you will conflict with, some people you will conflict with," E! Katsadler told van der pen
”Asked the aunt! What if you and brandy have a chance to repair your relationship? Van der penp cast a shadow over Granville and replied, "who?"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  549
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Water Luis Sequeira Victoria and Abdul Consolata Boyle Visual Effects...”
“Dorota Kobiela Hugh Welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan Mactaggart Hugh Welchman Animated Short Dear Basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant Garden Party Victor Caire Gabriel Grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray Negative Space Max Porter Ru Kuwahata Revolting Rhymes Jakob Schuh Jan Lachauer Adapted Screenplay Call Me by Your Name James Ivory...”
“Guillermo del Toro’s “The Shape of Water” continued its awards show streak, leading the pack with 13 nominations.”
““Dunkirk” followed behind with eight nods and Martin McDonagh’s “Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri”with seven.”
“All three films earned best picture nominations.”
“The rest of the category was rounded out by “Call Me By Your Name,” “Darkest Hour,” “Get Out,” “Phantom Thread,” “Lady Bird,” and “The Post.”The Academy Awards — hosted by Jimmy Kimmel for the second time — will air live on ABC on March 4.”
“Here is the list of 2018 Oscar nominations Best Picture Call Me by Your Name Darkest Hour Dunkirk Get Out Lady Bird Phantom Thread The Post The Shape of Water Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Lead Actor Timothée Chalamet Call Me by Your Name Daniel Day Lewis Phantom Thread Daniel...”
“Kaluuya Get Out Gary Oldman Darkest Hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Lead Actress Sally Hawkins The Shape of Water Frances McDormand Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse Ronan Lady Bird Meryl Streep The Post Supporting Actor Willem Dafoe The Florida Project Woody Harrelson Three...”
“Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Christopher Plummer All the Money in the World Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Supporting Actress Mary J Blige Mudbound Allison Janney I Tonya Lesley Manville Phantom Thread Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer The Shape of Water Director...”
“Dunkirk Christopher Nolan Get Out Jordan Peele Lady Bird Greta Gerwig Phantom Thread Paul Thomas Anderson The Shape of Water Guillermo del Toro Animated Feature The Boss Baby Tom McGrath Ramsey Ann Naito The Breadwinner Nora Twomey Anthony Leo Coco Lee Unkrich Darla K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha Loving Vincent...”


"Water Louis sequila, Victoria and Abdel Consuela tapboyle visual effects..."
"Dorota kobiela Hugh welchman Sean Bobbitt Ivan MacTaggart Hugh welchman animated short film dear basketball Glen Keane Kobe Bryant garden party winner Caire Gabriel grapperon Lou Dave Mullins Dana Murray negative space Max Porter Ru kuwahata reversing rhyms Jakob Schuh Jan lachauer adapted screenplay" call me your name James ivory "..."
Guillermo del Toro's the shape of water continues its winning streak at the awards ceremony, leading with 13 nominations
Dunkirk followed with eight nods, and Martin MacDonald's three billboards out of Missouri followed with seven nods
"All three films were nominated for best picture."
"The rest of the awards were replaced by" call me your name "," the darkest moment "," go away "," phantom line "," Miss bird "and" post ". The second Oscars, hosted by Jimmy Kimmel, will be broadcast on ABC on March 4
"Here's the list of best picture nominations for the 2018 Oscars. Please call me your name at the darkest moment. Dunkirk goes out Lady Bird mirage line, the shape of water behind three billboards, ebb tide. Missouri chief actor Timothy chalamit, please call me your name Daniel Day Lewis mirage line Daniel..."
"Karuya comes out of Gary Oldman's darkest moment Denzel Washington Roman J Israel ESQ heroine Sally Hawkins water shape Francis mcdorman and three billboards out of the ebb Missouri margotrobi I Tonia sayilsronan lady Kyle Streep supporting actor William Dafoe Florida project woody hallerson III.."
"Missouri billboard Richard Jenkins the shape of water Christopher Plummer all the world's qiansam Rockwell three billboard supporting actress Mary J. blaig confused Alison Jennie Tony Leslie Manville phantom line Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Octavia Spencer the shape director of water..."
"Dunkirk Christopher Nolan out of Lady Jordan peel bird Greta wig phantom thread Paul Thomas Anderson water Guillermo del Toro shape cartoon boss baby Tom McGrath Ramsey annetto breadwinner Nora Tommy Antonio CoCo Lee Unkrich Dara K Anderson Ferdinand Carlos Saldanha love Vincent..."



Number  550
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...not to me Kim said...”
“I kind of looked up and they were BFF or wifeys But the closeness between Shepherd and Kourtney made things awkward for Kim who learned from her sister that Shepherd had admitted to feeling unfulfilled job wise I do think it s inappropriate for her to talk to you and...”
““Then he’s like, ‘You’re the love of my life.”
““He’s like, ‘Your little friend is going to get beat up every single day that we’re there,'” Kourtney said.”
“But it was more serious than that — according to Kourtney, Disick had started “threatening” her and Bendjima.”
““He doesn’t care how he embarrasses you, going out on the town with Bella and all of those other people,” Khloé said.”
“It’s super suspicious.”Kourtney informed her that she and Disick had gotten into a “full war” over the trip.”
““We just went through all that s— in Santa Barbara, and all of a sudden Scott is going to Cannes?”
““It is crazy that Scott won’t leave Kourt alone,” fumed Khloé Kardashian, 33.”
“Because that is just wild.”Sure enough, as soon as he found out his ex would be there, Disick planned his own trip, claiming he had booked a club appearance.”


“… It's not what Kim told me... "
"I looked up and saw that they were good friends or wives, but Kim was embarrassed by the close relationship between Shepard and Courtney. She learned from her sister that Shepard admitted that she had no sense of accomplishment in her work. I really don't think she should talk to you, and..."
"Then he said," you are the love of my life. "
"He said, 'we're there, and your kids get beaten every day,'" Courtney said
But more than that, according to Courtney, desik has begun to "threaten" her and benjima
"He doesn't care how he embarrasses you and goes out of town with Bella and the others," said Heroe
"That's suspicious." Courtney told her that she and desik had fallen into an "all-out war" on their journey
"We just went through all the s in Santa Barbara, and suddenly Scott is going to Cannes?"
"It's crazy that Scott won't leave Kurt," said 33 year old Kardashian angrily
"Because that's crazy." Sure enough, when he found out that his ex girlfriend would be there, disik planned his trip and claimed that he had reserved the club's entrance fee



Number  551
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So I mean, I love his family.”For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
““But he has a wonderful family, they love us so much and they’ve ben so supportive through everything.”
“Aaron Rodgers opened up about his high-profile split from Olivia Munn in a new interview.”
“The NFL quarterback, 33, blamed the price of fame for placing “increased strain” on his romance with the X-Men: Apocalypse actress, 37.”
““When you are living out a relationship in the public eye, it’s definitely … it’s difficult,” he explained to ESPN The Magazine in a profile published on Wednesday, August 30 — though he didn’t mention her by name.”
““It has some extra constraints because you have other opinions abut your relationship, how it affects your work and, you know, just some inappropriate connections.”The Green Bay Packers player and The Predator star began dating in early 2014 and split in April.”
“A source told Us Weekly exclusively at the time that complicated family dynamics likely contributed to the split.”
““Olivia doesn’t get along with his family,” the insider revealed.”
““They think she’s controlling.”Rodgers’ family was thrust into the limelight in 2016 when his brother Jordan competed on — and won — JoJo Fletcher’s season of The Bachelorette.”
“The athlete has avoided commenting on how the ABC dating series’ depicted his family and feels that such a private matter should not have been broadcasted on national television.”


"So I mean, I love his family." To learn about the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to us weekly's YouTube page
"But he has a good family, they love us very much, and their support for Ben runs through everything."
"In a new interview, Alan Rogers revealed his high-profile breakup with Olivia moon."
The 33 year old NFL QUARTERBACK blamed the cost of fame on the "growing tension" in his romantic relationship with the 37 year old X-Men: Revelation star
"When you live in a relationship in the public eye, it's definitely It's very difficult, even though he didn't mention her name. "
"It has some additional limitations because you have other views of your relationship, how it affects your work, and, you know, just some inappropriate connections." Green Bay Packers players and predator star started dating in early 2014 and broke up in April
"A source told weekly exclusively at the time that complex family dynamics could be the cause of the breakup."
"Olivia doesn't get on well with her family," a person familiar with the matter said
"They think she controls everything." Rogers' family was put in the spotlight in 2016, when his brother Jordan played and won Joe Fletcher's singles season
"The athlete avoids commenting on how ABC's blind date series describes his family and believes that such a private event should not be broadcast on national television."



Number  552
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jax, Stassi's ex, agreed, saying, "Finally she's got a good guy, she's got a great guy, and they both really love each other.”Stassi deserves happiness, so this Vanderpump Rules fan is happy she found her Beau.”
“Everyone deserves that feeling, so it's wonderful now that Stassi has it.”
“Just on her time on Vanderpump Rules she s taken up relationships with Jax Taylor which ended well for no one that bartender Frank who wanted to fight Jax and broadcaster Patrick Meagher who clearly thought he was way too...”
“...good to be on a reality show...”
“Now, Stassi is dating Beau Clark, and it seems like these two are really meant to be.”
“Beau from Vanderpump Rules also has a normal job — he’s not a SURver or bartender or actor, which means that he’s removed from much of the SUR drama.”
“Hey, maybe these two really could work.”
“Beau and Stassi met when Stassi finally let her friends — fellow Vanderpump castmates Kristen Doute and Katie Maloney-Schwartz — set her up with him.”
“Of their relationship, Stassi told Entertainment Tonight, "I can just be myself [with him].”
“Legitimately, I feel so comfortable and happy and I just have fun and he just, literally, just I love him for him and he loves me for me," she said.”


Stacy's ex boyfriend Jakes agreed. He said, "she's finally got a good man. She's got a great man, and they're all in love." Stacy deserves to be happy, so this fan of the Vanderbilt rule is glad she found her boyfriend
"Everyone deserves it, so it's great for Stacy to have it."
"Just when she was in the van der Pol rule, she started a relationship with Jakes Taylor, which was not a good ending for anyone, such as frank, the bartender who wanted to fight with Jakes, and Patrick Miguel, the broadcaster who obviously thought he was..."
“… The reality show is so good... "
"Now, Stacy is dating Bo Clark, it seems that these two people are really destined."
"Van der Pol's regular Bo also has a normal job - he's not a bartender, bartender or actor, which means he's been removed from a lot of sur dramas."
"Hey, maybe these two really work."
"When Bo and Stacy met, Stacy finally asked her friends, van der Pol's partners Christine Dutt and Katie malloni Schwartz, to arrange for her to be with him."
"About their relationship, Stacy told the entertainment tonight," I can be myself. "
"Reasonably speaking, I feel so comfortable and happy, I just have a good time, he just, literally, I love him for him and he loves me for me," she said



Number  553
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Nerisha Penrose Assistant Editor Nerisha is the assistant editor at ELLE.com, covering all things beauty and fashion.”
“Sorta.”
“Ah Royals, they're just like us.”
“"She was so nice, explaining she was just doing a bit of Christmas shopping."”
“She very politely declined," the shopper said.”
“"When Kate got to the checkouts I plucked up courage to ask if she’d do a selfie with me and my kids.”
“One mother even tried to snap a photo with the Duchess but was turned down.”
“...last minute Christmas bargains one shopper told The Sun...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
Nerisha Penrose, assistant editor ELLE.com Website, covering all beauty and fashion. "
"All right."
"Ah, royalty, they're like us."
"She's so nice to explain that she's just buying Christmas presents."
"She declined politely," the customer said
"When Kate went to check out, I plucked up the courage to ask if she would like to take a selfie with me and my children."
"One mother even tried to take a picture with the Duchess, but was turned down."
“… Last minute Christmas special a customer told the sun



Number  554
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Pippa Middleton and James Matthews are joined by their guests after their ceremony Credit Samir Hussein WireImage Image zoom Princess Kate tends to Prince George and Princess Charlotte Credit Samir Hussein WireImage...”
“George, 3, is acting as a page boy and Charlotte, 2, will serve as a bridesmaid for her aunt Pippa.”
“...wedding day...”
“Princess Kate helped smooth out Pippa Middleton‘s dress as the bride entered the church for her wedding to James Matthews at St. Mark’s Church in Englefield, England, on Saturday morning.”
“Before the ceremony, Kate was seen driving with her husband Prince William to the church, skipping the guest walking line.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge wore a peach dress and matching hat and flashed a smile at the cameras while helping the children in the bridal party go into the church.”
“At one point, Kate gently shushed the children as they all walked in hand-in-hand.”
“WATCH: Princess Kate Arrives At Pippa’s Wedding With George And CharlotteKate was pulling double duty at the event as both the sister of the bride and the parent of two very special members of the wedding party — Prince George and Princess Charlotte.”
“(Having young bridesmaids is very common in British aristocratic weddings.)”


"Image zooming Pippa Middleton and James Matthews will join their guests at the end of their ceremony image zooming Kate prefers Prince George and Princess Charlotte image zooming Samir Hussein WireImage..."
"George, 3, plays a paging boy and Charlotte, 2, will be the maid of honor for her aunt Pippa."
“… Wedding day... "
Kate helped Pippa Middleton dress up at St. Mark's Church in engelfield on Saturday morning. The bride entered the church to attend the wedding with James Matthews
"Before the wedding, Kate and her husband, Prince William, were seen driving to church and skipping the guests' walk."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The Duchess of Cambridge, in her pink dress and matching hat, smiles at the camera as she helps the wedding children walk into the church."
"Once, Kate booed the children, because they were walking hand in hand."
"Watch: Princess Kate and George attend Pippa's wedding together. Charlotte Kate, as the sister of the bride and the parents of Prince George and Princess Charlotte, the two special members of the wedding, has two duties at the wedding."
"(it's common to have young bridesmaids at British noble weddings.)



Number  555
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our daily newsletter.”
“Stay current on the latest trends, news and people shaping the fashion industry.”
“It seems that for Jenner, the right partnership has arrived — at least for the time being.”
“The right partnership hasn't come about, but I do think about it and I do talk about it," she said.”
“"I talk about expanding into hair all the time.”
“Earlier this week, I asked Jenner's sister Kim Kardashian West, who has built somewhat of a beauty empire herself, whether she'd be expanding into the hair category anytime soon.”
“It seems Formawell is hedging its bets, as the marketing push for its new styling tool range will also include 15 other social media influencers who combine for more than 200 million followers, according to WWD.”
“With cases like The Estée Edit, some in the industry have pointed out that Jenner's engagement with (and commitment to) the brand — particularly when it came to sharing on social media — left much room for improvement.”
“The Kardashian-Jenner family in general has seen much success in the cosmetics industry over the last few years, but those wins have come hard-fought after many previous trials and struggles in the beauty business.”
“It's worth noting that Jenner has dabbled in the beauty space before, most notably with a high-profile Estée Lauder contract and its short-lived millennial-targeted line, The Estée Edit, which was discontinued less than a year after its debut in 2017.”


"Sign up for our daily newsletter."
"Focus on the latest trends, news and people in the fashion industry."
"It seems that for Jenner, the right partnership has arrived - at least for now."
"The right partnership hasn't been formed yet, but I did think about it and I did talk about it," she said
"I've been talking about expanding to hair."
"Earlier this week, I asked Jenna's sister, Kim Kardashian West, if she would expand into hair in the short term, as she has built her own beauty empire."
According to WWD, formawell seems to be hedging its bets because the marketing of its new styling tool series will also include 15 other social media influencers, with more than 200 million fans
"In cases like EST é e edit, some industry insiders pointed out that Jenner's participation (and commitment) in the brand, especially in social media sharing, leaves a lot of room for improvement."
"In the past few years, the Kardashian Jenner family has achieved great success in the cosmetics industry as a whole, but these victories have been achieved after many attempts and struggles in the beauty industry."
"It's worth noting that Jenner has been involved in the field of beauty before, and the most remarkable thing is that he signed a high-profile contract with Estee Lauder. His short-lived Millennium target series, Estee Lauder editor, was launched in 2017 and stopped production within a year."



Number  556
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Meghan may be head over heels with Daryl's kissing skills, Daryl is all about her body.”
“Thank you for the most amazing year.”
“You are my whole world.”
“I will love you forever and for always.”
“You are the greatest person I know, and I'm so lucky to call you my best friend.”
“From the moment I met you I was mesmerized by everything you said and everything you do.”
“...tour...”
“Happy Anniversary meghan_trainor A post shared by Daryl Sabara darylsabara on Jul 1 2017 at 11 24pm PDT Daniel posted a video of the Dear Future Husband singer along with the caption Took this video at the beginning of your...”
“Happy Anniversary @meghan_trainor."”


"Although Megan may know nothing about Daryl's kissing skills, Daryl knows her body like the back of her hand."
"Thank you for the best year I've had."
"You are my whole world."
"I will always love you."
"You are the greatest person I know, and I am very lucky to call you my best friend."
"From the moment I met you, I was fascinated by everything you said and did."
“… Tour... "
"Happy Anniversary Meghan è tranor Daryl Sabara posted Daryl Sabara's post at 11:24 p.m. on July 1, 2017. Daniel posted a video of my dear future husband singer with the title attached. This video is in your..."
"Happy Anniversary @ Meghan / u Trainor."



Number  557
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by camila (@camila_cabello) on Mar 1, 2018 at 3:51pm PST”
“...thank you @taylorswift for having me from the bottom of my heart, i love you so much !!!!!!!!”
“...this is going to be so much fun!!!!”
“DREAM also, @charli_xcx WHO I ADORE, WHAT?!!!!!!”
“A.”
“...as the girl who would sing Hey Stephen thinking of the boy in class who didn t know my name LMAO it s...”
“Taylor swift poster in her room when she was 14 and wanted SO BADLY to go to the speak now tour distinctly remember my friends going to school the next day raving about it and me like ITS A DREAM”
“...on every level this is a dream come true as a fan i m going to be singing every song at the top of my lungs as a friend it s a GIANT SLEEPOVER as the girl who had a...”


“camila（@camila_ Cabello) on March 1, 2018 at 3:51 p.m. PST "
“… Thank you @ Taylor swift for owning me from the bottom of my heart. I love you so much
“… It's going to be fun!! "
"It's the same with dreams, @ Charli, who and what do I worship?"
“A.”
“…… Just like the girl who sings "Hi, Stephen" and remembers the boy in the class who doesn't know my name, I am... "
"When Taylor Swift was 14 years old, he put up posters in his room and wanted to go to the" speak now "tour. I remember clearly that when my friends went to school the next day, they were full of praise about it. It was like a dream to me."
"On every level, it's a dream come true. As a fan, I'll sing every song to my heart's content as a friend. It's a huge night, as a person with..."



Number  558
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the 71st edition of the Cannes Film Festival AFP Getty Images Kimberley Garner attends the Fashion For Relief Cannes 2018 event on the sidelines of the 71st edition of the Cannes Film Festival AFP Getty Images Izabel Goulart arrives for the screening of the film Sink Or Swim Le Grand...”
“Cannes 2018 Dave Benett Bella Hadid Fashion For Relief Cannes 2018 Splash News Bella Hadid attends Fashion for Relief Cannes 2018 during the 71st annual Cannes Film Festival Dave Benett Isabeli Fontana arrives on May 13 2018 for the screening of the film Sink Or Swim Le Grand Bain at...”
“It was a fitting complement for a woman who would have looked statuesque had she decided on a bin bag to wear to the occasion.”
“( Kristen Stewart in a Chanel suit and Cate Blanchett in an Armani gown / Getty Images )When jury president Cate Blanchett made her impassioned speech on Saturday she did so in a streamlined creation by Giorgio Armani.”
“Of course Cannes is Cannes and accordingly there were gowns aplenty on the Le Croisette this year, with puffy and princessy giving way to moody shades and strong silhouettes.”
“The result was a spectacle which unearthed these women at their most powerful and a key change for the festival which counts gowns and honking great diamonds as crucial to its DNA as the Palme D’Or.”
“...everything from shift dresses and trouser suits to their favourite pair of jeans...”
“Carey Mulligan poses for portrait photographs for the film Wildlife Joel C Ryan Invision AP Saturday night s protest serves as the most glorious example of Cannes prevalent new image with women from across the length and breadth of the film industry choosing to take to the red carpet in...”
“( Lea Seydoux at the Cold War premiere / AFP/Getty Images )She is joined by Kristen Stewart, who packed an array of Chanel trouser suits to accompany her on her trip to the French Coast, and by Carey Mulligan, who marched to her own tune in a scarlet tuxedo.”
“Among the leading figures are Léa Seydoux — an actress who represents a vibrant new generation of female film-makers — who favoured cocktail style sweaters and thigh-skimming Louis Vuitton shirt dresses instead of conforming to classic Cannes tradition.”


“…… The 71st Cannes Film Festival AFP Getty Images Kimberly garner attended the 2018 Cannes relief fashion event on the sidelines of the 71st Cannes Film Festival. AFP Getty Images Izabel Goulart arrived to watch the movie "sink or swim" on the big screen... "
"Live news of Cannes 2018 Dave Bennett Isabella Hadid 2018 Cannes embossed fashion show Bella Hadid attended the 2018 Cannes embossed fashion show during the 71st Cannes Film Festival. Dave Bennett Isabella Fontana arrived in Cannes on May 13, 2018 to attend the screening of the film" the fall of great Bain.... "
"It's a fitting addition to a woman who will look like a statue if she decides to wear a garbage bag on the occasion."
(Christine Stewart in Chanel suit, Kate Blanchett in Armani robe / Getty pictures) when the chairman of the jury Kate Blanchett delivered her passionate speech on Saturday, she used the streamlined creation of George Armani. "
"Of course, Cannes is Cannes, so this year's Croisette has seen a lot of dresses, fluffy and Princess temperament giving way to Moody tones and strong silhouettes."
"The result is a spectacle that unearths these women in their most powerful and one of the key changes for the festival, calculating dresses and big diamonds as the key to their DNA in the palm tree."
“… From shift dresses and pants suits to their favorite jeans... "
"Kelly Mulligan's portrait of the film wildlife Joel C. Ryan invision the protest by the associated press on Saturday night is the most brilliant example of Cannes' popular new image. Women from all walks of life choose to walk on the red carpet..."
(Lea Seydoux at the cold war premiere / AFP / Getty Images) Kristen Stewart and Carey Mulligan joined her. Kristen Stewart packed a series of Chanel pants to accompany her on a trip to the French coast, and Carey Mulligan joined her Mulligan, wearing a scarlet tuxedo, follows his own style
"Among the leaders are l é a Seydoux, an actress representing a new generation of dynamic female filmmakers, who prefers cocktail sweaters and open legged Louis Vuitton skirts over Cannes' classic traditions."



Number  559
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET) on E!”
“...m...”
“Brown died in March 2006 while at a sunset photoshoot at Colorado’s Telluride Ski Resort after falling sideways off the back of a snowcat snow-grooming machine and getting caught in the tracks.”
“He was just 16.”
“Kenworthy, 26, was by his friend’s side at the time along with two of their other friends.”
“The pals has piled on the back of the snowcat to get to the top of the mountain, which was closed at the time.”
“The tragic loss left Kenworthy questioning whether he wanted to continue with skiing.”
“Gus KenworthyThings were made more complicated as Kenworthy, who is openly gay, had just understood his own sexual orientation and had not yet come out.”
“He felt so guilty about being gay, he wished he had been the one to die, he said.”
““I know for myself, especially I was in the closet at the time, I mean hadn’t told anybody that I was gay.”


"ET) on e!"
“… m…”
"In March 2006, while taking a sunset photo at telluride ski resort in Colorado, brown fell sideways from behind the snow cat's snow sweeper and was caught in the snow path. Unfortunately, he died."
"He's only 16."
"Kenworthy, 26, was with two of their other friends at the time."
"My friends have piled on the snow cat's back, ready to climb to the top of the mountain, which was closed at that time."
"The defeat made Kenworthy wonder if he wanted to continue skiing."
"The case of GUS Kenworthy has become more complicated because Kenworthy is openly gay. He just understands his sexual orientation and has not come out yet."
"He felt very guilty about being gay, and he wanted to be the one who died," he said
"I know that myself, especially when I was in the closet, I mean I didn't tell anyone I was gay."



Number  560
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you or someone you know is in emotional distress or considering suicide, call the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255).”
“Kate and I during Christmas family photos.”
“The actor is the younger brother of the late designer’s husband, Andy Spade.”
““Katy at my book signing.”
“I love this pic of her.”
“So pretty.”
“I don’t think everyone knew how f–king funny she was… Its a rough world out there people.”
“Try to hang on,” the comedian, 53, captioned a Twitter photo of the two.”
“The Grown Ups star went on to share a pic of the relatives celebrating the holidays together.”
““Fuzzy picture but i love it.”


"If you or someone you know is depressed or considering suicide, please call the national suicide prevention lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255)."
"Kate and I took a picture at Christmas."
"The actor is the younger brother of the late designer husband Andy spade."
"Katie's in my signature book."
"I like this picture of her."
"It's beautiful."
"I don't think everyone knows how funny she is The outside world is cruel. "
The 53 year old comedian tweeted a photo of the two: "hold on."
"The star then shared a photo of relatives celebrating the festival together."
"The blur, but I like it."



**Something goes wrong**
“Although Trump has yet to publicly respond to the Cravings author, he blocked her on Twitter in July 2017 after she tweeted at him, “No one likes you.””
“...about her disproval of the real estate mogul in the past...”
“Chrissy Teigen made good on her word that she’d be hosting President Donald Trump’s “Most Dishonest & Corrupt Media Awards of the Year.”The 31-year-old model took to Snapchat on Wednesday, January 18, to document the mock event.”
““Just arrived here at the Dolby Theater in Hollywood,” Teigen narrated a hilarious clip of herself walking around the lobby.”
““The Fake News Media Awards are setting up now.”Teigen then panned the camera around the main floor of the theater, where many people were walking around.”
““Here at the Dolby Theater for the MDCMAs, the ‘Most Dishonest and Corrupt Media Awards.’ As you can see, it’s bustling here,” the cookbook author joked.”
““A lot of people.”
“A lot of people excited for the Fake News Awards.”
“We’re excited!”The Lip Sync Battle host then shared a video of herself having her makeup done before the event.”
““I’m not positive exactly when the awards start.”


"Although trump has not publicly responded to the author of desire, in July 2017, she tweeted to trump," no one likes you, "and he blocked her on twitter."
“… About her past denial of real estate tycoons... "
Chris Teigen has made good on her promise to host president Donald Trump's most dishonest & corrupt Media Awards of the year. The first mock exam was recorded on Wednesday (Wednesday) by the 31 year old model on Snapchat.
"Just arrived at the Dolby theater in Hollywood," tegan tells of the funny footage of walking up and down the hall
"The fake news media awards are now in place." Tegan then pointed the camera at the main floor of the theater, where a lot of people were walking
"At the mdcmas" the most dishonest and corrupt Media Award "at the Dolby theatre, you can see that it's bustling," the cookbook author joked
"A lot of people."
"A lot of people are excited about the fake news awards."
"We're excited! "The host then shared a video of making up before the event."
"I'm not sure when the awards ceremony will start."



Number  562
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jay-Z “4:44” tour dates:”
“Tickets for the 4:44 TOUR go on sale to the general public starting Friday, July 14 at 10 a.m. local time.”
“Members can find details for purchasing tickets at Sprint.TIDAL.com and www.citiprivatepass.com.”
“Tidal subscribers and Citi cardholders will have access to a special presale beginning on Monday, July 10th at 12:00pm ET.”
“It is the first installment in the rapper’s recent 10-year touring deal with Live Nation.”
“Following previously announced dates at the Made in America, Meadows and Austin City Limits festivals, the tour launches in Anaheim, CA on Oct. 27 and hits most major markets through the end of the year.”
“Jay-Z, riding high from the positive reviews of his 13th and latest album “4:44,” on Monday morning announced an extensive North American tour.”


"Jay-Z" 4:44 "tour date:
"Tickets for the 4:44 tour will be available to the public from 10 a.m. Friday, July 14 local time."
"Members can find the ticket details on the website Sprint.TIDAL.com as well as www.citiprivatepass.com 。”
"Chaozhou subscribers and Citigroup cardholders will enjoy special pre-sale from 12:00 p.m. EST on Monday, July 10."
"This is the first part of rapper's recent 10-year tour with living."
"Following the dates previously announced at the made in America, grass and Austin City restrictions Festival, the tour will be launched in Anaheim, California, on October 27 and will enter most major markets by the end of the year."
"Jay-Z has been a huge success with his 13th and latest album 4:44, announcing an extensive North American tour on Monday morning."



Number  563
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow the AllAboutTRH Podcast on iTunes & Soundcloud – Remember to Rate, Comment & Subscribe!”
“Like AllAboutTRH On Facebook.”
“The former friends and Real Housewives of New York co-stars haven’t spoken in years after a major falling out.”
“However, Bethenny recently swallowed her pride and put her drama with Jill on the back burner.”
“Instead, Bethenny showed support for the Zarin family and sent them a thoughtful gift.”
“In fact, Millionaire Matchmaker Patti Stranger dished about the situation on Heather McDonald’s Juicy Scoop podcast.”
““Bobby’s dying.”
“He doesn’t have a lot of time,” Patti said.”
““This is not something to play around with.”
“Network antics aside me and Andy Cohen have been texting and emailing and this last week Bethenny did send a basket of goodies to Bobby Patti added At the end of the day if you get sick like Bobby you need support and we can all get sick Patti also...”


"Follow allaboutthh podcasts on iTunes and Soundcloud - remember ratings, reviews and subscriptions!"
"It's like allaboutthh on Facebook."
"Two New York co stars, former friends and Real Housewives, have been silent for years after a big fight."
"Recently, however, besseigne has put his play with Jill on the back burner."
"On the contrary, besseini expressed support for the zalins and gave them a thoughtful gift."
"In fact, millionaires matchmaker Patty stranger talked about it on Heather McDonald's juicy scoop podcast."
"Bobbie's going to die."
"He doesn't have a lot of time," Patty said
"It's not something to play with."
"Except for Andy Cohen and me, the antics on the Internet have been texting and e-mailing, and last week, Bethany did send Bobbie Patty a basket of candy. Finally, he added, "if you're sick like Bobbie, you need support, and we can all be sick..."



Number  564
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“Source: GettyAre you sad that the shows are ending?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyThe acronym "WAGS" stands for "Wives And Girlfriends of Sportspersons" and the shows followed these women living the high life.”
“They weren’t a fan of the shows anyway and the ratings weren’t strong enough to consider moving forward."”
“Source: GettySources told The Jasmine Brand exclusively that "There is a new top executive that’s making a lot of changes in terms of programming, especially when it comes to non-scripted projects.”
“...m like Hold up girlfriend Dominique has a whole bunch going on it may not be in the fashion world but I have a lot going on I wish they would have showed more of that...”
“Article continues below advertisement Source Getty She explained I m a fun person and I m all about women empowerment I have my own businesses and I really felt like they showed a lot of the other women with clothing lines and photo shoots and all this stuff and I”
“She told the site, The Jasmine Brand,"It was a great experience for me because it came right on time but I don’t think it really showed who I was."”
“I think there was to the head people of E!, they brought on a whole new staff of development team, and I don’t think the show fit with what they were looking for anymore so they decided to cancel it."”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyDominique explained "WAGS is canceled, the whole franchise.”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"Source: are you sad that the show is coming to an end?"
The article continues with the following advertising source: Getty acronym "wags" stands for "athletes' wives and girlfriends", and the program focuses on these women who live a noble life
"Anyway, they don't like these programs, and their ratings are not high enough to consider moving on."
"Source: gettysource told the jasmine brand exclusively," there is a new executive who has made a lot of changes in programming, especially in non script projects. "
“… I like hold up girlfriend Dominic has a lot going on, it may not be in the fashion world, but I have a lot going on, I hope they can show more... "
"The article continues with the following advertising source, Getty, who explains that I'm an interesting person, I'm all about women empowerment, I have my own business, and I really think they show me a lot of other women with clothing lines and photography and all these things."
"She told the website, jasmine brand," it's a great experience for me as it came, but I don't think it really shows who I am. "
"I think we should have a problem! They brought in a new development team, and I don't think this program meets their requirements, so they decided to cancel it. "
The article continues with the following advertising source: Getty Dominique explains that "the lottery is cancelled, the entire franchise."



Number  565
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fortunately for Beyoncé, Tina Knowles Lawson seems to already be on board in the role of proud grandmother.”
““Me, I’m extremely fortunate because I have a lot, a lot, a lot, a lot of help,” the singer said as her mother and sister joined the room to tend to the sleepy babies and allow Dion to pour her morning coffee.”
“The Internet lost its mind; the photo became the record-breaking most-liked post on Instagram, and Twitter took off with memes and GIFs.”
“Though the fanfare following her birth announcement might have been the biggest Hollywood has seen, Bey is joining a group of famous mothers of twins, which will now also include Amal Clooney.”
“One of said mothers, Jennifer Lopez—who has nine-year-old twins Emme and Max with ex-husband Marc Anthony—is here to offer some advice to her fellow star, per Page Six.”
““Nothing can prepare you for twins,” she cautioned at the premiere of her NBC series Shades of Blue.”
““I certainly was not prepared.”
“I would say, ‘Stay calm.’ ”Her advice is simple but sound.”
“Zoe Saldana, whose twin sons Cy and Bowie Perego-Saldana are two, shared a story with E!”
“News in January that proves raising twins is no task for the faint of heart.”


"Fortunately for Beyonce, Tina Knowles Lawson seems to have played the proud grandmother."
"I, I'm very lucky because I have a lot, a lot, a lot, a lot of help," said the singer, whose mother and sister joined the room to take care of the sleepy baby and let Dion pour her morning coffee
"The Internet has lost its mind; this photo has become the most popular post on instagram, setting a record, with memes and gifts on twitter."
"Although bey's postnatal announcement may be the biggest that Hollywood has ever seen, she will join a famous group of twin mothers, and now includes Amar Clooney."
One of the mothers of 9-year-old twins born to her ex husband Mark Antony, Jennifer Lopez is here to offer advice to her fellow stars
"There's nothing to prepare you for twins," she warned at the premiere of the NBC series blue shadows
"Of course I'm not ready."
"I would say, 'keep calm.'" Her suggestion is simple, but reasonable
"Zoe Sardana, his twin sons, West and Boye Perego Sardana, are two children and share a story with her!"
"The news in January proved that raising twins is not a task for timid people."



Number  566
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“Kenneth Lonergan fully supports the #MeToo movement, but he’s not happy about how his friend and collaborator Casey Affleck has been treated in the months since #MeToo and Time’s Up became talking points throughout the world.”
“Speaking to Variety, Lonergan said the actor has been “treated abominably” in the #MeToo era.”
“Affleck was the star of Lonergan’s acclaimed 2016 drama “Manchester by the Sea.” Lonergan won the best original screenplay prize, while Affleck earned the best actor trophy.”
““I couldn’t be more all for the #MeToo movement,” Lonergan said, “and I couldn’t feel more strongly that he’s been treated abominably.”
“It’s not good for anybody.”Affleck was accused of sexual harassment by two women who worked with him on his 2010 mock-documentary “I’m Still Here.” The actor settled both suits out of court for an undisclosed amount the same year.”
“The allegations resurfaced in the wake of the #MeToo anti-harassment movement and they made headlines again in January when Affleck decided to step down from presenting at this year’s Oscars.”
“Per tradition, Affleck would’ve presented the 2018 best actress trophy, but he bowed out as the #MeToo and Time’s Up campaigns took center stage during awards season.”
“Affleck notified the Academy on January 25 that he would not be attending this year’s ceremony because he did not want his involvement in the telecast to distract from the performances of the five nominated actresses.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"
"Kenneth lonegan fully supports the meto movement, but he is not happy with the treatment of his friend and collaborator, Kathy Affleck, in the months after" the rise of meto and the age "became a global topic."
In an interview with variety, lonegan said the actor was "badly treated" in the era of meto'o
"Affleck is the star of Lonergan's famous play" Manchester by the sea "in 2016. Lonergan won the best original screenplay award, while Affleck won the best actor trophy
"I'm very supportive of the Mayo movement," lonegan said. "I feel very strongly that he's been treated abominably."
"It's not good for anyone." Affleck was accused of sexual harassment by two women who worked with him on the 2010 mock documentary I'm still here. In the same year, Affleck settled two lawsuits out of court, the amount of which is unknown
"These charges resurfaced after the" Mayo anti harassment campaign "and made headlines again in January when Affleck decided to resign from this year's Academy Awards."
"Traditionally, Affleck could have awarded the best actress trophy in 2018, but when meto and time were at the center of the season, he pulled out of the ceremony."
"Affleck informed the Oscars on January 25 that he would not attend this year's awards ceremony because he did not want to distract his attention from the performance of the five nominated actresses by participating in the television broadcast."



Number  567
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Star Best Fandom and Cast on Social Media Best New 2017 2018 Show Most Anticipated New Show Saddest Cancellation and Best Series Finale...”
“Here s the full list of polls Best Comedy and Best Drama Best Drama Acting Best Comedy Acting Best Breakout Stars Best Couple and Sexiest Moment Best Reality Show and Star Best and Worst Shocker Best Fight and Musical Moment Saddest Death and Actor Exit Best Villain and Best Guest...”
“Others nominated include Charmed, Sharp Objects, Shadowhunters, Will & Grace, New Girl, Kerry Washington (Scandal), James Corden, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmel Kimmel and Michelle Wolf.”
“Pretty Little Liars: The Perfectionists is up for 'Most Anticipated Show' of 2018/2019.”
“Any show that aired between June 9 2017 and June 8 2018 is eligible.”
“News' TV Scoop Awards.”
“Shortlink to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday, June 29, 2018 7:37am ET by PresspartyVoting closes at 5pm PT today (June 29) for this year's E!”


"Star, best fan and social media, best new 2017, best 2018 show, most expected rookie, saddest cancellation and best series ending..."
"The following are the best comedy and the best drama, the best drama performance, the best comedy performance, the best breakthrough star, the best couple and the sexiest moment, the best reality show and the best and the worst shock star, the best battle and music moment, the saddest death and the actor's exit, the best villain and the best guest..."
"Other nominations include magician, sharp weapon, shadow hunter, will and grace, new girl, Kerry Washington (scandal), James scodon, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmy Kimmel and Michelle wolf."
"Beautiful little liar: perfectionists will participate in the 2018 / 2019" most anticipated show. "
"Any program broadcast between June 9, 2017 and June 8, 2018 is eligible."
"News TV exclusive Award"
"Short link to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday , June 29, 2018, 7:37 a.m. EDT press release ends today (June 29) at 5 p.m. this year's e! "



Number  568
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Here’s how I justify it — if modern women today are fighting rightfully so for equal pay,” Kelley began, “Why can’t we also have the right to fight with men?”
“Kelley joked that at first, she and Gillies were uncomfortable with physical fighting and wanted to work out their characters’ disagreements “through words.” But then, the actress realized there was a gender inequality issue with on-screen catfights.”
““The relationship between Blake and Steven is not about sexuality.”
“Blake Carrington’s (Show) son, Steven (James Mackay), is gay and he’ll be out-and-proud.”
“The CW version will be far from that.”
“The original “Dynasty” was homophobic.”
“She’s definitely there in the other characters.”2.”
““We do refer to her a lot,” Schwartz said to which Patrick added, “We’re building up the spirit of Alexis.”
““We’re going to see if it works out.”Even before Alexis shows up on screen, the character’s presence will be felt throughout the episodes.”
““We don’t know yet,” Patrick said of the Alexis casting.”


Kelly began to say, "If today's modern women are justified in fighting for equal pay for equal work, why can't we also have the right to fight men?"
Kelly joked that at first, she and gilly were uncomfortable with physical conflict and wanted to resolve the differences between the characters "through language.". But then the actress realized that there was gender inequality in the onscreen fights
"The relationship between black and Steven has nothing to do with sex."
"Black Carrington's (Acting) son Steven (James McKay) is gay, he will be out and proud."
"The CW version will be far from that."
"The original Dynasty was homophobic."
"She must be in other roles." two
"We do mention her a lot," Schwartz said, adding that "we are nurturing the spirit of Alexis."
"We need to see how it works." Even before Alexis appears on the screen, the whole episode can feel the existence of this character
"We don't know yet," Patrick said of Alexis's cast



Number  569
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  570
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Which one is the best?”
“Below, find a list of some of television’s most notorious musical episodes from non-musical shows.”
“...like the completely unnecessary late season 7th Heaven episode...”
“Sometimes the format works like in ABC s fairy tale fantasy Once Upon a Time episode The Song in Your Heart the network s The Middle will also break into song in an upcoming episode and sometimes it doesn t...”
“In fact, the musical episode has a fine history of adding a little razzle dazzle to non-musical shows throughout the years — to both wonderful and disastrous effect.”
“Although TV has seen a resurgence of musicals in recent years, a series doesn’t have to be Glee or Smash (may they RIP) or Crazy Ex-Girlfriend to feature singing and dancing.”


"Which is the best?"
Here are some of the most infamous non musicals
“… It's like the totally unnecessary seventh season of heaven episode seven
"Sometimes this format works just like an episode of ABC's fairy tale" fantasies of the past ". The songs in your heart and the middle part of the network will become songs in the upcoming episode. Sometimes it won't..."
"In fact, this musical episode has a very good history. Over the years, it has added a little dazzling color to non musical programs - both wonderful effects and disastrous effects."
"Despite the resurgence of musicals on TV in recent years, a series doesn't have to be" glee "or" may they rip "to be able to lead in singing and dancing."



Number  571
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[wdi_feed id=”1″]”
“He expressed his excitement during a speech at the event.”
“Her Majesty appointed Harry Commonwealth Youth Ambassador in April 2018, so the event was a significant one for the Duke of Sussex.”
“The leaders focus on a number of topics, including human rights, health climate change, peace and democracy.”
“Princess Diana also wore yellow to several eventsHeld at the Marlborough House, the event invited young leaders from across the Commonwealth to discuss how they hope to shape the future of their states by the year 2040.”
“Kate Middleton has worn yellow to many occasions.”
“However, Meghan isn’t the first royal to wear the bright color.”
“As for the Duke of Sussex, Harry looked snazzy in a blue suit.”
“After all, the duchess has attended many events with Queen Elizabeth II, and Dishaw suspected Meghan aligned her fashion choices for these events to not overshadow the importance of those events or the other members of her new family that were with her.”
“However, Meghan’s wardrobe choices are likely intentional.”


“[wdi_ feed id=”1〃]”
"He expressed his excitement in his speech at the event."
"Her Majesty appointed Harry as the Commonwealth youth ambassador in April 2018, so this event is of great significance to the Duke of Sussex."
"Leaders are concerned about many issues, including human rights, health, climate change, peace and democracy."
Princess Diana was also dressed in yellow at several events at the Malborough palace. The event invited young leaders from all over the Commonwealth to discuss how they hope to shape their country's future by 2040
"Kate Middleton wore yellow many times."
"However, Megan is not the first royal to wear this bright color."
"As for the Duke of Sussex, Harry looks fashionable in a blue suit."
"After all, the Duchess and Queen Elizabeth II are present at many events, and Disha suspects Megan has adjusted her fashion choices for those events so as not to obscure the importance of those events or other members of her new family with her."
"But Megan's wardrobe choice is probably intentional."



Number  572
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“From duets to daddy duty to wearing one another on their feet (seriously), here are just a few of the weirdest things about this pairing.”
“...with Shelton after they d started dating...”
“The ska turned pop icon and the proud hillbilly have since made it no secret that they re outright obsessed with one another with Stefani even admitting to Hoda Kotb on Today that she went back and watched old interviews...”
“"I didn't even know that he was a human being on this planet."”
“"I didn't even know he existed before the show," Stefani told Andy Cohen on his SiriusXM Radio Andy show in September 2019.”
“The couple seem awfully in love, but there are a few strange facets to their hyper-public relationship, including the fact that Stefani had no idea who Shelton was for a long time.”
“...else especially Instagram and red carpets...”
“Odd Things About Gwen Stefani And Blake Shelton s Relationship Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton are always together at work on The Voice in the recording studio for duets like Go Ahead and Break My Heart and just about everywhere...”


"From duets to Dad's duties to wearing each other's feet (seriously), here are just a few of the strangest things about the couple."
“… After dating Sheldon... "
"This ska born pop idol and proud hillbilly never hide that they are totally obsessed with each other. Stephanie even admitted to Hoda Kotb today that she went back to the previous interview..."
"I didn't even know he was from this planet."
"I didn't even know he existed before the show," Stephanie told Andy Cohen on his Sirius XM Andy show in September 2019
"The couple seem to love each other very much, but there are some strange aspects of their super public relations, including Stefani who didn't know Sheldon for a long time."
“… Especially instagram and the red carpet... "
"Strange things about Gwen Stephanie's relationship with Blake Sheldon. Gwen Stephanie and Blake Sheldon always work together in the studio for duets like go break my heart and everywhere..."



Number  573
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“?#AusOpen pic.twitter.com/l6gAphIqKh — #AusOpen (@AustralianOpen) January 16, 2018”
“Anchorman hits @rogerfederer with the hard questions… ???”
“"Roger, would you describe your game as a silky gazelle?"”
“Watch the interview below.”
“A 2013 sequel grossed more than $176 million domestically.”
“...in the role of a top rated newsman in San Diego...”
“And of course Ferrell had to sign off in classic Ron Burgundy fashion Stay classy Melbourne Also Read Will Ferrell s The House Bombs Star s Worst Opening in 18 Years Anchorman The Legend of Ron Burgundy became a cult hit after it was released in 2004 and starred Ferrell...”
““They remind me of my own name,” Federer joked in response to Ferrell’s question about the audience.”
““Does it get annoying when they scream, ‘Come on, Roger!’ over and over again?” Ferrell asked.”
“Also Read: 'Daddy's Home 2' Film Review: Mark Wahlberg and Will Ferrell Listlessly Pack This Stocking With CoalDuring the interview, Ferrell also asked the tennis player whether he eats wombat to stay fit.”


"? ossop pic.twitter.com/l6gAphIqKh -#Australia open, January 16, 2018
"The host hit @ rogerfederer with sharp questions...??"
"Roger, can you describe your prey as a smooth gazelle?"
"Look at the interview below."
"The sequel in 2013 grossed more than $176 million at the domestic box office."
“… Playing one of the most popular journalists in San Diego... "
"Of course, Ferrer has to sign the classic Ron Burgundy fashion to leave first-class Melbourne also read will Ferrer's house bomb star's worst opening ceremony in 18 years host Ron Burgundy legend became a cult hit after it was released in 2004, starring Ferrer..."
"They remind me of my own name," Federer joked in response to Ferrer's questions about the audience
"When they scream," come on, Roger! " It's not very annoying when I'm on the road! "Over and over again? "Asked Ferrer
"Also read:" Dad's house 2 "film review: mark Walberg and will Ferrer listlessly loaded the stockings with coal in the interview, Ferrer also asked the tennis player whether to eat wombats to keep healthy



Number  574
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Exclusive...”
“Embed Code Restart Real Housewives of New York City Bethenny and Carole s Fight Ramps Up in Colombia Exclusive Watch the First Footage From The Real Housewives of New York City Cast s Cruise From Hell Andy Cohen Addresses Real Housewives of New York City Cast s Cruise From Hell...”
“The longtime star of the Bravo hit has announced she will not return for the 11th season of the show, which will likely begin filming later this year.”
“The 54-year-old released a statement about her decision to depart on Wednesday, which comes before the series' current season, its 10th, finishes airing.”
“The cast has completed filming, however, having taped the reunion special earlier this month.”
“"After six seasons on Bravo’s [Real Housewives of New York City], I have decided to return to what I do best — journalism and producing,” Carole writes.”
“I am sure this does not come as a surprise to any of the viewers all of whom have been supportive encouraging and kind RHONY Star Dorinda Medley Explains Bethenny Frankel and Carole Radziwill s Falling Out Exclusive This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message...”
“...from our sponsors...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Embed Code Restart 'RHONY' Star Dorinda Medley Explains Bethenny Frankel and Carole Radziwill's Falling Out (Exclusive)The show’s current season has largely focused on Carole’s falling out with one-time bestie Bethenny Frankel.”


Exclusive
"Embed code to restart the battle between New York City Real Housewives Bethany and Carol in Columbia upgrade exclusive watch the first shot from New York City real housewife actor cruise from hell Andy Cohen address New York City real housewife actor Chris from hell..."
"The longtime star of great has announced that she won't be in Season 11 again, and the production may start later this year."
"The 54 year old released a statement on Wednesday about her decision to leave before the 10th season of the season
However, the crew has finished filming, recording "reunion special" earlier this month
"After six seasons of Bravo's Real Housewives of New York City, I decided to go back to what I was best at - Journalism and production," Carroll wrote
"I don't think it's going to surprise any audience. They've been supporting, encouraging and kind-hearted Rona singer Dorinda Medley explained that the exclusive falling out between Bethany Frankel and Carol laziwell made this video unusable because we couldn't load information..."
“… From our sponsors... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Embedded code restart 'rhony' star Dorinda Medley explains the fall out between Bethenny Frankel and Carol Radziwill (exclusive) this season focuses on the fall out between Carol and former best actress Bethenny Frankel."



Number  575
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And while a show like Total Bellas may not see a similar pop in viewership—the inaugural season averaged just over 640,000 viewers—it can certainly expect to grow its viewership in the likelihood that it continues to broadcast such intriguing life events.”
“The episode, which occurred in Season 11, drew an impressive 2.28 million viewers.”
“Credit: Eonline.comBrie Bella has adapted quite well to life after WWE as the Divas-era star has been featured in Total Divas, Total Bellas and the popular Bella Twins YouTube channel which, in partnership with WWE, has amassed a staggering 500,000 subscribers in just under a year.”
“The newest addition to the Bella dynasty could be its most important in terms of furthering a brand that has could one day put the Bella Twins on equal footing as some of the biggest giants in both reality television and digital media.”
“Baby Bella Raises Profile of WWE's Reality TV PortfolioIn its Q4 2016 earnings report, WWE singled out the Bella Twins YouTube channel and Total Bellas as highlights of its growing presence in digital media and reality television, respectably.”
“On the strength of reality shows like Total Bellas, WWE was able to increase its television revenues by 23 percent, compared to Q4 2015, with revenues of $68.6 million.”
“With the first Bella baby now conceived, Nikki Bella, Brie Bella, John Cena and Daniel Bryan stand to reap the benefits of surging interest in their monetized post-WWE lives.”
“Credit: WWE.comBirdie Joe Playlist will Attract Millions of Viewers on YouTubeSpecial events have translated to large viewership numbers on the Bella Twins YouTube channel.”
“All four of the aforementioned stars are either retired or part-time performers.”
“The Bella Twins YouTube channel has allowed fans continued access to their lives while they spend time away from the world wide leader and its famed squared circle.”


"Although programs like total Bellas may not have a similar popularity trend in ratings, the average ratings in the first quarter are only more than 640000, and its ratings will certainly increase, because it is likely to continue to broadcast such interesting life events."
"This episode took place in Season 11 and attracted 2.28 million viewers."
"Credit: Eonline.comBrie Bella has been well adapted to the life after WWE, because the star of the divas era has appeared in total divas, total Bellas and the popular Bella twins YouTube channel, which has cooperated with WWE and accumulated an amazing 500000 subscribers in less than a year. "
"The latest members of the Bella dynasty may be one of its most important brands. One day, the Bella twins will become some of the biggest giants in the field of reality TV and digital media."
"Baby Bella has increased the popularity of WWE reality show portfolio. In its Q4 2016 earnings report, WWE specifically pointed out that Bella twins YouTube channel and total Bellas are its growing highlights in digital media and reality TV, which are worthy of respect."
"With reality shows like total Bellas, WWE's TV revenue grew 23% to $68.6 million from the fourth quarter of 2015."
"With the birth of the first baby Bella, Nicky Bella, bribella, John Seine and Daniel Blaine will benefit enormously from their monetized life after World War II."
"Credit: WWE.comBirdie The company, Joe playlist, will attract millions of YouTube viewers, especially on the Bella twins YouTube channel
"These four stars are either retired or part-time."
"The Bella twins YouTube channel keeps fans in touch with their lives as they move away from the global leader and his famous square circle."



Number  576
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Katharine McPhee and David Foster | Credit: Kevin Mazur/GettyRELATED VIDEO: Katharine McPhee Addresses Rumors Surrounding Her Dating Life – ‘I’m Not Doing Anything Wrong’”
“They eventually went public with their romance when they stepped out together at the 2018 Met Gala.”
“The 35-year-old comedy writer and Barely Famous star left a comment on her dad’s Instagram post on Tuesday, calling McPhee, 34, “Mommmyyy” (alongside a sea of heart emoji, natch).”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“David’s other daughter Sara, 37, also got in on the laughs, writing, “Out of the country.”
“What did I miss?”Image zoomIt’s not the first time Erin has poked fun at David and McPhee’s coupling.”
“Back in September as rumors of their romance popped up Erin shared a photo of the two to her Instagram Stories alongside the captions Excited about my new step mom and My parents At the time a source close to David was denying his romance with McPhee and another insider...”
“...explained that Erin s quite obviously tongue in cheek and sarcastic Instagram comments were pointed at those who can t seem to grasp that her dad and Kat can be colleagues collaborators and longtime friends without it being some big romance They can t even perform together without people saying...”
“...they re headed down the aisle the source said...”
““Erin was messing with people who jump to conclusions.”Image zoomImage zoomBut Erin herself wasn’t denying it.”


"Katharine McPhee and David Foster image zooming | image source: Kevin Mazur / gettyrelated Video: Katharine McPhee handles rumors about her dating life –" I didn't do anything wrong "
"They finally came out together at the 2018 blind date party and made their relationship public."
The 35 year old comic writer and unknown star posted a comment on her father's instagram on Tuesday calling 34 year old McPhee "mommyyy"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
David's other daughter, Sarah, 37, also laughed and wrote, "leave the country."
"What did I miss? "It's not the first time Irene has made fun of David and McPhee's relationship."
"As early as September, when their romantic rumor suddenly appeared, Irene shared their photos on instagram, with the title beside them. At that time, a person close to David denied his romantic relationship with McPhee and another insider. She was excited about my new stepmother and my parents..."
“… She explains that Irene is obviously joking and satirizing. Instagram comments point out that those people can't seem to understand that her father and Kate can be colleagues, collaborators and long-term friends. If it's not for some great romance, they can't even perform together. No one says
“… They are walking down the corridor, the source said
"Irene's making trouble with people who jump to conclusions." Irene herself did not deny this



Number  577
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whether Sheeran's "Super Bowl" comment was alluding to Lady Gaga or not, the two stars are now presenting a united front against cyberbullying.”
““I’ve actually come off Twitter completely," he said.”
“Lady Gaga is defending Ed Sheeran after he admitted to nearly quitting Twitter because of all the hate.”
“In an Instagram post Tuesday, Gaga called Sheeran an "incredible talented artist" and implored people to treat him with "love and respect."”
“"I wish all people on the internet would be positive and loving and apart of creating an online community that is kind and empowering, not hateful and mean," she wrote.”
“"No reason to tear down an artist simply because they are on top.”
“Work harder to be kinder everybody.”
“That should be your first duty to humanity."”
“Gaga's post comes after Sheeran told The Sun earlier this week that Twitter trolls prevent him from enjoying the site.”
“As his fans know, Instagram is his social media platform of choice, and the majority of his tweets appear to be auto-generated posts linking to his Instagram account.”


"Whether or not Sheeran's" super bowl "comments allude to Lady Gaga, the two stars are now showing a united front against cyber bullying."
"In fact, I've got rid of twitter completely," he said
"Lady Gaga is defending ed Sheeran because he admitted that he almost quit twitter because of all the hatred."
On instagram on Tuesday, Gaga called Sheeran an "incredibly talented artist" and begged people to treat him with "love and respect."
"I hope that everyone on the Internet will be positive, loving, and committed to creating a kind, powerful, rather than hateful and mean online community," she wrote
"There's no reason to tear down an artist just because he's on top."
"Working hard is better for everyone."
"This should be your first responsibility to mankind."
"Before Gaga published this article, Sheeran told the sun earlier this week that Twitter Troll prevented him from enjoying the site."
"His fans all know that instagram is his preferred social media platform, and most of his microblogs seem to be automatically generated Posts linked to instagram accounts."



Number  578
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pitt was investigated but cleared of all wrongdoing.”
“It came amid allegations that Pitt had been 'rough' with one of their children on a private plane.”
“The estranged couple had been working out the legalities of their split behind closed doors with a private judge.”
“But some of the details of their court battle have been made public and the Hollywood hunk thinks it's 'terrible' for their children Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 12, and twins Vivienne and Knox, nine.”
“Not impressed Brad Pitt reportedly thinks it s disgusting that Angelina Jolie has gone public with their divorce because their children will read about it on social media The Blast reports that Brad 53 thinks it s disgusting that some details have been made public because some of their children...”
“...are old enough to read about it on social media and has been forced to react...”
“The insider has told the publication that Brad is hoping Angelina will eventually see how their bitter battle is hurting the kids and put a stop to it.”
“Last week, Angelina denied parting ways with celebrity divorce attorney Laura Wasser and claimed Brad hadn't paid enough child support to her since their split almost two years ago and that she intends to file a request for a court order.”
“Troubled: Some of the details of their court battle have been made public and the Hollywood hunk thinks it's 'terrible' for their children (pictured in 2015)Trying to make things better?”
“The insider has told the publication that Brad is hoping Angelina will eventually see how their bitter battle is hurting the kids and put a stop to it (stock photo)Her lawyer Samantha Bley DeJean claims that: '[Pitt] has a duty to pay child support.”


"Pete was investigated, but without any fault."
"The incident came at a time when it was alleged that Pete had" rough treated "one of their children on a private plane."
"The separated couple have been studying the legality of separation in private with a private judge."
"But some of the details of their court battle have been made public. The handsome Hollywood guy thinks it's' terrible 'for their children. Maddox, 16, parks, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 12, and twins Vivian and Knox, 9."
"It's reported that Brad Pitt thinks it's disgusting for Angelina Jolie to disclose their divorce because their children will see it on social media. The explosive report says Brad 53 thinks it's disgusting for some details to be disclosed because some of their children..."
“…… I'm old enough to read about it on social media and be forced to respond to it... "
"Brad wants Angelina to finally see how their fight hurt the children and stop it," the source told the media
"Last week, Angelina denied breaking up with celebrity divorce lawyer Laura Wasser and claimed that Brad had not paid her enough child support since her divorce two years ago and that she intended to apply to the court for a ruling."
"Perplexity: some details of their court battle have been made public, and this Hollywood handsome guy thinks it's' terrible 'for their children (photographed in 2015) to try to make things better?"
"The person told the media that Brad hoped Angelina would finally see how their bitter struggle hurt the children and stop there (stock photo) and her lawyer Samantha Bley dejean claimed that" [Pete] is obliged to pay for the child support. "



Number  579
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...celebrities to attend the Royal Wedding...”
“What a joy it has been to see that young boy grow to inherit his mother s warmth sense of humor and courage to stand up and champion the causes he truly believes in George and Amal Clooney David and Victoria Beckham Oprah Winfrey and Idris Elba were among the...”
““I first met an extremely shy and sweet Prince Harry at a private lunch at Kensington Palace, given by his mother Princess Diana for Gianni Versace and me many years ago,” John once said.”
“...of the royal family...”
“Sir Elton performed for the newly married couple in recognition of the close connection he has with Prince Harry and his family John notably performed a revised rendition of his Candle in the Wind at the funeral of Princess Diana Harry s mother in 1997 and was a close friend...”
““Prince Harry asked Sir Elton to perform at the Reception which was hosted by Her Majesty The Queen at St George’s Hall, Windsor Castle,” Kensington Palace confirmed in a statement.”
“Ellie Goulding similarly covered “Your Song” at the wedding of Harry’s brother Prince William and Kate Middleton.”
“...lady,” a nod to Markle’s acting career.”
“...latter song features the lyric L A”
“According to the Daily Mail John took the stage after Prince Harry following his speech asked his guests Does anyone here know how to play the piano John then sat by the piano and performed four songs Your Song Circle of Life I m Still Standing and Tiny Dancer the...”


“… Celebrities at royal weddings... "
"It's a great pleasure to see that this little boy has gradually inherited his mother's warmth, sense of humor and courage and stood up bravely to defend the cause he really believes in. George, Amar Clooney, David, Victoria Beckham, Oprah Winfrey and Idris Elba are all among them..."
John once said, "I first met a very shy and lovely Prince Harry at a private lunch at Kensington Palace, which his mother, Princess Diana, gave to me and Jennie Versace many years ago."
“… "Royal..."
"Sir Elton performed for the newlyweds in recognition of his close ties with Prince Harry and his family. In 1997, John performed a revised version of candle in the wind at the funeral of Harry's mother, Princess Diana. He is a close friend... "
"Prince Harry asked Sir Elton to perform at her Majesty's reception at St. George's Hall in Windsor Castle," Kensington Palace confirmed in a statement
At the wedding of Harry's brother Prince William and Kate Middleton, Ellie gulding also made the cover of your song
“… Ma'am, "it's an affirmation of markel's acting career
“… The latter song is characterized by lyrical "La"
"According to the daily mail, after Prince Harry's speech, John went on stage and asked his guests," can anyone here play the piano? John sat at the piano and performed four songs, I'm still standing, your song of life, and little dancer



Number  580
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...study into everything that s wrong with you...”
““It’s such a crazy game of chance because who knows if you’re going to grow in parallel, if your paths are going to diverge, [or] what’s going to happen,” she said.”
“The 45-year-old actress, who is engaged to marry producer Brad Falchuk, opened up about her prospective on love and marriage to Sarah Jessica Parker on a new episode of her weekly goop podcast.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“I m about to get married again Paltrow stated at the beginning of the podcast adding that while she s a little scared she s also very optimistic I think you should be optimistic the 53 year old Sex and the City alum replied explaining that Paltrow is in a...”
“...completely different place now then when she was getting ready to marry her first husband Chris Martin over a decade ago...”
““You’re a grown-up woman and you’re making a choice for entirely different reasons.”
“Perspective and life experience is everything,” Parker remarked.”
““I think the value of being a sophisticated woman and choosing marriage is promising, don’t you?”Agreeing, Paltrow commented on how difficult it is to choose the right partner when you get married at a young age.”
“Image zoom Gwyneth Paltrow and Brad Falchuk | Credit: Splash NewsPaltrow and Falchuk first met in 2010 when she made a guest appearance on Glee as Holly Holliday, a role for which she won an Emmy Award.”


“… Study all your problems... "
"It's a crazy game of opportunity, because who knows if you're going to grow parallel, if your path is going to diverge, or what's going to happen," she said
The 45 year old actress, who is engaged to producer Brad falchuk, reveals her love and marriage prospects with Sarah Jessica Parker in the weekly goop podcast
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'm going to get married again," Paltrow said at the beginning of the podcast. Although she was a little scared, she was also very optimistic. I think you should be optimistic. The 53 year old sex and city alumni replied that Paltrow was in a city
“…… Ten years ago, when she was going to marry her first husband, Chris Martin, it was totally different now... "
"You're an adult woman and you make choices for completely different reasons."
"Ideas and life experiences are everything," Parker said
"I think the value of being a mature woman and choosing marriage is promising, isn't it? Paltrow agrees, saying how difficult it is to choose the right partner when you get married when you are young
"Image zooming Gwyneth Paltrow and Brad falchuk | image source: splash Newswatch and falchuk first met in 2010 when she guest starred as holly Holliday in glee and won an Emmy for it."



Number  581
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"All the way he'll keep up with Daniela's course of life, and she along with Salmoé will be persistently rooting and supporting him."”
“James is in Germany, ready to continue harvesting triumphs, fill a country full of pride that will always have him in their heart.”
“Daniela will be in Colombia, launching her brand and with national and international projects.”
“'Vidal not for sale at any price'"Both find themselves with significant professional challenges in different countries.”
“They'll always be partners in life in her growth and education," the post reads.”
“It was all in the greatest of terms with one standard agreement, maintaining between them an extraordinary relationship full of love and respect, where the most important thing is the best interest of Salomé.”
“Contigo @jamesrodriguez10 A post shared by Dani Salomé (@daniela_ospina5) on Jul 27, 2017 at 8:49am PDT"Daniela Ospina and James Rodríguez, parents of Salomé Rodríguez Ospina; officialise their separation after six and a half years of marriage.”
“Bayern at 1/8 to win the BundesligaThe couple, who married while both were still teenagers, have a daughter together and say the parting is on mutual terms.”
“The former Real Madrid star, who joined Bayern Munich on loan this summer, and his wife announced the decision with a formal statement on her Instagram page.”
“James Rodriguez and wife Daniela Ospina announce separationThe newly signed Bayern Munich star and his wife have announced a split after six years of marriageJames Rodriguez and his wife Daniela Ospina have announced a split after six years of marriage.”


"Along the way, he will keep up with Daniela's life, and she and Salmo will always support him."
"James is in Germany, ready to continue to win, and a proud country will always have him."
"Daniela will launch her brand in Colombia and work with national and international projects."
"Vidal can't be sold at any price." both find themselves facing major career challenges in different countries
"In her growth and education, they will always be partners in life," the Post wrote
"It's all in a standard agreement to maintain their extraordinary relationship terms of love and respect, among which the most important is Salome's best interests."
“ Contigo@jamesrodriguez10 A post shared by Dani Salom é (@ Daniela è ospina5) at 8:49 a.m. on July 27, 2017 in PDT: "parents of Daniela Ospina and James Rodr í Guez, Salom é Rodr í Guez Ospina; officially separated after six and a half years of marriage."
"Bayern won the Bundesliga championship by 1 / 8. The couple got married when they were both under age. They gave birth to a daughter together and said that breaking up was a condition for both sides."
"The former Real Madrid star joined Bayern Munich on loan this summer, and he and his wife announced the decision in an official statement on instagram's home page
"James Rodriguez and his wife Daniela Ospina announced their separation. The new Bayern Munich star and his wife announced their separation after six years of marriage. James Rodriguez and his wife Daniela Ospina announced their separation after six years of marriage."



Number  582
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But it seems that with the arrival of the new baby, the two are bouncing back.”
“He’s so in love with his kids.” The couple endured a difficult 2016: Kim was robbed in Paris and Kanye was hospitalized for a nervous breakdown.”
““This one in particular came along after a very dark time.”
““Kanye says that his children have saved his life,” the insider further explained.”
“North and Saint are especially thrilled to welcome their baby sister."A source told People that Kanye is a "hands-on" dad.”
“"We are incredibly grateful to our surrogate who made our dreams come true with the greatest gift one could give and to our wonderful doctors and nurses for their special care.”
“"Kanye and I are happy to announce the arrival of our healthy, beautiful baby girl," she wrote.”
“CloseKim made the announcement on her website shortly after the baby's arrival.”
“He held the baby after she was born.”
“Kanye was in the delivery room as well, but remained behind a curtain as to give the surrogate some privacy during birth.”


"But it seems that with the arrival of the new baby, the two are rebounding again."
"He loves his children too much." The couple had a tough 2016: King was robbed in Paris and Kanye was hospitalized for a mental breakdown
"Especially after a very dark time."
"Kanye said his children saved his life," the person familiar with the matter further explained
Kanye is a "do it yourself" father, a source told people
"We are very grateful to our surrogate mother, who has given us the best gift to make our dream come true, and to our excellent doctors and nurses for their special care."
"Kanye and I are happy to announce the arrival of our healthy and beautiful baby girl," she wrote
"Shortly after the baby was born, kloskin announced the news on his website."
"He held the baby when she was born."
"Kanye is also in the delivery room, but in order to give the surrogate a little privacy during childbirth, she has been hiding behind the curtain."



Number  583
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“2/2 — George P. Bush (@georgepbush) April 17, 2018This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Jeb Bush, Jr. urged people to honor her legacy by reading a book to a child, or “finding an opinion different [than] our own.”This content is imported from Twitter.”
“I love you more than tongue can tell, my Ganny.”Some of Bush Hager’s cousins, fellow grandchildren of the former first lady, have also spoken out on social media to remember Barbara Bush.”
“I didn’t mind sharing you with them.”
“Gans, people stopped me all the time to tell me how much they loved you.”
“Thinking of my Gampy tonight —no doubt missing his beloved desperately.”
“She adored my Gampy, the first man she ever kissed; their love story is so engrained in the history of our family.”
“Humor helps, she often said and it does, Gans, but I will miss your laugh terribly.”
“She adored her friends and family; her loyalty was unwavering.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"2 / 2-george p.bush (@ georgepbush) April 17, 2018 this content was created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address."
Jeb Bush, Jr. urged people to respect her legacy by reading a book to their children or "finding a different perspective from ours.". The content was imported from twitter
"I love you more than my tongue can say, my ganny." Some of Bush Hager's cousins, the grandchildren of the former first lady, also publicly expressed their nostalgia for Barbara Bush on social media
"I don't mind sharing you with them."
"Gan, people always stop me from telling me how much they love you."
"Thinking of my little brother tonight - no doubt, he is desperately missing his beloved."
"She adores my boyfriend, the first man she ever kisses; their love stories are deeply rooted in the history of our family."
"Humor helps, she often says, Gans, but I'll miss your laughter a lot."
"She adores her friends and family; her loyalty is unwavering."



Number  584
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“McCann HBO WENN”
“WENN article continues below ad 25 High Sparrow Jonathan Pryce HBO WENN 26 Davos Seaworth Liam Cunningham HBO WENN 27 Daario Naharis Michiel Huisman HBO WENN article continues below ad 28 Bronn Jerome Flynn HBO WENN 29 The Three Eyed Raven Max von Sydow HBO WENN 30 The Hound Rory...”
“...article continues below ad 19 Bran Stark Isaac Hempstead Wright HBo WENN 20 Samwell Tarly John Bradley West HBO WENN 21 Gilly Hannah Murray HBO WENN article continues below ad 22 Jorah Mormont Iain Glen HBO WENN 23 Ellaria Sand Indira Varma HBO WENN 24 Grey Worm Jacob Anderson HBO”
“...below ad 13 Melissandre Carice van Houten HBO WENN 14 King Tommen Baratheon Dean Charles Chapman HBO WENN 15 Margaery Tyrell Natalie Dormer HBO WENN article continues below ad 16 Lord Varys Conleth Hill HBO WENN 17 Nathalie Emmanuel Missandei HBO WENN 18 Lady Olenna Tyrell Diana Rigg HBO WENN”
“...ad 7 Arya Stark Maisie Williams HBO WENN 8 Ramsay Bolton Iwan Rheon HBO WENN 9 Theon Greyjoy Alfie Allen HBO WENN article continues below ad 10 Yara Greyjoy Gemma Whelan HBO WENN 11 Petyr Baelish Aidan Gillen HBO WENN 12 Brienne Of Tarth Gwendoline Christie HBO WENN article continues...”
“1 Daenerys Targaryen Emilia Clarke HBO WENN 2 Jon Snow Kit Harington HBO WENN 3 Tyrion Lannister Peter Dinklage HBO WENN article continues below ad 4 Sansa Stark Sophie Turner HBO WENN 5 Cersei Lannister Lena Headey HBO WENN 6 Jamie Lannister Nikolaj Coster Waldau HBO WENN article continues below...”
“Here are 30 Game of Thrones actors out of costume.”
“However, would you even notice your favorite GoT character without their fantasy inspired clothing?”
“The season finale of Game of Thrones is right around the corner which means we’ll have to wait an entire year before seeing our favorites from the world of Westeros again.”


"Macon home theater"
"Article continues to be lower than advertisement 25 high sparrow Jonathan price HBO Article 26 Davos airworthiness Liam Cunningham HBO Article 27 Dario Na Harry Mitchell whistleman HBO article continues to be lower than advertisement 28 bronjerome Flynn HBO Article 29 three eyed crow Max von track HBO Article 30 hound Rory..."
“… The article continues to be lower than the advertisement 19 branstak Isaac Hempstead Wright HBO Wen 20 sanweltali John Bradley West HBO Wen 21 gilihana Murray HBO Wen the article continues to be lower than the advertisement 22 Jorah Mormont Ian Glenn HBO Wen 23 Elia Shah Indra wama HBO Wen 24 grey worm Jacob Anderson HBO "
“… Below ads 13 Melissa Andre carris van Houten home theater 14 king thomen balassen Dean Charles Chapman home theater 15 Margaret Tyrell Natalie domer home theater 16 article continues below ads 16 Lord Wallis Conrad Hill home theater 17 Natalie Emmanuel missandi home theater 18 lady OLINA Tyrell Diana Rieger "Family cinema"
“… Ad 7 Yaya stark Macy Williams home theater Wen 8 Ramsey Bolton Evan Leon home theater Wen 9 Sean gray Joey Alfie Allen home theater Wen article continues to be lower than ad 10 yarragray Joey Gemma Whelan home theater Wen 11 petil belish Eden giren home theater Wen 12 tarseg windolin Christie home theater Wen article continues... "
"1 Danielle tangurian Emilia Clark HBO Copy2 Jon Snow KITT Harrington HBO copy3 Tyrion Lannister Peter dinkrach HBO copy4 Sansa stark Sofie Turner HBO copy5 Selsey Lannister Lena Heidi HBO copy6 Jamie Lannister Nikolay Coster Waldo HBO copy4 Continue to publish articles.... "
"There are 30" game of Thrones "actors out of their costumes
"However, do you notice that your favorite characters don't have their fantasy inspired costumes?"
"The final season of the game of power is coming, which means we have to wait a whole year to see our favorite westroth world again."



Number  585
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"It's just unbelievable all these people are here, and thank God for Star Wars fans!"”
“He's definitely with me right now," he said.”
“HE RECEIVED QUITE THE BEDSIDEVISIT FROM DARTH VADER HIMSELFWHO HAD A MESSAGE FOR THE LONG FOR THE LIFELONG STAR WARSFAN YOU HAVE BEEN SEVEN YOUHAVE BEEN SUMMONED BY THEEMPEROR HIMSELF TIM RON WAS DIAGNOSED WITHSTAGE FOUR CANCER EARLIER THISYEAR HIS”
“DAUGHTER ELIZABETHPREVIOUSLY PURCHASED TICKETS TOTHE MOVIE THINKING HE WOULD BEWELL ENOUGH TO GO BUT HIS PAIN ONLY GOT WORSE HE IS NOW RECEIVING CARE AT AFACILITY IN BEDFORD ELIZABETH PUT OUT A CALL FORHELP SPARKING AN ONLINE RONSLASTJEDI HER CALL”
“WAS ANSWERED IN A WAYTHAT WAS OUT OF THIS WORLD I NEVER WOULD HAVE IT WOULDTURN OUT LIKE THIS TIM HE RECEIVED AN ESCORT BYFIRST RESPONDERS TO THE THEATERWHERE HE ARRIVED TO APPLAUSEFROM A CAST OF CHARACTERS FROM AGALAXY FAR”
“FAR AWAY TODAY WAS A BIG COMMUNITY EFFORTFROM THE MOVIE THEATER TO THEFIRST RESPONDERS AND EVENCHEWBACCA OUR ROLE IS TO MAKE SURE HESTAYS COMFORTABLE AND CAN ENJOYTHE EXPERIENCE A NEED ARISES AND EVERYONEJOINED IN TO MAKE IT HAPPEN TIM O”
“NEILL CINEMAS DONATED THETHEATER TIME TO RON AND HISENTIRE FAMILY SO THEY COULDENJOY THIS TOGETHER WE ARE ALSO STAR WARS FANS WE COULD WE COULD HELP HIM TIM ALTHOUGH HE IS GOINGTHROUGH A DIFFICULT TIME RON ISFEELING THE FORCE OF”
“GOOD THANKSTO EVERYONE S EFFORTS I HOPE THAT GOD WILL BLESSEACH AND EVERY SINGLE ONE OFTHEM JUST THE WAY I FEEL BLESSEDRIGHT NOW BECAUSE HE ISDEFINITELY WITH ME RIGHT NOW AND IT IS JUST UNBELIEVABLE THATALL OF THESE PEOPLE ARE”
“HERE THANK GOD FOR STAR WARS FANS”
“Advertisement Air Force veteran granted his dying wish to see The Last Jedi Authorities escort ailing Star Wars fan to theater Share Shares Copy Link Copy Last week WMUR interviewed Ron Villemaire a veteran in hospice care whose dying wish...”


"I can't believe all these people are here. Thank you Star Wars fans!"
"He must be with me now," he said
"He received Darth Vader's own bedside visit, and he sent us a message that we would enjoy star wars for a long time - you are seven years old - you have been summoned by the Pope himself - and Tim Ron was diagnosed with four stages of cancer earlier this year."
"My daughter Elizabeth used to buy a movie ticket and thought that he would be good enough to go, but his pain would only get worse. He is now in a hospital in Bedford. Elizabeth sent out a call for help, which triggered an online ronslastjedi call to her."
"It was answered in an extraordinary way, and I would never let it be like this, Tim, who was escorted by the first responder to the theater, where he received applause from a group of characters that agalesi had come all the way."
"Today, far away, from the cinema to the first responder, even Chewbacca, is a big community. Our responsibility is to make sure that he is comfortable and can enjoy the experience he needs, and everyone is involved in making it a reality, Tim o"
"Neil films donated heating time to Ron and his family so they could celebrate together. We are also fans of Star Wars. We can help him, Tim, even though he's going through a difficult time when Ron feels the strength
"Thank you for everyone's efforts. I hope God will bless everyone as I feel now, because he is with me now. It's incredible that all these people are like this."
"Thank you Star Wars fans"
"The ad Air Force veteran agreed to his last wish, hoping to see the last Jedi authority escort the sick Star Wars fan to the theater to share a copy of the shares. Last week, wmur interviewed a dying care veteran, Ron velaimer, whose last wish was..."



Number  586
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tickets go on sale to the general public starting Friday, May 18 at Ticketmaster.com.”
“American Express® Card Members can purchase tickets before the general public beginning Tuesday, May 15 at 10am through Thursday, May 17 at 10pm.”
“...release of Drake s fifth full length album Scorpion which is preceded by the singles God s Plan and Nice For What His latest mixtape More Life dropped in March of last year...”
“On it fans can probably expect to see the two acts team up for some kind of re enactment of the brilliant Soul Train themed video for their collaborative song Walk It and Talk It from Migos latest album Culture II The tour launches a month after the June 28”
“Produced by Live Nation, the 41-date outing will kick off July 26 in Salt Lake City, UT and visit cities across the U.S. and Canada including Toronto, New York, Los Angeles, Detroit, Boston, Miami, Vancouver, and many more.”
“(Drake’s real name is Aubrey Drake Graham.)”
“This morning Drake announced the awesomely named “Aubrey and the Three Amigos Tour” that will see him joined by Atlanta trio Migos for a 41-date, continent-spanning North American tour that will carry on for the better part of four months.”


Tickets will be available to the public on Friday afternoon, May 18 Ticketmaster.com .”
"American Express members can purchase tickets in public from 10 a.m. on Tuesday, May 15 to 10 p.m. on Thursday, May 17."
“… Release Drake's fifth full-length album scorpion, which is prior to the single God's plan and nice what, his latest mixed tape more life down in March last year... "
"On this album, fans may see a replay of the two actors' wonderful soul train theme video for their co song walk it and talk it, which is the tour of migos' latest album Culture II launched one month after June 28."
The 41 date tour, produced by living, will open on July 26 in Salt Lake City, Utah, and will visit many cities in the United States and Canada, including Toronto, New York, Los Angeles, Detroit, Boston, Miami, Vancouver, etc
"(Drake's real name is Aubrey Drake Graham)"
This morning, Drake announced a wonderful performance called "Aubrey and three friends Tour", when he will join Atlanta trio Miggs in a 41 day tour across the North American continent, which will last for most of four months



Number  587
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And, now that I have a baby, I still want to keep something that’s my time, my space, something I’m doing for myself.””
““Exercise is something I’ve always used to maintain my sanity and relieve stress.”
“Khloé Kardashian says she has lost 33 lbs in the three months since she gave birth to daughter True, her first child, on April 12.”
“In a post on her official app, the 34-year-old reality star credited a “combination of breastfeeding and being very active” for the impressive weight loss.”
“Mommy’s Little Love A post shared by Khloé (@khloekardashian) on May 26, 2018 at 2:13pm PDT“After I had True, I didn’t put any pressure on myself to lose the baby weight,” Kardashian wrote.”
““I just wanted to get back to my regular routine from before I got pregnant, which was working out five to six times a week.”Then Kardashian got down to specifics: “Here is where I am at currently.”
“True turned 3 months old on July 12.”
“I honestly didn’t give myself a number that I wanted to lose by this time, especially since I wasn’t able to work out for the first six weeks.”
“But, since then, I’ve lost 33 pounds!”
“I’m shocked that I lost that much weight that quickly.”


"And now that I have children, I still want to keep something, that's my time, my space, what I do for myself."
"Exercise is something I've always used to keep my head clear and relieve stress."
Kardashian said she has lost 33 pounds in three months since she gave birth to her first child, a real daughter, on April 12
The 34 year old reality TV star posted a post on her official app praising the "combination of breastfeeding and being very active" for her remarkable weight loss effect
Kardashian wrote: "a post shared by khlo é (@ KhloeKardashian) on May 26, 2018 at 2:13 p.m. Pacific time:" after I got the real one, I didn't put any pressure on myself to lose weight. "
"I just want to go back to my normal life before I got pregnant and exercise five to six times a week." Then Kardashian began to say specifically, "this is where I am now."
"It's really three months old on July 12."
"To be honest, I didn't give myself a number I wanted to lose at this time, especially because I couldn't exercise for the first six weeks."
"But since then, I've lost 33 pounds!"
"I'm shocked that I've lost so much weight so quickly."



Number  588
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”
“A teaser of epic proportions, the biggest reveal takes shape in the return of Eleven (Millie Bobby Brown), as the iconic eggo waffles enthusiast who finally makes an appearance having been absent from the forthcoming season's promotional trails.”
“While Will Byers has been rescued from the Upside Down, a darker, more dangerous threat is looming over the town of Hawkins.”
“The Demogorgon of the first chapter makes way for the "Shadow Monster" born in Will's "PTSD-like visions of" his season one experience.”
“Speaking about the new run of episodes, co-creator Ross Duffer of the Duffer Brothers previously said: “It’s all connected to this singular threat, which is tied into this shape that Will sees in the sky."”
“In the final Stranger Things 2 trailer the stakes keep rising, as the survivors of season one face the horrors from their nightmares as they creep into reality.”
“Eleven has no choice but to return.”
“The Duffer Brothers revealed that the forthcoming season acts as a "movie sequel" to the first instalment with the marketing campaign branding the new episodes as Stranger Things 2, as opposed to Stranger Things season 2.”
“TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for Show all 16 1 16 TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for Jessica Jones Starring Krysten Ritter Rachael Taylor Carrie Anne Moss David Tennant Start date 8 March Netflix Netflix TV preview 2018”


"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list and agree to the terms..."
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here independent culture newsletters best movie music TV broadcast will be sent directly to your in box every week..."
"An epic proportion of banter, the biggest unveiling form in the return of eleven (Millie Bobbie Brown), as the iconic waffle aficionado who finally appears absent in the upcoming season's promotional line."
"Although will Byers has been rescued from the fall, there is a darker and more dangerous threat hanging over Hawkins."
"The demons in the first chapter make way for the" shadow monster "born in the illusion of post-traumatic stress disorder in will's first season experience."
Speaking of the new series, Ross duffer, co-author of the duffer brothers, once said: "it's all about this strange threat, this threat is about this shape that can be seen in the sky."
"In the last" stranger's business 2 "trailer, the stakes keep rising, because the survivors of the first season face the horror of their nightmares, and they quietly enter the reality."
"Eleven has no choice but to return."
Dover brothers revealed that the upcoming season will be the "movie sequel" of the first season, and the marketing campaign will name the new series "stranger's business 2" instead of "stranger's business 2"
"2018 TV preview all attention programs all 16 1 16 TV preview 2018 TV preview all attention 2018 TV preview all attention Jessica Jones starring krysten Ritter Rachael Taylor carrier Anne Moss David Tennant start date March 8, 2018 Netflix TV preview"



Number  589
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I would never want it to feel like we overstayed our welcome.”Press PLAY above and then hit the comments with your thoughts on Gilmore Girls: Another Year in the Life.”
““I don’t know if there’s a need to do more.”
““Now it’s become what can we [still] do with this story that’s satisfying, that [makes it] worth continuing, that will be gratifying to the people who care so much about it,” Graham said.”
“...the subject of a second revival...”
“It doesn t help me do a better job Gilmore Girls Revival The Best Quotes Also in the Q A Graham and co star Alexis Bledel shared their markedly divergent opinions about those infamous final four words the former loved it the latter loved it less before weighing in on...”
“As an actor, [whenever] I’ve watched myself it just makes me feel self-conscious.”
““I will give it a good 10 years and then maybe I’ll check it out.”
““As a rule, I don’t find it helpful to watch myself in anything,” Lorelai’s portrayer confessed to me last month at Deadline’s The Contenders Emmy event in Los Angeles (video of which is now available above).”
“And she has no desire to remedy that anytime soon.”
“Gilmore Girls: A Year in the Life made its Netflix debut six long months ago and Lauren Graham still has not seen a single frame of the four-part revival.”


"I don't want you to think that our welcome time is too long." Click on the play above and add your thoughts on Gilmore girl in the comments: another year in your life. "
"I don't know if it's necessary to do more."
"Now, what can we (still) do with this satisfying story to make it worth continuing, to satisfy people who care so much about it," Graham said
“… The theme of the second renaissance... "
"It doesn't help me to complete the revival of Gilmore girl better. The best quotation also appears in Q & A. Graham and co star Alexis Bradell share their obviously different views on those infamous last four words. The former loves it, the latter doesn't love it so much, and then weigh them up..."
"As an actor, I look at myself (all the time) and it just makes me feel self-conscious."
"I'll give it a good 10 years, and then maybe I'll see it."
"As a rule, I don't think it's helpful to look at myself in anything," Lorelei's actor admitted to me last month at the deadline Emmy event in Los Angeles (video can now be seen above)
"And she doesn't want to make it up in the short term."
"Gilmore girl: a year of life" debuted on Netflix six months ago, and Lauren Graham has yet to see the four part film



Number  590
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Exclusive)Tiffany Haddish Says She Wants Leonardo DiCaprio to Be Her 'Baby Daddy' (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“Check your wig cap @tiffanyhaddish ....I love u and I will never take from you.”
“So does getting Kevin Hart to take back a loan!”
“In 2017, Tiffany Haddish went from a struggling actor to an overnight sensation thanks to her hilarious performance in the film Girls Trip.”
“And now Haddish is looking to pay back the people who helped her along the way -- namely Hart.”
“Back in the day, Hart loaned Haddish $300, all the money he had on him at the time, when he discovered she was living in her car.”
“Now, the 38-year-old actress is working hard to return the money.”
“Really hard.”
“Hart just posted a video of his Night School co-star dumping dollar bills on him during an interview on set.”
“I love my sister tiffanyhaddish She has been trying to pay me back for years I refused to take the money so she ambushed me on set and made it rain on me Hart went on to add that what she doesn t know is that I put the money...”


(exclusive) Tiffany hadish said she wanted Leonardo DiCaprio to be her "baby dad" (exclusive) related gallery... "
"Look at your wig cap @ Tiffany hardish I love you and I will never take it from you
"It's the same with Kevin Hart getting the loan back!"
"In 2017, Tiffany haddash became famous overnight as a struggling actor with his funny performance in the film" journey of girls. "
"Now hadish is going to repay the person who helped her along the way - Hart."
"That day, Hart found that hadish lived in the car and lent her all the money she had at that time for $300."
"Now, the 38 year old actress is trying to pay back the money."
"It's really hard."
"Hart just released a video of him throwing dollars at his night school partner in an interview on the set."
"I love my sister Tiffany hadish. She wanted to pay me back for many years. I refused to accept the money, so she ambushed me on the set and surprised me. Hart added, "what she doesn't know is that I put the money in..."



Number  591
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Warning: Explicit language...”
“The Atlanta-based management company and record label has seen stratospheric success in recent years modeling its business after such game-changing entities as Cash Money and No Limit.”
“She joins Migos and Lil Yachty on the QC roster of star acts.”
“Earlier this week, Variety broke the news that Cardi has new management in Quality Control’s Kevin “Coach K” Lee and Pierre “Pee” Thomas.”
“Bruno Mars Finesse which she performed with him on the Grammy Awards earlier this year...”
“...the rapper s breakout hit Bodak Yellow and its follow up Bartier Cardi She has released two mixtapes to date Gangsta Bitch Music Volume 1 in 2916 and Volume 2 in 2017 and has made a host of guest appearances on songs and on television most recently Migos MotorSport and...”
“While information about the album has been kept under wraps for months despite a constant barrage of questions and she s been teasing a number of songs on her Instagram account without revealing titles it s safe to assume that the new single will be on it as well as...”
“...to a piece of s t Cardi s debut studio album Invasion of Privacy is due on April 6 with an appearance on Saturday Night Live the following night and her Coachella debut the following two weekends...”
“Yeah it s not a threat it s a warning There s also a cute reference to TLC s 1994 infidelity themed hit Creep in the opening lyrics that set the song s tone I gave you TLC you wanna creep and s t I poured out my whole heart...”
“You gonna gain the whole world, but is it worth the girl that you’re losing?” she sings on the chorus.”


Warning: explicit language
"The Atlanta based management and record company has been a huge success in recent years, with its business model built after game changing entities like cash and unlimited."
"She's on Miggs and lil Archie's star list."
Earlier this week, variety reported that Caddy's new coaches, Kevin Lee and Pierre Thomas, were in quality control
"The skills Bruno Mars performed with him at the Grammy Awards earlier this year..."
“…… Pop rap song bodak yellow and her follow-up work bartier Cardi she released two remixes, dating gangster whore music in Volume 1 of 2916 and Volume 2 of 2017 respectively, and making guest appearances on songs and TV many times, most recently migos motorsport and... "
"Although the information about this album has been kept secret for several months, and despite a series of problems, she has been talking about some songs in her instagram account, but has not disclosed the title. It is certain that the new single will also appear on this album..."
“… S t Cardi's first studio album, invasion of privacy, will be released on April 6. It will appear live on Saturday night the next night, and the next two weekends will be her first album of Coachella.... "
"Yes, it's not a threat, it's a warning, there's also a lovely reference to TLC's 1994 infidelity theme hit lyrics, which set the tone of the song, I give you TLC, you want to climb, I pour my whole heart..."
"You will win the whole world, but is the girl you lost worth it? "She sings in the choir."



Number  592
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“InstagramAlyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“"The images were taken by The Duchess shortly before Princess Charlotte left for her first day of nursery at the Willcocks Nursery School."”
“Charlotte wore a red coat, red Mary Janes, a red bow, and had the most radiant smile:Instagram"The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge are very pleased to share two photographs of Princess Charlotte at Kensington Palace this morning," Kensington Palace captioned its Instagrams of the photos.”
“Princess Charlotte starts nursery school today, and to mark the occasion, Kate Middleton generously took and shared two photos of her daughter.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor at instagram Alyssa Bailey ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
"These pictures were taken by the Duchess of Charlotte shortly before her first day at Wilcox kindergarten."
Charlotte is wearing a red coat, a red Mary Jens, a red bow and a radiant smile: instagram "the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge are very happy to share two photos of Princess Charlotte at Kensington Palace this morning," Kensington Palace added a title to its instagram
Kate Middleton generously took and shared two photos of her daughter in honor of her kindergarten start today



Number  593
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But Girardi was having a more cordial exchange with Chrissy Teigen when the 31-year-old model joked the her age was “Icy Hot patch wearer” and the reality star replied: “Same.””
“...full on war...”
“Girardi s five week DWTS run followed an emotional roller coaster of a season on RHOBH which culminated in her melting down over a comment about her son before having several fiery exchanges with nemesis Dorit Kemsley and Kemsley s husband PK about a misguided joke that developed into a...”
“Image zoomGirardi was eliminated fourth from Dancing after she struggled with letting herself loose in the ballroom — a shock to many fans, considering her dance music performing persona Erika Jayne is known for flashy, sexy performances and skintight costumes.”
“...stuck with an IV needle and clamped by a pulse monitor...”
“Ever the showgirl Girardi joked in one shot that the hospital lighting is amazing Image zoom Credit Erika Jayne Instagram In another she wears a surgical head covering that obscures her flowing blonde hair and a third picture shows the well manicured nails on her right hand which has been...”
“Girardi, 45, posted Instagram Stories this morning chronicling a surgical procedure she had for an upper body tear, according to TMZ, that sidelined her from DWTS’ finale on Monday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star also known as Erika Girardi sustained an injury during her run on the most recent season of Dancing with the Stars.”
“Ever the showgirl, Girardi joked in one selfie that "hospital lighting is amazing"Erika Jayne Hospitalized: RHOBH Star Heads into Surgery for Secret Dancing with the Stars InjuryErika Jayne has been keeping a secret.”


But Gilardi's communication with Chris tegan was more intimate. The 31 year old model joked that the girl at her age was "the wearer of ice and fire." the reality TV star replied, "the same."
“… Full of war... "
"Girardi spent an emotional season on RHOBH. After five weeks of DWTS running, she was depressed about a comment on her son. After that, she had several heated exchanges with dorit Kemsley and her husband PK about a misguided joke, which turned into a..."
"Image zoom Girardi was knocked out of fourth place after struggling to relax in the Ballroom - a shock to many fans, considering that her dance performance character Erika Jayne is famous for her gorgeous, sexy performances and tight clothes."
“… Stuck in an IV needle, stuck in a pulse monitor... "
"There was once a picture in which Girardi, a female artist, joked that the lights in the hospital were amazing. In another photo, Erica Jenn instagram wears a surgical headgear to cover her flowing blonde hair. In the third photo, the manicured nails on her right hand are already... "
Gilardi, 45, posted a report on instagram this morning documenting the procedure of her upper body tear, which prevented her from attending Monday's DWTS finale, TMZ reported
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The real housewife of Beverly Hills stars, also known as Erica Girardi, was injured in a recent season's dance with stars competition."
Gilardi, a former showgirl, joked in a selfie that "the lights in the hospital are wonderful." Erica Jayne is in hospital: the RHOBH star enters the operating room and dances with the star secretly. Injury Erika Jayne keeps a secret



Number  594
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rocky, who owns a karaoke company, told The Miami Herald his daughter believes Sheeran is singing her father’s songs.”
“We’ll see you tomorrow!”Sheeran has a concert scheduled Thursday in Orlando, Florida.”
““‘Cause she’s gonna be chill.”FROM PEN: Grammy News and Notes: Album of the Year NomineesRocky later posted the video to his Facebook account and wrote, “Ed Sheeran we didn’t get a picture with you tonight, but you singing to my daughter was pretty amazing.”
““I want you to be as loud as you can,” he told the crowd.”
“Just chilling there for the whole thing and you guys have been loud, you’re singing and she’s just kinda like … I love babies!”He dedicated his song “Dive” to Cooper, asking the audience to sing along for her.”
““Her middle name is Sheeran?” the singer asked, and added, “I’ve never seen a baby this calm at a concert.”
“Cooper’s parents, Rocky Smith and Harmony Smith, spoke to Sheeran from the crowd, telling him of their daughter’s middle name.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The “Shape of You” singer, 26, dedicated a song to a special member of his Miami, Florida, audience on Wednesday: a 1-year-old baby named Cooper Sheeran, whose parents named her after him.”
“Ed Sheeran has met his biggest fan!”


Rocky, who owns a karaoke company, told the Miami Herald that his daughter believed Sheeran was singing her father's song
"See you tomorrow! Sheeran is scheduled to give a concert in Orlando, Florida, on Thursday
"Because she'll be cold." From PEN:Grammy News  and  Notes:Album of  Rocky, the year's nominee, later uploaded the video to his Facebook account and wrote, "edsheeran, we didn't have a picture with you tonight, but it's great that you sang to my daughter."
"I want you to be as loud as you can," he told the crowd
"The whole thing is chilling. You're always loud. You're singing. She's like I love children! He dedicated his song "diving" to Cooper and asked the audience to sing for her
"Her middle name is Sheeran? The singer asked, adding, "I've never seen such a quiet baby at a concert."
Cooper's parents, rocky Smith and harmone Smith, spoke to Sheeran from the crowd and told him their daughter's middle name
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 26 year old "your shape" singer gave a song to a special audience in Miami, Florida, on Wednesday: a 1-year-old baby named Cooper Sheeran after his parents
"Ed Sheeran met his biggest fan!"



Number  595
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You are (nearly) an adult now, and not just your mother’s daughter, so don’t let other adults tell you what to do, OK?”
“But good luck, Kaia.”
“...cover of French Vogue...”
“Because contrary to what you might think celebrity children don t have to be famous the parents just have to choose to keep them away from red carpet events to get their lawyers to threaten tabloids that publish unobscured photos of them and not to pose with them on the...”
“There is a sharp divide among celebrities between those who put their kids in the limelight, and those who very much don’t, and I’m always intrigued as to which celebrity chooses which path.”
“She is the daughter of Cindy Crawford and the rather amusingly named Rande Gerber, who is also, it turns out, George Clooney’s best friend, neatly proving this column’s theory that all famous and vaguely famous people know each other.”
“But – and you might have seen this coming – the key detail here is that Kaia is a celebrity offspring.”
“Perhaps you are thinking that this seems a little OTT for your run-of-the-mill pretty teenage girl, which it is.”
“The media coverage of her 16th was, shall we say somewhat thigh-rubbing, with the British tabloids in particular barely able to control their excitement that young Kaia is now legally of age – in the UK anyway, if not in her home state of California.”
“...bandeau top and high waisted jeans...”


"You're (almost) an adult now, not just your mother's daughter, so don't let other adults tell you what to do, OK?"
"Good luck, Kaya."
“… French fashion magazine cover... "
"Because, contrary to what you might think celebrity children don't have to be famous, parents just have to choose to keep them away from red carpet activities, let their lawyers threaten tabloids that publish their unobtrusive photos, rather than I'll take a picture with them
"Among celebrities, there is a clear difference between those who put their children in the spotlight and those who don't. I've always been curious about which celebrity will choose which way."
"She's Cindy Crawford's daughter, and a rather interesting name is Rand Gerber, and it turns out that she's also George Clooney's best friend, cleverly proving the theory of this column that all celebrities and unknown people know each other."
"But - as you may have seen - the key detail here is that Kaya is a descendant of a celebrity."
"Maybe you are thinking that it seems a little too much for your unchanging pretty girl. That's the truth."
"We can say that the media coverage of her 16-year-old is a little bit thigh rubbing, especially the British tabloids can hardly control their excitement. Young Kaya is now a legal adult - anyway, in the UK, if not in her hometown California."
“… Striped top and high waisted jeans... "



Number  596
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“#chocprom2018 #chocprom.””
“The prom’s theme this year was “Around the World in One Night.”Gomez posed for photos and videos with several fans and the event captioned one of them by writing, “And then @selenagomez shows up at your prom ….”
“Other celebrities at the event included Jack Black and “Grey’s Anatomy” stars Sarah Drew, James Pickens Jr., Caterina Scorsone and Kevin McKidd.”
“The singer made an appearance on Saturday night at the Children’s Hospital Orange County’s oncology prom event, which supports teens and young adults undergoing cancer treatment as well as post-treatment survivors.”
“From www.theblast.comBy Daniel GoldblattSelena Gomez is once again killing ’em with kindness.”


“#chocprom 2018#chocprom。”
"The theme of this year's dance is" travel around the world overnight. " Gomez took a group photo with several fans. The title of the event is "then @ selenagomez appears at your dance party..."
Other celebrities at the event include Jack Black and Sarah drew, James Pickens Jr., Katrina scorson and Kevin mckead, stars of Gray's anatomy
"The singer appeared at the cancer dance at Orange County children's Hospital on Saturday night, which provides support for teenagers and young people receiving cancer treatment and survivors after treatment."
"From www.theblast.comBy The company, Daniel Goldblatt, Selena Gomez, once again mercifully killed them



**Something goes wrong**
“And catch new episodes of Bravo’s Weekly Pregame on Sundays at bravotv.com.”
“Check out a preview of some more Ramona vs. Bethenny drama to come, below.”
“Make sure to tune in to Part 1 of the RHONY reunion, airing Wednesday, August 22, at a special time, 8/7c.”
“The upcoming reunion promises to show how they feel after wrapping a tense season with each other.”
“Can Ramona and Bethenny ever make up or has the rift gotten too big?”
“Ouch!”
“Bethenny became successful because of the show."”
“"I mean, all of us women on the show were very successful even before we did the show.”
“"I'm at this Halloween party and she tells me, 'Don't talk to me until you're a success," Ramona said.”
“Ramona elaborated on their issues and gave a hint as to what's to come on the reunion when talking to Daryn Carp on Bravo's Weekly Pregame.”


Watch Bravo's weekly pre match new show in Sunday's game, Bravo TV network. "
"Look at the preview of more of Ramona's and Bethany's plays that will be staged next."
"Be sure to watch the first part of Ronnie's reunion on Wednesday, August 22, 8 / 7."
"The coming reunion promises to show how they feel after a tense season."
"Will Ramona and besseini make up? Or is the crack too big? "
"Ouch!"
"Besseini was successful because of the performance."
"I mean, all of our women were very successful before the show."
"I was at a Halloween party and she told me, 'don't talk to me until you succeed,'" Ramona said
"When Ramona talked to Darrin Kapp before Bravo's weekly game, she elaborated on their problems and hinted at what would happen to the reunion."



Number  598
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share Your Thoughts...”
“Who’s excited for The Paynes?”
“This is going to be epic!”
“Lance Gross and Tyler Perry both shared pictures of the former cast on set.”
“It also appears that members from the original cast will be returning for the spinoff in some capacity.”
“The series will reportedly star Emmy winner Jackée Harry, Stephanie Charles, Markice Moore, JD McCrary and Sanai Victoria.”
“The spinoff will follow Curtis and Ella Payne trying to enjoy their retirement in Florida only to get roped into a real estate deal that will tumble their lives like clothes in a dryer.”
“Perry has created more hit television series, but fans have been longing for the Paynes to return.”
“House of Payne ran for 254 episodes before going off the air.”
“This is the second spinoff from the show following Meet the Browns, which also aired on TBS.”


"Share your thoughts..."
"Who's excited about the Penns?"
"It's going to be epic!"
"Lance gross and Tyler Perry shared photos of former actors on set."
"It seems that members of the original crew will also come back to participate in derivative plays in some capacity."
According to reports, the show will be starred by Emmy winners Jack Harry, Stephanie Charles, Marcus Moore, JD McClary and Sanai Victoria
"Curtis and Ella Penn are trying to retire in Florida, but they are involved in a real estate deal that will make their lives roll like clothes in a dryer."
"Perry has created more popular TV series, but fans have been longing for the return of the Penns."
Penn's house aired 254 episodes before it went off the air
"This is the second derivative of the play after meet brown, which is also broadcast on TBS."



Number  599
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO:”
“CBS will broadcast the 72nd annual Tony Awards live from Radio City Music Hall June 10, with Sara Bareilles and Josh Groban on board to host.”
“With a roster of candidates that includes Harry Potter and the Cursed Child Mean Girls and Frozen these are the Tony nominations biggest snubs and surprises SURPRISE Amy Schumer Meteor Shower The Steve Martin comedy Meteor Shower was one of the season s giant hits thanks to Schumer s name...”
“...on the marquee...”
“But after the show earned very mixed reviews, no one expected Tony nominators to remember it particularly favorably, and even if they did, a nomination seemed most likely to have gone to Tony favorite Laura Benanti.”
“Still, Schumer’s performance impressed nominators enough that now she’ll add an extra jolt of star power to the ceremony, where she’s up against acting royalty Glenda Jackson, among others, in the race for lead actress in a play.”
“SNUB: Chris Evans, “Lobby Hero”The “Avengers: Infinity War” actor has surprised a lot of Broadway audiences with his turn in “Lobby Hero,” in which he plays, very convincingly, a deeply unlikable cop who’s a far cry from Captain America.”
“But with shows like “Angels in America” and “The Iceman Cometh” also in the mix, the field of male actors was particularly packed this season, and while nominators found room for “Lobby Hero” cast members Brian Tyree Henry and Michael Cera, Evans was left out.”
“SURPRISE: Michael Cera, “Lobby Hero”Playing a slacker doorman in “Lobby Hero,” Michael Cera gives a performance that’s so on-brand for the actor and so seemingly effortless that theatergoers have dismissed his work in what some might not notice is the play’s linchpin role.”
“But Tony nominators didn’t make that mistake, giving Cera a nod for his skilled, subtle work.”


Related videos:
"CBS will broadcast the 72nd annual Tony Awards live on June 10 at the broadcasting City Concert Hall, with Sarah barreles and Josh Groban as hosts."
"Harry Potter", "the cursed child", "bad girl" and "freezing three feet" are Tony's nominees, which are the biggest coldness and surprise to Amy Schumer's "meteor shower". Steve Martin's comedy "meteor shower" is one of the season's masterpieces because of Schumer's name
“… On the tent... "
"But after the show has won mixed reviews, no one expects Tony's nominees to be particularly optimistic about it, even if they remember that the nomination seems most likely to be Tony's favorite Laura BianTi."
"Even so, Schumer's performance has left enough deep impression on the nominees. Now she will add extra star power to the award ceremony. In a drama heroine competition, she will compete with the royal family of performing arts, such as Glenda Jackson."
"Cold shoulder: Chris Evans, the actor of" Hall hero "and" Avenger: Infinite War "in" Hall hero "surprised many Broadway audiences. He plays a very unpopular policeman in the play, far from the American team leader."
"But with the mix of" angels in America "and" Iceman coming, "the cast is particularly crowded this season. Although the nominees are Brian Tilly Henry and Michael Cera of" lobbying heroes ", Evans is excluded."
"Surprise: Michael sella, the hall hero plays a lazy doorman in the hall hero. Michael sella's performance is so famous for the actors, and seems so relaxed that the audience despises his work. Some people may not notice the key role of the play."
"But Tony's nominees didn't make that mistake, because his skilful and skilful work confirmed Sierra."



Number  600
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more of Pitchfork’s coverage of this year’s Golden Globe Awards.”
“Jon Brion scored Lady Bird’s soundtrack, which is out on vinyl on February 23.”
“Ronan won for Best Actress in a Musical or Comedy Motion Picture, Laurie Metcalf was up for Best Supporting Actress in a Motion Picture, and Gerwig was nominated for Best Screenplay.”
“Lady Bird, the coming of age tale starring Saoirse Ronan, was written and directed by Greta Gerwig.”
“It was up against James Franco’s The Disaster Artist, Jordan Peele’s Get Out, The Greatest Showman, and I, Tonya.”
“Lady Bird has won Best Motion Picture, Musical or Comedy at the 2018 Golden Globes.”


"Read more about pitchfork's coverage of this year's Golden Globes."
On February 23, Jon Brien recorded the soundtrack of "Lady Bird" on vinyl
Ronan won the best actress in a musical or comedy, Laurie Metcalf the best supporting actress in the film, and Gerwig the best screenplay nomination
Lady bird is an adult novel starring saorse Ronan, written and directed by Greta gweger
"It's right with James Franco's disaster artist, Jordan Peel's going out, the greatest performer and me, Tonia."
"Mrs. bird won the Golden Globe for best film, music or comedy in 2018."



**Something goes wrong**
“Now series star Lea Michele has revealed which of those songs was the worse.”
“But quality and focus seemed to peter out after a few years, resulting in awkward storylines and even more awkward musical numbers.”
“Glee was massively popular in its early seasons, earning a handful of Emmys and Golden Globes in the process.”
“But before he basically owned a network, Ryan Murphy has his TV start with shows like Nip/Tuck and the musical extravaganza Glee.”
“The producer/director/writer has a litany of small screen projects currently airing, including American Horror Story, American Crime Story, and Feud.”
“If you have access to the cable network FX, you'll notice that Ryan Murphy is just about everywhere.”


"Now series Star Leah Michelle has revealed which song is worse."
"But after a few years, the quality and focus seem to be gradually disappearing, leading to the embarrassment of the storyline and the embarrassment of the music numbers."
Glee was very popular in the first few seasons, winning Emmy and Golden Globes in the process
"But before he basically owned a network, Ryan Murphy's TV series started with Nip / Tuck and glee."
Producer / Director / screenwriter currently has a series of small screen shows on air, including "American horror story", "American crime story" and "world feud"
"If you have access to the cable network FX, you'll find that Ryan Murphy is almost everywhere."



Number  602
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The marriage is definitely over though and they’re just trying to work through things as parents and act appropriately for their kids.””
“It’s no longer toxic,” the source continued.”
“...sort of...”
“While cleaning out her garage on Wednesday, the 33-year-old former Playboy model admitted to needing some assistance.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Maybe now is the time for a dating app just to help me with my garage,” Wilkinson wrote on her Instagram Story with crying laughing emojis.”
“In the photo, Wilkinson can be seen posing in front of several storage boxes.”
““I need a man please,” Wilkinson continued.”
““Wait no I don’t.”“#divorcesucks,” Wilkinson added.”
“Moments later, the reality TV star stumbled upon a DVD of season 1 of her show Kendra, which followed her life with ex-husband Hank Baskett after leaving the Playboy Mansion.”


"However, the marriage is definitely over. They just want to deal with things as parents and take appropriate actions for their children."
"It's no longer toxic," the source continued
“… A little... "
"While cleaning the garage on Wednesday, the 33 year old former Playboy model admitted that she needed some help."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Maybe it's time to fix my garage with a dating app," Wilkinson wrote in her instagram story, laughing and crying
"In the photo, Wilkinson can be seen posing in front of several storage bins."
"I need someone," Wilkinson continued
"Wait, no, I don't know." "Divorce shit," Wilkinson added
Soon after, the reality star stumbled across a DVD of her first season of Kendra, about her life with her ex husband Hank Basquet after leaving Playboy's mansion



Number  603
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There are opportunities for beauty companies to take this even further and approach their data stack like “Color Camouflaging,” using specific data points to counteract problems and create tailored solutions that look and feel seamless.”
“Deep learning for cosmetics is so sophisticated that AI assistants can now understand and cater to unique facial geometrics, eye shapes and skin tones with minimal human input.”
“And with some of these scanners treating wrinkles, blemishes, or dark spots directly — they might replace dermatologists altogether sometime in the near future.”
“With such level of awareness and prevention, consumers are bound be become much more knowledgeable about their skin health.”
“Skin-based UV sensors will also be able to soon protect us from overexposure to the sun, having developed so quickly that they now come in the form of nail stickers.”
“Powered by artificial intelligence, these devices are able to go as deep as the inner skin and make recommendations based on variables like hydration or melanin levels.”
“A simple scan or even a selfie is all consumers need to analyze and understand their unique skin condition, as well as to receive personalized skin-care recommendations.”
“Democratized DermatologySpeaking of saving time, personal skin readers mark the dawn of a new era for consumers, dermatologists and beauty companies alike.”
“And in an age when brands are losing customers due to a lack of personalization, customizability matters — both to consumers and the beauty marketers seeking to keep sales strong.”
“All this is aimed at saving people time while tackling concerns over the transparency of ingredients, offering a clean and high-quality solution to consumers.”


"Beauty companies have the opportunity to go a step further, working with data stacks like 'color camouflage', using specific data points to solve problems, and creating custom solutions that look and feel seamless."
"The deep learning of cosmetics is very complex, and AI assistants can now understand and cater to the unique facial geometry, eye shape and skin color with minimal human input."
Some scanners can directly treat wrinkles, blemishes or black spots, and they may replace dermatologists in the near future
"With such awareness and prevention, consumers will certainly have a better understanding of their skin health."
"Skin based UV sensors will also soon be able to protect us from the sun's overexposure, growing so fast that they now come in the form of nail stickers."
With AI, these devices can penetrate into the skin and make recommendations based on variables such as moisture or melanin levels
"A simple scan or even a self portrait is what consumers need to analyze and understand their unique skin condition and accept personalized skin care suggestions."
"Democratic Dermatology - saving time, personal skin reader marks the dawn of a new era for consumers, dermatologists and beauty companies."
"In an era when brands lose customers due to lack of personalization, customizability is important for consumers and beauty marketers seeking to maintain strong sales."
"All of this is to save people's time, solve people's concerns about ingredient transparency, and provide consumers with a clean and high-quality solution."



Number  604
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The countdown is on to see what she does next week...”
“This week, Rihanna shows you how to create a look using her newly launched Fenty Beauty #CHILLOWT holiday collection!”AdvertisementThe channel also added a new playlist titled “Tutorial Tuesday With Rihanna."”
“Admitting Sub Zero, which has a blue and purple combination, looks "pretty scary", she applies it to the outside corners of her eyes but assures fans "I can use it on my eyes, on my cheeks."”
“She then highlights the inner corners of her eyes using Chillz to make them "light up".”
“AdvertisementStarting with Stone Cold, which she "likes how it looks on your lid", she applies it to her eyes.”
“Read next Fenty Beauty's Black Friday sale has just dropped and you really won't want to miss it Black Friday Fenty Beauty's Black Friday sale has just dropped and you really won't want to miss it Spoiler - Everything is 30% off.”
“And you know us girls, we love drama."”
“Showing off her on-trend lilac eye, the singer says: “Not too much drama, but it’s still drama.”
“Holding the Killawatt Foil Freestyle Highlighter Palette, she says: "As you can see, I've already dug into a couple of them because I just wanna touch them."”
“AdvertisementRihanna seems completely comfortable as she chats animatedly, narrating each step as she applies the makeup - and it's clear she really knows her Fenty Beauty products.”


"The countdown has started. Let's see what she's doing next week..."
"This week, Rihanna will show you how to create a look with her latest Fundy beauty and chillowt holiday collection! The channel also added a new play list called "Rihanna Tuesday tutorial."
"Admitting that yazero, with a combination of blue and purple, looks" pretty scary, "she applied it to the outer corner of her eyes, but assured fans," I can use it in my eyes, on my cheek. "
Then she used chillz to highlight the inner corners of her eyes and make them "light up."
The advertisement starts with a cold stone. She "likes the way it looks on your eyelids." she paints it on your eyes
"Look at the Black Friday sale of Fenty's beauty. You really don't want to miss it. The Black Friday sale of Fenty's beauty. You really don't want to miss it - everything is 70% off."
"You know us girls, we love drama."
"It's not too dramatic, but it's still dramatic," said the singer, who showed off her style in "Lilac eyes of fashion."
Holding killawatt's foil freestyle fluorescent pen palette, she said, "as you can see, I've dug some because I just want to touch them."
"Rihanna looks comfortable in the advertisement. She talks vividly and talks about every step of her make-up - it's obvious that she really knows her Fenty beauty products."



Number  605
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And other fans claim they saw the singer at the wedding of his nephew, Siggy Jackson in December.”
“A selfie taken by daughter Paris Jackson, in which a shadowy figure that resembled Micheal appeared to be lurking, fuelled these claims.”
“Sign up today for the best stories straight to your inbox Sign up today!”
“Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid EmailThe King of Pop plunged the world into mourning when he was tragically found dead at his home in 2009.”
“The 50-year-old, one of the best-selling music artists of all time, died after suffering a heart attack as a result of acute propofol and benzodiazepine intoxication on June 25.”
“MJ's sister, LaToya Jackson, told Piers Morgan on CNN in 2011 she believed her brother had been murdered.”
“Now, years on from his death, she enlisted the help of professional medium Tyler Henry, who claims to have been in contact with the Thriller icon from beyond the grave.”
“In messages about his death from the afterlife, Jacko has revealed what happened in his final moments, Tyler claims.”
“(Image: Getty)“He conveyed various messages and I think LaToya was still very curious about the nature of what exactly happened to Michael in his final moments,” he said.”
““There were some questions about the timeline as far as who was around at the time.”


Other fans claim they met the singer at his nephew Seager Jackson's wedding last December
"In a self portrait of her daughter Paris Jackson, a Michael like shadow seems to lurk, fueling these claims."
"Sign up today, send the best stories to your in box, and sign up today!"
"Thank you for subscribing. We have more newsletters to show me our privacy statement. In 2009, the king of Pop was found dead at home, which made the whole world mourn. "
One of the best-selling music artists of all time, the 50 year old, died of a heart attack on June 25 after acute propofol and benzodiazepine poisoning
"My sister, LaToya Jackson, told CNN's pierce Morgan in 2011 that she believed her brother had been murdered."
"Now, in the years after his death, she has the help of professional media Taylor Henry, who claims to have had contact with the thriller idol in beyond the grave."
"In the information about his death, Jacko revealed what happened before he died," Taylor said
"(photo: Getty)" he sent all kinds of messages, and I think ratoya is still very curious about what happened to Michael at the last minute, "he said
"As for who was around at the time, there were some questions about the timeline."



Number  606
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for the future, whatever's meant to be will always be.”In 2016, the pair took a break from their relationship, but rekindled it months later.”
“I want nothing but the best for him and will continue to support him as a friend that I have immense respect and love for.”
“I'm forever grateful for the love, time, and life lessons that Z and I shared.”
“At the time, she said, “Breakup statements often seem impersonal because there is really no way to put into words what two people experience together over a few years.. not only in the relationship but in life in general.”
“We love you all."”
“We wish this news would have come from us first.”
“I'm grateful to all of our fans for respecting this difficult decision and our privacy at this time.”
“She has such an incredible soul.”
“He tweeted, “Gigi and I had an incredibly meaningful, loving and fun relationship and I have a huge amount of respect and adoration for Gigi as a woman and a friend.”
“In March, the two announced they were calling it quits again.”


"As for the future, everything is predestined." In 2016, the two broke up, but a few months later, the relationship was rekindled
"I just want to give him the best, and I will continue to support him as a friend I respect and love very much."
"I'll always thank Z for sharing love, time and life experience with me."
"At that time, she said," break-up statements often seem inhuman, because there is no way to express the experience of two people together for several years in words.. Not only in relationships, but in life. "
"We love you."
"We want the news to come from us first."
"I am grateful to all our fans for respecting this difficult decision and our privacy at this time
"She has an incredible soul."
"My relationship with Gigi is very meaningful, full of love and fun. As a woman and friend, I have great respect and adoration for Gigi," he tweeted
"In March this year, they announced that they would withdraw again."



Number  607
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tanya is still grieving the death of her beloved husband and out of respect for Alan’s memory intends to handle his sons’ false statements privately.””
“RELATED VIDEO: Alan Thicke’s Sons Taking His Widow to Court Over Prenup She Claims Is InvalidCallau also notes that her husband later went in for a full physical after Henry brought up the topic of the heart numerous times during their filmed reading.”
“In a new interview with E!”
“News, Tanya Callau, who married the Growing Pains star in 2005, says that the couple was designing a nursery in their home in preparation of a new little addition.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Alan went in for a full physical because we were planning on having a baby so in order to go and do the whole sperm thing he wanted to get a full physical and make sure that he was healthy and ready to go the timing of it was just...”
“...unbelievable Callau says in the interview...”
“Image zoom Credit: Frazer Harrison/GettyThicke passed away unexpectedly on Dec. 13 at 69 years old after suffering a heart attack while playing hockey with his youngest son, Carter.”
“But months prior to his death, he and his wife sat down with Tyler Henry for an episode of Hollywood Medium with Tyler Henry, which will air next Wednesday.”
“Tyler did say this is something that s uncovered on the episode but when you did your reading Alan did ask him Do you see children And Tyler said No And I kept saying to Alan Isn t it strange that Tyler didn t see that Two weeks before my...”


"Tanya is still grieving for the death of her beloved husband, and out of respect for Ellen's memory, she plans to deal with her son's misrepresentation in private."
"Related video: Alan Thicke's sons took his widow to court for claiming that the prenuptial agreement was invalid. Kalou also pointed out that after Henry mentioned the topic of heart many times in their film reading, her husband later had a comprehensive medical examination. "
"In a new interview!"
"News, Tanya Kalou, who married the star of growing pains in 2005, says the couple are designing a nursery at home to prepare for a new addition."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Alan took part in a comprehensive physical examination, because we are planning to have a baby, so in order to do the whole sperm thing, he wants to do a comprehensive physical examination to ensure that he is healthy and ready to leave at the right time..."
“… "The incredible Kalou said in the interview
Photo: on December 13, Fraser Harrison / gettysick, 69, died of a heart attack while playing hockey with his youngest son Carter
But a few months before his death, he and his wife sat down with Tyler Henry to watch an episode of Hollywood media and Tyler Henry, which will air next Wednesday
"Tyler did say that it was found in this episode, but when you read your book, Ellen asked him if you saw the baby. Tyler said no, I always said to Ellen, it's strange that Tyler is in my I didn't see that in the last two weeks. "



Number  608
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A rep for Meyers didn’t immediately respond to a request for comment.”
“Meyers has sought treatment for alcoholism in the past, most recently having relapsed in September 2017 following his wife’s miscarriage.”
“As a result, he and his wife were released.”
“Meyers and his wife’s verbal altercation didn’t have any physical component, so it was determined that no crime had been committed.”
“...crew told him it was against regulations and he put it away...”
“American Airlines requested that law enforcement meet the flight which landed close to 8 p m PT given the nature of the argument Los Angeles airport police also told us that Meyers 40 took a drag or was about to take a drag of a vape pen but the flight...”
“A representative for American Airlines told Page Six on Monday that Meyers and his wife, Mara Lane, were engaged in a “domestic dispute” while flying from Miami to Los Angeles with their 1-year-old son.”
“...his wife onboard an American Airlines flight...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Police at LAX Airport detained actor Jonathan Rhys Meyers on Sunday night after he allegedly got into a verbal altercation with...”


"A representative of Meyers did not immediately respond to a request for comment."
"Meyers has sought treatment for alcoholism in the past, most recently after his wife miscarried in September 2017."
"As a result, he and his wife were released."
"The quarrel between Meyers and his wife had no body composition, so he was found not guilty."
“…… The crew told him it was against the rules and he put it away... "
"In view of the nature of the dispute, American Airlines asked law enforcement agencies to meet with the flight whose landing time was close to 8 pm. Los Angeles airport police also told us that Meyers 40 was towed away or was about to tow a range hood, but the flight..."
A representative of American Airlines told page 6 on Monday that Meyers and his wife, Mara lane, had a "family dispute" on their way from Miami to Los Angeles with their 1-year-old son
“… His wife is on an American Airlines flight... "
"Click to send this email to a friend open it in a new window click to share it on twitter open it in a new window click to share it on Facebook open it in a new window Los Angeles airport police detained actor Jonathan Reese Meyers on Sunday night, who is said to be in contact with There was a quarrel. "



Number  609
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“The account, which is managed by Coco Rocha and her husband James Conran, then shared another sweet photo from the hospital room.”
“The new mom took to Instagram to announce the news and share a sweet photo of her new baby.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“According to her caption, the baby weighed in at 7lbs and 10oz.”
“And just like the model's first child, baby Iver Eames already has his own Instagram handle at just 1-day-old.”
“In fact, the newborn posted his first Instagram from inside the womb...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"The account is managed by coco Rocha and her husband, James Conran, and then shares another sweet picture from the ward."
"The new mother announced the news on instagram and shared a sweet picture of her new baby."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"According to her description, the baby weighs 7 pounds 10 ounces."
"Just like the model's first child, iver Eames already has his own instagram handle at the age of one day."
"In fact, the newborn released his first instagram in the womb..."



Number  610
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Born with hip dysplasia, years of gymnastics further aggravated the condition and eventually led her to receiving a hip implant in 2008.”
“The West Virginia native, who retired in 1986, was inducted into the International Gymnastics Hall of Fame in 1997.”
““I’m really excited,” Carson said.”
““It’s so much more difficult than I thought it would be.”“I’ll be dancing with her and thinking I’m doing a really good job, and then I’ll look back at the video and I just look terrible,” he added with a laugh.”
““Once we started getting going, it was nothing like I ever imagined,” he said of training with Carson.”
“During an appearance on Good Morning America on Tuesday, the actor described his experience thus far to host Michael Strahan.”
“Milo Manheim and Witney CarsonManheim, who rose to fame as the star of this year’s Disney Channel original movie Zombies, will be season 27’s youngest competitor at 17 years old.”
“Ware and Smith divorced in 2012.”
“What if all three did?”The couple adopted their daughter, Marley, in 2008.”
““Sometimes, when I’m tired on the field, and I feel like I can’t go anymore, I just think, what if he had one more breath?”


"She was born with dysplasia of the hip, and years of gymnastics further aggravated her condition, which eventually led to her hip implant in 2008."
The West Virginia retired in 1986 and was inducted into the international gymnastic hall of fame in 1997
"I'm really excited," Carson said
He added with a smile: "it's much more difficult than I thought." "I'll dance with her and feel like I'm doing really well, then look back at the video and I just look terrible."
"Once we started training, it was totally different from what I thought," he said of training with Carson
"On Tuesday's Good Morning America show, the actor described his experience of hosting Michael Strahan so far."
Milo Mannheim and Vitelli Casson Mannheim have made their mark in this year's Disney Channel Original Movie zombie. They will be the youngest competitors in season 27 at the age of 17
"Will and Smith divorced in 2012."
"What if all three do it? "The couple adopted their daughter Mary in 2008."
"Sometimes, when I'm tired on the court and feel like I can't walk, I think, what if he takes a breath again?"



Number  611
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To stay on top of it, she said she was going to therapy regularly, keeping up with her medications, going to AA meetings, and staying physically active.”
“Back in September 2017 at the annual Brent Shapiro Foundation for Drug Prevention Summer Spectacular, Lovato said that "every day is a battle."”
“Lovato also tweeted out the video this week with the comment: "My truth..."Lovato has been an outspoken advocate and ally when it comes to experiences with sobriety and mental health challenges.”
“...the end of the song Lovato promises to get help and apologizes...”
“...when I m lonely Sometimes I just wanna cave and I don t wanna fight She also addresses fans in the song I m sorry for the fans I lost Who watched me fall again I wanna be a role model But I m only human In the lyrics at...”
“Wake me when the shakes are gone and the cold sweats disappear Call me when it s over and myself has reappeared I don t know why I don t know I don t know I don t know why I do it every every every time It s only...”
““I got no excuses for all of these goodbyes/ Call me when it’s over ‘cus I’m dying inside,” Lovato sings.”
“In a new song released Thursday called “Sober,” Lovato poignantly sings about reaching a breaking point.”
“Although the singer has not confirmed whether she's singing about herself, many have speculated that the song is about a personal relapse.”
““It is possible.”Now, in a new song, Lovato sings about breaking sobriety.”


"To stay healthy, she says she needs regular treatment, medication, AA meetings and physical activity."
"As early as September 2017, at the annual summer event of Brent Shapiro anti drug foundation, Lovato said," every day is a battle. "
"Lovato also tweeted the video this week and commented," my truth... " Lovato has always been an outspoken advocate and ally in the face of soberness and mental health challenges
“… At the end of the song, Lovato promised to get help and apologize... "
“… When I am lonely, sometimes I just want to go to the cave, I don't want to fight, she also addressed the fans in the song, I feel sorry for my lost fans, they watched me fall again, I want to be an example, but I am the only one in the lyrics... "
"Wake me up when the shiver disappears and the cold sweat disappears. When it's over, I show up again. I don't know why. I don't know why. I just do it every time..."
Lovato sang, "I have no excuse to say goodbye / call me when it's over, because I'm dying inside."
In a new song called "sober" released on Thursday, Lovato singularly reached a turning point
"Although the singer has not yet confirmed whether she is singing about herself, many people speculate that the song is about a relapse."
"It's possible." Now, in a new song, Lovato is singing about breaking consciousness



Number  612
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Hurrah for a Bella and The Weeknd romance 2.0.”
“This kiss is giving us the tingles.”
“InstagramLast November, The Weeknd was seen exiting Bella’s NYC apartment weeks after his split from girlfriend Selena Gomez after 10 months of dating leading many fans of the pair to believe they were on good terms following the break-down of their year-long relationship in 2015.”
“News to quote Shaggy's lyrics, ‘It Wasn't Me’.”
“Getty ImagesLast month, the duo were allegedly seen ‘kissing all night’ at a Coachella party but Bella later shut down rumours of a reunion with an Instagram comment on a picture of the pair uploaded by E!”
“Following their kiss, the couple was photographed leaving together.”
“The 21-year-old sported a grey mini-dress and a matching oversized blazer, paired with black pumps and hoop earrings for the evening and was reportedly with he former beau, 'kissing all night'.”
“Splash NewsHadid was seen cosying up to the Canadian crooner at the Magnum x Alexander Wang bash on Promenade de la Croisette, suggesting the pair are closer than we were originally lead to believe following their rumoured - and then denied - kiss at Coachella.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Cheers for Bella and weekend romance 2.0."
"The kiss stings us."
"Last November, a few weeks after Bella broke up with her girlfriend Selena Gomez after 10 months of dating, he was seen leaving Bella's apartment in New York this week, which convinced many fans of the couple that they had a good relationship after their one-year relationship broke up in 2015."
"News quoting shaggy's lyrics" not me. "
Last month, the two were said to have "been kissing all night" at a party in cochella, but Bella later commented on instagram that the rumor of their reunion had been ignored
"After the kiss, the couple were photographed leaving together."
"The 21-year-old, wearing a gray miniskirt and a matching oversized suit, black heels and basketball earrings at night, is reported to have been" kissing all night "with his ex boyfriend
"Splash newshadid was seen in close contact with Canadian singers on magnum x Alexander Wang bash in Croisette promenade, which shows that the couple are closer than we initially believed, because the rumor that they were kissing in Coachella was later denied."



Number  613
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Katie Holmes Wears a White T-Shirt and Makes It Look So ChicKatie Holmes and Suri Cruise Twin in Floral Ahead of Paris Fashion WeekJamie Foxx Reminds Everyone What an Incredible Voice He Has at the BET Awards -- Watch!”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Jamie Foxx Walks Off Live ESPN Broadcast After Katie Holmes Question: Watch!”
“For a look at that short interview, watch the video below.”
“But, true to form, Foxx, just one month later, yanked off his headset at a celebrity basketball game and abruptly ended an interview when asked about Holmes.”
“The couple got slightly less shy this year, making a rare public appearance together at the Clive Davis and the Recording Academy’s Pre-GRAMMY Gala in New York City.”
“Foxx publicly denied their relationship at the time, but evidence began to pile up over the years, whether it was a photo of the pair holding hands in his music studio, a quick dinner date in New York City or a romantic stroll on the beach in Malibu.”
“They were first romantically linked back in 2013 -- a year after Holmes' divorce from Tom Cruise -- when they were spotted dancing together onstage at the 4th Annual Apollo in the Hamptons Benefit.”


Related libraries
"Embedded code restart" content: Katie Holmes is wearing a white T-shirt to make it look like the flower twins of chicati Holmes and Suri cruise before Paris fashion week. Jamie fox reminds you how incredible his voice is at the best prize - look
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"This video is not available because we were unable to load the sponsor's email."
Jamie fox left ESPN live after Katie Holmes
"For a brief interview, please see the video below."
But, in fact, fox took off his headphones at a celebrity basketball game a month later, and when asked about Holmes, he abruptly ended the interview
"The couple are a little less shy this year, making a rare public appearance at Clive Davis and the New York City Academy of records Grammy Awards."
"Fox publicly denied their relationship at the time, but over the years evidence has begun to pile up, whether it's photos of the two holding hands in his music studio, a fast-food dinner date in New York City, or a romantic stroll on the beach in Malibu."
"Their first romantic connection dates back to 2013 - a year after Holmes and Tom Cruise divorced - when they were found dancing together at the fourth Apollo awards in Hampton."



Number  614
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was pretending she was okay with not having a kid, he was pretending he absolutely couldn’t and wouldn’t budge on that point.”“They both got a wake-up call once they canceled the wedding, and they both realized they could fix what was broken,” the insider added.”
““It was a wedding that was entered into under false pretenses.”
“In a new clip from Sunday’s new episode of Total Bellas, Nikki Bella discovers a love letter from ex-fiancé.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Bella is giving a friend a tour of their once-shared home alongside her twin sister Brie when she comes across a bouquet of flowers and the note.”
““It’s really hard to be in this house without John,” says Nikki.”
““His presence is so strong here.”Bella looks full of emotion as she reads the handwritten card.”
““For me to watch you grow into something so beautiful and amazing,” reads part of the card shown on the screen.”
““For making me feel a part of all these moments…”“Is it a sweet card?” Brie asks her twin.”
““The best,” Nikki replies while smiling and holding the card to her heart.”


"She pretended that she had no problem without children, and he pretended that he could never and would never give in to that." "They were all woken up after cancelling the wedding, and they all realized that they could fix something that was broken," the person familiar with the matter added
"It's a fake marriage."
"In a new episode of Sunday's complete Bella, Niki Bella finds a love letter from her ex fiance."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Bella took a friend to visit the home where they used to be with her twin sister, Bree, when she saw a bunch of flowers and a note."
"It's really hard to be in this house without John," Nicky said
"His presence is so strong here." Bella looked at the handwritten card, full of emotion
Some of the cards on the screen read, "let me watch you grow into something so beautiful and amazing."
"Thank you for making me feel part of all these moments..." "Is this a sweet card? "Bree asked her twins."
"The best," Nikki replied with a smile, keeping the card in mind



Number  615
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“And while there was some speculation that the soiree was actually a secret wedding—Jennifer Aniston, Reese Witherspoon, and more A-listers showed—multiple sources confirmed to Page Six it really was just an extravagant engagement celebration.”
“A wedding is said to be scheduled in the Hamptons later this year.”
“GP is wearing a new ring though after the party.”
“She showed off a "BF" gold band on her left ring finger at the Pre-Broadway Opening Engagement Of Head Over Heels in San Francisco.”
“BF is obviously Falchuk's initials, so she's very clearly wearing a tribute to her husband-to-be.”
“Whether the ring will be a regular addition to Paltrow's outfits or is just a one-night statement piece, future red carpet appearances will determine.”
“But it's a pretty smart move on Paltrow's part to keep outlets buzzing about her future secret wedding whenever that may actually be:Getty ImagesGetty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Although some people speculate that the party is actually a secret wedding, Jennifer Aniston, Reese Witherspoon and more first-line stars have confirmed to page 6 that the wedding is actually a luxury engagement ceremony."
"It is said that there will be a wedding in Hampton later this year."
"But after the party, the GP wore a new ring."
At the Broadway premiere in San Francisco, she showed off the "BF" gold ring on her left ring finger
"BF is obviously an acronym for falchuk, so she's obviously wearing a dress that pays homage to her future husband."
"Whether this ring is a regular accessory of Paltrow's clothing or just a piece of overnight fame, the future red carpet appearance will decide everything."
"However, Paltrow's wise move is that at any time, the media will pay attention to her future secret wedding: Getty Images Getty Images is imported from {embedded name}."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information



Number  616
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He tried out again in 2010, which led to the formation of 1D.”
“I feel very blessed.”The singer and Cole first met when he auditioned on the U.K.’s The X Factor in 2008, when he was 14.”
“We haven’t named him yet but he’s already capturing hearts including mine.”
“I’m completely in awe of his incredible mother and how she has been the whole way through this, she’s really made my dreams come true.”
““I’m incredibly happy to welcome our new baby boy into the world, it’s a moment that I will never forget for the rest of my life and my favorite memory I have so far.”
““My close friends and family know there are very few times when I’m left speechless… wow!” Payne captioned an Instagram photo of himself holding his baby boy.”
“Your a boss.”Payne and Cole, 33, welcomed their first child together in March.”
“Payne replied: “Thanks man hope he grows with an ounce of your courage!”
“Love & blessings to you guys as you start on the greatest adventure… @CherylOfficial @LiamPayne,” Grylls, 42, tweeted to the new dad, along with a Daily Mail story reporting about the name.”
“Your a boss — Liam (@LiamPayne) May 2, 2017“Great choice!”


"He tried again in 2010 and eventually formed 1D."
"I feel very lucky." The singer and Cole first met in 2008, when he auditioned for factor X in England at the age of 14.
"We haven't named him yet, but he has captured the hearts of everyone, including me."
"I'm in complete awe of his incredible mother, how she spent all this, and she really made my dream come true."
"I'm very happy to welcome our new baby boy to this world. It's a moment I'll never forget and my best memory so far."
"As my close friends and family know, I'm rarely speechless WOW! "Penn added a title to his picture of holding a baby boy on instagram."
"You're the boss." Penn and Cole, 33, had their first children in March
Penn replied, "thank you. I hope he grows up with your courage!"
"As you embark on your greatest adventure, bring you love and blessings @ CherylOfficial@LiamPayne The Daily Mail reported the name
"Your a-boss Liam (@ liampayne) may 2, 2017" is a good choice



Number  617
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I ain't got it, dude.”
“She's revealing all of this because Lockwood is demanding she pay more than $450k for his attorney fees, and she's clearly saying ...”
“LMP says the rest of her debt is mostly credit cards and unpaid attorneys' bills.”
“According to the docs, obtained by TMZ ... that's another $6 mil she owes.”
“She also says she has a house in the U.K. she's desperately trying to unload because she's defaulted on the mortgage.”
“In the docs she says most of her debt is unpaid taxes from 2012 to 2015, totaling more than $10 million.”
“Lisa Marie just filed docs in her divorce from Michael Lockwood, and they contain the bombshell news ... the King's daughter is more than $16 million in the red.”
“EXCLUSIVEThis seems impossible, but Elvis Presley's daughter is drowning in debt ... this according to Lisa Marie Presley herself ... TMZ has learned.”


"I don't understand, man."
"She disclosed all this because Lockwood asked her to pay more than $450000 for his lawyer's fees, and she made it clear that..."
"LMP says her remaining debt is mainly credit cards and unpaid lawyer bills."
"According to the documents obtained by TMZ... She still owes six million dollars. "
She also said she had a house in the UK because she was in arrears with her mortgage and desperately wanted to unload it.
"In the document, she said most of her debts were unpaid taxes from 2012 to 2015, totaling more than $10 million."
"Lisa Mary has just filed her divorce from Michael Lockwood, which contains explosive news... The king's daughter has a deficit of more than 16 million dollars. "
"Exclusivity seems impossible, but Elvis Presley's daughter is in debt... According to Lisa Mary Presley herself... TMZ has learned. "



Number  618
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'””
“...want to do I would be honored...”
“She talked to AJ about her life today and the status of her relationship with some of her former cast members.”
“On returning to her store:“It was very surreal coming into Zarin Fabrics today.”
“It's the first time I've been back since Bobby died.”
“I didn't expect to be emotional when I walked in the door.”
“He would have been 72 two weeks ago... it's surreal.”
“But he's here.”Does she still have a relationship with Bobby's family?“People want to know, I still have a relationship with Bobby's family.”
“I love his kids, I love his family.”
“I promised him I would take care, especially his daughter, Jennifer.”Was she surprised her “frenemy” Bethenny Frankel attended Bobby's funeral?“I didn't expect her there.”


“'””
“… I would be honored to be... "
"She talked to AJ about her life today and her relationship with some former actors."
Back at her store: "it's amazing to walk into zarin fabric today."
"This is the first time I've been back since Bob died."
"I didn't expect to be emotional as soon as I entered the door."
"He was 72 two weeks ago... It's surreal. "
"But here he is." Does she have anything to do with Bob's family? "People want to know that I still have a relationship with Bob's family."
"I love his children, I love his family."
"I promised him I would take care of him, especially his daughter, Jennifer." Was she surprised to see her "friend" Bethany Frankel at Bobbie's funeral? "I didn't expect her to be there."



Number  619
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I remember having a meltdown, freaking out that I had eaten five banana chips.”Read Lawrence’s full interview at Vanity Fair.”
““Everybody here is professional.”
“In “Red Sparrow, ” which hits theaters on Friday, Lawrence plays a Russian ballerina-turned-assassin who uses her sexuality for espionage.”
“The film requires her to go nude a first for the actress and something she said scared the hell out of me I tried to do the movie without nudity but realized it just wouldn t be right to put the character through something that I myself am not willing...”
“...to go through Lawrence told Vanity Fair for the March edition cover story...”
“But her decision was that much more difficult in light of a photo hack back in August 2014 that targeted her and other celebrities like Kate Upton, and leaked intimate photos of them on the internet.”
“Vanity Fair Jennifer Lawrence covers Vanity Fair's March 2018 issue.”
““My biggest fear was that people would say, ‘Oh, how can you complain about the hack if you’re going to get nude anyway?’” Lawrence said.”
“The photo hacker has since been sentenced to 18 months in prison for using fraudulent email addresses to gain access to various iCloud and Gmail accounts.”
“Lawrence previously described the photo-hack experience as being “gang-banged by the f**king planet.” But going nude in “Red Sparrow,” she said, was about feeling empowered on her own terms.”


"I remember collapsing because I ate five banana slices and went crazy." Reading Lawrence's complete interview in Vanity Fair
"Everyone here is very professional."
In Friday's red sparrow, Lawrence plays a Russian Ballerina turned assassin who uses her sexual orientation to spy
"This movie requires her to be naked for the actress first. Some of her words scared me. I tried to make this movie without being naked, but realized that it was wrong to let this character experience something I didn't want to experience myself..."
“… Tell vanity fair the March cover story through Lawrence... "
"But considering a photo hacking attack in August 2014, her decision was much more difficult, targeting her and other celebrities such as Kate Upton, and divulging their intimate photos on the Internet."
Vanity Fair's Jennifer Lawrence reports a march 2018 issue of vanity fair
"What I fear most is that people will say, 'Oh, if you're still naked, how can you complain about hacking? "Lawrence said
"Since then, the photo hacker has been sentenced to 18 months in prison for using fraudulent email addresses to access various icloud and Gmail accounts."
Lawrence previously described the experience as "being attacked by gangs on the planet f * * king," but said nudity in "red sparrow" was to feel right



Number  620
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“They did not appear in the official portraits.”
“The new images, taken by British photographer Matt Holyoak, show the two-month-old son of Prince William and Kate Middleton with his parents and other members of the royal family.”
“The photos were taken at a small reception following Louis' christening.”
“They show the Windsors posing with the little prince in a series of adorable portraits.”
“In one of the most stunning shots, the Cambridges pose with the Duke and Duchess of Sussex for the photos, along with William and Harry's dad, Prince Charles, and his wife, Camilla, Duchess of Cornwall.”
“Matt Holyoak/Camera Press/ReduxThe Cambridges were also captured in a perfect family shot, which shows just how grown up Princess Charlotte and Prince George are now.”
“Matt Holyoak/Camera Press/ReduxOne of the photos focuses on the Duchess of Cambridge and Prince Louis.”
“Kate gazes adoringly at her new baby son and both mother and child are beaming Matt Holyoak Camera Press Redux Adorably the Middletons and the Windsors are captured together in one photo too Matt Holyoak Camera Press Redux Louis godparents are Nicholas van Cutsem Lucy Middleton Guy Pelly Harry Aubrey...”
“Fletcher Lady Laura Meade and Hannah Carter...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"They didn't appear in the official portrait."
New photos by British photographer Matt holyoak show the two month old sons of Prince William and Kate Middleton with their parents and other members of the royal family
"These pictures were taken at a small reception after Louis' baptism."
"They show the Windsor couple and the little prince in a series of lovely portraits."
"In one of the most amazing photos, the Cambridge couple and the Duke and Duchess of Sussex, William and Harry's father Prince Charles and his wife Camilla, Duchess of Cornwall
"Matt holleyock / photojournalist / redx Cambridge family has also been perfectly photographed. This photo shows how mature Princess Charlotte and Prince George are now."
"Matt holleyock / camera press / reducsson's photos focus on the Duchess of Cambridge and Prince Louis."
"Kate is looking at her new son with love. Both mother and child are in high spirits. Matt holliac camera printer Redux lovely Middleton and Windsor are captured together in a photo. Matt holliac camera printer Redux Louis godfather is Nicholas van cutson Lucy Middleton guy pely Harry Aubry..."
"Mrs. Fletcher, Laura Mead and Hannah Carter..."



Number  621
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Call me.”This post has been updated.”
“...community.”
“The Olympic gold medalist who has been an outspoken activist for transgender rights, told radio host John Catsimatidis that she is interested in the “the political side of activism” and “would look for a senatorial run.”“Can I do a better job from the outside?” said Jenner, a lifelong Republican.”
““Kind of working the perimeter of the political scene, being open to talking to anybody?”
“Or are you better from the inside, and we are in the process of determining that.”
“Yeah but I would look for a senatorial run When asked whether Jenner is seriously considering a run and if she would run as a Republican or an independent her publicist Alan Nierob told CNN Monday that there are no further details to report at this time This comes after...”
“...wrestling star and actor Dwayne The Rock Johnson said that he would consider running for president in 2020 musician Kid Rock insisting last week that his tweet about running for the Senate is no joke and in perhaps the most viral moment of celebrities exploring a run for office Kanye...”
“West declaring a 2020 presidential bid during his speech at the 2015 MTV Video Music Awards...”
“I have had a ton of emails and texts asking me if this website is real… https://t.co/RRVgISDFeq The answer is an absolute YES.”
“...pic.twitter.com/uYCUg6mjW1 — Kid Rock (@KidRock) July 12, 2017After meeting with then-President-elect Trump in December, West tweeted, “#2024,” causing fans to speculate whether he’s delaying a run for president and whether he is serious about running at all.”


"Call me." This post has been updated
"Community"
The outspoken Olympic gold medalist for transgender rights told radio presenter John katsim matidis that she was interested in "the politics of radicalism," would seek to run, "and" can I do better from the outside? Lifelong Republican Jenner said
"It's a bit like working on the political stage, opening up to anyone?"
"Or you look better from the bottom of your heart, and we're fixing that."
"Yes, but when asked if Jenner is seriously considering running, if she will run as a Republican or an independent, I will consider running for the Senate. Her spokesman, Alan nileb, told CNN on Monday that there are no more details to report at this time. This is after... "
“…… Wrestling star and actor Dwayne rock Johnson said he would consider running for president in 2020. Musician Kidd rock insisted last week that his comments on twitter about running for the Senate were no joke, and perhaps the most viral moment for celebrities to explore running for president, Kanye... "
"West announced running for president in 2020 in 2015 MTV Music Video Awards speech..."
"I've received a lot of emails and text messages asking me if this website is real https://t.co/RRVgISDFeq The answer is absolutely yes. "
“... pic.twitter.com/uYCUg6mjW1 -Kid Rock (@ kidrock) on July 12, 2017, after meeting with trump, the then president-elect, in December, West wrote on twitter that "#2024" caused fans to speculate whether he delayed running for president and whether he really wanted to run. "



Number  622
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”
“Be sure to keep up with all of PEOPLE’s royal wedding coverage and don’t forget to check out everything you need to know about Meghan Markle’s perfect style.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Pippa was glowing in a mint green and pink floral “Hepburn” silk dress by The Fold as she held her husband’s hand while walking into the service with mom, Carole Middleton, dad, Michael Middleton and brother, James Middleton.”
“Image zoom Credit: James Gourley/ShutterstockPippa made headlines for the dress she wore to Kate’s royal wedding in 2011.”
“For today’s wedding, the mom-to-be arrived with a barely-there baby bump in a long sleeve mint dress with a drop waist, pleated blush skirt and floral designs.”
“The dress was not a maternity dress, and Charlotte Sutcliffe-Smith, PR for The Fold told PEOPLE, “We are absolutely delighted she has worn it.”She wore her hair in a low bun with a small side braid tucked into it and her makeup natural, as she typically does.”
“Image zoom Credit: Pascal Le Segretain/Getty ImagesIt’s the event of the year!”
“Of course, to top it all off, Pippa accessorized with a dusty rose fascinator with small white flowers, strappy heels and a small clutch of the same shade that perfectly pulled together her elegant look.”
“Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”


"Sign up for our newsletters and get the latest news from Kate Middleton, Megan markel and others!"
"Be sure to keep up with all the coverage of people's royal weddings, and don't forget to check out all the information you need to know about Megan markel's perfect style."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Pippa, wearing a mint green and pink floral "Hepburn" silk dress, clasped her husband's hand and glittered beside the folds as she attended the ceremony with her mother, Carol Middleton, Dad, Michael Middleton and brother James Middleton
"Photo zooming credit: James Gurley / shutterstock Pippa's wedding dress at Kate's royal wedding in 2011 made headlines."
"At today's wedding, the expectant mother wore a low waist long sleeved Mint skirt, pleated skirt and flower patterned blush skirt, and there was almost no baby mass."
"It's not a maternity dress," Charlotte Sutcliffe Smith, a public relations officer at fold, told people. "We're very glad she's wearing it." She wore her hair in a low bun with a small braid on the side and made up naturally, just like she usually did
"Image zooming credit: Pascal Le segreat / Getty Images this is a great event of the year!"
"Of course, most importantly, Pippa's accessories are a dusty rose, white flowers, lace up high heels and a small clutch with the same hue, which perfectly combines her elegant appearance."
"Is there not enough coverage of the royal family?"



Number  623
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We’re grown-ups, and we’re going to take our time and we’re going to do things at our own pace.””
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Lo and A Rod Attend Their Daughters Dance Recital and Pose with Her Ex Marc Anthony Jennifer Lopez is used to owning the stage but she was more than happy to be just another member of the audience while her kids took a turn in the spotlight at their dance...”
“...recital...”
“The entire family came together to support Lopez’s 10-year-old daughter Emme Maribel as well as her beau Alex Rodriguez‘s two children, 10-year-old Ella Alexander and Natasha Alexander, 13, at Wednesday night’s show.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The night began with the pop star playing makeup artist for the three girls, which was documented on both her and Rodriguez’s Instagram stories.”
“Both proud parents showed off their completed looks for the recital in a group shot.”
““On call makeup artist!!”
“!” the singer captioned one snap.”


"We are adults. We need to take our time and do things at our own pace."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Lo and a rod attended the girls' dance recital and took a picture with her ex boyfriend, Marc Anthony. Jennifer Lopez is used to having the stage, but when her children are in the spotlight in their dance, she is very happy to be another member of the audience... "
“… "Recitation..."
"On Wednesday night's show, the family supported Lopez's 10-year-old daughter, Amy maribell, and her boyfriend, Alex Rodriguez's two children, 10-year-old Ella Alexander and 13-year-old Natasha Alexander."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Starting that night, the pop star played makeup artist for three girls, which is recorded in her and Rodriguez's instagram story."
"Two proud parents in the group shooting showed their modeling for the recital."
"Make up artist on call!"
"!" the singer subtitled a snapshot. "



Number  624
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“During an interview with the Evening Standard, Malik explained that it’s nice having a partner who can relate to having a high-profile career, but it’s by no means the main reason his relationship with Hadid works.”
“Recently, the duo graced the cover of Vogue‘s August issue together.”
“The singer and Hadid first started dating in late 2015 and have been inseparable ever since...”
“Malik addressed the rumor telling The Fader magazine that he has too much respect for Edwards than to end anything over text message Image zoom Credit Disney Rex Shutterstock RELATED VIDEO Perrie Edwards Says Zayn Malik Ended Their Engagement with a Simple Text Image zoom Credit Pascal Le Segretain Getty...”
“Just like that,” Edwards, 24, wrote in a leaked excerpt from the group’s latest book One World, confirmed as legitimate by PEOPLE.”
“A four-year relationship, two-year engagement ended by a simple text message.”
““It was horrible, the worst time in my life.”
““Jade was laughing because her voice cracked.”FROM PEN: Grammy News and Notes: Album of the Year NomineesAfter Edwards and Malik ended their two-year engagement, she revealed that the One Direction star broke it off via text message.”
““Can everyone chill perrie literally didn’t say hadid,” wrote one Twitter user.”
“A video shared on Twitter shows bandmate Jade Thirlwall cracking up after the apparent improvisation, prompting Edwards to scold, “Jade, don’t!”“Shout Out to My Ex” has been rumored to be about Malik, but fans on Twitter are split about the supposed dig at Hadid.”


"In an interview with the evening news, Malik explained that it's good to have a partner who can be associated with a high-profile career, but that's by no means the main reason why his relationship with Hadid works."
"Recently, they were on the cover of Vogue's August issue together."
"The singer and Hadid first dated at the end of 2015 and have been inseparable ever since..."
"Malik told the rumor that he told vogue that he had too much respect for Edwards instead of ending any video related to Disney Rex shutterstock on SMS image scaling credit. Perry Edwards said that Zane Malik ended their engagement with a simple SMS image scaling credit Pascal segotti..."
"It's like this," Edwards, 24, wrote in a leaked excerpt from the group's latest book, one world, which has been proven legal
"Four years of love, two years of engagement, all ended with a simple text message."
"It was terrible, the worst moment of my life."
"Jed laughed because her voice was hoarse." "Pen: Grammy news and notes: album of the year" nominees Edwards and Malik revealed after two years of engagement that the one-way star broke up via text message
One twitter user wrote: "can everyone calm down? Perry didn't say Hadid. "
A video shared on twitter showed that band member jade Thirlwall collapsed after an apparent improvisation, prompting Edwards to scold: "jade, no! "Yelling at my ex" has always been a rumor about Malik, but twitter fans have different opinions about Hadid's sarcasm



Number  625
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lamar is the top VMA contender with eight nominations.”
“Other performers include Kendrick Lamar, Ed Sheeran, Miley Cyrus, the Weeknd, Lorde, Shawn Mendes and host Katy Perry.”
“She recently dropped a new single, “What About Us,” and will release her seventh album, “Beautiful Trauma,” on Oct. 13.”
“Pink released her debut album in 2000.”
“Past winners include Madonna, Peter Gabriel, Beyonce and Justin Timberlake.”
“The Vanguard award honors musicians who have had an impact on pop culture with their songs, fashion and music videos.”
“She will also perform at the awards show.”
“The Grammy-winning singer will receive the honor Aug. 27 at the Forum in Inglewood, California, MTV said Tuesday.”
“Video Music Awards with the Michael Jackson Video Vanguard Award...”
“MTV announced Tuesday Aug 15 that the Grammy winning pop star will receive the honor and also perform on Aug 27 at the Forum in Inglewood Calif Photo by Amy Harris Invision AP File NEW YORK AP Pink s 17 year old music career will be honored at the MTV”


"Lamar is VMA's number one contender, with eight nominations."
Other performers include Kendrick Lamar, ed Sheeran, Millie Cyrus, weekend, Lord, Sean Mendes and host Katie Perry
She recently gave up a new single "how are we?" and will release her seventh album "beautiful trauma" on October 13
"Pinker released her first album in 2000."
"Past winners include Madonna, Peter Gabriel, Beyonce and Justin Timberlake."
"The avant garde awards honor musicians who have an impact on pop culture with their songs, fashions and music videos."
"She will also perform at the awards ceremony."
MTV said on Tuesday that the Grammy award-winning singer will receive the award at a forum in Inglewood, California, on August 27
"Michael Jackson video Pioneer Award Video Music Award..."
MTV announced on Tuesday, August 15 that the Grammy winner will receive the award and perform at a forum in Inglewood, California, on August 27. Photo source: Amy Harris invasion AP File New York AP Pink's 17-year-old music career will be honored at MTV



Number  626
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lindsay Arnold Evanna Lynch and pro Keo Motsepe ELIMINATED John Schneider and pro Emma Slater DeMarcus Ware and pro Lindsay Arnold...”
“The Harry Potter actress showcased incredible confidence and sensuality with this rumba, and she seems to have an awareness of her body and the space around her that even some of the strongest contestants lack.”
“Despite wrapping its Disney Night with a storybook ending two weeks ago — “No one’s going home!” — the ABC series made up for that non-elimination on Monday, when not one, but two couples were sent packing.”
“But before any of the Season 27 duos went home, the remaining competitors took to the dance floor for Country Night — which is fitting, given that a double elimination can prompt heartache worthy of a country song.”
“And it wasn’t just couples who were do-si-do-ing around the ballroom; Monday’s broadcast also featured the first team dances of Season 27, which added a few extra points to each contestant’s score.”
“First, let’s review the highlights of Country Night:BEST OF THE NIGHTDeMarcus Ware and pro Lindsay Arnold (Viennese Waltz) — I was a little stunned that DeMarcus didn’t earn a perfect score after this Viennese waltz, especially given the judges’ praise.”
“For the last three weeks or so, I’ve found his and Lindsay’s performances to be a bit forgettable, which is why Monday’s dance was doubly pleasant to watch.”
“It was so graceful and tender, and DeMarcus seemed more connected to Lindsay and the choreography than he has since the first week of competition.”
“Judges’ Score: 27/30BEST OF THE NIGHT (RUNNER-UP)Evanna Lynch and pro Keo Motsepe (Rumba) — Season 27 has delivered very unpredictable eliminations thus far; Tinashe is gone, but Grocery Store Joe has never even been in jeopardy.”
“(Insert the emoji of the shrugging lady here.)”


"Lindsay Arnold Evanna Lynch and pro KIO mosepe eliminated John Schneider and pro Emma Slater DeMarcus valre and pro Lindsay Arnold..."
"The Harry Potter actress shows incredible confidence and sexuality with this rumba. She seems to have a sense of her body and the surrounding space, which even some of the strongest players lack."
Although disney night ends with a storybook two weeks ago - "no one's home! "The ABC series made up for Monday's absence, when not one couple, but two couples were sent to pack."
"But before any duet in season 27 comes home, the rest of the contestants go to the country night dance floor - which is appropriate, because two knockouts are heartbreaking and worth a country song."
"It's not just couples dancing in the ballroom; Monday's radio broadcast also showed the 27th season of first-team dance, adding a few points to each contestant's score."
"First of all, let's look back at the country's highlight Nights: the best night demarchus and professional Lindsay Arnold (Vienna Waltz) - I'm a little surprised that demarchus didn't get full marks after this Vienna waltz, especially with the praise of the review committee."
"In the past three weeks or so, I've found that his performance with Lindsay is a bit forgotten, which is why Monday's dance is so enjoyable."
"It's so elegant and gentle that demarchus seems to be more connected to Lindsay and choreographer than he did from the first week of the game."
"Judges score: 27 / 30 best night (runner up) Ivana Lynch and pro KIO motsepe (Rumba) - season 27 has been a very unpredictable knockout so far; tinash has gone, but grocer Joe has never been in danger."
"(insert the shrugged lady's emoticon here)"



Number  627
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“!”
“Let us know your opinions in the comments (below)!!”
“What do U think, Perezcious readers?!”
“Too funny!”
“Ha!!!”
“Watch that (below)!!!”
“Related: Blake Lively Comes Forward With Sexual Harassment StoryBeyond that, Blake sat down and discussed family life with Jimmy, too, sharing a very funny story about her one-year-old daughter Ines‘ incredible love of meat!!”
“Ch-ch-check out their HIGHlarious segment (above) to see Blake have to remove a wedgie, and Jimmy get down to the “Heisman Magician”!”
“It was time for the dance move generator on The Tonight Show last night, and Jimmy Fallon and Blake Lively didn’t hold back in getting after it to some funky moves like “The Catching The Bouquet” and more!!!”


“!”
"Please let us know your opinion in the comments below!"
"What do you think, the indomitable reader?"
"How funny
"Ha
"Attention (below)!"
"Related reports: Blake Lively came forward to tell the story of sexual harassment. In addition, Blake sat down to discuss family life with Jimmy and shared a very interesting story about her one year old daughter ines's incredible love for meat!"
Check their treble section (above) and see that black has to remove the wedge, and Jimmy gets "hesman magician"! "
"It's time for last night's" Tonight Show "to start dancing. Jimmy Fallon and Blake Lively did not hesitate to start some fashionable moves, such as" catch the bouquet "and so on!"



Number  628
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She said of the results: "They look very natural and I don’t have to faff around trying to even them out anymore."”
“Also known as tattooed eyebrows, microblading is a semi-permanent make-up technique, allowing for those over-plucked eyebrow day sins to be vanished.”
“...free selfie...”
“And it turns out the 72-year-old beauty has turned to microblading to help keep her looking fresh when there’s no makeup artist on hand.”
“She revealed to the Daily Mail that she'd recently tried the beauty trend – and absolutely loved it.”
“She said: "I was fed up of my brows barely being there and when one of my girlfriends got it done, I thought that they looked great.”
“They're very lightly and delicately done — but it means that when I get up in the morning and I have no makeup on, at least I have eyebrows.”
“It's made a huge difference."”
“Helen shared this incredible barefaced selfie following this year s Oscars Coleen Rooney recently took to social media to share a before and after photo of her newly microbladed eyebrows one of the many stars to swear by this popular...”
“...beauty trend...”


"They look natural and I don't have to put on airs anymore," she said of the results
"Also known as eyebrow tattooing, it's a semi permanent make-up technique that can eliminate the evil of excessive eyebrow removal."
“… Free selfie... "
"It turns out that without a make-up artist, the 72 year old has started to use Weibo to help her keep fresh."
"She told the daily mail that she had recently tried beauty trends and loved them very much."
"I'm fed up with my eyebrows almost not being there, and when one of my girlfriends is done, I think they look great," she said
"They're light and delicate - but it means that when I get up in the morning without makeup, at least I have eyebrows."
"It's a huge change."
"After this year's Oscars, Helen shared this incredible selfie. Colleen Rooney recently shared a front and back photo of her new micro tattooed eyebrow on social media. This is one of the stars who swore to this popular eyebrow... "
“… Beauty trend... "



Number  629
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Pre-order my new sci-fi novel Herokiller, and read my first series, The Earthborn Trilogy, which is also on audiobook.”
“Brian Yorkey, Joy Gorman, Mandy Teefey, Kristel Laiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Golin and Selena Gomez are returning as EPs.”
“The original run of the Netflix original was one of the most talked-about series of the year, often by fans who loved it, sometimes by critics who lamented how it handled its tough issues like suicide and rape.”
“But season 2 has come and gone with…almost no buzz at all.”
“It was a very, very strange phenomenon.”
“I don’t think I’d ever seen a show go from all anyone could talk about to a complete void of coverage for its sophomore season, yet that’s exactly what happened with 13 Reasons Why.”
“The theory was that, perhaps, after a relatively conclusive ending to season 1 (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), that simply no one was watching the second season.”
“But that appears not to be the case as Netflix has announced today that yes, 13 Reasons Why is returning for season 3.”
“They also gave these details alongside the announcement:Production on the new season will resume later this year.”
“The new season will premiere in 2019.”


Pre order my new science fiction "hero killer", read my first series, also in the audio book "the birth of the Earth Trilogy"
"Bryan joki, Joey Gorman, Mandy Tiffany, crystal leiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Goering and Serena Gomez will return as earnings per share."
"The original version of Netflix is one of the most watched series this year. It's often sought after by fans who love it, and sometimes by critics who lament how it deals with thorny issues such as suicide and rape."
"But the second season has come and gone There is hardly any excitement. "
"It's a very, very strange phenomenon."
"I don't think I've ever seen a show change from a topic that anyone can talk about to a completely unreported sophomore, but that's the truth. There are 13 reasons."
"The theory is that maybe after the end of the first season (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), no one will watch the second season."
"But that doesn't seem to be the case, because Netflix announced today that, yes, there are 13 reasons for the third quarter return."
"They also provided these details with Ann cement: production of the new season will resume later this year."
"The new season will premiere in 2019."



Number  630
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ A post shared by tiamowry (@tiamowry) on Jun 9, 2018 at 12:53pm PDTWelcome to the world officially, baby Cairo!”
“After giving birth, the actress teased fans on Instagram by selectively showing off her baby girl but now that we’ve finally met her and we’re already obsessed with her.”
“Today on her Facebook Watch series, Tia Mowry’s Quick Fix, the star revealed her second bundle of joy’s adorable little face and her name too.”
“(Which husband Cory Hardrict picked out!)”
““This is baby Cairo.”
“Her name is Cairo Tiahna Hardrict.”
“Cairo, it basically means victorious.”
“My husband was in the air, flying.”
“He always feels like he’s closer to his mother when he’s up in the air.”
“He said when he was flying, he saw the letters A, I, R, in the sky.”


"A post shared by tiamowry (@ tiamowry) at 12:53 p.m. on June 9, 2018 is officially open to the world, baby Cairo!"
"After giving birth, the actress selectively showed off her baby girl on instagram to make fun of her fans, but now we finally meet her, and we're fascinated by her."
"Today, in her Facebook watch series, TIA Murray's quick fix, the star shows off her second lovely face and her name."
"(which husband was chosen by Corey hadrick!)"
"This is little Cairo."
"Her name is Cairo Tiana hadrik."
"Cairo, basically means victory."
"My husband is flying in the air."
"He always feels closer to his mother in the air."
"He said that when he was flying, he saw the letters a, I, R in the sky."



Number  631
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are looking forward to the sound of Kelly Clarkson on ‘The Voice.’””
“ABC has committed to roughly 40 hours of “Idol,” making it highly likely that the show will air two nights a week, as it did on Fox.”
“The pop star and season-one “American Idol” champion will join longtime coaches Blake Shelton and Adam Levine for the NBC talent-competition series’ spring 2018 cycle.”
“A fourth coach for the season has not yet been set.”
“Jennifer Hudson and Miley Cyrus are already confirmed to be joining regulars Levine and Shelton this fall for the show’s 13th season.”
“Clarkson had been in long-simmering talks about possibly joining “The Voice” for an upcoming season.”
“She was approached by the show multiple times in the past and had expressed interest, but had been unable to work its production cycle into her schedule.”
“Both Clarkson and Shelton are represented by Narvel Blackstock’s Starstruck Entertainment.”
“Clarkson had been approached in recent weeks to join “American Idol” as judge for its upcoming relaunch on ABC.”
“The deal with “The Voice” scuttles any possible return to “Idol” for Clarkson, who was the winner of the talent competition’s first season in 2002 and appeared as a guest judge during the show’s 15th and final season on Fox.”


"We're looking forward to Kelly Clarkson's performance in the voice."
ABC has promised about 40 hours of idol, which makes it possible for the show to air two nights a week, like fox
"The pop star and first season" American Idol "champion will join longtime coach Blake Sheldon and Adam Levin in the NBC talent show series" spring cycle 2018. "
"The fourth coach of the season has yet to be confirmed
"Jennifer Hudson and Millie Cyrus have confirmed that they will join regular guests Levin and Sheldon in season 13 this fall."
"Clarkson has been brewing for a long time to discuss whether it is possible to join the voice next season."
"She has been contacted by the show many times in the past and expressed interest in it, but she has been unable to put its production cycle on the agenda."
"Clarkson and Sheldon are representatives of Neville Blackstock's star entertainment company."
In recent weeks, Clarkson has been invited to join "American Idol" as a judge for the upcoming rebroadcast on ABC
Clarkson won the first season of the 2002 draft and was a guest judge in fox's 15th and final season



Number  632
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Bride-to-be Gwyneth Paltrow has been just been whisked off to Mexico by her famous friends for a VIP bachelorette party this weekend.”
“In January of this year, Paltrow and TV producer fiancé Brad Falchuk confirmed their engagement to Good Morning America.”
“Now now, the Goop founder is celebrating her upcoming nuptials south of the border with her best (and famous) gal pals.”
“According to Page Six, Cameron Diaz orchestrated the event, chartering a private jet for 12 friends to fly down to Mexico for the party celebrating Paltrow.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Inside sources told the publication that guests will definitely include a few famous faces, like Diaz and fashion designer Stella McCartney.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Gwyneth Paltrow, the bride to be, has just been rushed to Mexico by her famous friend for this weekend's VIP singles party."
"In January, Paltrow and TV producer's fiance Brad falchuk confirmed their engagement to Good Morning America."
"Now, the founder of goop is celebrating her upcoming wedding in the south of the border with her best (and famous) girlfriends."
"According to page 6, Cameron Diaz planned the event by renting a private plane for 12 friends to fly to Mexico to celebrate Paltrow's party."
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Insiders told the media that the guests would definitely include some famous faces, such as Diaz and fashion designer Stella McCartney."



Number  633
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Bronze medalist added another photo, writing, “Having a leather moment at #oscars2018.””
“Huge thank you to the brill, beautiful, and kind, @itsjeremyscott,” Rippon shared on Instagram of his look.”
“Getting ready for the Oscars with @accessonline!”
““Dressed to impress in @moshino.”
“He was accompanied by fellow Olympian Mirai Nagasu, who wore a romantic ice blue, long-sleeve tulle Tadashi Shoji gown with celestial embroidery.”
“I know Harry will be upset.”Rippon turned heads on Sunday night wearing an S&M, bondage-inspired look which he paired with a black tuxedo jacket and color coordinated slacks as well as a leather studded harness.”
““I didn’t realize how cute he was.”
““I was sleeping on Shawn Mendes — not with,” he said with a sly smile.”
“Just days before he met Mendes, he admitted to Ellen DeGeneres during an appearance on her show last Thursday that he had a crush on Harry Styles, but had since moved on to Jake Gyllenhaal — quickly mentioning he might have also developed a liking for Mendes.”
“He is cute, he is sweet, and the other guy is @ShawnMendes,” Rippon tweeted, while in the photo he tilted his head toward Mendes as the singer smiled.”


The bronze medalist added a photo that read, "there's a leather moment at the 2018 Oscars."
"Thank you so much brier, beautiful, kind, @ itsjeremyscott," Rippon shared on instagram
"Prepare for Oscar with @ accessonline!"
"It's impressive to wear @ moshino."
He was accompanied by Olympian Mirai Nagasu, who wore a romantic ice blue long sleeve Tulle robe embroidered with sky embroidery
"I know Harry will be upset." On Sunday night, Rippon was wearing a head down S & M look with a black tuxedo jacket, matching slacks and leather padded harness
"I don't know how cute he is."
"I sleep on Sean Mendes - not with him," he said with a sly smile
"Just a few days before he met Mendes, he admitted to her on the Ellen DeGeneres Show last Thursday that he was infatuated with Harry stiles, but then turned to Jack Gyllenhaal - he soon mentioned that he might also have a crush on Mendes."
"He's cute, he's cute, and the other guy is @ shawnmendes," Rippon tweeted, while in the photo, when the singer smiles, he tilts his head toward Mendes



Number  634
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET to see if the guys pull it together.”
“Tune into Eric & Jessie on Wednesday at 10 p.m.”
“The duo struggles to put the crib together, with a new side falling off every time they add a piece.”
“But maybe she shouldn’t lean on Eric and John for furniture construction.”
“Let's Do It'“It’s so great to have my family live in the same exact town as me, because I can always lean on them and depend on them if I need anything,” Sydney shares.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Jessie James Decker Talks Having More Kids With Football Hubby Eric Decker: 'I'm Game.”
“Sydney’s husband, MLB player Anthony Bass, is out on the road playing, so the baby’s uncles, Eric, and Jessie’s brother, John, stop by to build a crib.”
“On this week’s episode of Eric & Jessie, Jessie's sister, Sydney, needs a little help putting together the nursery for her unborn child -- and ET has your exclusive first look.”
“Eric Decker is a dad of two -- but that doesn’t mean he’s mastered crib building quite yet.”


"Let's see if they can unite."
"Listen to Eric and Jesse on Wednesday at 10pm."
"They try to put the crib together, adding one piece at a time, and the new side falls off."
"But maybe she shouldn't rely on Eric and John to build furniture."
"Let's do it." "It's great that my family and I live in the same town, because if I need something, I can always rely on them, on them."
"Exclusive: Jesse James Decker and soccer husband Eric Decker talk about having more children: 'I'm happy.'"
"Sydney's husband, major league baseball player Anthony bass, was playing on the road, so the boy's uncle Eric and Jesse's brother John stopped by to build a crib."
"In this week's Eric and Jesse, Jesse's sister Sidney needs a little help to set up a nursery for her unborn child - and ET is your first look."
"Eric Decker is a father of two - but that doesn't mean he's in complete control of the construction of the crib."



Number  635
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Press PLAY on the video above to see a preview of the second half of the season, then hit the comments with your thoughts!”
““It just gives us a real chance to do real drama, a story about a really badly sundered relationship where these two men have not seen each other in many years.”Herskovitz adds that Cox will sing during his time on the show.”
““It was just such a happy turn of events for us that we could get” Cox, Nashville co-showrunner Marshall Herskovitz tells TVLine.”
“Per the official character description, Gideo is a “recently reformed lifelong alcoholic” and “crusty, frustrated, would-be musician” who’ll enter the action as he tries to repair his relationship with his son.”
“Elsewhere, Stargate SG-1) has been cast as Deacon’s father, Gideon Claybourne.”
“Meanwhile, Ronny Cox (St.”
“Mia Maestro (Alias, The Strain) will play Rosa, a true-believer member of The Movement for Coherent Philosophy who is starting to doubt her involvement in the organization.”
“In addition, Nashville will add two recurring guest stars in the last batch of episodes.”
“As usual, all episodes will be available to stream on Hulu the day after they air.”
“The country-music drama will return for the series’ final eight episodes on Thursday, June 7, at 9/8c, CMT announced just after the midseason finale aired Thursday.”


"Click on the video above, watch the preview for the second half of the season, and then click on the comments with your thoughts!"
"It gives us a real chance to play a real drama, a story about a very bad relationship in which two men have not seen each other for many years." Herskowitz added that Cox would sing during the show
"It's a very happy turning point for us to get," Cox, Nashville co host Marshall herskowitz, told tvline
According to the official description, gidio is a "recently rehabilitated lifelong alcoholic" and "irritable, depressed, and aspiring musician" who will join the role as he tries to repair his relationship with his son
"Elsewhere, SG-1 plays the Deacon's father, Gideon klebourne."
Meanwhile, Ronnie Cox
"MIA Maestro (pseudonym, the strain) will play Rosa, who is a faithful believer in the coherent philosophy movement and now doubts whether she is involved in the organization."
"In addition, Nashville will add two frequent guest stars to the final series."
"As usual, all the episodes can be shown on Hulu the day after they are shown."
"The country musical will air in the last eight episodes of the series at 9:08 on June 7 (Thursday), after CMT announced its mid season finale last Thursday."



Number  636
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s thrilling when I get to perform stuff where I can just emotionally let go and fly off to another world in my mind, and the audience gets to ride on that too.”Contact the writer: jmoe@ocregister.com...”
““I get to go up onstage with musicians who I really admire and respect, and just have a great time with,” Salonga said.”
“Never did she imagine, though, that she would grow up to be a real-life, bona fide Disney Princess.”
“Then after earning a Tony Award for her portrayal of Kim in the Broadway musical Miss Saigon in 1991 Salonga landed the career break of a lifetime to be the singing voice of Princess Jasmine in the 1992 hit Disney film Aladdin Six years later she got a second chance...”
“...to live her young girl s dream as she performed the vocals of Mulan in the 1998 Disney film of that name...”
““I never thought when I was 5 and listening to ‘Cinderella’ stories that I’d be a Disney princess.”
“I think it’s such a magical thing to happen in my life, and for it to happen twice is something I would never have thought could happen,” said Salonga in a recent phone interview.”
“Salonga’s distinctive voice will return to Southern California for concerts tonight at the Valley Performing Arts Center in Northridge and Saturday at Segerstrom Center for the Arts.”
“Backed by a four-piece band, Salonga will perform a selection of well-known songs, including her greatest hits from her various musicals and films.”
“We made sure to choose a fun program that the band is going to dig playing and I m going to love singing said Salonga and because we are having so much fun onstage I hope that translates to the audience as well Salonga is keeping the program s song...”


"It's really exciting when I start to show things that I can let go emotionally and fly to another world in my mind where the audience can also ride on." Contact author: jmoe@ocregister.com 。。。”
"I can go on stage with musicians I really appreciate and respect and have a good time with them," saloga said
"However, she never thought that she would grow up to be a real, real Disney Princess."
"In 1991, saloga won the Tony Award for her role as Kim in the Broadway musical Miss Saigon. Six years later, she became the voice of Princess Jasmine in the 1992 Disney hit film Aladdin and won her second chance in life..."
“… To realize her dream as a young girl, she sang Mulan in the 1998 Disney movie of the same name
"When I was five years old listening to Cinderella, I never thought I would be a Disney Princess."
"I think that this amazing thing happened in my life, and that it happened twice is something I never thought would happen," saloga said in a recent telephone interview
"Saloga's unique voice will return to Southern California tonight at the North Ridge Valley performing arts center and Saturday at the segstrom Art Center for concerts."
With the support of a band of four, saloga will sing a series of famous songs, including her most popular songs in various musicals and movies
"We must choose an interesting program, the band will dig and play, I will like singing," said saloga, because we have so much fun on the stage, I hope to switch to the audience as well as saloga is to keep the song of the program... "



Number  637
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Play slideshow Getty Images 1 of 12 Prince Harry and Meghan Markle kiss on the steps of St George's Chapel...”
“...and Diana to Meghan and Harry Mon May 21 2018 The heartwarming tradition captured in beautiful pictures...”
“A body language expert has analysed the two couples in the same scenario and gave her professional opinion on how they differ.”
“Judi James looked at images both couples kissing at the polo as the princes received awards.”
“She claimed while the kisses are very different, this may have been inspired by the same women, the late Princess Diana.”
““Both boys grew up with a hugely loving and tactile role-model in Diana, but they might each have taken away totally different lessons that they now apply to their married life displays,” Judi said.”
“For Harry and Meghan though there is a much more 'celebrity' approach to their PDAs Judi JamesAccording to the body language expert, spontaneous body language and risk-taking behaviours are not a feature of either William or Kate's public profile.”
“She said: “William has always been appropriately cautious for a man who is heir to the throne and his non-verbal behaviour since his teens often signals more introvert traits, in direct contrast to his extrovert, risk-taking younger brother Harry.”
“Harry seems happy to mimic his mother s trait of public displays of hugs and affection William might have grown up more aware of the potential risks involved Kate Middleton and Prince William s kiss William avoids the royal soap opera signals that made Diana the victim of too much...”
“...press attention Judi claimed...”


"12 slides of Prince Harry kissing Megan Marcel on the steps of St. George's Church"
“…… Diana to Megan and Harry, Monday, May 21, 2018, warm traditions captured in beautiful pictures... "
"A body language expert analyzed two couples in the same situation and gave professional advice on their differences."
"Judy James saw pictures of two princes kissing Polo as they received the prize."
"She claimed that although the kissing methods were quite different, it might have been inspired by the late Princess Diana."
"Both boys have an example of love and touch in Diana, but they may have learned completely different lessons that are now being applied to their marriage," Judy said
"For Harry and Megan, although according to body language expert Judy James, their PDAs have more" celebrity "ways, spontaneous body language and risk-taking behavior are not the characteristics of William and Kate's public image."
"William has always been appropriately cautious about the heir to the throne and nonverbal behavior, as he tends to be more introverted as a teenager, in direct contrast to his outgoing, adventurous brother Harry," she said
"Harry seems to be happy to imitate his mother's hugging and intimacy in public. When William grows up, he may be more aware of the risks of Kate Middleton and Prince William's kiss. William avoids the Royal soap opera signal that makes Diana too many victims..."
“… Judy's claimed news attention... "



Number  638
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Nori for Veep!”
“By that point, North will be 7 and wiser than us all.”
“May we kindly request that Kim start priming North for a political career in 2020?”
“If her father really runs in 2020 — who knows which party or which policies he’d support — he’s going to need proper counsel.”
“One could argue she’s already the first daughter.”
“And, unlike certain heads of state, we know she isn’t interested in photo ops or nepotism.”
“She’s already media trained, having given her first presidential interview in which we learned she has impeccable music taste, loves cheese, and has LGBTQ pride even if she doesn’t know it yet (her favorite color is “rainbow,” folks).”
“And when you did feel safe at home, now with Trump in presidency you just don’t feel safe any more.”Now, though North West may be but little (she’s 4), she is fierce and seemingly fit for the job.”
“It’s really scary, the world that we’re living in now.”
““Every single day when you can’t really believe what’s going on, the next day it’s something else even more crazy and tragic.”


"Nori of VIP!"
"By then, the north will be smarter than all of us."
"Can we ask Kim Jong Il to start preparing for North Korea's political career in 2020?"
"If her father does run in 2020 - who knows which party or policy he will support - he will need the right advice."
"Some would say she's already the first daughter."
"And, unlike some heads of state, we know she's not interested in photography or nepotism."
"She has received media training. In her first interview with the president, we learned that she has impeccable taste in music and loves cheese. Even if she didn't know it, she also has the pride of LGBTQ (her favorite color is rainbow and guys)
"When you do feel safe at home, now that trump is president, you will never feel safe again." Now, although the northwest may be small (she's only four years old), she's fierce and seems to fit in
"The world we live in now is really terrible."
"Every day, when you really can't believe what happened, something crazier and sadder happens the next day."



Number  639
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But guys, Jenner has been dropping hints about her eagerness to start a family and become a mother for quite some time.”
“One can only imagination what is going through Jenner's mind right now as the whole world speculates about her pregnancy, her due date, and, most of all, the idea of her as a mother.”
“Every picture is being analyzed, every tweet pored over, and surely her neighborhood is being swarmed with paparazzi waiting to get her picture.”
“It's all still up in the air, but fans and websites have been scrounging the reality star's social media feeds to find receipts and proof of the alleged pregnancy.”
“Neither Jenner nor Scott have confirmed or the denied the report yet, which TMZ first broke earlier this afternoon.”
“It is reported that Kylie Jenner is pregnant with Travis Scott's child.”


"But guys, Jenna has been insinuating that she's been longing to get married and be a mother for some time."
"When the world is speculating about Jenna's pregnancy, her due date, and, most importantly, her idea of being a mother, people can only imagine what Jenna is thinking now."
"Every picture is being analyzed, every microblog is being studied carefully, and her neighbors must be packed with paparazzi waiting to take her picture."
"It's still up in the air, but fans and websites have been scouring the reality TV star's social media feeds for receipts and evidence of suspected pregnancy."
"Neither Jenner nor Scott has confirmed or denied the report, which TMZ first disclosed earlier this afternoon."
"Kelly Jenner is reported to be pregnant with Travis Scott's child."



Number  640
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Ava DuVernayGetty ImagesFilm director Eva DuVernay was invited to introduce honoree Tessa Thompson.”
“These difficulties we face share the same spirit of those faced by countless women all over the world who struggle for the right to earn a living, the right to be heard, and even the right to be safe from harm.”
“After that degrading humiliating lineup, the female producer told me I should use the naked photos of myself as inspiration for my diet.”
“We all stood side by side with only paste-ons covering our privates.”
“During this time, a female producer had me do a nude lineup with about five women who were much thinner than me.”
“One girl before me had already been fired for not losing weight fast enough.”
“When I was much younger and starting out, I was told by the producers of a film to lose 15 pounds in two weeks or I’d be fired.”
“...humiliating way...”
“Jennifer Lawrence Getty Images In Jennifer Lawrence s speech the Oscar winner recognized that after gaining fame with movies like The Hunger Games she has the power to say no But she says when she was just starting out she was once pressured into losing weight in a degrading and...”
“And I actually feel less alone.”


"EVA duvinagati, the film director, was invited to introduce the winner, Tessa Thompson."
"The difficulties we face are in the same spirit as those faced by countless women around the world who struggle for the right to make a living, the right to be heard, and even the right to be free from harm."
"After that humiliating performance, the female producer told me that I should use nude photos of myself as inspiration for my diet."
"We all stand side by side, only the post covers our privacy."
"During this time, a female producer asked me to perform nude with about five women who were much thinner than me."
"A girl before me has been fired for not losing weight fast enough."
"When I was much younger, the producer of a movie told me to lose 15 pounds in two weeks or I would be fired."
“… The way of humiliation... "
"In her speech, Jennifer Lawrence Getty, the Oscar winner, realized that she had the right to say no after becoming famous for movies such as" hunger game, "but she said that when she was just starting out, she had been forced to lose weight in a degrading way, and
"Actually I don't feel so lonely anymore."



Number  641
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...points in Game 4 of the Eastern Conference Finals on Tuesday night at Quicken Loans Arena...”
“...s OneLastDance Dominated February Warriors Fans Go Wild After Unforgettable Moments with Steph Eight Years Ago the Nuggets Traded Melo to the Knicks Two Years Ago the Kings Shipped Boogie to the Pelicans ASG Will Be Competitive Again If the NBA Raises the Stakes Right Arrow Icon Smith scored five...”
“Coming for a Repeat of Sixth Man of the Year Pat Beverley Has the Clippers Stealing the LA Shine LeBron Keeps Shredding NBA Record Books Young s Hot Streak Is Heating Up the ROY Race with Luka LeBron and 2 Chainz Form a Superteam to Release a New Album Wade...”
“Season Westbrook Makes History While Honoring Nipsey Hussle Devin Booker Makes History with Scoring Tear 29 Years Ago Jordan Dropped Career High 69 Points Bosh Is Getting His Jersey Raised to the Rafters in Miami Steph Returns to Houston for 1st Time Since His Moon Landing Troll Lou Williams Is...”
“Video Play Button McCollum and the Blazers Snapped Postseason Losing Streak for Jennifer Stars Invest in Plant Based Food as Vegetarianism Sweeps NBA The NBA Got Some Wild Techs This Season Jarrett Allen Is One of the NBA s Hottest Rim Protectors Wade s Jersey Swaps Created Epic Moments This...”
“It's pretty much the only thing that relieves some of the pressure."”
“Just keep having conversations about it.”
“"I talk to my wife about it.”
“"I'll be happy when I can bring her home, but until then, it's something I want to keep in the front of my mind all the time," he said in March.”
“Smith posted photos on Instagram as he and his wife, Jewel, left the hospital:On Wednesday, Smith shared a photo of himself and his two daughters at home:After Dakota was born prematurely in January, Smith told ESPN.com's Ramona Shelburne her health was of the utmost importance.”


“… The score in Game 4 of the Eastern Conference finals on Tuesday night is in "quick loans arena..."
“… The last dance dominated the warriors in February, and the fans became crazy after the unforgettable moment with Stephen. Eight years ago, the Nuggets traded Mello to the Knicks. Two years ago, the kings transported boogie to the pelicans. ASG will compete again if the NBA raises the stakes. Right arrow idol Smith scores five goals... "
"Pat Beverly made the same mistake as the sixth man of the year. The Clippers stole the light of Los Angeles. LeBron kept tearing up the NBA record. The hot streak of young people made Roy, Luca LeBron and two chains form a super team to release the new album Wade..."
"Westbrook made history this season, while commemorating Neptune's Hussein devonbuck's making history score tearing 29 years ago, Jordan dropped his career highest 69 points, and Bosh raised his shirt to the rafters of Miami. Stephen returned to Houston for the first time because his moon landing Troll Lu Williams was..."
"Video play button McClellan and the Trail Blazers took pictures of Jennifer stars' playoff losses. Vegetarianism swept the NBA. The NBA got some crazy technicians this season. Jarret Allen is one of the most popular hoop protectors in the NBA. Wade's jersey Exchange created an epic moment..."
"It's almost the only thing that can relieve some of the stress."
"Just keep talking."
"I talked to my wife."
"I'll be happy when I can take her home, but until then, I want to keep it in my mind," he said in March
Smith posted a picture of him and his wife, jewel, as they left the office on instagram hospital: on Wednesday, Smith shared a picture of him and his two daughters back home in Dakota, and Smith told reporters that she gave birth prematurely in January ESPN.com Her health is the most important thing



Number  642
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on ABC.”
“Image zoom Credit: Eric McCandless/ABCIt’s been a long road to the altar for these two.”
“Don’t forget to subscribe for more exclusive interviews and photos, only in EW.”
“Wedding bells will soon be ringing at Grey Sloan!”
“EW can exclusively reveal that Jo (Camilla Luddington) and Alex (Justin Chambers) will be getting married in the season 14 finale of Grey’s Anatomy.”
“Slated to air Thursday, May 17, the finale is gearing up to be a big event — which, in the world of Shondaland, means things will certainly go awry.”
““I am so excited for Jo and Alex to finally seal the deal and get married,” Luddington tells EW.”
““But in true Jolex form, the wedding will have lots of twists and turns to it.” See?”
“EW’s exclusive photo from the wedding definitely seems to speak to impending disaster.”
“After his failed marriage to Izzie (Katherine Heigl) in the early years of Grey’s, Alex and Jo started dating in season 9.”


"Et on ABC."
"Image scaling credit: Eric McCandless / abcit is a long way to the altar for these two people."
"Don't forget to subscribe to more exclusive interviews and photos, only in EW."
"The wedding bell will soon ring in graysloan!"
"EW can exclusively reveal that Joe (Camilla Luddington) and Alex (Justin chambers) will be married in the finale of Season 14 of anatomy of gray."
"Scheduled to air on Thursday, May 17, the terminator is preparing to become a big event - which in the world of Sunderland means things are bound to go wrong."
"I'm very excited that Joe and Alex have finally reached an agreement and got married," rudington told the Wall Street Journal
"But in a real jolex form, there are a lot of twists and turns in the wedding." See that? "
"EW's exclusive photo at the wedding seems to confirm the impending disaster."
"After the failure of Gray's early marriage to Izzy (Katherine Hagel), Alex and Joe start dating in season 9."



Number  643
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We hope they join us for these last few hours as we journey to the Enchanted Forrest for one more adventure.””
““’Once Upon a Time has been an amazing journey for all of us at ABC Studios and for fans around the world,” said Patrick Moran, president of ABC Studios.”
“The show, created and executive produced by Edward Kitsis and Adam Horowitz, returns for the second half of its final season on March 2, and the finale will air in May, after more than 150 episodes.”
“Once Upon a Time went through a creative and casting revamp at the end of Season 6 when a number of original cast members left, and also relocated from its longtime Sunday home to the lower-trafficked Friday night this season.”
“During the TCA winter press tour in January, ABC Entertainment President Channing Dungey said she was “cautiously optimistic” about an eighth season, pending a meeting with Kitsis and Horowitz, but that was not to be.”
“Related Story In The Financial Fine Print, A Glimpse Of Fragile Oscar Economics“When we first heard Adam and Eddy’s pitch for Once Upon a Time, we knew it was something incredibly special,” Dungey said in a statement today.”
““For seven years, they have captivated us with their creativity and passion while reimagining some of our most beloved Disney fairytales, creating an undeniable global hit.”
“Saying goodbye will be bittersweet but Once Upon a Time will forever be part of the ABC legacy and we can t wait for fans to join us in this epic final chapter Once Upon a Time was a breakout hit when it premiered in fall 2011 starring Ginnifer Goodwin...”
“Jennifer Morrison Lana Parrilla Josh Dallas Robert Carlyle and Jared Gilmore and featuring classic Disney fairytale characters...”
“In addition to strong ratings early in its run, Once fit nicely in the Disney brand with corporate synergies and has been a solid international seller for producer ABC Studios because of the global recognition of its characters.”


"We hope they will join us in the last few hours, and we will take an adventure in the enchanted Forrest."
"It used to be a wonderful journey for all of us at ABC and for fans around the world," said Patrick Moran, President of ABC
"The show, created and produced by Edward kisses and Adam Horowitz, will be broadcast in the second half of the final season on March 2. After more than 150 episodes, the final episode will be broadcast in May."
"Once upon a time, at the end of the sixth season, some original actors left for a creative and cast adjustment, and moved from their long-term Sunday home to the less popular Friday night of the season."
"On TCA's winter reporter tour in January, ABC entertainment president Channing dungee said she was" cautiously optimistic "about Season 8 and was waiting for a meeting with kisses and Horowitz, but that's not true."
"When we first heard Adam and Eddie speak, we knew it was a very special thing," dunkey said in a statement today
"Over the past seven years, they have fascinated us with their creativity and passion, and at the same time, they have re conceived our favorite Disney fairy tales, creating an undeniable global hit."
"It will be bittersweet to say goodbye, but" the past "will always be a part of ABC's tradition. We can't wait for fans to join in this epic final chapter," the past "will shine when it premieres in autumn 2011, starring Jennifer Goodwin..."
"Jennifer Morrison, Lana, parrilla, Josh, Dallas, Robert Carlyle and Jared Gilmore, starring in the classic Disney fairy tale characters..."
"In addition to its early high ratings, once is well integrated into the Disney brand by virtue of corporate synergy, and has always been a reliable international seller for producer ABC Studios due to its globally recognized role."



Number  644
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s also mom of daughter Nahla, 9, with ex-boyfriend Gabriel Aubry.”
“The Extant alum was previously married to David Justice from 1992 to 1997, R&B singer Eric Benét from 2001 to 2005 and French actor Olivier Martinez, whom she shares son Maceo, 3.”
““Grow out got me feelin’ some kinda way every day ain’t perfect…” she wrote.”
“Berry possibly hinted at the breakup in an Instagram post on Wednesday, too.”
“Magazine’s 7th Annual Halloween Party at The Mayan in L.A. in October.”
“They more recently attended the Treats!”
““My balance,” they both wrote.”
“The exes first went public with their relationship in September when they posted black and white photos of themselves cuddling on their respective social media accounts.”
“Just hours earlier, Us Weekly exclusively revealed that Berry, 51, and the music producer had split after several months of dating.”
“She also shared a photo of rope in the shape of a heart and added three emojis of a flexed arm muscle.”


"She's also the mother of her 9-year-old daughter Nora, with her ex boyfriend Gabriel Aubrey."
The current alumnus married David justice from 1992 to 1997, R & B singer Eric Ben é T and French actor Olivier Martinez from 2001 to 2005, who shared a room with his three-year-old son Marcio
"Growing up makes me feel that every day is not perfect..." She wrote
"Berry may also hint at a breakup in an instagram post on Wednesday."
"The magazine's seventh annual Halloween party will be held in October in the Mayans of Los Angeles."
"They were at the reception recently!"
"My balance," they all wrote
"The two ex girlfriends' first public love affair came in September, when they posted black-and-white photos of themselves hugging on their respective social media accounts."
"Just a few hours ago, US weekly revealed exclusively that berry, 51, and the music producer broke up after a few months of dating."
"She also shared a picture of a heart-shaped rope and added the expression of three arm muscles bending."



Number  645
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Can you imagine going to someone's wedding and they just whip out these insane moves?"”
“I would love for them to help us out, oh my gosh.”
“And I want to do something kind of pretty and cool.”
“I could totally learn my first dance!'”
“"It wasn't the full motivation but the second I said yes I was like, ‘Oh my gosh.”
“"I for sure want to learn my first dance here," Nikki gushed after Wednesday's big announcement.”
“News earlier today that she hopes to pick up some moves she and John can use at their upcoming wedding.”
“The Total Bellas star told E!”
“Nikki Bella has officially joined season 25 of Dancing With the Stars.”
“Get your dancing shoes out, John Cena!”


"Can you imagine going to someone's wedding and all of a sudden they do these crazy things?"
"I wish they could help us, my God."
"I want to do something beautiful and cool."
"I can learn my first dance!"
"That's not the whole motivation, but the moment I said yes, I thought," my God. "
"I certainly want to learn my first dance here," Nicky gushed after Wednesday's important announcement
"Earlier today, it was said that she hoped to take some action at the upcoming wedding."
"Always tell me Bellas!"
"Nicky Bella is officially in season 25 of dance with the stars."
"Take out your dancing shoes, John Senna!"



Number  646
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...not in the competition yet...”
“Date The contestant went on a date and gave out a rose at the rose ceremony.”
“It is a spin-off of the reality television game shows The Bachelor and The Bachelorette, and is a winter counterpart to the summer series Bachelor in Paradise.”
“The show is hosted by Chris Harrison and Hannah Storm of ABC’s sister station ESPN.”
“It has been described by ABC as "an ode to the Winter Olympic Games", and aired as counterprogramming against NBC's coverage of the 2018 Winter Olympics.”
“Ashley Brewer presents the play-by-play and live interviews during the games.”
“[2]The series reunite previous contestants from The Bachelor and The Bachelorette at a winter resort in Manchester, Vermont, where they are competing with contestants from the various international adaptations of the franchise in various winter sports challenges.”
“1 3 Contestants edit Elimination table edit Place Contestant Episode 1 2 3 4 1st Ashley Last In Date Winner Kevin Date In Date 2nd Courtney In In In Runner up Lily In In In Dean In Date Last Runner up Lesley In Date Last Luke Date Date In Runner...”
“...up Stassi In Date In 9 10 Bibiana Date In In Split Jordan N A a In In Split 11 12 Ally In In Out Josiah Last In Out 13 14 Christian In In Split Clare In Last Split 15 Yuki In In Out 16 Michael In In Quit 17”
“Ben In In Quit 18 Tiffany In In Quit 19 20 Jenny In Out Rebecca Date Out 21 Benoit In Quit 22 26 Eric Out Jamey Out Laura Out Lauren Out Zoe Out Key edit The contestant is male...”


“… I'm not in the game yet... "
"The date player went on a date and gave a rose at the rose ceremony."
"It's a derivative of the reality TV game bachelor and single woman and a winter version of the summer series Bachelor in heaven."
"It's hosted by Chris Harrison and Hannah storm of ABC sister station ESPN."
ABC calls it a "Winter Olympics anthem," which runs counter to NBC's coverage of the 2018 Winter Olympics
"Ashley brewer introduced the match and the live interview during the match."
"[2] at a winter resort in Manchester, Vermont, the series brings together contestants from singles and single women who compete with international adaptations of the franchise from a variety of winter sports challenges."
"13 contestants edit elimination table edit competition location Episode 1 Episode 2 Episode 3 Episode 4 first place Ashley last date champion Kevin date second place Courtney date runner up Lily date Dean date last place runner up Leslie date last place Luke date runner up..."
“… Upper Stacey on the date of 9 10 biana on the date of the split Jordan n a on the date of the split 11 12 allies on the outside Josiah on the last outside 13 14 Christianity on the last split Claire on the last split 15 Yuki on the outside 16 Michael on the inside quit 17 "
"Ben in quit 18 Tiffany in quit 19 20 Jenny in out Rebecca date out 21 Benoit in quit 22 26 Eric out Jamey out Laura out Lauren out Zoe out key edit contestant is male..."



Number  647
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the trailer above.”
“[powergridprofile powerrank=”356” node=”1064248” type=”project” title=”Pitch Perfect 3” image=”pp3.jpg”]It opens on Dec. 122.”
““Pitch Perfect 3” is again produced by Paul Brooks of Gold Circle Entertainment and Max Handelman & Elizabeth Banks of Brownstone Productions, and is directed by Trish Sie (“Step Up All In”).”
“John Lithgow and Ruby Rose join the cast as newcomers.”
“See Video: 'Pitch Perfect 3' Trailer: Bellas Reunite to Compete Against Real MusiciansHailee Steinfeld, Brittany Snow, Anna Camp, Hana Mae Lee, Ester Dean, Alexis Knapp, Chrissie Fit, Kelley Jakle, Shelley Regner, Elizabeth Banks and John Michael Higgins also return for the new film.”
“...offered a solo deal so she has to battle with the difficult decision of progressing her career or sticking with her girls...”
“There are a few moments of self doubt Is it weird that everybody is better at the one thing we do than we are at that thing but the trailer also shows new a cappella versions of popular songs like Avicii s Wake Me Up Kendrick s character Beca is...”
““Whassup, Pitches!” yells Rebel Wilson at the outset of the new trailer for “Pitch Perfect 3.”The Barden Bellas travel to military bases in Europe to compete.”


"Look at the trailer above."
"[powergridprofile powerrank =" 356 "node =" 1064248 "type =" project "title =" pitch perfect 3 "image =" PP3. JPG "] opened on December 122."
Perfect pitch 3 is again produced by Paul Brooks of Golden Circle entertainment and Max Handman and Elizabeth Banks of bronstone production, and directed by Trish Sie
"John liskow and Ruby Ross joined the cast as newcomers."
"Watch the video: 'perfect pitch 3' Trailer: Bellas reunites, competing with the new films that real musicians Steinfeld, Brittany snow, Anna camp, Lee Hannah may, estedian, Alexis Knapp, Chris fit, Kelly Jacquel, Shelley regner, Elizabeth Banks and John Michael Higgins are also back."
“… Offers a separate deal, so she has to struggle with tough decisions to continue her career or stick with her girl... "
"It's strange to have some self doubt that everyone is doing something better than we are doing that thing, but the trailer also shows new unaccompanied versions of pop songs, such as avisi's wake me up, Kendrick's character, Becca is..."
"What, pitch! At the beginning of the New Trailer perfect pitch 3, the rebel Wilson shouts, "the badenberas are going to the military base in Europe to compete."



Number  648
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE: Adam Levine Reveals Gender of His Second Child, Says Wife Behati Prinsloo ‘Wants Like 100 Babies’For more on the gorgeous couple, watch below!”
“?," she captioned the Instagram snap.”
“The actor's spouse revealed that the couple will be having a baby girl in a silly Instagram post shared on Thursday.”
“"Nothing to say other than I love these humans and I’m missing Telluride.”
“And I’m pleased to introduce you to Flat Aaron.”
“When I travel without the babe, Flat Aaron always comes with and parties.”
“Also, why are we all smiling the exact same way?”
“It’s kinda amazing.”
“Also creepy ?," Lauren wrote before adding, "Alsooooo baby girl was in my tum here and I had no idea.”
“BUN!"”


"More: Adam Levin revealed the gender of his second child, and his wife biharti prinslow said," I want 100 children. "For more information about this beautiful couple, please see below!"
"?" she added a title to the instagram snapshot. "
"The actor's spouse revealed that the couple will have a stupid baby girl on instagram, which they will share on Thursday."
"There's nothing to say but I love these people, I miss telluride."
"I'm glad to introduce you to Alan."
"When I don't have children, I always come with them and parties."
"What else do we as like as two peas?"
"It's kind of incredible."
"Creepy, too? Lauren wrote, then added, "there's another baby girl in my stomach, I don't know."
"Buns!"



Number  649
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drake Walk It Talk It Travis Scott Butterfly Effect The Carters Apes t ALBUM OF 2018 Post Malone Beerbongs Bentleys Drake Scorpion Cardi B Invasion of Privacy Migos Culture II J Cole Kod Camila Cabello Camila Travis Scott Astroworld Shawn Mendes Shawn Mendes Ariana Grande Sweetener Logic Bobby Tarantino II”
“SZA, “All the Stars”Selena Gomez, “Back to You”Cardi B, Bad Bunny & J Balvin, “I Like It”Migos feat.”
“DRAMA SHOW OF 2018 The Walking Dead This Is Us Grey s Anatomy The Good Doctor 13 Reasons Why Scandal Lost in Space 9 1 1 Westworld Riverdale The Handmaid s Tale Castle Rock COMEDY SHOW OF 2018 Saturday Night Live The Big Bang Theory Modern Family Will Grace Black...”
“Walking Dead This Is Us Grey s Anatomy The Big Bang Theory Will Grace WWE Raw The Good Doctor 13 Reasons Why 9 1 1 America s Got Talent Modern Family Saturday Night Live A post shared by 13 Reasons Why 13reasonswhy on Aug 3 2018 at 11 35am PDT”
“Deadpool 2 Donald Glover Solo A Star Wars Story Alicia Vikander Tomb Raider Chadwick Boseman Black Panther Danai Gurira Black Panther Michael B Jordan Black Panther Dwayne Johnson Rampage Chris Pratt Jurassic World Fallen Kingdom Scarlett Johansson Avengers Infinity War Tom Cruise Mission Impossible Fallout TV SHOW OF 2018 The...”
“Mann Blockers Nick Robinson Love Simon Amanda Seyfried Mamma Mia Here We Go Again Anna Faris Overboard John Hamm Tag Tiffany Haddish Uncle Drew Mila Kunis The Spy Who Dumped Me ACTION MOVIE STAR OF 2018 Chris Hemsworth Avengers Infinity Wars Evangeline Lilly Ant Man and the Wasp Ryan Reynolds...”
“12 Strong Gina Rodriguez Annihilation Ewan McGregor Christopher Robin John David Washington BlacKkKlansman Shailene Woodley Adrift Jamie Dornan Fifty Shades Freed COMEDY MOVIE STAR OF 2018 Awkwafina Crazy Rich Asians Constance Wu Crazy Rich Asians Amy Schumer I Feel Pretty Melissa McCarthy Life of the Party John Cena Blockers Leslie...”
“Howard Jurassic World Fallen Kingdom Emily Blunt A Quiet Place Jennifer Lawrence Red Sparrow DRAMA MOVIE STAR OF 2018 Reese Witherspoon A Wrinkle in Time Oprah Winfrey A Wrinkle in Time John Krasinski A Quiet Place Emily Blunt A Quiet Place Natalie Portman Annihilation Jennifer Lawrence Red Sparrow Chris Hemsworth...”
“Man and the Wasp Scarlett Johansson Avengers Infinity War Oprah Winfrey A Wrinkle in Time Sandra Bullock Ocean s 8 Reese Witherspoon A Wrinkle in Time Leslie Mann Blockers Anne Hathaway Ocean s 8 Lily James Mamma Mia Here We Go Again Melissa McCarthy Life of the Party Bryce Dallas...”
“Deadpool 2 Chadwick Boseman Black Panther Dwayne Johnson Skyscraper Michael B Jordan Black Panther Chris Pratt Jurassic World Fallen Kingdom John Boyega Pacific Rim Uprising Tom Cruise Mission Impossible Fallout Pierce Brosnan Mamma Mia Here We Go Again Nick Robinson Love Simon FEMALE MOVIE STAR 0F 2018 Evangeline Lilly Ant...”


"Drake walk it talk it Travis Scott butterfly effect the cartons apest 2018 album post Malone beerbongs Bentleys Drake scorpion Cardi B invasion of privacy migos Culture II J Cole KOD Camila Cabello Camilla Travis Scott astroworld Shawn Mendes Shawn Mendes Ariana Grande sweetner logic Bobby Tarantino II"
"Sasha", all stars "Selena Gomez", come back to you "Katie B, bad rabbit and J. Baldwin", I like "migos feat"
"The 2018 TV series" walking dead "this is our Gray's anatomy 13 reasons for the disappearance of the" good doctor "scandal in space 9 1 1 1 westward Riverdale's" maid's story "Castle Rock comedy 2018 Saturday night live big bang theory modern family will add color to Blake..."
"Walking dead, this is gray's anatomy Big Bang Theory in the United States. The 13 reasons why Dr. grace WWE raw is a good doctor, and the 9 11 1 American Daren modern family live broadcast a post shared by 13 reasons on Saturday night. Why 13 reasons why PDT at 11:35 a.m. on August 3, 2018"
"Pool of death 2 Donald Glover solo a star wars story Alicia Vicente Goodman mausoleum Richard wick posiman Panther danagula Panther Michael B Jordan Panther Dwyane Johnson rampage Chris Platt Jurassic world fallen Kingdom Scarlett Johansen Avenger Infinite War Tom Cruise mission impossible dust TV show 2018..."
"Mann blockers Nick Robinson love Simon Amanda Seyfried Mamma Mia here we go against Anna Faris overboard John Hamm tag Tiffany haddish uncle drew Mila Kunis spy dumped me 2018 action movie stars Chris Hemsworth Avengers infinity war Evangeline Lily ant man and hornet Ryan Reynolds..."
"Top 12 Gina Rodriguez annihilates Ivan McGregor Christopher Robin John David Washington blacklansman shoring Lynn Woodley drifting Jamie Donan 50 film free comedy movie star 2018 octafina crazy rich Asian Constance Wu crazy rich Asian Amy Schumer I think it's Melissa McCarthy's life John Seine roadblock Leslie …”
"Howard, the fallen kingdom of the Jurassic world, Emily Bronte, a quiet place, Jennifer Lawrence, the red sparrow, movie star Reese Witherspoon, wrinkles in one time, Oprah Winfrey, wrinkles in one time, John krazinski, a quiet place, Emily Bronte, a quiet place, Natalie Portman annihilates Jennifer Lawrence Chris Hemsworth, the red sparrow... "
"Man and wasp Scarlett Johansen Avenger Infinite War Oprah Winfrey in the wrinkles of time Sandra Bullock 8 Reese Witherspoon in the wrinkles of time Leslie Mann blocker Anne Hathaway 8 Lily James Mamma Mia here we go to Melissa McCarthy party Bryce Dallas life..."
"Deadpool 2 Chadwick boseman Panther Dwayne Johnson skyscraper Michael B Jordan Panther Chris Pratt fallen kingdom of Jurassic world John boyega Pacific Rim uprising Tom Cruise mission impossible radioactive dust Pierce Brosnan Mamma Mia we have Nick Robinson love Simon actress 0f 2018 Evangeline Lily ant..."



Number  650
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: The Hidden, Sentimental Meaning Behind the Songs at Prince Louis’ Christening...”
“Image zoom Credit: Matt Porteous/PA WireIn another special photo of just mother and son, the prince — who was born in April — looked alert, despite being asleep at the start of his ceremony.”
“Prince Louis Is the Happiest Baby in Newly Released Christening Portrait with Mom KateLittle Prince Louis has one big smile!”
“In a newly released portrait from his christening last Monday, the youngest royal appeared to be laughing as he was photographed in the arms of beaming, proud mom Kate Middleton.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Taken after Louis’ christening at the Chapel Royal at St. James’ Palace, the photo, shot by photographer Matt Porteous, follows others released on Sunday and also taken in and outside of Clarence House by Matt Holyoak.”
“Porteous previously photographed Louis’ brother Prince George when he turned 3 in 2016.”
““Their Royal Highnesses hope that everyone enjoys this lovely photograph of Prince Louis as much as they do,” the office of Prince William and Kate at Kensington Palace said in a statement on Monday.”
“Image zoom Credit: Matt Holyoak/Camera Press/REDUXKate wore her most princess-worthy look yet at the special event, picking an Alexander McQueen dress with a structured shoulder detail and a dramatic Jane Taylor headpiece.”
“The first photo features Will, Kate and their three children along with Prince Harry and Meghan Markle, Prince Charles and Camilla and Kate’s family, including Carole and Michael Middleton, James Middleton, Pippa Middleton and her husband, James Matthews.”


"Related videos: the hidden and sentimental meaning behind the songs of Prince Louis baptism..."
"Photo zooming credit: Matt portios / PA weir in another special photo of mother and son, the April born Prince looks alert, though he falls asleep at the beginning of the ceremony."
"Prince Louis is the happiest baby in the newly released baptism portrait with mother cartrittle! Prince Louis has a big smile!"
"In a baptized portrait just released last Monday, the youngest member of the royal family seemed to laugh when he was photographed in the arms of his jubilant and proud mother, Kate Middleton."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
This photo was taken after Louis was baptized in the Royal Chapel at St James' Palace by photographer Matt Porteous, following other photos released on Sunday and also taken by Matt holyoak inside and outside Clarence palace
"Portius took pictures of Louis' brother Prince George when he turned three in 2016."
"Her royal highness wants everyone to enjoy this lovely picture of Prince Louis as they do," Prince William and Kate said in a statement from their offices at Kensington Palace on Monday
"Photo zooming credit: Matt holyoak / camera press / Redux Kate, who wore the best Princess look to date at this special event, chose an Alexander McQueen dress with structured shoulder details and a striking Jane Taylor headdress."
"The first photo features will, Kate and their three children, as well as Prince Harry and Megan marcel, Prince Charles and Camilla, and Kate's family, including Carol and Michael Middleton, James Middleton, Pippa Middleton and her husband James Matthews."



Number  651
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s time to go see her, Tess,” Randall says.”
“That’s my brother.”Tess hasn’t seen “her” in awhileBack on the Season 2 finale, we got our first glimpse of an older Randall and an older Tess.”
“Sterling K. Brown: We’ve all [in the cast] known that it’s Rebecca, though the audience didn’t know, and we know why it’s Rebecca and you guys will find out at the end of the season what it is.”
“How soon are we going to find out why everyone is gathering to see her?”
“TheWrap: How did you feel about the reveal Rebecca is the mysterious future “her” we’ve all been wondering about?”
“So since we didn’t get anymore new hints on screen, TheWrap was able to gather a few clues for you while speaking with Brown about Randall winning the Philadelphia City Council race and how those election results might impact the Pearsons in the present and the future.”
“Also Read: 'This Is Us' Season 3: 'ER' Alum Goran Visnjic Cast as Beth's Teacher on Backstory Episode“This Is Us” returned from hiatus tonight with an episode that jumped between the past and present — but didn’t head into the future again.”
“Does that mean they separate or even divorce?”
“That spat led to Randall sleeping on the couch, and a not so happy vibe between the happy couple in the present, with some hints in the future indicating the two are only communicating between Adult Tess.”
“The episode also ended with a fight between our Present Day Beth and Randall, because Randall refused to drop out of the city council race, when the polls show he won’t win and his wife asks him to give up and come back to helping his family.”


"It's time to see her, Tess," Randall said
"That's my brother." Tess didn't see "she" in the last episode of season 2 for a long time. We saw old Randall and old Tess for the first time
"Stirling K. Brown: we all know it's Rebecca, although the audience doesn't know, we know why it's Rebecca, and you'll know what it is at the end of the season."
"How long will it take us to figure out why everyone got together to see her?"
"The wrap": how do you feel about the revelation of "Rebecca" in "Rebecca is the mysterious future we've always wanted to know"
"So, since we don't get any new cues on the screen anymore, the wrap gathered some clues for you when talking with brown about Randall's winning the city council election in Philadelphia and the impact of these election results on the present and future of the Pearsons."
"Also read: 'this is our' third season: 'er' Alan Golan Visnjic plays Beth's teacher backstage episode 'this is our' return to rest tonight and jump between the past and the present with an episode - but not towards the future."
"Does that mean they are separated or even divorced?"
"The quarrel caused Randall to sleep on the sofa. The atmosphere between the happy couple is not very pleasant now. Some hints in the future indicate that they are only communicating with adult Tess."
"This episode also ended with the fight between Beth and Randall today, because Randall refused to withdraw from the city council election. At that time, the polls showed that he would not win, and his wife asked him to give up and come back to help his family."



Number  652
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[H/T Twitter / @etnow]Related:UPDATE: Bristol Palin's Ex-Fiancé Dakota Meyer Hints the Two Are Back Together With Instagram PhotoBristol Palin SLAMS Instagram Follower Who Criticized Brother TrigCiara and Russell Wilson Welcome Baby Girl...”
“I can't believe we'll be a family of 5 in a matter of days ❤️ A post shared by Bristol Meyer (@bsmp2) on Apr 25, 2017 at 10:03am PDTCongratulations to the happy family on their newest addition!”
“The newest edition of the Meyer family!!”
“@bsmp2 #dadlife #ownthedash A post shared by Dakota Meyer (@dakotameyer0317) on May 8, 2017 at 3:14pm PDTCongratulations to Bristol Palin and her husband Dakota Meyer!”
“Palin gave birth to her third child, a baby girl, and announced the exciting news on social media.”
“The 26-year-old posted a cute black-and-white photo with Meyer and her little girl on Instagram Monday.”
“"Welcome to the world Atlee Bay," Palin wrote.”
“Meyer posted the same photo on his account, writing, "Meet Atlee Bay!!!”
“@bsmp2 #dadlife #ownthedash"Atlee Bay is the second child for Palin and her husband, who will celebrate their first wedding anniversary in June.”


"[H / T twitter / @ etnow] related: update: Bristol Palin's former fiance, Meyer, Dakota, suggests they're together again in instagram photos. Bristol Palin attacks instagram followers, who criticize the trigciara brothers and Russell Wilson for welcoming the baby girl..."
"I can't believe we're a family of five in a few days ❤️  Bristol Meyer (@ bsmp2) shared a post on PDT at 10:03 a.m. on April 25, 2017 to greet the latest members of the happy family! "
"The latest version of the Mayer family!"
"@ bsmp2 # dadlife # owns a post shared by Dakota Meyer (@ dakotameyer 0317) with Bristol Palin and her husband Dakota Meyer at 3:14 pm on May 8, 2017!"
Palin gave birth to her third child, a baby girl, and announced the exciting news on social media
"Mayer, 26, posted a lovely black-and-white photo of Mayer and her little girl on instagram on Monday."
"Welcome to the Atlantic Bay of the world," Palin wrote
Meyer posted the same photo on his account and wrote: "know Attlee bay!"
"@ bsmp2 # dadlife # ownthedash" atley Bay, Palin's and her husband's second child, will celebrate their first wedding anniversary in June



Number  653
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"We're working on each other and trying to work on us, and we talk every day."”
“"Right now, we're just friends," the WWE star told her fans amid rumors of the former couple's rekindled romance.”
“On Wednesday, July 4, 2018, The Crown star addressed reports romantically linking her with Mission: Impossible — Fallout co-star Tom Cruise.”
“Speculation surrounding their rumored romance began in May 2017 after the two were spotted kissing while filming a scene for the action movie.”
“"Even though the crew were there, it was all [in the tabloids] like, 'The next wife falls at his feet,'" Kirby began during an interview with the August 2018 issue of Marie Claire UK.”
“At the time, she had already been in her current relationship with actor Callum Turner for nearly two years.”
“The Netflix star added, "The most disconcerting thing was the people I didn't think would believe it, did, and they were texting my boyfriend, asking, 'Are you OK?'”
“I don't think they believe anything they read now because you just can't.”
“None of it is real.”
“To be getting married to him?”


"We help each other, we try to help ourselves, we talk every day."
"Right now, we're just friends," the WWE star told her fans, rumored to be back in love with the former couple
"On Wednesday, July 4, 2018, the Crown Star published a report romantically linking her with Tom Cruise, CO star of mission: the impossible - the dust is settled."
"In May 2017, it was found that the two were kissing while filming a scene for an action movie, and speculation about their rumored relationship began."
In an interview with British Marie Claire UK in August 2018, Kirby said: "although all the cast members are here, they all say that" the next wife falls at his feet. "
"At that time, she had been in a relationship with the actor Karem turner for nearly two years."
The Netflix star added: "what's most disturbing is the people I don't think I'm going to believe. They really believe it. They text my boyfriend and ask me, 'are you ok?'"
"I don't think they believe anything they read now, because you just don't believe it."
"It's not true."
"Marry him?"



Number  654
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s written for the show.””
“She feels like people are judging her and that always makes her feel anxious,” our insider adds.”
“Selena Gomez was a little too confessional in her new song ‘Back To You.’ We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she regrets that fans are sure she’s singing about ex Justin Bieber.”
“As soon as fans got a listen to Selena Gomez‘s brand new song “Back To You,” they immediately dissected the lyrics and many believed that she was singing about her ex Justin Bieber, 24.”
“The reaction has been a tough one for the 25-year-old, who has moved on after rekindling things with the Biebs in the fall of 2017.”
““All the speculation and judgement about Selena’s new song being about Justin has been hard on her.”
“It’s never easy putting personal stuff out there but this is taking way more of a toll on her than she was expecting,” a source close to the singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She loves her song and she’s proud of it, but she’s starting to have major regrets about being so open.”
“With lyrics like “Let a couple years water down how I’m feeling about you” and “Everybody knows we got unfinished business,” how could fans NOT think that she was singing about Justin?”
“...the Executive Producer and at least one level headed fan pointed that out tweeting Again people BackToYou is not about Justin...”


"It's for the show."
"She felt that people were judging her, which always made her anxious," our insider added
"Serena Gomez is a little too confessed in her new song back to you. We have exclusive coverage of the details of her regret that her fans affirmed that she was singing former Justin Bieber
"As soon as the fans heard Selena Gomez's new song" back to you ", they immediately analyzed the lyrics. Many people thought she was singing her 24-year-old former Justin Bieber."
"It's a tough reaction for the 25-year-old, who started a new life after rekindling his relationship with Bibbs in the fall of 2017."
"All the new songs about Serena are about Justin. It's hard for her to guess and judge."
A source close to the singer told reporters: "it's never easy to put personal belongings there, but the impact on her is much greater than she expected." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"She loves her songs and is proud of it, but she's starting to feel very sorry for being so open."
The lyrics are "let me dilute my feelings for you for a few years" and "everyone knows we still have unfinished business". How can the fans not think that she is singing Justin? "
“… Executive producer and at least one sober fan point out that it's not about Justin to give people back to you again. "



Number  655
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  656
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““House of Cards” staffers have since made allegations of sexual misconduct against Spacey.”
“Spacey allegedly made a creepy move on Rapp back in 1986, when Spacey was 26 and Rapp just 14, the younger actor said.”
“...troubling allegations against him...”
“The production company for the show said they will continue to evaluate a creative path forward for the program during the hiatus Spacey who hasn t been arrested or charged with any crime has been under fire for nearly a week after Star Trek actor Anthony Rapp came forward with...”
““Netflix will not be involved with any further production of ‘House of Cards’ that includes Kevin Spacey,” the service said.”
“Production on the sixth and final season of “House of Cards” will go forward without Spacey and his lead character, former President Frank Underwood.”
“Netflix announced Friday it has cut all ties with the actor, in the wake of sexual harassment and assault allegations made against him.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)The “House of Cards” fell on Kevin Spacey.”


"The staff of the house of cards later charged spacey with sexual misconduct."
"It's said that spacey made some creepy moves on Rapp as early as 1986, when spacey was 26 and Rapp was only 14," the young actor said
“… The disturbing charges against him... "
"The production company of the show said that they would continue to evaluate the creation path of the show during the suspension period. After Star Trek actor Anthony Rapp appeared, spacey has not been arrested or charged with any crime for nearly a week, and he has been criticized all the time..."
"Netflix will not be involved in any further production of house of cards, including Kevin Spacey," the service said
The sixth and final season of house of cards will continue without spacey and his protagonist, former president Frank Underwood
"Netflix announced on Friday that it had cut off all contact with the actor after making sexual harassment and assault charges against him."
"Click send this email to a friend (open in a new window) Click share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window)" house of cards "falls on Kevin Spacey."



Number  657
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Take a look at this cool outfit with a leather biker jacket and black top.”
“While it’s true that this denim style is great for highlighting womanly curves, you can always play against type in vintage-inspired, lighter blue flare jeans, by matching them with masculine-inspired separates.”
“04 of 11 Date Night Outfit with a Sexy Top Daniel Zuchnik/Getty Images Are you a stylish trendsetter?”
“The trick to making this look stylish -- not sloppy – is to choose top layers in different weights and textures, such as this cool lingerie-inspired look with a lacy camisole, long-sleeved tee, and nubby faux fur jacket.”
“Lighter wash flare jeans take on the look of a stylish trouser when you wear them with multiple tops.”
“03 of 11 Fall or Winter Outfit with Layered Separates Kirstin Sinclair/Getty Images When the weather cools, make a head-turning fashion statement by creating a layered look over flare jeans.”
“A structured leather handbag and basic black loafers are all you need.”
“For a clean, modern look, keep accessories classic.”
“Sticking to dark shades for all your layers, as pictured here, has an overall slenderizing effect, too.”
“Meanwhile, wider hemmed bottoms help to minimize your thighs, making you look leaner.”


"Look at this cool dress with a leather motorcycle jacket and a black top."
"Although this denim style is really suitable for highlighting women's curves, you can match it in retro style, lighter blue flared jeans by matching it with masculine style pieces."
"04 of 11 date night wear with sexy top Daniel zuchnik / Getty Images are you a trendsetter?"
"To make this dress look fashionable rather than slovenly, the key is to choose top layers of different weights and textures, such as this cool lingerie, with lace vest, long sleeve T-shirt and hairy man-made leather jacket."
"Shallow wash flared pants with a number of top, will present a fashionable pants shape."
"03 / 11 autumn / winter wear with layered pieces Kirstin Sinclair / Getty Images for layered look on flared pants when the weather turns cool."
"A structured leather bag and basic black casual shoes are what you need."
"For a clean, modern look, keep the classic accessories."
"As shown in the picture, use dark color on all your layers, which will also bring about the overall slimming effect."
"At the same time, a wider hem helps reduce your thighs and make you look thinner."



Number  658
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“@girlwithnojob on Instagram) and her sister Jackie Oshry’s “stamp of approval.””
“...about her not so secret crush on the radio DJ since his time vying for JoJo Fletcher s heart on season 12 of The Bachelorette in 2016”
“During an appearance on The Morning Breath show on Wednesday, Bachelorette and Bachelor in Paradise alum Wells revealed that he first met the Modern Family actress — you guessed it — on social media.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““The internet — it’s amazing,” he said.”
“Asked about maintaining a private life post-Bachelor, the Nashville resident acknowledged it wasn’t easy.”
““I’m amazed how smart the internet is,” he said.”
“Because I just assume everyone on Twitter is an idiot and then I m like Wow As fans of the adorable unexpected couple are well aware Hyland 26 and Adams 33 began flirting on Twitter this summer during his stint as the bartender in Paradise but Hyland had been vocal...”
“RELATED VIDEO: Sarah Hyland Reveals Her Modern Family Character Is BisexualHyland and Wells took their relationship public this Halloween, dressing up as characters from Stranger Things together and posting plenty of photos on Instagram — but don’t expect them to be sharing too many more details beyond that.”
“The actress documented herself watching Adams’ interview on her Instagram story, excitedly announcing that she had received hosts Claudia Oshry (a.k.a.”


"@ girlwithnojob (on instagram) and her sister Jackie oshley's" recognition seal. "
“… About her secret love for radio DJ, since he competed for Joe Fletcher's heart in the 12th season of Bachelor in 2016
"In an appearance on the breath show on Wednesday morning, the alumnus of bachelor and Bachelor of paradise, wells, revealed that he met the modern family actress for the first time on social media - you guessed right."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The Internet - it's amazing," he said
When asked how to maintain a private life after being single, the Nashville resident admitted that it was not easy
"I'm surprised at how smart the Internet is," he said
"Because I just assume that everyone on Twitter is an idiot, and then I'm just like world of Warcraft, because fans of this lovely unexpected couple know very well that this summer, Helan 26 and Adams 33 began to flirt on twitter, when he was working as a bartender in heaven, but Helan kept on speaking..."
"Related video: Sarah Hyland revealed that her modern family role is bisexual. On Halloween this year, Helan and wells made their relationship public, dressed up as strangers and posted a lot of photos on instagram - but don't expect them to share more details. "
The actress recorded watching an interview with ADAMS on instagram and was excited to announce that she had received the host, Claudia Ashley



Number  659
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Love you and my baby!””
“Image zoom Credit: Emma McIntyre/GettyIn January, Lee shared a seaside shot of the pair on vacation in Mexico, writing: “Bye bye CABO!!!!”
“Though they initially stayed mum in interviews, their social media accounts quickly morphed into a mutual love fest in the coming months.”
““Can’t stop staring.”Lee and Furlan first sparked dating rumors last summer when they were seen getting cozy while out and about in Calabasas, California.”
““Love,” she wrote.”
“Her Instagram stories featured an even closer look at the massive rock.”
“I can’t wait to get to spend forever with my best friend,” she wrote.”
““Best day of my life!!!!”
“Furlan, 31, also shared the happy news via Twitter, posting a pic of the two holding hands — with the sparkler front and center.”
““Say hello to future Mrs. Lee  #engaged.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Love you and my baby!"
Photo zooming credit: Emma McIntyre / gettingin January, Lee shared a photo of the two people on holiday at the seaside in Mexico and wrote: "goodbye, cabo!!"
"Although they were initially silent in interviews, their social media accounts will soon evolve into a love affair in the coming months."
"I can't help staring." Last summer, Lee and Fran were seen hanging out in Calabasas, California, and it was the first time they had a date
"Love," she wrote
"Her story on instagram describes the boulder in more detail."
"I can't wait to be with my best friend forever," she wrote
"The best day of my life!!"
Fran, 31, also shared the good news through Twitter. He posted a photo of two people holding hands. The front and middle of the photo are glittering
"Say hello to the future Mrs. Li, engagement." Get push notification of news, functions, etc



Number  660
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  661
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maia and I have an hour, maybe two, every so often to fit in a movie, but relationships outside of what we’re doing right now are very challenging and difficult.”
“There’s not a lot of time!”
“It’s nice to be able to pursue other things.”
“A: We have some [different] interests outside of skating, which is great.”
“Alex, when you say “different,” what specifically do you mean?”
“We are!”
“We are different people!”
“A: I think because we are such a strong team and so in sync on the ice, there's the perception that we’re literally always the same in life and that we have the same interests.”
“Ruben ChamorroWhat don’t people ask you about very often that you wish you could talk more about?”
“We’re just really grateful to have been on this journey together.”


"Maya and I have an hour, maybe two hours, to adapt to a movie every once in a while, but the relationship beyond what we are doing now is very challenging and difficult."
"Time is running out!"
"It's good to be able to pursue something else."
"A: besides skating, we have some (different) interests, which is good."
Alex, when you say "different," what exactly do you mean? "
"We are!"
"We are different people!"
"A: I think that because we are such a strong team and are so synchronized on the ice, people think that we are almost always the same in life and we have the same interests."
"Ruben Chamorro, what do people ask you so often that you want to talk more about it?"
"We really appreciate the journey together."



Number  662
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But she may have had a better claim to being at Drake’s party than Simmons or Jenner, given that she and Drake collaborated on the 2015 song “On a Wave.””
“Kendall Jenner spark Blake Griffin s nasty custody battle...”
“...enjoy a romantic night out...”
“The latest incident happened Wednesday night at Delilah, the Daily Mail reported.”
“The Vogue supermodel and her NBA star boyfriend were seen leaving the club, and they looked “tense,” possibly because Tinashe also was at the party.”
“This is awkward.”
“Tinashe was once again at the same party as Kendall Jenner and Ben Simmons after it was reported that Ben thought his ex was stalking him https t co s5ER5CJoeX Luca Forzin Luca_Forzin July 19 2018 Tinashe s tendency to be up at the same Los Angeles area events at...”
“...least three times in the past month has become problematic enough that the Philadelphia 76er has hired extra security TMZ and other outlets have reported...”
“TMZ said Simmons believes the “All Hands on Deck” singer has become “obsessed” with him after he dumped her for Jenner.”
“An insider told TMZ in early July: “Ben is convinced Tinashe cannot accept the fact he ended their relationship and has moved on with Kendall.”


"But she may prefer to show up at Drake's party than Simmons or Jenna, because she and Drake collaborated on the 2015 song" on the waves. "
"Kendall Jenner started Blake Griffin's dirty custody fight..."
“… Enjoy a romantic night... "
According to the daily mail, the latest incident happened in Delilah on Wednesday night
"Some people saw the fashion supermodel and her NBA star boyfriend leave the club, they looked very" nervous ", maybe because she was also at the party."
"It's embarrassing."
"Tinashe is at the same party with Kendall Jenner and Ben Simmons again, because it is reported that Ben thinks his ex girlfriend is following him, and tinashe tends to appear at the same event in the Los Angeles area..."
"In the past month, there have been problems at least three times. The Philadelphia 76ers have hired additional security guards, TMZ and other media reports..."
TMZ said Simmons believed the "armed" singer had become "obsessed" with Jenna after abandoning her for her sake
"Ben is sure she can't accept the fact that he ended their relationship and continued to live with Kendall," a person familiar with the matter told TMZ in early July



Number  663
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The two wed in 1998, and Key filed for divorce on Dec. 31, 2015, a month after they separated.”
“Image zoom Credit: Walter McBride/WireImageKey was previously married to Cynthia Blaise, an actress and dialect coach.”
“The duo also stepped out during 2017 Emmys weekend, as well as this year’s Tony Awards and BAFTA Tea Party event.”
“Key, 46, and Pugliese have kept their romance largely out of the public eye, though the two have attended events together, including the U.S. Open this year and the Rescue Dinner hosted by IRC in New York City earlier this month.”
“She said yes!” he shared on Twitter Tuesday morning.”
“I’m the luckiest man ever.”
““She shows me every day that each one of us has the ability to help make the world a better place.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Key and Peele star is engaged to his girlfriend, Hollywood producer and director Elisa Pugliese, a rep for the actor confirmed to PEOPLE.”
“Keegan-Michael Key was previously married to Cynthia Blaise, an actress and dialect coachWeddings bells will soon be ringing for Keegan-Michael Key.”


"They got married in 1998, and Kay filed for divorce on December 31, 2015 after a month of separation."
"Credit for image zooming: Walter McBride / wireimagekey married actress and dialect coach Cynthia Bryce."
"The pair also appeared at the 2017 Emmy weekend, as well as this year's Tony Awards and BFA tea party."
Kay and puglitzer, 46, have been keeping their relationship out of the way, although they have been involved in a number of events, including this year's U.S. Open and a rescue dinner hosted by the IRC in New York earlier this month
"She said yes! "He tweeted it on Tuesday morning."
"I'm the luckiest person ever."
"She shows me every day that each of us has the ability to help make the world a better place."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The key and skin star is engaged to his girlfriend, Hollywood producer and director Eliza poglitzer, and the actor's representative confirmed this to people magazine
Keegan Michael key was married to actress Cynthia Bryce, and the wedding bell will soon ring for him



Number  664
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I knew that if you and I were to ever date … there’s no going back.”
“I’m like going after this other girl and we’re going on dates, and yet it’s so much easier with you.”
““I was in love,” he says.”
“...in a different light...”
“It was a slow build for me Flirty Friendship After their first season of Paradise together the couple built a strong friendship but also became the definition of it s complicated During a weekend spent in Virginia with their friends for a charity event Iaconetti was planning Haibon saw her...”
““I’m not gonna lie and say that I was in love with Ashley during BiP.”
““I was overthinking every little thing that came out of my mouth.”Though Haibon “dumped” Iaconetti on the show, “I never felt like it was over between us after Paradise,” he says.”
“I was constantly scared of another girl coming in and catching your eye,” explains Iaconetti.”
““My interpretation of our first date is a little different.”
““It never felt dull … or awkward.”Image zoom Ashley Iaconetti and Jared Haibon | Credit: Courtesy Ashley IaconettiIt was “truly love at first sight” for Iaconetti, however, who wasn’t able to fully be herself during the experience.”


"I know if you date me It's not going back. "
"I like to go after another girl. We're going on a date, but it's much easier to be with you."
"I'm in love," he said
“… From another angle... "
"For me, it's a slow way to build a flirting friendship. After their first season together in paradise, the couple built a strong friendship, but also became very complicated in its definition. Spending a weekend in Virginia with their friends for the charity iaconetti project, hayburn saw her..."
"I won't lie that I fell in love with Ashley during BiP."
"I think too much about every little thing that comes out of my mouth." Although hayburn "abandoned" akonetti "on the show, he said," I never felt like we were over after heaven. "
"I was always afraid that another girl would come in and catch your eye," iaconetti explained
"I have a different understanding of our first date."
"It never felt boring Or embarrassment. " Image zooming Ashley aconetti and Jared hayburn credit: courtesy Ashley aconetti this is "true love at first sight", however, for aconetti, she can't be herself completely in the experience



Number  665
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Winnie HarlowDimitrios Kambouris / Getty ImagesThe Canadian model went for a touch of Hollywood glamour with a dramatic, slitted gown and voluptuous waves.”
“Brooke ShieldsDimitrios Kambouris / Getty ImagesThe actress and model opted for a chic suit with metallic embellishment at the collar, and paired it with black stilettos.”
“Candice HuffineDimitrios Kambouris / Getty ImagesThe model looked drop-dead gorgeous in a bright red jumpsuit with a two-tiered necklace and gold clutch.”
“Emily RatajkowskiDimitrios Kambouris / Getty ImagesThe model and actress wore a black, lacy dress with a floral pattern and a sweetheart neckline.”
“Diane LaneDimitrios Kambouris / Getty ImagesThe actress looked gorgeous in an iridescent turquoise suit, which she paired with neutral pumps and a black handbag.”
“Claire DanesAFP - Getty ImagesThe “Homeland” star showed off her baby bump in an asymmetrical black gown.”
“She paired the neutral dress with a bold, red lip.”
“Ashley GrahamEvan Agostini / APThe model looked chic and understated in her beige Vera Wang gown.”
“Celebrities including Cate Blanchett, Diane Lane and Brooke Shields rocked these stylish, menswear-inspired looks.”
“Issa RaeDimitrios Kambouris / Getty ImagesThe actress, writer and producer wore a stunning, sparkly blue gown as she hosted the CFDAs.”


Winnie Harlow Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images, a Canadian model, pursues Hollywood glamour with a dramatic slit robe and sexy waves
"Brooke Shields Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images the actress and model chose a chic suit with a metal collar and black stilettos."
"Candice huffine Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images, the model looks beautiful in a bright red jumpsuit, a double necklace and a golden clutch."
Emily ratakikovsky mirios cumbrics / Getty the model and actress are wearing a black lace dress with floral patterns and a lovely neckline
Diane lanedimitrios kambouris / Getty Images, the actress, looks gorgeous in a glittering Turquoise suit, Unisex high heels and a black handbag
Claire danyshav Getty's photo of home shows the audience her small lump in an asymmetrical black robe
She paired the neutral dress with a bold red lip
"Ashley Graham Evan Agostini / this model looks chic and low-key in a beige Vera Wang dress."
"Celebrities, including Kate Blanchett, Diane Lane and Brooke Shields, have brought shock to these fashionable, Menswear inspired looks."
The actress, writer and producer wears an amazing shiny blue dress as she hosts cfdas



Number  666
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Deal Source Although Richie rarely discusses their relationship while appearing on Australian talk show The Morning Show in September she shared that she and Disick are very happy...”
“She loves being around Scott and his kids The insider also shared that Richie is happy to have built up some trust with Kardashian and proved to Kourtney that she is great with her kids RELATED VIDEO Sofia Richie Knows Kourtney Kardashian Isn t Her Biggest Fan and Tries to...”
“With just days to go before Christmas, Kourtney Kardashian hung out with her ex Scott Disick and his girlfriend Sofia Richie during a family vacation with Kardashian and Disick’s kids in Cabo San Lucas, Mexico, over the weekend.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Disick, 35, had a sense of humor about traveling abroad with both his girlfriend and ex: “What more can a guy ask for.”
“THREE’S COMPANY,” Disick captioned an Instagram image showing the trio relaxing on recliners — with Kardashian, 39, on his right, and Richie, 20, on his left — after the Daily Mail published photos of their day in the sun.”
“Though Disick sat between them in the photo he shared, the ladies lounged next to each other at one point, chatting and looking at Kardashian’s phone.”
“Kardashian and Richie also walked on the beach together as the kids — Mason, 9, Penelope, 6, and Reign, 4 — played in the sand.”
“Kardashian opted for a black two-piece swimsuit, which she later partially covered up with a dark mini-skirt, while Richie wore an orange bikini and Disick rocked leopard-print swim trunks and a blue t-shirt.”
“Giving her seal of approval, Khloé Kardashian tweeted in response to a fan who called her sister’s vacation “co-parenting done right!”


"Although Ritchie rarely discussed their relationship, appearing on the Australian talk show in September, she shared that she and Disick were very happy..."
"She likes to be with Scott and his children. People familiar with the situation also said Ritchie was happy to build some trust with Kardashian and proved to Courtney that she loved videos related to children. Sophia Ritchie knew that Courtney Kardashian was not her biggest fan and tried to... "
"Only a few days before Christmas, Courtney Kardashian and her ex Scott Disick and his girlfriend Sophia Ritchie are on holiday with Kardashian and Disick's children in San Lucas, capo, Mexico, over the weekend."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Disik, 35, has a good sense of humor about traveling abroad with his girlfriend and ex-wife: "what else can a man ask for?"
After the daily mail published a photo of the three in the sun for a day, a picture on instagram titled "three together" showed them relaxing in a reclining chair - Kardashian, 39, on the right and rich, 20, on the left
"Although in the photos he shared, Disick was sitting between them, the two women once strolled next to each other, chatting and looking at Kardashian's mobile phone."
"Kardashian and Ritchie are also walking on the beach, and the children - Mason, 9, Penelope, 6, and Ricky, 4 - are playing on the beach."
"Kardashian chose a black two-piece swimsuit, which she later partially covered with a dark miniskirt, while Ritchie wore an orange bikini and bleached Panther print trunks and a blue T-shirt."
Kardashian responded to a fan on her microblog that her sister's holiday was "a good job of CO parenting!"



Number  667
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Compassion is such a strong and grounding virtue that doesn’t just better you but also the people and world around you.””
““We are so in love with her and cannot wait for the world to meet her.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“The Australian-born supermodel and Erth Jewelry CEO gave birth to the couple’s second child, a baby girl named Gia “Gigi” Leblane Clark, on Monday, Jan. 15, a rep confirms to PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Trunfio and the Grammy-winning musician — whose also share son Zion Rain, 3 — welcomed their daughter at 4:44 a.m. She weighed 7 lbs., 8 oz.”
““Gia is named after my late father, Giuseppe Antonio Trunfio, who passed away from cancer,” Trunfio tells PEOPLE.”
“The couple told E!”
“News, “Gary and I are humbled to announce the arrival of our healthy and incredibly stunning daughter into the world on Martin Luther King Jr. Day, of course, Zion is so excited to be a big brother.”
“We are so grateful to Dr. Crane and nurses at Cedars for such an incredible birth experience.”“[We] feel so lucky to have a daughter, and to bring a little girl into the world during such empowering times, the future is bright for women,” they added.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"Compassion is a strong virtue, it can not only make you better, but also make the people around you and the world better."
"We love her so much that we can't wait for the whole world to see her." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
A representative confirmed to people that the Australian born supermodel and CEO of erth jewelry gave birth to the couple's second child, GIA "Gigi" leblane Clark, on Monday, January 15
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Trumpfio and the Grammy award-winning musician - their half son, Zion Ryan, 3 - welcomed their daughter at 4:44 a.m., weighing seven pounds and eight ounces."
"GIA was named after my late father, Giuseppe Antonio trenfio, who died of cancer," trenfio told people
"The couple told me!"
"News," Gary and I humbly announced that on Martin Luther King's day, our healthy and amazing daughter came to the world, and of course Zion was so excited to be a big brother
"We are very grateful to Dr. crane and the nurses at Cedar hospital for giving us such an incredible birth experience." "We feel very lucky to have a daughter, to be able to bring a little girl into the world in such a powerful era, and the future of women is bright," they added
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  668
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of caviar, 20 gallons of house-made gelato — and of course, 7,170 chocolate Oscars.”
“...of Miyazaki wagyu beef, 15 kg.”
“...sculpted ice raw bar, 300 lbs.”
“Among the highlights of the Governors Ball menu this year are a 2,600 lb.”
“Download the PeopleTV app on your favorite mobile or connected TV device, or stream the show on People.com, EW.com, Twitter, Facebook Live and YouTube Live.”
“Image zoom Wolfgang Puck (left) and Giuliana RancicImage zoom Giuliana Rancic at the 90th Annual Academy Awards | Credit: Kevin Mazur/WireImageWatch PEOPLE & Entertainment Weekly Red Carpet Live this Sunday, March 4 at 5 p.m. ET/ 2 p.m. PT.”
“(Luckily, it didn’t stain!)”
“Of course, Rancic took it all in stride and laughed the moment off.”
“After she took a bite, a small piece snapped off and fell down the front of her stunning cream-colored gown.”
“As Puck, 68, was running down his menu for the night, he offered Rancic, 43, one of his famous chocolate Oscar statuettes — which were filled with passion fruit chocolate, to Rancic’s surprise.”


"Roe, 20 gallons of homemade gels, and of course 7170 pieces of Oscar chocolate."
“…… Miyazaki and jade beef, 15kg. "
“… Carved iceberg bar, 300 pounds. "
"One of the highlights of this year's governor's ball menu is 2600 pounds."
"Download the peopletv app on your favorite mobile or connected TV device, or play programs on people.com, EW, twitter, Facebook live and Youtube live."
"Image zooming Wolfgang Park (left) and Juliana ranch image zooming at the 90th Academy Awards ceremony | credit: Kevin Mazu / wireimagewatch people's entertainment weekly red carpet live this Sunday, March 4, 5pm EST / 2pm Pt."
"Fortunately, it's not dirty!"
"Of course, he took it easy and laughed."
"After she took a bite, a small piece of debris fell down and landed in front of her beautiful Beige robe."
When Parker, 68, was browsing the menu that night, he presented Ranchi, 43, one of his famous Oscar statuettes filled with passion fruit chocolates, which surprised Ranchi



Number  669
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Getty(4)And it looks like she’s definitely returning to that retro style this year.”
““She always gets excited about bright colors, because they flatter her complexion.”Image zoomIn Lopez’s earlier years at the Met Gala, the star kept her looks more conservative, instead opting for more classic, Old Hollywood vibes, including Marilyn Monroe-inspired hair looks in 2007 and 2008.”
““Whenever you see a picture of Jennifer, the handbag matches, the shoes work and the hair is perfect for the look she’s doing,” the Shades of Blue star’s stylist Rob Zangardi previously told PEOPLE.”
“In previous years, the glam goddess never played it safe with her looks, which ranged from a stunning custom nude one-shoulder Atelier Versace illusion gown in 2015 to a semi-mohawk pompadour hairstyle for 2013’s punk theme worn with a reptile-print Michael Kors gown.”
“#beastmode #bronx #latino #goat” (by “goat” she means “greatest of all time,” a popular acronym used on social media).”
“Just a week ago, Jenny from the Block proclaimed her love for the Bronx Bomber on Instagram, sharing a photo of him post-home run with the caption, “Wow!!”
““Me and my macho bello… #metball2017 #Valentino,” she wrote.”
“Image zoom Credit: Neilson Barnard/GettyLopez shared a selfie of the couple on Instagram on the way to Metropolitan Museum of Art’s annual gala.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple looked happy in love on the red carpet, which doesn’t come as much of a surprise since the two look like they’re on cloud nine each time they’re spotted out together.”


"Image scaling credit: Getty (4), it seems that she will definitely return to that retro style this year."
"She's always excited about bright colors because they make her skin look better." The image zooms in on Lopez's early image at the met Party, making her look more conservative than choosing more classic old Hollywood styles, including hairstyles inspired by Marilyn Monroe in 2007 and 2008
"Whenever you see a picture of Jennifer, the matching of handbags, shoes and hair are perfect for her look," Blue Star stylist rob zangardi told people earlier
"In the past few years, this dazzling goddess has never done a safe treatment to her own shape, from an amazing custom bare shoulder one shoulder dress in Versace illumination in 2015 to a half Mohawk Pompadour hairstyle with reptile printed Michael kors dress in punk theme in 2013."
"Beastmode # Bronx # Latin # goat" (she said "goat" means "the greatest ever", a popular abbreviation on social media)
Just a week ago, Jennie on the block announced her love for the Bronx bomber on instagram, sharing a photo of him after a home run titled "Wow!"
"My man and my beauty #Mettbauer 2017? Valentino, "she wrote
"Image scaling credit: Nelson Barnard / Getty Lopez shared the couple's self portrait on instagram on his way to the annual event of the Metropolitan Museum of art."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's no surprise that the couple seem to be in love on the red carpet, because every time they are found together, it's like they're on cloud nine."



Number  670
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My ultimate goal in my life is to have a family,” he shared with PEOPLE.”
““My adoption journey fully fuels my inspiration, my drive, what my vision of success is.”
““Yesterday was definitely one of the hardest days I’d say after our crazy team fall apart injury day between the knee and the eye that was rough,” he said after his win.”
“The actor said the lead up to the final had been very hard going.”
“Image zoom Credit: David Livingston/Getty ImagesImage zoom Credit: Adam Rose via Getty ImagesFisher suffered a scratched cornea two weeks ago and Arnold has injured her leg so badly it was feared she would have to drop out of the competition.”
“I’ve come close and to finally take it with Jordan means more than I could ever say,” she said.”
““It’s beyond anything I could have ever imagined.”
“Calling winning “insane’, Arnold praised her celebrity partner.”
“It is also the first Mirrorball Trophy win for Arnold, who has competed as a pro dancer since season 16.”
“...his family s Thanksgiving table...”


"My ultimate goal in life is to have a family," he shared with people
"My adoption journey has inspired me, motivated me and my vision for success."
"Yesterday was definitely the toughest day I've ever said, because our crazy team had rough knees and eyes after injury," he said after winning
"The actor said the preparation for the final was very hard."
"Credit for image zooming: David Livingston / Getty Images credit for image zooming: Adam rose via Getty Images Fisher suffered a corneal scratch two weeks ago and Arnold's leg was so badly injured that people worried that she would have to quit the game."
"I'm close, and ultimately being with Jordan means more than I can say," she said
"It's beyond my imagination."
Arnold called the win "Crazy" and praised her celebrity partner
"It's also Arnold's first time to win the mirror ball trophy. He has been playing as a professional dancer since season 16."
“… His family's Thanksgiving table... "



Number  671
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“—With files from the Associated Press...”
“He is known to the producers of the show and some of the cast and he s a gigantic fan of the show READ MORE Game Of Thrones actor Kit Harington speaks out about a holes who leak spoilers The Castle on the Hill singer isn t the first musician...”
“While many Game of Thrones fans had different reactions to Ed Sheeran’s cameo in the Season 7 premiere, Game of Thrones director Jeremy Podeswa had nothing but good things to say about the singer.”
“The Thinking Out Loud singer made a cameo appearance as a Lannister soldier with his campfire singing catching the attention of Arya Stark (Maisie Williams) who was passing by but then cautiously joined their party for dinner.”
““It was lovely working with Ed,” Podeswa told Variety.”
““He is one of the nicest guys in the world, and he really is one of the guys.”
“He s lovely he s a team player he wants to do a good job he takes direction he s very open READ MORE Ed Sheeran s Game of Thrones cameo receives mixed reviews from fans The episode s director continued He s a big fan of the show and...”
“...he was really excited to be a part of it...”
“I think his lovely voice was used to great effect and he just has a really nice presence Story continues below advertisement Podeswa also said that Sheeran blends into the world of the show in a nice way and that if people didn t know who the singer was nobody...”
“...would even blink about his presence on the show Sheeran s appearance as a Lannister soldier drew a mix of criticism and praise from fans of the show including some calling the show less authentic due to his cameo...”


"- file from the Associated Press..."
"He's known by the producers and some actors of the show. He's a big fan of the show. Game of Thrones actor kit Harrington said there was a hole in the destroyer. The singer of castle on the mountain was not the first musician..."
"Although many fans of game of Thrones have different reactions to ED Sheeran's guest appearance at the premiere of season 7, game of Thrones director Jeremy Podeswa has only good words to say to the singer."
"The thoughtful, loud singer made a guest appearance as a Lannister soldier. His bonfire singing attracted the attention of Maisie Williams, who was passing by, and then cautiously joined their party."
"It's a pleasure to work with ED," Podeswa told variety
"He's one of the best people in the world, and he's really one of them."
"He's cute, he's a team member, he wants to do his job well, his direction, he's very open, read more about edhiran's" game of Thrones "guest star, and received mixed reviews from fans. The director of this episode continued that he's a big fan's festival and
“… He's really happy to be part of it... "
"I think his lovely voice is used to produce huge effects, he just has a very good presence story to continue the following ad. Podeswa also said that Sheeran's integration into the world's display is in a good way if people don't know who the singer is a nobody..."
“… Even blinking at his appearance in the show, Sheeran's appearance as a Lannister soldier has attracted criticism and praise from fans of the show, including some people who say that because his guest show is not very real... "



Number  672
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It rose to #1 most watched broadcast drama series during the 2009-2010 season and has held the top spot ever since.”
“NCIS premiered on CBS in 2003.”
“With him on board, the long-running crime procedural drama has been renewed for the 2018-2019 broadcast season.”
“Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See AllNow in its 15th season, NCIS remains CBS’ #1 drama series.”
“Additionally, it has been crowned as the most-watched drama in the world in three of the last four years and is the reigning champ in the category as the recipient of the 2017 International Audience Award by Eurodata TV Worldwide and the Monte Carlo Television Festival.”
“NCIS is currently licensed in more than 200 territories.”
“CBS“It’s pretty simple – viewers everywhere love NCIS,” said Kelly Kahl, President, CBS Entertainment.”
““This show speaks to viewers of all ages, in all parts of the country and around the world.”
“NCIS’ amazing characters and terrific storytelling result in some of TV’s most passionate fans.”
“Of course, none of this would be possible without an outstanding production team, and talented cast led by the incomparable and absolutely tireless Mark Harmon.”


"In the 2009-2010 season, the show rose to one of the most watched radio and TV series and has been at the top of the list ever since."
"NCIS premiered on CBS in 2003."
"With him, this long drawn out crime drama will continue in the 2018-2019 season."
"Prime time panic for your pilot guide and direct to series orders see allnow in its 15th season, NCIS is still CBS's first drama series."
"In addition, the show has been rated as the most watched TV series in the world in three of the past four years, and has become the defending champion of this category as the winner of the 2017 eurodata Global Audience Award and the Monte Carlo Festival."
"NCIS currently has licenses in more than 200 regions."
"CBS is very simple, audiences all over the world like NCIS," said Kelly Kahl, President of CBS entertainment
"This program addresses audiences of all ages across the country and around the world."
"NCIS's amazing characters and wonderful stories have created some of the most passionate TV fans."
"Of course, none of this would have been possible without an excellent production team and a talented actor led by the unparalleled and absolutely tireless mark Harmon."



Number  673
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’ll make her Saturday Night Live debut when Black Panther’s Chadwick Boseman hosts on April 7.”
““Sometimes I think is ready sometimes I think it’s not so I’m going to take my time till it’s right.”The surprise announcement came at a perfect time for Cardi.”
“I just don’t think they qualified for my album,” she tweeted.”
“I have songs stashed up.”
““I have a lot of pressure on me.”
“Cardi B had teased potential release dates for the album, but also told fans in November about some of its holdups.”
“With the anticipation of her full-length album growing with every appearance, award show, and single drop since the summer, the expectations for the album are high.”
“Though “Bodak Yellow” was indeed world-conquering, Cardi is still a relatively new force on the mainstream-music scene.”
“There’s a lot at stake for Invasion of Privacy to deliver, with fans, critics, and the charts.”
“She also got engaged to Migos’s Offset and announced her plans to join Bruno Mars’s “24k Magic” tour.”


"She will make her debut on Saturday night live, hosted by Chadwick Bosman of panther on April 7."
"Sometimes I think it's ready, sometimes I don't think it's ready, so I'll take my time until it's right." This amazing news is a perfect time for Katie
"I just don't think they're suitable for my album," she tweeted
"I've hidden the song."
"I'm under a lot of pressure."
"Cardi B joked about the possible release date of the album, but also told fans in November about some of its obstacles."
"Since the summer, with her every appearance, award ceremony and single down, people's expectations of her full-length album have been higher and higher, and the expectations of this album have also been higher and higher."
"Although" bodak Huang "has indeed conquered the world, caddy is still a relatively new force in the mainstream music world."
"It's important to publish privacy infringing content with fans, commentators and leaderboards."
"She is also engaged to migos' compensation and announced that she plans to join Bruno's Mars' 24K magic tour."



Number  674
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian, welcomed a baby girl named Chicago via a surrogatein January and her sister Khloe Kardashian is due to give birth in two months.”
“He was arrested after his concert and police claimed he "encouraged people to rush the stage" but his lawyer said video footage did not support the allegations so other charges of inciting a riot and endangering the welfare of a minor were dismissed.”
“On the same day her name was disclosed, it was revealed Stormi's father, rapper Travis Scott - real name Jacques Webster - had pleaded guilty to disorderly conduct for an incident last year at a concert in Arkansas.”
“Image: Pic: Kylie Jenner/YoutubeDuring her pregnancy there were several rumours which she chose not to address, only posting pictures on social media where her stomach could not be seen.”
“Jenner also shared an 11-minute video giving fans a peek into the last nine months, from the time she found out she was expecting until the baby's birth.”
“She said pregnancy had been the most "beautiful, empowering and life changing experience" of her life and she is "actually going to miss it".”
“Image: Pic: Kylie Jenner/YoutubeThe star has been in the spotlight since she was nine years old as part of the Jenner-Kardashian family on reality TV show Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”
“"I knew my baby would feel every stress and every emotion so I chose to do it this way for my little life and our happiness."”
“She said: "There was no gotcha moment, no big paid reveal I had planned.”
“Jenner apologised to fans for "keeping you in the dark" and said she kept the pregnancy private because she needed to "prepare for this role of a lifetime in the most positive, stress free, and healthy way I knew how".”


Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian, is expecting a baby girl named Chicago through a surrogate in January. Her sister, helo Kardashian, will give birth in two months
He was arrested after the concert, and police claimed that he "encouraged people to rush onto the stage," but his lawyer said the video did not support the charges, so other charges of inciting riots and endangering the welfare of minors were dismissed
On the same day that her name was revealed, Tommy's father, rapper Travis Scott (real name Jacques Webster), pleaded guilty to disorderly conduct at a concert in Arkansas last year
"Picture: picture: during Kelly Jenner / utu's pregnancy, there were several rumors that she chose not to publish, just posted some pictures of her belly on social media that she couldn't see."
"Jenna also shared an 11 minute video to give fans a glimpse of the past nine months, from her discovery of pregnancy to the birth of her baby."
She said pregnancy was the most "beautiful, powerful and life changing experience" of her life, and she "will actually miss it."
"Photo source: Kylie Jenner / youtube, a star who has been a member of the Jenner Kardashian family on the reality TV show" keep up with Kardashian "since she was nine years old, has been receiving much attention."
"I know my baby will feel every kind of pressure and emotion, so I choose to do it for my little life and our happiness."
"I didn't seize the moment, I didn't plan to expose," she said
Jenna apologized to fans for "keeping you in the dark" and said she kept pregnancy secret because she needed to "prepare for the role of her life in the most positive, stress free and healthy way I know."



Number  675
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the video above to see some of his infamous quotes from the 1970s to today!”
“I’ll celebrate you forever!!”
“Kendra Wilkinson posted a heartfelt tribute to Hugh Hefner on his 91st birthday on Sunday, April 9.”
“The former centerfold thanked the Playboy magazine founder with an emotional Instagram message.”
““Happy birthday Hef!”
“!” she wrote.”
““Thank you for EVERYTHING.”
“People might not understand you but that’s because they’ve never had the chance to know you like I do.”
“!”Happy birthday Hef!!”
“The 31-year-old maintains a good relationship with Hefner and has described him as “family” and an “angel.”To celebrate Hefner’s milestone, Us Weekly rounded up some of his best — and most ridiculous — life lessons.”


"Watch the video above and see some of his infamous quotes from the 1970s to today!"
"I will always celebrate for you!"
Kendra Wilkinson paid tribute to Hugh Hefner on Sunday, April 9, his 91st birthday
"Thank you for the founder of Playboy magazine with a moving instagram message in the front insert."
"Happy Birthday!"
"!" she wrote. "
"Thank you for everything."
"People may not know you, but that's because they never get to know you as well as I do."
"Happy Birthday!"
The 31 year old has a good relationship with Hefner and calls him "family" and "angel". To celebrate Hefner's milestone, American weekly summed up some of the best and most ridiculous lessons of his life



Number  676
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And the mother of one has been looking forward to building a family with her husband.”
“A source confirmed to PEOPLE in April that Montag and Pratt, 34, were expecting their first child.”
“Image zoom Credit: MEGARELATED STORY: Everything Spencer Pratt and Heidi Montag Have Said About Having KidsFive days following his birth, Montag, 31, announced her friend and former costar Jen Bunney as Gunner’s godmother.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“...long.”
“...and measuring 19 in.”
“He was born weighing 6 lbs, 12 oz.”
“PEOPLE confirmed that The Hills alums, who wed in November 2008, welcomed baby Gunner on Oct. 1.”
“In the photo, the new parents proudly place their newborn front and center as they beam with pride and joy.”


"And the mother of one child has been looking forward to a family with her husband."
"A source confirmed in April that Montag and Pratt, 34, were pregnant with their first child."
"Image zooming: megarelated" STORY:Spencer Pratt And Heidi Montag about five days after the baby was born, Montag, 31, announced that her friend and former partner Jen bunney was gunner's godmother. "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
“… It's a long time. "
“… The size is 19 inches. "
"He was born 6 pounds 12 ounces."
"It has been confirmed that hill's alumni, who married in November 2008, welcomed the young shooter on October 1."
"In the photo, the new parents are proud to put their newborn in the front and in the middle, and they are filled with pride and joy."



Number  677
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Next: This basketball star’s slip cost him millions.”
“But David and Victoria stayed together through it all.”
“Hugh Grant and Elizabeth HurleyHugh Grant was in a long-term relationship with Elizabeth Hurley in 1995, when he was caught having oral sex with a prostitute in his car.”
“Next: This British celebrity was caught with his pants down.”
“The two worked hard to rebuild their relationship, and now they’re stronger than ever — and they even welcomed a new baby into their lives.”
“But a few years ago, Spelling got the shock of her life when she learned McDermott had been unfaithful to her.”
“Tori Spelling and Dean McDermottTori and Dean were both married to other people when they met, but they soon left their spouses for each other, got married, and had four children.”
“Next: Considering the way this relationship started, her husband’s infidelity wasn’t a huge surprise.”
“Cookie not only stood by him, she vowed to help him fight for his health — and she has.”
“He was then faced with the grueling task with not only calling various women he’d slept with, but confessing to Cookie that he’d been unfaithful during their courtship.”


"Next: the basketball star's mistake cost him millions of dollars."
"But David and Victoria have always been together."
"Hugh Grant and Elizabeth Hurley Hugh Grant had a long-term relationship with Elizabeth Hurley in 1995 when he was found in a car having oral sex with a prostitute."
"Next: the British celebrity took off his pants when he was arrested."
"The two are trying to rebuild their relationship, and now they are stronger than ever - they even have a new baby."
"But a few years ago, when she learned that McDermott was unfaithful to her, Sperling was hit by life."
Tori Sperling and Dean McDermott both married when they met, but they soon left their spouses, got married and had four children
"Next step: considering the way the relationship started, her husband's infidelity is not surprising."
"Kutch not only supported him, but vowed to help him fight for his health - and she did."
"At that time, he was faced with a difficult task, not only to call all kinds of women he had slept with, but also to confess to Kutcher that he had been unfaithful to them during his courtship."



Number  678
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Use products that protect the skin by binding with free radicals, preventing them from attaching to healthy skin cells in a process termed quenching.”
“Follow up with a serum or certified organic facial oil and moisturiser.Use a concentrated treatment product in your beauty regime to revitalise skin and boost radiance.”
“Change of season and weather can often result in a change of how your skin behaves.”
“If you have sensitive skin, it can become more unbalanced leaving it blotchy and prone to blemishes.”
“This is a great time to listen to the changing needs of your skin and update your skincare regime.There’s no better way to rid your face of dead skin than to exfoliate it well.”
“Carrying out an extra deep treatment to spring clean your face will instantly improve texture and reveal a brighter, fresher complexion.”
“Here’s how: Apply a creamy exfoliant generously to dry skin after cleansing and leave to dry for five minutes.”
“Support the side of your face with one hand to stop skin from pulling and with long sweeping movements across your face, use your other hand to ‘flake away’ the cream.”
“(It’s a good idea to put your face over the bathroom sink as the product will flake away, removing the build-up of old, dull cells with it).”
“Remove excess by rinsing with warm water.”


Use products that protect skin by combining with free radicals to prevent free radicals from attaching to healthy skin cells
Follow up with serum or certified organic facial lubricants and moisturizers. Use concentrated treatment products in your beauty program to revitalize the skin and improve gloss
"Changes in season and weather often lead to changes in skin behavior."
"If your skin is sensitive, it becomes more unbalanced, leaving spots and blemishes."
"Now is a good time to listen to the changes in skin needs and update skin care products. There's no better way to remove dead skin from your face than to exfoliate
"An extra deep cleansing of your face will immediately improve your texture and make your complexion brighter and fresher."
"The method is: After cleansing, apply a large amount of emulsion exfoliator on the dry skin and let it dry for 5 minutes."
"One hand to hold the side of the face to prevent skin pulling, and to use the other hand to make long time sweeping action on the face, to peel off the cream."
"It's a good idea to put your face on the bathroom sink because the product will peel off and remove old, dull cell deposits."
"Rinse with warm water to remove excess water."



Number  679
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's unclear what medical issue Omarosa had, but considering Mathews and Winokur were joking about it ... it doesn't seem too serious.”
“Then she says, about Omarosa ... "I put her in the hospital."”
“Marissa tells him injuries happen on the show -- like Christmas Abbott's broken ankle last season -- and the houseguests can return.”
“The news came out in a convo between Ross Mathews and Marissa Jaret Winokur about the HoH competition, with Ross questioning if Omarosa would be allowed to come back.”
“The 'CBB' live feeds went down Friday night during the competition -- where the houseguests reportedly had to get dizzy and bowl -- but when they came back ... fans found out Omarosa was taken to the hospital, and is possibly still there.”
“Omarosa apparently had a rough time during a Head of Household competition on "Celebrity Big Brother" ... and got sent to the hospital for treatment.”
“Marissa sounds pissed, too ... telling other houseguests she wants to know how much sleep Omarosa got.”
“...at the hospital...”
“Omarosa is back in the house CBBUS BBCeleb pic twitter com ge7c8O8bzq BB_Updates 11 15 AM PT Marissa just disclosed on the live feed that Omarosa s still not back in the house and suggests she possibly drummed up an asthma attack so she could leave and get some rest...”
“She was out due to her medical issue for about 19 hours.”


"It's not clear what medical problems Omarosa has, but considering that Matthews and vinoku are joking... It doesn't look too serious
"And then she said, about Omarosa..." I took her to the hospital
"Marissa told him that injuries were on the show - like Abbott's ankle fracture last Christmas - and that the tenants could come back."
"The news came from the teams of Ross Matthews and Marissa Jarrett winoku, when Ross was questioning if Omarosa would be allowed to come back."
"CBB's live broadcast appeared during the game on Friday night - where the tenants had to be dizzy and bowling, according to reports - but when they came back... Fans found out that Omarosa had been taken to the hospital and might still be there. "
Omarosa had a tough time in the celebrity big brother householder contest... They were sent to the hospital for treatment. "
"Marissa sounds angry, too... Tell the other guests she wants to know how much sleep Omarosa has had
“… In the hospital... "
"When Omarosa returns home, cbbus bbceleb pic twitter website ge7c8o8bzq BB Yan u update 11:15 a.m. Pt Marissa just revealed in the live broadcast that Omarosa has not returned home, and hinted that she may have asthma attack, so she can leave for rest..."
"She was out for about 19 hours because of physical problems."



Number  680
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on ABC.”
“Image zoom Credit: Eric McCandless/ABCIt’s been a long road to the altar for these two.”
“Don’t forget to subscribe for more exclusive interviews and photos, only in EW.”
“Wedding bells will soon be ringing at Grey Sloan!”
“EW can exclusively reveal that Jo (Camilla Luddington) and Alex (Justin Chambers) will be getting married in the season 14 finale of Grey’s Anatomy.”
“Slated to air Thursday, May 17, the finale is gearing up to be a big event — which, in the world of Shondaland, means things will certainly go awry.”
““I am so excited for Jo and Alex to finally seal the deal and get married,” Luddington tells EW.”
““But in true Jolex form, the wedding will have lots of twists and turns to it.” See?”
“EW’s exclusive photo from the wedding definitely seems to speak to impending disaster.”
“After his failed marriage to Izzie (Katherine Heigl) in the early years of Grey’s, Alex and Jo started dating in season 9.”


"Et on ABC."
"Image scaling credit: Eric McCandless / abcit is a long way to the altar for these two people."
"Don't forget to subscribe to more exclusive interviews and photos, only in EW."
"The wedding bell will soon ring in graysloan!"
"EW can exclusively reveal that Joe (Camilla Luddington) and Alex (Justin chambers) will be married in the finale of Season 14 of anatomy of gray."
"Scheduled to air on Thursday, May 17, the terminator is preparing to become a big event - which in the world of Sunderland means things are bound to go wrong."
"I'm very excited that Joe and Alex have finally reached an agreement and got married," rudington told the Wall Street Journal
"But in a real jolex form, there are a lot of twists and turns in the wedding." See that? "
"EW's exclusive photo at the wedding seems to confirm the impending disaster."
"After the failure of Gray's early marriage to Izzy (Katherine Hagel), Alex and Joe start dating in season 9."



Number  681
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This is the first marriage for both stars.”
“As for Bowman, he recently appeared in an episode of Doctor Who and will star in the made-for-TV movie Escaping the Madhouse: The Nellie Bly Story, premiering in 2019.”
“The newlyweds are keeping busy with VanCamp currently starring on the Fox medical drama The Resident as nurse practitioner Nicolette "Nic" Nevin.”
“"We got engaged and then both hit the ground running with work," she revealed to People that she and Bowman were in no rush to get married, also saying, "Once I'm done doing The Resident I want to have some good solid family time."”
“VanCamp and Bowman became engaged in May 2017 with the actress posting a cute picture of her covering her face with her hands showing off her diamond ring on her Instagram.”
“The couple first began dating in 2012, while they were co-starring on the ABC drama.”
“Thank you times a million."”
“"And to @lelarose and your incredible team for creating my dream dress...”
“We are eternally grateful," she said, while also thanking her dress designer.”
“"Thank you to all of our friends and family who made their way to celebrate with us!”


"This is the first marriage of the two stars."
"As for Bowman, he recently starred in an episode of who's the doctor and will make his debut in the TV production of" escape from the Madhouse: the story of Nelly bly "in 2019."
The newlyweds are busy working with van Kamp, who is currently playing a nurse practitioner in fox's medical drama resident
"We got engaged, and then both started working," she told people, revealing that she and Bauman were not in a hurry to get married, adding, "once I finish my residency job, I want to have some good solid family time."
"Van Kamp and Bauman got engaged in May 2017, and the actress posted a lovely picture of her covering her face with her hand showing a diamond ring on instagram."
"The couple first dated in 2012, when they were co stars on ABC."
"Thank you very much."
"Thank you and your team for creating my dream costume..."
"We'll always be grateful," she said, as well as her fashion designers
"Thanks to all the friends and family who came to celebrate with us!"



Number  682
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Take a look at the preview of the new and improved auction scene below.”
“Disneyland Paris received a similar revision last year while Anaheim’s Disneyland will get the makeover later this spring with work starting on April 23.”
“The park reopened the new version of the ride on March 19 after they announced the changes last summer.”
“The Pirates of the Caribbean attraction at the Magic Kingdom recently received this makeover.”
“Redd will now be a pirate who’s just pillaged the town’s rum supply and has something to say about it.”
“Now that Disney has become aware of this, the scene that once had a redheaded character named Redd as part of a “wench sale” with signs that read “Auction take a wench for a bride” has changed with the times.”
“What may have been okay in the ’60s is now a bit insensitive and — let’s be honest — very misogynistic.”
“However, there has been one part of the ride that has remained controversial: the bride auction scene.”
“Ever since Disneyland first opened the Pirates of the Caribbean ride in 1967, the attraction has become blockbuster movie franchise and a must-see for all who enter the gates of any of the Disney parks around the world.”


"Please see a preview of the new and improved auction scenarios below."
"Paris Disneyland received similar modifications last year, and the Disneyland in Anaheim will be renovated later this spring, and construction will start on April 23."
"The park reopened a new version of its rides on March 19 after the changes were announced last summer."
"The Pirates of the Caribbean attraction in Magic Kingdom recently received this transformation."
"Red is going to be a pirate now. He's just plundered the supply of rum in the town. He has something to say about that."
"Now Disney has realized this. There used to be a red haired character named red. As a part of the" girl auction ", the slogan" marry a girl by auction "was written on it. This scene has changed with the times."
"Things that might have been good in the '60s are a little insensitive now. To be honest, I hate women very much."
"However, one of the links has been controversial: the bride auction site."
Since disneyland first opened its Pirates of the Caribbean tour in 1967, this scenic spot has become a blockbuster movie and a must see place for all who enter the gates of Disneyland all over the world



Number  683
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN’s Elizabeth Joseph contributed to this report...”
“CNN has reached out to McGowan’s representatives for comment.”
“US actor Shia LaBeouf(L) during his He Will Not Divide Us livestream outside the Museum of the Moving Image in Astoria, in the Queens borough of New York January 24, 2017 as a protest against President Donald Trump.”
“LaBeouf has installed a camera at the Museum of the Moving Image in New York that will run a continuous live stream for the duration of Trumps presidency.”
“LaBeouf is inviting the public to participate in the project by saying the phrase, He will not divide us, into the camera.”
“/ AFP / TIMOTHY A. CLARY (Photo credit should read TIMOTHY A. CLARY/AFP/Getty Images)HOLLYWOOD, CA - MAY 10: Rob Kardashian and Blac Chyna arrive at her Blac Chyna Birthday Celebration And Unveiling Of Her "Chymoji" Emoji Collection at the Hard Rock Cafe on May 10, 2016 in Hollywood, California.”
“(Photo by Greg Doherty/Getty Images)FILE - SEPTEMBER 14: It has been reported that actress Heather Locklear has been hospitalized after driving her car into a ditch in Thousand Oaks, California.”
“BEVERLY HILLS- CA - AUGUST 16: In this handout photo provided by Discovery, Actress Heather Locklear attends TLC "Too Close To Home" Screening at The Paley Center for Media on August 16, 2016 in Beverly Hills, California.”
“(Photo by Amanda Edwards/Discovery via Getty Images)Brown bonded out on $2,000, according to jail records.”
“Booking Date Time 07 05 2018 23 00 Release Date 07 05 18 Time 23 52 Gretchen Wilson arrives at the 50th annual CMA Awards at the Bridgestone Arena on Wednesday Nov 2 2016 in Nashville Tenn Photo by Evan Agostini Invision AP Story highlights A Virginia court has issued...”


"Elizabeth Joseph of CNN contributed to this report..."
"CNN has contacted McGovern's representative for comments."
"On January 24, 2017, American actor Shia Labov (left) is outside the film and video Museum in Astoria, Queens, New York. As a protest against President Donald Trump, he will not split the American live stream."
"Labov has installed a camera at the motion picture Museum in New York, which will continue to be broadcast live during Trump's presidency."
"Labov is inviting the public to participate in this project. He said that he will not separate us and turn us into a lens."
"/ AFP / timing a.clay (photo source should be timing a.clay / AFP / Getty Images) Hollywood, California - May 10: Rob Kardashian and blac Chyna attended blac Chyna's birthday celebration on May 10, 2016 at hard rock cafe in Hollywood, California, and unveiled her" chymoji "expression album."
(Photo by Greg Doherty / Getty) Sept. 14: actress Heather rockill is reported to be hospitalized after driving into a ditch in Thousand Oaks, California
"Beverly Hills, California - August 16: in this promotional photo provided by discovery, actress Heather Locklear showed TLC" too close to home "at the Pelley media center in Beverly Hills, California on August 16, 2016."
(Amanda Edwards / Getty pictures, discovery) according to prison records, brown paid off his debt for $2000
"Booking date time 07 05 2018 23 00 release date 07 05 18 time 23 52 Gretchen Wilson arrived at Bridgestone arena in Nashville, Tennessee on November 2, 2016 (Wednesday) for the 50th annual CMA awards ceremony released by Evan Agostini invision AP story highlights a Virginia court..."



Number  684
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It is necessary and long overdue.”Image zoom Aziz Ansari and Lena WaitheWaithe, 33, previously touched on the Ansari allegation in an interview with KPCC’s The Frame.”
“I took her words to heart and responded privately after taking the time to process what she had said.”“I continue to support the movement that is happening in our culture,” he added.”
““It was true that everything did seem okay to me, so when I heard that it was not the case for her, I was surprised and concerned.”
“...afterwards which he said by all indications was completely consensual The next day I got a text from her saying that although it may have seemed okay upon further reflection she felt uncomfortable he continued...”
“...said they returned to his apartment where she alleged that Ansari behaved coercively and that several sexual acts occurred though she was physically giving off cues that she wasn t interested In response Ansari issued a statement acknowledging they went on a date and ended up engaging in sexual activity...”
“The woman a 23 year old Brooklyn photographer recounted her allegations under the pseudonym Grace She alleged that after meeting Ansari at an Emmy Awards afterparty in September 2017 they exchanged numbers and eventually went on a date which she called the worst of her life After a meal she...”
““That’s just human kindness and decency.”In January, an anonymous woman accused Ansari, 35, of sexual behavior that she classified as assault but he called consensual in a controversial article published on Babe.net that sparked a public conversation regarding the nuances of the #MeToo movement.”
“...comfortable doing whatever that thing is and that we re doing it together she continued...”
“I think there are both men and women who are still trying to figure it out We need to be more attuned to each other pay more attention to each other in every scenario and really make sure that whatever it is we re doing with someone else they re...”
““At the end of the day, what I would hope comes out of this is that we as a society … educate ourselves about what consent is — what it looks like, what it feels like, what it sounds like,” she said.”


"It's necessary. It's long overdue." Aziz Ansari, 33, and Lina weatherwaite spoke about Ansari's accusations in an interview with KPCC's frame
"I took her words to heart, and after taking the time to deal with what she said, I responded in private." "I continue to support the movement that is taking place in our culture," he added
"Indeed, I think everything is fine, so when I heard that she was not like this, I was surprised and worried."
“…… Later, he said that all the signs showed that it was exactly the same. The next day, I received a text message from her saying that although she felt uncomfortable after further thinking, he continued to say.... "
“…… She claimed that Ansari's behavior was compulsive and had sex several times, despite her physical suggestion that she was not interested in responding. Ansari issued a statement admitting that they had dated and finally had sex... "
"The 23-year-old Brooklyn female photographer told the story under her pseudonym grace. She claimed that after meeting Ansari at an Emmy Party in September 2017, they exchanged numbers and finally had a date. She said it was the worst time in her life. After dinner, she..."
In January, an anonymous woman accused 35 year old Ansari of having sex as a sexual assault, but in a controversial article published in the Wall Street Journal, he said it was a voluntary baby. Net, which sparked a public discussion about the nuances of the "meto movement."
"No matter what it is, let's do it together, she continued
"I think both men and women are trying to figure out that we need to be more coordinated with each other, pay more attention to each other in every scene, and really make sure that no matter what we do with others, they are..."
"At the end of the day, I want us as a society Teach yourself what is consent - what is consent, what is the feeling of consent, what is the voice of consent. "



Number  685
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In December, band member Dave Haywood and wife Kelli Cashiola-Haywood welcomed a baby girl of their own.”
“The twins are the latest arrivals in the recent "baby Bellum" boom.”
“"God hears every prayer."”
“"My heart still grieves for our loss and all who are struggling with pregnancy and infant loss and infertility," Scott shared when she announced her pregnancy in August.”
“Scott and Tyrrell have relied heavily on their faith since suffering a miscarriage two years ago.”
“"And thank you Lord for healthy babies."”
“"Thank you to everyone who prayed and prayed for these little ladies," Scott wrote in the birth announcement.”
“The couple expected the babies to arrive in February, but despite their early appearance, all is well with the bundles of joy.”
“Months before giving birth, Scott remarked that their 4-year-old, Eisele, was "so excited to have her very own living baby dolls" on the way.”
“Rick Diamond / Getty ImagesThe new additions are the second and third for the family, who are now raising a trio of daughters.”


In December, band member Dave Heywood and his wife, Kelly cassiola Heywood, welcomed their baby girl
"The twins are the latest in the recent baby Belem craze."
"God listens to every prayer."
"My heart is still saddened by our loss and by all those struggling with pregnancy, baby loss and infertility," Scott said when announcing his pregnancy in August
"Scott and Tyrell have been heavily reliant on their beliefs since their miscarriage two years ago."
"Thank God for giving us healthy children."
"Thank you all for praying for these little girls," Scott wrote in the birth announcement
"The couple thought the baby would be born in February, but although they showed up early, with bundles of joy, everything was fine."
A few months before giving birth, Scott said their 4-year-old, Ethel, "is very happy to have her own living baby."
"Picture of Rick diamond / Getty these new members are the second and third members of the family who are now raising three daughters."



Number  686
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Family Feud music video is now on Tidal directed by @ava @s_c_  pic.twitter.com/GCju6PiDYK — Mindy Kaling (@mindykaling) December 29, 2017The full video is available on Tidal, which is offering a free-trial holiday promotion.”
“The Family Feud music video is now on Tidal directed by @ava @s_c_ ”Nobody wins when the family feuds.”
“Jay-Z teamed up with acclaimed director Ava DuVernay for his star-studded music video for “Family Feud,” which features a ton of famous cameos.”
“The full clip was released on Tidal on Friday, December 29, after he shared a short teaser featuring his wife, Beyonce, and daughter Blue Ivy on Thursday.”
“The rapper enlisted some of Hollywood’s biggest names, including Mindy Kaling, Jessica Chastain, Michael B. Jordan, Thandie Newton, Brie Larson, Janet Mock, Constance Wu, Rashida Jones, Rosario Dawson and Niecy Nash.”
“The video travels through time and explores different types of government throughout 400 years.”
“Starting in the year 2444, the scenes travel back in time as they preview how a government could look with women as leaders, the consequences of power struggles and other political turmoil.”
“In the opening scene, Newton and Jordan play a brother and sister who are fighting over their kingdom, which is under her command.”
“Her lover, played by Trevante Rhodes, steps in and kills Jordan’s character.”
“Newton’s character then stabs him in the back and says: “It’s not his, and it’s not yours.”


"Family grudge music video is now@ ava@s \Director pic.twitter.com/GCju6PiDYK -Mindy Kaling (@ Mindy Kaling) the complete video is available on tidal on December 29, 2017. The website provides free trial holiday promotion
"Family grudges music videos are now released by@ ava@s \No one will win when it comes to family enmity
"Jay-Z collaborated with the famous director Ava Duvernay to make a starry music video for family grudge, including a large number of famous guest stars."
"The full video was released on Friday, December 29, in trendsetter magazine, after he shared a short play on Thursday featuring his wife Beyonce and daughter Ivy LAN."
The rapper has drawn in a number of Hollywood celebrities, including Mindy Carlin, Jessica chastan, Michael Jordan, sandy Newton, Bree Larson, Janet mock, Constance woo, Rashida Jones, Rosario Dawson and niece Nash
"This video goes through time and space, exploring different types of government for 400 years."
"Starting in 2444, these scenes go back in time, and they preview how a government sees the consequences of women leaders, power struggles and other political upheavals."
In the first act, Newton and Jordan play a brother and sister who fight for their Kingdom under her command
"Her lover, played by trivant Rhodes, intervenes and kills Jordan."
Newton's character stabbed him in the back and said, "it's not his or yours."



Number  687
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Photo Credit: Bravo]”
“Her account needs to be reported please help!!”
“The question remains unanswered, but maybe it will be addressed on the upcoming season of Don’t Be Tardy.”
“We will have to wait and see what is shown when it comes to that horrible incident, but Kim has other dog-related drama.”
“A “fan” reported her to animal control after she posted a photo of her dogs in cages.”
“According to an article from Page Six, Kim explained the situation on Snpachat, “Apparently somebody thought it would be really cute to call the animal control center on my dogs today and say they were not being taken care of.”
“I am utterly f–king disgusted and appalled by the person who did this.”
“I will no longer be sharing any part of my dogs and their life on my social media any longer.”Another day, another “fan” upset with Kim Zolciak‘s social media content.”
“At least it’s giving her a break from people bashing her cosmetic procedures.”
“Since Kim was called out, she decided to call out one of her haters by posting a screen shot that the person posted in a Bravo fans Facebook group.”


"[photo source: Bravo]"
"Her account needs to be reported, please help!"
"There is no answer to this question, but it may be solved in next season's don't be late."
"We will have to wait to see what shows when it comes to this terrible event, but Kim has other dog related dramas."
"A fan reported her to the animal control center after she posted a picture of a dog in a cage."
"According to an article on page 6, Kim explained the situation on snpachat," apparently someone thought it was lovely to call animal control today and say my dog wasn't taken care of. "
"I'm very disgusted and shocked by the people who do it."
"I will never share my dogs and any part of their lives on my social media again." Another day, another "fan" was upset about Kim zolciak's social media content
"At least it freed her from the criticism of her plastic surgery."
"Since Kim was called out, she decided to call out one of her enemies by publishing a screenshot that she posted on a" Bravo fan "Facebook group."



Number  688
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drake is currently producing documentary feature The Carter Effect, about former NBA star Vince Carter, that premiered at the Toronto Film Festival.”
“Robot) for an untitled TV series; and potentially something with Apple, too.”
“While details remain slim, Drake is said to be teaming with A24 (Moonlight) in a deal that includes both TV and film; with Anonymous Content (Mr.”
“Top Boy comes as Drake is looking to expand his television (and film) footprint.”
“Netflix vp originals Cindy Holland also noted that it was Drake's passion for the series that "drove its resurrection."”
“"That human element drew me in," he said.”
“In THR's cover story, Drake noted he caught the original on YouTube and was taken with its depiction of London as both beautiful and malevolent.”
“Awaiting them both is Jamie, the young, hungry and ruthless gang leader whose ambitions leave no place for Dushane and Sully.”
“He teams with Sully (Kane "Kano" Robinson), his spiritual brother, partner, and sometime rival who is also returning to the same streets after his own form of exile — prison — comes to an end.”
“The third season picks up as Dushane (original star Ashley Walters) returns from exile to his home in London to reclaim his throne in the highly lucrative drug market.”


Drake is currently working on the documentary Carter effect, which tells the story of former NBA star Vince Carter and premieres at the Toronto Film Festival
"Robot" is an untitled TV series; there's also something that could be related to apple. "
Although the details remain unclear, Drake is said to be working with A24 (Moonlight) to reach an agreement, including television and movies, for anonymous content
"When Drake wanted to expand his influence in the field of television (and film), there were top boys."
Cindy Holland, the original vice president of Netflix, also pointed out that it was Drake's enthusiasm for the series that "drove its revival."
"The human element attracted me," he said
In the cover story of the times, Drake noticed that he saw the original on youtube and was photographed depicting London as both beautiful and vicious
"Waiting for them is Jamie, a young, hungry, ruthless gang leader, whose ambition makes dushann and Sally have no place."
He works with Sally (Kane "Cano" Robinson), who is his spiritual brother, partner and sometimes rival. After his own form of exile, prison, Sally also returns to the same street
"At the beginning of the third season, dushann (former star Ashley Walters) returned from exile to his home in London and regained the throne in the lucrative drug market."



Number  689
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Miller has 45 days to report to prison.”
“Miller’s charges carried up to $5 million in fines and possibly five years in jail, but the Feds initially pushed for a two-and-half-year prison sentence.”
“Afterward, Miller took the stand to defend herself, saying, “Dance Moms became a hit and I became the laughingstock of reality TV.” Miller will likely serve nine months in a facility close to Los Angeles, and have an additional two years of supervised release.”
“In Tuesday’s hearing, character witnesses said Miller isn’t anything like the combative and demanding dance instructor she was portrayed as on the Lifetime show.”
“Her legal woes came to a head after federal agencies found evidence that she tried to hide $775,000 in income from Dance Moms, the spinoff Abby’s Ultimate Dance Competition, and other Dance Moms–related appearances and merchandise.”
“Miller filed for bankruptcy in 2010, and was first indicted in 2015 on 20 charges of bankruptcy fraud, concealment of bankruptcy assets, and false bankruptcy declarations.”
“She’ll also have to pay a fine of $40,000, along with an additional $120,000 for a currency-reporting violation she was investigated for last summer.”
“Photo: Alberto E. Rodriguez/Getty ImagesAlmost a year after pleading guilty to bankruptcy fraud, Dance Moms’ Abby Lee Miller was sentenced Tuesday to a year and a day in prison by a federal judge in Pittsburgh, according to Deadline.”
“Abby Lee Miller.”


"Miller has 45 days to report to prison."
"Miller's charges brought a fine of up to $5 million and a possible five-year imprisonment, but the FBI initially pushed for a two-and-a-half-year sentence."
Later, Miller came forward to defend himself, saying: "dancing mom has become a hot topic, and I have become the laughing stock of reality TV." Miller is likely to serve nine months in a prison near Los Angeles and be released under supervision for another two years
"At the hearing on Tuesday, the role witness said Miller was totally different from the aggressive, demanding dance teacher she played in the show of life."
"Her legal dilemma peaked after federal agencies found evidence that she was trying to hide $775000 in income from dance moms, by-products of Abby's ultimate dance competition, and other appearances and merchandise related to dance moms."
"Miller filed for bankruptcy in 2010 and was first charged with bankruptcy fraud, concealment of bankruptcy assets and false bankruptcy declaration in 2015."
"She also had to pay a $40000 fine and a $120000 fine because she was investigated last summer for violating currency reporting rules."
"Photo: Alberto E. Rodriguez / Getty Images almost Abby Lee Miller, the dancing mother, was sentenced to one year and one day in prison by a federal judge in Pittsburgh on Tuesday, a year after admitting bankruptcy fraud."
"Abby Lee Miller."



Number  690
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““If you’re gonna go and see it, be prepared for a heavy ride.””
““I think it’s important to see that it’s a happy ending, it’s like a redemption concept,” Clapton said.”
“...things from getting old Elsewhere in the Radio 2 interview Clapton spoke about his former alcohol habits which included drinking special brew with vodka and said that his new documentary shows there s light at the end of the tunnel...”
“It started with lower back pain and turned into what they call peripheral neuropathy which is where you feel like you have electric shocks going down your leg I ve had to figure out how to deal with some other...”
“Speaking to Classic Rock Magazine recently, he said: “I’ve had quite a lot of pain over the last year.”
““Then I have to go through the whole threshold of getting calluses [on the fingers] back, coordination.”Clapton has been open about health issues in recent years.”
““I know that is part of it, because it’s amazing to myself I’m still here.”“I have to get on the bottom of the ladder every time I play guitar, just to tune it,” Clapton explained.”
“I mean, I’m going deaf, I’ve got tinnitus, my hands just about work.”Advertisement“I’m hoping that people will come along and see me just because, or maybe more than because I’m a curiosity,” he continued.”
“Confirming that he still plans to perform live, Clapton added: “The only thing I’m concerned with now is being in my seventies and being able to be proficient.”
“Clapton was promoting the film when he opened up about his health during a BBC Radio 2 interview.”


"If you're going to see it, be prepared for a heavy journey."
"I think it has to be seen as a happy ending, like a concept of redemption," Clapton said
“…… In an interview with radio 2, Clapton talked about his previous drinking habits, including special vodka, and said that his new documentary "light at the end of the tunnel"... "
"It started with low back pain, and then it evolved into what they call peripheral neuropathy, that is, you feel an electric shock on your leg, so I have to find a way to deal with the others..."
"I went through a lot of pain last year," he said in a recent interview with classic rock magazine
"Then I have to go through a threshold to let the calluses grow back, coordination." Clapton has been open to health issues in recent years
"I know it's part of it because I'm still here and it's amazing to me," Clapton explained "Every time I play the guitar, I have to stand at the bottom of the ladder, just to tune it."
"I mean, I'm going to be deaf, I have tinnitus, and my hands are just for work." "I want people to come and see me just because, maybe not just because I'm a curious person," he continued
Clapton confirmed that he still plans to perform live, adding: "the only thing I care about now is whether I'm proficient in my 70s."
"Clapton made public his health in an interview with BBC 2 when he was promoting the film."



Number  691
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After Haskell’s resignation last week, president and COO Josh Randle and chairman Lynn Weidner also resigned after being revealed to have also exchanged the demeaning emails among the board members.”
“...board members and management...”
“A statement from the group also noted that that Carlson will work with all Miss America stakeholders including the organization s state executive directors and former state titleholders to continue an ongoing inclusive and transparent process to identify additional new...”
“The group recently told the Associated Press they were seeking the help of former Miss Americas and state directors to recommend the next generation of leaders for the pageant.”
“The Miss America Organization also announced former Miss Americas Laura Kaeppeler Fleiss (Miss America 2012), Heather French Henry (Miss America 200) and Kate Shindle (Miss America 1998) are joining the board.”
“In the end, we all want a strong, relevant Miss America and we appreciate the existing board taking the steps necessary to quickly begin stabilizing the organization for the future,” said Carlson in a statement from the Miss America Organization.”
““Everyone has been stunned by the events of the last several days, and this has not been easy for anyone who loves this program.”
“Carlson confirmed Huffington Post's report of her new position and tweeted, "Honored to move this iconic program forward with so many amazing volunteers."”
“...language...”
“Carlson is joining the organization amid a recent controversy of leaked internal emails from Miss America leaders including now former CEO Sam Haskell which crudely discussed the appearances of women who had competed in the pageant with demeaning and misogynistic...”


"After Haskell resigned last week, President and coo Josh Randle and chairman Lynn Weidner also resigned because they were disclosed to have exchanged demeaning e-mails among board members."
“… Board members and management... "
"A statement from the organization also pointed out that Carlson will work with all Miss America stakeholders, including the organization's state executive directors and former state ownership holders, to continue an ongoing inclusive and transparent process to identify more new..."
"The group recently told the associated press that they are seeking the help of former Miss America and State Directors to recommend the next generation of leaders for beauty pageants."
"Miss America also announced that former Miss America Laura Capella fries (Miss America 2012), Heather France Henry (Miss America 200) and Kate sindel (Miss America 1998) will join the board."
"Ultimately, we all want to have a strong and relevant Miss America, and we appreciate that the existing board has taken the necessary steps to quickly begin to stabilize the future of the organization," Carlson said in a statement by Miss America
"What happened in the last few days has stunned everyone. It's not easy for anyone who likes this show."
Carlson confirmed the Huffington Post report about her new position and tweeted: "it's a great honor to work with so many excellent volunteers to promote this iconic project."
“… Language... "
"As Carlson joined the organization, the recent internal e-mails leaked by Miss America leaders (including former CEO Sam Haskell) caused controversy, which roughly discussed the appearance of women who participated in beauty contests, with the implication of belittling and disgusting women..."



Number  692
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““So we always try to make sure to see each other.”“I don’t think it’s hard if the love is there,” she continued.”
“The two recently celebrated Adams’ 34th birthday in early May with Hyland sharing a sweet message to her boyfriend on Instagram in which they cuddled in bed.”
“The former Bachelorette star revealed how the two managed their relationship in the public eye during his appearance on PeopleTV‘s Chatter on Friday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s been really weirdly normal,” Adams said of how the two kept their relationship private.”
“That question gets asked a lot because you expect the answer to be like it s crazy because it s in the spotlight but for whatever reason it s been really nice and normal and wonderful The two sparked romance rumors in October after they were spotted dressed up for...”
“Halloween together...”
“A source told PEOPLE at the time, “They’ve been friends for a while and now they’ve been hanging out and spending more time together.”
“They re flirty Image zoom Wells Adams and Sarah Hyland Credit Rachel Murray Getty Adams revealed more about their romance on Chatter admitting they first made contact on social media when he slid into her DM s explaining they struck a conversation when he referenced Harry Potter while on The...”
“Bachelorette...”


"So we always try to make sure we see each other." "I don't think it's hard if love is there," she continued
"The two recently celebrated Adams' 34th birthday in early May. Helan sent a sweet message to her boyfriend on instagram, and they cuddled up in bed."
"The former single actress exposed how the two managed their relationship in public view on people's TV's chatter program on Friday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's really normal," Adams said of how the two keep a personal relationship
"This question has been asked a lot, because you expect the answer to be like crazy, because it's in the spotlight, but for whatever reason, it's really good, normal and wonderful, both sparking romantic rumors. After October, they were found dressed up as..."
"Halloween together..."
"They've been friends for a while, and now they spend more and more time together," a source told people at the time
"They're flirting characters, and zoom wells Adams and Sarah Hyland credit Rachel Murray Getty Adams revealed more about their romance on chatter, admitting that they first contacted on social media when he slipped into her DM, explaining that they talked about it when he mentioned Harry Potter..."
"Single woman..."



Number  693
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He told his followers that he would make his page private if they didn't stop with the nasty messages about Sofia.”
“It all started in August of 2016, when Selena criticized Justin for threatening to quit social media after fans penned harsh comments about his then girlfriend Sofia Richie.”
“At times the pop star would raise his hands, which brought Selena to giggles.”
“Justin led the way on his black bike with headphones in his ears.”
“Before their coffee break, Justin and Selena biked around an LA neighborhood together.”
“The Sorry artist wore his hoodie over his hair for most of their outing together.”
“...matching leggings adding white sneakers Justin also cut a casual figure in a bold red Thrasher hoodie with black and red track shorts from one of his favorite brands high end streetwear label Daniel Patrick...”
“...her cream Coach purse slung over her shoulder In sync They both grabbed large ice coffees from a local cafe Sweet The star who sported just a touch of makeup had her cream Coach handbag slung over one shoulder Animated The former Disney star rocked an oversized gray sweater with...”
“Leading the way Selena styled her short brunette locks loose with a deep side part and a natural wave Giddy The stars appeared to be having a blast during their outing together which included a stroll and a biking session Can t stop smiling Selena also carried a notebook with...”
“Selena also carried a book and a large notebook in one hand.”


"He told his followers that if they didn't stop the malicious information about Sophia, he would keep his page secret."
"It all started in August 2016 when Selena criticized Justin for threatening to quit social media because of the severe comments from fans on his then girlfriend Sophia Ritchie."
"The pop star sometimes raises her hand, which makes Serena giggle."
"Justin leads the way on a black bike with headphones."
"Before the coffee break, Justin and Selena cycle around a block of Los Angeles."
"Poor artists spend most of their time traveling together wearing hoodies over their hair."
“… Paired with tights and white sneakers, Justin also cut a bold red thrasher hoodie with black and red sports shorts from one of his favorite brands, high-end Street clothing brand Daniel Patrick casual figure... "
“… Her cream coach wallet hung on her shoulder synchronized them all from a local caf é to snatch the big ice coffee sweet star who sports just a little bit of make-up to have her cream coach handbag hanging on one shoulder before the animation Disney star shakes an oversized gray sweater with... "
"Leading Serena's fashion style, her dark short hair, deep side, natural waves make people dizzy. The stars seem to be very excited when they go on an outing together, including walking and cycling. Selena also carries a notebook with her, which says.... "
"Serena has a book and a big notebook in her hand."



Number  694
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'But I might just be over that phase of my life.'”
“I try to make sure I get enough food instead of limiting food,' she said.”
“Although she thought she would only gain 20 to 30 pounds while expecting her firstborn, the former The Hills star revealed she gained over 45 pounds in the end.”
“However, the 31-year-old told speaking to US Weekly she 'wasn't really concerned about getting in shape right away' and 'wanted to give it time'.”
“Postpartum Heidi Montag 31 has opened up about how pregnancy has helped her make peace with her body following the birth of her son Gunner on October 1 New addition The new mom pictured with husband Spencer Pratt 34 and baby Gunner revealed she gained 45 pounds while pregnant despite...”
“...only expecting to gain 20 to 30 pounds Process Having a baby has made me really appreciate my body not just how it looks...”
“It's just amazing, the human body,' Heidi (pictured while pregnant) said'I just had a baby, I'm very emotional,' she added.”
“Heidi also explained that she is now eating healthier than ever because she wants to give baby Gunner all the nutrients he needs while breastfeeding.”
“'Having a baby has made me really appreciate my body, not just how it looks.”
“It's just amazing, the human body,' she added.”


"But I may have passed that stage of my life."
"I try to make sure I get enough food instead of limiting it," she said
"Although she thought she would only gain 20 to 30 pounds when she was pregnant with her eldest son, the former hills star revealed that she eventually gained more than 45 pounds."
"However, in an interview with us weekly, the 31 year old woman said that she" doesn't really care about getting back in shape right away, "but" wants to give it time. "
"Postpartum Heidi Montague disclosed the new news on how pregnancy helped her get along with her body after her son gunner was born on October 1. The photo taken by the new mother, her husband Spencer Pratt, 34, and baby gunner shows that she gained 45 pounds during her pregnancy, although..."
“… I just want to gain 20 to 30 pounds in the process of giving birth, which makes me really appreciate my body, not just its appearance... "
Heidi (pregnant photo) said: "the human body is amazing. I've just had a baby and I'm very excited."
"Heidi also explained that she is eating healthier than ever because she wants to give baby gunner all the nutrients he needs when breastfeeding."
"With children, I really appreciate my body, not just its appearance."
"The human body is amazing," she added



Number  695
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That’s what this song represents to me every time I hear it,” she told PEOPLE.”
““It really represents freedom and the chance to be what you want to be — and there being no judgment and just living your life as you want to live it.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Cardi B Says She's Been with 'A Lot' of Women, Apologizes for Rita Ora Lyrics ControversyCardi B is opening up about her sexuality and weighing in on the controversy surrounding her Rita Ora collaboration.”
“On Friday, the British singer released her new single “Girls,” which features Cardi, Bebe Rexha and Charli XCX.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The flirty song addresses bisexuality and sexual fluidity with lyrics like I m 50 50 and I m never gonna hide it and Red wine I just wanna kiss girls girls girls Shortly after the track s release some LGBTQ artists including Hayley Kiyoko and Kehlani spoke out online against...”
“...the song calling its lyrics problematic and exploitative...”
“Image zoom Cardi B Credit Jeff Kravitz FilmMagic During her verse Cardi 25 raps Now I could be your lipstick just for one night I steal your bitch have her down with the scissor Tonight I don t want a dog I want a kitten I might French a girl...”
“...from Great Britain On Tuesday Cardi took to Twitter to apologize to anyone offended by the song or words she s used in the past and to open up about having experiences with women...”


"That's what I stand for every time I hear this song," she told people
"It really represents freedom and the opportunity to be what you want to be - no judgment, just live what you want to be."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Cardi B said she was with 'a lot of' women and apologized for the controversy over Rita ora's lyrics. Cardi B disclosed her sexual orientation and weighed the controversy over Rita ora's collaboration."
On Friday, the British singer released her new single "girl," which includes Katie, Bebe Reichard and Charlie Hicks
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"This flirting song expresses bisexuality and sexual mobility with lyrics. For example, I'm 50 years old and I'll never hide it. I just want to kiss girls with red wine. Shortly after the release of this song, some LGBTQ artists, including Haley Kiyoko and kirani, openly opposed it online..."
“… The song says its lyrics are problematic and exploitative... "
"Image zoom kajaf kravz movie magic in her poem Calv 25 rape now I can be your lipstick, just one night I steal your whore with her scissors tonight I don't want a dog I want a kitten I can French girl..."
“…… On Tuesday, Katie, from Britain, tweeted an apology to anyone offended by the songs or words she used in the past and disclosed her experience with women.... "



Number  696
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s so nostalgic for people — I’m not going nowhere near that.”Share...”
“Nah man, you can’t touch stuff like that.”
“The duo are celebrating a short concert run with Friday and Saturday’s MTV Presents Summerblast Music Festival 2017 in Croatia, then at Sunday’s Livewire Festival in Blackpool, England, though they are hoping for more.”
““I looked at Jeff and he was getting old, man, and I was like, ‘I can’t do this to this boy,’” Smith joked to Entertainment Tonight’s Kevin Frazier.”
“...about the decision to have a reunion.”
““It was time.”
“LL hit me [up and] was like, ‘Dude, I’m telling you, it’s time.”
“You have no idea the love that’s out there.’ I was listening to L like, ‘All right, I need to do it.’”“Now I got the bug,” Smith continued.”
““I was on fire last night.”
“It was the first time being on stage in a while.”


"It's so nostalgic - I don't want to go anywhere near it." share
"No, man, you can't touch that."
"The two are celebrating a short concert, MTV will host the 2017 summerblast festival in Croatia on Friday and Saturday, followed by the livewire festival in Blackpool on Sunday, but they hope to have more."
"I look at Jeff, he's old, man, and I think, 'I can't do this to this boy,'" Smith joked to Kevin Fraser on tonight's entertainment show
"The decision to reunite"
"It's time."
"I'll hit me and say, 'man, I'll tell you, it's time.'"
"You don't know what love is out there." I'm listening to me saying, "well, I need to do it." "Now I have a bug," Smith continued
"I caught fire last night."
"It's the first time in a while that I've been on stage."



Number  697
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’ve been with him literally every day and I’m not sick of him, and I miss him when he’s not in my visual sight, it’s gross.””
“She told BANG Showbiz: “It’s that cheesy line of ‘You know when you know’ and that’s so real because I’ve never had anything like this with any other human, I’ve never not got sick of someone.”
“LONDON - Meghan Trainor is planning to have a winter wedding.”
“The 24 year old pop star got engaged to her significant other Daryl Sabara at the end of last year and she is keen to tie the knot in a chilled ceremony in her own backyard around 12 months after...”
“...he got down on one knee...”
“She said: “I was thinking, my backyard’s real pretty.”
“Like, real beautiful.”
“And I just want it be chill and with my family in the backyard so I think I’m going to do that around Christmas time because it’s my favourite.”
““My mom is like, ‘Stop telling them.’ It’ll be fine mom.”
“No one knows where I live.”


"I'm with him every day. I don't hate him. When he's out of my sight, I miss him. It's disgusting."
She told Bang showbiz: "it's a tacky line like 'you know it when you know it.' it's too real, because I've never had anything like this with anyone else, and I've never felt sick of anyone."
"London - Megan Turner plans a winter wedding."
"The 24-year-old pop star was engaged to another important Daryl Sabara at the end of last year. She is eager to have a cold wedding in her backyard in 12 months..."
“… He went down on one knee... "
"I was thinking, my backyard is beautiful," she said
"Like, it's really beautiful."
"I just want the weather to be cooler and my family in the backyard, so I think I'll do it around Christmas because it's my favorite."
"My mother said," don't tell them. " It's going to be all right, mom
"No one knows where I live."



Number  698
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The area in which the film was shooting was unoccupied.”
“The Cruzes’ apartment building was completely destroyed, causing them to be displaced and lose multiple personal items such as clothes, important documents and the loss of their rent-controlled apartment, their lawsuit says.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Edward Norton's production company, Class 5 Films, was sued on Tuesday for $7 million over the fire in an apartment in Harlem, New York CityEdward Norton’s company is being sued by residents of a building destroyed in a fire last week which tragically killed a firefighter.”
“On Tuesday as friends and family attended the funeral of the firefighter killed in the blaze two residents filed a suit against the actor s production company Class 5 Films and the owner of the apartment building Vincent Sollazzo Lampkin after they claimed the production company knew about the fire...”
“...that had broken out but did not warn residents...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The company and the building owner are being sued for $7 million, according to court documents obtained by The Blast.”
“In a statement provided to PEOPLE at the time, the film’s producers said their crew noticed smoke and immediately began alerting the residents of the building.”
““Our production was towards the end of our working day and had dozens of people working on site, when our crew noticed that smoke was coming into our set and into other parts of the building from below us,” read the statement.”


"The filming area is uninhabited."
Their lawsuit said: "the Cruz couple's apartment building was completely destroyed, resulting in their displacement, the loss of clothing, important documents and other personal items, and the loss of their rent controlled apartment."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
Edward Norton's production company, grade five, was charged on Tuesday with a $7 million claim for a fire in an apartment in Harlem, New York City. Last week, a building burned down in a fire, killing a firefighter. Edward Norton's company is being sued by residents
"On Tuesday, while friends and family were attending the funeral of the firefighter who died in the fire, two residents filed a lawsuit against the actor's production company, grade 5 film company and apartment owner, Vincent solazo Lampkin, for claiming that the production company knew about the fire..."
“… There has been an outbreak, but no warning to residents... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to court documents obtained from the explosion, the company and the building owner were sued for $7 million."
"In a statement provided to people at the time, the filmmakers said their staff noticed the smoke and immediately began to remind the residents of the building."
"Our production was almost over and dozens of people were working on the scene when our staff noticed that smoke was coming from below into our crew and other parts of the building," the statement said



Number  699
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She and the Top Gun star, 54, are also parents of Connor, 22, and Isabella, 24, who they adopted.”
“We don’t need to hash up all that stuff.”Urban and Kidman, who was previously married to Tom Cruise from 1990 to 2001, are parents of daughters Sunday, 8, and Faith, 6.”
““We’re here now and it’s all good.”
“He didn’t call me for four months,” she recalled at the time.”
““I remember thinking I had such a crush on him and he wasn’t interested in me.”
“In February, the actress opened up about first meeting him when she dropped by on The Ellen DeGeneres Show.”
“Happy anniversary.”Urban and Kidman met in 2005 and tied the knot the following year.”
““I love you Keith Lionel more and more.”
““11 years of love that I thank God for every day,” she wrote on her Facebook account.”
“– KU A post shared by Keith Urban (@keithurban) on Jun 25, 2017 at 7:55am PDTThe Big Little Lies actress, 50, meanwhile, posted a throwback photo of the pair on their wedding day.”


"She and the 54 year old number one star are also the parents of their adopted 22-year-old Connor and 24-year-old Isabella."
Urban and Kidman married Tom Cruise from 1990 to 2001. They are the parents of their 8-year-old daughter, Sunday, and their 6-year-old daughter, faith
"We are here now and everything is fine."
"He hasn't called me for four months," she recalled at the time
"I remember thinking I was so infatuated with him that he wasn't interested in me."
In February, the actress made public her first encounter with Alan DeGeneres on the show
"Happy anniversary." Urban and Kidman met in 2005 and married the next year
"I love you more and more, Keith Lionel."
"I thank God every day for 11 years of love," she wrote on her Facebook account
"– Keith Urban (@ Keith Urban) shared a post at 7:55 a.m. on June 25, 2017. Meanwhile, the 50 year old big lie actress released a picture of their wedding day



Number  700
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pretty Mess will be published by Gallery Books in January 2018.”
“'This book proves why Erika Jayne is a fan favorite: she’s fun and she’s fearless; and for the first time, she’s here to tell all,' said publisher Jennifer Bergstrom.”
“And on Tuesday the Real Housewives Of Beverly Hills star talked to People about what will be in the pages of her tell-all.”
“'Without Erika Jayne, Erika Girardi would just be another rich bitch with a plane,' the 46-year-old siren said.”
“'I hope my intimate story can inspire readers to become their own strong, confident and vibrant pretty messes.'”
“Tell all time Erika Girardi has written a new book Pretty Mess which will come out in January 2018 seen in 2016 in Las Vegas Real dirt She will talk about her time on The Real Housewives Of Beverly Hills here she is seen with l r Lisa Rinna Eileen...”
“Davidson Kyle Richardson Lisa Vanderpump and Dorit Kemsley She will also address her marriage to legal eagle Tom Girardi who is 32 years older than she...”
“They wed in 1999 after he met her when she was working as a cocktail waitress.”
“'Tom is an incredibly special human being,' she said.”
“'He’s not only a great husband — he’s also a great father, a great friend, a great mentor, and a hell of a f***ing lawyer.”


"The gallery book will be published in January 2018," quite a mess. "
Publisher Jennifer Bergstrom said: "this book proves why Erica Jenn is a fan's favorite: she's fun and fearless; she's here for the first time to tell you."
"On Tuesday, Beverly Hills star housewives told people what she was going to tell everyone."
"Without Erica Jayne, Erica Girardi would be just another rich bitch with a plane," the 46 year old Banshee said
"I hope that my private stories can inspire readers to become strong, confident and energetic beautiful women."
"Tell all the time that Erica Girardi has written a new book" mess ", which will be published in January 2018. In" real earth "in Las Vegas in 2016, she will tell about her time in" Real Housewives "in Beverly Hills, where she is with Lisa Lina Irene..."
"Davidson Kyle Richardson Lisa van der PANP and dorit Kemsley - she will also propose to Tom Girardi, the legal eagle, who is 32 years older than her..."
"They got married in 1999 when he met her as a cocktail hostess."
"Tom is a very special person," she said
"He is not only a great husband, he is also a great father, a great friend, a great mentor and a great lawyer."



Number  701
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“WATCH: Chris Pratt Adorably Gushes Over His 'GD Funny' Wife Anna FarisPratt and Faris -- who have been one of Hollywood's cutest couples in recent years -- share a 4-year-old son, Jack, who turns five on Aug. 25.”
“@prattprattpratt," Faris wrote.”
“And I love being romantic over twitter.”
“You always make me laugh.”
“Happy birthday honey!!”
“"Ahhh!!!”
“Back in June, Faris wished the Jurassic World star happy birthday when he turned 38 with a sweet, romantic message on Twitter.”
“Pratt also shared the statement, signed by both of them, to his Facebook page, with the additional sentiment that the pair will "continue to have the deepest respect for one another."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Observation: Chris Pratt lovingly confides in his" GD funny "wife Anna Faris Pratt and Faris, who have been one of Hollywood's loveliest couples in recent years, and their 4-year-old son Jack turned 5 on August 25."
"@ Pratt Pratt," Faris wrote
"I love being romantic on twitter."
"You always make me laugh."
"Happy birthday, dear!"
"Aha
"As early as June this year, Faris tweeted a sweet and romantic message to wish the 38 year old Jurassic world superstar a happy birthday."
Platt also shared the signed statement on his Facebook and said the two would "continue to respect each other the most"



**Something goes wrong**
“They eventually went public in January 2018.”
“As he placed the diamond engagement ring on her finger, a private fireworks display went off in the background.”
“The Vanderpump Rules star is engaged to Hollywood producer Randall Emmett, her rep confirms to PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Emmett, 46, popped the question during a romantic trip to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico, where they also celebrated her 28th birthday at the Esperanza An Auberge Resort.”
““This weekend has been an amazing one for the two of us!”
“It was definitely the most romantic moment of my life.”
“Every detail of the surprise was stunning and I’m still in shock,” Kent tells PEOPLE of Emmett’s proposal.”
“Image zoom Lala Kent | Credit: Josafat De La Toba PhotographyEmmett had set up a screen for her to watch one of her favorite shows, Friends, before the screen went black and showed a video of the pair and all their memories together, including moments with their families.”
“At the end, Emmett got on his knee and proposed.”


"They will eventually go public in January 2018."
"When he put the diamond engagement ring on her finger, a private fireworks show rang out in the background."
"Van der Pol rules star is engaged to Hollywood producer Randall Emmett, her agent confirmed to people."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Emmett, 46, raised the issue during a romantic trip to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico, where they celebrated her 28th birthday at Esperanza Oberg resort
"This weekend is great for both of us!"
"It was definitely the most romantic moment of my life."
"Every detail of the surprise was shocking, and I'm still shocked," Kent told people magazine of Emmett's proposal
"Picture zooming Lala Kent | credit: josafat de la Toba photography Emmett set up a screen for her to watch one of her favorite shows friends before the screen went black, and played a video of the two and all their memories, including the time with family."
"Finally, Emmett knelt down and proposed."



Number  703
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And soon: pet merchandise will be available at four Walt Disney World Resort properties.”
“Rooms will have a Pluto “Do Not Disturb” door hanger so staff will know that there is a dog in the room.”
“Inside is a mat, bowls, a pet ID tag, plastic disposable bags, puppy pads, and dog walking maps.”
“The properties will offer a Pluto’s Welcome Kit.”
“Disney Parks: Halloween events without the screamsStill, the dogs are getting their perks.”
“Resorts also typically have “resort fees” that cover amenities such as swimming pool use and Wi-Fi.”
“...for them to charge fees for them...”
“There are also nightly pet cleaning fees involved Disney s Art of Animation Resort 50 Disney s Port Orleans Riverside Resort 50 Disney s Yacht Club Resort 75 Cabins at Disney s Ft Wilderness Resort 50 Hotels have increasingly been welcoming their guests canine friends and it s not unusual...”
“And Disney is calling this a pilot program vs. a permanent one.”
“Only two dogs per room are allowed.”


"And soon: pet merchandise will be on sale at four hotels at Walt Disney World Resort."
"There will be a Pluto" if you are the one "door hanger in the room, so that the staff will know that there is a dog in the room."
There are cushions, bowls, Pet ID cards, disposable plastic bags, dog pads and dog walking maps
"The hotel will provide Pluto's welcome package."
"Disneyland: there's no scream at Halloween, dogs get their privileges."
Resorts often also have "resort fees," including facilities such as pool use and Wi Fi
“… Let them charge for them... "
"There are also pet cleaning fees every night, including Disney animation art resort 50 Disney port of Orleans Riverside Resort 50 Disney Yacht Club Resort Disney ft Wilderness Resort's 75 cabins and 50 hotels are increasingly welcoming their guests and dog friends, which is not uncommon..."
"Disney calls it a pilot project, not a permanent project."
"Only two dogs are allowed in each room."



Number  704
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I’ve actually never asked him about that,” Hyland told Kimmel on Tuesday.”
“I saw him as the bartender and I was like, ‘That’s really cute.’ ”Image zoom Wells Adams and Sarah Hyland | Credit: Todd Williamson/January Images/ShutterstockIt helped that Adams’ first message piqued Hyland’s interest.”
“The couple have been going hot and heavy since they took their relationship public over Halloween.”
“And according to the 27-year-old Modern Family star, it’s all thanks to a direct message Adams sent her on social media.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Have you seen those memes of ‘Slide into the DMs?’ That.”
“He slid into my DMs,” Hyland told comedian Jimmy Kimmel during an appearance on his hit late night talk show Tuesday.”
“Hyland and Adams 33 began flirting on Twitter last summer during his stint as the bartender in Bachelor in Paradise though Hyland had been vocal about her not so secret crush on the radio DJ since his time vying for JoJo Fletcher s heart on season 12 of The Bachelorette...”
“...in 2016”
““I was following him,” she told Kimmel.”


"I've never actually asked him about it," Helan told Kimmel on Tuesday
"When I saw that he was a bartender, I thought," that's lovely. " Image zooming wills Adams and Sarah Herland | image source: Todd Williamson / January image / shutterstock the first message from Adams intrigued Herland
"The couple have been hot and heavy since the public love affair on Halloween."
"According to the 27 year old modern family star, it's all down to the direct messages Adams sent her on social media."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Do you see the memes that slide into DMS? "That one."
"He slipped into my DMS," Hyland told comedian Jimmy Kimmel, who appeared on Tuesday's late night talk show
"Last summer, Helan and Adams began to flirt on twitter at the age of 33, when he worked as a bartender in" Bachelor in heaven ", but since Helan competed for Joe Fletcher's heart in" Bachelor "season 12, he has been talking about her secret love for radio DJ..."
"2016"
"I'm following him," she told Kimmel



Number  705
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(The family opted to not release a card in 2016.)”
“It’s the toddler’s first holiday card, as he was only a few weeks old when sister North and cousins Penelope, Mason and Reign Disick starred in the 2015 photo wearing coordinating chic black outfits.”
“On Dec. 1, Kim posted the first image: a photo of son Saint, 2, in denim jeans as he posed by neatly wrapped brown presents with white ribbon.”
“Linnetz wrote on Instagram that the series is titled, The 25 Days of Xmas.”
“Since the start of the month, Kim Kardashian West and the photographer behind the card — Eli Linnetz — have been sharing images from the shoot on social media, much like an advent calendar.”
“The Kardashian-Jenner crew is expanding their annual, cheer-spreading Christmas card to cover an entire month — and keeping fans guessing with daily sneak peeks.”


"(the family chose not to issue cards in 2016)"
"This is the first holiday greeting card for this toddler, because when he was only a few weeks old, sister north and cousins Penelope, Mason and Regent disc starred in a 2015 photo in coordinated fashion black."
On December 1, Kim Jong Il released his first photo: his two-year-old son, saint, posed in jeans with a white ribbon and a brown gift wrapped neatly
The title of the series is "25 days of Christmas," linnetz wrote on instagram
"Since the beginning of this month, Kim Kardashian West and Eli linnetz, the photographer behind the card, have been sharing photos on social media, much like a calendar."
"Kardashian Jenner's staff are expanding their annual celebrations, extending Christmas cards throughout the month, and making fans guess through daily peeping."



Number  706
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more in the video below.”
“...alleged game First They Killed My Father producers played with children while casting the film...”
“...pic twitter com eIDbLkyi6Y Anne Thompson akstanwyck September 2 2017 WATCH Why Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie Have Slowed Down Their Divorce Process And No They re Not Getting Back To Meanwhile Jolie recently found herself fighting back against an excerpt from her recent Vanity Fair tell all which discussed...”
“2017 Angelina Jolie gets standing ovation...”
“The extraordinarily beautiful Angelina Jolie at the world premiere of her film with her crew and two of her kids J Don Birnam at SundanceFilmFestival jdonbirnam September 2 2017 Standing O and not a dry eye for AngelinaJolie and her film at J Don Birnam at SundanceFilmFestival jdonbirnam September 2”
“Maddox, who helped his mother in the production of the Netflix film, and Pax supported their mom on stage after the screening, which left the audience in tears.”
“...her own children...”
“RELATED Angelina Jolie Fights Back Against Vanity Fair Tell All Excerpt False and Upsetting Getty Images Getty Images Jolie who directed and co wrote the movie with Loung Ung based on Ung s memoir of the same name was joined by the film s cast and crew and two of...”
“The 42-year-old actress received a warm welcome after screening her film, First They Killed My Father, at the 2017 Telluride Film Festival in Colorado on Saturday.”
“A standing ovation for Angelina Jolie!”


"Please see more in the video below."
“… They killed my father first. My father was a producer, and he played with the kids when he was choosing movies. "
“… Pic twitter com eidblkyi6y Anne Thompson akstanwyck September 2, 2017 watch why Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie slow down their divorce process, no, they'll never come back. Meanwhile, Jolie recently found herself fighting back against an excerpt from her recent Vanity Fair, telling all the discussion... "
"Angelina Jolie got a standing ovation in 2017..."
"On September 2, 2017, Angelina Jolie stood in jdonbirnam, the Sundance Film Festival, at the world premiere of the film with her crew and two children, J don Birnam. For Angelina Jolie and her films in J don Birnam, she is not dry eye."
"Maddox helped his mother make Netflix movies, while parks supported her on stage after the screening, which made the audience tearful."
“… Her own child... "
"Related to Angelina Jolie counterattack Vanity Fair tells all excerpts of false and disturbing Getty pictures of Julie who directed and co wrote the film according to long long long's memoir of the same name is joined by the film's actors and staff and two..."
"The 42 year old actress received a warm welcome after showing her film" the first time they killed my father "at the 2017 telluride film festival in Colorado on Saturday
"A standing ovation for Angelina Jolie!"



Number  707
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Late Late Show Carpool Karaoke Primetime Special airs Monday, April 23, at 10 pm ET/PT on CBS.”
“The first two primetime specials – in 2016 and 2017 – won Emmy Awards in the Outstanding Variety Special category.”
“CBSAlso set for the one-hour special: Corden and bandleader Reggie Watts are planning a Bruno Mars-inspired musical number, and Corden will reflect on his favorite Late Late Show moments.”
“...the host in Crosswalk the Musical The Sound of Music in which Corden and guests stage fairly elaborate traffic stopping versions of famous musicals...”
“The Late Late Show Carpool Karaoke Primetime Special will feature at least two of the CBS late night show s fan favorite bits with Aguilera duetting with Corden in a new Carpool Karaoke bit and Faris and Janney Mom Nayyar The Big Bang Theory and Young Sheldon s Armitage joining...”
“The streets will be alive with the sound of music April 23 when James Corden’s third Carpool Karaoke primetime special welcomes Christina Aguilera (in the car) and Allison Janney, Anna Faris, Kunal Nayyar and Iain Armitage (in the street).”


"CBS's" carpool karaoke prime time special "is on Monday, April 23, at 10 p.m. EDT / Pacific time
"The first two prime time Specials - 2016 and 2017 - won the Emmy Award for outstanding variety."
CBS is also preparing for the one hour special: Corden and band leader Reggie watts are planning a musical number for Bruno Mars, and Corden will review his favorite evening show moments
“…… He is the host of the crosswalk musical the sound of music. In this musical, Corden and the guests elaborate a traffic jam version of the famous musical... "
"The evening show carpool karaoke prime time special will feature at least two favorite clips from fans of CBS Evening Show. Aguilera and Corden will duet in a new carpool karaoke clip. Faris and Jennie's mother Nayyar big bang theory and young Sheldon s Armitage will join in..."
"On April 23, when Christina Aguilera (in the car) and Alison Jennie, Anna Faris, Kunar Nayar and Ian Armitage (in the street) are welcomed on James Colden's third carpool karaoke prime time special, the streets will be filled with music."



Number  708
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““You’re hearing her voice,” Deborah says, fighting back tears.”
“Deborah is holding on to the thought that she was the first person her daughter gave the book to read, even now as the story takes on a new meaning under the circumstances.”
““We’re not introducing any new characters.”
““The directing is minimal and it has to adhere to the style and tone and the template that Zack set,” says Emmerich.”
“But as he prepared to shoot the scenes in England, Snyder realized it was not the time to leave home.”
“Snyder, after screening a rough cut of Justice League for fellow filmmakers and friends, wanted to add additional scenes, so he brought Whedon on board to write them.”
“Warners also extended Snyder's first-look deal to give him time to work on other planned projects when he returns to work.”
“One of the first things the studio floated was the possibility of pushing back the release date of the movie, but the Snyders decided against that.”
““What they are going through is unimaginable, and my heart — our hearts — go out to them," says Warner Bros. Pictures president Toby Emmerich.”
“I’m having a hard time.”The studio is fully behind the move.”


"You heard her voice," Deborah said, suppressing tears
Deborah always thought she was the first person her daughter read the book to, even now the story has taken on a new meaning in this context
"We won't bring in any new characters."
"The director is the smallest, and it has to stick to the style, tone and template that Zach sets," Emmerich said
"But as he prepared to shoot in the UK, Snyder realized it was not the time to leave home."
"Snyder wanted to add some scenes after showing a rough" justice alliance "for other filmmakers and friends, so he took Whitney aboard to write these scenes."
"Warner also extended Snyder's FirstLook agreement to allow him time to work on other planned projects when he returns to work."
"One of the first things the studio raised was the possibility of postponing the release of the film, but the Snyders decided not to."
"It's hard to imagine what they've been through," said Toby Emmerich, President of Warner Bros. pictures. "My heart - our heart - is pouring into them."
"I have a hard time." The studio fully supports this move



Number  709
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But after those initial dates, they did travel together to Botswana.”
“In real life, Meghan and Harry’s first date was quickly followed by two back-to-back dates in London, so he was already on speed-dial by that point!”
“And he was ready to find love and settle down.”
“But after retiring from the Army in 2015 after 10 years of service, Harry had reformed his wild ways.”
“He made headlines again after naked photos emerged from his strip billiards game in Las Vegas in 2012.”
“In 2005, Harry’s picture was splashed on front pages around the world showing the then-20-year-old wearing a Nazi uniform at a costume party.”
“Just Before Meeting Meghan While it s true that he was known as the party prince during his 20s his partying days were well behind him by the time he met Meghan in 2016”
“I have this intense sense of complete relaxation and normality here Image zoom Prince Philip Prince William Earl Spencer Prince Harry and Prince Charles walk outside Westminster Abbey during the funeral service for Princess Diana Credit JEFF J MITCHELL AFP Getty False Prince Harry Was Deep Into the Party Scene...”
“I wish I could spend more time in Africa.”
““This is where I feel more like myself than anywhere else in the world.”


"But after the first date, they did go to Botswana together."
"In real life, Megan and Harry's first date will soon be in London twice in a row, so by then he's already on speed dial!"
"He's ready to find love and settle down."
"But after 10 years of service, Harry retired from the army in 2015, and he has turned over."
"He made headlines again after nude photos at the 2012 strip billiards game in Las Vegas."
"In 2005, Harry's picture was on the front page all over the world, showing the then 20-year-old in a Nazi uniform at a masquerade ball."
"Just before I met Megan, although he was called the prince of the party in his 20s, by the time I met Megan in 2016, his party days were over."
"I have a strong feeling of complete relaxation and normality here picture zooming Prince Philip Prince William Earl Spencer Prince Harry and Prince Charles walking outside Westminster Abbey during the funeral of Princess Diana
"I wish I could spend more time in Africa."
"I'm more like myself here than anywhere else in the world."



Number  710
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fellow honorees at tonight's ceremony, which was hosted by , include Ralph Lauren, , and Dian von Furstenburg.”
“"This is seriously such an honor."”
“The E!”
“...reality star and cosmetics mogul received the inaugural Influencer Award at tonight's star-studded gathering in New York City.”
“Though it needs no explanation, Kardashian helped coin the term "influencer" thanks to her 200 million+ social media followers and wildly successful ventures in cosmetics, fragrance, apparel and technology.”
“Need further proof?”
“Kim can earn an estimated $500,000 for a single sponsored Instagram post, and her KKW Beauty line is projected to turn over $100 million in revenue within the year.”
“Following a video message put together by Kim's peers in the industry (as well as a super cute shoutout from and son ), introduced the star.”
“During her acceptance speech, Kardashian reflected on a former publicist who told her she'd never make an impact in the fashion world.”
“"I'm kind of shocked that I'm winning a fashion award when I'm naked most of the time," she teased on stage.”


At tonight's awards ceremony, the winners include Ralph Lauren and Dean von Furstenberg
"It's a great honor."
"That guy!"
“…… Reality TV stars and cosmetics tycoons won the first influencer award at tonight's star studded party in New York
Although there is no need to explain, Kardashian helped create the word "influencer" by virtue of its more than 200 million social media fans and enterprises that made great success in cosmetics, perfume, clothing and technology.
"Do you need further evidence?"
"Kim's sponsorship of instagram's post is estimated to earn $500000, and her kkw beauty series is expected to earn more than $100 million this year."
"He introduced the star after his peers in the industry (and the super cute cry of a father and son) released a video message."
"In her acceptance speech, Kardashian reflected on a former public relations executive who told her that she would never have an impact in the fashion world."
"I was a bit shocked because I was naked most of the time and won the fashion awards," she said on stage



Number  711
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She married TV announcer Paul Khoury in July 2018.”
“Greene received a special award this year, "The Style Icon Award" at Hollywood Life's Young Hollywood Awards, and a PETA foundation for representing Avon and supporting the companies no testing on animals' policy.”
“Greene posed for SoBe advertisements in Sports Illustrated Swimsuit Edition 2010, appearing nude with only a body painted bikini.”
“In 2010 she portrayed Michelle Burkham in the drama film Skateland, which premiered at the 2010 Sundance Film Festival.”
“She reprised her role in the sequels, The Twilight Saga: New Moon, The Twilight Saga: Eclipse, and The Twilight Saga: Breaking Dawn Part 1 and Part 2.”
“She landed her first major role of Alice Cullen in Twilight in 2008.”
“She soon appeared as a guest on such television shows, as Punk'd and Crossing Jordan.”
“She decided she wanted to be an actress after taking commercial and acting lessons.”
“Ashley originally intended to be a model however she was told that she was not tall enough at 5'5″ to be a runway model and should instead focus on commercials.”
“Her mother Michele works in insurance.”


"She married Paul holly, a TV announcer, in July 2018."
Greeney won a special award this year, the fashion icon award at the young Hollywood Awards for Hollywood life, and the Peta foundation, representing Avon, to support companies that don't test animal policy.
"Green photographed SOBE's advertisement on the swimsuit page of sports illustrated in 2010, wearing only a painted bikini when he was naked."
"In 2010, she played Michelle burkan in the 2010 Sundance Film Festival premiere drama ice skating."
"She plays her part again in the sequels" Twilight: New Moon "," Twilight: Eclipse "and" Twilight: Dawn "parts 1 and 2
"In 2008, she played Alice Cullen's first major role in twilight."
She soon appeared as a guest on TV shows like punk and through Jordan
"She decided to be an actress after business and acting classes."
"Ashley originally intended to be a model, but she was told that she was less than 5 feet 5 inches tall and not suitable to be a runway model. She should focus on commercial advertising."
"Her mother, Michelle, works for an insurance company."



Number  712
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“God, I'm so ready for this."”
“"I just thought she loved me back."”
“Reality TV star Becca Kufrin will be walking down the aisle after all.”
“In the season finale, "The Bachelorette" viewers watched as Kufrin got engaged to Garrett Yrigoyen on a beach in the Maldives.”
“After Kufrin admitted to Yrigoyen that she was in love with him, the Reno, Nevada-based sales representative dropped to one knee and asked her to marry him.”
“"Sorry fellas, she's off the market, she's all mine!"”
“...he ecstatically told the cameras after.”
“"There's so much that I want to do with you!"”
“...she told her new fiancé.”
“"I want to get a Costco membership with you, and I want to have your kids...”


"My God, I'm ready."
"I just think she loves me, too."
"Reality star Becca Coughlin is going down the aisle."
At the end of the season, viewers of "Bachelor" see kuflin's engagement to Garrett iligoyan on a beach in Maldives
After kuflin admitted to iligoyan that she was in love with him, the sales representative in Reno, Nevada, knelt down and proposed to her
"I'm sorry, guys. She's not in the market anymore. She's all mine!"
“…… Then he told the camera with ecstasy
"I want to do too much with you!"
“…… She told her new fiance
"I want to be your Costco member, I want to have your children..."



Number  713
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“These rare serial killers may have taken the lives of at least three people, some with victim numbers over 50, yet are still alive themselves.”
“The male and female serial killers on this list either received life sentences or managed to avoid life in prison.”
“When serial killers are caught, after a long period of horrific, evil crimes, it’s almost expected that their lives will be coming to an end.”
“So it’s remarkable to hear about serial killers that are still alive, most of whom are serving life sentences in prison.”
“Some serial killers who could've been on death row took plea deals, so now they will be serving life in prison.”
“Dennis Rader, also known as BTK, was caught in 2005, and still remains in prison.”
“Very few serial killers who have been caught have been released from prison, but there are still some odd exceptions where the law and morality don’t intersect.”
“Are these some of America's most famous serial killers?”
“There are some famous mass murderers on here, too.”
“How did these serial killers murder their victims?”


"These rare serial killers may have killed at least three people, some of them more than 50, but they are still alive."
"The male and female serial killers on this list are either sentenced to life imprisonment or managed to avoid life imprisonment."
"When serial killers are captured, after a long period of terrible and evil crimes, their lives can almost be expected to end."
"So it's amazing to hear that serial killers are still alive, most of them serving life in prison."
"Some serial killers who may be on death row have accepted the plea agreement, so now they will be imprisoned for life."
Dennis rader, also known as Btk, was arrested in 2005 and is still in prison
"There are very few serial killers out of prison, but there are still some strange exceptions to the separation of law and morality."
"Are these the most famous serial killers in America?"
"There are also some famous Holocaust killers here."
"How do these serial killers murder their victims?"



Number  714
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He faces a minimum prison sentence of 25 to 40 years in the molestation case.”
“Nassar has already been sentenced to 60 years in prison for child pornography crimes.”
“Nassar admitted molesting athletes during treatment when he was employed by Michigan State University and USA Gymnastics.”
“More than 80 victims, including Olympic gymnasts Aly Raisman and McKayla Maroney, testified against Nassar, describing the impact of being assaulted by him.”
“...all the women who have come forward you are my role models my heroes and I will forever respect you and be inspired by your bravery and commitment to making our world a better and safer place she said...”
“I am here for not just these young athletes but for all young women who want and deserve to feel and to be safe Liukin also revealed her father is the coach of the Women s National Team and working to change the culture and environment of this program To...”
““My hope is this is the beginning of positive change,” she said.”
“ALY RAISMAN FACES ABUSER LARRY NASSAR IN COURT: '(WE) ARE A FORCE AND YOU ARE NOTHING'Liukin then pledged all proceeds for the Nastia Liukin Cup, her upcoming gymnastics competition, to be donated to an organization supporting victims of sexual abuse.”
“I stumbled through my words because I couldn’t even begin to process my thoughts, let alone my words, about his abhorrent and criminal actions,” she added.”
““I realized I gave the impression I was not fully supportive of my teammates.”


"In this indecent case, he will face a minimum sentence of 25 to 40 years."
"Nasar has been sentenced to 60 years in prison for child pornography."
"Nasar, who was employed by Michigan State University and the U.S. gymnastics team, admitted to molesting athletes during treatment."
"More than 80 victims, including Olympic gymnasts Eli Reisman and mckeira Maroni, testified against Nasar and described the impact of his attack."
“…… All the women who stand up, you are my example and my hero. I will always respect you and be inspired by your courage and commitment to make our world a better and safer place, she said
"I'm here not only for these young athletes, but also for all young women who want and should feel safe. Liujin also revealed that her father, who is the coach of the women's national team, is trying to change the culture and environment of this event to become..."
"I hope this is the beginning of a positive change," she said
"Ali Reisman told the abuser Larry Nasar in court: '(we) are a force, you are nothing.' Liujin later promised that all the proceeds from her upcoming gymnastics competition" nasia Liujin Cup "would be donated to an organization supporting victims of sexual abuse."
"I stammered over my words because I couldn't even begin to deal with my thoughts, let alone my words about his abominable and criminal behavior," she added
"I realized that I gave the impression that I wasn't fully supportive of my teammates."



Number  715
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“… There is a force that takes over when you believe, and I’m a believer.””
“At this time of my life, going back a few years back when it was so hard, I feel as though I can spread my wings.”
““I went through a lot.”
““I’m enjoying myself,” she said.”
“...of one another in January 2016”
“Finally though the singer managed to eke out a more serious answer telling the gathered fans that she s been taking life one day at a time since her husband Rene Angelil and her brother Daniel Dion died within days...”
“...even gave a nod to Marvin Gaye s 1971 track What s Goin On when another reporter asked the question aloud in confusion...”
“We going out or what she asked with a smile to which he asked Are you free tonight At that cue Dion burst out in song again this time belting out the chorus to Tom Petty s Free Fallin Dion...”
“When the same reporter then attempted to ask her once more about her love life, Dion didn’t relent.”
“...to answer his question...”


“…… When you believe, there will be a power to take over everything, and I am a believer. "
"At this point in my life, going back to the hard times a few years ago, I feel like I can fly."
"I've been through a lot."
"I had a good time," she said
“…… January 2016
"In the end, although the singer managed to give a more serious answer, telling the assembled fans that since her husband Rene Angelil and her brother Daniel Dion died in a few days, she has been taking her life day by day..."
“…… When another reporter asked this question in a confused voice, he even nodded his head in favor of Marvin Gay's 1971 "tracking what happened..."
"We go out, or she smiles and asks, and he asks, are you free tonight?" Dion suddenly began to sing again, this time for Tom Patty's "free Falin Dion"
"When the same reporter tried to ask her about her love life again, Dion didn't let go."
“… Answer his question... "



Number  716
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch All the Latest DancesMeet the Dancing with the Stars 2018 Cast...”
“Watch Dancing with the Stars MONDAYS 8|7c on ABC!”
“You can catch up with full episodes of Dancing with the Stars on ABC.com or the ABC app.”
“Want to see one again?”
“Missed an episode?”
“Rashad Jennings sat in as a guest judge this week...”
“30 Kareem Abdul Jabbar and Lindsay Arnold total score 26 Jennie Finch Daigle and Keo Motsepe total score 26 Tonya Harding and Sasha Farber total score 33 Team 1950s Tennis Dance Team 1970s Football Dance See the Week 2 Eliminations All scores were out of possible total of 40 as...”
“Adam Rippon and Jenna Johnson total score 37 Adam Rippon s Crazy Quick Quickstep Mirai Nagasu and Alan Bersten total score 37 Mirai Nagasu s Fairytale Foxtrot Arike Ogunbowale and Gleb Savchenko total score 33 Chris Mazdzer and Witney Carson total score 33 Josh Norman and Sharna Burgess total score...”
“Check out all the results and some highlights below!”
“There were team dances, guest judge Rashad Jennings and the first 10s of the season going to Adam Ripon and Mirai Nagasu.”


"Watch all the latest dances, dance with stars, 2018 cast..."
"Watch dance with the stars ABC 8:7 Monday!"
"You can see the full footage of dancing with the stars on TV, ABC website or ABC app."
"Do you want to see it again?"
"Missed an episode?"
"Rashad Jennings is guest judge this week..."
"30 Kareem Abdul Jabbar and Lindsay Arnold total score 26 Jennie finch Daigle and Keo motsepe total score 26 Tonya Harding and Sasha Farber total score 33 team 1950s tennis dance team 1970s football dance see second week knockout all scores exceed the possible total score of 40 points as..."
"Adam Rippon and Jenna Johnson total score 37 Adam Rippon crazy fast trot long horse and Allen bear total score 37 long horse's fairy tale Foxtrot dancers Arik ogumbale and grub safchenko total score 33 Chris Mazel and vitny Carson total score 33 Josh Norman and Shana Burgess total score..."
"Take a look at all the results and some highlights below!"
"There's team dancing, guest judge Rashad Jennings, and Adam Rippon and Miley NAGase in the top 10."



Number  717
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We were taught that growing up, so I look to every woman who’s comfortable in her own skin as a boss woman and I’m grateful to have examples of women who I aspire to be and also from my friends who are comfortable with them.””
“And I think women have a tendency to minimize themselves.”
“Even coming here today, I felt that I don’t deserve to be here, I don’t deserve to be honored among these incredible women.”
“...in my own skin so I look to those women who are so confident...”
“I ve looked up to so many women in my career from Meryl Streep who is always at the top of her game to Hillary Clinton who was almost our first female president all those women inspire me Added the actress It s still a struggle for me feeling comfortable...”
“...and are so clearly comfortable with themselves I think it s a shame that women are called bossy and that when a woman is in power we refer to her as a boss because if they were just successful we could just call them that she told Us...”
“That s why I want to stand up for children who are being sexually abused and I m so grateful to be able to share their story when they can t for themselves Lively added that she is inspired by women in Hollywood who are not afraid to be themselves...”
““I saw that in small ways through her humanity, and she was very aware and conscious of other people.”
““My mom has always stood up to people who didn’t have a voice,” she told Us on the red carpet.”
“So, you can ask me another question.”The Gossip Girl alum was, however, eager to talk about the empowering women in her life and how she hopes to set a good example for her daughters — James, 2, and Ines, 6 months — whom she shares with husband Ryan Reynolds.”


"We've been educated since childhood, so I'm looking at every woman who feels comfortable with her skin. As a female boss, I'm grateful for the examples of women I aspire to be and my friends who feel comfortable with them."
"I think women have a tendency to minimize themselves."
"Even if I come here today, I don't think I deserve to be here. I don't deserve to be honored among these incredible women."
“… In my own skin, so I look forward to those women who are so confident... "
"In my career, I've admired a lot of women, from Meryl Streep to Hillary Clinton. She's always at the top, and she's almost our first female president. All of these women inspire me, the actress added. For me, feeling comfortable is still a struggle... "
“…… Obviously, they are very satisfied with themselves. I think it's a pity that women are called bossy. When a woman is in power, we call her boss, because if they just succeed, we can call them directly. She tells us... "
"That's why I want to stand up for those children who are sexually abused, and I'm very grateful to be able to share their stories when they can't be themselves," she added, inspired by Hollywood's fear of being their own woman... "
"I see that in her humanity, she knows and is conscious of other people."
"My mom always stood up to people who didn't have a say," she told us on the red carpet
"So you can ask me another question." However, the gossip girl's alumni are eager to talk about empowering women in her life and how she hopes to set a good example for her two daughters, James, 2, and Ian, 6 months old, whom she shared with her husband, Ryan Reynolds



Number  718
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“No matter what, we support each other in everything we do.””
“Also utilizing Instagram’s carousel feature, Consuelos, 46, shared multiple pictures of the couple together throughout the years.”
“To celebrate their 21st wedding anniversary on Monday the same day Ripa revealed that Ryan Seacrest will be joining her as co host of Live with Kelly Ryan after a yearlong search the ABC host and the actor each took to Instagram to express their love for one another in...”
“...sweet posts...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““21 years of lit-ness.”
“ (sorry Lola) @instasuelos Happy Anniversary I love you.”
“Big!” Ripa, 46, first captioned an Instagram post in honor of her husband, which included numerous photos of the pair cuddled up on trips they had taken together.”
““Yes!!!”
““We really do have quite an allegiance to one another.”


"Anyway, we support each other in everything we do."
Consuelos, 46, also used instagram's carousel feature to share photos of the couple over the years
"To celebrate their 21st wedding anniversary, Ripa revealed on Monday that Ryan Seacrest would be co host of" living with Kelly Ryan "with her. After a year's search, ABC hosts and actors expressed their love for each other on instagram..."
“… Sweet post... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"21 years of light."
"(I'm sorry, Lola) @ Happy Anniversary. I love you."
"Big! Ripa, 46, first wrote an article for her husband on instagram, which included many photos of the two people cuddling together while traveling together
"Yes!!"
"We are really loyal to each other."



Number  719
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Counted as one of the highest-paid supermodels in the world, Gisele has taken slight step back from the spotlight in recent years as she raises her two children with husband of eight years, American football quarterback Tom Brady.”
“Embellished with animal-print, she matched the piece with a headscarf as she threw a smoldering look at the camera.”
“And Naomi Campbell, 47, and Kaia Gerber, 16, made the perfect pair as they posed for Versace's latest high fashion campaign.”
“The British supermodel, and the American teen model- who rocked huge eighties hair, were joined by Brazilian star Gisele Bundchen, 37, making up three generations of stunners.”
“Scroll down for videoVersace, Versace, Versace!”
“Kaia Gerber, 16, showed off her stunning features and chiseled bone structure as she slipped into a baby blue coordinating ensemble for the latest campaign, rocking huge eighties hairSeeing double!”
“Kaia 16 echoed her supermodel mum Cindy Crawford s look seen left aged 26 in 1992 in the stunning high fashion shoot Looking every inch her model mum s daughter Kaia showed off her naturally stunning features and chiseled bone...”
“...structure as she slipped into a baby blue coordinating ensemble...”
“She rocked the brand's trademark gold accessories and hardware, wearing her glossy brunette locks in voluminous waves as she posed for the brand.”
“The teen has been following in her family's modelling footsteps after first landing a contract with Young Versace as a child, before going on to pose for Vogue Paris alongside Cindy aged 15 and landing an array of contracts.”


Giselle is considered one of the world's highest paid supermodels. In recent years, she has taken a step back from the spotlight by raising two children with her husband of eight years, American football quarterback Tom Brady
She decorated the work with animal prints, paired it with a headscarf and cast a gloomy look at the camera
Naomi Campbell, 47, and Kaya Gerber, 16, made the perfect couple at Versace's latest haute couture show
The British supermodel and an American teen model with disheveled hair in their 80s, joined by 37 year old Brazilian star Gisele Bundchen, are three generations of stunt stars
"Scroll down to see the video Versace, Versace, Versace!"
In her latest campaign, 16-year-old Kaia Gerber, dressed in a light blue coordinating suit, shows off her amazing facial features and well-defined bone structure, and shakes her huge '80s haircut! "
"Kaya 16 is the same as her supermodel mother Cindy Crawford. In 1992, when she was 26 years old, her model mother's daughter Kaia showed her natural and charming features and well-defined bones in an amazing high-end fashion shoot..."
“… When she slides into a baby blue harmony ensemble
"She's rocking the brand's iconic gold accessories and hardware. As she poses for the brand, she's wearing a smooth dark lock and curling it."
"The girl signed a contract with Versace when she was a child, then posed for vogue Paris with Cindy, 15, and signed a series of contracts. Since then, she has been following the family model."



Number  720
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Michael Buckner/Getty Images]”
“Other DWTS alums on hand to celebrate the couple’s wedding weekend included longtime DWTS pros Tony Dovolani, Keo Motsepe, Henry Byalikov, and actress Rumer Willis, who was Val Chmerkovskiy’s celebrity partner on the 20th season of the ABC celebrity ballroom competition.”
“On July 7, the Dancing with the Stars pro dancers and their posse partied the night away at Oheka Castle, the sprawling piece of real estate featured in Taylor Swift’s “Blank Space” video.”
“According to E!”
“News, the night before their July 8 wedding, Maks and Peta hosted their pre-wedding party at the famous Long Island wedding venue.”
“The couple reportedly rented out the space for their weekend-long wedding extravaganza, and they will exchange vows there.”
“Entertainment Tonight previously reported that Maks Chmerkovskiy and Peta Murgatroyd planned to host a Shabbat dinner at Oheka the night before the ceremony and a Sunday brunch the morning after the wedding.”
“For the wedding eve event, Peta Murgatroyd was picture perfect in a white, satin, strapless sheath dress.”
“Other attendees at the gala included Maks’ brother, Val Chmerkovskiy, and his rumored girlfriend and fellow Dancing With the Stars pro dancer Jenna Johnson, as well as former DWTS troupe member Nicole Volynets Gamer, who was not only Peta’s maid of honor but also her wedding planner.”
“Other celebs that were previously rumored to have made the guest list include Val’s ex, Amber Rose, Nyle DiMarco, and Bachelor star Nick Viall, who was Peta Murgatroyd’s most recent celebrity partner on the ABC celebrity ballroom competition.”


"[Michael Buckner / Getty pictures]
Other DWTS alumni attending the Wedding Weekend included DWTS longtime Pro Tony dovolani, Kio motsepe, Henry bialikov and actress rumor Willis, who was val chimmerkovsky's celebrity partner in season 20 of the ABC celebrity ballroom competition
"On July 7, professional dancers dancing with the stars and their team gathered at Oheka castle, a vast real estate shown in Taylor Swift's" blank space "video."
"According to e!"
"It's reported that mark and PETA held their premarital party at the famous long island wedding venue the night before their wedding on July 8."
"It is reported that the couple rented the venue to their wedding party at the weekend, where they will exchange vows."
Entertainment Tonight previously reported that Max chimmerkovsky and PETA murgatroyd planned to hold a Sabbath dinner in ohka the night before the wedding and a Sunday Brunch the morning after the wedding
At the event on the eve of the wedding, PETA murgatroyd was dressed in a White Satin Strapless tight skirt with perfect pictures
"Other people at the party included Mark's brother val chmerkovskiy, his rumored girlfriend, his star dancing companion, professional dancer Jenna Johnson, and former DWTS member Nicole volynets She's not only the maid of honor of PETA, she's also her wedding planner. "
"It has been rumored that other celebrities on the guest list include Val's ex girlfriends amber Ross, Neil Dimaco and bachelor star Nick vial, who is PETA mugartroyd's recent celebrity partner at the ABC celebrity ballroom competition."



Number  721
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““‘You’re going to be worried and nervous and have an insecure life because if he’s not faithful now, he’ll never change.’””
“Finally, Khloe breaks the awkward silence and asks both Kim and Thompson, “Are you going to say hi to each other or no?”Thompson makes the first move and brings Kim in for a deeply cringeworthy hug before the two pull away from each other.”
“Entertainment via Getty Images Kim Kardashian poses for photos at the People's Choice Awards in November.”
“Her interaction with Tristan Thompson as Khloe Kardashian gave birth -- just days after news broke that Thompson had cheated on Khloe -- was uncomfortable, to say the least.”
“If Khloe Kardashian’s game is the revenge body, then Kim Kardashian’s is just straight-up revenge.”
“As any Kardashian connoisseur will tell you, the reality TV star isn’t afraid to unleash on those she thinks have wronged her ― or worse, wronged anyone in her family.”
“Enter Khloe’s boyfriend and NBA player Tristan Thompson, who was caught cheating on her in multiple videos days before she gave birth to their daughter, True.”
“Kim predictably went ballistic after learning the news, unfollowing him on social media and declaring his actions were “so fucked up” during an appearance on “The Ellen DeGeneres Show” shortly after.”
“The two have seemingly made up since (and made light of their feud), but a clip from this Sunday’s episode of “Keeping Up With the Kardashians” shows Kim coming face-to-face with Thompson for the first time after learning he was unfaithful to her sister.”
“And it’s gloriously uncomfortable.”


"You will be worried and nervous, life will be very unsafe, because if he is not loyal now, he will never change."
Finally, Crowe broke the awkward silence and asked Kim and Thompson, "do you want to say hello or not?"? "Thompson took the first step and brought Kim in and gave him a big hug before they parted."
"Entertainment through Getty pictures Kim Kardashian took photos at the people's Choice Awards in November."
"Her interaction with Tristan Thompson during Chloe Kardashian's childbirth - just a few days after the news of Thompson's betrayal of Chloe - was uncomfortable, to say the least."
"If Carol Kardashian's game is revenge, then Kim Kardashian's game is straightforward revenge."
"As any Kardashian expert will tell you, the reality star is not afraid to blame anyone she thinks has wronged her - or worse, anyone in her family."
"Look at helo's boyfriend and NBA player Tristan Thompson. A few days before she gave birth to her daughter, he was found cheating her in several videos, really."
After learning the news, Jin Zhengnan flew into a rage and followed him on social media. He later declared that his behavior was "too bad" on the "Ellen DeGeneres Show."
"The two seem to have made up since then (and downplayed their grudges), but footage from this Sunday's" keep up with Kardashian "episode shows Kim meeting Thompson face to face for the first time after learning that he was unfaithful to his sister."
"It's very uncomfortable."



Number  722
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Megan McCluskey at megan.mccluskey@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“...of Wednesday s Live...”
“...episode to poking fun at the Fox News host.”
“Responding to a tweet in which his “pal” Hannity claimed he has never paid Cohen—who is at the center of a probe by the FBI—the late-night host eagerly shared his take on the matter.”
““That sounds normal.”
“He has a lawyer he doesn’t pay,” Kimmel quipped.”
““By the way, I’m thinking of hiring Michael Cohen as my lawyer.”
“He only has three clients and apparently, he works for free.”
“He doesn’t take money from anyone.”This new controversy comes just over a week after the two television personalities engaged in a heated back-and-forth on Twitter that ended with an apology from Kimmel.”


"To Megan McCluskey Megan McCluskey @ time.com."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Live on Wednesday"
“… Teases Fox News Host's episode
On a tweet, his "friend" hanniti claimed that he never paid Cohen, who is the center of investigation of the Federal Bureau of investigation, and the late night host enthusiastically shared his views on the matter
"That sounds normal."
"He has a lawyer who doesn't pay," quipped Kimmel
"By the way, I'd like to ask Michael Cohen to be my lawyer."
"He has only three clients, and obviously he works for free."
"He doesn't take money from anyone." The new dispute, which ended with Kimmel's apology, took place more than a week after two television celebrities had a fierce fight on twitter



Number  723
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tommy Lee's caption on the same photo was even more cryptic: "Did it, I do a LOT."”
“News reporting that the two -- who announced their engagement on Valentine's Day 2018 -- were wed in an "intimate ceremony in front of a few lucky guests."”
“The cryptic nature of the caption made it unclear if the pair actually got married or were just having some fun, despite E!”
“(to take a photo in front of someone's leftover wedding alter."”
“EVER.”
“DAY.”
“The caption on the photo reads "BEST.”
“Lee and fiancee former Vine star Brittany Furlan posted a photo on Sunday (May 27) in which they are wearing matching white robes and slippers while kissing under an awning.”
“Or it could all be a big joke.”
“It's possible that former Motley Crue drummer Tommy Lee got married for the fourth time over the Memorial Day weekend.”


"In the same photo, Tommy Lee's description is more obscure:" yes, I did a lot. "
"The news report said the two announced their engagement on Valentine's day in 2018, and they had a" close wedding in front of a few lucky guests. "
"The obscurity of the subtitles makes it hard to see whether they are really married or just having fun, although e!"
"Take pictures in front of other people's remaining wedding altar."
"Never."
"One day."
The title of the photo says "best"
"Ang Lee and his fiancee, former vine star Brittany Furlan, released a photo on Sunday (May 27) showing them kissing under the awning in matching white robes and slippers."
"Or it could be a big joke."
"It's possible that Tommy Lee, a former drummer of Crusoe, got married for the fourth time over Memorial Day weekend."



Number  724
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I have the utmost respect for John, but I know this is what’s best for me.””
“Nikki’s Christmas and New Year’s Eve traditions will also be different this year.”
“Nikki Bella is going to find that out very soon.”
“This year was really fun because I hosted Thanksgiving for the first time and I m going to do the same for Christmas and it s fun because my daughter actually starts to care about some stuff around the holidays so I can have those moments with her Brie Bella...”
“...told Us exclusively at Jingle Ball 2018 in New York City on Friday December 7 adding and you know feed Nikki a ton of wine And Santa better bring me something to your house Nikki chimed in...”
““I need diamond earrings.”Brie, 35, and her husband, Daniel Bryan, welcomed their daughter, Birdie, in May 2017.”
““The greatest feeling in the world!!”
“!” she captioned a photo later that week.”
““Can’t even express the love I feel for her  from the moment I saw her I was in love.” Birdie will be 1 and a half years old around the holidays.”
“The Total Bellas star, 35, and John Cena called off their engagement in April 2018, ending their six-year relationship.”


"I have great respect for John, but I know it's the best for me."
"Nicky's Christmas and new year's Eve traditions will be different this year."
"Nikibala will know soon."
"It's really interesting this year, because I'm hosting Thanksgiving for the first time, and I'm going to do the same for Christmas, which is very interesting, because my daughter starts to care about something before and after the holiday, so that I can spend those moments with her bribella..."
“…… On Friday, December 7, at the 2018 Dingdang ball in New York City, you know, if you feed Nicky a ton of wine, Santa would better bring me something to your house, Nicky interjected
"I need diamond earrings." Bree, 35, and her husband Daniel Bryan welcomed their daughter birdie in May 2017
"The greatest feeling in the world!"
"!" she captioned a photo later that week. "
"I can't even express my love for her from the moment I saw her. I fell in love with her." Bertie will be one and a half years old before and after the holiday
"Total Bellas star, 35, and John cena cancelled their engagement in April 2018, ending their six-year relationship."



Number  725
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Chapman announced on Tuesday that she is leaving Weinstein.”
“Milano served as a host, and Chapman, who co-founded the fashion line Marchesa, served as a judge.”
“Project Runway All Stars was produced by the Weinstein Company.”
“...star Rose McGowan who settled with Weinstein after an episode in a hotel room in 1997”
“Please don t confuse my silence for anything other than respect for a dear friend and her beautiful children 7 High Profile Men Accused Of Sexual Harassment Over The Past Year After publishing her post Milano retweeted a photo with the words I Stand With Rose referencing her Charmed co...”
“It is because of my love for Georgina, India and Dashiell that I haven’t publicly commented on this until now.”
“Harvey and Georgina also have two very young children who my children have known their entire lives.”
“She is one of the most special humans I have ever met.”
““Georgina Chapman is my friend.”
“But speaking out against Weinstein, she added, “is complicated for me for personal reasons.”“Harvey has a wife, who I have had the privilege of working with for the last 5 years on Project Runway All Stars,” Milano explained.”


"Chapman announced on Tuesday that she would leave Weinstein."
Milan hosts and Chapman judges. Chapman is one of the founders of the machesa fashion brand
"The T-ALL Star project was made by Weinstein."
“…… After an episode in a hotel room in 1997, rose McGovern, the star who settled with Weinstein
"Please don't confuse my silence with respect for a dear friend and her beautiful child. In the past year, seven well-known men have been accused of sexual harassment after publishing her post. Milano forwarded a photo with the words "rose and I stand together" and mentioned her charming colleague... "
"It's because of my love for Georgina, India and dashir that I'm not commenting on this publicly until now."
"Harvey and Georgina have two very young children, and my children know them all their lives."
"She's one of the most special people I've ever met."
"Georgina Chapman is my friend."
"But public opposition to Weinstein is complicated for me because of personal reasons," Milano explained



Number  726
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m the guy.””
““If there are any accidents, I’m there.”
“Their countdown continues for the arrival of their twins, and we are learning more and more information about how the two of them are gearing up for the babies.”
““They’re counting down [the days] and nearly at the edge of their seats,” according to a source of E!”
“News.”
““Every day, one of them is like, ‘It’s going to be today.”
“I can feel it’ and then it doesn’t happen.”The insider also said that “Amal is great.”
“She’s healthy, excited and looking forward to becoming a mother.”
“She is taking it very easy.”
“She s officially on maternity leave now The source stated that the human rights attorney is due very soon while another source very close to the couple confirmed the fact that Amal didn t need to pay daily visits to...”


"I'm the one."
"If there's any accident, I'll be there."
"The countdown to the birth of their twins continues, and we are learning more and more about how the two of them prepare for their babies."
"They are counting down (days), almost beside their seats," according to an e! "
"News."
"Every day, one of them would say," today is coming. "
"I can feel it, and then it won't happen." The insider also said, "Amar is great."
"She's healthy, excited and looking forward to being a mother."
"She's relaxed."
"She is now officially on maternity leave. The source said that human rights lawyers will soon arrive, while another source close to the couple confirmed that Amar does not need to visit every day..."



Number  727
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of Thrones The Good Place The Handmaid s Tale Insecure Master of None Stranger Things 2 This is Us AFI Special Award The Vietnam War...”
“AFI Movies of the Year The Big Sick Call Me by Your Name Dunkirk The Florida Project Get Out Lady Bird The Post The Shape of Water Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Wonder Woman AFI TV Programs of the Year Big Little Lies The Crown Feud Bette and Joan Game...”
“The full list of this year's honorees follows.”
“The honorees will be recognized at a Jan. 5 luncheon in Los Angeles.”
“However, this year, the latest Star Wars film, The Last Jedi, which hits theaters on Dec. 15, was nowhere to be found on AFI's list.”
“Two years ago, the AFI delayed voting on its year-end list to give critics a chance to see Star Wars: The Force Awakens, which it subsequently included on its list of the 10 best films of 2015.”
“Apatow, who is a producer of The Big Sick, recused himself from voting on that film.”
“Other jury members included Judd Apatow, Halle Berry, Jamie Lee Curtis, Leonard Maltin, authors and scholars representing prestigious universities with recognized motion picture arts and TV programs and film and TV critics from media outlets like NPR, Rolling Stone, TV Guide and The Washington Post.”
“This year's juries were chaired by AFI board of trustees vice chairs Tom Pollock (for film) and Richard Frank (for TV).”
“"AFI Awards is honored to celebrate this community of artists who challenge and inspire us, entertain and enlighten us — ultimately reminding us of our common heartbeat."”


“… It's a good place for the throne, a maid's story, and a strange thing for a insecure host. 2 this is the US Air Force Special Award for the Vietnam War. "
"AFI movie of the year big illness call me your name Dunkirk Florida project go out lady bird back water shape three billboards out ebb Missouri Wonder Woman AFI TV show of the year big lie crown revenge Betty and Joan game..."
"The list of winners this year is as follows."
"The winners will be recognized at a luncheon in Los Angeles on January 5."
"This year, however, the latest Star Wars movie" the last Jedi, "which was released on December 15, is not on AFI's list."
"Two years ago, the Motion Picture Association of America delayed voting on the year-end awards to give critics a chance to see Star Wars: the awakening of the force Wars:the Force  The society then published Star Wars: the awakening of the force Wars:the Force  Warkes is on the top 10 best picture list of 2015. "
"Pato is the producer of" seriously ill "and he avoided voting on that film."
Other members of the jury include Jude apato, Halle Berry, Jamie Lee Curtis, Leonard Maltin, writers and scholars representing famous universities, and film critics from NPR, rolling stone, TV guide and Washington Post
"This year's jury was presided over by Tom Pollock (film) and Richard Frank (TV), vice chairmen of AFI's board of directors."
"The AFI awards celebrate this group of artists who challenge and inspire us, entertain and inspire us - and ultimately remind us of our common heartbeat."



Number  728
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Perfectly normal.””
““Swimming with sharks,” Mariah she captioned the clip.”
“She also revealed her rarely seen adventurous side in a video of herself and Monroe snorkelling in the shallow water with the creatures.”
“In another picture which showed Mariah petting one of the sharks, the star looked stunning in a wetsuit unzipped to her cleavage.”
“The animals, which eat mainly small fish, shrimp and squid, can grow up to 14 feet (4.3 meters) and have very strong jaws filled with thousands of tiny, serrated teeth, which they use to bite defensively if stepped on or bothered by divers who assume they’re docile.”
“Also along for the watery ride was the singer’s on-off backup dancer boyfriend Bryan Tanaka, who also shared a video of himself swimming with the bottom-dwelling sharks.”
““Shark day with #dembabies ... don’t worry, they’re gentle #NurseSharks,” wrote Mariah in her post on the social media site.”
“...tend to be found in shallow warm waters...”
“The We Belong Together singer posted photos and video on her Instagram page on Independence Day of her and the six year olds in the ocean with the supposedly gentle nurse sharks The pair looked completely fearless as they were surrounded by the sharks which are harmless to humans and...”
“Mariah Carey took her twins Moroccan and Monroe on a daring day out to celebrate July 4 - swimming with sharks.”


"Absolutely normal."
"Swim with sharks," Maria wrote in the title of the clip
"In a video of herself and Monroe snorkeling in shallow water with these creatures, she also revealed her rare side of adventure."
"In another photo of Maria caressing one of the sharks, the star looks beautiful in a diving suit that zips up to the cleavage."
"These animals mainly eat small fish, shrimp and squid. They can grow up to 14 feet (4.3 meters), have very strong jaws and tens of thousands of small serrated teeth. If they are stepped on or disturbed by divers who are considered docile, they will use these teeth for defense."
"Accompanied by the water ride is the singer's off and on partner Bryan Tanaka, who also shared a video of himself swimming with the undersea shark."
"Shark day and denbarbie... "Don't worry, they are gentle nannies," Maria wrote in a post on the social media site
“… Often found in warm shallow water
"On independence day, the" we belong together "singer posted photos and videos on instagram. In the photos, she and her six-year-old children were in the ocean with the nurse shark, who was considered gentle. They looked totally fearless because they were surrounded by sharks that were harmless to human beings, and..."
"Mariah Carey took her twin Moroccans and Monroe to celebrate July 4 - swimming with sharks."



Number  729
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s time to go see her, Tess,” Randall says.”
“That’s my brother.”Tess hasn’t seen “her” in awhileBack on the Season 2 finale, we got our first glimpse of an older Randall and an older Tess.”
“Sterling K. Brown: We’ve all [in the cast] known that it’s Rebecca, though the audience didn’t know, and we know why it’s Rebecca and you guys will find out at the end of the season what it is.”
“How soon are we going to find out why everyone is gathering to see her?”
“TheWrap: How did you feel about the reveal Rebecca is the mysterious future “her” we’ve all been wondering about?”
“So since we didn’t get anymore new hints on screen, TheWrap was able to gather a few clues for you while speaking with Brown about Randall winning the Philadelphia City Council race and how those election results might impact the Pearsons in the present and the future.”
“Also Read: 'This Is Us' Season 3: 'ER' Alum Goran Visnjic Cast as Beth's Teacher on Backstory Episode“This Is Us” returned from hiatus tonight with an episode that jumped between the past and present — but didn’t head into the future again.”
“Does that mean they separate or even divorce?”
“That spat led to Randall sleeping on the couch, and a not so happy vibe between the happy couple in the present, with some hints in the future indicating the two are only communicating between Adult Tess.”
“The episode also ended with a fight between our Present Day Beth and Randall, because Randall refused to drop out of the city council race, when the polls show he won’t win and his wife asks him to give up and come back to helping his family.”


"It's time to see her, Tess," Randall said
"That's my brother." Tess didn't see "she" in the last episode of season 2 for a long time. We saw old Randall and old Tess for the first time
"Stirling K. Brown: we all know it's Rebecca, although the audience doesn't know, we know why it's Rebecca, and you'll know what it is at the end of the season."
"How long will it take us to figure out why everyone got together to see her?"
"The wrap": how do you feel about the revelation of "Rebecca" in "Rebecca is the mysterious future we've always wanted to know"
"So, since we don't get any new cues on the screen anymore, the wrap gathered some clues for you when talking with brown about Randall's winning the city council election in Philadelphia and the impact of these election results on the present and future of the Pearsons."
"Also read: 'this is our' third season: 'er' Alan Golan Visnjic plays Beth's teacher backstage episode 'this is our' return to rest tonight and jump between the past and the present with an episode - but not towards the future."
"Does that mean they are separated or even divorced?"
"The quarrel caused Randall to sleep on the sofa. The atmosphere between the happy couple is not very pleasant now. Some hints in the future indicate that they are only communicating with adult Tess."
"This episode also ended with the fight between Beth and Randall today, because Randall refused to withdraw from the city council election. At that time, the polls showed that he would not win, and his wife asked him to give up and come back to help his family."



Number  730
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Bookout wrote in the documents, obtained by RadarOnline, that she feared for her son’s safety and cited Edwards’ driving under the influence as a factor.”
“The Teen Mom OG star, 26, filed for an order of protection against Edwards, 30, in late March and included their 9-year-old son, Bentley, as well as her two other children: Jayde Carter, 2, and Maverick Reed, 22 months, whom she shares with husband Taylor McKinney.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“A rep for Edwards did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Bookout claimed in court documents obtained by E!”
“News that Edwards left voicemail messages threatening to show up at my house and take my son and alleged her ex has made threats to show up and hurt me if I don t answer my phone The MTV star also alleged that Edwards had appeared at Bentley s baseball...”
“...game in May 2017 under the influence of heroin and got in my face yelling and threatening to hurt me RadarOnline reported...”
“Image zoom Maci Bookout Ryan Edwards Credit John Phillips Getty Mackenzie Edwards Instagram Edwards was previously shown driving impaired during the season 6 finale of Teen Mom OG while on the way to his wedding with Mackenzie Standifer Edwards who was seen at times taking the steering wheel from him...”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”


"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
Booker wrote in a document obtained by ladaroni that she was worried about her son's safety and used Edwards' drunk driving as a factor
"The 26 year old mother applied for a protection order against 30-year-old Edwards at the end of March, including their 9-year-old son Bentley and her two other children, 2-year-old Jed Carter and 22-month-old trek reed, who share the two children with her husband, Tyler McKinney."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A representative of Edwards did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
"The booking claimed in the court documents obtained by E!"
"It's said that Edwards left a voice message threatening to show up at my house and take my son, claiming that her ex boyfriend threatened to show up and hurt me if I didn't answer the phone, and that the MTV star also claimed that Edwards showed up at Bentley's baseball field..."
“… In May 2017, under the influence of heroin, the game yelled in my face and threatened to hurt me. Ladaroni reported... "
"Image zoom MACI bookout Ryan Edwards credit John Phillips Getty Mackenzie Edwards instagram Edwards was on his way to the wedding ceremony with Mackenzie standifer Edwards. In the last episode of the sixth season of" teenage mom og ", he was photographed with driving obstacles, and Mackenzie standifer Edwards sometimes took the steering wheel from him..."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"



Number  731
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““[She] mumbled something, knocked some things off of the counter and then walked out,” the spokesperson said.”
“A spokesperson for the West Hollywood Sheriff’s Department told PEOPLE at the time that a woman had walked into the store with a revolver and pointed it at one of the employees.”
“Khloé Kardashian are saying goodbye to a chapter in their lives...”
“The KKW beauty mogul, 37, announced on her app and website on Thursday that she and her siblings had decided to close all of their DASH storefronts.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““After nearly 12 years, my sisters and I have decided to close the doors of our DASH stores,” the mother of three began.”
““We opened our first store as a family in 2006 and since then we have made so many lifelong memories.”
“From opening locations in Los Angeles, Miami and New York, to having our Dash Dolls spin-off show, it’s been such a huge part of our lives.”“We’ve loved running DASH, but in the last few years we’ve all grown so much individually,” she continued.”
““We’ve been busy running our own brands, as well as being moms and balancing work with our families.”
“We know in our hearts that it s time to move on Image zoom Credit Gustavo Caballero Getty Images We love our DASH Dolls and are so grateful for the amazing memories and we have to give a special thanks to the DASH employees and all of the incredible fans...”


"(she) mumbled something, knocked things off the counter and walked out," the spokesman said
"A spokesman for the West Hollywood sheriff's Department told people at the time that a woman came into the store with a revolver and pointed it at one of the employees."
"Kardashian is saying goodbye to a chapter in their lives..."
The 37 year old kkw beauty tycoon announced on her app and website on Thursday that she and her siblings had decided to close all dash stores
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After nearly 12 years, my sisters and I decided to close our dash store," the mother of three began
"In 2006, our family opened their first store. Since then, we have created a lot of lifelong memories."
"From the opening ceremonies in Los Angeles, Miami and New York to our dash show, it's an important part of our lives." "We like to run dash, but each of us has grown a lot in the past few years," she continued
"We've been busy running our own brand, we've been busy being mothers, and we've been balancing with our family at work."
"We know in our hearts that it's time to continue zooming. We love our dash dolls. Thank you very much for these wonderful memories. We would like to thank the staff of dash and all the incredible fans... "



Number  732
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“According to Beyoncé’s Instagram, the names are Rumi and Sir Carter, two handles that are definitely unique enough to keep company with the likes of Blue Ivy.”
“Beyoncé announced that she and Jay Z would be expecting not one, but two new additions to the family in February of this year with an artistic Instagram photo of herself clad in a veil and an exposed baby bump that sent the Internet into a tizzy.”
““We would like to share our love and happiness.”
“We have been blessed two times over,” the “Lemonade” singer captioned the photo.”
“Beyoncé shared a series of photos throughout her pregnancy, many who featured their 5-year-old daughter, Blue Ivy Carter.”
“The twins’ birth was one of the most widely anticipated events of 2017, with Beyoncé’s avant garde Instagram pregnancy announcement breaking a Guinness World Record for most liked photo on Instagram.”
“The power couple, who married in 2008, welcomed Blue – who is now five – on January 7, 2012.”
“See the name announcement in all its glory below.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
Please enter a valid email address
"According to Beyonce's instagram, which is named rummy and Sir Carter, these two handles are absolutely unique enough to be compatible with plants such as blue ivy."
"Beyonce announced that what she and jay z are looking forward to is not one, but two new family members added in February this year. A veiled art photo of her on instagram and an exposed baby lump have thrown the Internet into chaos."
"We are willing to share our love and happiness."
"We've been blessed twice," the lemonade singer wrote in the title of the photo
"Beyonce shared a series of photos during her pregnancy, many of which were photos of their five-year-old daughter, Ivy Carter."
"The birth of the twins is one of the most anticipated events in 2017, and Beyonce's avant-garde instagram pregnancy announcement broke the Guinness world record for the most popular photo on instagram."
"The power couple got married in 2008, and on January 7, 2012, they ushered in blue, now five years old."
"Please see the name announcement below."



Number  733
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...kids...”
“It gives me confidence in our relationship knowing that he truly wants to be with me and he took this huge risk to make it happen And both agreed that they were very excited about marriage and starting a family in fact Luyendyk Jr said he wants two to four...”
““Things are moving pretty quickly and everything’s been great.”The couple also admitted that they have yet to watch their season finale — including the painfully raw footage of Luyendyk Jr. ending things with Kufrin.”
““We’re in our condo now and we just bought a new house,” Burnham said on The View.”
“Kufrin is engaged once again, this time after wrapping production on The Bachelorette (her season premieres Monday on ABC), and Luyendyk Jr. and Burnham have moved in together in his hometown of Scottsdale, Arizona.”
“Image zoom Arie Luyendyk Jr. and Lauren Burnham on The BachelorSince then, all three parties involved have moved on.”
“He ultimately decided to break things off with Kufrin, 28, to pursue a relationship with Burnham — and proposed to her on live television during the two-hour After the Final Rose special on March 6.”
“Less than two months after proposing to finalist Becca Kufrin, Luyendyk Jr. realized he was still in love with his runner-up, Burnham.”
“...season of The Bachelor.”
“Luyendyk Jr., 36, and Burnham, 26, were at the epicenter of the most recent (and most controversial!)”


“… The kids
"It made me confident in our relationship because I knew he really wanted to be with me, and he did it at great risk, and both agreed that they were very excited about marriage and family. In fact, little luyandick said he wanted two or four..."
"Things are going very fast and everything is fine." The couple also admitted that they haven't seen the end of their season - including the raw footage of young luyandick and kufrin ending their relationship in agony
"We're living in an apartment now, and we've just bought a new house," Burnham said from the observation deck
"Kuflynn is engaged again, this time after completing the production of" Bachelor "(she premieres on ABC this season on Monday), young luyandick and Burnham have moved to his hometown of Scottsdale, Arizona."
"The single photos of little Ali luyandik and Lauren Burnham are continuing."
"He finally decided to break up with 28 year old kuflin, continue his relationship with Burnham - and propose to her live on TV two hours after the rose special ended on March 6."
"Less than two months after proposing to finalist Becca Coughlin, little luyandick realized that he still loved runner up Burnham."
Singles Day
Little luyandik, 36, and Burnham, 26, were the epicenters of the latest (and most controversial) earthquake



Number  734
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After watching Colbert rail so hard against the Trump administration’s lies, it was downright bizarre to see him warmly welcome someone responsible for defending so many of them.”
“It went against everything Colbert purports to do on his fiercely pointed Late Show, and retroactively sucked the air out of any biting Trump jokes he tried to make earlier in the opening monologue.”
“...after the truth while evading it with all his might...”
“With this toothless punchline Colbert and the Emmys cast a jolly sheen over Spicer s tenure as press secretary which began with that ridiculous lie about Trump s inauguration crowd size and continued with him berating the press for asking...”
“That’s why seeing Colbert close out his monologue by sharing a chuckle with Spicer wasn’t just jarring — it was incredibly disappointing.”
“Every night that The Late Show has been on the air has been a night that Colbert has passionately slammed Trump and his staff alike for using their power to spread falsehoods and fear.”
“Colbert has spent the entirety of Trump’s time in office railing against the president’s hypocrisy, his exclusionary policies, and his affinity for telling lies whenever it’s convenient.”
“...audience to witness an inauguration period both in person and around the world The bit was also completely unnecessary...”
“...of course was a not so sly reference to Spicer s very first day at work as Donald Trump s White House press secretary in which he angrily declared to the press that Trump s inauguration crowd was the largest...”
“As the audience gasped Spicer wheeled out a podium and bellowed This will be the largest audience to witness an Emmys period both in person and around the world Wow Colbert grinned this really soothes my fragile ego The bit...”


"It's really strange to see Colbert warmly welcome a person responsible for defending so many lies after he has so severely attacked the trump administration's lies."
"It goes against everything Colbert claims in his sharp evening show, back to any sharp trump joke he tried to make in his opening remarks."
“… While trying to escape the truth... "
"Colbert and the Emmy Awards have given a layer of joy to Spencer's term of press secretary, which started with the absurd lies about the size of the crowd at Trump's inauguration, and then he continued to denounce the media's questions..."
"That's why it's not just harsh to see Colbert end his monologue and share laughter with Spicer - it's incredibly disappointing."
"Every night on the evening show, Colbert enthusiastically attacked trump and his staff for using their power to spread lies and fears."
"Throughout Trump's administration, Colbert has attacked the president's hypocrisy, his xenophobic policy, and his tendency to lie at any convenient time."
“…… There is no need for the audience to witness the inauguration ceremony in person or around the world... "
“…… Of course, this does not mean that on his first day as Donald Trump's White House press secretary, Spencer angrily declared to the media that Trump's inauguration crowd was the largest.... "
"When the audience gasps for breath, Spicer launches a podium and roars, which will be the biggest audience to witness during the Emmy period, both personally and around the world. Wow, Colbert grins, which really soothes my fragile ego..."



Number  735
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared on Billboard.”
““I mean, it was chaos for a pure seven to 10 minutes,” he told NBC.”
“Strip...”
“Speaking to NBC News, Owen described the chaotic scene as it unfolded.”
““I was on the stage.”
“I had just walked up on the stage with a couple friends of mine including Luke Combs another artist who had played earlier and we were literally standing 50 feet from where Jason was on stage and all of a sudden you heard what sounded it was kind of a...”
“...think where you were like Was that gunfire and it got faster and faster almost like it was an automatic rifle he said...”
““You could hear it ringing off the rafters off the top of the stage.”
“That’s when you saw people fleeing.”
“At that point, people on stage just started running everywhere possible.”


"This article first appeared on the billboard."
"I mean, it's just seven to 10 minutes of chaos," he told NBC
"Split..."
In an interview with NBC, Owen described the chaos
"I'm on stage."
"I just stepped onto the stage with a few of my friends, including Luke combs, another early performer. We were standing 50 feet away from Jason's stage, and suddenly you heard something that sounded a little bit..."
"When you think about it, it's a shot, and it's getting faster and faster, like an automatic rifle," he said
"You can hear it from the rafters at the top of the stage."
"You saw people running away at that time."
"At that time, the people on the stage began to run everywhere."



Number  736
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Confusing times.”The Instagram post was written months after Dick was fired from two films following allegations of sexual assault and harassment.”
“No joke.”
“Is anybody going to carry Trump off?”
“I was jokingly carried off by security.”
“I also mistakenly thought she would date me.”
“Her legs were sparkling, and I was trying to see if the glitter would wipe off.”
“Dick actually brought attention to the incident himself in an Instagram post last year when he posted a screenshot of the incident along with the caption, “The time I ‘groped’ Trump’s daughter, Ivanka, on Jimmy Kimmel Live.”
“People reports that later Kimmel and a member of his security team removed Dick from the set.”
“Trump appears shocked but attempts to laugh off the incident while slapping Dick’s hand away.”
“...when suddenly Dick makes a comment about Ivanka’s legs and rubs them.”


"The age of chaos." Instagram's post came a few months after Dick was fired from both films after he was accused of sexual assault and harassment
"No kidding."
"Is anyone going to take trump away?"
"I was jokingly taken away by the security guard."
"I mistook her for dating me."
"Her legs are shining. I want to see if they can be wiped off."
"Dick posted a screenshot of the incident on instagram last year, with the title" the time I "touched" trump's daughter Ivanka at the scene of Jimmy Kimmel. "In fact, he himself attracted people's attention to the incident in this post
"It was reported that Kimmel and one of his security team members later took Dick away from the set."
"Trump looked shocked, but tried to laugh at the incident and clap Dick's hand away."
"When Dick suddenly commented on Ivanka's legs and rubbed them."



Number  737
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When she was given this new co-hosting job, her salary was bumped to $4 million.”
“While there, Jenna and her sister Barbara made national headlines when they were both arrested for alcohol-related charges twice within 5 weeks: on April 29, 2001, Jenna was charged with a misdemeanor for possession of alcohol under the age 21 in Austin, Texas.”
“Jenna Bush (Hager) was born November 25, 1981 in Dallas, Texas.”
“She is probably best known for being the younger of the non-identical twin daughters of the 43rd U.S. President George W. Bush and former First Lady Laura Bush.”
“Jenna is a granddaughter of the 41st U.S. President George H. W. Bush and former First Lady Barbara Bush.”
“She and her sister Barbara were the first twin children of a U.S. president.”
“Hager is an author, an editor-at-large for Southern Living magazine, correspondent for NBC's Today Show and a contributor to NBC Nightly News.”
“In 1994, after her father was elected Governor of Texas and the family moved to Austin, Texas, Bush was a student at St. Andrew's Episcopal School and attended Austin High School (1996-2000).”
“She attended the University of Texas at Austin and took summer classes at New York University.”
“On May 29, 2001, Jenna was charged with another misdemeanor—attempting to use a fake ID (with the name Barbara Pierce, her paternal grandmother's maiden name) to purchase alcohol.”


"When she got the new co chair job, her salary soared to $4 million."
There, Jenna and her sister Barbara were arrested twice in five weeks on alcohol-related charges, making headlines across the country: Jenna was charged with a misdemeanor in Austin, Texas, on April 29, 2001, for possessing alcohol under the age of 21
Jenna Bush (Hagrid) was born on November 25, 1981 in Dallas, Texas
"She is probably best known for the younger twin daughter of George W. Bush, the 43rd president of the United States, and former first lady Laura Bush."
"Jenna is the granddaughter of the 41st president of the United States, George H. W. Bush, and former first lady Barbara Bush."
"She and her sister Barbara are the first twins of the president of the United States."
Hagrid is a writer, a fugitive editor of Southern Living magazine, a reporter for NBC's today show, and a writer for NBC's nightnews
In 1994, Bush's father was elected governor of Texas. After the family moved to Austin, Texas, she attended St. Andrew's Episcopal school and Austin high school (1996-2000)
"She studied at the University of Texas at Austin and took summer classes at New York University."
On May 29, 2001, Jenna was charged with another misdemeanor of attempting to use a fake ID card (her grandmother's maiden name was Barbara Pierce) to buy alcohol



Number  738
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Come on.””
““Omg y’all I’m not dating Tyga,” Jordan shared on Twitter Friday afternoon after the pictures surfaced.”
“Before you assume something is going down, you may just want to go straight to the source.”
“And when it was time to leave the restaurant, the pair embraced for a hug goodbye.”
“In photos obtained by TMZ, the “Ayo” rapper and Jordan Ozuna were spotted sitting next to each other inside Serafina Sunset in West Hollywood.”
“After the rapper and his girlfriend Kylie partied separately during the first weekend of Coachella2017, Tyga got fans talking when he was spotted enjoying dinner with a few friends.”
“Tyga was spotted out and about with a new girl and the internet is going widl!”


"Come on."
On Friday afternoon, after the photo came to light, Jordan tweeted, "my God, I'm not dating TEGA."
"Before you think things are getting worse, you may just want to go straight to the source."
"When they were about to leave the restaurant, they hugged and said goodbye."
In a photo taken by TMZ, Ayo rapper and Jordan ozuna are found sitting side by side at sunset in Serafina, West Hollywood
"Following the rap singer and his girlfriend Kelly's first weekend in cochella in 2017, TEGA was found to have dinner with several friends, which caused a lot of discussion among fans."
"TEGA is found with a new girl. She's crazy on the Internet!"



Number  739
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He was hung like a raisin in that scene.”“Altered Carbon” debuts Friday, February 2.”
“It was really weird…”RELATED: Netflix’s Wild New Trailer For ‘Altered Carbon’ Will Blow You Away“That’s why they didn’t show everything,” joked his co-star James Purefoy.”
““So it was hot like a sauna in that room and I was buck naked, but I had that goo all over so I was freezing because the skin didn’t get any oxygen.”
““I don’t know what it was, but it was strange because when they put that goo on, the skin stopped breathing,” said Kinnaman.”
“...be not just naked but also covered in a thick gelatinous goo...”
“So I ve never done that before RELATED Joel Kinnaman Says Sexual Misconduct Allegations Against House Of Cards Co Star Kevin Spacey Wasn t A Shock In the scene in question Kinnaman s character is re sleeved as his consciousness gets transferred into a new body which required him to...”
“News.”
““I spent the first two days buck naked in front of 250 people I just met,” Kinnaman explained to E!”
“For star Joel Kinnaman, the high-profile series did not come without sacrifices.”
“The intriguing new Netflix series that debuts Friday is set in a dystopian future in which technology has created a form of immortality by allowing human consciousness to be transferred from one body to another .”


"In that scene, he was hanging like a raisin." "Changed carbon" premieres on Friday, February 2
"It's really strange..." Related story: Netflix's wild new trailer for carbon of change will surprise you. "That's why they didn't show everything," joked his partner, James Purefoy
"So the room was as hot as a sauna. I was naked, but I was covered with mucus, so I froze because my skin couldn't get oxygen."
"I don't know what it is, but it's strange because when they put that layer of mucus on, the skin stops breathing," kinnaman said
“…… Not only to be naked, but also to be covered with thick mucus... "
"So I've never done this before. Joel kinnaman said that the sexual misconduct accusation against Kevin Spacey, CO star of house of cards, is not a shock. Kinnaman's role has been re trapped because his consciousness has been transferred to a new body, which requires him to..."
"News."
"I spent the first two days naked in front of 250 people I just met," kinneman told e! "
"For star Joel kinnaman, this high-profile series is not without sacrifice."
"The intriguing new Netflix series, which premieres on Friday, is set in an anti utopian future, where technology creates an immortal form by shifting human consciousness from one body to another."



Number  740
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Frazer Harrison/Getty Images]”
“So he’s extremely happy with it.”Leave your thoughts about Chrisley Knows Best in the comments below.”
“According to Us Weekly, Chrisley Knows Best star Julie Chrisley — who is Todd’s second wife — appeared on the hit show Hollywood Medium to connect with her late brother from the great beyond.”
“Julie’s brother, whose name was Trey, committed suicide when he was 25-years-old.”
“In the sneak peek of the show, Tyler Henry — the titular Hollywood Medium — made the connection with Trey by feeling like he was “electrocuted,” only to find out that it was an obscure reference to the last job Trey did with their father, Harvey.”
“Julie explains that one of the last moments her father and brother had together was doing a job on a lake that almost resulted in a severe electrical mishap.”
““No one would have any way of knowing that,” she says in a confessional interview.”
““That’s what’s so bizarre.”Henry begins to connect to Trey and relays the message he receives.”
““He comes through very very peaceful,” Henry says.”
““But he is making a very profound connection to your dad.”


"[Fraser Harrison / Getty pictures]
"So he's very satisfied with it." In the comments below, please leave what you know best about crisley
"According to us weekly, the best movie star Chris Lee knows is Todd's second wife. She appeared on the popular show Hollywood media and connected with her late brother from the great other side."
Julie's brother, Terri, committed suicide at the age of 25
"In the peek of the show, Tyler Henry, Hollywood's nominal media, established contact with Trey by feeling that he had been" electrocuted ". It turned out that this was an obscure reference to the last job Trey and their father Harvey did."
"Julie explained that one of her father's last moments with her brother was working on a lake, which nearly led to a serious power accident."
"No one will know that," she said in a confessional interview
"That's strange." Henry began to contact Trey to convey the message he had received
"He had a quiet time," Henry said
"But he has a deep relationship with your father."



Number  741
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are still married.””
“We understand that.”
“Duhon, 26, took to Twitter on Sunday, November 19, to announce that the couple, who met and married on season 5 of the Lifetime show, have separated … and claims it was not due to cheating.”
““Prior to any statements made about me, we were no longer living together and I already filed for divorce,” he wrote in response to Down’s November 5 tweet regarding his unfaithfulness.”
“His announcement continued, “This was known by both parties, my lawyer, and the lawyer for the show.”
“The reason that led me to file for divorce from Ms. Downs was thoroughly understood by all parties as well.”
“Infidelity was not a reason, nor did I ever admit such a thing.”
“Thank you to those of you who have shown support throughout this tough time Downs had alleged in her tweet earlier in the month that a woman had called her to say she was sleeping with her husband and that it was the same woman Duhon had called during their...”
“...honeymoon...”
“But Downs, 31, wouldn’t let him have the last word.”


"We're still married."
"We understand."
"Du Hong, 26, announced on twitter on Sunday, November 19 that the couple who met and married in the fifth season of life show have separated And claim it's not because of deception. "
"Before making any statement to me, we are no longer living together, and I have applied for divorce," he wrote in response to Tang's November 5 microblog about his infidelity
His statement went on, "it's known to both sides, my lawyer, and the lawyer for the show."
"The reasons for my divorce to Ms. downs are fully understood by all parties."
"Infidelity is not a reason, and I've never admitted it."
"Thanks to those of you who have been supportive during this difficult period, Downes tweeted earlier this month that a woman called her and said she was sleeping with her husband, which is exactly where duhong is
“… Honeymoon... "
"But Downes, 31, won't let him say the last word."



Number  742
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Chris has been dating actress Annabelle Wallis, 32, for the past 18 months, and enjoyed a brief romance with Hollywood leading lady Jennifer Lawrence, 26, in the summer of 2015.”
“Gwyneth has since moved on with Glee co-creator Brad Falchuk, 46, who she's been dating since 2014.”
“But even though they're no longer husband and wife, it seems friendly exes Gwyneth Paltrow, 44, and Chris Martin, 40, remain the best of friends.”
“Sharing a photo on her Instagram page, the actress and her former spouse joined forces for a day out with daughter Apple, 13, and son Moses, 11, at the Museum Of Ice Cream in Los Angeles on Sunday.”
“Scroll down for video Family affair Friendly exes Gwyneth Paltrow and Chris Martin enjoyed a day out with daughter Apple 13 and son Moses 11 at the Museum Of Ice Cream in Los Angeles on Sunday Celebrating both Apple s birthday and Mother s Day the family looked as though...”
“...they were having a blast on their day out at the museum billed as a place where flavours are mysteries and toppings are toys...”
“The Coldplay frontman looked to be enjoying the company of daughter Apple and son Moses along with beaming ex-wife Gwyneth.”
“The youngster was bearing a remarkable similarity to her actress mother, proving the apple doesn't fall too far from the tree.”
“Alongside the snap, Gwyneth wrote: 'Best Apple's birthday/Mother's Day EVER at the @museumoficecream @autumncomm SO FUN #goopgo #dtla.'”
“Mini me: The family were celebrating celebrating both Apple's birthday and Mother's Day as they enjoyed their day out at the museumApple was pictured in a pink hoodie with leopard print leggings and UGG boots.”


"Chris has been dating 32 year old actress Annabel Wallis for the past 18 months and had a brief romance with 26 year old Hollywood actress Jennifer Lawrence in the summer of 2015."
Gwyneth later dated Brad falchuk, a 46 year old co creator of glee, who has been dating since 2014
Although they are no longer husband and wife, former girlfriends Gwyneth Paltrow, 44, and Chris Martin, 40, are still best friends
The actress and her ex-wife shared a photo on instagram Sunday at the ice cream Museum in Los Angeles, spending a day out with their 13-year-old daughter apple and 11 year old son Moses
"Rolling down the video family friendly ex girlfriends Gwyneth Paltrow and Chris Martin enjoy a day with daughter Apple 13 and son Moses 11 at the ice cream Museum in Los Angeles on Sunday to celebrate Apple's birthday and mother's day the family looks like..."
“…… They spent a day in the museum, where the taste is mysterious and the ingredients are toys... "
"The leader of Coldplay seems to enjoy the company of his daughter apple and son Moses and his jubilant ex-wife Gwyneth."
"This young man has a striking resemblance to her actress's mother, proving that the apple doesn't fall too far from the tree."
"In addition to this snapshot, Gwyneth wrote:@ museumoficecream@autumncomm  SOM fun'goopgo'dtla is the best apple birthday / mother's Day ever. "
"Mini me: the family are celebrating Apple's birthday and mother's day because they had a wonderful day at the museum. In the photo, apple is wearing a Pink Hoodie, leopard leggings and ugg boots



Number  743
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The divorce news comes just as Jeremy, aka the "Hot Felon," and Chloe announced the birth of their son, Jayden, by posting a pic of him gripping their fingers.”
“The judge signed off Wednesday, but sources connected to the exes tell us their division of assets -- child support and custody agreement (they have a 9-year-old son) -- is still up in the air.”
“According to docs filed in L.A. County, Jeremy and Melissa are both officially single now.”
“The hits keep coming for Jeremy Meeks ... 9 days after his son with Chloe Green was born, he's hammered out his divorce from wife #1, Melissa.”
“He also owes $12,000 to Melissa's attorney, Lisa Bloom.”
“As we previously reported, Jeremy's been ordered to pay $1,000 per month in child support.”
“Melissa will keep the house and they both get to keep their vehicles.”
“Both have waived spousal support.”
“Melissa will have their son 70% of the time, and Jeremy will have him 30%.”
“Exclusive Details12:14 PM PT -- According to the divorce docs -- obtained by TMZ -- the couple will share joint legal custody ... she gets primary physical custody.”


The news of the divorce came as Jeremy, also known as "hot felon," and Chloe released photos of their son, Jaden, clasping his fingers, announcing the birth of their son
"The judge signed on Wednesday, but sources related to ex girlfriends told us that their distribution of assets - child care and custody agreement (they have a 9-year-old son) - is still up in the air."
"According to the Los Angeles County filing, Jeremy and Melissa are now single."
"Jeremy Meeks' hit songs keep popping up... He and Chloe green divorced his wife Melissa nine days after their son was born
"He still owes Melissa's lawyer Lisa bloom 12000 dollars."
"As we reported earlier, Jeremy was asked to pay $1000 a month for child support."
"Melissa will keep the house. They both have cars."
"Both sides have given up on alimony."
"Melissa will have their son 70% of the time and Jeremy will have him 30% of the time."
"Exclusive details 12:14 p.m. - according to the divorce documents obtained by TMZ - the couple will share common legal custody... She's got the main custody. "



Number  744
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But Margera was admittedly anxious about the pending arrival.”
“Related Video: Nicky Hilton Rothschild Welcomes Daughter Teddy MarilynSince announcing the pregnancy on Instagram, the dad-to-be spent the months leading up to the birth sharing photos of his wife’s growing belly.”
“According to the new dad, the couple also first met at the Phoenix Theater in Petaluma, California, where his brother Jess Margera‘s band CKY was performing at the time.”
““I said it and everybody liked it, so we stuck with that,” Margera explained to PEOPLE in September, adding that the moniker had “just kind of followed” them around.”
“The couple — who wed in 2013 in Reykjavik, Iceland — had already decided on their little one’s name long before he arrived.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Margera also shared a second photo of his famous father Phil visiting his new grandson.”
“Sharing a photo of the new mom snuggled up with her newborn in the hospital, Margera simply captioned the sweet shot with their baby boy’s name.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"But magra admits that he is anxious about the coming."
"Related video: Nicky Hilton Rothschild welcomes his daughter, Teddy Marilyn. Since announcing her pregnancy on instagram, the father to be has been sharing pictures of his wife's growing belly in the months before giving birth."
"According to the new dad, the couple also met for the first time at the Phoenix theater in Petaluma, California, where his brother Jesse magra's band CKY was performing."
"I said, everybody likes it, so we stick to it," magra explained to people in September, adding that the nickname "just follows" them a little bit
"The couple married in Reykjavik, Iceland, in 2013, and they decided on his name long before their youngest son arrived."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Magra also shared a second photo of his famous father Phil visiting his new grandson."
"To share a picture of a new mother nestling in a hospital with a newborn, marguera simply captioned the sweet picture with the name of their baby boy."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  745
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I wish I had reacted to their admiration of me by being a good example to them as a man and given them some guidance as a comedian, including because I admired their work.”
“And I’ve tried to learn from them.”
“At the time, I said to myself that what I did was O.K.”
“...because I never showed a woman my dick without asking first, which is also true.”
“But what I learned later in life, too late, is that when you have power over another person, asking them to look at your dick isn’t a question.”
“It’s a predicament for them.”
“The power I had over these women is that they admired me.”
“And I wielded that power irresponsibly.”
“I have been remorseful of my actions.”
“And run from them.”


"I wish I could respond to their admiration for me, set a good example for them as a man, and give them some guidance as a comedian, including because I appreciate their work."
"I try to learn from them."
"At that time, I said to myself that everything I did was OK."
“…… Because I've never shown my dick to a woman, and that's the truth
"But I learned too late that when you have power over another person, it's not a problem for them to see your penis."
"It's a dilemma for them."
"My power over these women is that they admire me."
"I used that power irresponsibly."
"I always regret my behavior."
"Run away from them."



Number  746
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rest up Smoke."”
“So much talent and so many stories we never get to see play out.”
“"I wish peace would wash over our city.”
“"All these gifts and blessed souls and inner lights being extinguished lately is devastating," Drake wrote via Instagram story on a photo of him and the late rapper.”
“...confirm that Smoke had died with their tributes on social media...”
“In the hours following the shooting several of Smoke Dawg s friends including Drake Mustafa the Poet and Nathan Miller the director of NORTHSIDE a documentary focused on Toronto s growing rap scene that featured the rapper all appeared to...”
“All three were rushed to the hospital, though one of the victims later died.”
“Local news outlet CP24 reports that three people, two men and a woman, were shot in broad daylight in an incident that quickly devolved into chaos outside of the Cube Nightclub in Toronto's Entertainment District.”
“He helped people wherever he could and will be remembered for his huge smile and glowing personality," the statement continues.”
“"As a young man from Regent Park, he overcame poverty and grew into a responsible, caring grown man who took care of his friends and family.”


"Take a break."
"So many talents and stories we'll never see."
"I hope peace will sweep our city."
Drake wrote in an instagram story photo of him and the late rapper: "all these gifts, blessed souls and inner lights have recently been extinguished, which is devastating."
“… Confirm that smoke's Memorial on social media is dead... "
"In the hours after the shooting, several friends of smoke dawg, including poet Drake Mustafa and director Nathan Miller of Northside, a documentary focusing on the growing rap scene in Toronto, with rappers as the protagonists, seemed to be..."
"All three were rushed to the hospital, but one of the victims later died."
"Cp24, a local news agency, reported that three people, two men and one woman, were shot dead in broad daylight, which quickly turned into chaos outside cube nightclub in Toronto's entertainment district."
"He helps people as much as he can, and his bright smile and brilliant personality will be remembered," the statement continued
"As a young man from Regent's Park, he overcame poverty and grew into a responsible and caring adult who took care of his friends and family."



Number  747
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 7 is currently averaging a 0.5 rating in adults 18-49 and 2.4 million viewers, down over 40% in the demo and over 20% in total viewers from Season 6.”
“The show also moved from its longtime Sunday night timeslot to Fridays, where it has suffered a noticeable ratings decline.”
“The seventh season was a creative reboot for the show, which lost core cast members like Morrison when their contracts ended after the sixth season.”
“ABC announced in February that “Once Upon a Time’s” seventh season would be the show’s last.”
“Previously, Tony Amendola, Lee Arenberg, JoAnna Garcia Swisher, Robbie Kay, Sean Maguire, Victoria Smurfit, Keegan Tracy, Beverley Elliott, and Jared Gilmore were all confirmed to appear in the final two episodes.”
“The four are the latest former cast members to book returns for the show’s finale.”
“Dallas starred as Prince Charming/David Nolan, and de Ravin played Belle/Lacey.”
“Morrison played Emma Swan in the series, while Goodwin played Snow White/Mary Margaret Blanchard.”
“All four of the actors departed the ABC fairy tale series after its sixth season.”
“Former “Once Upon a Time” stars Jennifer Morrison, Ginner Goodwin, Josh Dallas, and Emilie de Ravin have all been confirmed to return for the show’s final episode, which is set to air on May 18.”


"In the seventh season, the average audience rating among adults aged 18-49 is 0.5, with an audience of 2.4 million, a drop of more than 40% in the demonstration, and a drop of more than 20% in the total audience in the sixth season."
"The show has also shifted from the long-term Sunday evening period to Friday, and the audience rating has dropped significantly."
"The seventh season is the creative restart of the play. After the end of the sixth season, the contracts of core actors such as Morrison were terminated, and the play lost them."
ABC announced in February that the seventh season of the play will be its last
"Previously, Tony amundola, Lee Arenberg, Joanna Garcia Swisher, Robbie Kay, Sean Maguire, Victoria Smurfs, Keegan Tracy, Beverly Elliott and Jared Gilmore were confirmed in the last two episodes."
"These four are the latest batch of former actors to book a return for the play's ending."
"Dallas as as prince charming / David Nolan, delavin as bell / Lacey."
Morrison plays Emma Swan and Goodwin plays Snow White / Mary Margaret Blanchard
"After the sixth season of ABC Fairy Tale series, all four actors left."
Former "once upon a time" stars Jennifer Morrison, Gina Goodwin, Josh Dallas and Emily delavin have all confirmed that they will return to the final episode broadcast on May 18



Number  748
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“They’ve traveled to Miami, Italy, and Mexico together, packing on the PDA in each new location.”
“The 19-year-old model wore her heart on her phone case on Tuesday night while out with pal Lottie Moss in London, England.”
“Richie was photographed holding a clutch purse and her phone, which made quite the style statement.”
“Splash NewsOn the case is an epic throwback photo from 2010 of Richie’s boyfriend, Scott Disick, who sometimes jokingly goes by Lord Disick.”
“The image is of the 34-year-old reality star talking on the phone in New York City, and appears to be taken when the father of three was in his prime “Lord Disick” years.”
“MORE: Scott Disick Asks Kourtney Kardashian If They'll Get Married in Their '40sIn the pic, he’s wearing a plaid navy suit with a polka dot silk scarf, which he fashioned into a bold collar.”
“As for his hair, it's slicked back in a look of business entrepreneurial chic.”
“Splash NewsRichie and Disick haven't exactly been private about their new romance.”
“Meanwhile, Disick has been getting candid about life after his split from Kourtney Kardashian on Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"They went to Miami, Italy and Mexico together, and packed on a PDA at every new location."
On Tuesday night, the 19-year-old model printed a heart on her cellphone cover while she was out in London with her friend Lottie moss
"Ricky was photographed with a handbag and a mobile phone. It's very stylish."
"The splash Newson case is an epic retrospective photo of Ritchie's 2010 boyfriend Scott disc, who sometimes jokingly calls himself Lord disc."
This is a picture of the 34 year old reality TV star on the phone in New York City. It seems to have been taken when the father of three is in the prime of "Lord Dirk"
"More: Scott Disick asked Courtney Kardashian if they would marry at 40. In the photo, he is wearing a plaid navy suit with a dot silk scarf, which he made into a bold collar
"As for his hair, it's smooth back and looks very commercial."
"Splash news, Richie and disc are not completely secretive about their new relationship."
"At the same time, after breaking up with Courtney Kardashian, desik has been honest with life to keep up with Kardashian."



Number  749
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The takeaway: if set your curls like Shakira, just don’t forget to remove all the clips when you’re done!”
“Hey, at least the singer has a sense of humor about it.”
“In a LOL-worthy moment the singer posted a short video clip backstage mid-performance in which the glam duo is laughing because they’ve realized Shakira had an errant setting clip in her hair for the whole performance up to that point.”
“But with all of the curls and clips, sometimes things fall through the cracks.”
“We know this because Shakira snapped a video of her stylist extraordinaire showing off a peak into their pre-show ritual.”
“...with a small curling iron and individually amps up the coils for that iconic Shakira bodacious head of spirals that she can toss around while she performs during her El Dorado World Tour...”
“While it was an in process shot as Alvarez points out in her caption the colorful clips also provide a reference to Solange s iconic imagery with pins in her locks from her song Don t Touch My Hair Another secret once the curls have dried Alvarez goes back in...”
“The She Wolf took a snapshot of her golden coils drying with colored hair clips strategically placed down the length to perfectly set their pattern as they dry.”
“But now we have the secret to how she gets that enviably perfect curl pattern thanks to a handful of Instagram selfies shared on celebrity stylist Cynthia Alvarez’s feed.”
“And while the singer has oscillated between different tones of blonde throughout her career, she’s stayed true to her natural texture.”


"Takeout: if you curl up your hair like Shakira, don't forget to cut all the curls when you're done!"
"Hey, at least the singer has a sense of humor."
"At a moment worth laughing, the singer released a short video clip backstage, in which both fans were laughing because they realized that Shakira had a wrong set clip in her hair throughout the performance, until then."
"But with all the curls and clips, sometimes things fall through the cracks."
"We know this because Shakira made a video in which her stylist showed a peak in their pre show ceremony."
“… With a small curly iron and a single magnifying coil on the head of the iconic Shakira bodacious spiral, she can throw it around while she toured her world tour in Eldorado... "
"While it's a process of shooting Alvarez, the color clip in her title also provides a reference to sorange's iconic image with a needle in her hair from her song don't touch my hair another secret once curly hair dries back..."
"The female wolf took a picture. The golden hair circle in the picture is drying. The color of the hairpin is strategically put down along the length of the hairpin, so that the hairpin can put out its own pattern perfectly when it is drying."
"But now we have a secret about how she got the enviable perfect curly hair pattern thanks to a few instagram selfies shared in Celebrity Stylist Cynthia Alvarez's feed."
"Although the singer has been swinging between different blonde tones throughout her career, she has always maintained her natural quality."



Number  750
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch a sneak peek for the Total Bellas finale below:Total Bellas finale airs tonight at 9pm on E!”
“Her daddy, Daniel Bryan, has also been using social media to show the world he is completely besotted with his little girl.”
“Read More WWE Diva Nikki Bella calls IVF pregnancy rumors ridiculousLittle Birdie counts WWE stars as kin, including Auntie Nikki Bella and Uncle John Cena!”
“...family on May 9 2017 at 11 58pm weighing in at a healthy 8lb 10oz and measuring 21in long...”
“Brie later sang the praises of her doula Kelly Sunshine and even posted a separate video showing how supportive her husband and sister were in the 21 hour process to deliver Birdie The well documented happy moment came to fruition as Birdie Joe Danielson arrived to the delight of her...”
“Twin sister Nikki Bella also was by Brie’s side as the family awaited little Birdie.”
“Husband Daniel Bryan was there every minute of it.”
“Sign up for our TV newsletter!”
“Getting to the endgame was a tough and hard labor for the beautiful wrestling star who had her entire family there to help her through.”
“On tonight’s season finale of the Total Divas spin-off, the excitement and stress of Brie’s delivery is the main event.”


"Take a peek at Bella's ending: Bellas is broadcasting the last episode on channel e at 9 o'clock tonight!"
"Her father, Daniel Bryan, has also been using social media to show the world that he is totally fascinated by his little daughter."
Read more WWE days later Niki Bella said IVF pregnancy rumors funny little bird count WWE star's relatives, including aunt Niki Bella and Uncle John Senna
“… At 11:58 p.m. on May 9, 2017, my family weighed 8 pounds 10 ounces and was 21 inches long... "
"Bree later eulogized her dura Kelly sunshine and even released a separate video showing how supportive her husband and sister were of sending birds over the course of 21 hours. The well-documented moment of happiness finally came true, and Joe Danielson, the bird, came to her joy... "
"Twin sister Nicky Bella is with Bree, and the family is waiting for the birds."
"Husband Daniel Blaine is there all the time."
"Sign up for our TV news release!"
"It's hard work for this beautiful wrestling star to get to the finish line, and her family are there to help her through."
"At the end of the season, the excitement and pressure of Bree's delivery is the main event in tonight's total split



Number  751
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I always felt that I wanted to invest more.”
““Relationships are hard.”
“This is everything I know.”
“All you want to do is say, ‘Are you kidding me!?”
““When all that stuff was happening with Sex and the City, which I know is meaningless in the world, but when it’s happening and you’re caught up in any of the muscle of that stuff, it’s so painful because all you want to do is respond.”
“...the press but was told to remain quiet...”
“We ve been colleagues and in some way it s a very healthy place to be Image zoom Kim Cattrall Sarah Jessica Parker Cynthia Nixon and Kristin Davis Credit Craig Blankenhorn Warner Bros Courtesy Everett Collection As the story unfolded Parker said she wanted to speak out about it in...”
““We’ve never been friends,” Cattrall said.”
“...costars...”
“To be thought of as some kind of diva is absolutely ridiculous the 61 year old actress told Piers Morgan in October saying Parker who would have been a producer on the film could have been nicer Cattrall then admitted that she had never been close with the other three...”


"I always feel like I want to invest more."
"Relationships are hard."
"That's all I know."
"You just want to say," are you kidding? "
"When all these things happen in sex and cities, I know it's meaningless in the world, but when it happens, you're entangled in any muscle of these things, which is so painful, because all you want to do is respond."
“…… But the media was told to remain silent... "
"We've always been colleagues, and to a certain extent, it's a very healthy place to become an image zoomer, King Cattell Sarah Jessica paksinia Nixon and Christine Davis credit Craig bracken hornwarner Bros. courtesy of Everett's collection of stories unfolded, Parker said she wanted to say it out in..."
"We've never been friends," katlar said
“… Co actors... "
"Being considered a certain type of Diva is absolutely ridiculous. The 61 year old actress told pierce Morgan in October that Parker who was originally a producer of the film could be better cartel, and then admitted that she had never been close to the other three..."



Number  752
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If that wasn’t bad enough, the cable giant was accused of mishandling a tweet by “SportsCenter” anchor Jemele Hill, turning it into a national story that even prompted the White House to call for her firing.”
“Parent company Disney announced an ESPN-branded streaming service to stem the bleeding, but that won’t launch until next year.”
“A tone-deaf promo ahead of the show’s return didn’t help fans forget the controversy and hop back on board.”
“Then there was the ugly “Bachelor in Paradise” sex scandal, when Corinne Olympios called herself a “victim” after a sexual encounter with DeMario Jackson.”
“First up, Rachel Lindsay’s “Bachelorette” finale slipped double digits in ratings from the prior year’s version.”
“Also Read: Summer 2017 Movie Winners and Losers, From 'Spider-Man: Homecoming' to 'The House' (Photos)Loser: Every Rose Has Its Thorn(s)There was very little love surrounding the “Bachelor” franchise this summer.”
“Good luck, everyone else.”
“Plus, the Peacock’s got a killer combination coming up in 2018: Super Bowl LII and a little TV show called the Winter Olympics.”
“But don’t worry for NBC when the leaves change color: “This Is Us” will be back, and “Sunday Night Football” is set to again be the biggest show of the season.”
““Weekend Update: Summer Edition” was no slouch performer either and “American Ninja Warrior” stayed doing its thing.”


"If that's not bad enough, the cable giant has been accused of mishandling a tweet from sports center anchor jemele hill, turning it into a national story and even prompting the White House to demand her dismissal."
"Disney, the parent company, announced an ESPN branded streaming service to stop the bloodshed, but it won't be launched until next year."
"Before the return of the show, a propaganda film with a deaf voice can't help fans forget the controversy and come back on stage."
Then came the ugly "Bachelor of heaven" sex scandal, in which Corinne Olympus called herself a "victim" after having sex with demario Jackson
First of all, the ratings of Rachel Lindsay's "Bachelor" ending are down by double digits from last year
"Also read: winners and losers of summer films in 2017, from 'Spiderman: Homecoming Festival' to 'house' (photo) Losers: every rose has a thorn, and this summer's' Bachelor 'series has almost no love."
"Good luck to you all."
"In addition, peacock has another killer group in 2018: Super Bowl LII and a small TV show called Winter Olympics."
"But when the leaves change color, don't worry about NBC:" this is us will return, and Sunday night football will be the biggest show of the season again. "
"Weekend update: Summer Edition" is not a lazy performer, and "American Ninja Warrior" is still doing its own thing



Number  753
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So I don’t take it for granted.””
“So I’m very aware that I was blessed with that and it could have been something different.”
“On Thursday, June 28, the Dinero singer took to her Instagram Story to share a video of herself and her little girl riding in a car on their way to their business meeting.”
““It’s a very special day.”
“Me and Emme are off to our very first book publishers meeting for an idea Emme had for a book,” the actress told fans.”
“CLICK FOR GALLERYVIEW GALLERY Jennifer's daughter attended meetings for a possible book deal Photo: Insatgram/jloThe mom-of-two noted that her daughter had more than one meeting scheduled for the day to discuss her book idea.”
““We’re excited.”
“We have three meetings today,” she revealed, captioning the video: “Emme’s first meeting.”MORE: Jennifer Lopez and A-Rod's daughter show off dance moves on a boatJennifer also shared a picture of her little author holding a binder of her book titled Lord Help Me!”
“The proud mom added the hashtag "#lordhelpme."”
“While it's yet to be published, Emme's book already has cover art of a young girl kneeling down praying.”


"So I don't take it for granted."
"So I know, I'm lucky, it could be something different."
"On Thursday, June 28, the dinero singer shared a video on instagram, in which she and her little girl sit in a car and go to their business meeting."
"Today is special."
"Amy and I are going to our first book publishers Conference for an idea of Amy's book," the actress told fans
"Click on galleryview gallery. Photo of Jennifer's daughter attending a meeting on a possible book deal: insatgram / jloth's mother noticed that her daughter arranged more than one meeting to discuss her book ideas that day."
"We're excited."
"We have three meetings today," she revealed, adding a title to the video: "Amy's first meeting." More: Jennifer Lopez and A-Rod's daughter show dance moves on the boat, and Jennifer shares a photo of her little author holding a binder for a book called "God bless me!"
Proud mother added a label "lordhelpme"
"Although this book hasn't been published, Amy's book already has the cover art of a young girl kneeling and praying."



Number  754
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the end, everyone made it out unscathed, and these puppies got a few extra cuddles that day.”
“There’s no evidence that these dogs were harmed or mistreated — although, in the middle of a fashion show surrounded by people and bright lights, there was definitely the possibility for chaos.”
“She was working for the designer by walking in the show and followed directions by carrying the dog.”
“...false falsePeople are definitely making good points in these tweets, but Hadid was also just doing her job.”
“Twitter is already ripping her for it.”
“But right now, she’s getting all the heat.”
“To be totally fair, Hadid wasn’t the only one carrying a puppy down the runway — it was part of the designer’s vision for the show, and many of the other models hit the runway with puppies in tow.”
“This is especially the case since the designer does use real leather in his designs…which comes from other live animals.”
“However, people are wondering if puppies being used as accessories crosses a line somewhere.”
“Well, they were ridiculously adorable.”


"In the end, everyone came out safe and sound, and the dogs had a few more hugs that day."
"There's no evidence that these dogs have been hurt or abused - but there's definitely a risk of chaos in a fashion show surrounded by crowds and bright lights."
"She works for a designer, walking in the show, following the direction with her dog on her back."
“…… Fake people can certainly speak well on these tweets, but Hadid is just doing her job. "
"Twitter is already making fun of her for that."
"But now, she's under all the pressure."
"To be fair, Hadid is not the only one to take the dog to the catwalk - it's part of the designer's vision for the show, and many other models take the dog to the catwalk."
"This is particularly important because designers do use leather in their designs This kind of dermis comes from other living things. "
"However, people are wondering if it's a bit out of line for puppies to be used as accessories."
"Well, they are so cute."



Number  755
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yeah you know I did one thing right Starry eyes sparking up my darkest night Chorus Cause my baby s fit like a daydream Walking with his head down I m the one he s walking to So call it what you want yeah call it what you want to...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“He promised to play the song for me, but he never did.”
“I wanted us to have a friendly relationship.”
“I wanted to believe Kanye when he told me that I would love the song.”
“Of course I wanted to like the song.”
“You don't get to control someone's emotional response to being called 'that bitch' in front of the entire world.”
“It doesn't exist because it never happened.”
“Swift posted a Note after on her Instagram, where she wrote: "Where is the video of Kanye telling me he was going to call me 'that bitch' in his song?”
“I brought a knife to a gunfightThe gunfight is likely a reference to the Snapchat receipts Kim Kardashian posted of Swift and Kanye West discussing the lyric about her in "Famous".”


"Yes, you know I did one thing. The eyes of the stars inspired the chorus of my darkest night, because my child is like a daydream, walking with his head down. I'm the person he walks with, so you can call it whatever you want, and you can call it whatever you want..."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"He promised to play the song for me, but he never did."
"I hope we have a friendly relationship."
"When Kanye told me that I would love this song, I wanted to believe him."
"Of course I want to like this song."
"You can't control a person's emotional reaction to being called 'that bitch' in front of the world."
"It doesn't exist because it never happened."
Swift posted a note on her instagram saying, "where's the video Kanye told me he was going to call me 'that bitch' in the song?"
"I brought a knife in the gunfight. The shootout was probably a snapchat receipt from Kim Kardashian in celebrity about swift and Kanye West discussing her lyrics. "



Number  756
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The other two shades have been entirely sold out by 11:40 a.m.”
“I showed him my Instagram yesterday and we were looking at the product shots and all of the campaign shots and he was just so excited Kim was positively glowing when she revealed the new details about her recent double headed birthday trip to the Bahamas and Japan for her...”
“She talked about all makeup related things at the beauty brand’s launch party.”
“While the queen of contour may credit his stylish husband Kanye West with her fashion makeover, she maintains that her man knows to stay away from her makeup line and he leaves all decisions to her.”
“Kim was asked if the creative genius helps her with her makeup line and she made it very clear that he doesn’t do this.”
“‘No.”
“That’s totally an area he doesn’t know much about.”
“But he’s so proud of me.’Despite not knowing a lot about lipsticks, bronzers, and concealers, Kim said that her husband couldn’t be more supportive of her new endeavor.”
“...husband s 40th anniversary...”
“The medium was the first shade to go; then the light was the next favorite shade.”


"The other two colors were all sold out by 11:40 a.m."
"I showed him my instagram yesterday. We were looking at the product photos and all the campaign photos. He was very excited. When Kim revealed the new details of her recent double headed birthday trip to the Bahamas and Japan, she was full of anger..."
"She talked about everything about cosmetics at the launch of the beauty brand."
"While the silhouette queen may praise the fashion transformation of her fashionable husband Kanye West, she insists that her man knows to stay away from her make-up line and he leaves all the decisions to her."
"Kim was asked if the creative genius could help her with her make-up, and she made it very clear that he would not."
"No
"That's a whole area he doesn't know much about."
"But he's proud of me." Despite little knowledge of lipsticks, bronzes and concealers, Kim said her husband was very supportive of her new attempt.
“… My husband's 40th Anniversary... "
"The medium is the first shadow to go, and then the second favorite shadow."



Number  757
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kym's also found a way to incorporate her twins into her at-home workouts when she can't make it to the studio or a gym.”
“A little bit of dance cardio, nothing too crazy... and some Pilates to engage that core again."”
“"Being a mom, I have such a different respect for moms now, it's unbelievable," she continued.”
“It's those funny things that happen and you've got to keep a good sense of humor with having babies."”
“I'd sprung a leak in my boob and I had no idea and he was laughing at me.”
“In the beginning, I remember walking down the stairs to see Robert and it was crazy [in the house].”
“She said, 'You have to have a sense of humor,' and she's right.”
“My mom gave me great advice.”
“"My girlfriends tell me that you feel like you get into the groove of one thing, and then another stage happens.”
“It takes a while," she confessed, telling ET that her mother and friends have also been a big help.”


"Kym also found a way to include her twins in her home exercise when she can't go to the studio or gym."
"A little bit of aerobics, nothing crazy... There are also some Pilates that come in contact with the core again
"As a mother, I can't believe that I now have such a different respect for my mother," she continued
"It's these funny things that happen, and you have to have a good sense of humor about having children."
"My chest suddenly leaks. I don't know. He's laughing at me."
"At first, I remember walking down the stairs to see Robert. It was crazy."
"She said, 'you have to have a sense of humor,' and she was right."
"My mother gave me good advice."
"My girlfriend told me that you feel like you're at the top of one thing, and then you're at another stage."
"It's going to take a while," she confessed, telling et that her mother and friends also helped a lot



Number  758
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In his statement to PEOPLE, Ayers maintained he had been diagnosed with stage 3 non-Hodgkin lymphoma in 2013.”
“Image zoom Brooks Ayers and Vicki Gunvalson | Credit: Amanda Edwards/GettyThe revelation came after some of Gunvalson’s RHOC costars called his diagosis into question, fracturing their friendhsip with her.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“I pride myself in apologizing when I am wrong or have wronged others either intentionally or unintentionally,” Ayers told PEOPLE in 2016.”
““I have made my share of mistakes which I regret.”
“Ayers, who appeared on RHOC for four years and previously dated housewife Vicki Gunvalson, caused a stir in 2015 when he admitted he had forged medical records relating to his alleged cancer diagnosis, making it seem like he had been a patient at cancer hospital City of Hope.”
“Groves also appeared to share a sweet snap from their wedding day on her Facebook account.”
“According to E!, the couple met about a year and a half ago and will be moving from Indiana to Mississippi, where Ayers is originally from, to live closer to his family.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"In a statement to people, Ayers insisted that he was diagnosed with stage 3 non Hodgkin's lymphoma in 2013."
"Image zooming Brooks Ayers and Wiki gonwason | image source: Amanda Edwards / Getty this was revealed after some of gonwason's RhoC co stars questioned his diagnosis and interrupted their friendship with her."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"I'm proud of myself for apologizing when I've wronged someone, intentionally or unintentionally," Ayers told people in 2016
"I made my share of regretful mistakes."
"Ayers appeared on RhoC for four years. Before that, he dated his housewife Vicky gonwason. In 2015, he admitted that he had forged medical records related to his so-called cancer diagnosis, which made people feel like he was a patient at the city of hope cancer hospital and caused a big stir."
"Groves also seems to have shared the sweet moments of the wedding day on her Facebook account."
"According to e! The couple met about a year and a half ago and will move from Indiana to Mississippi, where Ayers comes from, and live closer to his family
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  759
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:All the Best Looks From the 2018 Met Gala After-PartiesSelena Gomez's 2018 Met Gala Look Featured a Hidden MessageBlake Lively's Met Gala Dress Took Over 600 Hours to Make...”
“And she's made me a more empathetic person."”
“More specifically, she carried them with her: Lively had a Judith Leiber clutch custom-made with the Reynolds family crest.”
“If you look closely, you'll see that Lively's rhinestone-embellished handbag has intricate scenes depicted on either side.”
“On the front it s classic sacred heart iconography behind a veiled woman in keeping with the theme of this year s Costume Institute exhibit Heavenly Bodies Fashion and the Catholic Imagination on the other there s a riff on a medieval family crest which at the very center of...”
“...a scroll reads Reynolds...”
“Here's a close-up of both sides of Lively's clutch.”
“Courtesy of Judith Leiber Courtesy of Judith Leiber The Reynolds crest is in the shape of a cross and on each of the four points there s a jewel with a letter in the middle B R J and I the first initials of each member of the Reynolds Lively...”
“...family...”
“Does this count as James and Ines's first Met Gala appearance?”


"Related story: the best look of 2018 metropolitan grand ceremony after all parties Lena Gomez's 2018 metropolitan grand ceremony look contains a hidden message. Blake Lively's Metropolitan grand ceremony dress took more than 600 hours to make..."
"She made me a more compassionate person."
"More specifically, she carries it with her: lively has a clutch with Judith Leiber's custom-made Reynolds family badge."
"If you look closely, you'll find that lively's Rhinestone decorated handbag depicts intricate scenes on both sides."
"On the front is a classic portrait of the sacred heart, and on the back is a veiled woman, which is in line with the theme of this year's fashion academy exhibition, celestial fashion and Catholic imagination. On the other hand, the horizontal pattern on the medieval family badge is located in It's the center of the world. "
“… The scroll says, "Reynolds..."
"This is a close-up of both sides of the lively clutch."
"The courtesy of Judith Leber the courtesy of Judith Leber the Reynolds badge is in the shape of a cross, with a gem on each of the four badges and a letter B R J and I in the middle. The initials of each member of the Reynolds badge..."
“… Family... "
"Is this the first time James and ines have appeared at a blind date party?"



Number  760
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But if you need a break from the current news cycle of back-to-back hurricanes, the possible threat of a nuclear stare down, and the proposed end of DACA, then peruse Nicki Minaj and John Mayer’s respective Twitter feeds for a break from reality.”
“...fake marriage proposals courtesy of Drake and DJ Khaled...”
“Mayer is no slouch in that department either as Taylor Swift added him to her pantheon of jilted ex boyfriend songs with 2010 s Dear John Celebrities making googly eyes at each other via Twitter isn t exactly groundbreaking given that Nicki has been on the receiving end of two...”
“— John Mayer (@JohnMayer) September 8, 2017Thanks to Safaree Samuels and Meek Mill, even non-Nicki fans probably know more about Nicki Minaj’s love life than they care to publicly admit.”
“This isn't my reply yet.”
“This isn’t my reply yet.”Please hold, losing my shit.”
“Such activity would usually provide an opportunity for some hyperbole about the internet collectively “losing it,” but Mayer already took care of that for everyone by further replying, “Please hold, losing my shit.”
“...https://t.co/jKpRdnhzbD — NICKI MINAJ (@NICKIMINAJ) September 8, 2017And then two fan bases queued up their “pair of eyeballs” emojis to weigh in on the matter.”
“— John Mayer (@JohnMayer) September 8, 2017The object of his Twitter affection quickly replied with a pun based on one of Mayer’s more popular hits, replying, “Would my body be your wonderland?”Would my body be your wonderland?”
“Friday, Mayer randomly tweeted, “I spend an inordinate amount of time per day wondering if Nicki Minaj would like me or not.”I spend an inordinate amount of time per day wondering if Nicki Minaj would like me or not.”


"But if you need to get out of the current cycle of hurricanes, the threat of nuclear explosions, and the end of the Dhaka project, read Nicky Minagi and John Mayer's Twitter feeds carefully to get out of reality."
“… Fake marriage advice from Drake and DJ Khalid... "
"Mayer is not listless in this department. Taylor Swift added Mayer to the pantheon of her abandoned ex boyfriend, and celebrities in 2010's" Dear John "glared at each other through Twitter. This is not entirely groundbreaking, because Nicky has always been the receiving end of the two songs..."
"- John Mayer (@ John Mayer) on September 8, 2017, thanks to safaree Samuels and meek mill, even non Nicki fans may know more about Nicki Minaj's love life than they are willing to admit publicly."
"That's not my answer yet."
"That's not my answer." Just a moment, please. I lost my stool
"This kind of activity usually provides an opportunity for some exaggerations to say that the internet collective" loses it ", but Mayer has solved this problem for everyone, and he further replied," please wait a minute, lose my shit. "
“... https://t.co/jKpRdnhzbD-NICKI  Minaj (@ nickiminaj) on September 8, 2017, then two fans lined up their "pair of eyeballs" emoticons to weigh the matter
——John Mayer (@ John Mayer) on September 8, 2017, his twitter favorite quickly replied with a pun: "will my body be your fairyland? "Will my body be your fairyland?"
On Friday, Mayer tweeted randomly: "I spend a lot of time every day wondering if Nicky Minaj likes me." I spend a lot of time every day wondering if Nicky Minaj likes me



Number  761
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'”The good news for Vivi is that she does have a close female playmate in Jessie’s niece: Brooklyn Rae, the 10-week-old daughter of Jessie’s sister Sydney Rae Bass.”
“Grimacing at being caught, Bubby stood in front of his family’s coffee table with a present half unwrapped.”
“Jessie James Decker‘s 2-year-old son, Eric “Bubby” Jr, could not wait until Christmas morning to open his gifts, with his mom catching the toddler red-handed.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In two adorably hilarious Instagram posts, the singer, 29, shared her son’s pout at being discovered opening gifts early while sitting next to their Christmas tree.”
““Caught Bubby for the 5th time trying to open presents after he already snuck and opened one already.”
“He teared up and gave me the lip ,” she wrote in the caption.”
“A few minutes later, Bubby decided to try his luck again, but without much success as his mother took another photograph as evidence.”
““Caught!”
“Jesus, I want a baby sister.”


"The good news for Vivian is that she does have a close playmate with Jesse's niece: Brooklyn ray, the 10 week old daughter of Jesse's sister Sydney ray bass."
Bubby stood in front of the coffee table at home, with an expression of being caught and a half open gift in his hand
Jesse James Decker's 2-year-old son Eric booby Jr. couldn't wait to open the gift when his mother caught the toddler on the spot
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In two cute and funny posts on instagram, the 29 year old singer shared her son's pouting when he was found sitting next to a Christmas tree and opening a gift ahead of time
"After Bubby had secretly opened the gift, he tried to open it for the fifth time."
"He was in tears and gave me lips," she wrote in the title
A few minutes later, Bubby decided to try his luck again, but failed because his mother took another picture as evidence
"Caught!"
"God, I want a little sister."



Number  762
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...of the Year edit Single of the Year edit Best New Hip Hop Artist edit Hustler of the Year edit Made You Look Award Best Hip Hop Style edit Best Mixtape edit Sweet 16 Best Featured Verse edit Impact Track edit I Am Hip Hop Icon edit...”
“Mix 3 by Erykah Badu Nominations and Winners edit Winners highlighted in Bold Best Hip Hop Video edit Best Collabo Duo or Group edit Hot Ticket Performer edit Lyricist of the Year edit Video Director of the Year edit DJ of the Year edit Producer of the Year edit MVP”
“Cyphers [ edit ]Beat and mix by DJ Mustard.”
“[3] XXXTentacion's mother accepted his award on his behalf since he had been murdered months beforehand.”
“XXXTentacion was the winner of Best Hip Hop New Artist.”
“Jay-Z and Beyoncé followed with three awards, including Album of the Year and Song of the Year.”
“[2]Cardi B was the biggest winner with four awards, including MVP of the Years and Hustler of the Year.”
“Under them Childish Gambino received six nomination, Travis Scott and Kendrick Lamar tied for five nominations, and Jay-Z (credited also as "The Carters" with Beyoncé in Album of the Year, Best Collabo, Duo or Group and Song of the Year categories) with four nominations.”
“[1]Drake led the BET Hip-Hop Awards 2018 with eleven nominations, followed by Cardi B with ten.”
“The nominations were announced on September 9, 2018.”


“… Best editor of the year best single editor of the year best new hip hop singer editor of the year best liar editor makes you look like the best hip hop style editor of the year best mix editor Sweet 16 best feature verse editor impact track editor I'm hip hop idol editor... "
"Mix 3 nominated by Erykah Badu and edited by winners best hip hop video editor best co OP duet or group editor hot ticket performance editor lyrics editor video director editor DJ editor MVP of the year"
"Cyphers [editor] stirred by DJ mustard."
"[3] xxxentacion's mother accepted the prize on his behalf because he was murdered a few months ago."
"Xxxentacion is the winner of the best hip hop Rookie Award."
"Jay-Z and Beyonce then won three awards, including album of the year and song of the year."
"Katie B is the biggest winner, winning four awards, including MVP of the year and swindler of the year."
"Under their leadership, the boyish Gambino won six nominations, Travis Scott and Kendrick Lamar tied for five, and Jay-Z (also known as" cartel "in album of the year, best collaborator, duet or group and song of the year categories with Beyonce) won four."
"[1] Drake led the 2018 best hip hop awards with 11 nominations, followed by caddy B with 10 nominations."
"The nomination was announced on 9 September 2018."



Number  763
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Me Do...”
“Imagine Dragon s Thunder Khalid s Young Dumb and Broke Bruno Mars and Cardi B s Finesse Remix Ed Sheeran s Shape of You Shawn Mendes There s Nothing Holdin Me Back and Taylor Swift s Look What You Made...”
“"I'm keeping my role super simple," Clarkson added of her hosting duties tonight, before she broke out into a medley of songs -- Maren Morris' "My Church," Sam Smith's "Too Good at Goodbyes," Kendrick Lamar's "HUMBLE.”
“I love all of these artists," she said.”
“"I'm a big fan.”
“After her tearful tribute to the victims of the Santa Fe school shooting, Kelly Clarkson performed a delightful tribute of Billboard Hot 100 hits during her monologue at the Billboard Music Awards.”


"I'd like to..."
"Imagine the dragon's thunder, Khalid's young mute and broken Bruno Mars and caddy B's clever remix, ed Sheeran's shape. What's the matter with you, Sean Mendes? I'll come back and see what you've done with Taylor Swift..."
"My role is very simple," Clarkson added of tonight's hosting, and then she suddenly sang a set of Songs - Marlon Morris's my church, Sam Smith's too good at saying goodbye, Kendrick Lamar's humility
"I like all these artists," she said
"I'm a big fan."
After paying a tearful tribute to the victims of the Santa Fe school shooting, Kelly Clarkson paid a pleasant tribute to "100 billboard hits" in the monologue of "Billboard Music Awards"



Number  764
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the reading, below.”
“On his reading with Kardashian, he tactfully said: "Well, I saw some relationship issues."”
“Earlier this week, Henry appeared on the Zach Sang Show.”
“Henry predicted that travel might come between the then-new couple; and indeed, rumors indicate that Thompson may have cheated on Kardashian while on the road in New York City, Washington D.C., and Boston.”
“Awkward.”
“At the time, Kardashian was dating Tristan Thompson, who — in case you missed it — is now rumored to have cheated on her with multiple women while she was pregnant.”
“"Do you not see anything about my current boyfriend?"”
“"You keep saying my 'next boyfriend,'" Khloe noted.”
“...show that was filmed months ago, Kardashian sat down with her go-to psychic, who kept mentioning her next beau.”
“In an episode of the E!”


"Look at the readings below."
When he was reading with Kardashian, he said euphemistically, "well, I see some relationship problems."
"Earlier this week, Henry appeared on zachsan's show."
Henry predicted that the trip might take place between the newlyweds; in fact, there were rumors that Thompson might have cheated Kardashian on his way to New York, Washington and Boston
"Awkward."
"At the time, Kardashian was dating Tristan Thompson, and if you miss it, there are now rumors that Tristan Thompson was cheating on several women during her pregnancy."
"Don't you see anything about my boyfriend now?"
"You've been talking about my 'next boyfriend'," Khloe said
"The show was shot a few months ago, and Kardashian sat down with her to watch psychic media, which kept mentioning her next boyfriend."
"In an episode of E!"



Number  765
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was a learning process for everyone to not only get inside my head, but for me to also communicate how I make decisions.”
“Going from the film to the show, how did you work with others?”
“If you’re a black person of a certain age, you’ve absolutely been to that viewing party.”
“I call them kitchen-sink entertainment because they give you every possible thing that could possibly happen.”
“Shonda [Rhimes] knows what they are.”
“Honestly, I think her shows are great.”
“I think a good place to start is: How do you feel about Scandal?”
“In the first episode, the main characters gather to watch Defamation, a Scandal parody.”
“Tune in to Good One every Monday on iTunes, or wherever you get your podcasts.”
“Listen to the episode and read an edited transcript of our discussion below.”


"For everyone, it's a learning process, not only going deep into my mind, but also allowing me to communicate how I make decisions."
"How do you work with people, from movies to performances?"
"If you're black at some age, you've definitely been to that party."
"I call them kitchen sink entertainment because they give you everything that can happen."
"Shonda [Rhimes] knows what they are."
"To be honest, I think her show is great."
"I think a good start is: what do you think of the scandal?"
"In the first episode, the protagonists get together to watch slander, an imitation of a scandal."
"Every Monday, you can listen to good programs on iTunes, or anywhere you receive podcasts."
"Listen to this episode and read the edited transcript we're talking about below."



Number  766
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Barr along with Goodman, Gilbert, Laurie Metcalf, Lecy Goranson, Michael Fishman and Sarah Chalke reprise their roles in the revival.”
“The assumed death of Goodman’s character was a shock to fans at the time of the series finale as Barr also revealed that her character was writing her own life story all along since season 1.”
“RELATED VIDEO: How ‘Roseanne’ Went from a Reunion to a Revival!”
“Image zoom Sara Gilbert and John Goodman | Credit: EverettDan’s fate was also previously teased in February when ABC released sneak peek clips of the reboot.”
“Image zoom Roseanne Barr and John GoodmanAfter addressing the unanswered question in the first few minutes, the storyline continued with the introduction of Sara Gilbert’s character Darlene, who has moved back into her childhood home with her gender-fluid child Mark, 9, and 14-year-old daughter Harris.”
“I thought maybe you moved on,” Roseanne quipped.”
““You looked happy.”
“Why does everybody always think I’m dead?” Dan told her, referencing the serious heart attack he suffered at the end of the series finale.”
““What happened?” he said as his wife joked, “I thought you were dead!”“I’m sleeping!”
“The hour-long premiere opened with Dan startled awake by Roseanne as he removed a sleep apnea mask from his face.”


Barr and Goodman, Gilbert, Laurie Metcalf, Lacey glanson, Michael fishman and Sarah chuck play their roles again in the Renaissance
"Assuming Goodman's character dies is a shock to fans when the series ends, Barr also revealed that her character is writing her own life story all the time since the first season."
"Related video: how Rosanna went from Reunion to Renaissance!"
"Picture zooming Sarah Gilbert and John Goodman credit: Everett Dan's fate was also teased in February when ABC released a restart peep clip."
"Image zooming after Rosanna Barr and John Goodman answer this unanswered question in the first few minutes, the story continues to introduce Sarah Gilbert's character Darlene, who moves back to her childhood home with her 9-year-old, mark, and 14-year-old daughter, Harris."
"I think maybe you're gone," joked Rosanne
"You look happy."
"Why do people think I'm dead? "Dan told her about the serious heart attack he suffered at the end of the show."
"What's the matter? His wife joked, "I thought you were dead! "I'm asleep!"
"At the beginning of the hour long premiere, Dan took off a sleep apnea mask from his face and was awakened by Rosanna."



Number  767
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“9.”
“The original cut of Finding Nemo was more ambiguous about Gill’s integrity, however, making him the owner of a falsified identity that he swiped from a nautical-themed children’s book housed in the dentist’s waiting room.”
“...while enrolling in scuba diving classes...”
“Disney Pixar In order to get the look and the feel of Finding Nemo s characters and world just right Pixar s in house art team was required to take courses and audit lectures in marine biology oceanography and ichthyology...”
“THE MOVIE’S ART TEAM WENT THROUGH MARINE TRAINING PRIOR TO PRODUCTION.”
“4.”
““You had me at ‘fish.’” That is precisely what Pixar’s chief creative officer told Stanton following his exhaustive pitch for his passion project.”
“IT TOOK ONLY ONE WORD TO GET THE GREEN LIGHT FOR FINDING NEMO.”
“3.”
“Stanton already had a script completed before this second step took place, the only Pixar project to proceed in this manner.”


“9.”
"However, the original book in search of NEMO was more ambiguous about Jill's integrity, making him the owner of a fake identity he stole from a children's book on sailing in the dentist's waiting room."
“… When taking a diving course... "
"In order to find Nemo's role and the right look and feel of the world, Pixar's in-house art team is required to attend courses and audit lectures on marine biology, oceanography and ichthyology..."
"The film's art team received sea training before production."
“4.”
"You let me go to fish." That's what Pixar's chief creative officer told Stanton after he did a detailed promotion of his passion project
"It took only one word to give the green light to find Nemo."
“3.”
"Stanton has completed a script before the second step, which is the only project Pixar has done in this way."



Number  768
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Three days, people — get hype!”
“But at the end of the day, it doesn't really matter who walks Meghan down that aisle, as long as she ends up standing next to Prince Harry when she gets to the end of it.”
“"There's certainly precedence dating back to Queen Victoria's reign."”
“"So if Meghan Markle does make the decision to have her mother give her away," she explained.”
“Queen Victoria then did the same for her daughters, Princess Helena and Princess Beatrice on their wedding days.”
“...that when Queen Victoria married Prince Albert in 1840, she was given away by her paternal uncle Prince Augustus Frederick, the Duke of Sussex.”
“Harris told E!”
“Meanwhile, Markle wouldn't be the first bride at a royal wedding to make a trip down the aisle on the arm of someone other than her dad.”
“...the dude who plays her husband on Suits — because OMG how amazing would that be?”
“Now I'm just hoping she taps Patrick J. Adams — a.k.a.”


"Three days, people - get hyped!"
"But at the end of the day, it doesn't matter who takes Megan down that aisle, as long as she's standing next to Prince Harry at the end."
"There must have been priority under Queen Victoria."
"So if Megan markel really decides to let her mother send her away," she explains
Queen Victoria did the same at the wedding of her daughters, Princess Helena and Princess Beatrice
“…… When Queen Victoria married Prince Albert in 1840, she was given to her by her uncle, Prince Augustus Frederick, Duke of Sussex. "
"Harris told me!"
"At the same time, markel won't be the first bride to walk through the aisle on the arm of someone other than her father at a royal wedding."
“… The guy in the suit who plays the husband - God, how amazing is that? "
"Now I just hope she can photograph Patrick J. Adams - that is to say."



Number  769
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They were also seen on a family trip to a Broadway show last month.”
“In the meantime, they have continued to co-parent their kids and earlier this year spent Easter weekend together with them in Hawaii, where Affleck was shooting his new movie Triple Frontier.”
“...settle privately...”
“They continue to figure out ways of working together as a family and this is what works for them Image zoom Jennifer Garner and Ben Affleck in 2013 Credit Jason Merritt Getty Since filing the former couple have been in mediation with leading L A divorce lawyer Laura Wasser to...”
“However, a source told PEOPLE at the time, “there is no rush here.”
“...for Third Time as Visibly Upset Jennifer Garner Drives Him to Treatment In early August an L A court advised Garner and Affleck that their divorce case could be dismissed for delay in prosecution if they fail to proceed and provide necessary documents...”
“Her number one concern is the kids the source said noting that Garner struggles with questions like Is Ben healthy enough to have custody Added the source What she ultimately cares about is his sobriety and whether she can rely on him to co parent WATCH Ben Affleck Enters Rehab...”
“...their divorce would affect their three children Violet 12 Seraphina 9 and Samuel 6”
“Another source close to the couple says the two are still working on the divorce They ve spent quite some time figuring out what works best for them and their family A source told PEOPLE in the days before the rehab trip that Garner was mostly concerned about how finalizing...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"They also took part in a family trip on Broadway last month."
At the same time, they continued to raise their children together, and earlier this year they spent the Easter weekend together in Hawaii, where Affleck filmed his new film triple borders
“… In private... "
"They continue to find ways to work together like their families, which works for them. Photos of Jennifer Garner and Ben Affleck in 2013. Jason Merritt Getty said the former couple had been mediating with a divorce lawyer, Laura Wasser, since filing their divorce application.... "
However, a source told people at the time, "there's no hurry here."
“…… At the beginning of August, Jennifer Garner drove him to treatment for the third time. The Los Angeles court informed Garner and Affleck that if they could not continue and provide the necessary documents, their divorce case might be rejected because of the delay in prosecution... "
"She is most concerned about the children, the source said, Ghana's struggling problems, such as whether Ben is healthy enough to have custody, added that the source's ultimate concern is his soberness, whether she can rely on his co parents to watch Ben Affleck enter the rehab center..."
"Their divorce will affect their three children violet 12, Seraphina 9 and Samuel 6"
"Another source close to the couple said that they are still dealing with the divorce. They have spent quite a long time trying to find out what is most suitable for them and their families. A source told people a few days before the rehabilitation trip that Ghana is most concerned about how to finalize it..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  770
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Jared and my sister [Lauren Iaconetti] kind of worked together on putting it together.””
“My parents are apparently really good actors, so is my sister, so are Jade [Roper] and Tanner [Tolbert], it’s like all very crazy.”
“Ashley Iaconetti and Jared Haibon are considering exchanging vows in a televised ceremony, but they have one condition.”
“I think we re both down for it but our caveat is that we want as many guests as we want and we don t want to have to be limited to that Iaconetti 30 explained on the Monday June...”
“25 episode of her and Ben Higgins Almost Famous podcast...”
“So if we couldn t have it the way we imagined that s the only reason we wouldn t do it We want it we want it Iaconetti also revealed details about the day Haibon 29 proposed to her and...”
“...admitted that her fiancé didn t seem nervous at all when getting down on one knee...”
““I had an inkling, I was, like, 50-50.”
“I thought it was going to happen for a couple weeks leading up to it, and then the week of, everyone was throwing me off,” the Bachelor Winter Games alum recalled.”
““So I knew that Jared would ask my dad, he always said he would ask my dad.”


"Jared and my sister (Lauren aconetti) worked together to put it together."
"My parents are obviously very good actors, so are my sister, so are Jed (Roper) and Tanner (Talbot), and everything is crazy."
"Ashley yakonetti and Jared hayburn are considering exchanging vows at a live TV ceremony, but they have one condition."
"I think we're all disappointed, but we have to pay attention that we want as many guests as we want, and we don't want to be limited to Monday, June 30, as explained..."
"25 episodes of her and Ben Higgins almost famous podcasts..."
"So, if we can't have it the way we think, that's the only reason why we don't do it. We want it, we want it. Yakonetti also revealed the details of the day Haibang proposed to her on the 29th, and..."
“…… Admit that her fiance is not nervous when he kneels down on one knee... "
"I have a clue. I'm about 50 to 50."
"I thought it was going to happen for a few weeks, and then in the week of, everyone dumped me," the bachelor Winter Games alumni recalled
"So I knew Jared would ask my dad. He always said he would ask my dad."



Number  771
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it's wonderful."”
“"It's such a luxury to have that because not everybody has that kind of relationship especially not with their co-workers.”
“"We care for each other, we root for each other and we're there for each other in any way and every way," Chrissy explained.”
“...much more than co workers...”
“Regardless of if she wins or loses Chrissy admitted to feeling so happy and like a little princess thanks to her custom Lila Rose gown She also has the support of her Emmy nominated co stars who have become so...”
“I was thinking about moving back home, didn't think I could hack it after 12 years, didn't think it was in the cards for me, and then voila, the universe is like just kidding.”
“"I was really struggling.”
“News' Jason Kennedy.”
“...way home because you probably didn t book the job it s really really cool she explained to E”
“When you ve been struggling to do what you ve wanted to do for so long and then you see yourself 10 feet tall on a building that you passed by after an audition when you were crying on your...”


"Great."
"It's a luxury to have such a relationship, because not everyone has such a relationship, especially with colleagues."
"We care for each other, we take root for each other, we exist for each other in any way and in any way," Chris explained
“…… Much more than colleagues.... "
"Whether she wins or loses, Chris admits that because of her custom Lila rose dress, she feels so happy, like a little princess, she also gets the support of the Emmy nominated co stars, and they become so..."
"I was thinking about moving home. I didn't expect that I could crack it 12 years later. I didn't expect that it was possible for me. Then look, the universe is like a joke."
"I'm really struggling."
"Jason Kennedy news"
"On the way home, because you may not have a job, it's really cool," she explained to E
"When you've been trying to do what you want to do, and then you see yourself on a 10 foot building, you go through an audition, and when you cry your..."



Number  772
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At lunch a few hours later, over bowls of sea salt-dusted edamame and blistered shishito peppers, Nikki and Brie seem wholly unaffected by the fact that everyone else around us is literally staring at them.”
“Even their coffee orders are unfussy: just black, with some cinnamon if you have it.”
“Or maybe it was an episode of the network’s hit spinoff series, Total Bellas, which also ranks among the top ten primetime cable programs for women ages 18-49, according to the network, and is filming its fourth season now.”
“(The series just returned for its eighth season last month, currently ranking as one of Wednesday night’s top ten original primetime programs for women ages 18-34, per E!.)”
“...reality show Total Divas, which follows the professional and personal lives of the twins and the other wrestlers in the Women's Division of WWE.”
“Then you’ve probably caught an episode of the popular E!”
“No?”
“John Francis/Instagram.”
“...a mischievous grin before simultaneously flipping over the top rope their Kardashian length hair trailing behind them...”
“Chances are you ve seen them on TV in the middle of an arena under the glow of stoplight red colored lights Nikki probably sporting a bright red bra top with the words Fearless Nikki emblazoned across the front and Brie in a black crop top reading BRIE MODE sharing...”


"For lunch a few hours later, on bowls of soy beans sprinkled with sea salt and pickled Shishi peppers, Nikki and Brie didn't seem to be affected by everyone around them staring at them."
"They don't even like the coffee they ordered: just black, if any, with cinnamon."
"It may also be an episode of the popular derivative drama total Bellas. According to the statistics of the network, the play is also among the top ten prime time cable TV programs for women aged 18-49, and is currently filming the fourth quarter."
"Last month, the show just returned to its eighth season and is currently rated as one of the top 10 original prime time shows for women aged 18-34 on Wednesday night."
“… The reality show total divas tells about the professional and personal lives of the twins and other wrestlers in the WWE women's group. "
"Then you may have seen a popular e!"
"No?"
"John Francis / instagram."
“… A prank smile, and then flip the top rope at the same time, their Kardashian length hair trailing behind... "
"You may have seen them on TV. In the light of the traffic lights, in the middle of the arena, Nicky may be wearing a bright red bra top with the words" fearless Nicky "printed on his chest, and Bree in a black jacket is reading Bree's pattern..."



Number  773
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“PETA encourages caring people to adopt from local animal shelters and never buy from breeders or pet stores, which only exacerbate the homeless-animal overpopulation crisis.”
“Countless more end up on the street, where they may starve, freeze, get hit by cars, or endure abuse.”
“Every year, more than 6 million dogs and cats end up in U.S. animal shelters, and half of them must be euthanized because there aren’t enough good homes for them.”
“...can eat and she helped PETA unveil Melissa s anti fur billboard in Times Square...”
“She helped PETA lobby the New York City Council to pass bills increasing licensing fees for unneutered animals and prohibiting dogs from being chained outside she hosted PETA s Passover hotline to promote vegan ham or pork even a Jew...”
“...campaigns over the years...”
“It s always the one that gets pushed aside that needs the love and will love you back that much more Rivers who credited her dog Spike with saving her life after her husband s suicide assisted PETA with numerous...”
““I love rescues and runts,” Rivers told People magazine in 2010.”
““My first thought was to rescue 2 more, but I don’t want to go through menopause again.”The ad, featuring a photo supplied by Rivers’ daughter, Melissa Rivers, shows her entangled with a dog on a leash.”
“Joan Rivers PETA Ad“A study says owning a dog makes you 10 years younger,” she says.”


"PETA encourages caring people to adopt from local animal shelters and never buy from breeders or pet shops, which will only aggravate the crisis of the surplus of homeless animals."
"Countless people end up on the streets, where they may starve, freeze, be hit by a car or suffer abuse."
"Every year, more than 6 million dogs and cats end up in American animal shelters, half of which have to be euthanized because there are not enough good homes for them."
“… Can eat, she helped PETA unveil Melissa's anti fur billboard in Times Square... "
"She helped PETA lobby the New York City Council to pass a bill to increase the license fees for animals that have not been euthanized and prohibit dogs from being tied outside the door. She presided over PETA's Passover hotline to promote vegan ham or pork, even Jews..."
“… Years of campaign... "
"It's always those who are pushed aside who need love and will love you back. More rivers believes that her dog spike saved her life after her husband committed suicide and helped PETA get countless..."
"I love rescue and dwarfs," rivers told people magazine in 2010
"My first thought was to save two more, but I don't want to go through menopause any more." The ad shows a picture provided by rivers' daughter Melissa rivers, who is entangled with a dog tied to a leash
"Joan Rivers' PETA ad" a study says that having a dog can make you 10 years younger, "she said



Number  774
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So I don’t want to shut them down in any way.””
“But I completely support people coming out and being able to have a voice because they didn’t have a voice for so long.”
“Franco, 39, attended the ceremony with his girlfriend Isabel Pakzad.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a red carpet interview with E!, his sister-in-law Alison Brie, nominated for her role in GLOW, defended the Disaster Artist star.”
““I think that above all what we’ve always said is that it remains vital that anyone that feels victimized should and does have the right to speak out and come forward,” she said.”
““I obviously support my family, and not everything that’s been reported has been accurate, so I think we’re waiting to get all the information.”
“But of course now is the time for listening and that s what we are all trying to do Five women accused Franco who is nominated at Sunday s ceremony for outstanding performance by a male actor in a leading role for his movie The Disaster Artist of sexually exploitative...”
“...behavior earlier this month...”
“Last week, Franco skipped the Critics’ Choice Awards, where he won the award for best actor in a comedy.”


"So I don't want to close them in any way."
"But I fully support people coming out and having a say, because they haven't had a say for a long time."
Franco, 39, and his girlfriend Isabel Packard attended the wedding
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In a red carpet interview! His sister-in-law, Alison Bree, has been nominated for the role of glow, defending the disaster artist star
"I think the most important thing is that we've always said that anyone who feels victimized should and does have the right to speak up, and that's still crucial," she said
"I obviously support my family and not all the reports are accurate, so I think we are waiting for all the information."
"Of course, it's time to listen, and that's what we're all trying to do. Five women accused Franco of being nominated by an actor to star in his film the artist of the disaster of sexual exploitation at Sunday's awards ceremony
“… Earlier this month... "
"Last week, Franco skipped the commentator's Choice Award, where he won best actor in comedy."



Number  775
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I can’t even describe what it is, but it’s such a peace mixed with total excitement.””
“So Kim had no problem tagging Bailon on Instagram, and teasing her Monday night.”
“LOL,” she wrote in a post shared to her own Instagram story, commenting on the videos Kim posted.”
““Just woke up to this!”
“!”The message left Bailon in stitches.”
““Should I break the news to North that this could have been her auntie?!?!?”
“#CheetahGirls,” Kim wrote on her Instagram story of the movie.”
““North’s new obsession!”
“Image zoom Adrienne Bailon and Kim Kardashian West | Credit: Theo Wargo/WireImageImage zoom Adrienne Bailon and Rob Kardashian | Credit: Michael Buckner/GettyShe’s remained on good terms with the Kardashians since (Rob’s sister Kourtney Kardashian was even Bailon’s “breakup buddy”).”
““I’ve never felt what I feel right now.”


"I can't even describe what it is, but it's a peace full of excitement."
"So Kim tagged Byron on instagram and made fun of her on Monday night, no problem."
"Ha ha," she wrote in a post she shared with instagram, commenting on Kim's video
"Just wake up!"
"!" this letter has brought Barron down. "
"Should I tell the north that this may be her aunt?"
"Cheetah girl," Kim wrote on instagram
"The new obsession of the North!"
"Image zooming Adrienne bailon and Kim Kardashian West | image zooming Adrienne bailon and rob Kardashian | image zooming Adrienne bailon and rob Kardashian | image zooming: Michael Buckner / gettyshe has always had a good relationship with Kardashian (Rob's sister, Kourtney Kardashian, and even bailon's" breakup partner ")
"I've never felt the way I feel now."



Number  776
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...a brown baby...”
“Of course at this point Girls is damned if it does and damned if it doesn t but isn t it a bit odd that It s never discussed or dealt with it s just oh yeah Hannah s having...”
“Or is her settled contentment at the end, once Grover has finally started breastfeeding, about as good as it gets in this life?”
“Is she happy?”
“But is this what she wanted?”
“...can t quit now...”
“In the premiere of Girls Hannah asks her own parents for money in the finale she has to assume the mantle of grown up even though she s scared s itless mostly because someone has to do it and she...”
“But its circularity about running away, growing up, finding home, and being someone must feel especially relevant when you’re a single mom in a house in the woods, just one car trip away from running away.”
“It’s almost not fair, because that song is wrenching enough to do a lot of emotional heavy lifting on its own.”
“But really, what got me is that Tracy Chapman’s “Fast Car” was stitched — thematically and melodically — through the episode.”


“… A brown baby... "
"Of course, at this point, the girl is damned if it does, if it doesn't, but it's not a bit strange that it never discusses or deals with it just Oh, yes, Hannah has..."
"Or, when Grover finally started breastfeeding, was her ultimate satisfaction as good as her life?"
"Is she happy?"
"But is that what she wants?"
“… Can't quit now... "
"At the premiere of" the girl ", Hannah asked her parents for money in the ending. She had to bear the responsibility of growing up, although she was not afraid, mainly because someone had to do it. She..."
"But when you're a single mother, living in a house in the forest and only one drive away from home, you feel like you're running away from home, growing up, finding a home and becoming a particularly relevant person."
"It's almost unfair, because the song itself is exhausting."
"But in fact, what moved me was that Tracy Chapman's" express "hit the nail on the head in terms of theme and melody."



Number  777
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was fun.””
“She was pretty down-to-earth, funny.”
““She saw a few of Elsa’s pieces and so she wanted to check it out.”
““Elsa [Pataky] organized a private session after hours for Miley and a few friends to come and shop,” says Mel Carrero, a publicist for Spell.”
“He would just pull her close to him and put his arm around her.”Before the festival, Cyrus also stopped by fashion store Spell to pick out a few items.”
“They looked very happy and affectionate.”Adds another source: “He was really protective of her.”
“At one point, Liam was rubbing Miley’s back.”
““They were chatting and laughing.”
““They were in a large group with Chris Hemsworth and other family,” says onlooker Ashleigh Saunders.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"It's interesting."
"She's down-to-earth and fun."
"She saw some of Elsa's works, so she wanted to see them."
"Elsa (Pataki) organized a private meeting after work for Miley and a few friends to go shopping," says Speer's publicist Mel carrello
"He'll pull her to his side and put his arms around her." Before the festival, Cyrus also went to the fashion shop spell to buy some things
"They look very happy and kind." Another source said, "he really protects her."
"Liam was massaging Miley's back once."
"They laugh and talk."
"They're in a big group with Chris Hemsworth and the rest of the family," bystander Ashley Sanders said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  778
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She jumped for joy, screaming “Oh my God,” and quickly running over to hug the Real Housewives of New York City.”
“All of this left Lawrence in complete shock.”
“Andy Cohen on Thursday the 27 year old Oscar winner spoke about Kent...”
“According to E!”
“News, Lawrence said she thought the Bravo personality is fake for being friends with her enemies and jokingly said about Kent: “I’m like, ‘Bitch, you’s a c–t!’ ”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After Kent learned about Lawrence’s name-calling, the Vanderpump Rules cast member took to Twitter, where she posted and deleted three tweets in response to the actress, who’s been vocal about her love of reality TV.”
““You had a classic tweet and delete,” Amy Phillips said on Tuesday’s episode of Reality Checked with Amy Phillips on SiriusXM’s Radio Andy channel before the deleted tweets were read aloud: ” ‘Did Jennifer Lawrence really just call me a c— on Bravo Watch What Happens Live?”
“And talk about my mama?”
“Bitch, you better pray I don’t see you in the streets.”
“You’re one of the highest-paid actresses on the planet.”


She jumped up with joy, screaming "oh my God," and then quickly ran to embrace the Real Housewives of New York City
"It all took Lawrence by surprise."
"Andy Cohen on Thursday, the 27 year old Oscar winner talked about Kent..."
"According to e!"
In the news, Lawrence said she thought Bravo's personality was a fake friend with her enemy, and joked that Kent: "I like, 'bitch, you're a C-T! 'get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After Kent learned of Lawrence's roll call, members of the vanderpe rules crew tweeted. She tweeted and deleted three microblogs in response to the actress who has been denouncing her love of reality TV."
"You have a classic tweet and delete," said Amy Phillips, in front of Sirius XM's Andy channel on Tuesday's reality check with Amy Phillips, and delete tweets were read aloud: "Jennifer Lawrence really just called me a C-on Bravo to watch what happened live?"
"Tell me about my mother?"
"Bitch, you'd better pray that I won't see you in the street."
"You're one of the highest paid actresses on the planet."



Number  779
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Offering up a cuter, tinier version of the same character in the credits is an emotional salve to heal up the wounds caused by Groot’s death before anyone leaves their seats, whether it’s a son, a clone, or just a great merchandising opportunity.”
“Protesting a tweet asking “Who would you save, Baby Groot or a porg?” he points out that Baby Groot is an entirely new being that is, at best, a son.”
“...gone viral leading Gunn to repeatedly emphasize the point to people asking questions and freaking out...”
“2 as Baby Groot has a different personality than Groot none of his memories and is much much dumber When the issue resurfaced today Gunn lamented on Twitter The internet is like Groundhog Day every time I point out first Groot died This time however the news seems to have...”
“In a 2017 Facebook post, Gunn wrote, “I do think it’s more obvious in Vol.”
“— James Gunn (@JamesGunn) February 27, 2018This isn’t the first time Gunn has mentioned this tidbit, which never fails to get Guardians of the Galaxy and Groot fans worked up.”
“Baby Groot is his son.”
“First Groot is dead.”
“According to director James Gunn, however, that wasn’t Groot using his neat regeneration powers, and he’s never going to grow back into the original Groot.”
“If he is in fact introducing a new Groot at the end of the first film, the timing is confusing at best.”


"It's a kind of emotional comfort to provide a more lovely and smaller version of the same character in the film, which can cure the trauma caused by grott's death before anyone leaves his seat, whether it's a son, a clone, or a good marketing opportunity."
Protest a micro blog, ask "who will you save, little Groot or pig?"? "He pointed out that baby grott is a new life, a son at best."
“… As a result of viral transmission, Gunn repeatedly stressed the importance of people asking questions and going crazy... "
"2 because baby grott and grott have different personalities, there is no one in his memory, and when the problem reappears today, he is even more stupid. Gann sighed on twitter that every time I pointed out that grott died for the first time, the Internet was like groundhog day, but the news seemed to have... "
"In a Facebook article in 2017, Gann wrote," I do think this is more obvious in volume two. "
"James Gunn (@ James Gunn) February 27, 2018 this is not the first time Gunn has mentioned this grapevine, it always excites Galaxy guardian and grott fans."
"Little grott is his son."
"The first grott is dead."
"However, according to director James Gunn, it's not that grott is using his ingenious regenerative ability. He will never grow back to the original grott."
"If he did introduce a new gloat at the end of the first film, the timing would be confusing at best."



Number  780
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(This is largely thanks to Keeping Up With The Kardashians ' wild success and the power of social media.)”
“...each and every year...”
“The celebration picked up steam after the world s most famous momager married Caitlyn Jenner who then identified as Bruce but it wasn t until this past decade that the event became Hidden Hills biggest most star studded spectacle of...”
“The fête — commonly referred to as the Kardashian-Jenner Christmas Eve Party, the Kardashian Kristmas Eve Party or, more simply, Krismas , as Kylie refers to it — began more than 30 years ago, when Kris was still married to Robert Kardashian.”


"(this is largely due to the crazy success of the kardashians and the power of social media.)
“… Every year... "
"After the world's most famous mother, Caitlin Jenner, married Caitlin Jenner, the celebrations began to come alive. At that time, Caitlin Jenner called herself Bruce, but it wasn't until the past decade that this event became the biggest star gathering scene in hidden mountain... "
"F ê te - commonly known as Kardashian Jenner's Christmas Eve party, Kardashian christmase's Christmas Eve party, or more simply, what Kelly calls Chris MAS Party - began more than 30 years ago, when Chris was still married to Robert Kardashian."



Number  781
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Flavor Flav Suit by gmaddaus on Scribd...”
““He had never heard of the album, nor heard any of the final mixes,” the suit states.”
“So says a lawsuit filed in federal court Wednesday, in which Flav accuses Public Enemy co-founder Chuck D and two business managers of cheating him out of royalties and merchandising revenue.”
“Flav — real name, William Drayton — contends that his Public Enemy royalties have dwindled to almost nothing in recent years.”
“In the last few months, he and his representatives have attempted to get a full accounting of the money owed to him, but have been thwarted.”
“Flavor Flav and Chuck D were the two core members of the group.”
“Chuck D was seen as the serious musical talent while Flav played the goofy hype man.”
“The suit hints at years of pent-up hard feelings over this perception of their relative importance.”
“Flav contends that there have been many attempts to minimize his role in the Public Enemy business over the years while managers continued to exploit his fame and persona to market the brand In addition to naming Chuck D as a defendant the suit also goes after Gary Rinaldo the...”
“...group s business manager since 2008 and Clifton Greg Johnson who was until recently Flav s longtime personal manager...”


"Gmaddaus's yellow suit on Scribd..."
"He's never heard of the album or any final mix," the suit said
On Wednesday, vlaf filed a lawsuit in federal court accusing chuck D, co-founder of public enemy, and two business managers of defrauding him of royalties and sales revenue
"Fraf - real name, William Drayton - argues that his public enemy's royalties have been reduced to almost zero in recent years."
In the past few months, he and his representatives have tried to take a full inventory of the money owed to him, but they have been thwarted
"Flavor flav and chuck D are two core members of the team."
"Chuck D is seen as a serious musical genius, and vlaf as a stupid writer."
"The suit suggests years of repression about this relative importance."
"Vlaf argues that over the years, many people have tried to minimize his role in the public enemy business, while managers continue to use his reputation and personality to promote the brand. In addition to listing chuck D as the defendant, this lawsuit is also against Gary Rinaldo..."
“… Clifton Greg Johnson, the group's business manager since 2008, has only recently become Mr. fraff's long-term private Manager... "



Number  782
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My sweet Grandma Bass was named Evelyn and she was the best and I hope that our daughter is fierce like her,” Bass said at the time.”
“While Waddell wouldn’t allow Bass to name their daughter Evan, they were both overjoyed to reveal her moniker, explaining that they would call the newborn Bella for short.”
“— in paradise.”
“Bachelor in Paradise alums Carly Waddell and Evan Bass welcomed a healthy baby girl, Isabella Evelyn Bass, on Thursday, Feb. 15, the couple exclusively reveals to PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“She was born at 1:58 p.m., measuring 18¾ inches long and weighing 6 lbs., 8 oz.”
““It was a perfect birth, no problems at all.”
“We were supposed to induce her today but Carly’s water broke 15 minutes before our alarm went off so Bella is setting her own birthday!” Bass said in a statement.”
““Carly is recovering well and the baby has had her eyes open for hours.”
“I cried a lot during the birth!”


"My dear grandmother bass is Evelyn, she's the best, and I want our daughter to be as fierce as she is," Bass said at the time
"Although wardel did not allow bass to name their daughter Evan, they were very happy to reveal her nickname and explained that they would call her the newborn Bella for short."
"In heaven."
"The Bachelor of heaven" alumni Carly Waddell and Evan bass ushered in a healthy baby girl Isabella Evelyn bass on February 15 (Thursday), the couple told people exclusively
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She was born at 1:58 p.m., 18 – inches long and 6 pounds 8 ounces heavy."
"It was a perfect birth, without any problems."
"We were going to induce labor today, but Carly's water broke 15 minutes before the alarm clock went off, so Bella is going to fix her birthday!"! "Bath said in a statement."
"Carly is recovering well. The child has been open for hours."
"I cried a lot when I was born!"



Number  783
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Love: Her sexy beach display comes in light of her rumoured ex Justin proposing to model Hailey after only one month of dating...”
“...engagement on Instagram on Monday after days of speculation...”
“Yet Baskin Champion didn't seem too bothered as she showed off her sensational figure during a Miami Beach photoshoot on Friday.”
“The American model, 22, flaunted her envy-inducing abs and toned legs in a skimpy bikini as she worked her best angles on the sand.”
“Wow Baskin Champion 22 didn t seem too bothered with her rumoured ex Justin Bieber s engagement to Hailey Baldwin as she sizzled during a Miami Beach photoshoot on Friday Baskin who was said to be dating Justin shortly after the demise of his relationship with Selena Gomez earlier this...”
“...year was in her element during the saucy display...”
“The skimpy two-piece put focus on her cleavage as well as her peachy posterior.”
“The Instagram sensation, who boasts 300,000 followers, looked every inch the blonde bombshell as her locks billowed in the wind.”
“Her sexy beach display comes in light of her rumoured ex Justin proposing to model Hailey after only one month of dating.”
“Bottoms up!”


"Love: her sexy beach show comes from her rumored ex Justin proposing to Haley after a month of dating..."
“… After days of speculation, the engagement on instagram on Monday
"However, the Baskin champion didn't seem to be in too much trouble because she showed her pictures on Miami Beach in sensational numbers on Friday."
The 22-year-old American model showed off her enviable ABS and strong legs on the beach
"Wow, Baskin champion 22 doesn't seem to be much bothered by her rumor that former Justin Bieber's engagement, Haley Baldwin, hissed as she took a picture at Miami Beach on Friday. Baskin who said he was dating shortly after he terminated his relationship with Selena Gomez earlier this year..."
“… In her sexy performance, year is her element... "
"The light two-piece set focuses on her cleavage and peach colored hind legs."
Instagram, who claims to have 300000 fans, looks like a blonde bomb when her hair is blowing in the wind
"Her sexy show on the beach was due to her rumor that former Justin proposed to Haley after only one month of dating."
"Cheers



Number  784
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and about multiple times over the past few months leaving TAO restaurant in Hollywood together in late September and even sharing a friendly embrace in late August...”
“” Jackson wrote on Instagram, sharing the same photo.”
“...for Halloween...”
“The duo were all smiles on Saturday night at Maxim’s Halloween party in Los Angeles, posing for photographers in their respective costumes: a “Biker Boy” for Jackson, and a “Fembot” (of Austin Powers fame) for his companion.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Broadimage/REX/Shutterstock“Fembot – Biker Boy take Halloween ,” Olympios, 24, captioned an Instagram snap of the twosome showing off their outfits.”
“Hers included a short silver skirt with matching bra top, choker and stilettos, plus a sheer pink jacket decorated with feathers and coordinating headband.”
““This fembot captured me tonight!”
“RELATED VIDEO: Corinne Olympios and DeMario Jackson Get Cozy Outside Club After Bachelor in Paradise ScandalEarlier this month, Jackson opened up to reporters about his friendship with Olympios despite the sex scandal that led Bachelor in Paradise to delay filming over the summer.”
“It s like Oh it s fake It s always you re damned if you do you re damned if you don t FROM PEN Why Bachelorette Rachel Lindsay Didn t Choose Peter Kraus I Just Knew He Wasn t the One for Me The pair have been spotted out...”


“…… In the past few months, we have left the Tao restaurant in Hollywood many times in late September, and even hugged each other in late August... "
"Share the same photo," Jackson wrote on instagram
“… "Halloween..."
On Saturday night, at a Halloween party in maxim, Los Angeles, the two wore their respective costumes to take photos for Photographers: Jackson's "motorcycle boy" and his companion's "female robot" (Austin Powers)
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Credit for image zooming: broadimage / Rex / shutterstock" fembot - Motorcycle kid for Halloween, "24-year-old Olympus took a snapshot of two people showing their clothes on instagram."
Her dress includes a silver skirt with a bra top, necklace and stilettos, plus a feathered pink jacket and coordinated headband
"This woman has me tonight!"
"Related video: Corinne Olympus and demario Jackson are enjoying themselves outside the club after the" Bachelor of heaven "scandal. Earlier this month, Jackson disclosed his friendship with Olympus to reporters, even though the sex scandal delayed the shooting of" Bachelor of heaven "all summer."
"It's like Oh, it's fake. If you do this, you will always be cursed. If you're not in the pen, you will be cursed. Why didn't Rachel Lindsay choose Peter Claus? I only know that he is not the one I'm looking for. They have been found out..."



Number  785
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““At one point during this trip Diana was aware that Charles was on the telephone to Camilla.””
“Speaking about one particular holiday, he said: “It was sad in a sense for Diana of course because Camilla was always on the back of her mind.”
“In “Robert Jobson’s Royal Podcast” by the Evening Standard’s royal editor Robert Jobson, former inspector Ken Wharfe recalled how Charles had secret phone calls with Camilla during family trips abroad.”
“Ken Wharfe has claimed...”
“How Prince Philip could have SAVED Princess Diana from marriage Why the Queen and Prince Philip BLAME Charles for Diana marriage Diana was even aware of secret phone calls between her husband and Camilla during family holidays with their two children Prince William and Prince Harry former royal security guard...”
“In her famous TV interview in 1995 on BBC’s Panorama, Diana claimed she knew Charles and Camilla’s relationship continued throughout her marriage because of her “women’s instinct”.”
“However, there were constant allegations of infidelity between Camilla and the Prince of Wales throughout his marriage to Diana.”
“Prince Charles and Camilla Parker Bowles were exes when the Prince of Wales married Princess Diana in 1981.”


"On this trip, Diana realized that Charles was calling Camilla."
Speaking of a special festival, he said: "it's certainly a sadness for Diana, because Camilla is always in her mind."
In Robert Jobson's "Robert Jobson's Royal podcast" by the Royal editor of the evening news, former inspector Ken wolf recalled Charles's Secret phone call with Camilla while his family were traveling abroad
"Ken Wharfe claims..."
"How can Prince Philip rescue Princess Diana from her marriage? Why do the queen and Prince Philip blame Princess Charles for her marriage? Princess Diana even knows that her husband and Camilla have a secret phone call with their two children during the family holiday? Prince William and Prince Harry are former royal security guards..."
In 1995, Diana gave a famous TV interview on BBC's panorama program, claiming that she knew that Charles and Camilla's relationship continued throughout her marriage because of her "female instinct."
"However, throughout the marriage between Camilla and Diana, there have been constant accusations of infidelity with the prince of Wales."
"When the prince of Wales married Princess Diana in 1981, Prince Charles and Camilla Parker powers were predecessors."



Number  786
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more from Styles’ residency, watch the clip below!”
“WATCH: Harry Styles Addresses Whether 'Two Ghosts' Is About Taylor Swift: 'It's Pretty Self-Explanatory'Styles also performed his new song, “Two Ghosts,” on the show, which is rumored to be about his ex, Taylor Swift.”
“Watch the clip to see what happens when they’re trying to defuse a bomb!”
“5.”The grieving funeral attendees weren’t particularly pleased to see them dancing around the casket.”
“After apologizing to their fellow doctors, Corden and Styles then exited the operating room to tell the patient’s family, saying, “Bad news, guys!”The sketch then showed the pair serving as pallbearers at a funeral when they broke into the Lou Bega hit “Mambo No.”
“They had an urgent surgery, but couldn’t stop themselves from breaking into the Tom Jones’ classic “It’s Not Unusual.”Decked out in scrubs, the pair performed synchronized dance moves as their patient went into shock and then died on the operating table while they were singing.”
““Unfortunately, our mutual love of singing has always gotten us into trouble.”The skit then cut to Corden and Styles as doctors in the operating room.”
“WATCH: Harry Styles Delivers an Opening Monologue on ‘The Late Late Show,’ Discusses Side Effects of Going Solo"Harry Styles and I have known each other for a long time, but what people might not know is that we've worked together many times,” Corden explained.”
“The 23-year-old British singer continued his Late Late Show residency on Wednesday night where he participated in a funny sketch with the show’s host.”
“Sometimes you’ve just gotta burst into song, and if you’re James Corden and Harry Styles, that tends to be at pretty inappropriate moments.”


"For more information about styles residency, watch the clip below!"
"Observation: Harry styles talks about whether" two ghosts "is related to Taylor Swift:" it's self-evident. "Stiles also sang his new song" two ghosts "on the show, which is said to be about his former girlfriend Taylor Swift."
"Look at this clip and see what happens when they try to defuse the bomb!"
"5." sad funeral attendants are not particularly happy to see them dancing around the coffin. "
After apologizing to other doctors, cordon and stiles left the operating room and told the patients' families, "bad news, guys! Later, the sketch shows the two men acting as funeral attendants at a funeral when they broke into Lou Bega's hit drama Mambo No
They had an emergency operation, but they couldn't stop themselves from breaking into Tom Jones' classic extraordinary. The two, dressed in tights, performed synchronized dance steps when the patient was in shock and then died on the operating table while singing
"Unfortunately, our shared love of singing always gets us in trouble." The sketch was later adapted to be a doctor in the operating room
"Observation: Harry stiles gave an opening monologue at the late late show to discuss the side effects of solo," cordon explained. "Harry stiles and I have known each other for a long time, but what people may not know is that we have worked together many times."
"The 23-year-old British singer continued her internship on the evening show on Wednesday night and joined the host in an interesting sketch."
"Sometimes you have to sing all of a sudden. If you're James cordon and Harry stiles, it's often at a very inappropriate time."



Number  787
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Supergirl actress also said the family was planning on taking a road trip in an RV to celebrate Channing's 37th birthday on Wednesday.”
“I was like, "This is... Hmm, I don't think this is good."'”
“In the episode, set to air on Tuesday, the 36-year-old dancer and actress opened up about the night her now husband Channing Tatum, 36, first seduced her while filming 2006's Step Up.”
“'He did this whole thing where he didn't want to be in a relationship, so I was like, "Look, if you want to date other people and be free, that's fine, but we're not going to hang out and watch movies.”
“You've got to figure out what you want, because I know I want to be in a relationship with you,"' she told the 59-year-old TV host.”
“Stepping up Jenna Dewan Tatum sported a strapless white Monique Lhuillier SS 17 mini dress on Tuesday s Ellen Show where she revealed how husband Channing Tatum won her over So three days goes by and he had gone out with all the dancers on Step Up and he had...”
“...this crazy wild tequila night she added...”
“'He said he had the chance "to be free" and he couldn't stop thinking about me.'”
“'So he comes down to my hotel room at two in the morning and he's banging on the door, and I'm like, "What's going on?"”
“So I go and open the door, and he's in a sombrero, underwear, Ugg boots, and he's like, "Let's do this."'”


"The super actress also said that her family plans to travel by RV on Wednesday to celebrate Channing's 37th birthday."
"I said," this is... Well, I don't think it's good
In the episode aired on Tuesday, the 36 year old dancer and actress recounts the night that her now 36 year old husband Channing Tatum first seduced her when filming "step by step" in 2006
"He didn't want to fall in love, so I said," listen, if you want to date someone, if you want to be free, that's OK, but we're not going out to the movies. "
"You have to figure out what you want because I know I want to fall in love with you," she told the 59 year old TV host
"On the Allen Show on Tuesday, Jenna Dewan Tatum wore a white Monique lhuillier SS 17 miniskirt without shoulder straps. She revealed how her husband Channing Tatum won her. Three days later, he went out with all the dancers, and he has..."
“… This crazy wild tequila night, she added
"He said he had a chance to be 'free' and he couldn't stop thinking about me."
"So he came to my hotel room at 2 a.m. and banged on the door, and I thought," what's the matter? "
"So I went to the door, and he was wearing pajamas, underwear, boots, and he said," let's go. "



Number  788
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But it’s how you handle it, and how you decide to move forward from it.””
“I sincerely apologize to the LGBTQ community for my insensitive words from my past.”In a second tweet, Hart finally issued an apology, writing, “I’m sorry that I hurt people..”
“Image zoom Kevin Hart touches down in Sydney, Australia, on a private jet | Credit: MEGAStepping Down as Oscars Host — and an ApologyJust an hour after he refused to apologize, the comedian shared he would be stepping down as Oscars host.”
“I’m going to be me and stand my ground.”A source familiar with the situation confirmed to PEOPLE that the Academy did ask Hart to apologize.”
“I’m not going to continue to go back and tap into the days of old when I’ve moved on and I’m in a completely different space in my life.”He added, “I’m not going to do it, man.”
“...do the people closest to me...”
“So I just got a call from the Academy and that call basically said Kevin apologize for your tweets or we re going to have to move on and find another host he said in a video shared on Instagram that he captioned I know who I am and so...”
“If you’re not doing that, you’re not on my page.”Hours later, Hart took to Instagram again to reveal the Academy had asked him to issue an apology — which he refused to do.”
“I’m in a great place, a great mature place where all I do is spread positivity.”
““I’m the wrong guy, man.”


"But the key is how you deal with it and how you decide to move forward from it."
"I sincerely apologize to the LGBTQ community for the insensitive words I said in the past." On the second tweet, Hart finally apologized, saying, "I'm sorry, I hurt people..."
"Picture zooming Kevin Hart landed in a private plane in Sydney, Australia. Photo source: Mega resigns as Oscars host - an hour after he refused to apologize, the comedian said he would resign as Oscars host. "
"I want to be myself and stick to my position." A person familiar with the matter confirmed that the college did ask hart to apologize
"I'm not going to go back to the past, back to the old days, when I move on, my life is in a completely different space," he added. "I'm not going to do that, man."
“… People around me... "
"So I just received a phone call from the college, basically saying that Kevin apologizes for your tweet, otherwise we have to continue to find another host. He said in the video shared by instagram that he wrote in the title that I know who I am, so..."
"If you don't, you won't be on my page." A few hours later, Hart visited instagram again and revealed that the Academy had asked him to apologize, but he refused to do so
"I am in a great place, a great mature place, what I do is spread enthusiasm."
"I'm wrong, man."



Number  789
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She's trying to relate to you!'”
“Fan She has lupus she doesn t fly a lot but she was all excited he said of the Hotel Transylvania premiere She gets up and gives Harper a hug very sweet gives Bea a hug and then my mom s across the aisle he continued And I go say...”
“David Spade recalled the embarrassing moment he introduced his mother to Selena Gomez on Wednesday's Tonight Show.”
“The comedian plays the Invisible Man opposite Selena's vampire Mavis in Hotel Transylvania 3, and told host Jimmy Fallon about the awkward encounter at the premiere.”
“Scroll down for video Awkward David Spade recalled the embarrassing moment he introduced his mother to Selena Gomez on Wednesday s Tonight Show He revealed that as well as inviting his nine year old daughter Harper and 13 year old niece Beatrix Bea the daughter of the late Kate Spade...”
“...he brought his mom...”
“'She has lupus, she doesn't fly a lot... but she was all excited,' he said.”
“'They all want to see Selena Gomez, of course.”
“She's a huge star, they're sort of bored of me...”
“I've sort of leveled out at this point on the excitement meter.'”


"She wants to build a relationship with you!"
"She had lupus erythematosus, she didn't fly very often, but she was very excited, he said. At the premiere of the Transylvania Hotel, she stood up, gave Harper a hug, very sweet, gave BIA a hug, and then my mother walked through the aisle, and he continued, I'll say..."
"David spade recalled the embarrassing moment when he introduced his mother to Selena Gomez on Wednesday's tonight show."
"The comedian played opposite Selena's vampire Mavis in the hotel 3 in Transylvania, playing invisible man, and told host Jimmy Fallon about the embarrassment of the premiere."
"Scrolling down the embarrassing video, David spade recalled the embarrassing moment when he introduced his mother, Selena Gomez, on Wednesday's tonight show. He revealed that in addition to inviting his 9-year-old daughter Harper and 13-year-old niece Beatrix BIA, the daughter of the late Kate Spade..."
“… He brought his mother... "
"She has lupus and doesn't fly much... "But she was excited," he said
"Of course they all want to see Selena Gomez."
"She's a big star, they're a little tired of me..."
"I've stabilized at this point on the excitement scale."



Number  790
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We hung out and spent every single day together that I've been in L.A. since then, since February."”
“I got my hair cut and he texted me like, 'Let's go to a movie!'”
“"I was like, 'What am I gonna do?'”
“"We kept in touch very rarely, not even that much, from January to February, and then the day I got back from season one in February I was bored in L.A., believe it or not," she continued.”
“"I think we just randomly had mutual friends, so we added each other."”
“He had auditioned for Jughead," she told Cosmopolitian in 2017.”
“"He messaged me on Facebook in January of season one and congratulated me on the show.”
“Madelaine Petsch first met actor-musician boyfriend Travis Mills when he was up for the role of Jughead, but the romance didn't take-off until they reconnected online.”


"We spent every day together, and since then, since February, I've been in Los Angeles."
"I had my hair cut and he texted me and said," let's go to the movies! "
"I was thinking," what should I do? "
"From January to February, we rarely kept in touch, not even so much, and then the day I came back from the first quarter of February, I was bored in Los Angeles, believe it or not," she continued
"I think we just had random friends in common, so we added each other."
"He auditioned for Jughead," she told cosmopolitan in 2017
"He left me a message on Facebook in January of the first season, congratulating me on my show."
"Madeleine page first met Travis mills, actor and musician's boyfriend, when he starred in pig's head, but the relationship didn't begin until they were reconnected online."



Number  791
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News:”
“| E!”
“Robert Pattinson Cools Off With FKA Twigs: Are Things Heating Up With Katy Perry?”
“They have just been trying to figure out how to sort everything.“ Pattinson made headlines in July after he said he’s only “kind of“ engaged to Twigs during a radio interview.”
““They really tried to make it work, and it’s not long until the split will be public.”
“He and FKA have had major distance and tension between them for months now,“ the informant continues.”
““They were serious at one point, but not anymore.” The source goes on to say that the 31-year-old actor has been good friends with Perry for several years, but that “you never know what will happen in the future.“ “Rob already feels single.”
“News.”
““He is technically still with FKA Twigs, but it doesn’t seem like it will last,“ an insider tells E!”
“A source close to Robert Pattinson has suggested that his engagement to singer FKA Twigs is on the outs–and that he may be moving on with Katy Perry.”


News:
“| E！”
Robert Pattinson calms down with FKA's branches: is Katie Perry heating up? "
Pattinson said he was only "a little bit" engaged to twig in a radio interview and made headlines in July
"They really worked hard and soon the split was made public."
"There has been months of distance and tension between him and FKA," the source continued
"They used to be serious, but now they are not." The 31 year old actor and Perry have been good friends for years, but "you never know what will happen in the future," the source added "Rob already feels single."
"News."
"Technically, he's still with FKA twigs, but it doesn't seem to last," an insider told e! "
"A source close to Robert Pattinson suggested that his engagement to singer FKA twigs is over and that he may continue to date Katie Perry."



Number  792
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In his most recent album More Life, Drake rapped about Lopez in the track “Free Smoke” saying “I drunk text JLo, wrong number so it bounce back.” The rapper also sampled the Bronx-native’s 1999 hit single ‘If You Had My Love’ for the song “Teenage Fever.””
“Fans are speculating Lopez was throwing shade at the rapper, but the bit has apparently been in the star’s show since opening night last year — long before she and Drake were ever linked together.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“She gave the crowd a major hair flip and continued on with her performance.”
““Huh, booty call,” she said when the rapper’s “Hotline Bling” track began to play.”
“A video recently surfaced of JLo during her All I Have residency in Las Vegas making an interesting comment mid-performance after one of Drake’s songs starting playing.”
“Now, the World of Dance star is enjoying her new relationship with the retired baseball player traveling with their families and going on numerous—and always stylish—date nights.”
“Before there was Alex Rodriguez, Jennifer Lopez was making headlines with Drake after posting a cozy photo of the two on her Instagram.”


In his recent album more lives, Drake rapped Lopez on the song smoke of freedom, saying: "I drank the text JLO and dialed the wrong number, so it will bounce back." The rapper also picked the Bronx native's 1999 hit single "if you have my love" for the song "teen fever."
"Fans speculate that Lopez has cast a shadow over the rapper, but this has obviously been on the star's show since last year's premiere night - long before she and Drake were linked."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She gives the audience an important hair flip and continues her performance."
When rapper's "hot line bling" began to play, she said, "ah, booty call."
"Recently, a video exposed JLO's" everything I have "residence in Las Vegas. After Drake's song began to play, she made an interesting comment in the middle of the performance."
"Now, the world of dance stars is enjoying her new relationship with the retired baseball player, traveling with her family and attending countless ever fashionable date nights."
"Before Alex Rodriguez appeared, Jennifer Lopez posted a picture of the two on instagram, making Drake's headlines."



Number  793
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s consistently embarrassing to watch, and features plot holes so yawningly vast they have a kind of Grand Canyon-like splendour: part of you wants to hang around to see what they look like at sunset.”
“Instead, it feels like a sheepish feature-length retraction of the franchise to date.”
“...did for Marvel five years ago...”
“After a four film build up that began four years ago with Man of Steel Justice League should have felt like a culmination with Batman and Wonder Woman recruiting new heroes and bringing back Superman in order to fend off an extraterrestrial invasion in much the same way the Avengers...”
“...cultural black hole sucking up as much money and audience goodwill as the studio can shovel into it...”
“It s easy to lose but if you dig around it s usually close by Yet there s no trace of the stuff in Warner Bros latest hapless attempt to jump start their DC Comics blockbuster brand which at this point looks less like a cinematic universe than a pop...”
““A man I knew used to say that hope was like your car keys,” quips Superman (Henry Cavill) at the beginning of Justice League, into a cameraphone clutched by a couple of flustered schoolboy fans.”
“12A cert, 120 mins.”
“Dir: Zack Snyder; Starring: Ben Affleck, Gal Gadot, Ezra Miller, Jason Momoa, Ray Fisher, Jeremy Irons, Henry Cavill, Amy Adams, Diane Lane, Connie Nielsen, JK Simmons, Ciarán Hinds (voice).”


"The film has always been embarrassing, and it's characterized by a hollow plot so huge that it has a grand canyon grandeur: you have a part of people who want to see them at sunset."
"Instead, it gives the impression of a shy characteristic length, the withdrawal of the franchise so far."
“… Five years ago for Marvel... "
"After the four films that man of steel Justice League started four years ago, Batman and wonder woman recruited new heroes and brought back Superman to defend against alien invasion, just like the Avengers..."
“…… The cultural black hole sucks as much money as the producers can put in and the audience's favor... "
"It's easy to lose, but if you dig around, it's usually around, but in Warner Bros' latest unfortunate attempt to jump start their DC comic blockbuster brand, it doesn't look like a movie universe at this point, there's no trace of anything more than pop music..."
"A person I know once said that hope is like your car key," Superman (Henry Carville) joked at the beginning of Justice League, and his camera was held tightly by several flustered primary school fans
"12a certificate, 120 minutes."
"Directed by Zach Snyder, starring Ben Affleck, Gail gadote, Ezra Miller, Jason momova, ray Fisher, Jeremy Irons, Henry caville, Amy Adams, Diane Lane, Connie Nelson, JK Simmons, sialan Hindes (dubbing)"



Number  794
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VF.com has reached out to representatives for Gosling and Mendes and will update this story when more information becomes available.”
“We’re content with this report from Us Weekly about the mere idea that he and Mendes might be married right now, because Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are working towards the legal dissolution of theirs.”
“The original post continues below.”
“When one celebrity marriage ends, another begins (that’s how that saying goes, right?).”
“Fresh off the news that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are getting divorced—which you might have heard; it was written up in a few periodicals yesterday and will possibly be covered today as well—Us Weekly is reporting that notoriously private couple Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes are married.”
“Not only did they allegedly tie the knot, they may have done so earlier this year.”
“They’re newlyweds, and have been for quite some time.”
“Multiple sources reveal in the new issue of Us Weekly that Gosling and his love of five years Eva Mendes quietly tied the knot earlier this year among a small group of family and friends Another source goes on to say that Eva and Ryan have always felt like a...”
“...married couple...”
“.”


“ VF.com The website has contacted representatives of gosling and Mendes and will update this report when more information is available. "
"We're happy with this US weekly report because Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are trying to break their marriage through legal means, just the idea that he and Mendes might get married now."
"The original post is as follows."
"When a celebrity marriage ends, another begins (that's the saying, right?)."
"You may have heard of the news that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are going to divorce. It was reported in several journals yesterday, and it may be reported today. American Weekly reported the marriage of infamous illegitimate children Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes."
"Not only are they said to be married, they may have been earlier this year."
"They are newlyweds and have been married for a long time."
"Several sources revealed in the new issue of American weekly that Gosling and his five-year lover Eva Mendes quietly married in a small group of friends and relatives earlier this year. Another source went on to say that EVA and Ryan always feel like a..."
“… Married couple... "
“.”



Number  795
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“However, this segment was really all about watching Arie awkwardly hold Samuel.”
“You do you, Kendall.”
“Kendall called herself a “weird soul” and really drove that point home by singing to a dead seal.”
“There’s also a girl who collects taxidermy animals.”
“Contestant Tia is friends with Raven Gates — who competed on Nick Viall’s season of The Bachelor and season 4 of Bachelor in Paradise — as if you couldn’t tell based solely on their identical accents.”
“The women did a lousy job of pretending to be excited about Arie, but we did learn a couple of interesting tidbits of information.”
“Meet (Some of) the LadiesNext, we saw short pre-taped intro packages of some of the contestants.”
“We may have just figured out why he’s still single.”
“...ago so it s too late for him...”


"Wait a minute."
"However, this part is actually to see ERI holding Samuel awkwardly."
"You know, Kendall."
Kendall called himself a "weird soul" and really brought it home by singing to a dead seal
"And a girl who collects animal specimens."
"Contestant TIA is a friend of Revan gates - he's in Nick Villar's singles season four and singles in paradise season four - as if you can't judge by their accent alone."
"These women pretended to be excited about Ellie, but we did learn some interesting anecdotes."
"Meet (some) ladies. Next, we'll see some brief pre recorded introductions of the contestants."
"We may have just figured out why he's still single."
“… So it's too late for him... "



Number  796
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We had an opportunity to really get to know each other living in such close quarter.'”
“Her side: She also said she was into love.”
“And at a recent press event for her new show, Famously Single, the best friend of Khloe Kardashian told People that the reality TV star was 'aggressive.'”
“'Ronnie and I are really, truly opposites,' Haqq, 34, said.”
“'His love language is very aggressive.”
“It’s verbally aggressive, it’s physically aggressive.”
“It’s just the way he expresses himself.'”
“Done: Malika Haqq split from Jersey Shore vet Ronnie Ortiz-Magro in February after dating for two months.”
“And at a press event for her new show Famously Single the best friend of Khloe Kardashian told People that the reality TV star was aggressive Her take We show our love language in two very different ways so the way we were trying to communicate with each other was...”
“...often misconstrued because we don t speak the same language They have moved on Malika on the left on Thursday and Ronnie on the right in March She also said she was into love...”


"We have a chance to really get to know each other in such a close environment."
"On her side: she said she was in love."
At a recent news conference, Kardashian's friends told people that the reality TV star was aggressive
"Ronnie and I are really, really antagonistic," said Huck, 34
"His love language is very aggressive."
"It's a verbal attack, a physical attack."
"It's just his way of expressing himself."
"Done: after two months of dating, Malika Huck broke up with Jersey coast vet Ronnie Ortiz Magro in February."
"At the press conference of her new show" famous single ", Chloe Kardashian's best friend told people that the reality TV star is very aggressive. She thinks we use two completely different ways to express our love language, so the way we try to communicate with each other is..."
“…… They are often misunderstood because we speak different languages. Malika on the left on Thursday and Ronnie on the right in March also said that she fell in love with... "



Number  797
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Is she gaining control ... or is he just letting her think she is?”
“"Radicals are the only people who ever got anything done.”
“What About Bob's Gimp?”
“Ally is starting to suspect something however, telling Dr. Rudy Vincent it seemed like Ivy was already "prepared" to abandon her.”
“That Jill Stein vote realllly rubbed her the wrong way, didn't it?”
“"The only thing I love right now is my son and I will do whatever it takes to make the world a better place for him, even if it means burning it all down."”
“I hate my fucking wife for letting it happen," she explained to Winter.”
“I hate this country, what it's become.”
“I'm ready.”
“Why Ivy's In On ItFXNot only did the episode confirm that Ivy is a member of the cult and a (somewhat reluctant) cold blooded killer, viewers also got some insight into why she's doing it.”


"Is she controlling... Or did he just make her feel like she was? "
"The radicals are the only ones who have done anything."
"Where's Bob's leg?"
However, Ellie began to doubt something and told Dr. Rudy Vincent that it seemed that Ivy was "ready" to abandon her
"Jill Stein's vote really confused her, didn't it?"
"The only thing I love now is my son, and I will try my best to make the world a better place, even if it means burning everything."
"I hate my wife letting this happen," she explained to winter
"I hate this country. It's what it is now."
"I'm ready."
"Why Ivy goes to itfx not only proves that ivy is a member of a cult and a cold-blooded killer (a little reluctant), but also the audience has some understanding of why she does it."



Number  798
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Subscribe to the Queer Voices newsletter.”
“Don’t miss the latest (and greatest) in LGBTQ entertainment!”
“Don’t miss Tortorella’s full appearance on “Hollywood Medium with Tyler Henry” Wednesday on E!”
“They’ll just be quick little flashes of an image, symbol, face or person, but I do find that there are occasions where I will physically and visually see somebody.”Previous guests on “Hollywood Medium with Tyler Henry” have included Boy George and Margaret Cho.”
““Those images are primarily mental so I see them in my mind’s eye.”
““Primarily I’m a clairvoyant so I receive information visually, but I also pick up on physical sensations,” he said.”
““He’s always been such a staple of the family story, so his love and his legacy lives on.”Henry, who is gay, spoke at length about his abilities in a 2015 interview with Out magazine.”
““I was only two years old when he passed, so I didn’t know him on a personal level,” Tortorella says in the clip.”
“It’s an understandably emotional moment for the actor.”
““Younger” fans will get a look at a different side of Nico Tortorella on Wednesday’s episode of “Hollywood Medium with Tyler Henry.”In the video above, Tortorella, 28, tears up when Henry, who is billed as a “clairvoyant medium,” appears to connect him with his grandfather, Lou.”


"Subscribe to queer voice newsletters."
"Don't miss the latest (and best) show of LGBTQ entertainment!"
Don't miss torrella's full appearance in "Hollywood media and Tyler Henry" on Wednesday at e! "
"They're just quick flashes of images, symbols, faces or characters, but I do find that on some occasions I see someone physically and visually." Previous guests on "Taylor Henry's Hollywood media" included Boy George and Margaret Chao
"These images are mainly mental, so I see them in my mind."
"I'm mainly a clairvoyant, so I can receive information visually, but I can also feel information physically," he said
"He has always been the protagonist in the family story, so his love and legacy are immortal." In an interview with out magazine in 2015, Henry, a homosexual, gave a detailed account of his abilities
"I was only two years old when he died, so I didn't know him personally," torrella said in the clip
"It's an understandable emotional moment for actors."
"Young" fans will see another side of Nico torrella on "Hollywood media and Tyler Henry" on Wednesday. In the video above, torrella, 28, cries when Henry, known as "the media of a thousand miles", appears in contact with his grandfather Lu



Number  799
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Here’s the List of Nominees for the 2018 Grammy Awards“Going from To Pimp a Butterfly to DAMN., that s— could have crashed and burned if it wasn’t executed right,” he added.”
“That was our total focus, how to do that sonically, lyrically, through melody — and it came out exactly how I heard it in my head … It’s all pieces of me,” he told Rolling Stone last year.”
“ET'Jay for President': Kendrick Lamar Gives JAY-Z a Shout-Out While Winning Best Rap AlbumAnd the winner is … Kendrick Lamar!”
“The 30-year-old musician took home the Grammy for best rap album at Sunday’s ceremony for DAMN., beating out some of hip-hop’s biggest stars for the coveted honor.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““This is a special award because of rap music — this is the thing that got me on the stage.”
“This got me to tour all around the world, support my family,” he said in his acceptance speech.”
“Most important it showed me the true definition of what being an artist was From the jump I thought it was about the accolades and the cars and the clothes but it s really about expressing yourself and putting that paint on the canvas for world to evolve for the...”
“...listener the next generation after that he added...”
““Hip-hop has done that for me.”The rapper concluded his speech with a shout-out to eight-time 2018 nominee JAY-Z, “Jay for president!” JAY-Z gave a standing ovation for Kendrick’s win.”


"Related video: Here's the list of nominees for the 2018 Grammy Awards," from pimping butterflies to damned ones. "If not properly executed, s-may collapse and burn down," he added
"That's all we focus on, how to do it through melody, through sound, through lyricism - and that's what I hear in my mind It's all part of me, "he told rolling stone last year
"Jay of the president": Kendrick Lamar yells at Jay-Z while winning the best rap album. The winner is Kendrick Lamar
The 30-year-old musician beat some hip-hop stars to win the Grammy for best rap album at Sunday's damned awards
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's a special award for rap music - it's something that gets me on stage."
"This has enabled me to travel around the world and support my family," he said in his acceptance speech
"Most importantly, it shows me the real definition of an artist. I think it's about honor, cars and clothes, but it's really about expressing yourself and putting paintings on canvas to make the world Evolution. "
“… For the next generation after that, he added
"Hip hop did it for me." At the end of his speech, the rapper yelled to Jay-Z, who has won eight nominations in 2018: "Jay is running for president! "Jez stood up and applauded for Kendrick's victory."



Number  800
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2 September 2020 A Palestinian woman reacts as Israeli forces demolish her animal shed near Hebron in the Israeli occupied West Bank Reuters World news in pictures 1 September 2020 Students protest against presidential elections results in Minsk TUT BY AFP via Getty World news in pictures 31 August 2020”
“A search began for possible survivors after a scanner detected a pulse one month after the mega blast at the adjacent port AFP via Getty World news in pictures 3 September 2020 A full moon next to the Virgen del Panecillo statue in Quito Ecuador EPA World news in pictures...”
“The fast moving Glass fire has burned over 1 000 acres and has destroyed homes Getty World news in pictures 26 September 2020 A villager along with a child offers prayers next to a carcass of a wild elephant that officials say was electrocuted in Rani Reserve Forest on the...”
“China will celebrate national day marking the founding of the People's Republic of China on October 1st Getty World news in pictures 27 September 2020 The Glass Mountain Inn burns as the Glass Fire moves through the area in St. Helena, California.”
“...to frontline health care workers during the COVID 19 pandemic in Beijing China...”
“2020 A girl s silhouette is seen from behind a fabric in a tent along a beach by Beit Lahia in the northern Gaza Strip AFP via Getty World news in pictures 28 September 2020 A Chinese woman takes a photo of herself in front of a flower display dedicated...”
“World news in pictures Show all 50 1 50 World news in pictures World news in pictures 30 September 2020 Pope Francis prays with priests at the end of a limited public audience at the San Damaso courtyard in The Vatican AFP via Getty World news in pictures 29 September...”
“In the wake of the Harvey Weinstein scandal, a number of women have come forward with allegations of sexual harassment against Mr Seagal.”
““The way you combat is by let's not ever do an interview again to show these c***suckers,” he said.”
“...unbelievable...”


"On September 2, 2020, a Palestinian woman reacts when an animal shed near Hebron, the West Bank occupied by Israel, is demolished by the Israeli army. Reuters world news photo on September 1, 2020, students protest the results of the presidential election, AFP reported through Getty world news photo on August 31, 2020"
"A month after the big bang in the neighboring port, the scanner detected a pulse and began to search for possible survivors. Agence France Presse photo: Getty world news, September 3, 2020, the full moon next to the statue of virgin del panecilo in Ecuador, photo: EPA world news... "
"This fast-moving glass fire destroyed more than 1000 acres of land and destroyed houses. Getty World News Photo Agency on September 26, 2020, a villager and a child prayed beside the body of a wild elephant, which officials said was electrocuted in the forest of LaNi reserve..."
"China will celebrate the national day of the founding of the people's Republic of China on October 1. Getty World News Photo Agency on September 27, 2020, the glass mountain hotel burns as a glass fire passes through St. Helena, California."
“… To front-line health care workers during the cowid 19 pandemic in Beijing, China.... "
"On September 28, 2020, a Chinese woman took a picture before a special flower show..."
"The news of the world in the picture shows all the news of the world pictures in the 50 150 news of the world pictures on September 30, 2020 Pope Francis prayed with the priest at the end of a limited public audience at the Vatican's San damasso courtyard, AFP passed the Getty news of the world in the picture on September 29..."
"After the Harvey Weinstein scandal, some women came forward and accused Siegel of sexual harassment."
"The way you fight is to let's not do another interview to show these c * * idiots," he said
“… Unbelievable... "



Number  801
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“L P”
“Many traders and bankers had a great year, thriving as markets swung, and they expected to be rewarded.”
“...making 1 million or more received for the first time as part of their 2020 compensation...”
“Instead of vesting in equal parts over a set period as such awards typically do these bonuses have a cliff vest provision making the shares eligible for sale only at the end of four years People familiar with the situation described an internal drama unfolding over the past couple of...”
“...weeks Initially the bank planned to apply the new pay structure broadly...”
“But veterans in investment banking and trading revolted upon hearing they d have to stay through 2024 to reap bonuses for 2020 and management agreed to exempt them Chief Executive Officer Brian Moynihan acknowledged the blowback in a Jan 27 interview on Bloomberg Television saying the change in policy didn...”
“...t work the way some people wanted it to so we fixed it Yet senior colleagues in corporate and commercial banking a less powerful cohort soon learned that their awards are still subject to the vesting restrictions...”
“That’s when the grousing began, the people said.”
“In recent days, employees have been gathering on calls to vent frustrations and discuss options.The decision touched a raw nerve.”
“Bank of America is torn by long-simmering jealousies and divisions among its staff of more than 200,000, many dating back to the shotgun marriage with Merrill Lynch in the 2008 financial crisis.”


“L P”
"A lot of traders and bankers have had a good year and are thriving with the volatility of the market, and they expect to be rewarded."
“… Receive 1 million or more for the first time as part of their 2020 compensation... "
"These bonuses are not granted in equal amounts within a specified period, as is usually the case with bonuses. Instead, there is a cliff like Grant clause, which stipulates that shares are only eligible for sale at the end of four years. People familiar with the situation describe it as an internal drama staged in the past few years..."
“… A few weeks ago, the bank planned to widely adopt the new pay structure... "
"But veterans of investment banking and trading expressed dissatisfaction when they heard that they would have to stay until 2024 to get a bonus in 2020, and management agreed to exempt them. Brian Moynihan, chief executive, admitted this kind of counterattack in an interview with Bloomberg Television on January 27, saying that there was no change in policy..."
“… We can't work the way some people want, so we solved the problem, but senior colleagues in enterprises and commercial banks, a weak group, soon learned that their rewards are still limited by Awards... "
"People say that's when they started complaining."
"In recent days, employees have been gathering on the phone to vent their dissatisfaction and discuss issues. The choice touched my nerves
"More than 200000 of Bank of America's employees have long been envious and divided, many of which date back to their gun fight marriage with Merrill Lynch during the 2008 financial crisis."



Number  802
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It is being seen as the UK’s response to the Time’s Up campaign in the US, which emerged out of the sexual abuse allegations against Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein.”
“The fund has been set up with the support of some of UK’s most high profile actors to “end the culture of harassment, abuse and impunity” and aims to raise £2 million via a crowdfunding site.”
“The Beauty and the Beast actress has since been joined by other stars including Keira Knightley, Emma Thomspon and Tom Hiddleston, who have donated sums ranging from £10,000 to £500 to the organisation.”
“The 27-year-old’s representatives confirmed to the Telegraph that she had given the large sum to the UK Justice and Equality Fund three days ago.”
“Actress and campaigner Emma Watson has donated £1 million to a new campaign aimed at ending sexual harassment in the UK.”


"This is seen as Britain's response to a massive campaign launched by time in the United States, which stems from sexual abuse charges against Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein."
"The fund was set up with the support of some of the UK's best-known actors to" end the culture of harassment, abuse and impunity "and aims to raise 2 million pounds through crowdfunding websites."
"Beauty and the beast" heroine Keira Knightley, Emma Thompson and Tom sidleston and other stars also joined the ranks, they donated 10000 to 500 pounds to the organization
"The 27 year old representative confirmed to the daily telegraph that she had donated the huge sum to the justice and equality foundation three days ago."
"Actress and activist Emma Watson has donated 1 million pounds to a new campaign to end sexual harassment in the UK."



Number  803
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Santa Monica California that he is seeing other people...”
“But he s a friend of mine and tells me lots of inside scoops Image zoom Credit Nick Viall Instagram Jones who liked Viall s photo on Instagram and left a flirty comment on Jan 6 with an eye rolling emoji and a heart hasn t shied away from her...”
“Last month, reports circulated that Jones, 40, and The Bachelor alum Nick Viall, 37, were seeing each other, and that he had recently celebrated her birthday alongside her Mad Men costars.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“While a source told PEOPLE in January that the pair is just friends, the actress is now opening up about the nature of her relationship with Viall.”
““He’s a friend of mine.”
“He’s super sweet,” Jones told Entertainment Tonight.”
““No, I’m single.”
“...love of the Bachelor franchise...”
“But I declined because I don t need to be humiliated WATCH The Bachelor s Vanessa Grimaldi Opens Up About What Went Wrong Between Her Nick Viall Since his split from Grimaldi over the summer the former Bachelor recently told PEOPLE at the Art of Elysium s Heaven Celebration in...”


"Santa Monica, California, he's dating people..."
"But he's a friend of mine who told me a lot of insider pictures about Nick Villar instagram Jones, who likes Villar's photos on instagram, and left a flirting comment on January 6 with rolling eyes and a heart that didn't evade her..."
Last month, it was reported that Jones, 40, was dating Nick Villar, a 37 year old single alumnus, who recently celebrated her birthday with the stars of mad men
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Although a source told people in January that they were just friends, the actress has now made public the nature of her relationship with Villar."
"He's a friend of mine."
"He's super cute," Jones told the entertainment tonight
"No, I'm single."
“… Bachelor's love... "
"But I refused because I didn't need to be humiliated to see Vanessa Grimaldi reveal what happened to Nick Villar since she broke up with Grimaldi in the summer "At the celebration of the art of heaven



Number  804
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We are doing it right now,” said RM, slyly making eyes at the audience.”
“(The band get their name from the acronym for the Korean term “Bangtan Sonyeondan,” or “bulletproof boy scouts” in English.)”
“...ever hooked up with one of their fans who call themselves the ARMY”
“RELATED VIDEO Why Jennifer Aniston Will Be Back on TV 13 Years After Friends and the Key Role Reese Witherspoon Will Play After learning the singers were fans of the show DeGeneres surprised the group with a slew of Friends souvenirs before asking them via an interpreter if they ve...”
“So thanks to my mother — she bought all the seasons [on] DVD!”RM said he started watching the show with Korean subtitles before switching over to English subtitles — and eventually removed all subtitles completely.”
“I thought I was kind of like, a victim at that time, but right now I’m the lucky one.”
““I think back in the days when I was like 14, 15, it was like a syndrome for all the Korean parents to make their kids watch Friends.”
““My English teacher was a sitcom — Friends,” he said.”
“On their daytime debut, member RM (formerly known as Rap Monster) revealed that he taught himself English by watching the iconic series, which ran from 1994-2004.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"We're doing it now," RM said, looking cunningly at the audience
(the name of the band comes from the Korean abbreviation "bangtan Sony Dan" or the English abbreviation "bullet boy scout")
“… Have you ever talked to a fan who calls himself the army? "
"Why does the video come back to TV 13 years after friends, and the key role Reese Witherspoon will play when she learns that the singer is a fan of the show? DeGeneres surprised the group with a lot of friends' souvenirs, and then asked them if they were interested through an interpreter
"Thanks to my mom - she bought all the seasonal DVDs! "RM said he started watching TV shows with Korean subtitles, then turned to English subtitles - and eventually completely removed all the subtitles."
"I thought I was a victim at the time, but now I'm lucky."
"I think when I was 14 or 15, it was like a syndrome for all Korean parents to let their children watch TV."
"My English teacher is a sitcom friend," he said
During their daytime premiere, member RM (formerly known as Rap monster) revealed that he taught himself English by watching the 1994-2004 classic series
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  805
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I can’t really say anything other than that.”A rep for Gottwald did not immediately reply to Rolling Stone’s request for comment.”
“We’ve clashed.”
“Without You The American Idol alum who has spoken out against Dr Luke nee Lukasz Sebastian Gottwald in the past made the revelation during a recent interview with Z100”
““I was making a point to the people working with me, going, ‘This is how much I don’t want to do this,'” she said.”
““I don’t care about the money.”
“I don t care about oh You re going to be the most famous person ever if you do this That s not what holds weight in my life Clarkson clarified that while Dr Luke did indeed pen the track...”
“...she made substantial changes to the song and rightfully should have been given co writing credit...”
““There’s a lot of times in my career where you don’t see my name on the song and that’s because sometimes I don’t write them,” she said.”
““A lot of times I do change the song in a way that probably you should ask for credit, but I don’t because the song was already great – I just made it more me.”
“I think a lot of artists steal credit a lot from writers, which I think is super crappy because that’s their livelihood.”But, “if I deserve it, I usually ask,” she continued.”


"I really can't say anything else." A representative of Gottwald did not immediately respond to rolling stone's request for comment
"We had a conflict."
"Without you, the alumnus of American Idol, he has publicly opposed Dr. Luke Ni lucasz Sebastian Gottwald in the past, which he revealed in a recent interview with Z100."
"I say to people who work with me, 'this is what I don't want to do,'" she said
"I don't care about money."
"I don't care. If you do, you'll be the most famous person ever. That's not the most important thing in my life. Clarkson clarified that although Dr. Luke did write this song..."
“…… She has made substantial changes to this song, which deserves the honor of CO creation... "
"There are a lot of times in my career when you don't see my name in songs because sometimes I don't write them," she said
"A lot of times, I do change this song, maybe you should ask for praise, but I don't, because it's great - I just make it more suitable for me."
"I think a lot of artists steal a lot of honors from writers, and I think it's very bad because it's their livelihood." But, "if I deserve it, I usually ask," she continued



Number  806
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Haute Living was proud to be the exclusive media partner of this event.”
“A-list guests — like Serena Williams, Adrienne Bailon, Domingo Zapata and Zuleyka Rivera, to name a few—walked the red carpet and grabbed their seats.”
“Kicking off Art Basel weekend, the Eden Roc Miami Beach Hotel dazzled with celebrities, musicians, artists, philanthropists and other distinguished guests as The Global Gift Gala returned to the Magic City.”
“In a night filled with passionate speeches, star-studded musical performances, a champagne reception and art auction, this charitable gala brought together hundreds of A-listers.”
“Global Gift Foundation Honorary Chairs Eva Longoria Bastón and Ricky Martin lead the event as they came together to raise money for hurricane recovery efforts in struggling Puerto Puerto.”
“Photo Credit: ExcslusiveAccess.NetWhen Hurricane Maria tore through Puerto Rico in September 2017 it brought tremendous devastation to the island.”
“After leaving all of its residents without power, The Global Gift Foundation, an organization committed to fighting poverty, health, education and social injustice, knew it needed to do something to help.”
“In response, it teamed up with the charitable organizations of its Honorary Chairs, the Eva Longoria Foundation and Ricky Martin Foundation, to host a star-studded gala that would raise money for a part of the United States that desperately needed our help.”
“Photo Credit: ExcslusiveAccess.NetA cocktail reception kicked off this sold-out event and glasses clinked as Miami’s most beautiful swirled around the Eden Roc Miami Beach Hotel ballroom donning the season’s most striking gowns.”
“The room was filled to the brim with partygoers who indulged under a magical setting of glittering chandeliers, deep purple mood lighting and fairytale-like flowers in blush pinks, reds and corals.”


"Senior life is proud to be the exclusive media partner of this event."
"First class guests - Serena Williams, Adrian Byron, Domingo sapata, and Zuleika Rivera - stepped on the red carpet and took their seats."
"The Eden ROC Miami Beach Hotel is packed with celebrities, musicians, artists, philanthropists and other VIPs as the Basel arts weekend kicks off and the global gift show returns to this magical city."
"On a night of passionate speeches, starry music performances, champagne parties and art auctions, the charity party brought together hundreds of first-line stars."
"Eva Longoria Baston, honorary president of the global gift foundation, and Ricky Martin jointly raised money for the hurricane recovery in struggling Puerto Rico and led the event."
"Photo source: ExcslusiveAccess.net In September 2017, hurricane "Maria" swept through Puerto Rico, bringing huge damage to the island. "
"The global endowment is an organization dedicated to the eradication of poverty, health, education and social injustice. After powering all residents, it knows what it needs to do to help them."
"In response, it collaborated with the Eva Longoria foundation and Ricky Martin foundation, the honorary chairman's charities, to hold a star studded party to raise money for parts of the United States that are in urgent need of our help."
"Photo source: ExcslusiveAccess.NetA The paper cocktail reception kicked off the sold out event, with glasses jingling as Miami's most beautiful ballroom spins around the ballroom of Eden rock Miami Beach Hotel in its most eye-catching dress of the season. "
The room was packed with partygoers, enjoying themselves in a magical setting of glittering chandeliers, deep purple ambience lights and fairy tale pink, red and coral flowers



Number  807
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Goldie Hawn and Amy Schumer share their 'Snatched' meet-cuteGoldie Hawn, Amy Schumer talk body image, being marginalized in Hollywood...”
“Happy anniversary (expletive)," she joked in her post.”
“"A year ago today I met the love of my life.”
“Meanwhile, Schumer opted for a more humorous approach.”
“This pic was taken in New Orleans and was the night I knew I wanted to spend my life with her."”
“We ended up spending 6 days in a row together.”
“"We both weren't looking for a relationship at the time, but something felt right from the very first night we met.”
“"A year ago I met the love of my life," Hanisch captioned a black-and-white picture.”
“Schumer and Hanisch made frequent appearances together on red carpets and ballpark kiss cams, celebrating their one-year anniversary in November with dueling Instagram posts.”
“From the looks of her Instagram, Schumer is keeping busy in the aftermath of her breakup: participating in table reads, singing karaoke and making press appearances with her Snatched on-screen mom, Goldie Hawn.”


"Goldie horn and Amy Schumer share their 'robbed' meeting - kutegoldie horn, Amy Schumer talk about body image, marginalized in Hollywood..."
"Happy Anniversary (curse)," she joked in her post
"A year ago today, I met the love of my life."
At the same time, Schumer chose a more humorous way
"This picture was taken in New Orleans, and that night I knew I wanted to spend my life with her."
"We ended up together for six days in a row."
"We didn't want to fall in love at that time, but we felt something from the night we first met."
"A year ago, I met the love of my life," Hanish wrote in a black-and-white photo
"Schumer and Hanish often appear together on the red carpet and baseball kissing cameras, and they duel on instagram in November to celebrate their first anniversary."
"On instagram, Schumer has been busy since her Breakup: playing board games, singing karaoke, and appearing in the media with her screen snatching mother, Goldie horn."



Number  808
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“BRB, we have to go jam out.”
“...a must listen...”
“...pic twitter com HvVpxRwtOm Her Campus HerCampus January 28 2018 SZA was nominated in the categories of best new artist best urban contemporary artist best R B song best R B performance and best rap sung performance so there s no question her critically acclaimed debut studio album Ctrl is...”
“...pic.twitter.com/1wdTKqkMaK — Mike Adam (@MikeAdamOnAir) January 28, 2018crying bc @sza brought her mom and grandma to the #grammys!!!”
“@SZA (accompanied by her mother and grandmother) talks about being in awe of attending the #GRAMMYs, and explains her team up with @Mastercard.”
“...pic.twitter.com/cz5ydC3E2H — Pop Crave (@PopCrave) January 28, 2018.”
“(also, SZA’s look... yes) pic.twitter.com/Hqm9NBAPfC — mikasa (@mikasa22) January 28, 2018SZA looks like an absolute PRINCESS at the 2018 #GRAMMYs Red Carpet!”
“Look how cute they are!”
“Fans on Twitter could not stop gushing about her dates and her dress:SZA brought her mom and her granny to the #GRAMMYs.”
“#GRAMMYs pic.twitter.com/7Nf99fi68u — DAILY SZA (@CampSZA) January 28, 2018In addition to being generally adorable with her family, the 27-year-old singer wore a stunning gown from the Atelier Versace Fall Couture 2017 line.”


"BRB, we have to get out."
“… You have to listen... "
“… Pic twitter com hvpxrwtom her campus on January 28, 2018, SZA was nominated as best newcomer, best city contemporary artist, best RB song, best RB performance and best rap performance, so there is no doubt that her first studio album "Ctrl is..."
“... pic.twitter.com/1wdTKqkMaK -Mike Adam (@ Mike Adam onair) crying on January 28, 2018 bc@sza Took her mom and grandma to Grammy! "
"@ SZA (accompanied by her mother and grandmother) talked about her awe of participating in the Grammy Awards and explained her cooperation with @ MasterCard."
“... pic.twitter.com/cz5ydC3E2H -Pop crave (@ popcrave) 28 January 2018. "
"And the expression of Sasha... (yes) pic.twitter.com/Hqm9NBAPfC -Mikasa (@ mikasa22) January 28, 2018 SZA looks like an absolute princess on the red carpet of the 2018 Grammy
"Look how lovely they are
Twitter fans keep talking about her dating and lifestyle: Sally, her mom and grandma go to Grammy
"Grammy Awards pic.twitter.com/7Nf99fi68u -Daily SZA (@ campsza) on January 28, 2018, the 27 year old singer wore a stunning dress from Versace fall Couture 2017 series studios in addition to being cute with her family. "



Number  809
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Honestly, she went in on Bette Midler,” Pink said, referring to Kardashians tweet slamming Midler for the Tony Award winner’s criticism over her NSFW selfie.”
“...throwing shade at the Keeping Up With the Kardashians star...”
“...problems so much so that they almost came to blows...”
“The pop star, 38, told Andy Cohen on Watch What Happens Live that while the two have made amends since their feud in the early 2000s, their relationship was very rocky.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We were super young and super new at the whole thing, and I think I’m an alpha, and she’s an alpha,” Pink said of their feud during the “Plead the Fifth” segment.”
“She continued, “I’m used to taking my altercations physical and she’s used to having them verbal.”
“We’re just very different, we’re very different.”
“And we were very young and new.”Image zoom“You have to learn — women have to learn how to support each other,” she added.”
““It’s not taught to each other in the playground.”When Cohen asked if Pink had attempted to make an argument into a physical fight, the pop star revealed, “Actually, she swung at me in a club.”


"To be honest, she likes Betty Midler," Pinker said, referring to Kardashian's Twitter attack on Midler, because the Tony prize winner criticized her for taking selfies at the all China Women's Federation
“… Cast a shadow over kardashan... "
“… There are so many problems that they almost burst out... "
The 38 year old pop star told Andy Cohen in "observe what's going on" that although the two have reformed after their feud at the beginning of the 21st century, their relationship is very unstable
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We're super young and super new in the whole thing, I think I'm alpha and she's alpha," Pinker said of their grudges in the "fifth plea" session
"She went on," I'm used to seeing my quarrels as physical, and she's used to speaking. "
"We're just very different, we're very different."
"We were young and new," she added. "Image scaling" you have to learn - women have to learn how to support each other
"It's not taught on the playground." When Cohen asked Pinker if she was trying to turn the quarrel into a physical conflict, the pop star revealed, "in fact, she waved at me in the club."



Number  810
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...with Entertainment Tonight on Thursday before revealing that North was not feeling the look...”
“RELATED VIDEO Kim Kardashian West Takes Saint and North to Disneyland See the Cute Mommy and Me Snaps Yesterday I took North to school and they had crazy hair day so I wore a blonde wig thinking I d be the cool grandma you know at school Kris 62 shared...”
“Image zoom Credit: Kim Kardashian/InstagramDays after enjoying some quality family time with her family in Wyoming, North traveled back home where she ended up having an embarrassing encounter with her grandmother Kris Jenner.”
“!” alongside the image.”
“Sharing a photo of one of her gifts, the mother of three gushed, “Look at this Wang bag that North got.”Enthusiastically, she added, “I’m stealing this !!!!”
“...already started receiving presents specifically two luxury handbags from Alexander Wang...”
“Image zoom Kanye West and Kim Kardashian West with children North Saint and Chicago Credit Kim Kardashian West Twitter While Kim Kardashian West and her husband have yet to give any hints on how they ll be celebrating North s upcoming birthday on June 15 the pair s daughter has...”
““Father, forgive me, I’m scared of the karma / ‘Cause now I see women as something to nurture / Not somethin’ to conquer,” West raps.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletterOn another song from the album, West opens up about how fatherhood changed his perspective on women — and how he hopes daughters North and Chicago, 19 weeks, don’t get treated unfairly as they grow up.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


“… On Thursday's entertainment show, before revealing that North didn't feel this way... "
"Related video Kim Kardashian west takes saint and north to Disneyland to see the snapshot of my lovely mother and me. Yesterday I took north to school. They have crazy hair, so I wore a golden wig. I thought I would be the cool grandma Kris 62 you met at school..."
"Credit for image zooming: after Kim Kardashian / instagram days had a wonderful family time with his family in Wyoming, North returned home and encountered embarrassment with his grandmother, Kris Jenner."
"!" next to the image. "
Sharing a picture of a gift, the mother of three gushed, "look at this royal bag Beiguo got." She added enthusiastically, "I'm stealing this!!"
“… Has begun to receive gifts, especially two luxury handbags from Alexander King... "
"Image zooming Kanye West and Kim Kardashian West, with their children North saint and Chicago credit card Kim Kardashian West, posted on twitter, while Kim Kardashian West and her husband have not disclosed how they will celebrate North's upcoming birthday on June 15, and their daughters have..."
"Father, forgive me, I'm afraid of karma, because now I see women as something to cultivate, not something to conquer," West said
"Click here to get these and more people to another song on the album, and West opens up about how the father changed his view of women - he wants his daughters north and Chicago, 19 weeks, not to be treated unfairly as they grow up."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  811
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But if history is any indication, Frozen 2 will almost certainly give hopeful LGBT fans the cold shoulder.”
“Others have been more generous in their assessment: “Ring The Alarm!” BuzzFeed declared.”
“...be Or when the director of the live action Beauty and the Beast remake promised an exclusively gay moment angering social conservatives only for Gaston s sidekick LeFou to be briefly spotted dancing with another man in the film s finale...”
“Remember when eagle eyed fans spotted a lesbian looking couple in the Finding Dory trailer creating mounting speculation that we d see definitively LGBT representation in a Pixar movie only for the film s co director to give the cop out answer They can be whatever you want them to...”
““ For the last few years now, Disney has walked a delicate tightrope between not shutting down LGBT fans who want to see better representation in their films and not pissing off homophobic viewers.”
“Disney has been down this road before.”
“If you think there’s a serious chance Elsa will find same-sex love in Arendelle, it’s probably best to let that hope go.”
““Elsa Might Have A Girlfriend In The ‘Frozen’ Sequel.” But it’s safe to say that we can un-ring that bell.”
“We’ll see where we go.”HuffPost correctly labeled that noncommittal response a “glimmer of hope” for the #GiveElsaAGirlfriend campaign, which sprouted up on social media in 2016.”
“It would be nice if Disney, like Elsa, could proclaim, “Let the storm rage on” and march forward.”


"But if there is any sign of history," frozen 2 "will almost certainly give LGBT fans a cold shoulder."
Others are more generous: "ring the alarm! "Buzzfeed has been declared."
“…… When the director of the remake of the reality show beauty and the beast angered social conservatives by promising a completely gay moment, only Gaston's partner, lefo, was briefly found dancing with another man at the end of the film... "
"Remember, when sharp eyed fans found a lesbian couple in the trailer of looking for dolly, more and more people speculated that in Pixar's films, we would definitely see representatives of LGBT. Only the co director of this film can give the answer of escape. They can be anything you want them to do..."
"Over the past few years, Disney has taken a delicate line between not shutting down gay fans who want to see better performance in movies and not irritating homophobic audiences."
"Disney used to walk this way."
"If you think that Elsa is likely to find homosexual love in arendel, it's better to give up that hope."
"Elsa may have a girlfriend in the sequel to frozen." But to be sure, we can cancel that ring. "
"We'll see." HuffPost rightly calls this noncommittal response "a glimmer of hope for the giversaa girl friend movement," which rose on social media in 2016
"It would be great if Disney, like Elsa, could announce 'let the storm continue' and move forward."



Number  812
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He also had a recurring role as Lt. Declan Murphy on NBC's Law & Order: Special Victims Unit.”
“Donal Logue stars as Detective Harvey Bullock on Gotham.”
“Police provided no details about how or where she was found.”
“Jade is transgender and was previously known as Arlo Logue.”
“He wrote on Facebook that the "net had been flung far and wide."”
“Logue had posted appeals to help find Jade on Facebook and Twitter after she disappeared on June 26.”
“The New York Police Department says 16-year-old Jade Logue was found Saturday.”
“Associated PressNEW YORK (AP) — The teenage daughter of actor Donal Logue has been found safe nearly two weeks after she went missing in New York City.”


"He also often plays Lieutenant Declan Murphy on NBC's law and order: special victims."
"Donnal Logue plays detective Harvey Bullock in Gotham."
"The police did not provide details of how or where she was found."
"Jed is transgender. His name used to be Arlo Logue."
"The Internet has been scattered all over the place," he wrote on Facebook
"After Jed disappeared on June 26, Logue made appeals on Facebook and Twitter to help find her."
"The New York Police Department said 16-year-old Jed Rogge was found Saturday."
"New York (AP) - the teenage daughter of actor Donal Logue was found safe nearly two weeks after she disappeared in New York City."



Number  813
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#MuteRKelly, the campaign that sparked Williams’ tirade on her show, has said that it is responsible for the cancellations of R. Kelly concerts in eight cities.”
“Kelly denied the accusations.”
““I’m sick of this #MeToo movement,” Williams said just over 15 minutes into her daytime show’s “Hot Topics” segment.”
““I love that people are speaking up for the first time and coming out and everything, but now it’s got — I look at all men like, ‘You’re a #MeToo.’ All of them.”
“All of them, which is not fair.”Earlier in the segment, the 53-year-old host also spoke about #MuteRKelly, a campaign started by two women to remove R. Kelly from the music industry.”
““What is this, 10 years too late?” Williams said.”
““It’s not going to work.”
“Black people aren’t really good at protesting.”
“Not since the King march.”The comment provoked this reaction from an audience member:"The Wendy Williams Show"Williams then addressed R. Kelly’s marriage to the late musician Aaliyah when she was 15.”
““The #MeToo movement hasn’t affected R. Kelly,” she said.”


"Muter Kelly, the controversial campaign on Williams' show, said it was responsible for the cancellation of R. Kelly's concerts in eight cities."
"Kelly denied the charges."
"I'm tired of this' metoo 'movement," Williams said in the first 15 minutes of the day's' hot topics' segment
"I like what people say for the first time, but now I see all the men like 'you're a me too', they are all."
"All this, it's not fair." Earlier, the 53 year old presenter talked about muter Kelly, a two woman campaign to remove R. Kelly from the music industry
"What's this, 10 years late? "Williams said
"It won't work."
"Black people are not really good at protesting."
"Not since the march of the king." "Wendy Williams show" Williams went on to talk about R. Kelly's marriage to the late musician Elia when he was 15
"The meto movement didn't affect R. Kelly," she said



Number  814
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: The Ellen ShowAlso during her Ellen Show appearance, Jenner was more than prepared to avoid the host’s prodding about her pregnant daughters Khloé Kardashian and Kylie Jenner.”
““I look like a lunatic!” the reality star said after jig was up.”
“From complaining about the cost of coconuts and razors to hysterically laughing out loud on command, Jenner played along all while trying to keep a low-profile wearing dark sunglasses and head-to-toe black.”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians matriarch had to follow every instruction and repeat every word the host told her during DeGeneres’ segment and was even forced to give one unsuspecting cashier a tough time during checkout.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“So the momager, 61, found herself in unfamiliar territory recently when Ellen DeGeneres sent her to a 99 Cents Only Store in Burbank, California, shop as part of the daytime talk show host’s hilarious hidden series, Ellen’s Show Me More Show, which aired on Friday.”
“Kris Jenner Was Hilariously Sent to Dollar Store by Ellen DeGeneres After Signing $150M TV DealKris Jenner gets a commission from her famous daughters’ business deals, thus making her a bonafide millionaire.”


"Image scaling credit: The Ellen show is also on show, and Jenner is very prepared to avoid the host's stimulation of her pregnant daughters, Carol Kardashian and Kelly Jenner."
"I look like a madman! "The reality star said after the gig."
"From complaining about the price of coconuts and razors to laughing hysterically out orders, Jenner has been trying to keep a low profile, wearing dark sunglasses and black from head to toe."
"The patriarch who keeps in touch with the Kardashian family must follow every instruction, repeat every word the host told her in the DeGeneres session, and even be forced to give a unsuspecting cashier a hard time when checking out."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"So the 61 year old mother recently found herself in a strange field, and Ellen DeGeneres sent her to a 99 cent store in Burbank, California, as part of the daytime talk show host's hilarious" hide "series, which aired on Friday."
"After signing a $150 million TV deal, Chris Jenner was funnily sent to a dollar store by Ellen DeGeneres. Chris Jenner got a commission from her famous daughter's business, which made her a real millionaire."



Number  815
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hit PLAY on an exclusive finale sneak peek above, then drop a comment with your hopes for the big Royals Wedding below.”
“...praying that the show is renewed for Round 5”
“It works so well for me In keeping with tradition Moseley adds that the episode leaves a huge dot dot dot at the end of the season introducing twists for every single character that will leave fans wishing hoping and...”
“We had an orchestra, we had a choir and I like the way we use [Radiohead’s ‘Creep’].”
“I also think we cut back a little on our budget for the first eight or nine episodes so that we could really give the Royal Wedding the substance and work that it needed.”
““So it definitely has an archaic, epic feel.”
““We were very fortunate that we filmed in Ely Cathedral, which is where The Crown did all of their interior cathedral shots,” he explains.”
“As for the wedding itself, Moseley tells TVLine it’s just as grandiose as you’d hope.”
“(For the record: The cast wrapped Season 4 in Sept. 2017, a full two months before Markle and the prince even announced their engagement, so it really came down to dumb luck.)”
“Star William Moseley is among those who “can’t believe” the incredible timing of the couple’s big day, which airs less than a week before Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s real-life nuptials.”


"Click play in the exclusive finale peek above, and then write down your hopes for the royal wedding in the comments below."
“… Pray for the fifth round to start again "
"It's very good for me and it's in line with the tradition," Mosley said, adding that the episode left a huge dot at the end of the season, introducing a tortuous plot for each character, which will make fans full of hope and hope... "
"We have an orchestra, we have a choir, and I like the way we use [Radiohead's creep]."
"I also think we've cut the budget for the first eight or nine episodes a little bit so that we can really provide the content and work needed for the royal wedding."
"So it definitely has an ancient, epic feel."
"We were very lucky that we took pictures at Erie Cathedral, where the crown took pictures of all the interior of the church," he explained
"As for the wedding itself, Mosley told tvline, it's as grand as you want it to be."
"(on record: the actors ended their fourth season in September 2017, and it was exactly two months before markel and the prince announced their engagement, so it was really bad luck.)
"Movie star William Moseley also" can't believe "the incredible timing of the couple's big day, less than a week before the actual wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle."



Number  816
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or, sometimes sunglasses just aren’t as good as we thought prior to purchasing them.”
“One of our favorites is “Jake laughing at his sandwich.” As he pointed out, sandwiches are hilarious.”
“In fact, he’s not on most social media sites.”
“But that doesn’t mean that there aren’t a few great parody sites out there.”
“Gyllenhaal referred to himself as a “drag and drop kind of guy” while appearing on Conan, saying that he knows computers, but not very well.”
“So, he kind of steers clear from anything more advanced than basic computing.”
“One of the best accounts out there is @JakeActivities, which happens to showcase funny photos of Gyllenhaal enjoying life.”
“The actor only recently heard about the website, and let’s just say he was pretty into it.”
“Surprisingly, @JakeActivities is still fairly new.”
“Hey, sometimes it’s just that sunny out.”


"Or, sometimes sunglasses are not as good as we thought before we bought them."
"One of our favorite is the jack laugh sandwich. As he pointed out, sandwiches are funny. "
"In fact, he's not on most social media sites."
"But that doesn't mean there aren't a few good copycat sites."
"In Conan, Gyllenhaal called himself a" drag and drop guy. "He said he knew computers, but he didn't know much about them."
"So he turned a blind eye to anything more advanced than basic computing."
"One of the best accounts is @ jakeactivities, which just shows interesting photos of Gyllenhaal enjoying life."
"The actor just heard about this website recently. It can be said that he likes it very much."
"Surprisingly, @ Jake's activity is quite new."
"Hey, sometimes it's sunny outside."



Number  817
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Che and Jost told ET they were “proud” to be the first duo to host the iconic award show since 1999 — when Jenna Elfman and David Hyde Pierce co-hosted.”
“"I think we are in for one of the funniest awards shows in a long time."”
“...of NBC Entertainment told Entertainment Tonight in April...”
“MICHAEL CHE COLIN JOST OF SNL TO HOST EMMY AWARDS NBC is thrilled to be the home of this year s Emmy Awards and with Colin and Michael in the driver s seat as hosts along with surprise appearances by other cast members of Saturday Night Live Robert Greenblatt chairman...”
“Months later, NBC announced Che and Jost will co-host the Emmy Awards in September.”
“They were named co-head writers of “SNL” in December.”
“The "SNL" stars have been anchoring “Weekend Update” for about four years.”
“Jost, who was smirking in the photo with his hands clasped, simply wrote, “Goddamit [sic].”Che replied with a crying-laughing emoji.”
“CELEBRITY LONG-TERM COUPLES WHO NEVER MARRIEDJohansson was caught looking at the camera with her mouth agape.”
“Jost, who turned 36 on Friday, sent Che a photo of himself sitting next to girlfriend Scarlett Johansson, 33, and wearing a balloon crown.”


Che and Jost told et they are proud to be the first duet to host the iconic awards ceremony since 1999, when Jenna Elfman and David Hyde pierce co hosted the ceremony
"I think we're going to take part in the most interesting award ceremony in a long time."
"NBC Entertainment's Tell tonight's entertainment in April... "
"Michael Che Colin Jost, who will host NBC's Emmy Awards, is very happy to be the host of this year's Emmy Awards. Colin and Michael will be the hosts, and other actors will be expected to attend the live broadcast of Robert Greenblatt on Saturday night Chairman of Greenblatt... "
A few months later, NBC announced that Che and Jost would co host the Emmy Awards in September
"They were named co chief writers of SNL last December."
"SNL stars have been hosting weekend update for four years."
"Jost's hands clenched and smiling in the photo, he simply wrote," Damn it. " He answered with a smile and cry
"A long-term celebrity partner who has never married Joe Hansen has been photographed opening his mouth to the camera."
Jost, who turned 36 on Friday, sent him a picture of himself sitting next to his 33 year old girlfriend, Scarlett Johnson, wearing a balloon crown



Number  818
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“Read more Lawyer for Olympic Gymnasts NDAs Allow Sexual Abuse to Fester In a statement posted Tuesday USA Gymnastics said USA Gymnastics has not sought and will not seek any money from McKayla Maroney for her brave statements made in describing her victimization and abuse by Larry Nassar nor for...”
“Everyday Americans get that no one should be silenced about child molestation.”
“So outraged that people were kindly offering to pay the six figure USAG penalty so McKayla could speak.”
“...attorney was unenforceable He also notes that The only reason this statement was issued is because people were outraged by USAG s behavior toward Ms Maroney and her family...”
“USA Gymnastics remains focused on our highest priority the safety health and well being of our athletes and creating a culture that empowers and supports them Maroney s lawyer John Manly said in response that USA Gymnastics finally acknowledges that the gag order they forced on Ms Maroney and her...”
“This has been her right and USA Gymnastics encourages McKayla and anyone who has been abused to speak out.”
“...any victim impact statements she wants to make to Larry Nassar at this hearing or at any subsequent hearings related to his sentencing...”
“Nassar is currently being sentenced in a Michigan court on counts of first degree sexual assault; dozens of his victims are testifying over several days at the sentencing hearing.”
“Simone Biles Gabby Douglas Aly Raisman and Maggie Nichols the organization in December also filed a request to dismiss the lawsuits in which they are named saying that while Nassar is liable to the plaintiffs USAG is not The group also said that Most of the plaintiffs failed to timely...”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
The American Gymnastics Association said in a statement Tuesday that it did not and will not ask for any money from mckeira Maroni because of her courageous statements about the injury and abuse of Larry Nasar
"Every day, Americans understand that no one should be silent about child molestation."
"People were very angry and kindly offered to pay a six figure fine from the U.S. government so that she could speak up."
“…… Lawyers are unenforceable, and he also pointed out that the only reason for this statement is that people are angry at the US government's actions against Ms. Maroni and her family... "
"The U.S. gymnastics team remains focused on our top priorities, namely, the safety, health and well-being of athletes, and the creation of a culture that can empower and support them. John Manley, Maloney's lawyer, said that the U.S. gymnastics team finally admitted that they had imposed an injunction on Ms. Maloney and her... "
"It's her right, and the American Gymnastics Association encourages mckeira and anyone who's been abused to say it."
“…… Any victim impact statement she would like to make to Larry Nasar at this hearing or any subsequent hearing related to his sentence... "
"Nasar is currently being sentenced in a Michigan Court for first-degree sexual assault; dozens of his victims have testified at several days of sentencing hearings."
"Simone biles Gabby Douglas aly raisman and Maggie Nichols also filed a request in December last year to dismiss their named lawsuit, saying that although Nassar was responsible for the plaintiff, usag was not the organization, and that most of the plaintiffs failed to act in time..."



Number  819
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...this vulgar behavior these crews aren t trust worthy this MTV family is a disgusting gang of power tripping failed producers executives who have failed...”
“As I become the best Farrah I can be I won t let a man or network be little me try to break me lie about who I am to my core I m bullied surrounded hurt by all the manipulation I no longer will allow as a protective mother...”
“After announcing she was “moving on” from the MTV series last month, blasting the show as “hateful” and “horrible,” the reality star is taking legal action, suing parent company Viacom for $5 million.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“According to court documents obtained by The Blast, Abraham claims she was fired because of her decision to work in the adult entertainment industry.”
“The 26-year-old previously released sex tapes with Vivid Entertainment in 2013 and 2014 with porn star James Deen, and since then, she has done adult webcam shows and appearances at strip clubs.”
“She has also endorsed sex toys.”
““We respect Farrah’s decision to pursue other endeavors and we wish her the best,” a Viacom spokesperson tells PEOPLE.”
“Regarding her suit the claims are without merit In the complaint Abraham who is mom to 8 year old daughter Sophia alleges Viacom wrongfully terminated her employment because she did not conform to gender stereotypes Image zoom Farrah Abraham Credit Rodrigo Varela Getty According to Abraham in October 2017 she...”
“...was confronted by 16 Pregnant and Teen Mom executive producer Morgan J Freeman at her Texas home where she alleges she was harassed humiliated discriminated against disrespected ridiculed degraded and sex shamed for her recent decision to pursue opportunities in the adult entertainment industry Abraham alleges Freeman and his production...”


“… This vulgar behavior of these staff members is not trustworthy, and this MTV family is a disgusting power to trip the failed producers and managers who failed the gang... "
"When I become the best Farah I can, I won't let a man or Internet ego try to break my lies, who am I at my core, I am bullied around, hurt all the manipulators, I'm no longer allowed to be a protective mother..."
The reality star announced last month that she would "move away" from the MTV series, lashing out at the show's "hateful" and "horror", and is taking legal action to sue parent company Viacom for $5 million in damages
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to court documents obtained by the explosion, Abraham claimed that she was fired because she decided to work in the adult entertainment industry."
"The 26 year old released lively and entertaining sex videos with porn star James deen in 2013 and 2014. Since then, she has done adult online video shows and appeared in strip clubs."
"She also supports sex toys."
A Viacom spokesman told people: "we respect Farah's decision, hope she can continue to work hard and wish her all the best."
"With regard to her lawsuit, the plaintiff, Abraham, the mother of her 8-year-old daughter Sophia, claimed that Viacom mistakenly terminated her job because she did not conform to gender stereotypes, which is groundless. According to Abraham, in October 2017, she... "
“…… At her home in Texas, she confronted Morgan J. Freeman, executive producer of 16 pregnant and underage mothers. She claimed that she had been harassed, humiliated, discriminated against, disrespected, ridiculed, belittled and sexually humiliated for her recent decision to seek opportunities in the adult entertainment industry. Abraham accused Freeman and her works... "



Number  820
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...disputed Sadler’s claims, saying that she and Kennedy had “different roles,” with Sadler focused on daytime while Kennedy worked in primetime and did red carpet coverage.”
“She will return to the show on Sept. 4, where she will join co-host Jason Kennedy.”
“News,” the cable network announced Friday.”
““Giuliana is an incredibly charismatic and well-respected entertainment journalist.”
“As a longtime member of the E!”
“...family, it’s exciting to welcome her back home to ‘E!”
“News,’” said John Najarian, executive vice president and general manager of news and digital for E!.”
““While ‘E!”
“News has seen massive growth across digital and social we have also continued to expand and elevate our television coverage and Giuliana is an excellent addition to our weeknight series which remains the most watched entertainment news franchise with young...”
“...women Rancic was previously the co host of the nigtly entertainment news show from 2005 2015”


“…… She refutes Sadler's claim that she and Kennedy have "different roles." Sadler focuses on the day, while Kennedy works in prime time and reports on the red carpet. "
"She will return to the show on September 4, when she will meet with co host Jason Kennedy."
"News," the cable network announced Friday
"Juliana is a glamorous and respected entertainment journalist."
"As a long-term member of E!"
“… Family, it's exciting to welcome her home
"News," E! John najarian, executive vice president and general manager of news and digital, said
"Now!"
"News has made great progress in digital and social fields, and we continue to expand and improve our TV coverage." Juliana "is an excellent supplement to our weekly series, which is still the most popular entertainment news series of young..."
“…… Women Rancic was co host of nightly entertainment news from 2005 to 2015



Number  821
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He later told colleagues how his wife had accompanied him to the London Olympics because she didn’t trust him to travel alone.”
“According to multiple accounts, independently corroborated by Variety, Lauer would invite women employed by NBC late at night to his hotel room while covering the Olympics in various cities over the years.”
“Lauer couldn’t be reached for comment.”
“It’s not clear if NBC is paying Lauer through the end of his contract, which expires in 2018.”
“1 in the ratings, and executives were eager to keep him happy.”
“For most of Lauer’s tenure at “Today,” the morning news show was No.”
“Several women told Variety they complained to executives at the network about Lauer’s behavior, which fell on deaf ears given the lucrative advertising surrounding “Today.” NBC declined to comment.”
“In a statement, NBC News Chairman Andy Lack called this the first complaint about Lauer’s behavior in more than 20 years and acknowledged that it may not be the last: “We were also presented with reason to believe that this may not have been an isolated incident,” Lack said.”
“The employee met with human resources at NBC on Monday night.”
“The cause of his dismissal, according to sources, was a detailed complaint from another current NBC employee about inappropriate sexual conduct from Lauer that started on a trip at the Sochi Olympics in 2014 and continued for several months.”


"He later told colleagues how his wife accompanied him to the London Olympics because she didn't trust him to travel alone."
"According to various reports independently confirmed by variety, Raul has invited women hired by NBC to his hotel room late at night when covering the Olympic Games in several cities for many years."
"Raul could not be reached for comment."
"It's not clear whether NBC will pay Raul before his contract expires, which expires in 2018."
"Top of the ratings, executives want to make him happy."
For most of Raul's time at today, morning news was not
Several women told variety magazine that they complained to the station's executives about Raul's behavior, which they turned a deaf ear to in view of today's lucrative advertising. NBC declined to comment
"In a statement, NBC News chairman Andy Lacker called this the first complaint against Raul's behavior in more than 20 years and admitted that this may not be the last:" we also have reason to believe that this may not be an isolated incident, "Lacker said
"The employee met with human resources at NBC on Monday night."
"According to the source, he was fired because of a detailed complaint by another NBC current employee about Raul's improper sexual behavior, which started with a trip to Sochi in 2014 and lasted for several months."



Number  822
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s the restriction.”The producers are also rumoured to be determined to bring back Adele to record the theme tune, after her song written for Skyfall became the first 007 theme to win a Grammy and a Golden Globe award.”
“If anything, the restriction is that it is incredibly time-consuming.”
“We’re done.”
““I’m over it at the moment.”
“...pic.twitter.com/tx8MqPhpnR — Edan Clay (@EdanClay) August 16, 2017The film garnered rave reviews but Craig, clearly frustrated with the promotional commitments that accompanied playing Bond, said he would rather “slit my wrists” than reprise the role.”
“Hurry the f*ck up!!!”
“Daniel Craig is coming back as BOND!”
“Thank f*cking GAWD!”
“However, Craig’s renewed enthusiasm for the role marks a change of mind after comments he made in 2015, following the release of Spectre.”
“It is not surprising news, as his return was first reported in July.”


"That's the limit." After Adele's song for "heaven" became the first 007 theme song to win the Grammy and Golden Globe Awards, the producers also rumored that they would decide to let her come back to record the theme song
"If there's any limitation, it's that it's very time-consuming."
"We're done."
"I'm past now."
“... pic.twitter.com/tx8MqPhpnR -Ethan clay (@ Edan clay) won acclaim on August 16, 2017, but Craig was clearly disappointed with his promotional promise to play bond, saying he would rather "cut his wrist" than play the role again
"Get up!"
"Daniel Craig will come back as bond!"
"Thank you, damn it!"
"However, Craig's renewed enthusiasm for the character marks a change of heart after he commented on the release of ghost in 2015."
"It's not surprising because his return was first reported in July."



Number  823
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Daddario closes out the video stating that the cast and crew of “Shadowhunters” stands for “love and kindness.”Watch below.”
““I think so many problematic phrases go unchallenged and they perpetuate negativity and hate and intolerance, and today I was part of that and I am truly, truly sorry,” Sherwood says in the video.”
“Sherwood, 27, posted a video on Instagram apologizing for his behavior calling it “disgusting and abhorrent.” Daddario stands beside him in the video but doesn’t speak during Sherwood’s apology.”
“I’m live,” Daddario replied.”
“Stop.”
“Matthew Daddario, who plays gay Shadowhunter Alec Lightwood, was talking to fans on Facebook Live on Tuesday when Sherwood greeted him off-camera saying,”What’s up f-g?”“Stop.”
“A post shared by Dom Sherwood (@domsherwood) on Jan 2, 2017 at 4:36pm PST“Shadowhunters” actor Dominic Sherwood has apologized after he was caught using a gay slur during a Facebook Live stream.”


Dadario ended the video by saying that the cast and crew of Shadow Hunter represent "love and kindness.". Look below
"I don't think a lot of problematic phrases have been questioned, they perpetuate negativity, hatred and intolerance, and today I'm a part of them, and I'm really, really sorry," Sherwood said in the video
Sherwood, 27, posted a video on instagram apologizing for his behavior, calling it "disgusting and hateful.". Dardario stands beside him in the video, but does not speak during Sherwood's apology
"I'm still alive," replied dardario
"Stop it."
Matthew dardardario plays Alec letwood, a gay shadow hunter. When he talks to fans on Facebook live on Tuesday, Sherwood greets him outside the camera and says, "what's the matter, F-G? "Stop it."
"DOM Sherwood (@ domsherwood) shared a post at 4:36 p.m. Pacific Standard Time (PST) on January 2, 2017 with Dominic Sherwood, the shadow hunter actor, who was found using homosexual abusive language in the Facebook live stream and apologized for this."



Number  824
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If Dr. Dubrow throws his hands in the air right now I’d be absolutely devastated.””
““Me getting my life back, me getting back into life, me being happy.”
““There is truly a lot hanging on this exam,” Kitaen says.”
““So I applaud Tawny for wanting to get rid of them.”Dubrow and Dr. Paul Nassif take Kitaen back to the examination room to see what they can do.”
““It’s unusual for an actress/entertainment-type person to not want to have implants anymore, but after a certain amount of time, you’re fed up with implants and the complications associated with them,” Dr. Terry Dubrow says.”
“And now the implants are down to the bottom of my rib cage.”Now Kitaen wants them out entirely.”
“So I go back to the doctors and say, ‘Look, they’re too big,’ [and they say] ‘Great, we’ll take them out and make your implants smaller.’ Within six months, the implants started slipping through the mesh.”
““And then it gets worse.”
““When I was under, the doctors took the liberty of putting in the size that they felt was going to suit me,” she says.”
“So Kitaen, who famously starred in Whitesnake’s “Here I Go Again” video, decided to get breast implants, but the doctors took advantage of her.”


"I would be shocked if Dr. dubro raised his hand in the air now."
"I've got my life back, I've got my life back, I'm happy."
"There's a lot of suspense about this exam," Kitaen said
"So I applaud for tany trying to get rid of them." Dubro and Dr. Paul nasif take Kitan back to the exam room to see what they can do
"It's unusual for an actor / entertainer not to want an implant anymore, but after a while, you're tired of it and the complications associated with it," Dr. Terry dubro said
"Now the implant is at the bottom of my chest." Now Kitan wants to take them all out
"So I went back to the doctor and said," look, they're too big. "(they said)" great. We'll take them out and make your implants smaller. " Within six months, the implants began to slide out of the net. "
"And then it's even worse."
"When I wasn't in the hospital, the doctors casually added the size they thought was right for me," she said
"So Kitaen, the famous star of Whitesnake's" I'm here again "video, decided to have breast augmentation surgery, but the doctors took advantage of her."



Number  825
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...source: Thenetng...”
“He told the police that he will do whatever it takes to be with Katy Perry and he had gone to her shows in Orlando, Tampa, Atlanta, Chicago and Grand Rapids over the past 20 days.”
“He had also tried to contact the singer on two of her shows in Canada.”
“According to E News, Pawel rushed into a restricted backstage area while Katy Perry was performing at the American Airlines Arena on Wednesday night.”
“He also had to face charges for Loitering and resisting arrest.”
“The 37 year old man had been stalking Katy Perry throughout her Witness Tour.”
“Pawel Jurski, Katy Perry’s fan and alleged stalker was arraigned before a court yesterday for aggravated assault and escape.”


“… Source: thenetng... "
"He told the police that he would do anything to be with Katie Perry. In the past 20 days, he's been to her shows in Orlando, Tampa, Atlanta, Chicago and Grand Rapids. "
"He also tried to contact the singers of her two shows in Canada."
While Katie Perry was performing on American Airlines stage on Wednesday night, Pavel stormed into a restricted backstage area, according to e-news
"He also has to face charges of loitering and resisting arrest."
"The 37 year old man has been following Katie Perry during her witness tour."
PAWEL jurski, a fan of Katie Perry and suspected stalker, was arraigned yesterday for a serious attack and escape



Number  826
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From Meagan Damoreadvertising...”
“In "Justice League," she'll sport a more armored and dangerous look than the far less menacing one above.”
“On Twitter, "Aquaman" director James Wan shared a new photo of Amber Heard's Mera, which shows the character in her full Atlantean outfit.”
“The costume appears to be directly inspired by her look in the comics.”
“The photo shows Mera in a skin-tight green outfit plated with scales.”
“At her waist, she wears her trademark Atlantean symbol, forged out of gold.”
“She appears to have just emerged from the water, as her long red hair is wet and her sleeves are dripping.”
“Lady MERA swept in from the sea.”
“First day with the exquisite Amber Heard.”
“(Shot by the talented @jasinboland ) pic.twitter.com/FWQANu0S12advertising— James Wan (@creepypuppet) May 18, 2017RELATED: Aquaman: Power Rangers’ Ludi Lin Cast as MurkAccording to Wan, the photo marks Heard's first day of filming on "Aquaman."”


"More from Meagan Damore advertising..."
"In alliance for justice, she will show much less threatening armor and dangerous expression than the one above."
"On twitter, aquarium director James Wan shared a new picture of amber Hurd's Myra in her full Atlantis outfit."
"The costume seems to be directly inspired by her style in the cartoon."
"This picture shows Meila in a green tights with scales on it."
She wore Atlantis in gold around her waist
"She seems to have just come out of the water. Her long red hair is wet and her sleeves are dripping."
"Madame Mera rushed in from the sea."
"On the first day, I heard with exquisite amber."
(by genius @ jasinboland) pic.twitter.com/fwqanu0s12 Advertisement - James Wan (@ creepyuppet) May 18, 2017 related report: Aquarium: Ludi Lin of the power cruiser plays Murka. According to Wan, this photo marks Hurd's first day of shooting at the aquarium



Number  827
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Alexander Bradley would say at trial that it was Hernandez who shot Daniel de Abreu and Safiro Furtado – and Hernandez’s lawyers would say it was Bradley who shot them.”
“That came only months after two Cape Verdean immigrants were gunned down in their car drive-by style after one of them bumped into Hernandez at a nightclub and spilled his drink.”
“It was very, very hard, and he was very, very angry.”
““He would rebel.”
““I didn’t know what to do for him,” his mother Terri said in the same story.”
“The aftermath “was a mess with a lot of family issues, fighting and disagreements,” Hernandez told USA TODAY Sports in 2009, when he was playing at Florida.”
“Dennis Hernandez was a high school custodian who died of complications arising from routine hernia surgery.”
“Answers are ultimately unknowable but clues abound, beginning with the unexpected death of his father in 2006 when Hernandez was 16.”
“...there to a dark side of malevolent violence and unfathomable anger...”
“Appeals Court likely to vacate Aaron Hernandez s murder conviction Aaron Hernandez lawyer Determined to find truth about untimely death Armchair psychologists will long speculate what took Hernandez from a top target for Tim Tebow in college football to a top target for Tom Brady in the NFL and from...”


"Alexander Bradley will say in court that Hernandez shot Daniel de Abreu and saffro futado - Hernandez's lawyers will say Bradley shot them."
"Just a few months ago, two Cape Verde immigrants collided with Hernandez in a nightclub and spilled drinks on the floor. They were shot dead in their driving style."
"It's very, very difficult. He's very, very angry."
"He will resist."
"I don't know what to do for him," his mother Terry said in the same story
In 2009, Hernandez, while playing football in Florida, told USA sports today: "what's going on" is a mess, with a lot of family problems, quarrels and differences. "
"Dennis Hernandez, a high school guardian, died of complications from routine hernia surgery."
"The answer is ultimately unknown, but there are plenty of clues, starting with the unexpected death of his father in 2006, when Hernandez was 16."
“…… The dark side of evil violence and unfathomable anger... "
"The court of appeal may quash the murder of Alan Hernandez, whose lawyers are determined to find out the truth about premature death. Psychologists who stand idly by will speculate for a long time what made Hernandez from Tim Tebo's number one goal in college football to Tom Brady's number one goal in NFL, and from..."



Number  828
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"I could not be more excited to welcome baby Ivey to this world.”
“Jamie Lynn Spears took to Instagram on Friday to share an adorable family photo of herself posing with siblings Britney and Bryan Spears, as well as all of their kids.”
“Britney, who looked cute and casual in a red top, posed on the edge of a couch next to her sons,12-year-old Sean Preston and 11-year-old Jayden James.”
“Jamie Lynn was positioned at the other end, while her oldest daughter, Maddie, who turns 10 next week, held her baby sister, Ivey Joan.”
“Bryan sat next to Britney, while his daughter, Sophia, sat on Sean's lap.”
“"♥️FAMILY♥️," Jamie Lynn captioned the shot, also tagging her husband, Jamie Watson, and her mom, Lynne Spears.”
“It seems the family reunion was in the works for a while, as Britney expressed her excitement over Jamie Lynn's bundle of joy in April.”
“Congrats to @jamielynnspears and the whole family - I love you all so much!!!"”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"I can't be more excited to welcome baby ivy to this world."
"Jamie Lynn spears shared a lovely picture of her family on instagram last Friday with her siblings Britney and Bryan spears and all their children."
Britney Spears looks cute and casual in her red coat. She is on the edge of the sofa with her sons, Sean Preston, 12, and Jaden James, 11
Jamie Lynn is placed at the other end, while her eldest daughter, Marty, who turns 10 next week, holds her little sister Ivy June
Brian sits next to Britney Spears, while his daughter Sophia sits on Sean's lap
“" ♥️ family ♥️ "Jamie Lynn made the title for the photo and tagged her husband Jamie Watson and her mother Lynn spears."
"Family reunion seems to have been brewing for some time, because Britney Spears expressed her excitement for Jamie Lynn's joy in April."
"Congratulations to @ jamielynnspears and the whole family - I love you so much!!"
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  829
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Filmography [ edit ]Telenovelas [ edit ]See also [ edit ]”
“[8][9] Oprah Winfrey welcomed her into the WW community[10] during her 2020 Vision: Your Life in Focus tour in Fort Lauderdale, Florida.”
“Her father recovered, but with only five percent of his heart working.”
“López was given immediate permission to travel to Puerto Rico and be with her father for as long as she needed.”
“During the recording of that soap opera, her father, Luis, a respected and successful undertaker, suffered a heart attack and had to be hospitalized and operated on.”
“Recent years [ edit ]In 2004, López participated in the soap opera Mujer de Madera.”
“López also participated in Mujer, Casos de la Vida Real, where she played a victim of rape that later turned lesbian.”
“She traveled to Mexico next, after the invitation by the producers to try out there, and became a superstar in that country as well, working in many top soap operas, including Camila and the national super hit Amigas y Rivales.”
“...in Communications from the University of the Sacred HeartAdulthood and fame [ edit ]After reaching the age of maturity, she came back, participating in several plays at Puerto Rico's Teatro Tapia, San Juan's premier and oldest theater, and getting the attention of Mexican producers.”
“She holds a B.A.”


"Cinematography [editor] TV novel [editor] see also [editor]"
"[8] [9] Oprah Winfrey's vision 2020 in Fort Lauderdale, Florida: welcome to the WW community in a life focused journey."
"Her father recovered, but only five percent of his heart was working."
"Lopez was immediately allowed to go to Puerto Rico and be with her father if she needed to."
During the recording of the soap opera, her father, Louis, a respected and successful undertaker, had a heart attack and had to be hospitalized for surgery
"In recent years, in 2004, Lopez took part in the soap opera mujer de Madera
"Lopez also appeared in real house, where she played a rape victim who later became a lesbian."
"After the producers invited her to audition in Mexico, she went to Mexico next time and became a superstar in Mexico, playing in many top soap operas, including" Camilla "and the national super hit" the competition between amigais and me. "
“…… In the exchange at Sacred Heart University, adult and famous [editor] after reaching mature age, she came back and participated in several plays at the Teatro Tapia theatre in Puerto Rico (the leading and oldest theatre in San Juan) and got the attention of Mexican producers. "
"She has a bachelor's degree."



Number  830
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But don’t fret, Salem the cat will also be making an appearance in the series.”
“The series also stars Lucy Davis as Hilda Spellman, Miranda Otto as Zelda Spellman, Jaz Sinclair as Rosalind Walker, and Michelle Gomez as Mary Wardell.”
“After months of watching Netflix’s Sabrina reboot slowly come together, we finally have our first official look at Kiernan Shipka as Sabrina Spellman…and she looks like she stepped right out of the Chilling Adventures of Sabrina comics.”
“Taking to Twitter to reveal that the Netflix series will *also* be called Chilling Adventures of Sabrina, showrunner Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa gave us a glimpse of the former Mad Men star in action as the titular teen witch.”
“The photo features a fully costumed Shipka perched on the director’s chair, looking over her shoulder.”
“While Shipka’s Sabrina looks like the sweetest teen witch in all the land, the photo is full of hints of the darkness to come.”
“If the dark shadows and creepy Chilling Adventures of Sabrina font embossed on the back of the director s chair aren t enough Aguirre Sacasa s tweet makes it pretty clear the upcoming series is something out of our teen...”
“...horror dreams...”
“"It’s official!”
“'Chilling Adventures of Sabrina' is our title!”


"But don't worry, Salem the cat will also be in the series."
The series also includes Lucy Davis as Hilda Spelman, Miranda Otto as Zelda Spelman, AZ Sinclair as Rosalind walker, and Michelle Gomez as Mary Waddell
"For several months, we have been watching Netflix's" Sabrina's restart "slowly come together, and finally have our first formal opportunity to regard Kirnan shipka as Sabrina Sperman She looks like she came out of the creepy Adventures of Sabrina comics
"It's revealed on twitter that Netflix series will also be called" chilling Adventures of Sabrina ", and host Roberto Aguirre sacasa shows us the former" mad men "star's elegant demeanor as a nameless witch."
"This photo features a well-dressed shipka sitting in the director's chair, looking over her shoulder."
"Although Sabrina in shipka looks like the cutest young witch in the world, this picture is full of hints of darkness in the future."
"If the dark shadow of Sabrina's typeface imprinted on the back of the director's chair and the thrilling adventure are not enough, Aguirre sacasa's Twitter shows quite clearly that the upcoming series is the work of our teenagers..."
“… "Horror dream..."
"It's official!"
"The adventures of Sabrina is our title!"



Number  831
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more about Carrie Underwood:Now, learn how to pull off red eye shadow:Don't forget to follow Allure on Instagram and Twitter.”
“Sounds about right, doesn't it?”
“"I am invincible, unbreakable / Unstoppable, unshakeable / They knock me down, I get up again / I am the champion," she sings alongside Ludacris on the track.”
“In addition to the partial selfies she's shared, Underwood also appeared in a video for her new song, "The Champion," which has lyrics that hit seriously close to home.”
“She later shared that she was recovering well, but "not quite looking the same."”
“I’ll spare you the gruesome details, but when I came out of surgery the night of my fall, the doctor told [Underwood’s husband] Mike [Fisher] that he had put between 40 and 50 stitches in."”
“"In addition to breaking my wrist, I somehow managed to injure my face as well.”
“It's crazy how a freak random accident can change your life," she wrote in a letter to her fan club, People reported.”
“"There is also another part of the story that I haven't been ready to talk about since I have still been living it and there has been much uncertainty as to how things will end up.”
“In January, Underwood opened up about how she was feeling in the wake of the fall and her medical treatment.”


"Read more about Carrie's book: Underwood: now, learn how to remove the red eye shadow: don't forget to focus on seduction on Instagram and Twitter.
"That sounds good, doesn't it?"
"I'm invincible, unstoppable / unstoppable, unstoppable / they knocked me down, I got up again / I'm the champion," she sang with Ludacris on the track
"In addition to sharing some of the self portraits, Underwood also appeared in the video of the new song champion, whose lyrics are very popular in China."
She later said she recovered well, but "it doesn't look the same."
"I don't want to tell you the terrible details, but when I finished the operation the night I fell, the doctor told (Underwood's husband) Mike (Fisher) that he had 40 to 50 stitches."
"Besides breaking my wrist, I managed to hurt my face."
"It's crazy that a strange random accident can change your life," she said in a letter to the fan club, according to people
"There's still a part of the story I'm not ready to talk about, because I'm still living in the story, and there's a lot of uncertainty about the outcome."
"In January of this year, Underwood disclosed his feelings and medical conditions after the fall."



Number  832
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...happens contact the U S Embassy American Citizen Services...”
“She told the Daily Mail in an email that she and the group are doing okay and she is truly unclear of how far these individuals will go as I was physically intimidated and threatened in emails She warns others to investigate as much as possible beforehand and if anything...”
“Michaels found the boat through an online company and was traveling with friends, family members and her daughter.”
“She claims she is being scammed and held hostage.”
“In a video sent to the Daily Mail, Michaels is seen arguing with a crew member and is insisting the interaction be filmed.”
“The 43-year-old trainer said the crew demanded extra money for fuel because the “gas cash had been drained by mobsters in Capri,” writes the Daily Mail.”
“The fitness star opened up on Facebook saying she had chartered a boat for 12 days for $60k, but when she arrived on Tuesday, the boat was rusted and damaged.”
“While vacationing in Italy, Jillian Michaels claims a yacht crew member tried to extort her through an “aggressive and threatening” exchange.”


“… Contact the U.S. citizen service at the U.S. Embassy... "
"She told the daily mail in an email that she and the organization have done a good job. She really doesn't know how far these people will go because I have been physically intimidated and threatened in the email. She warned other people to investigate in advance as much as possible if anything happened..."
"Michael found the boat through an Internet company while traveling with friends, family and daughter."
"She claimed to have been cheated and taken hostage."
"In a video sent to the daily mail, Michaels was seen arguing with a crew member and insisted on filming the interaction."
The 43 year old coach said the crew demanded extra fuel because "the gas cash has been drained by Capri's mobs," the daily mail wrote
"The fitness star said publicly on Facebook that she had rented a boat for $60000 for 12 days, but when she arrived on Tuesday, it was rusty and damaged."
While on holiday in Italy, Gillian Michaels claimed that a yacht crew tried to blackmail her in exchange for "aggressive threats."



Number  833
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Talk about missing the point.”
“ReplyThreadLinkDead at her crediting Bo Derek for the originator of this look.”
“Reply Parent Thread Link no i said that because its funny to see the day and night change on here with opinions of her change suddenly its validated ofc Reply Parent Thread Link random but i remember somebody asked me...”
“ReplyParentThreadLinkIt's more like ONTD just seems to forget, like high school where you're all bff with somebody one day, and then the next day she's a bitch eating a cracker.”
“...and preferences...”
“I know we have to pick a job we have to do for the rest of our lives at way too early age and are supposed to stick with it but I never understand this train of thought for opinions...”
“...of an action...”
“They ve been around in all cultures of the world including whites for millennia Reply Parent Thread Expand Link didnt the majority of yall use to like her lmao Reply Thread Link So she can t be not liked because...”
“Braids don't belong to one race.”
“ReplyParentThreadLinkSame.”


"Say the wrong thing."
"She said that bodric was the creator of the expression, and she was shocked."
"There is no reply to the parent thread link, I said, because it's interesting to see the change of day and night and her opinion change here. Suddenly its verification OFC replies to the parent thread link randomly, but I remember someone asked me..."
"Representthreadlink it's more like ontd. It seems to have forgotten, just like in high school, one day you and someone were good friends, and then the next day she became a cookie bitches."
“… And preferences... "
"I know that we have to choose a job, we have to be too young for the rest of our life and should stick to it, but I never understand this idea of opinion..."
“… An action... "
"They have appeared in all the cultures in the world for thousands of years, including white people's reply to parent thread extension links. Not most Yar like her lmao reply thread links, so she can't help being liked, because..."
"Braids don't belong to one race."
“ReplyParentThreadLinkSame。”



Number  834
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Extra's” AJ Calloway recently headed to New Orleans to visit with Jada, Queen Latifah, Regina Hall and Tiffany Haddish on the set of “Girls Trip.” Watch!”
“The last time they co-starred in a movie was 20 years ago, in the film “Set It Off.”Over the past two decades, Jada has been “raising a couple of kids,” but she still found time to work with Latifah on a few projects off camera.”
““Extra's” Charissa Thompson hung out with Jada Pinkett Smith and Queen Latifah as they promoted their new film “Girls Trip.”“Girls Trip” gave them the chance to work together again on the big screen.”


"Extra's" AJ Calloway recently went to New Orleans and visited Jada, Queen Latifah, Regina hall and Tiffany haddish on the set of "girls trip". Look
"The last time they co starred in a movie was 20 years ago, in the movie detonate. In the past 20 years, Jada has been "raising a few children", but she still has time to work with Latifa on some private projects
"Extra's" Charlie Thompson, Jada pinkert Smith and Quinn Latifah are working together to promote their new film "journey of girls.". "Girl's journey" gives them a chance to work together again on the big screen



**Something goes wrong**
“For no one has there been any closure or clarity.”
““It’s like a sudden death.”
““I left our home to work on a movie, and while I was away, my boyfriend got married, and I’ve never heard from him again,” she said, via ABC News.”
“Dern opened up about her 1999 split from Thornton – when he famously left her for Angelina Jolie – during a past interview with Talk magazine.”
“As the Goliath actor, 62, briefly walked behind Dern on his way to the stage to accept an award, the exes appeared to avoid eye contact and Dern briefly looked down.”
“In January, the actress had a brief awkward run-in with her ex-fiancé Billy Bob Thornton at the 2017 Golden Globe Awards.”
“Davis’ wife of three years, Isabella Brewster, filed for divorce in June and requested primary physical and joint legal custody of their 3-year-old and 1-year-old children.”
“...love Since her split from Harper Dern has remained relatively mum about her romantic life although she was reportedly linked to Common last year...”
“Although Dern who divorced Ben Harper in 2013 after eight years of marriage was trying to remain incognito says the observer they were kissing and touching and were all over each other The duo said the eyewitness looked infatuated with each other and very much like a new couple in...”
“An eyewitness tells Us Weekly that following a lunch date where the pair were “talking, laughing and having a great time,” the athlete, 38, carried the actress’ purse as the duo packed on PDA.”


"Because no one has any end or clarity."
"It's like sudden death."
"I left home to make a movie, and while I was away, my boyfriend got married, and I never heard from him again," she said through ABC News
"In her last interview with talk magazine, Dean disclosed that she broke up with Thornton in 1999 when he left her to the famous Angelina Jolie."
"When the 62 year old Goliath actor briefly walked behind Dean on his way to the stage to receive the award, the two predecessors seemed to avoid eye contact, and Dean looked down briefly."
"In January this year, the actress had a brief and embarrassing run in with her ex fiance Billy Bob Thornton at the 2017 Golden Globe Awards."
Isabella Brewster, Davis's wife of three years, filed for divorce in June, demanding primary physical and joint legal custody of their 3-year-old and 1-year-old children
“…… Since her breakup with Harper Dean, love has been silent about her romantic life, despite reports last year that she was associated with putongtong... "
"Although Dean, who divorced Ben Harper in 2013 after eight years of marriage, tried to remain anonymous, the observer said that they were kissing and touching, and they were very close to each other. The two said that the eyewitness seemed to be infatuated with each other, very much like a couple in "I'm a new man."
"A witness told us weekly that after a lunch date, the two" had a good time talking and having a good time. "The 38 year old athlete was carrying the actress's wallet, and they packed with a PDA



Number  836
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“However, there may still be trouble ahead: PEOPLE’s exclusive look at the rest of the season showed Bella questioning if she needed to call off the wedding again due to “deeper problems.””
“Earlier this month, Cena also publicly confirmed that after years of insisting he had no desire to start a family, he’d had a change of heart, and vowed to get his vasectomy reversed.”
“In a sneak peek at Sunday’s episode of Total Bellas, the 34-year-old wrestles with an important question: Who should walk her down the aisle?”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Discussing the matter with her family the pro wrestler reveals that she s still not sure what to do even though she s been thinking a lot about it While her grandmother automatically assumes Nikki s brother JJ Garcia would be the one to stand beside her on the big...”
“...day her sister Brie thinks their mom Kathy Colace should get the honor...”
““I’m just saying it would make Mom super happy.”
“I think it would make her life,” Brie, 34, says, adding that when she had discussed the prospect of Nikki’s dad walking her down the aisle, their mother “kind of got a bit of attitude” about it.”
““It’s my wedding, though,” Nikki noted, as she pointed out that the “big” and “very emotional decision” was up to her.”
“Image zoom Nikki BellaMeanwhile, her fiancé John Cena thinks that instead of her father or JJ walking her down the aisle, it should be her sister Brie.”


"However, there may still be trouble in the future: exclusive coverage of the rest of the season shows that Bella questions the need to cancel the wedding again because of" deeper issues. "
"Earlier this month, senna also publicly confirmed that he had insisted for years that he did not want to have a family, but he had changed his mind and vowed to withdraw the vasectomy."
In Sunday's complete Bella, the 34 year old has an important question: who should accompany her up the aisle
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When discussing this with her family, the professional wrestler revealed that although she had been thinking about it, she still didn't know what to do, and her grandmother naturally thought that Nikki's brother JJ Garcia would be the big man standing beside her..."
“… One day her sister Bree thought their mother, Kathy CORAS, deserved the honor. "
"I just said it would make mom super happy."
"I think it will make her life better," Bree, 34, said She also said that when she discussed the prospect of Nikki's father accompanying her to the wedding, their mother had "a bit of an attitude" toward it
"But it's my wedding," Nikki points out, noting that "big" and "very emotional decisions" are up to her
At the same time, her fiance, John seiner, thought it was her sister Bree, not her father or JJ, who accompanied her down the aisle



Number  837
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“9.”
“Needless to say, it'd probably be best for these ladies not to vacation together ever again.”
“3.”
“That moment was truly priceless.”
“And who could ever forget Shereé Whitfield and Marlo Hampton's bizarre mimicking match where they mumbled and made weird faces at one another?”
“For starters, there was a huge controversy over whether or not Kim Zolciak "would hold a black baby," despite Kim's absence from the vacation.”
“Cape Town, South Africa (RHOA, Season 4)The drama was seemingly endless during Real Housewives of Atlanta's trip to Cape Town, South Africa.”
“2.”
“After revealing that the the man was a friend of hers, Luann De Lesseps uttered perhaps one of the most iconic lines in Housewives history, telling the ladies, "Don't be all, like... uncool" about the situation.”
“Turks & Caicos (RHONY, Season 7)There was a moment during Real Housewives of New York's Turks & Caicos vacay when Heather Thomson and Carole Radziwill became freaked out about a naked man sleeping in their vacation house.”


“9.”
"Needless to say, it's better for these ladies not to go on holiday together again."
“3.”
"That moment was priceless."
"Who else can forget Shelley Whitfield and Marlow Hampton's strange imitation game, they murmur to themselves and make faces at each other?"
"First of all, despite Kim Jong Il's absence from vacation, there is a huge controversy about whether Kim zorchak" will hold a black baby. "
"Cape Town, South Africa (RhoA, Q4) in the real housewife, a trip from Atlanta to Cape Town, the play seems endless."
“2.”
After revealing that the man was her friend, LuAnn de Lesseps uttered perhaps the most representative line in the history of housewives, telling women, "come on, it's like... Not calm "situation
"The Turks and Caicos Islands (rhony, season 7) in real housewives in the Turks and Caicos Islands, New York, there was a time when Heather Thomson and Carol laziwell were scared by a naked man sleeping in their vacation home."



Number  838
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Chrissy Teigen Poses With Daughter Luna in NYC and It’s Too Cute: ‘My Stoop Buddy’For more on how Teigen and Legend keep their love strong, watch the video below.”
“The tour will extend through June 30th before heading overseas.”
“SnapchatThe adorable family of three visited the Miami Seaquarium prior to the "Love Me Now" singer's kickoff show in Miami.”
“SnapchatSnapchatThe finished product hilariously read, "It's a prank, bruh," in jet-black ink.”
“Teigen, who has joined Legend on his Darkness and Light Tour, then posted a series of snaps where she is seen almost baring her booty in a pair of nude bikini briefs.”
“"John, don't be jealous."”
“Snapchat"John got to dance with a woman at his concert, so Chrissy gets to take on a man and hold hands with him," a friend's voice can be heard saying in another video.”
“Chrissy Teigen Jokes 'Everything Is Fake About Me Except My Cheeks,' Has 'No Regrets' About Plastic SurgeryThe Lip Sync Battle co-host then recruited a stranger named Eddie to join her on the temporary tattoo excursion.”
“"And you guys get to pick your ultimate henna on my lower back."”
“"I'm Chrissy Teigen," she said, while holding her 1-year-old daughter, Luna, in a video posted to Snapchat on Saturday.”


"Chris tegan and her daughter Luna are taking pictures in New York. It's so cute: 'my running dog' to learn more about tegan and legend how to keep their love, please see the video below."
"The trip will last until June 30, and then overseas."
The lovely family of three visited Miami ocean square before the "love me" singer's show in Miami
Snapchat finished product comically wrote in black ink: "it's a prank, brother."
Tegan joined legend's dark and light journey, then released a series of photos, people saw her wearing a naked bikini underwear, almost revealing her booty
"Don't be jealous, John."
"Snapchat" John dances with a woman at the concert, so Chris can hold hands with a man, "a friend's voice said in another video
"Chris tegan joked that" everything I have is fake except my cheek. "The co host of" no regrets "for plastic surgery and" simultaneous lip battle "later recruited a stranger named Eddie to join her temporary tattoo tour
"You can pick your henna on my back."
"I'm Chris tegan," she said, holding her 1-year-old daughter, Luna, who uploaded the video to snapchat on Saturday



Number  839
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“In a new interview with Byrdie Beauty, the Pretty Little Liars star reveals that after years of being in the Hollywood party scene, she decided to quit drinking.”
““I’m just always trying to surround myself with better people and be the best version of myself possible,” she says.”
“I know it sounds obnoxious to hear people say that but why not In place of the drink for Lucy these days quality time with her dog watching Big Little Lies great choice podcasts and SoulCycle which she says she signed up for after watching an episode of PLL some...”
“...years ago...”
““I went through a phase that was almost like my freshman 15,” she tells Byrdie.”
““It’s so weird to see your weight fluctuate on a TV show.”Lucy as Aria Montgomery on season six of Pretty Little Liars.”
“Disney ABC Television GroupLucy, who will officially say goodbye to Aria and company when PLL airs its series finale in June, also opens up about the struggles she had when the show first started.”
“She tried to be the social butterfly but discovered it wasn’t her style.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"In the latest interview with bady Belle, the beautiful little liar star revealed that after years at Hollywood parties, she decided to quit drinking."
"I always try to have better people around me and be the best I can be," she said
"I know that sounds annoying, but why not replace Lucy's drink? These days, Lucy and her dog watch big lies, selected podcasts and soul cycle together. She said that she signed up after watching an episode of PLL some... "
“… Many years ago
"I went through almost the same stage as my 15-year-old freshman," she told byrdie
"It's strange to see your weight fluctuate on TV." Lucy plays aliya Montgomery in the sixth season of little liar
"Disney ABC TV Group Lucy will officially bid farewell to aria and company when PLL broadcasts the finale of her series in June, and she also disclosed her struggle at the beginning of the show."
"She tried to be a social butterfly, but found that was not her style."



Number  840
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Co-host and comedienne Danielle Schneider shared with listeners, “Our dear friend Casey Rose Wilson has given birth to a little baby boy while we were recording the podcast, you guys this is so exciting.”Follow @htshowbiz for more...”
“ A post shared by Casey Wilson (@caseyrosewilson) on Aug 26, 2017 at 3:52pm PDTThe news of the couple welcoming a baby boy together was announced earlier this week on Casey’s podcast, Bitch Sesh.”
“Along with the cute photo of the trio, the “Happy Endings” star wrote, “Henry Bear Caspe is here!”Henry Bear Caspe is here!”
“The 36-year-old star, who already has two-year-old son Max Red with husband David Caspe, posted on Instagram a picture of herself accompanied by David and their little one.”
“Actor Casey Wilson shared the first photo of her newborn son Henry Bear Caspe.”


Co host and comedian Danielle Schneider shared with the audience: "our dear friend Kathy Ross Wilson gave birth to a little boy while recording the podcast. It's so exciting for you." Follow @ htshowbiz for more information... "
"Casey Wilson (@ Casey rosewilson) published an article at 3:52 p.m. on August 26, 2017. The couple announced that they would welcome a baby boy together on her podcast bite Sesh."
In addition to the lovely photos of the three, the "happy ending" star wrote: "here comes Henry belkasp! "Here comes Henry belkasp!"
"The 36 year old star, who has a two-year-old son, Max reed, with her husband, David Casper, posted a photo of herself with David and their youngest son on instagram
"Actor Kathy Wilson shared the first picture of her new son, Henry belkasp."



Number  841
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pledge never to go to a circus that uses animals now!”
“Never forget: Every ticket funds cruelty to animals.”
“Encourage your friends and family members to pledge not to buy tickets to animal circuses by sharing this page!”
“If one is scheduled to come to your town, you can call on authorities to cancel it and, if it goes ahead, demonstrate outside the show.”
“Watch our behind-the-scenes video to hear Juan Pablo explain why kids shouldn’t be taken to circuses that use animals:Please never patronize animal circuses.”
““To see what things are done to them in the circus is really upsetting,” he says.”
“Many big cats are forced to eat, drink, sleep, defecate, and urinate in the same small space.”
“Juan Pablo discusses his love for felines, including lions and tigers, whom circuses cart from town to town in barren cages, denying them the opportunity to fulfill their basic needs to exercise, roam, socialize, forage, and play.”
“Bears, elephants, tigers, and other animals don’t voluntarily ride bicycles, stand on their heads, balance on balls, jump through rings of fire, or perform other confusing tricks—they do so because they’re afraid of the painful punishment they’ll endure if they refuse.”
““What we see in the circus is just a fraction of what these poor animals have to go through,” he says.”


"Swear never to go to the circus, now use animals!"
"Don't forget: every ticket supports animal abuse."
"By sharing this page, encourage your friends and family to promise not to buy tickets for the animal circus!"
"If someone is arranged to come to your town, you can appeal to the authorities to cancel it, and if you continue, you can demonstrate outside the show."
"Watch our behind the scenes video and listen to Juan Pablo explain why you shouldn't take the kids to the circus because the circus uses animals: please never patronize the animal circus."
"It's really sad to see what they're doing in the circus," he said
Many large cats are forced to eat, drink, sleep and defecate in the same narrow space
Juan Pablo describes his love for cats, including lions and tigers, which are transported from one town to another by the circus in barren cages, depriving them of the opportunity to meet their basic needs such as sports, roaming, socializing, foraging and playing
"Bears, elephants, tigers and other animals don't voluntarily ride bicycles, stand head down, balance on the ball, jump the ring of fire, or perform other confusing tricks because they fear painful punishment if they refuse."
"What we see in the circus is just a small part of what these poor animals have to go through," he said



Number  842
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Season 7 is currently averaging a 0.5 rating in adults 18-49 and 2.4 million viewers, down over 40% in the demo and over 20% in total viewers from Season 6.”
“The show also moved from its longtime Sunday night timeslot to Fridays, where it has suffered a noticeable ratings decline.”
“The seventh season was a creative reboot for the show, which lost core cast members like Morrison when their contracts ended after the sixth season.”
“ABC announced in February that “Once Upon a Time’s” seventh season would be the show’s last.”
“Previously, Tony Amendola, Lee Arenberg, JoAnna Garcia Swisher, Robbie Kay, Sean Maguire, Victoria Smurfit, Keegan Tracy, Beverley Elliott, and Jared Gilmore were all confirmed to appear in the final two episodes.”
“The four are the latest former cast members to book returns for the show’s finale.”
“Dallas starred as Prince Charming/David Nolan, and de Ravin played Belle/Lacey.”
“Morrison played Emma Swan in the series, while Goodwin played Snow White/Mary Margaret Blanchard.”
“All four of the actors departed the ABC fairy tale series after its sixth season.”
“Former “Once Upon a Time” stars Jennifer Morrison, Ginner Goodwin, Josh Dallas, and Emilie de Ravin have all been confirmed to return for the show’s final episode, which is set to air on May 18.”


"In the seventh season, the average audience rating among adults aged 18-49 is 0.5, with an audience of 2.4 million, a drop of more than 40% in the demonstration, and a drop of more than 20% in the total audience in the sixth season."
"The show has also shifted from the long-term Sunday evening period to Friday, and the audience rating has dropped significantly."
"The seventh season is the creative restart of the play. After the end of the sixth season, the contracts of core actors such as Morrison were terminated, and the play lost them."
ABC announced in February that the seventh season of the play will be its last
"Previously, Tony amundola, Lee Arenberg, Joanna Garcia Swisher, Robbie Kay, Sean Maguire, Victoria Smurfs, Keegan Tracy, Beverly Elliott and Jared Gilmore were confirmed in the last two episodes."
"These four are the latest batch of former actors to book a return for the play's ending."
"Dallas as as prince charming / David Nolan, delavin as bell / Lacey."
Morrison plays Emma Swan and Goodwin plays Snow White / Mary Margaret Blanchard
"After the sixth season of ABC Fairy Tale series, all four actors left."
Former "once upon a time" stars Jennifer Morrison, Gina Goodwin, Josh Dallas and Emily delavin have all confirmed that they will return to the final episode broadcast on May 18



Number  843
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The bells of happiness are ringing right now.”USA TODAY has reached out to Jones' representatives for comment.”
““The extra heat is from the sun shining on my heart.”
““There appears to be a heatwave going across the Midwest,” she wrote on Instagram in June, showing off her ring in a photo.”
“Jones got engaged last year to the attorney, and regularly shows off their relationship on social media.”
“Our #AnthemToLove has officially begun on the #AnthemOfTheSeas," she wrote, referencing the cruise ship on which the happy couple was married.”
“"Yesterday was my birthday...and today is our wedding day at sea!”
“Jones shared several peeks of the Royal Caribbean cruise that hosted the ceremony, as well as her 56th birthday celebrations, on Instagram.”
“Maeve McDermottUSA TODAYCongratulations are in order to former TV personality Star Jones, who married her fiancé Ricardo Lugo on Sunday.”


"The bell of happiness is ringing." USA today has contacted Jones' representative for comments
"The extra heat comes from the sun shining on my heart."
"There seems to be a heat wave sweeping the Midwest," she wrote on instagram in June She showed her ring in a photo
Jones got engaged to a lawyer last year and often flaunted their relationship on social media
"Our love song has officially started on love song," she wrote She was referring to the cruise ship on which the happy couple got married
"Yesterday was my birthday Today is our wedding day at sea
"Jones shared several Royal Caribbean cruise ship ceremonies and celebrations of her 56th birthday on instagram."
"MEFF mcdermotusa today congratulates former TV Star Jones, who married fiance Ricardo Lugo on Sunday."



Number  844
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Photo by Andrew Milligan PA Images via Getty Images Andrew Milligan PA Images PA Images via Getty Images Carey Mulligan and Marcus Mumford British musician Marcus Mumford and British actor Carey Mulligan arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain s Prince Harry Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St...”
“Gareth Fuller—PA WireOprah WinfreyOprah Winfrey arrives at Windsor Castle ahead of the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle.”
“Chris Jackson—PA WireGeorge Clooney and Amal ClooneyAmal Clooney and George Clooney arrive at St George's Chapel at Windsor Castle for the wedding of Meghan Markle and Prince Harry, May 19, 2018.”
“Chris Jackson—AFP/Getty ImagesElton JohnSir Elton John leaves St George's Chapel in Windsor Castle following the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle, May 19, 2018.”
“Chris Jackson—AFP/Getty ImagesCharlotte Riley and Tom HardyTom Hardy and Charlotte Riley arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Alastair Grant—AFP/Getty ImagesAbigail SpencerAbigail Spencer (left) and Priyanka Chopra arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and US actress Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Ian West—AFP/Getty ImagesSarah RaffertySarah Rafferty and Santtu Seppala arrive for the wedding of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Ian West—AFP/Getty ImagesGina TorresGina Torres arrives for the wedding ceremony of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Marcus Mumford, a British musician, and Kerry Mulligan, a British actor, have arrived in St. Louis for the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan markel."
"Gareth fuller and Winfrey Oprah Winfrey arrive at windsor castle before the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle."
"On May 19, 2018, Chris Jackson and George Clooney arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle for the wedding of Megan Marcel and Prince Harry."
"On May 19, 2018, after Prince Harry married Megan markel, Chris Jackson left St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."
"On May 19, 2018, Chris Jackson / Getty Images Charlotte Riley, Tom Hardy, Tom hardy and Charlotte Riley arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, Windsor, for the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan Markle."
"On May 19, 2018, Alastair grant AFP / Getty imagesabigail Spencer (left) and Priyanka Chopra arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle to attend the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and American actress Meghan Markle."
"Ian West AFP / Getty Images Sarah Rafferty, Sarah Rafferty and santtu seppala arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle on May 19, 2018 to attend the wedding ceremony of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan Marcel."
"On May 19, 2018, Ian West AFP / Getty Images Gina Torres Gina Torres arrived in Windsor to attend the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."



Number  845
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Before I even know it, I called out, ‘You better slow down or you’re going to choke on your food.’ I am typically a little more charismatic than that, I swear.”For the latest celebrity news and interviews subscribe to our new podcast ‘In Case You Missed Us’ below!”
““I was like, Oh, he’s cute, with shorts and his backward hat, kind of masculine,” she explained.”
“...kiss 12 times she s looking for different angles to get And he s like OK I was just asking Metz also told MarieClarie com in March 2017 her first impression of Stancil...”
“There was the one the Christmas episode where Chris and I did kiss 12 times and Josh was texting me and he was like Why does Helen Hunt who directed the episode have you guys kiss 12 times And I was like I don t think she s having us...”
““We laugh about it,” Metz told reporters at the Television Critics Association press tour on August 3.”
“You don’t just dump them off.”The American Horror Story alum opened up in August about filming love scenes with her onscreen love interest Chris Sullivan in front of her real-life beau.”
““Because you care about the person.”
““I’m always friends with people who I was previously with, which is important to me, you know?” Metz explained.”
“She also revealed the duo have remained friends.”
“The actress told Williams that Stancil “moved onto another show” before their breakup.”


"Before I realized that, I said out loud," you'd better slow down, or you'll choke on your food. " I'm usually a little more glamorous than that, I swear For the latest celebrity news and interviews, please subscribe to our new podcast 'in case you miss us'! "
"I thought, oh, he was cute, in shorts, in a hoodie, a little bit masculine," she explained
“… After 12 kisses, she was looking for different angles. He seemed to be OK. I just asked Metz. In March 2017, she told marieclaire com her first impression of Stancil... "
"There was a Christmas episode where Chris and I did kiss 12 times. Josh texted me. He wondered why Helen Hunt, who directed this episode, made you kiss 12 times, and I didn't think she had us..."
"We scoff at this," Metz told reporters on the TV Review Association's press tour on August 3
The American horror film alum, released in August, is about shooting a love scene with her on-screen lover Chris Sullivan in front of her real-life boyfriend
"Because you care about this person."
"I always make friends with people I used to, which is very important to me, you know? "Metz explained
"She also revealed that they have been friends all the time."
The actress told Williams that stansil "changed the show" before breaking up



Number  846
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...every Sunday at 9pm and on Hayu...”
“A producer replies: "It looks like someone is obsessed with you."”
“The on-off couple dated for a number of years before the reality star called it quits for good back in April.”
“Speaking on the latest episode of her new E!”
“...show Life of Kylie, the Lip Kit star revealed: "There was absolutely not one thing wrong with me and T. He and I will always, always have a bond."”
“Kylie insisted that they didn't have a big fight - she just realised she was too young to be involved in something so serious.”
“(Image: E!”
“Network)"There was no crazy fight, we just decided... Well, I decided that I'm really young.”
“I don't want to look back in five years from now and feel like he took something from me when he's really not that type of person."”
“(Image: Splash News)Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play nowIn the same episode, the 20-year-old also receives a present from her new boyfriend Travis Scott, who she started dating shortly after dumping Tyga.”


“… Every Sunday at 9 p.m. with hayou... "
One producer replied, "it's like someone's crazy about you."
"The couple dated off and on for several years, until the reality TV star announced their breakup in April."
"New E in her latest episode!"
“… Show Kelly's life, "the lip star revealed." there's absolutely nothing wrong with T and me. He and I will always, always have a bond. "
"Kelly insisted they didn't have a big fight - she just realized she was too young to get involved in such a serious thing."
"(picture: e!"
There's no crazy fight on the Internet, we just decided... Well, I decided I was really young. "
"I don't want to look back five years later and think he's really not that kind of person, but he took something from me."
"(image: splash News) video loading video not available click play click play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel play in the same episode, 20-year-old also received a gift from her new boyfriend Travis Scott, who started dating soon after she dumped TEGA."



Number  847
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[34] Chhillar was announced as the brand ambassador for Anaemia Free Haryana.”
“[32][33] She was one of the celebrity speakers at the 2017 Global Entrepreneurship Summit in Hyderabad.”
“What lesson will you take back with you?”, to which Chhillar responded:“These days that I have spent with my fellow contestants has been the most dynamic period of my life.”
“[17]During the final question and answer round of Femina Miss India 2017, the top 5 delegates were asked the same question - “You have spent 30 days with 30 fellow contestants at Femina Miss India.”
“[16] During the competition, Chhillar was crowned Miss Photogenic.”
“Chhillar represented the state of Haryana in the annual Femina Miss India contest.”
“[15] Thereafter, she went on to win the title of Femina Miss India Haryana in April 2017.”
“It was conducted by the Miss India Organization.”
“[14]Pageantry [ edit ]Femina Miss India [ edit ]Chhillar ventured into pageantry with Fashion Big Bazaar sponsored Campus Princess 2016, where she was crowned as one of the finalists from All India Institute of Medical Sciences in December 2016.”
“[13] She is a trained Kuchipudi dancer, and had acquired her training under Raja and Radha Reddy.”


"[34] chhilar was announced as the brand ambassador of anaemia free Haryana."
"[32] [33] she was one of the celebrity speakers at the 2017 Hyderabad Global Entrepreneurship summit."
"What lessons are you going to take back? In response, chilaer said, "these days, I'm with my competitors. It's the most active period of my life."
"[17] in the last round of Q & A for Miss India in 2017, the top five delegates were asked the same question -" you spent 30 days with 30 contestants in Miss India. "
"[16] in the competition, hilar was crowned Miss camera."
"Hilar represented Haryana in the annual Miss India contest."
"[15] since then, she won the title of Miss Haryana of India in April 2017."
"This is hosted by Miss India."
"[14] gorgeous [Edit] Miss India [Edit] chhilar participated in the magnificent event with campus Princess 2016 sponsored by Fashion Fair. In December 2016, she was crowned one of the finalists of all India Institute of Medical Sciences."
[13] She is a well-trained kuchipudi dancer, trained under Raja and LADA Reddy



Number  848
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The expecting mother donned a dark green Jenny Packham gown with cap-sleeves and a black ribbon to accentuate her baby bump.”
“The seven-month pregnant Duchess of Cambridge looked exquisite at the 2018 BAFTAs, Britain's equivalent to the Oscars, on Feb. 18.”
““[Meghan] shares tips she’s read about healthy eating," a source told the publication.”
“The former Suits star often goes from her Nottingham Cottage to Kate's humble abode to have tea or exchange advice, according to US Weekly.”
“ROYAL RUMOR ROUNDUPLooks like Megan and Kate Middleton have been spending even more quality time together!”
“And after the soon-to-be-married couple's anthrax scare last Monday, we wouldn't be surprised if there's even more heightened security as they continue their royal duties ahead of their nuptials.”
“Scotland Yard, together with Thames Valley Police -- which will be policing this event -- money is not an object, and they make sure that the very best of security is put on display to make sure that security is not compromised."”
“"Trust me on this occasion, finance has nothing to do with this.”
“...in this day of austerity of finance he said...”
“From my own experiences and speaking to colleagues within the last few weeks Scotland Yard and neighboring police forces that will be part of this operation will be only too aware of how important it is to make sure that no stone is left unturned and you know one talks...”


"The mother to be wore a dark green Jenny Packham robe with cap sleeves and a black ribbon to highlight her baby's bulge."
"The Duchess of Cambridge, who is seven months pregnant, looks exquisite at the 2018 BAFTA on February 18, which is the equivalent of an Oscar."
"[Megan] shares the tips she read about healthy eating," a source told the magazine
According to us weekly, the former suit star often goes from her Nottingham villa to Kate's humble home for tea or exchange ideas
"People like Megan and Kate Middleton have had a better time together!"
"After the couple's anthrax scare last Monday, we wouldn't be surprised if they had higher security when they continued to perform their royal duties before the wedding."
"Scotland Yard, together with the Thames basin police - who will be responsible for monitoring this incident - money is not a goal, they make sure that the best security measures are displayed to ensure that security is not compromised."
"Trust me, in this case, finance has nothing to do with it."
“…… In today's era of fiscal tightening, he said.... "
"Based on my own experience and the conversations I have had with colleagues in the past few weeks, Scotland Yard and the adjacent police forces will be involved in this operation, and they will be very clear that they will do everything possible to make sure that you know how important one of the talks is..."



Number  849
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We're told he was complaining of chest pains and paramedics took him by ambulance to a hospital.”
“MJ's father walked into a Panda Express next to the accident scene, and sat down wincing in pain ... according to witnesses.”
“Law enforcement sources tell us ... Joe was a passenger in a black Jaguar when it T-boned a red SUV.”
“Joe Jackson's been taken to a hospital after a car accident near the Las Vegas strip ... TMZ has learned.”
“Thank God."”
“Joe says they're gonna do lunch at home, and "All is well.”
“However, his assistant, who was driving, broke his thumb.”
“As he says, he "got out of it without a scratch."”
“EXCLUSIVE1:30 PM PT -- Joe says he's out of the hospital and doing fine.”


"We heard that he was complaining about chest pain and the paramedics took him to the hospital in an ambulance."
"MJ's father walked into a Panda Express near the scene of the accident, sat down and winced in pain... According to the eyewitness
"Law enforcement told us... Joe is a passenger in a black Jaguar when it's T-bone in a red SUV
"Joe Jackson was taken to hospital after a car accident near Las Vegas Avenue... TMZ has learned. "
"Thank God."
Joe said they were going to have lunch at home and then said, "everything's fine."
"However, his assistant, who was the driver, broke his thumb."
As he put it, he was "out of the woods unscathed."
"Exclusive at 1:30 p.m. - Joe said he was discharged and everything was fine."



Number  850
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Witherspoon recently spoke with Conan O’Brien about what it’s like raising teenagers.”
“Keep studying hard and dreaming big!”WATCH: 23 Oscar Nominees Reveal The Untold Stories Behind Their FilmsAlthough the Big Little Lies star dropped out of Stanford to pursue acting, it may not be long before her look-alike daughter Ava Phillippe, 17, packs up for college.”
““It was a honor to share my experiences and chat with all of you bright minds.”
““Thank you @stanfordbusiness for having me yesterday,” she posted on Friday.”
““She was so nice; she even welcomed me in!”The Oscar winner was on campus to speak at an event for the Stanford Graduate School of Business.”
“...and met its newest tenant, Caitlyn!” Witherspoon captioned an Instagram photo.”
“While re-visiting @Stanford, I popped by my old dorm room….”
““Surprise!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The actress, 41, stopped by her old stomping grounds in Stanford University on Saturday and surprised a lucky college student while checking out the dorm room she used to call hers.”


"Witherspoon recently talked to Conan O'Brien about how it feels to raise a teenager."
"Continue to study hard, dream big! "Observation: 23 Oscar nominees reveal the hidden story behind their films. Although the little liar dropped out of Stanford University to pursue acting, her 17-year-old daughter, AVA Phillippe, may soon be preparing for college."
"It's a great honor to share my experience with you and chat with you smart people."
"Thank you @ Stanford Business for inviting me yesterday," she said in a post on Friday
"She's so nice that she even welcomes me in!"! "The Oscar winner spoke at an event at Stanford Business School."
“… Meet its new tenant, Caitlin! "Witherspoon added a title to an instagram photo."
"When I visited Stanford University again, I suddenly passed by my old dormitory..."
"Surprise
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 41 year old actress stopped in front of the old playground at Stanford University on Saturday to surprise a lucky college student as she inspected the dormitory she used to call her



Number  851
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Paltrow previously opened up about her upcoming nuptials, saying she was excited to plan her wedding.”
“The mother of two debuted her massive sapphire engagement ring that same month at the Producers Guild Awards.”
“After returning from a bachelorette getaway in Cabo, Mexico, with pals, the actress and her fiancé Brad Falchuk gathered up a star-studded guest list for an engagement party at the Los Angeles Theatre on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The bride-to-be, 45, was all smiles as she arrived in a one-shoulder maroon gown with a thigh-high slit.”
“Jennifer Aniston arrived working an unconventional accessory: a wrist brace on her left hand.”
“She wore a black strapless dress with a choker necklace.”
“Image zoom Credit Photographer Group Splash News Gwyneth Paltrow Image zoom Credit Photographer Group Splash News Demi Moore Image zoom Credit Photographer Group Splash News Cameron Diaz and Benji Madden Image zoom Credit Photographer Group Splash News Jennifer Aniston Image zoom Credit Photographer Group Splash News Kate Hudson Image zoom...”
“Credit Photographer Group Splash News Liv Tyler and Dave Gardner Image zoom Credit Photographer Group Splash News Reese Witherspoon Some celebrities shared snaps on social media from the festivities...”
“Jen Meyer posted a selfie with Sara Foster captioned, “Saturday night and we’re all off to celebrate our favorite couple,” tagging Paltrow and Falchuk.”


"Paltrow made public her upcoming wedding and said she was excited to plan her own."
"The same month, the mother of two showed her huge sapphire engagement ring for the first time at the Producers Guild Awards ceremony."
The actress and her fiance, Brad falchuk, gathered a star studded guest list for an engagement party at the Los Angeles Theater on Saturday after returning from a single trip to Cabo, Mexico
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The 45 year old bride to be is wearing a one shouldered maroon robe with slits up to her thighs and a smile on her face."
"Jennifer Aniston came here with an unconventional accessory: the wristband on her left hand."
"She was wearing a black strapless dress and a necklace."
"Image zooming credit photographer group splash news Gwyneth Paltrow image zooming credit photographer group splash news Demi Moore image zooming credit photographer group splash news Cameron Diaz and Benji Madden image zooming credit photographer group splash news Jennifer Aniston image zooming credit photographer group splash news Kate Hudson image zooming..."
"Credit photographer group splash news Liv Tyler and Dave Gardner image zoom credit photographer group splash news Reese withespoon some celebrities shared a snapshot of the celebration on social media..."
Jan Meyer posted a self portrait of Sarah foster titled "Saturday night, we're all going to celebrate our favorite couple," labeled Paltrow and falchuk



Number  852
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: People Think Justin Bieber Is Starting His Own Clothing LineCheck this out:”
“Only time will tell.”
“On Thursday night, however, the pop star made his return to the red carpet simply to show his support for his close friend Patrick Schwarzenegger.”
“Though he didn't talk to reporters, Justin did stop for several photos with Patrick on their way into the premiere of Patrick's new movie, Midnight Sun, at Los Angeles's ArcLight Hollywood Theater.”
“For the debut of the film, which also stars Bella Thorne, Justin and Patrick went in very different sartorial directions.”
“While Patrick opted for a classic midnight-blue suit with a white button-down and crisp white sneakers, Justin kept it casual.”
“He sported a black sweatshirt by Fear of God, slim-fitting black track pants with bright yellow stripes down the legs and small rips at the knees, and blue-and-yellow printed slip-ons.”
“Yes, Justin wore a sweatshirt and sweatpants to a red carpet.”
“Before heading into the theater, Patrick stopped to talk to Entertainment Tonight.”
“"He's such a great guy," Patrick told ET of Justin.”


"Related report: people think Justin Bieber is starting his own clothing line. Look at this:
"Only time can prove everything."
"However, on Thursday night, the pop star returned to the red carpet just to show his support for his good friend Patrick Schwarzenegger."
"Although Justin didn't talk to reporters, he did stop to take some pictures with Patrick on his way to the premiere of Patrick's new film midnight sun at Arclight Hollywood Theater in Los Angeles."
"The film's debut also stars Bella Thorne, and Justin and Patrick take a very different path in clothing."
"Patrick chose a classic midnight blue suit, white buttons and crisp white sneakers, while Justin remained casual."
"He's wearing a black sweatshirt, black tights, bright yellow stripes under his legs, small tears in his knees, and blue and yellow print slippers."
"Yes, Justin walks the red carpet in his sweatshirt and pants."
"Before entering the theatre, Patrick stopped to talk to the entertainment industry tonight."
"He's such a good man," Patrick said of Justin



Number  853
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Free call or text 1737 (available 24/7)KIDSLINE: 0800 543 754 (available 24/7)WHATSUP: 0800 942 8787 (1pm to 11pm)DEPRESSION HELPLINE: 0800 111 757 (available 24/7)SAMARITANS: 0800 726 666”
“OR IF YOU NEED TO TALK TO SOMEONE ELSE:LIFELINE: 0800 543 354 (available 24/7)SUICIDE CRISIS HELPLINE: 0508 828 865 (0508 TAUTOKO) (available 24/7)YOUTHLINE: 0800 376 633NEED TO TALK?”
“However, if you or someone else is in danger or endangering others, call police immediately on 111.”
“WHERE TO GET HELP:If you are worried about your or someone else's mental health, the best place to get help is your GP or local mental health provider.”
“We just really hope that Aaron gets the help he needs!”
“Then on Wednesday, Carter was visited by the police three times at his home following an anonymous call that said Carter had recently tried to buy a gun and had also made threats of harm against others, including his family.”
“On Tuesday he was involved in a car incident, in which he broke his nose and totaled his car.”
“This all comes after earlier concerns in the week for the welfare of Aaron.”
“When police arrived at Carter's house there was no answer at the door and they did not see anyone.”
“The documents also stated that the caller claims that Carter told a friend he was going to kill himself.”


"Free phone or SMS 1737 (available on 24 July) children's hotline: 0800 543 754 (available on 24 July) WHATSUP:0800 942  8787 (1pm to 11pm) depression help hotline: 0800 111 757 (available on July 24) s AMARITANS:0800 726  666”
"Or if you need to talk about something else: Lifeline: 0800 543 354 (available on July 24) suicide crisis hotline: 0508 828 865 (0508 tautoko) (available on July 24) YOUTHLINE:0800 376  Does 633 need a call? "
"However, if you or others are in danger or endanger others, please call 111 immediately."
"Where to help: if you are worried about your own or others' mental health, the best place to seek help is your family doctor or local mental health provider."
"We really hope that Aaron can get the help he needs!"
"Then on Wednesday, police visited Carter's home three times, after an anonymous phone call said Carter recently tried to buy a gun and threatened to hurt others, including his family."
On Tuesday, he was involved in a car accident in which he broke his nose and crashed the car
"It all happened after concerns about Aaron's welfare earlier this week."
"When the police arrived at Carter's house, there was no answer at the door and no one was seen."
"The document also said the caller claimed that Carter told a friend he was going to commit suicide."



Number  854
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I was mouthing, 'I love you,' to her."”
“I really didn't speak.”
“I said, 'I don't want to know a thing.'"”
“They called me that day and said, 'We want to run you through what's gonna happen.'”
“He said, "I knew I was going to be the victim.”
“According to Cohen, they call the person they bring on stage during "Freakshow" the "victim."”
“Of course, Cohen had a deep discussion about the experience and even explained how he was chosen to be Spears' "victim" on stage.”
“Then, after signing a T-shirt of herself for Cohen, she declares, "[My] ears, he's loud!"”
“Take note, she did not refer to Cohen by name.”
“Give it up for him!"”


"I said to her," I love you. "
"I really didn't say anything."
"I said," I don't want to know anything. "
"They called me that day and said," we want you to see what happens. "
"I knew I would be a victim," he said
Cohen said they call the people they bring to the stage on the monster show "victims."
"Of course, Cohen discussed the experience in depth and even explained how he was chosen as Spears' victim on stage."
"Then, after signing Cohen a T-shirt of her own, she announced," ears, he's loud! "
"Notice that she didn't mention Cohen's name."
"Give up for him!"



**Something goes wrong**
““But I also know that when our children find out not only what you have done, but who you are, they will be so proud of you, too.”TNT will air “AFI Life Achievement Award: A Tribute to George Clooney” on June 21.”
““I’m proud of you,” Amal concluded.”
“You fill our home with laughter and happiness and that’s even before the children have worked out that ‘dada’ is actually Batman, a talking fox, and friends with Mary Poppins.”The couple married in Venice, Italy, in 2014 and welcomed their twins in June of last year.”
““Seeing you with our children, Ella and Alexander, is the greatest joy in my life.”
““My love, what I have found with you is the great love that I always hoped existed,” she said.”
“He is the person who has my complete admiration and also the person whose smile makes me melt every time.”George began to visibly tear up when Amal spoke about his most recent role – dad to their twins.”
““Five years later, none of that has changed.”
“...grin and head tilt when reading his text messages or the letters that he would hide in my bag she said...”
“In her tribute video of which was shared on social media by some in attendance Amal joked that before she met her husband she thought she was destined to be a spinster I couldn t sleep when we were apart and I m told that I would display a particular...”
““Although George’s modesty attributes much of the success we are celebrating here tonight to luck, I think it’s incredible talent and character that got him here and these attributes also make him an amazing husband and father,” Amal said.”


"But I also know that when our children know not only what you have done, but also who you are, they will be proud of you." TNT will broadcast "AFI Life Achievement Award: tribute to George Clooney" on June 21
"I'm proud of you," Amar concluded
"You make our home full of laughter and happiness, even before the children find out that dada is actually Batman, talking Fox and Mary Poppins' friend." The couple married in Venice, Italy, in 2014 and received their twins last June
"To see you with our children Ella and Alexander is the greatest joy of my life."
"My love, what I find in you is the great love that I always wanted to exist," she said
"He's a person I totally admire and a person who melts me every time I smile." When Amar talked about his recent role, George began to cry visibly - the father of their twins
"Five years later, none of this has changed."
“… She grinned and tilted her head when she read his message or the letter he was going to hide in my bag
"In her mourning video, some participants shared the video on social media. Amar joked that before she met her husband, she thought she was destined to be an old maid. When we separated, I couldn't sleep. I was told that I would show a special..."
"While George's modesty owes much of the success we celebrate here tonight to luck, I think it's incredible talent and character that brought him here, and these qualities make him a great husband and father," Amar said



Number  856
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  857
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“We ve decided to cancel the show so that everyone can get a refund but we will make sure that everyone who had tickets for the August 25 show will have priority access for the next time we play in Houston Coldplay wrote adding We send our love to everyone...”
“The band made the announcement on Friday and expressed their disappointment in being unable to find a new date and venue.”
“"Good afternoon.”
“Due to scheduling conflicts, Coldplay’s show at NRG Stadium in Houston has been cancelled.”
“The show was originally postponed due to Hurricane Harvey.”
“Although the band and the venue made every effort to reschedule, they were unfortunately unable to find a new date," read a statement released on Coldplay's website.”
“The band also wrote a note to apologize and sent their love to their Houston fans.”
“RELATED: Coldplay Debuts New Song in Honor Of Houston"Hello everyone, we’re very sorry that we weren’t able to play our show in Houston on August 25 due to Hurricane Harvey.”
“...in Houston and everyone affected by the hurricane...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"We have decided to cancel the show so that everyone can get a refund, but we will make sure that all those who have tickets for the August 25 show will have priority in our next Coldplay game in Houston, and we extend our love to all of you..."
"The band announced the news last Friday and expressed disappointment that no new date and place could be found."
"Good afternoon."
"Due to schedule conflict, Coldplay's performance at NRG stadium in Houston was cancelled."
"Due to Hurricane Harvey, the performance was originally postponed."
"Although the band and the venue are trying to rearrange, unfortunately they can't find a new date," said a statement on Coldplay's website
"The band also wrote a note of apology and gave their love to their Houston fans."
"Related reports: Coldplay launches new song to commemorate Houston" Hello everyone, we are sorry that we can't play our show in Houston on August 25 due to Hurricane Harvey
"In Houston and all the people affected by the hurricane"



Number  858
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: DC ComicsCheck out Miller’s Instagram post below:DC’s Legends of Tomorrow airs Tuesdays at 9 p.m. on The CW.”
“Chaos and merriment will ensue.”Furthermore, the poster for this year’s four-way crossover “Crisis on Earth-X” confirmed that Miller would appear in that, too; Captain Cold’s face can be seen right above Barry’s right shoulder.”
“EP Marc Guggenheim added, “We’re obviously really excited to bring Wentworth back on the show for a few episodes, but a different iteration of Mr. Snart.”
““Mick Rory needs his pal, but unfortunately he’s not going to get the version of his pal that he remembers,” EP Phil Klemmer said during the show’s panel.”
“At San Diego Comic-Con in July, the Legends EPs revealed that Miller would return in season 3.”
“Even though Snart was killed off in the Legends’ season 1 finale, Miller became a series regular across all of the Arrow-verse shows and recurred on Legends and guest-starred on The Flash.”
“After recurring on The Flash, both men transitioned to DC’s Legends of Tomorrow.”
“Heat Wave.”
“The Flash in season 1 s Going Rogue This role would eventually reunite him with his Prison Break costar Dominic Purcell who plays Mick Rory a k a...”
“Grateful now and in advance to a pair of talented casts and hardworking crews Thank you He continued I ve had a tremendous time playing this character It s been an opportunity an education and a f king blast Miller made his scene stealing debut as the icy rogue on...”


Photo zooming credit: DC Comics view Miller's instagram post below: DC legend of tomorrow is broadcast on CW at 9pm on Tuesday
"Chaos and joy will follow." In addition, this year's four-way cross "earth crisis-x" poster confirms that Miller will also appear in it; captain cod's face can be seen right above Barry's right shoulder
EP mark Guggenheim added: "we're obviously excited to get Wentworth back on the show, but Mr. snett has a different version."
"Microry needs his friends, but unfortunately he won't get his friends version he remembers," EP Phil Cramer said during the show's panel discussion
"At the San Diego comics conference in July, legend EPS revealed that Miller will return in the third season."
"Although snett was eliminated in the finale of the first season of legend, Miller became a regular guest on all arrow poetry shows, and guest starred in legend and flash."
"After appearing repeatedly in the flash, they both turned to Washington's legend of tomorrow
"Heat wave."
"The role of flash in the first season will eventually bring him back to Dominic Purcell, who plays Mick Rory aka's prison break partner..."
"Thank you to a couple of talented actors and hard-working staff now and before. Thank you for continuing to say that I had a very good time playing this role. It was an educational opportunity. A f king blast Miller made his debut in" hooligans on the ice. "



Number  859
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If I could put out my prayer list and it come true for you ...”
“The 32-year-old singer shared the first photo of their daughter on Thursday on the TraceMe app, a gorgeous snap of Ciara in a flowy gold dress holding Sienna, which was actually taken by Wilson.”
“Ciara gave birth to Sienna last April.”
“TraceMeIn a video on the app, Ciara reads a touching open letter to her baby girl.”
“"My Princess, it has been the sweetest joy having you in my life," Ciara says.”
“"Since the day you were born, watching you grow up has been the greatest blessing a mom could ask for.”
“You are the little girl I always prayed for and more.”
“I’m so grateful for you."”
“"When I look in your eyes I see the sweetest angel," she added.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"If I can come up with my prayer list and do it for you..."
"The 32 year old singer shared her daughter's first photo on the traceme app on Thursday. This is a gorgeous snapshot of Sheila in a flowing gold dress holding Siena, actually taken by Wilson."
"Sheila gave birth to Siena last April."
"In a video on the app, Sheila reads a touching open letter to the baby girl."
"My princess, having you is the sweetest joy in my life," Sheila said
"From the day you were born, watching you grow up has become my mother's greatest blessing."
"You're the little girl I've been praying for."
"Thank you so much."
"When I look into your eyes, I see the cutest angel," she added



Number  860
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
““Big rigs and cars were swerving out the way.”
“Dwayne “The Rock” Johnson is promoting his latest tentpole “Rampage,” and he isn’t shying away from speaking about his personal battle with depression.”
“The actor shared a message on Twitter on April 2 that read: “We all go through the sludge/shit and depression never discriminates.”
“Took me a long time to realize it but the key is to not be afraid to open up.”
“Especially us dudes have a tendency to keep it in.”
“You’re not alone.”Johnson’s message linked to a story from The Express in which he explained how his own depression battle started after seeing his mother attempt suicide when he was only 15 years old.”
“The actor thanked fans for the messages of encouragement in response to the article.”
““She got out of the car on the Interstate 65 in Nashville and walked into oncoming traffic,” Johnson said.”
“I grabbed her and pulled her back on the gravel shoulder of the road.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Big rigs and cars are turning."
"Dwayne" rock "Johnson is promoting his latest" fury, "and he has not avoided talking about his personal fight against depression."
The actor shared a message on twitter on April 2: "we've all experienced mud / poop, and depression has never discriminated against us."
"It took me a long time to realize that, but the key is not to be afraid to open up."
"We guys, in particular, tend to keep secrets."
"You're not alone." Johnson's message was related to a report in the express, in which he explained how he started fighting depression when he saw his mother try to commit suicide when he was 15
"The actor thanks the fans for their encouraging comments on the article."
"She got off on interstate 65 in Nashville and went into the oncoming traffic," Johnson said
"I grabbed her and pulled her back to the gravel shoulder by the side of the road."



Number  861
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Kate Middleton, Prince William, Meghan Markle and Prince Harry at Christmas 2017 | Credit: Chris Jackson/Getty...”
“A source tells PEOPLE that last year, the couples enjoyed a memorable first Christmas together, when Meghan made her debut walk to church with the royal family on Christmas Day.”
“Members of the British royal family gathered for a Christmas lunch at Buckingham Palace ahead of Queen Elizabeth‘s visit to Sandringham for the holiday — and the whole brood was invited.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Meghan Markle, who first attended the event last year as Prince Harry‘s fiancée, joined her new husband for the event.”
“The mom-to-be was photographed driving into the luncheon wearing a black top with a high neckline, while her husband sported a suit as he took the drivers’ seat.”
“Also heading to the party were Meghan’s in-laws, Prince William and Kate Middleton.”
“William drove his family to the event, and Kate shared a smile and wave with onlookers in a bubblegum pink ensemble.”
“Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”


"Kate Middleton, Prince William, Megan Marcel and Prince Harry at Christmas 2017 | source: Chris Jackson / Getty..."
"A source told people that last year, the couple had an unforgettable first Christmas together, and Megan walked to church with the royal family for the first time on Christmas day."
"The royal family gathered at Buckingham Palace for Christmas lunch to welcome Queen Elizabeth to Sandringham for a holiday - the whole family was invited."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Megan markel took part in the event for the first time last year as Prince Harry's fiancee, along with her new husband."
"A mother to be was photographed driving into lunch in a high collar black jacket while her husband was in the driver's seat in a suit."
Megan's in laws, Prince William and Kate Middleton also attended the party
"William drives his family to the event, and Kate smiles and waves with the onlookers in a pink bubble gum suit."
"Is there not enough coverage of the royal family?"
"Sign up for our newsletters and get the latest news from Kate Middleton, Megan markel and others!"



Number  862
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“John Goodman was nominated seven times, but did not win for Outstanding Lead Actor.”
“The series captured Emmy wins for Barr and Metcalf.”
“It earned praise for its depiction of blue collar America, its hardworking parents, and its commitment to tackling social issues.”
“1 in the Nielsen ratings in 1990, and stayed in the top four across six of its nine seasons.”
“Roseanne originally aired on ABC from 1988 to 1997, hit No.”
“Meanwhile, Mark’s creative touch with building a birdhouse for Dan’s customer is more than Dan can handle, but Darlene defends her son.”
“Roseanne is back on Tuesday, May 1st on ABC at 8:00 p.m. with a new episode titled “No Country For Old Women.” Here’s the synopsis:After Beverly gets kicked out of the nursing home, Roseanne and Jackie fight over who will take care of their mother.”


John Goodman has been nominated seven times, but has not won the best actor award
"The series won an Emmy for Barr and Metcalf."
"Its depiction of America's blue collar workers, hard-working parents and commitment to solving social problems has won praise."
"He ranked first in Nielsen's ratings in 1990 and remained in the top four in six of his nine seasons."
"Rosani was first broadcast on ABC from 1988 to 1997, with the highest hit rate."
"Meanwhile, Mark's idea of building a birdhouse for Dan's clients is beyond Dan's reach, but Darlene defends her son."
Roseanne will broadcast a new episode of "no country for old women" on ABC at 8:00 p.m. on May 1 (Tuesday): Beverly is later driven out of the nursing home. Rosanne and Jackie quarrel over who will take care of their mother



Number  863
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I ve told this story about a night with Silvio Berlusconi and I hadn t told all the specifics about it before but perhaps I should have been more graphic about how vulgar that was in a way to take some responsibility each of us in our own individual way...”
“The other part of it is, I’d like to think that if someone came up to me and told me this was going on that I would go out and confront it.”
“It seemed like a way to smear the actresses and demean them by saying that they didn’t get the jobs based on their talent, so I took those rumors with a grain of salt.”
“I’ve heard rumors, and the rumors in general started back in the ’90s, and they were that certain actresses had slept with Harvey to get a role.”
“How did you react to the Harvey Weinstein news?”
“Clooney, on the other hand, was anything but.”
“Good Will Hunting to Quentin Tarantino Pulp Fiction have remained alarmingly silent...”
“Weinstein the former co chief of Miramax has since been fired from The Weinstein Company which he co founded with his brother Bob and many of the male actors and filmmakers in particular who have benefited from the studio executive s Oscar Midas touch from Matt Damon and Ben Affleck...”
“One local TV reporter, Lauren Sivan, claimed that Weinstein cornered her in the bowels of his restaurant, told her to “be quiet,” and masturbated into a potted plant.”
“Weinstein’s accusers, among them the actress Ashley Judd, shared similar horror stories: a “business meeting” at a lavish hotel suite soon gave way to a series of sexual propositions, including watching him shower.”


"I told the story of a night with Silvio Berlusconi. I haven't told all the details before, but maybe I should describe it more vividly. To some extent, each of us takes some responsibilities in our own way. How vulgar it is..."
"On the other hand, I think if someone comes to me and tells me what's going on, I'll go out and face it."
"To say that actresses don't get jobs by their talents seems to be a way to discredit actresses and belittle them, so I have a straight point attitude towards those rumors."
"I've heard rumors, which generally started in the '90s, that some actresses went to bed with Harvey to get a role."
"How do you react to Harvey Weinstein's news?"
"And Clooney is not at all."
"The goodwill pursuit of Quentin Tarantino's vulgar novels has always kept a shocking silence..."
"Weinstein, the former co president of Miramax, was later fired by Weinstein, which he co founded with his brother Bob and many actors and filmmakers who benefited from Oscar Midas touch directed by Matt Damon and Ben Affleck..."
Lauren Sivan, a reporter for a local television station, said Weinstein forced her into the corner of his restaurant, called her "quiet" and masturbated into potted plants
Weinstein's plaintiffs, including actress Ashley Judd, shared a similar horror story: a "business meeting" in a luxury hotel suite was quickly replaced by a series of sexual claims, including watching him take a bath



Number  864
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As Us Weekly reported earlier this week, Thicke and Patton’s long custody battle over Julian had been settled, with the former high school sweethearts agreeing to share equal custody of their son.”
“The lovebirds went public with their relationship in May 2015 when they attended the Cannes Film Festival.”
“❤️ A post shared by April Love Geary (@aprillovegeary) on Aug 17, 2017 at 2:08pm PDTThicke, 40, and Geary began dating shortly after Patton filed for divorce in October 2014.”
“The due date is March 1st, Alan's birthday!”
“Robin and I are very excited to share with you all that we're having a baby!”
“She wrote, “Robin and I are very excited to share with you all that we’re having a baby!” She also added that their child is due on March 1, the birthday of Thicke’s late father, actor Alan Thicke, who died in 2016 from a heart attack.”
“The model, 22, announced she was pregnant on Thursday, August 17, by sharing a picture of a sonogram on Instagram.”
“A post shared by April Love Geary (@aprillovegeary) on Aug 19, 2017 at 5:56pm PDTJust a day earlier, the couple were spotted hanging out at their luxury hotel with Geary showing off her growing baby bump in a red crochet bikini.”
“Love you ?”
“She captioned the photo, “Love you” with a sun emoji.”


"As US Weekly reported earlier this week, the long-term custody dispute between hick and Barton over Julian has settled, and the two former high school lovers have agreed to share the custody of their son equally."
"In May 2015, when they attended the Cannes Film Festival, they made their love affair public."
“ ❤️  April love gear (@ April vegeary) shared a post at 2:08 p.m. on August 17, 2017. 40 year old hick and gear started dating shortly after Barton filed for divorce in October 2014. "
"The due date is March 1st, Ellen's birthday!"
"Robin and I are very happy to share with you everything we have to have a baby!"
She wrote: "Robin and I are very happy to share with you everything we have to have a baby! "She added that their child is scheduled for March 1, the birthday of his late father, actor Alan hick, who died of a heart attack in 2016."
The 22-year-old model shared an ultrasound photo on instagram on Thursday, August 17, announcing that she was pregnant
"April love gear (@ April vegeary) shared a post at 5:56 p.m. on August 19, 2017, just one day after the couple was found hanging out in their luxury hotel, and gear was wearing a red Crochet Bikini to show her growing lump."
"Do you love you?"
"She added the title 'love you' to the photo with a sun emoticon."



Number  865
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While there's still a great deal to be done, the 2018 SAG Awards are inching a few square feet forward.”
“Following suit, announcement of the nominations Wednesday morning was also carried out by women--actresses Olivia Munn and Niecy Nash.”
“The annual ceremony's presenters will be all women, E!”
“News can confirm.”
“As a reflection of the current social climate and the demand for greater female visibility everywhere executive producer Kathy Connell made the initial suggestion to Sandra Dewey a president at Turner after being inspired at January s Women s March and the movement that has ensued since according to The...”
“New York Times...”
“"I want to salute women who are coming forward to speak at a very difficult time about very difficult subjects at great risk to themselves," Connell told the newspaper.”
“2018 SAG Awards: Stars React to Their NominationsAs a result, all 13 of the acting categories as well as the two stunt categories, which are typically awarded before the show, will be handed out by female presenters.”
“Per the newspaper, there is one caveat as the "Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture" category will be introduced by both men and women, but the award will be presented by a woman.”
“To boot, the show's first-ever host will be Kristen Bell.”


"There's still a lot of work to do, but the 2018 sag awards ceremony is moving forward a few square feet."
After that, the nominations on Wednesday morning were announced by actresses Olivia Munn and nice Nash
"The hosts of the annual awards ceremony are all women, e!"
"The news can be confirmed."
"To reflect the current social climate and the need to raise women's visibility around the world, executive producer Kathy Connell, inspired by the women's march in January and the subsequent movement, made the initial recommendations to Sandra Dewey, President of Turner company..."
"The New York Times..."
"I want to pay tribute to the women who come up at very difficult times and talk about very difficult topics that are very dangerous to themselves," Cornell told the paper
"The 2018 sag Awards: Stars respond to their nominations. As a result, all 13 performance and two Stunt Awards are usually presented before the performance and will be presented by the hostess."
According to the newspaper, there is a warning that the category "outstanding performance of film actors" will be jointly launched by men and women, but the awards will be presented by women
"First of all, the first host of the show will be Christine bell."



Number  866
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/ciGcUN9GEk — Paris Hilton (@ParisHilton) July 4, 2017”
“??????”
“❤️???”
“@m_rutler A post shared by Christina Aguilera (@xtina) on Jul 4, 2017 at 8:34am PDTStars, they’re just like Us!”
“Christina Aguilera, Kristen Bell, Miley Cyrus and more famous faces celebrated Independence Day in their best patriotic-themed gear.”
“And just like many in the United States, they documented their shindigs as well as their gratitude for the country on social media.”
“Read on to see how celebs rang in the 4th of July:#happy4thofjuly #jammies A post shared by kristen bell (@kristenanniebell) on Jul 3, 2017 at 8:53pm PDTOnly in America.”
“My life would have been an impossible dream anywhere else, so I tell everyone I am not self-made, I'm American-made.”
“...pic.twitter.com/5xjPjM4iFV — Arnold (@Schwarzenegger) July 4, 2017Happy 4th of July we like it just the way it is America completely over the top and fabulous #Sandyland pic.twitter.com/p0QKl83nMN — Sandra Bernhard (@SandraBernhard) July 4, 2017Happy 4th to everyone EVERYWHERE!”
“❤️?❤️?❤️?❤️?”


“... pic.twitter.com/ciGcUN9GEk -Paris Hilton (@ parishilton) July 4, 2017
“??????”
“ ❤️ ???”
"@ m / u rutler Christina Aguilera (@ xtina) posted a post at 8:34 a.m. on July 4, 2017, and they are just like us!"
"Christina Aguilera, Christine bell, Millie Cyrus and more celebrated independence day wearing their best patriotic themed equipment."
"Like many people in the United States, they have recorded their experiences and gratitude to their country on social media."
"Read on to see how celebrities ring on July 4: # happy 4 of July # jammies, a post shared by Kristen bell (@ kristenniebel) in the United States at 8:53 p.m. on July 3, 2017."
"My life is a dream that can't be realized anywhere else, so I tell you I'm not from scratch, I'm made in America."
“... pic.twitter.com/5xjPjM4iFV -Arnold (@ Schwarzenegger) July 4, 2017 happy July 4 we love it as if it's a wonderland beyond America and myth pic.twitter.com/p0QKl83nMN -Sandra Bernhard (@ Sandra Bernhard) July 4, 2017 happy 4th to everyone around the world
“ ❤️ ? ❤️ ? ❤️ ? ❤️ ?”



Number  867
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“October 2017”
“Ho doesn't have an e on it!"”
“...the launch of her new hair care line Flawless by Gabrielle Union at Ulta Beauty and the star revealed that she has a lot of haters on the Internet and that letting them insult her with no recourse is not her style...”
“Earlier today, E!”
“News caught upat a fan meet and greet in Miami to celebrate the launch of her new hair care line Flawless by Gabrielle Union at Ulta Beauty and the star revealed that she has a lot of haters on the Internet and that letting them insult her with no recourse...”
“...is not her style...”
“Being Mary Jane star says she's all about schooling the trolls because she finds it all "hilarious."”
“While some celebs are not into engaging with the angry masses, thestar says she's all about schooling the trolls because she finds it all "hilarious."”
“What's her biggest pet peeve when interacting with insult-hurling strangers who hide behind the anonymity of the Internet?”
“"If you are going to come for me, first of all spell things correctly.”


"October 2017"
"There's no e on him!"
"In the ulta beauty and star Gabriel alliance, she launched her new hair care line flawlessly, revealing that she has a lot of haters on the Internet, letting them insult her without recourse is not her style..."
"Earlier today, e!"
"A fan meeting was held in Miami to celebrate the launch of her new hair care line. The flawless Gabriel Union in ulta beauty and star revealed that she had many haters on the Internet, making them insult her without recourse..."
“… Not her style... "
As Mary Jane Starr, she said she wanted to educate trolls because she thought it was "funny."
"Although some celebrities don't like to deal with angry people, the star said she was totally educating trolls because she thought it was all" funny "
"What does she hate most when she interacts with strangers who hide behind anonymous networks and abuse others?"
"If you want to come to me, you have to spell it right first."



Number  868
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Chris’ creativity, along with the brilliant work of David and Gillian, continue to propel this pop culture phenomenon, and we can’t wait to see what fresh mysteries Mulder and Scully uncover in this next chapter of The X-Files.””
“And they are some of the reasons why The X-Files has had such a profound impact on millions of fans worldwide,” David Madden, Fox Broadcasting Company president, said in a press release.”
““Iconic characters, rich storytelling, bold creators — these are the hallmarks of great TV shows.”
“This go around, Fox has ordered a 10-episode season.”
“The series will be executive produced by show creator Chris Carter, as was the 10th season that revived the show for a limited, six-episode 10th season last year.”
“Fox today confirmed that The X-Files is coming back for a limited 11th season starring Gillian Anderson and David Duchovny as Agents Mulder and Scully.”


"Chris' creativity, together with the excellent works of David and Gillian, continues to drive this popular culture phenomenon. We can't wait to see what new mysteries Mulder and Scully have uncovered in the next chapter of the X-Files."
"That's some of the reasons why X-Files has had such a profound impact on millions of fans around the world," Fox President David Madden said in a news release
"Iconic characters, rich plots, bold creators - these are the hallmarks of great TV programs."
"Fox has ordered 10 episodes this season."
"It's going to be directed by Creator Chris Carter, and it's going to be the same with the tenth season of last year, which adapted the show into a limited, six episode tenth season."
"Fox confirmed today that the X-Files will return in its limited 11th season, starring Gillian Anderson and David dukovney as Mulder and Scully, respectively."



Number  869
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I'd be out here repping, me and TC just had a seance or whatever."”
“I never had the clean enough juice [to be recruited], if I had been a Brody or Lauren I think they would have come after me and I would have been like, lets get on a jet John Travolta.”
“Let's just say it involved people not surviving heavy shit and I was like, oh wow, this is not something to joke about.”
“He told me a story about Scientology that has stuck with me for years.”
“He may deny it but I have many witnesses and I'll take a polygraph.”
“"I had a penthouse loft when I was a freshman at USC and the connecting penthouse loft was Ryan Gosling and we used to kick it all the time.”


"I'll give a report here. TC and I just have a seat or something."
"I never had enough clean juice (recruited), and if I was Brody or Lauren, I think they would come to me and I would say, let's get on John Travolta's jet."
"We can say that it's about people not being able to survive in their stools, and I thought, oh, wow, it's not a joke."
"He told me a story about Scientology, which has been bothering me for years."
"He may deny it, but I have a lot of witnesses and I'll take a polygraph."
"When I was a freshman at USC, I had a penthouse, which was connected by Ryan Gosling, and we used to kick it."



Number  870
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...t the perfect natural shade of honey blonde or because your clothes aren t from Guess or that your curves look VERY different from hers she wrote...”
“Watson wrote a heartfelt letter exclusively for PEOPLE s 2017 World s Most Beautiful issue pleading with her younger self to Stop comparing yourself to anyone or anything You are just as important and beautiful as Amy the most gorgeous cheerleader in your entire school even if your hair isn...”
“I wanna see somebody else get on that damn stage and do what the hell she did FROM COINAGE This is Us Star Milo Ventimiglia Admits He Can t Resist Spending on This Thing The body positive actress along with her This Is Us costars Mandy Moore and Susan Kelechi...”
““How is someone fat if they’re not fat?” Metz asked.”
““That made me bonkers, bananas crazy,” she said in February of negative responses Lady Gaga received during her Super Bowl halftime show after wearing a midriff-baring ensemble.”
“#thankstho.”Image zoom Credit: Jen Lowery/Splash News OnlineImage zoom Credit: Rob Latour/REX/ShutterstockMetz — whose hit NBC show was nominated for multiple awards Sunday night and took home the prize in the Tearjerker category — is no stranger to weight-related criticism, both about herself and others.”
“News flash it’s MY body.”
“Apparently, the 36-year-old star was on the receiving end of some negative comments, because she used Twitter to share an empowering message later that night: “For the record, I wear what I want, when I want.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The This Is Us actress graced the MTV Movie & TV Awards Sunday night in a glamorous dark-red knee-length latex dress with ruffled sleeves, finishing her look with dangling earrings and shimmery flats.”


“… Not perfect for natural tones of honey blonde or because your clothes are not guessing or your curves look very different, she wrote
"Watson wrote a heartfelt letter for people magazine's 2017 world's most beautiful special issue, imploring her young self not to compare yourself with anyone or anything. You are as important and beautiful as Amy. You are the most beautiful cheerleader in the school, even if your hair is not..."
"I want to see other people on that goddamn stage doing what she did in mint. This is American star Milo Ventimiglia admitting that he can't help spending money on it. This is a physically active actress with her. This is American actors Mandy Moore and Susan kellich..."
How can a person who is not fat get fat? "Asked Metz
"It drives me crazy, bananas crazy," she said, adding that in February the negative reaction Lady Gaga received in her super bowl half-time performance after wearing the middle nude ensemble
"Thank you." Photo zooming credit: Jen Lowery / splash news online photo zooming credit: Rob Latour / Rex / shutterstock Metz - his hit NBC show was nominated for many awards on Sunday night and won back the big prize in the category of "tear jerker" - is no stranger to weight related criticism, including criticism of himself and others
"This is my body."
It's clear that the 36 year old star received some negative comments because she shared an authorization message with Twitter later that night: "as a record, I'll wear what I want and when I want to wear it."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"This is an American actress in a glamorous crimson knee length latex skirt, ruffled sleeves, dangling earrings and sparkling flat shoes, who made her debut at the MTV film and Television Awards on Sunday night."



Number  871
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When I see her I sometimes still see that blushing kid with big dreams and big hopes.”Since her daughter’s birth, Williams has been sharing shots of her sweet baby girl on social media, most recently an adorable video of Alexis Olympia boarding a private plane.”
“Most of all she is my friend.”
“You have to work the hardest and you have to make sacrifices.”RELATED VIDEO: Serena Williams Reveals She’s Back in Her Jean Shorts Just 2 Weeks After Giving BirthAdding, “She’s inspirational to me and she’s inspirational to all women.”
““She understands in order to be the best you have to think like you are the best.”
“Not only beautiful on the outside but totally stunning most importantly on the inside,” the 23-time Grand Slam champion also said during her presenter’s speech.”
““Since I’ve known Gigi Hadid since she was a kid, she’s always been a woman with goals.”
“Image zoom Credit: Broadimage/REX/ShutterstockImage zoom Credit: Stephen Lovekin/WWD/ShutterstockWilliams also paid some style homage to the honoree by wearing the sleeveless black and gold Versace dress that Hadid modeled during the Spring 2018 ready-to-wear collection during Milan Fashion Week.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“And I want you to imagine the effect you have on the world,” the mother of one, 36, said before giving the award to the 22-year-old supermodel.”


"When I see her, I sometimes see that red faced child with big dreams and big hopes." Williams has been sharing photos of her lovely baby girl on social media since her daughter was born. The latest video is a lovely video of Alexis Olympia boarding a private plane
"The most important thing is that she is my friend."
"You have to work hard, you have to sacrifice." Related video: Serena Williams revealed that she put on jeans two weeks after giving birth, adding, "she's inspiring to me, inspiring to all women."
"She understood that to be the best, you have to think of yourself as the best."
The 23 th Grand Slam champion also said in the host's speech: "it's not only beautiful in appearance, but also charming in the inside."
"I've known Gigi Hadid since I was a kid, and she's always been a targeted woman."
"Image scaling credit: broadimage / Rex / shutterstock image scaling credit: Stephen lovekin / WWD / shutterstock Williams also wore the Sleeveless Black and gold Versace dresses created by Hadid in the ready to wear collection of Milan Fashion Week in the spring of 2018 to pay homage to the winners in a certain style."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"I want you to imagine your influence on the world," the 36 year old mother said before giving the 22-year-old supermodel a prize



Number  872
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tupper was married to Kate Mayfield, but they divorced in 2006.”
“Prior to that marriage, the actress was in a high profile relationship with Ellen DeGeneres from 1997 until their split in 2000.”
“During their time together, the pair welcomed son Atlas, 8, in 2009.”
“According to court documents obtained by Us, the actress, 48, has filed a petition to establish custody and child support.”
“Heche is seeking joint custody and “reasonable visitation” rights for both parents and is also asking that Tupper, 52, pay her legal fees during the court battle.”
“The former couple first met when they costarred in the ABC series Men in Trees in 2006, while she was married to ex-husband Coleman Laffoon.”
“Heche then ended her marriage to the cameraman, and she began dating the Big Little Lies actor shortly after.”
“The couple moved in together in 2007 and Heche’s rep confirmed that The Brave actress was expecting a child with Tupper in December 2008.”
“During their relationship, the duo worked together on different projects, including the Syfy network’s show Aftermath and NBC’s The Brave.”
“Although they were together for more than a decade, the pair never married.”


"Tupper married Kate Mayfield, but they divorced in 2006."
"Prior to that marriage, the actress had a high-profile relationship with Ellen DeGeneres from 1997 to 2000."
"Together, they met their 8-year-old son atlas in 2009."
"According to the court documents we have obtained, the 48 year old actress has submitted an application for custody and child custody."
Heche is seeking joint custody and "reasonable visitation" for both parents, while demanding that Tupper, 52, pay court costs
The former couple first met in 2006, when they co starred in the ABC Series men in trees, when she married her ex husband Coleman lafoon
Later, Heche ended her marriage to the photographer and soon began dating the big liar
"The couple cohabited in 2007, and Heche's agent confirmed that the brave actress was pregnant with a child in December 2008."
"In their relationship, the two have worked on different projects, including the sequel show by Syfy network and the brave man by NBC
"Although they have been together for more than ten years, they have never married."



Number  873
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Which I understand.””
““Just out of respect for Lauren and that relationship, I don’t think he will [reach out].”
“...already knows exactly who she wants to come out of that limo...”
“Appearing on Ellen DeGeneres‘ talk show Thursday, the Minnesota native revealed her number one celebrity crush: Michael Strahan.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I love the gap tooth!” she gushed.”
““Just everything about him.”
“Bring him in the limo.”
“Game over — it’d be a really short season.”Image zoom Michael Strahan | Credit: John Lamparski/WireimageBut dream casting aside, Kufrin, 28, said while she may not have a physical type — “I’m all over the board” — she still has an idea of what kind of guy she wants.”
“Personality wise I want someone that s honest and loyal obviously she said referencing what just unfolded on The Bachelor with Arie Luyendyk Jr joking that it felt like a soap opera The race car driver infamously dumped Kufrin his finalist and fiancée on national television to pursue his runner...”


"I understand."
"Just out of respect for Lauren and the relationship, I don't think he's going to [help out]."
“… I already know who she wants to get out of the limo... "
The Minnesota native revealed her favorite celebrity on Ellen DeGeneres' talk show on Thursday: Michael Strahan
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I love this tooth! "She gushed on and on."
"All about him."
"Take him to the car."
"It's over - it's going to be a very short season." Kuflynn, 28, said that although she may not have a body type - "I'm comprehensive," she still knows what kind of man she wants
"In terms of personality, I want an honest and loyal person. Obviously, she said, referring to what just happened to a bachelor, little Ali luyandick joked that it's like a soap opera, where racers infamously leave kuflynn's finalist and fiancee on national TV and pursue his runners..."



Number  874
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The world is round, people.”Gareth Cattermole/Getty...”
“They are not -- audiences want to see them and, in fact, they earn money.”
““And thank you to... those of us in the industry who are still foolishly clinging to the idea that female films, with women at the centre, are niche experiences.”
“When a camera operator scanned her up and down, she said: “Do you do this to the guys?” In her Oscar acceptance speech for Blue Jasmine, she reminded the film industry that movies with leading women can still be successful.”
“The actors fighting against sexism in Hollywood Cate BlanchettThe actress famously called out sexism on the red carpet at the 2014 Screen Actors Guild Awards.”


"The world is round, people." Gareth catmore / Getty
"They're not - the audience wants to see them, in fact, they make money."
"Thank you... We in the industry are still foolishly insisting that women centered women's films are niche experiences. "
When a cameraman scanned her up and down, she said, "are you doing this to those guys? "In her Oscar winning speech for blue jasmine, she reminded the film industry that movies with heroines can still be successful."
"Kate Blanchett, Hollywood's anti sexist actress, spoke out about sexism on the red carpet of the 2014 Screen Actors Guild Awards."



**Something goes wrong**
““But then you’re like, ‘Oh my gosh, she needs to come out already.’ ””
“Our cast alone is like, 50 people!”Image zoom Credit: Evan Agostini/Invision/AP“It’s kind of weird because it sneaks up on you, you’re like, ‘I can’t believe it’s been eight months already,’ ” she said at the time.”
“It’s weird, [but] apparently doing the list for your wedding is a whole thing that could cause some issues.”
“It’s a lot.”RELATED VIDEO: Laura Prepon and Ben Foster Expecting First ChildShe added, “We want a really small wedding but we have a lot of people that we love and care about.”
“It’s just, you know, scheduling.”
““I just wrapped last week.”
“News at the Sundance Film Festival in January.”
““He’s going off to do two movies,” Prepon told E!”
“Planning the wedding around their busy schedules wasn’t easy.”
““Wishing all of us the good stuff!”


"But you're going to say, 'oh my God, she has to come out.'"
"We have 50 actors alone! "Image zooming credit: Evan Agostini / invision / AP," she said at the time. "It's a bit strange because it's coming quietly at you and you're going to say," I can't believe it's been eight months. "
"It's strange, [but] obviously, making a list for your wedding is a whole thing that can cause some problems."
"Too much." Related video: Laura preppen and Ben Foster are pregnant with their first child. She added, "we want a very small wedding, but we have a lot of people we love and care about."
"It's just, you know, the schedule."
"I just finished it last week."
"The news of the Sundance Film Festival in January."
"He's going to make two movies," plepen told e! "
"It's not easy to arrange weddings around their busy schedule."
"Good luck!"



Number  876
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...three generations of Kardashians ladies including Kris Jenner her daughters Kim Kardashian Kourtney Kardashian Khloe Kardashian Kendall Jenner as well as Kim s daughter North West and Kourtney s daughter Penelope Disick...”
“Along with the fierce photo of the fam which shows a rare full length photo of the pregnant Khloe Kardashian in a bright fringed jumpsuit Yousef Al Jasmi the oldest Kardashian wrote When not you can find the rest of the family for the photo 19659004 The photo presents the...”
“On Saturday, Kourtney Kardashian He took photos on Instagram to post a family photo without smiles and, most importantly, without a couple of key family members, including Rob Kardashian and Kylie Jenner both remarkably absent from the famous Christmas Card family.”
“This is getting uncomfortable …Taking the signal for Kanye West The No Smiles school, the Kardashian / Jenner clan posed for a very serious Christmas photo during Kris Jenner's annual Christmas Eve party .”


“…… Three generations of Mrs. Kardashian, including Chris Jenner, her daughter Kim Kardashian coultney Kardashian Kello Kardashian Kendall Jenner, Kim's daughter northwest and coultney's daughter Penelope Disick... "
"In addition to this ferocious family photo, this photo also shows a rare full-length photo, in which the pregnant Khloe Kardashian is wearing bright tassel Jumpsuit Yousef al jasmi, and the oldest Kardashian writes that when you can't find anyone else at home, the photo 1965 9004 presents..."
"On Saturday, Kourtney Kardashian took a picture of a family without a smile on instagram. Most importantly, he did not have a pair of important family members, including rob Kardashian and Kylie Jenner, who were obviously absent from the famous Christmas card family."
"It's uncomfortable The Kardashian / Jenner family signaled Kanye West's no smiles school at Chris Jenner's annual Christmas Eve party, presenting a very serious Christmas picture. "



Number  877
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“George Michael: Freedom will air on Channel 4 at 9pm on Monday 16 October./em>”
“His final song, a re-worked version of his 80s song Fantasy, was released last week with music producer Nile Rogers.”
“The Wham!”
“...legend was filming a programme for Channel 4 in the UK when he died suddenly on Christmas Day 2016.”
“He finished compiling the documentary less than 36 hours before he died.”
“In the voiceover for the programme he said he felt “picked on my god” during his life.”
“Freedom, directed by George and his friend David Austin, chronicles the making of the 1990 album Listen Without Prejudice and the subsequent legal battle with his record label.”
“In a harrowing twist, the story of his life, now released posthumously, is narrated by George himself.”
“He recalls the death of his first love, Brazilian Anselmo Feleppa, who died of an AIDS related illness in 1993.”
““It was the most frightening time of my life,” George says in the documentary.”


"George Michael: freedom will be on Channel 4 at 9 p.m. on Monday, October 16. /em>”
His last song, a remake of his 1980s song fantasy, was released last week in collaboration with music producer Nile Rogers
"Bang!"
“…… Legend died suddenly on Christmas 2016 while filming for channel 4 in the UK. "
"He completed the documentary less than 36 hours before he died."
"In the dubbing of the program, he said that he felt" bullied by God "in his lifetime."
Directed by George and his friend David Austin, "freedom" records the production of the 1990 album "listening without prejudice" and the subsequent legal battle with record companies
"It's sad that George himself told the story of his life after his death, which has now been published."
"He recalled that his first love, Anselmo feleppa of Brazil, died of AIDS related diseases in 1993."
"It was the most terrible moment of my life," George said in the documentary



Number  878
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“While Malika Haqq and Ronnie Magro-Ortiz might not have worked, check out these other interracial couples discuss their relationships, and their funny take on holidays with their families.”
“Ronnie Magro-Ortiz and Malika Haqq made their relationship official late last year after appearing on E!’s Famously Single.”
“We show our love language in two very different ways, so the way we were trying to communicate with each other was often misconstrued because we don’t speak the same language,” she added.”
“I’m a big communicator and I’m affectionate.”
““My love language is communication.”
“It’s just the way he expresses himself,” she added.”
“It’s verbally aggressive, it’s physically aggressive.”
““His love language is very aggressive.”
““Ronnie and I are really, truly opposites,” she said.”
“Malika echoed Ronnie’s sentiment during an interview with People.”


"While Marika Huck and Ronnie Magro Ortiz may not be working, look at these other interracial couples and they talk about their relationship and the interesting way they spend their holidays with their families."
"Ronnie Magro Ortiz and Malika Huck were in E! She is famous for being single
"We express our love language in two very different ways, so the way we try to communicate is often misunderstood because we speak different languages," she said
"I'm a good communicator. I'm very emotional."
"The language I love is communication."
"It's just his way of expressing himself," she added
"It's a verbal attack, a physical attack."
"His love language is very aggressive."
"Ronnie and I are really, really antagonistic," she said
"Malika also expressed Ronnie's views in an interview with people magazine."



Number  879
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“!”
“"You are not asking for anything because of what you are wearing- you are expressing yourself and don't you ever think you deserve the negativity as the consequence to what you are wearing- YOU ARE BEAUTIFUL.”
“The "Modern Family" star shared a family pic of herself sporting a bikini during a day of fun with her nieces on Friday, but it was greeted with some negative comments from her Instagram followers.”
“The 17-year-old actress decided to address her critics directly by posting another photo of a woman's leg with labels including "cheeky," "flirty" and "slut."”
“Instagram"Who knew that an innocent photo with my nieces would turn into this?”
“The height of a girl's skirt or whatever she is wearing for that matter, does not imply what she is asking for.”
“It sickens me to think at 17 years old, a photo of myself with my nieces is suggesting that I'm 'asking for it,'" she wrote.”
“"I typically never give power to the mean things people bravely say behind their computer screens on the Internet, but this is for the girls who are constantly bullied whether it be online or at school," she continued.”
“Celebrate you and don't let anyone's comments allow you to think less of yourself.”
“We love that Ariel is standing up for herself, don't you?”


“!”
"You're not asking for something because of what you're wearing - you're expressing yourself, don't you think you should be negatively affected because of what you're wearing - you're beautiful."
The "modern family" star shared a family photo of himself in a bikini with his nieces during a day of entertainment on Friday, but received some negative comments from instagram fans
The 17-year-old actress decided to publish another photo of a woman's leg directly to her critics, labeled "cheeky," "flirting" and "slut."
"Instagram" who knew an innocent picture of me and my niece would turn out like this? "
"The height of a girl's skirt or anything she wears doesn't mean what she wants."
"It makes me sick to think that when I was 17, a picture of myself and my niece suggested that I was" asking for trouble, "she wrote
"I don't usually give people the right to say mean things bravely behind the Internet computer screen, but it's for girls who are often bullied, both online and at school," she added
"Celebrate for you. Don't let anyone's comments make you think less about yourself."
"We like Ariel defending himself, don't you think?"



Number  880
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sitting in front of an open flame or other heat source can dry your skin.”
“Stay warm without cozying up to a fireplace or other heat source.”
“Ointments and creams are more effective and less irritating than lotions.”
“To trap this much-needed moisture, you need to apply a moisturizer within few minutes of: Drying off after a shower or bathUse an ointment or cream rather than a lotion.”
“Ointments, creams, and lotions (moisturizers) work by trapping existing moisture in your skin.”
“Apply moisturizer immediately after washing.”
“Click the image above to download a PDF.”
“You can prevent baths and showers from worsening dry skin by following these dermatologists' tips.”
“Baths and showers can worsen dry skin.”
“Use warm rather than hot water.”


"Sitting in front of an open fire or other heat source will dry your skin."
"Keep warm and away from fireplaces or other heat sources."
"Ointment and cream are more effective and less irritating than lotion."
In order to catch this badly needed moisture, you need moisturizing cream in a few minutes: after the shower, dry or bathe with cream or cream instead of lotion.
Ointments, creams and lotions (Run Fushuang) work by absorbing moisture from the skin.
"Apply moisturizer immediately after washing."
"Click the image above to download the PDF."
"Following these dermatologists' advice, you can prevent bathing and showering from making your skin dry and worse."
"Bathing and showering aggravate dry skin."
"Use warm water instead of hot water."



Number  881
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was arrested in March, with a subsequent restraining order made against him.”
“...and wrote her poems in which he declared that: "There is nothing I love more than you".”
“Jaffar had also tweeted images of sweets he planned to give Swift: "Something a gatekeeper (a guy dressed up as security guard in your lobby) prevented us from sharing."”
“...release on November 10”
“The trouble with Look What You Made Me Do Diamond bath in Taylor Swift s new music video cost 13 million Taylor Swift s new video makes debut on MTV VMAs Tough minded single off Reputation signals a harder turn James Croot Taylor Swift s new album is scheduled for...”
“READ MORE:* Taylor Swift is bridesmaid for her best friend* Is TSwift's new video sexist?”
“He is accused of making more than 60 phone calls to the pop star's management company over a two-week period in February this year, as well as entering her New York apartment building and repeatedly ringing her doorbell.”
“Twenty-nine-year-old Mohammed Jaffar will remain in custody at a New York state psychiatric facility until further mental health assessment are carried out.”
“A court doctor has deemed a man changed with stalking Taylor Swift unfit to stand trial.”
“A man accused of stalking Taylor Swift is now in a New York state psychiatric facility until further mental health assessment are carried out.”


"He was arrested in March and then a restraining order was issued against him."
“…… He wrote her poem, in which he said, "nothing loves me more than you."
Jafar also tweeted pictures of the candy he was going to give swift: "something a janitor (a guy dressed as a security guard in your lobby) prevents us from sharing."
“… Released on November 10
"The trouble you caused me to do a diamond bath in Taylor Swift's new music video costs 13 million. Taylor Swift's new video makes its debut on MTV Vmas. Tough single reputation marks a more difficult transition. James Croft Taylor Swift's new album is scheduled to..."
Read more: * Taylor Swift is her best friend's Bridesmaid * is zwitt's new video sexist? "
"He was accused of making more than 60 phone calls to the pop star's management company in two weeks in February, entering her apartment building in New York and ringing her doorbell many times."
"Muhammad Jafar, 29, will continue to be held in a mental hospital in New York state until further mental health assessments are conducted."
"A court doctor believes that a man changed by following Taylor Swift is not fit for trial."
"A man accused of following Taylor Swift is currently in a New York state mental hospital until further mental health assessments are conducted."



Number  882
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"We’re very close friends, and we’ve been friends for a long time," McPhee said.”
“The 68-year-old producer and the American Idol alum were spotted taking a stroll in Paris, France on Tuesday, hugging, kissing and taking pics of one another.”
“The 33-year-old Scorpio star wore navy leggings, a black jacket and beanie and tennis shoes.”
“She wrapped her arms around Foster, who kept things casual in jeans, a black coat and aviators with one of the lens missing.”
“BackgridThis isn't the first time cameras have caught the twosome packing on the PDA.”
“Earlier this month, McPhee and Foster were spotted kissing after lunch at E Baldi in Beverly Hills, California.”
“The couple has been rumored to be dating since May and have since been spotted at various events and dates together.”
“McPhee, however, insisted that they were nothing more than friends in a recent interview with Health magazine.”
“"I’m really, really fond of him, and I think he’s an incredible person."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"We're very close friends, we've been friends for a long time," McPhee said
The 68 year old producer and American Idol Arum were found walking in Paris on Tuesday, hugging, kissing and taking pictures of each other
The 33 year old Scorpio star wore Navy tight pants, a black jacket, beaded shoes and tennis shoes
"She's holding foster, who's wearing jeans, a black coat, and a pilot out of the camera."
"It's not the first time a camera has caught these two guys packing on a PDA."
Earlier this month, McPhee and foster were found kissing after lunch at e Baldi in Beverly Hills, California
"It's rumored that the couple started dating in May this year, and have been found to participate in various activities and dating together since then."
However, in a recent interview with health magazine, McPhee insisted that they were just friends
"I really, really like him. I think he's an incredible person."



Number  883
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here they are, the Top 10 AHS characters of all time, ranked.”
“Other series mainstays include Sarah Paulson and Evan Peters, both of whom have a place (or two) on this list, because they are also awesome.”
“Lange is the queen of American Horror Story, a pillar of the series whose absence is sorely felt when she's not grinning sadistically out of your television.”
“We'd apologize for so much of this list consisting of Jessica Lange characters, but we're not sorry.”
“In honor of this fandom dream come true, we thought we'd rank our favorites (some of which will appear again in Apocalypse).”
“Like a fanfiction come to fruition, Apocalypse is bound to feature some incredibly meta character moments.”
“The upcoming eighth season, American Horror Story: Apocalypse, will be a mashup of the series' two most popular seasons, Murder House (Season 1) and Coven (Season 3), and bring those season's favorite characters to the forefront once again.”
“Engaging, disturbing, and heartbreaking, these characters spread across seven seasons of Ryan Murphy and Brad Falchuk's horror anthology series and regularly do everything in their power to hurt each other.”
“Outside of flashbacks and dropped plotlines, American Horror Story is probably best known for its characters.”


"Here, they are the top 10 ahs characters of all time."
"The mainstays of the other series include Sarah Paulson and Evan Peters, both of whom have one (or two) on this list because they are also terrible."
Lange is the heroine of American horror story. When she doesn't show a sadistic smile on your TV, you will feel her absence
"We'll apologize for so many of Jessica Langer's characters on the list, but we're not sorry."
"To commemorate this fan's dream come true, we think we should rank our favorites (some of them will reappear in Apocalypse)."
"Just as a fan novel blossoms, apocalypse is bound to have some incredible metacharacter moments."
"The upcoming eighth season of American horror stories: Apocalypse will be a mix of the series's two most popular seasons, murder house (Season 1) and the sorceress Society (Season 3), and will bring the two most popular characters to the forefront again."
"These characters are fascinating, disturbing, heartbreaking, and have been circulating in seven seasons of Ryan Murphy's and Brad falchuk's horror anthologies series, often doing their best to hurt each other."
In addition to flashbacks and storylines, American horror novels are probably best known for their characters



Number  884
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He deserves to be able to name his child Chicago for as much as he does for our city and as much as he loves our city,' he told the media outlet.”
“'Kanye and Kim are family.”
“He’s two years old and knows how to spell gargantuan.”
“'Guys I have to say my son is a genius!”
“The mother-of-three gushed over her son in a tweet earlier this year, saying that the little guy is a genius.”
“She’s not like hurting him or anything.'”
“She’s not like harmful.”
“I saw glimmers of hope like a week ago.”
“...back in October saying Obviously North loves Saint she just is still jealous She needs to still get it together and warm up and like be a little bit nicer but I think she is getting there...”
“Cuties The 37 year old reality television star revealed to Ellen DeGeneres that her four year old daughter hardly talks to her two year old brother but is starting to show a little more love after years of rivalry seen on Instagram Family first She previously alluded to their rivalry...”


"He should name his children Chicago because of what he has done for our city and his love for our city," he told the media
"Kanye and Kim are a family."
"He's two years old and knows how to spell giant characters."
"Guys, I have to say my son is a genius!"
"The mother of three told her son on Weibo earlier this year that the little guy was a genius."
"She didn't want to hurt him or anything."
"She doesn't seem to be harmful."
"A week ago I saw a glimmer of hope."
“… Back in October, she said that obviously the North loves saints, she's just still jealous, she still needs to get it together, warm up, like a little better, but I think she's achieving... "
"The 37 year old reality star revealed to Ellen DeGeneres that her four-year-old daughter hardly talks to her two-year-old brother, but after years of competition on instagram family, she began to show more love. She mentioned their competition before..."



Number  885
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s still working on new music and is excited about it.””
“She feels and looks great.”
“...at New York Fashion Week After Completing TreatmentSelena Gomez used the New York Fashion Week stage to debut a brand new hair look.”
“The “Wolves” singer made her first public appearance since completing treatment for anxiety and depression at Coach’s Fall 2018 Runway Show in N.Y.C.”
“...where she debuted brand new bangs and a longer length.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Gomez experimented with blonde color for a few months towards the end of last year, but has since gone back to her natural brunette hue.”
“At the Coach show (she’s an ambassador for the brand), the actress and singer sported a set of long, wispy, Brigitte Bardot-inspired bangs and what looks like some extensions to lengthen her ends.”
“She teamed her new hair with a floral handkerchief hem dress, leather jacket and lace-up boots from the label.”
“Image zoom Credit: Dimitrios Kambouris/GettyAlthough Gomez has been spotted out in L.A. since news broke that she’d be seeking treatment for her ongoing battle with anxiety and depression, this is the 25-year-old’s first time attending an event.”


"She's still making new music and she's excited about it."
"She feels and looks great."
“…… At New York Fashion Week, after the treatment, Selena Gomez showed her new hairstyle for the first time on the stage of New York Fashion week. "
The "wolf" singer made her public debut at the 2018 fall Coach Fashion Show in New York City after completing treatment for anxiety and depression
“… For the first time, she introduced new bangs and longer lengths. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"At the end of last year, Gomez tried blonde hair for a few months, but then returned to a natural dark color."
"At the coach show (where she is the brand ambassador), the actress and singer showed off a set of long bangs designed by Brigitte Bardot, which look like some long bangs."
She paired her new hair with the trademark floral handkerchief dress, leather jacket and lace up boots
"Photo scaling credit: Although Dimitrios cumbrics / gettyal Gomez was found in Los Angeles, this is the 25-year-old girl's first event since it was reported that she is seeking treatment to fight anxiety and depression."



Number  886
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2 his anger jennifer and it could get worse MamaJune MamaJune_BooBoo We ll see where this DNA test storyline goes next week when the season finale of Mama June From Not to Hot airs Friday on WE tv...”
“"The DNA samples look corrupted, so they couldn't tell if you were her father or not," she explained.”
“Sugar Bear's new wife Jennifer previously behind her husband's back to get the test done on his maybe-daughter, in the hopes of freeing themselves from his ex, Mama June.”
“Jennifer was nervous about sharing, saying, "I'm having second thoughts about opening this because I didn't tell Mike.”
“I don't know how he's gonna act when I told him that I done this."”
“"I am the father!”
“I don't need no damn piece of paper telling me," Sugar Bear shouted when he finally found out what his wife had done, after discovering the results in a drawer.”
“Turns out it was much ado about nothing, as the tests came back inconclusive.”
“"We don't need no damn DNA test.”
“Mama June reacted to the moment on Twitter while the episode was airing Keeping secrets and being sneaky behind people s back in a relationship is not right it s going to backfire in her face MamaJune MamaJune_BooBoo Well welcome...”


"2 his anger, Jennifer and it could get worse, mamajune mamajune, we're going to see the story of this DNA test, go to the end of next season, June, mom never went to hot air Friday on our TV..."
"The DNA sample looks damaged, so they can't tell if you're her father or not," she explained
"Honey Bear's new wife, Jennifer, once tested her possible daughter behind her husband's back, hoping to get rid of the bondage of her ex-wife, Joan's mother."
Jennifer, nervous about sharing, said: "I'm reconsidering opening this because I didn't tell Mike."
"I told him I did it, and I don't know what he would do."
"I'm a father!"
"I don't need a damn piece of paper to tell me," he yelled, after finding out in the drawer what his wife had done
"It turns out that this is nothing, because the test results have no results."
"We don't need a damn DNA test."
"June's mother's response to this scene on Twitter is that when this episode is broadcast, it's wrong to sneak behind someone else's back in a relationship, which will backfire on her face. Mamajun, mamajun, Bubu, welcome..."



Number  887
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Also Read: 'Jackass' Star Bam Margera Arrested on DUI ChargeCutkosky was subsequently arrested on suspicion of DUI, drugs.”
“Police told TheWrap that officers noticed “the distinct odor of burnt marijuana” on the 18-year-old actor, who told police that he had smoked weed earlier that evening.”
“...police department for unsafe speed an unsafe turning movement and lane straddling...”
“Cutkosky s attorney Troy Slaten told TheWrap I think it was a good fair result noting that any allegation involving alcohol or drugs against his client was completely dismissed Cutkosky was arrested on Nov 2 after being stopped just after 10 30 p m by officers of the Burbank Calif...”
“Also Read: 'Shameless' Star Ethan Cutkosky Arrested on DUI ChargeThe actor must also attend either 26 Narcotics Anonymous sessions, or a 12-hour class.”
“In exchange for the plea, the DUI charge was dismissed, and the actor received two years of probation.”
“Cutkosky, 18, pleaded Thursday guilty to one count of reckless driving, a representative for the Burbank, Calif., city attorney’s office told TheWrap on Thursday.”
““Shameless” star Ethan Cutkosky, who plays trouble-prone youth Carl Gallagher on the Showtime series, has reached a plea agreement in the DUI case he was facing.”


"It also reads: 'ass' star BAM magrah was arrested for drunk driving, and kutekoski was later arrested on suspicion of drunk driving and drug use."
Police told the wrap that they noticed the 18-year-old actor had a "distinct smell of burning marijuana" and told police he had smoked marijuana earlier that night
“… Unsafe speed of police station, unsafe turning movement and lane crossing... "
"Troy Slaten, Cutkosky's lawyer, told the wrap that I think this is a very fair result. He pointed out that any charges against his client involving alcohol or drugs were completely dismissed. Cutkosky was arrested after being stopped by officials of the Bank of California at 10:30 p.m. on November 2..."
"It also said: 'shameless' star Ethan kutekos was arrested for drunk driving. Actors also have to attend 26 anonymous drug conferences or 12 hour courses. "
In exchange for the plea, the drunk driving charge was dismissed and the actor was sentenced to two years' probation
A representative of the Burbank, California prosecutor's office told the wrap on Thursday that 18-year-old Kurt Koski pleaded guilty to a reckless driving offence on Thursday
"Shameless" star Ethan kutekoski, who plays troublemaker young Carl Gallagher in the Showtime series, has reached a plea agreement over his drunken driving case



Number  888
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In a statement to PEOPLE in response, Chyna’s attorney Lisa Bloom said her team is “confident that we will prevail on this motion and at trial.””
“Rob has also denied the physical and verbal assault claims brought against him by his ex.”
“The order prevented Rob from contacting Chyna “either directly or indirectly, in any way” and required him to stay away from her, her home and place of work.”
“...lawsuit against them and asking a judge to dismiss her case alleging Chyna herself prevented the show from filming after obtaining a domestic violence restraining order against Rob in July...”
“Image zoom Blac Chyna left and Kim Kardashian West Credit Phillip Faraone WireImage Jason LaVeris FilmMagic RELATED VIDEO Kim Kardashian s Cryptic Instagram Post Sends Internet Into a Frenzy Over Possible Baby Name In December attorneys for Kris Kim and Rob filed a demurrer challenging the basis of Chyna s...”
“...reality show, axed before a season 2.”
“She alleges that the nude photo scandal — along with influence from the Kardashian family — are what got Rob & Chyna, the former couple’s E!”
“...her of drug alcohol abuse and infidelity...”
“They deserve blessings Chyna is suing ex Rob 30 Kim 37 and their mother Kris Jenner 62 claiming in October that she has suffered significant damages since Rob s social media rampage July 5 when he shared graphic and expletive ridden content about her including three naked photos while accusing...”
““It’s always a blessing,” Chyna told The Blast on Wednesday while running errands in Los Angeles.”


Ziner's lawyer, Lisa bloom, responded in a statement that her team "is confident of winning the motion and the trial."
"Rob also denied that his ex boyfriend accused him of physical and verbal assault."
The order prohibits rob from contacting Zina "directly or indirectly in any way" and requires him to stay away from her, her home and workplace
“…… She sued them and asked the judge to dismiss her case, accusing Gina of preventing the production of the play after she obtained a domestic violence injunction against rob in July. "
"Picture zooming blac Chyna left and Kim Kardashian West credit Phillip faraone WireImage Jason laveris filmmagic Related videos Kim Kardashian's mysterious instagram post has made the Internet crazy about possible baby names in December. Kris Kim and Rob's lawyers challenge Chyna s basis..."
“… Reality show, cut off before the second season. "
She claimed that the nude photo scandal and the influence of the Kardashian family were rob and Zina, the former couple's lovers! "
“… She's addicted to drugs, alcohol and infidelity... "
"They are blessed. Chyna is suing former rob 30 Kim 37 and their mother, Kris Jenner 62, claiming that she has suffered huge losses since Rob's rampage on social media on July 5, when he shared pictures and swearing content about her, including three nude photos, and accused..."
"It's always a good thing," Zina told the explosion on Wednesday while running errands in Los Angeles



Number  889
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Pink is tired of the fake beef people are trying to create between her and Christina Aguilera.”
“It all started on Sunday night when the “Beautiful Trauma” singer was spotted in the audience at the 2017 American Music Awards.”
“During Aguilera’s tribute to Whitney Houston, Pink appeared to have a slightly pained look.”
“Viewers quickly jumped on the moment, but failed to notice future cut backs to Pink in which she was smiling, in tears, and clapping enthusiastically.”
“After praising Xtina’s performance on Twitter the night of the show, Pink even further clarified her thoughts on Monday in a series of supportive tweets.”
“Last night was about honoring first responders, singing with one of the greatest voices I have ever heard @kelly_clarkson, and pushing myself to do something I was afraid of and everyone thought was impossible.”
“I scaled a building.”
“While singing live.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Pink is tired of the fake beef people are trying to make between her and Christina Aguilera."
"It all started on Sunday night when the" beauty trauma "singer appeared in the audience at the 2017 American Music Awards."
"When Aguilera salutes Whitney Houston, pink looks a bit painful."
"The audience quickly became interested in this moment, but didn't notice that she would smile, shed tears and clap warmly in the future."
"After praising xtina's performance on twitter that night, pink even further clarified her thoughts in a series of micro blogs supporting her on Monday."
"Last night was to honor the emergency workers, singing with one of the best voices I've ever heard @ Kelly ï u Clarkson, and forcing myself to do something I'm afraid of. Everyone thought it was impossible."
"I climbed up a building."
"Singing live."



Number  890
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Men have been using their positions of power to take advantage of women, and it’s so prevalent…I can only hope that what’s happening encourages more women [to speak out] and it serves to put women in more powerful positions across the spectrum.””
““We’re having a real cultural reckoning — one that’s definitely past due,” Moore told the magazine.”
“During the interview, Moore also weighed in on the growing number of women who have been speaking up about systemic sexual harassment in Hollywood.”
“I knew I was capable, but I couldn't get any momentum, and I had just been crushed by three failed pilot seasons."”
“"I was waiting for something different that would allow me to dig deep.”
“Frazer Harrison / Getty Images"Before I got the part, I was making massive changes in my personal life and was looking to echo that in my work," she said.”
“The cast of "This Is Us" during the 24th Annual Screen Actors Guild Awards at The Shrine Auditorium on Jan. 21, 2018 in Los Angeles, California.”
“There is power in knowing your value.”And although her NBC show, “This Is Us,” is a now roaring success, there were many bumps along the way in her professional life as well, including three failed pilot seasons.”
“There is power in saying no and in asking for what you deserve.”
“You realize, I’m not going to take anyone’s sh--.”Frederick M. Brown / Getty ImagesMoore, who is now engaged to musician Taylor Goldsmith, added, “It emboldened me.”


"Men have been using their power to use women, and it's very common I can only hope that what is happening will encourage more women (to be outspoken) and help to put women in a stronger position in all areas. "
"We have a real cultural liquidation - one that's definitely out of date," Moore told the magazine
"In the interview, Moore also talked about the growing number of women who say there is systematic sexual harassment in Hollywood."
"I know I have the ability, but I don't have any motivation. I've just been crushed by three failed pilot seasons."
"I'm waiting for something different that I can dig into."
"Before I got the role, I was making a huge change in my personal life, and I hope it will be reflected in my work as well," she said
"On January 21, 2018, at the 24th Annual Actors Guild Awards ceremony at the temple auditorium in Los Angeles, California," this is the cast of us. "
"It's powerful to understand your value." Although her NBC show "this is us" is now a huge success, her career has also experienced many ups and downs, including three failed trial seasons
"There is power in refusing and demanding what you deserve."
"You know, I won't take anyone's SH -" Frederick M. Brown / Getty Images Moore, now engaged to musician Taylor goldsmith, added, "it emboldens me."



Number  891
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It never seemed to stop, and the man explained, that it was just the “wrong situation” for the both of them.”
“AdvertisementAs for why they broke up, a lot of it had to do with the media bombardment that surrounded their romance.”
“When we were together, we were cautious for it not to be a media circus.”He went on to say that the “Twitter thing” was a result of him succumbing to pressure, and becoming weak at the last second.”
“The aftermath of the relationship was way more heavily publicized than the relationship itself.”
“The DJ explained, “It’s challenging when something I consider so personal plays out very publicly.”
“He added that the split between the two pop stars was more publicized than their actual relationship.”
“In the interview, he explained, “it was completely the wrong instinct.”“It felt like things were piling on top of me and that was when I snapped.”Harris said to the magazine that during his time with Swift, he felt their relationship was getting the spotlight rather than his music.”
“...his music and what he s good at...”
“For the people who don t remember he said I figure if you re happy with your new relationship you should focus on that instead of trying to tear your ex BF down for something to do In the sit down with the magazine Harris claimed he was merely defending...”
“When talking to GQ Magazine for the United Kingdom, Harris explained that going on his Twitter rant was an ill-informed knee-jerk reaction, and he’s sorry about it.”


"It never seemed to stop. The man explained that it was just their 'wrong situation'
"The ads about why they broke up have a lot to do with the media bombardment surrounding their relationship."
"When we're together, we're very cautious and don't want to be a media circus." He went on to say that the "Twitter incident" was the result of his succumbing to pressure and becoming weak at the last second
"The consequences of this relationship are more well known than the relationship itself."
"It's a challenge when I think something very personal is going on in public," the DJ explained
"He added that the breakup of the two pop stars was more open than their actual relationship."
In the interview, he explained, "it's all the wrong instinct." "I feel like things are piling on me, and I get mad." Harris told the magazine that during his time with swift, he felt that their relationship was being watched, not his music. "
“… His music and what he's good at... "
"For those who don't remember what he said, I think if you're happy with your new love, you should focus on that instead of trying to claim in Harris that he's just for When the defense magazine sits down, tear your ex boyfriend to pieces. "
"Harris explained in an interview with GQ magazine that shouting on twitter was a well-informed subconscious reaction, and he felt sorry for it."



Number  892
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Like most parents we gave our children names we liked … Gary Joseph, Michael Blair and our longed-for baby girl, Whitney Elizabeth, not for any other reason.”
“The film treats my family’s aspirations with the heavy handedness of people who are viewing an African American family through a lens lacking in cultural sensibilities.”
“She wasn’t running for office, asking for money or trying to win the right to run anyone’s life.”
“I say, NO, she was a famous person … a singer, an actress, a quiet but generous philanthropist.”
“I’ve been told—as justification for the invasive theme of this film—that Whitney was a public person and therefore the public has a right to know any and everything about her.”
“Image zoom Cissy and Whitney Houston | Credit: ABC Photo Archives/Getty ImagesWe cannot, however, overstate the shock and horror we feel and the difficulty we have believing that my niece Dee Dee Warwick (Dionne’s sister) molested two of my three children.”
“By this statement we do not intend to defend, condone or excuse the crime of molestation.”
“We understand and acknowledge that there are no rules governing a person’s reaction to trauma and every person reacts differently.”
“We make no attempt to minimize the pain, the trauma and perhaps lifelong damage to the psyche of abuse victims.”
“To begin we want to state clearly that the horror of what victims of sexual abuse experience is unimaginable.”


"Like most parents, we give our children names we like Gary Joseph, Michael Blair and our baby girl, Whitney Elizabeth, for no other reason
"This film treats my family's wishes as harshly as those who view an African American family through a lens that lacks cultural sensitivity."
"She's not running for office, she's not asking for money, she's not fighting for the right to manage anyone's life."
"I said, no, she's a celebrity A singer, an actor, a quiet but generous philanthropist. "
"I have been told that Whitney is a public figure, so the public has the right to know everything about her as a reason for the aggressive theme of the film."
"Image zooming, Sisi and Whitney Houston | credit: ABC picture archive / Getty Images we can't exaggerate the shock and horror we feel, the difficulties we feel, and we believe that my niece DIDY Warwick (Dion's sister) molested two of my three children."
"Through this statement, we do not intend to defend, condone or justify sexual harassment."
"We understand and acknowledge that there are no rules governing a person's response to trauma. Everyone's response is different."
"We are not trying to minimize the pain, trauma and possible lifelong mental damage of abuse victims."
"First of all, let's make it clear that the horrors experienced by victims of sexual abuse are unimaginable."



Number  893
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gallery...”
“The source said that Tristan has been "apologetic and begging for forgiveness" since the scandal, and that although Khloe is crushed about the recent videos that have surfaced of Tristan with other women, she wants nothing more than to believe Tristan has done nothing wrong.”
“Tristan was photographed opening his car door at around 3 p.m., wearing white sneakers.”
“The 27-year-old NBA star also skipped practice for the Cleveland Cavaliers on Thursday.”
“WKYCET previously learned that Tristan was at the hospital amid allegations that he cheated on Khloe multiple times while she was pregnant.”
“While it is not yet know if he was in the delivery room as 33 year old Khloe gave birth at around 4 a m ET learned that Khloe s mom Kris Jenner as well as sisters Kim and Kourtney and best friend Malika Haqq were all present in the...”
“...delivery room...”
““Baby and mom are healthy,” a source close to the Kardashians tells ET.”
““She’s beautiful!” the source says of Khloe’s baby girl.”
“Another source told ET that the family kept the delivery room "as zen as possible" and that Tristan "is lucky to be there" under the circumstances.”


"Gallery..."
"The source said Tristan had been" apologizing and begging for forgiveness "since the scandal, and although Khloe was shocked by the recent video of Tristan and other women, she just wanted to believe that Tristan had done nothing wrong."
"Tristan was photographed opening the door around 3pm, wearing white sneakers."
"The 27 year old NBA star also didn't train with the Cleveland Cavaliers on Thursday
"Wkycet had previously learned that Tristan was in the hospital because of accusations that Tristan had cheated Khloe many times during her pregnancy."
"Although it is not known whether he is in the delivery room, because Khloe, 33, gave birth around 4 a.m., we know that Khloe's mother, Kris Jenner, sisters Kim and Kourtney, and best friend Malika haqq were present..."
“… Delivery room... "
"The baby and the mother are healthy," a source close to the kardashians told et
"How beautiful she is! "The source said it was Khloe's baby girl."
Another source told et that the family "tried their best" to stay in the delivery room, and Tristan "was very lucky to be there in this situation."



Number  894
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Teigen talked previously about the brief breakup in last year’s December issue of Cosmopolitan, revealing that she and her husband laugh about the ordeal now.”
“Teigen and the R&B singer wed in 2013 in Italy after becoming engaged in 2011.”
“And to be bolder.”FROM PEN: Learn How To Make XOXO Pancakes for Your ValentineIn the years since the snafu, the stars have become a constant source of #RelationshipGoals with Legend being the most loving celebrity husband around.”
“I think it’s just being around her.”
““Not because she’s trying to.”
““She pushes me to be funnier,” he says.”
““I was just like, ‘I’d just be happier single right now,’ and she was like, ‘No.’ ”The split lasted for less than a day (as Teigen previously recalled), and the couple were quickly back together.”
““I was really stressed and busy,” he told the publication of the rough patch.”
““He was on tour and his voice hurt and he was being a whiny face about everything and so yeah, I was like ‘no.’ ”It was Legend’s recent interview with The Guardian that prompted Teigen’s trip down memory lane.”
“The supermodel tweeted on Monday tweeted an article about the short-lived breakup, writing, “11 years later, baby.”“It wasn’t a a typical breakup,” the mom of one wrote in a follow-up tweet.”


"Tegan talked about a brief breakup in Cosmopolitan magazine in December last year, revealing that she and her husband are laughing at the ordeal now."
"Tegan and the R & B singer got engaged in 2011 and married in Italy in 2013."
"Be bold." Start with a pen: learn how to make XOXO pancakes for your lover. Since that prank, stars have become the source of relationship goals. Legend is the most loving star husband around
"I feel just around her."
"Not because she wanted to."
"She made me more interesting," he said
"I thought," I'm happier now that I'm single, "and she said," No. " The breakup lasted less than a day (tegan recalled before), and the couple soon got back together. "
"I'm really nervous and busy," he told rough patch magazine
"He had a sore throat on the tour, and he had a grouchy face about everything, so yes, I said no." It was the recent interview with the guardian by the legend that led tegan to the road of memory. "
"11 years later, baby," the supermodel wrote in an article on her microblog on Monday about a brief breakup "It's not a typical breakup," one child's mother wrote in a subsequent microblog



Number  895
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more corporate information, visit www.nbcuniversal.com.”
“...is a network of NBCUniversal Cable Entertainment, a division of NBCUniversal, one of the world's leading media and entertainment companies in the development, production, and marketing of entertainment, news and information to a global audience.”
“...option with the phrase Vote For People s Choice Awards Google search Fans can vote for the following five categories using search keywords The Movie of 2018 The Show of 2018 The Social Celebrity of 2018 The Song of 2018”
“...can send a public tweet or retweet and include one category hashtag one corresponding nominee hashtag and PCAs Xfinity Fans can cast their vote for The Show of 2018 category using their X1 remote or by using the voice command...”
“Finalists See the full list of all 43 categories and finalists online at Voting Methods Online pca eonline com Facebook Fans can post either publicly or privately and include one category hashtag one corresponding nominee hashtag and PCAs Twitter Fans...”
“If fans vote with Xfinity, there is a limit of 10 votes per nominee, per set-top box.”
“For Google search, users must be logged into their Gmail account and they can vote up to 25 times per session per category.”
“Fans can vote up to 25 times per method, per category, per day if they vote via online, Facebook, Twitter.”
“Various methods of voting include: online at pca.eonline.com, through Facebook and Twitter, as well as Xfinity and Google search option, with specific details below.”
“Finalist voting for the 43 categories across movies, television, music, and pop culture runs today through Friday, October 19 at 11:59pm ET.”


"For more company information, please visit www.nbcuniversal.com 。”
“…… Nbcuniversal is the network of nbcuniversal cable entertainment, a division of nbcuniversal, one of the world's leading media and entertainment companies dedicated to developing, producing and marketing entertainment, news and information for global audiences. "
“… With the phrase "vote for people's Choice Award" option, Google search fans can use search keywords to vote for the following five categories: 2018 film, 2018 program, 2018 social celebrity, 2018 song "
“… You can send a public tweet or forward, and include a category tag, a corresponding nomination tag, and PCAs xfinity fans can use the X1 remote control or voice commands to vote for the 2018 category show... "
"The shortlisted can see a complete list of all 43 categories on the voting method online, which can be published publicly or privately, including a category tag, a corresponding nominees tag and PCAs twitter fans..."
"If fans use xfinity to vote, the voting limit for each nominator and set-top box is 10 votes."
"For Google search, users must log in to their Gmail account and can vote up to 25 times per session per category."
"If fans vote online, Facebook or twitter, they can vote up to 25 times a day by each method and category."
"Various voting methods include: online voting pca.eonline.com , as well as xfinity and Google search option, the details are as follows. "
"The final vote for 43 categories of film, television, music and pop culture will be held today through Friday, October 19, at 11:59 p.m. est."



**Something goes wrong**
“Dawson has not publicly commented on her cousin's death.”
“"I love you, my alpha child."”
“"Vaneza, my sweet, sweet beautiful baby—your passing has left me destroyed forever but I know you are at peace in Paradise," Orlando-based Centeno wrote.”
“Vasquez's grieving mother, Lisa Centeno, paid tribute to her late daughter on Facebook.”
“According to TMZ, Vasquez had been suffering from migraines and hypertension.”
“A toxicology report is still pending, but an early autopsy report allegedly indicates that her death was likely due to natural causes.”
“Vasquez was working for Dawson at the time of her death.”
“She was transported to the hospital, where she was pronounced dead.”
“Dawson called the paramedics straightaway, according to reports, but they were unable to revive Vasquez on the scene.”
“The 38-year-old actress discovered her 26-year-old cousin, Vaneza Ines Vasquez, was unconscious, TMZ reported Tuesday and People Magazine later confirmed.”


"Dawson did not comment publicly on the death of her cousin."
"I love you, my alpha child."
"Vanessa, my dear, lovely baby, your death has destroyed me forever, but I know you are peaceful in heaven," wrote Centeno of Orlando
"Vasquez's grieving mother, Lisa Centeno, mourned her late daughter on Facebook."
According to TMZ, Vasquez suffered from migraine and high blood pressure
Toxicology reports are still waiting, but early autopsy reports suggest that her death was most likely due to natural causes
"Vasquez worked for Dawson when she died."
"She was taken to the hospital where she was pronounced dead."
"It is reported that Dawson immediately called the medical staff, but they were unable to save Vasquez at the scene."
People magazine later confirmed that the 38 year old actress found her 26 year old cousin Vanessa ines Vasquez unconscious, TMZ reported on Tuesday



Number  897
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 26-year-old USC law student famously shared CCTV footage on Instagram Stories of Alex hugging a 'mystery blonde' along with scathing captions.”
“The duo first got together in March, two months after Alex's now ex-girlfriend Tori Woodward caught him cheating.”
“But things seem to be going swell for The Chainsmokers Alex Pall and his girlfriend of seven-months Katelyn Byrd, 23.”
“Wednesday saw the 33-year-old and the model head out for a romantic dinner date together in Los Feliz, California.”
“Scroll down for video Love is in the air Following a cheating scandal earlier in the year with ex girlfriend Tori Woodward things appeared to be going swell with new girlfriend Katelyn Byrd during a date night together on Wednesday Alex dressed casually for the occasion in a white sweatshirt...”
“...and a pair of striped trousers...”
“The EDM Grammy winning artist sported a well groomed beard and appeared loved up as he stood outside the restaurant with his lady love.”
“Katelyn stunned in a oversized black jacket on top of a shirt of the same color.”
“Dressed down Alex dressed casually for the occasion in a white sweatshirt and a pair of striped trousers Gorgeous Katelyn stunned in a oversized black jacket on top of a shirt of the same color The beauty completed her look with leather pants and accessorised her look with a designer...”
“...purse...”


"The 26 year old law student at the University of Southern California shared a famous CCTV video on instagram, which included the story of Alex hugging a" mysterious Blonde "with severe subtitles."
"The first time they met was in March, two months after Alex's ex girlfriend, Tori Woodward, found out he was cheating."
"But for Alex Parr and his girlfriend of seven months, 23-year-old Catlin bird, things seem to be getting better and better."
On Wednesday, the 33 year old model had a romantic dinner with her in Los Feliz, California
"After a cheating scandal with his ex girlfriend Tori Woodward earlier this year, the video" love is in air "rolled on. On Wednesday, Alex wore a white Sweatshirt on his date night with his new girlfriend, Katelyn Byrd, and looked casual.... "
“… And a pair of striped pants... "
"The Grammy award-winning artist has a neat beard and is very popular outside the restaurant with his lover."
"Catlin was stunned when she wore an oversized black jacket on a shirt of the same color."
"Wearing a white sports shirt and a striped trousers, Alex attended the event. Gorgeous Catlin was stunned by a large black jacket on a shirt of the same color. The beauty finished her modeling with leather pants and used designers to decorate her modeling..."
“… Wallet... "



Number  898
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it's not clear how long the relationship lasted, because they have broken up."
"The two celebrities made their relationship public on instagram."
"However, it has been confirmed that the rumor of breaking up is not true."
“… One month old... "
“… Photography contributed by Steve granitz Getty in November 2011, jelina was apparently rumored that Gomez dumped a Canadian pop star and began to surface after a Bieber fan claimed that she had sex with him backstage on a show in October 2010 and that he was the father of her four children
"Oh, young love."
“… Photographer Kevin mazul / writer / Getty Mae 2011: Billboard Music Awards: Jenna looks happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards. "
"Aren't they cute?"
"Jon kopaloff photo / filmmagic February 2011: Jelena stepped on the red carpet of the vanity fair Oscar Party. They walked on the red carpet together for the first time and finally realized our dream, thus proving their young love."
"But it wasn't until January 2011 that the two pop stars confirmed their romance by taking part in a big PDA while on holiday in Saint Lucia."



Number  899
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more information, or to schedule a consultation, please contact our practice today.”
“A: After treatment, there may be redness, swelling, bruising, bumps, or tenderness.”
“Facial rejuvenation solutions such as cosmetic injectables can reduce signs of wrinkles and fine lines, enhance the contours of the lips, and add volume to facial features with beautiful results.”
“Thanks to the addition of anesthetic to many of these products, we are now able to offer almost pain-free injections to patients who are interested in minimally-invasive injectable treatments as an alternative (or complement) to surgery.”
“Our office was selected as one of a small number of exclusive practices qualified to offer JUVÉDERM VOLUMA, Allergan’s newest cosmetic injectable, approved by the FDA as a shaping filler that can last up to two years!”
“Please follow the links below for more information on the many cosmetic injectables we offer, and be sure to watch for our BOTOX Cosmetic and dermal filler specials!”
“To reduce the chances of bruising, it is wise to discontinue the use of any medications that may prolong bleeding, including aspirin and non-steroidal anti-inflammatories (NSAIDS) at least one week prior to any injections.”
“We will go over all aspects of the procedure and address any concerns you may have during the initial consultation.”
“FAQ : Injectable Fillers Q: What are some common side effects associated with injectable fillers?”
“This usually subsides within days.”


"If you need more information or arrange consultation, please contact our organization immediately."
A: There may be swelling, bruises, lumps or tenderness after treatment
"Facial rejuvenation solutions, such as cosmetic injections, can reduce the signs of wrinkles and fine lines, enhance the contour of the lips, and increase the volume to produce beautiful facial features."
"With the addition of anesthetics to these products, we are now able to provide almost painless injections as an alternative (or supplement) to surgery for patients who are interested in minimally invasive injection therapy."
"Our office has been selected as one of the few exclusive agencies qualified to provide Juv É derm voluma, Allergan's latest cosmetic injection, which has been approved by FDA as a plastic filler and can be used for up to two years!"
"For more information about the many cosmetic injections we offer, please click on the link below and be sure to pay attention to our special prices of Botox cosmetics and dermal fillers!"
In order to reduce the incidence of bruising, it is advisable to stop using any drugs that may prolong bleeding at least one week before injection, including aspirin and NSAIDs
"We will review all aspects of the process and resolve any issues you may encounter during the initial consultation."
FAQ: injectable fillings Q: what are some of the common side effects associated with injectable fillings
"It usually goes away in a few days."



Number  900
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He also said that the "servicemen and women from the Royal Navy, Army and Royal Air Force will all be honored to offer their support."”
“"It is a happy occasion for the whole country and reminds us of the role the Armed Forces play in marking important events in the life of the nation."”
“"I am proud that members of the Armed Forces have been asked to take part in the ceremonial celebrations taking place on the royal couple's wedding day," Air Chief Marshal Sir Stuart Peach, chief of the Defence staff, said.”
“He also rose to the rank of Captain.”
“During these tours, Harry served as an Apache Pilot with the 3 Regiment Army Air Corps and served with the 1st Battalion The Royal Gurkha Rifles.”
“He also served with the Household Cavalry Regiment and served two tours in Afghanistan.”
“According to the MOD, Harry joined The Blues and Royals in April 2016.”
“He's also an Honorary Air Commandant of RAF Honington.”
“The royal is currently Captain General of the Royal Marines—a position he took over from —and is Commodore-in-Chief of the Royal Navy's Small Ships and Diving unit.”
“It shouldn't come as a big surprise that Harry and Meghan would want to include members of the Armed Forces in their big day, especially given Harry's military background.”


"The men and women of the Royal Navy, the army and the Royal Air Force will be honored to provide their support," he added
"This is a happy time for the people of the whole country, reminding us of the role of the military in commemorating important events in national life."
"I'm proud that members of the military have been invited to the ceremony on the wedding day of the royal couple," said Sir Stuart Page, chief of defense staff and air force marshal
"He was promoted to captain, too."
During these trips, Harry served as an Apache pilot in the Third Army Aviation Regiment and served in the first battalion of the Royal Gurkha Rifles
"He also served in the family cavalry regiment and twice in Afghanistan."
"Harry joined the blues and the Royal Army in April 2016, according to the UK Department of defense
"He is also the honorary air force commander of the Royal Air Force, hornington."
"The Royal Navy is currently the commander in chief of the Royal Marine Corps, which he takes over as commander in chief of the Royal Navy's small vessels and diving forces."
"It shouldn't come as a surprise that Harry and Megan want to join the armed forces on their big day, especially given Harry's military background."



Number  901
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In a recent interview with Complex, Nick discussed the breakup of the Jonas Brothers, saying "it would have ended badly if we hadn't ended it when we did."”
“Mike Windle/VF16/Getty ImagesFrom 2013 to 2015, Nick was in a high-profile relationship with Miss Universe winner Olivia Culpo.”
“The three teens were ubiquitous after their family band, the Jonas Brothers, first hit the big time in 2007.”
“They appeared in the Disney channel original movie Camp Rock (and it's sequel, Camp Rock 2), made a 3D concert movie and released four studio albums before officially splitting in 2013.”
“So what's been going on with all of the Jonas Brothers since they broke up the ol' brotherly band?”
“Well, they've all done different things in the years since the Jonas Brothers officially disbanded, but here's the basic deal with all of them.”
“Marco Ugarte/APKevin Jonas: The oldest member of the band, Kevin, is now 28.”
“He married wife Danielle Deleasa back in 2009 (when the band was still together) and, of course, brothers Joe and Nick were his best men.”
“The newlyweds starred in the short-lived reality series Married to Jonas, which aired from 2012 to 2013.”
“Kevin also appeared on The Celebrity Apprentice in 2015.”


"In a recent interview with complex, Nick talked about the Jonas Brothers' breakup, saying," if we don't end up breaking up, it's going to end badly. "
"Mike Wendell / vf16 / Getty Images from 2013 to 2015, Nick had a close relationship with Miss Universe champion Olivia culpo."
"These three kids have been everywhere since their family band Jonas Brothers first became popular in 2007."
"They starred in Disney Channel's original movie rock camp (and its sequel rock camp 2), produced a 3D concert movie, released four studio albums, and then officially split up in 2013."
"So what happened to the Jonas Brothers since they broke up the brothers band?"
"Well, since the Jonas Brothers officially dissolved, they've all done different things, but here's the basic agreement for all of them."
"Marco Ugarte / Kevin Jonas: Kevin, the oldest member of the band, is now 28."
"He married his wife Danielle dressa in 2009 (when the band was still together), and of course, Joe and the nick brothers were his best men."
"The newlyweds starred in the short-lived reality show marry Jonas, which aired from 2012 to 2013
"Kevin also appeared in Celebrity Apprentice in 2015."



Number  902
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1” on Genius now.”
“Kanye West s Father Stretch My Hands Pt...”
“More recently Talib Kweli stirred up anticipation for new Black Star material when he shared a photo of Kanye and Yasiin Bey sitting at a table next to Dave Chappelle with the note that 2018 is looking good Watch videos of the performance above and read all the lyrics to...”
“Music.”
“CyHi The Prynce revealed in November that Kanye would be getting back to his roots by serving as the sole producer of the next album by every artist on G.O.O.D.”
“However, it looks like he will be more involved behind the scenes this year.”
“Unfortunately for Kanye fans, the album never came to fruition.”
“Several months later, Kanye and Cudi were spotted together at the Toyko studio of Takashi Murakami, the artist who designed the cover art for Kanye’s 2007 album Graduation, leading to rumors about a surprise collaborative project seemingly titled Everybody Wins to be released on New Year’s Eve.”
“In May, he was reportedly holed up on a Wyoming mountaintop.”
“The Chicago rapper’s musical output was intermittent during 2017, although there were rumors of him working on new material throughout the year.”


"1" stands for genius
"Kanye West's father held out my hand..."
"Recently, Talib kweli shared a picture of Kanye and Yasin bey sitting at a table next to Dave Chappelle, noting that 2018 looked good, watched the video of the above performance, and read all the lyrics..."
"Music."
"In November, cyhi the PRYNCE revealed that Kanye will be the only producer of every artist on g.o.o.d's next album, thus returning to the source."
"This year, however, he seems to be more involved in behind the scenes activities."
"Unfortunately, for Kanye fans, the album never blossomed."
A few months later, Kanye and Cudi were found together in the Toyko studio of Takashi Murakami, the artist who designed the cover art for Kanye's 2007 album graduation, which led to rumors of a surprise collaboration project that seems to be called everyone wins and will be released on New Year's Eve
According to reports, in May this year, he was hiding on the top of a mountain in Wyoming
"The Chicago rapper's music was intermittent in 2017, despite rumors that he was working on new material all year."



Number  903
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So grab some popcorn and don't miss a single minute and watch it here!”
“3.”
“According to People, the singer has been on a strict diet and taken on the No Master Cleanse to prepare for her comeback.”
“The Singer Is Reportedly On An Even More Rigorous Diet PlanThe only thing more rigorous than her rehearsal schedule is her diet plan.”
“2.”
“Now, that's what we call dedication.”
“According to various reports, Bey has been rehearsing for 11 hours each day in order to be ready for the big performance.”
“Beyonce Has An Intense Rehearsal ScheduleWe all know Beyonce is a perfectionist when it comes to her art, but apparently the performer is taking it to a new level for her headlining gig.”
“---1.”
“While there are still a couple more days left on the calendar, we have a run down of everything you should know about Beyonce's return to the main stage.”


"Then take some popcorn. Don't miss a minute. Watch it here!"
“3.”
"According to people familiar with the matter, the singer has been on a strict diet and has taken a no owner cleaning to prepare for her comeback."
"The singer is reported to be on a more rigorous diet. The only thing more rigorous than her rehearsal plan is her diet plan
“2.”
"Now, that's what we call dedication."
"According to various reports, bey rehearses 11 hours a day to prepare for a big show."
"Beyonce has a tight rehearsal schedule. We all know that Beyonce is a perfectionist. When it comes to her art, it's obvious that the performer is taking it to a new level, her headline performance."
“---1.”
"Although there are still a few days left on the calendar, we have listed everything you should know about Beyonce's return to the main stage."



Number  904
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“—105.9 The Region (@1059TheRegion) October 23, 2017Derulo's expertly crafted ensemble has us excited to see other celebrities' extravagant Haloween costumes later this month.”
“"Best costume ever!"”
“His costume was extremely realistic.”
“The singer shared a time-lapse video on Instagram that revealed how intricate the costume was.”
“Halloween is coming up, and some people think that Jason Derulo has already worn this year's best costume.”
“On Saturday night, the "Ridin' Solo" singer dressed up as the Night King from "Game of Thrones" during a performance at Maxim's Halloween party — and he looked totally unrecognizable.”
“Winter is coming bihhh  thoughts on my costume?”
“#Nightking #gameofthrones A post shared by Jason (@jasonderulo) on Oct 22, 2017 at 3:59pm PDT Oct 22, 2017 at 3:59pm PDTFans were blown away by his getup.”
“"That is freaky awesome.”
“Loving it," one person commented on his Instagram post.”


"- 105.9 the elaborate ensemble of the region (@ 1059theregion) on October 23, 2017 excited us to see the luxurious haloween costumes of other celebrities later this month."
"The best costume ever!"
"His clothes are very realistic."
"The singer shared a delayed video on instagram showing how complicated the costume is."
"It's almost Halloween, and some people think Jason drew has put on the best costume of the year."
The "ridin 'solo" singer, dressed up as the night king of "game of Thrones" at Maxim's Halloween party on Saturday night, didn't seem to be recognized at all
"Winter is coming. What does BIH think of my clothes?"
"A post shared by # nightking # gameoftrones Jason (@ Jason delulo) at 3:59 p.m. on October 22, 2017 (3:59 p.m. Pacific time on October 22, 2017) was blown away by his dress."
"That's great."
One person commented on instagram: "I like it."



Number  905
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Styles in managed by Jeffrey Azoff of Full Stop Management and booked by CAA.”
“It is not currently known which opening acts if any will be joining the former One Direction lead singer on tour...”
“Germany Tempodrome 11 8 Amsterdam Netherlands AFAS Live 11 10 Milan Italy Alcatraz 11 23 Singapore The Star Theatre 11 26 Sydney Australia Enmore Theatre 11 30 Australia Melbourne Forum Theatre 12 2 Auckland New Zealand Spark Arena 12 7 Tokyo Japan EX Theater 12 8 Tokyo Japan EX Theater...”
“Comerica Theatre 10 25 Paris France L Olympia 10 27 Cologne Germany Palladium 10 29 London U K Eventim Apollo 10 30 London U K Eventim Apollo 11 1 Manchester U K O2 Apollo Manchester 11 2 Glasgow U K SEC Armadillo 11 5 Stockholm Sweden Fryshuset 11 7 Berlin...”
“10 1 Washington D C DAR Constitution Hall 10 4 Toronto ON Massey Hall 10 5 Upper Darby PA Tower Theater 10 8 Atlanta GA Roxy 10 10 Irving TX The Pavilion at Irving Music Factory 10 11 Austin TX ACL Live at The Moody Theater 10 14 Phoenix AZ”
“See the complete list of dates below 9 19 San Francisco CA The Masonic 9 20 Los Angeles CA The Greek Theatre 9 25 Nashville TN Ryman Auditorium 9 26 Chicago IL The Chicago Theatre 9 28 New York NY Radio City Music Hall 9 30 Boston MA Wang Theatre...”
“He will kick off the NBC “Today” Show Summer Concert Series on May 9, followed by a week-long residency on CBS’ “The Late Late Show” with James Corden May 15-18.”
“Styles began promoting the tour with performances of his new tracks on “Saturday Night Live” and BBC’s “The Graham Norton Show” earlier in April.”
“To prevent other vendors from re-selling tickets at higher prices, concert-goers can sign up for Ticketmaster’s Verified Fan program.”
“Fan registration for all North American dates has commenced, though supplies are limited.”


"Styles are managed by Jeffrey azoff of full stop management and ordered by CAA."
"At present, we don't know which opening performances will join the tour of the former one-way lead singer..."
"Tempodrome, Germany 11 8 Amsterdam, Netherlands aFAS live 11 10 Milan, Alcatraz, Italy 11 23 Singapore starlight theatre 11 26 Sydney, Australia Enmore theatre 11 30 Australia Melbourne Forum theatre 12 2 Auckland New Zealand spark arena 12 7 Tokyo Japan former theatre 12 8 Tokyo Japan former Theatre..."
"Comerican theatre 1025 Paris France L Olympia 1027 Cologne Germany palladium 1029 London U K Eventim Apollo 1030 London U K Eventim Apollo 111 Manchester U K O2 Apollo Manchester 11 2 Glasgow U K sec armadillo 11 5 Sweden frish set 11 7 Berlin..."
"10 1 Constitution Hall, Dahl, Washington, DC 10 4 Macy hall, Toronto 10 5 upper Darby PA tower theater 10 8 locksey, Atlanta 10 10 Owen, Georgia 10 10 Owen music factory Pavilion, Texas 10 11 Austin, Texas ACL at Moody's theater live 10 14 Phoenix, Arizona"
"Please refer to the complete list of the dates below 9 19 San Francisco CA Freemasons 9 20 Los Angeles CA Greek theater 9 25 Nashville TN Lehmann auditorium 9 26 Chicago Illinois Chicago theater 9 28 New York broadcast City Concert Hall 9 30 Boston king of the horse theater..."
He will start NBC's "Today Show" Summer Concert Series on May 9, and then have a week-long internship with James Corden on CBS's "evening show" from May 15 to 18
Stiles promoted the tour by performing his new songs on early April's "Saturday night live" and BBC's "the Graham Norton show."
"In order to prevent other suppliers from reselling tickets at higher prices, concert audiences can sign up for Ticketmaster's" verified fans program "
"Fan registration for all North American dates has started, but supply is limited."



Number  906
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Only the future will tell, but we’re enjoying being together and have a great time each time we are together.””
“...brother in law just got me a dog...”
“At least, not yet.”
“"My relationship with Javi is going really well," explained Briana to Blasting News.”
“"Things between us are continuing to develop and we are happy together.”
“As you can see in recent Instagram live videos, he also gets along well with my family.”
“As far as marriage right now, no, we are not currently married.”
“That rumor is really funny to us, but it’s not true.”
“Also, fans can relax, I’m not pregnant with his baby.”
“That also is a false rumor.”


"Only the future can prove everything, but we enjoy our time together and have fun together every time."
“… My brother-in-law just got me a dog... "
"Not yet, at least."
"I have a very good relationship with Javier," Briana explained to blast news
"Things between us are developing and we are happy together."
"As you can see from the recent instagram live video, he and my family are getting along well, too."
"As for the present marriage, no, we are not married yet."
"That rumor is interesting to us, but it's not true."
"Also, fans can relax, I'm not pregnant with his baby."
"It's also a false rumor."



Number  907
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In statements previously posted to Nxivm’s website, Raniere said all involved in DOS were consenting adults and that Nxivm was not involved in what he called a “sorority.”In the fall, the group denounced a New York Times article about them as “a criminal product of criminal minds.””
“The complaint against Raniere additionally alleges the women were branded with Raniere’s initials, as he “alone forms the top of the pyramid as the highest master.”A cauterizing pen was used to make the permanent marks near each person’s pubic region, the complaint alleges.”
“...sex trafficking and forced labor charges...”
“According to a message posted on Nxivm’s website, “we are suspending all Nxivm/ESP enrollment, curriculum and events until further notice.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The message was posted sometime after Mack’s April arrest, but it was not clear exactly when.”
“The message continues: “While we are disappointed by the interruption of our operations, we believe it is warranted by the extraordinary circumstances facing the company at this time.”
“We continue to believe in the value and importance of our work and look forward to resuming our efforts when these allegations are resolved Nxivm which has not responded to numerous requests for comment from PEOPLE on the allegations against Mack and Rainere has been described by at least one...”
“...former member as a cult Mack was charged with sex trafficking sex trafficking conspiracy and forced labor conspiracy...”
“The actress, best known for her years-long role as Chloe Sullivan on The WB’s Smallville, is facing a minimum sentence of 15 years in prison if convicted on all of her charges.”
“Raniere faces the same charges and potential prison sentence.”


In a previous statement posted on nxivm's website, Ranier said that the people who participated in DOS were consenting adults, and nxivm did not participate in what he called "sorority.". This fall, the group denounced an article in the New York Times about them, calling it "a criminal product of criminal psychology."
The complaint against Ranier also claimed that the women were branded with Ranier's initials because he "alone as the Supreme Master formed the top of the pyramid." According to the complaint, the burning pen was used to make a permanent mark near everyone's pudenda
“… Sex trading and forced labor charges... "
According to a message posted on nxivm's website, "we will suspend all registration, courses and activities of nxivm / ESP until further notice." Get push notification containing news, functions, etc
"The news was released some time after Mike was arrested in April, but it's not clear when."
"While we are disappointed with the business disruption, we believe that the special circumstances facing the company are justified," the information continued
"We continue to believe in the value and importance of our work and look forward to resuming our efforts when these allegations are resolved. Nxivm has not responded to many requests for comment on Mack and rainere's allegations, at least one..."
“…… Mike, a former member of the cult, is accused of sex trading, conspiracy to trade in sex and forced labor conspiracy. "
The actress, known for playing Chloe Sullivan in WB's Smallville, faces at least 15 years in prison if she is convicted of all the charges
"Ranier faces the same charges and possible imprisonment."



Number  908
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The tour resumes Stateside on June 30 and carries through until early October, when it moves to Australia and Japan.”
“9”
“She s just super excited that we re doing it Like the song the clip is a step away from Swift s own higher concept videos from her recent album Reputation She is currently on the European leg of the tour behind the album which launched in Arizona on May...”
“She’s been such a champion of ours, not only for many, many years, but also where this project is concerned.”
““She loves our recording of it.”
““She loves this song,” said Nettles.”
“Actor Brandon Roth plays the man, and Nettles turns in a memorable performance as the martini-swilling but vengeful wife.”
““She actually reached out to us and said, ‘I’ve got a great idea for the video,’ and she wrote the treatment,” Nettles, told People last week.”
“Swift not only co-wrote the song, but the “Mad Men”-inspired video, based in the early 1960s and featuring sumptuous period detail, was based on her concept, the group’s Jennifer Nettles said.”
“Taylor Swift takes another shot at her wholesome image in the new video Sugarland’s single “Babe,” playing a red-headed secretary who is having an affair with her married boss.”


"The tour resumed in the United States on June 30 and continues until early October, when it will travel to Australia and Japan."
“9”
"She's very excited that we're doing a clip of this song that's a step away from Swift's own higher concept video from her recent album reputation, her current tour in Europe, behind the album launch in Arizona in May..."
"She is our champion, not only for many years, but also in this project."
"She likes our recording."
"She likes the song," says nettles
Actor Brandon Ross plays the man, and nettles plays a vindictive wife drinking martinis in an unforgettable performance
"She contacted us, said 'I have a good idea for this video' and wrote down the treatment," nettles told people last week
"Swift is not only the co-author of the song, but" mad men "was inspired by videos from the early 1960s, featuring gorgeous details of the times, based on her ideas," said Jennifer nettles of the group
"Taylor Swift once again shows her healthy image in the new video" Sweetland "single" baby ", playing a red haired secretary who has an affair with her married boss



Number  909
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read ahead for some quick styling tips and shop similar pieces to get started on your fall looks.”
“We're going to show you how to easily recreate 20 cute autumn outfits, as seen on the streets.”
“Fall fashion means figuring out how to layer without looking like an overstuffed penguin and revisiting your favorite transitional-weather gear, from chunky ankle boots to classic trench coats.”
“(But every outfit will look different—we promise!)”
“It's time to burrow into your oversize fuzzy sweaters and wear the same pair of blue jeans Monday-Friday.”
“If summer is for showing off how great you look without a lot of clothing, fall is for demonstrating what you can do with your wardrobe.”


"Please read some quick styling tips in advance and buy similar items to start your fall styling."
"We're going to show you how to easily recreate 20 lovely autumn outfits, just like you see on the street."
"Autumn fashion means figuring out how to layer without looking like a full penguin and re examining your favorite transitional weather gear, from chunky ankle boots to classic windbreaker."
"But we guarantee that every dress looks different!"
"Monday to Friday, it's time to put on your oversized Plush sweater and the same pair of blue jeans."
"If summer is to show off that you don't wear too many clothes, autumn is to show what your wardrobe can do."



Number  910
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Women's March 2018: Celebrities Lend Their Voices Across the GlobeHarvey Weinstein's Onetime Assistant Calls Him a 'Master Manipulator' in First On-Camera InterviewHarvey Weinstein Scandal Continues: Could He Face Charges Amid Further Allegations?”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 61 year old illusionist took to social media on Wednesday to praise MeToo a social movement fighting back against sexual assault and misconduct stemming from the Harvey Weinstein sexual misconduct scandal as crucial and long overdue but he also cautioned against false accusations of sexual assault recalling a 2007”
“...allegation against him and alluding to a new one...”
“"We all want people who feel they've been victims of sexual misconduct to be empowered, and as a rule we should listen, so more will feel comfortable coming forward.”
“It's important," he began his Twitter and Instagram statement.”
“"But imagine what it's like, believing in the movement, and having also been falsely accused publicly in the past."”
“Copperfield then went on to detail what it was like to go through an allegation ordeal.”
“"To have your life and your family's life turned upside down.”
“Three years and hundreds of stories reported on a false claim investigated by the FBI, where the end result was the accuser was caught by law enforcement making the same false claim about another man," he wrote.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Harvey Weinstein's former assistant called him "master manipulator" in the first face-to-face interview of female "March 2018: celebrities speak the world". Harvey Weinstein scandal continues: will he face charges in further charges? "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 61 year old magician praised metoo on social media on Wednesday as a social campaign to fight back sexual abuse and misconduct caused by Harvey Weinstein's sexual misconduct scandal, which is crucial and long overdue, but he also reminded people not to make false accusations about the 2007 one-off assault."
“… The charges against him suggest a new... "
"We all want those who feel like victims of sexual misconduct to be empowered, and as a rule, we should listen so that more people feel free to come forward."
"It's important," he began to make statements on Twitter and instagram
"But imagine believing in this movement, which has been publicly framed in the past."
"Copperfield went on to elaborate on the feeling of going through the ordeal of accusation."
"Turn your life and your family's life upside down."
"Over the past three years, there have been hundreds of reports that the Federal Bureau of investigation (FBI) has investigated a false accusation, and the ultimate result is that the plaintiff was arrested by law enforcement and made the same false accusation against another man," he wrote



Number  911
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kerr's Must-Have Kit...”
“That’s when they come out.”
“I GOT MY DIMPLES FROM... My great-grandmother.”
“Hers had the same placement as mine.”
“My dad has one in his chin.”
“And [my 7-year-old son] Flynn has one in his chin plus another on one side.”
“Sometimes we’ll do a little kiss where he puts his [dimple on] mine.”
“It’s quite cute because it’s as if our dimples are kissing.”
“I’m surrounded by dimples—even [my husband] Evan has one in his chin!”
“[tiImage img-pos="2" image_style="684xflex" align="left"]THE FIRST TIME I GOT ATTENTION FOR MY DIMPLES... Was when I was growing up and someone [told] me that having dimples meant I was a flirt.”


"Cole's essential equipment..."
"Then they came out."
"My dimples come from... My great grandmother. "
"Her position is the same as mine."
"My father has one on his chin."
"And (my 7-year-old son) Flynn has one on his chin and one on the other side."
"Sometimes we make a little kiss where he put his dimple on mine."
"It's lovely. It's like our dimples are kissing."
"I have dimples all around me. Even Evan has dimples on his chin!"
"[tiimage img POS =" 2 "image / U style =" 684xflex "align =" left "] I noticed dimples for the first time... It was when I was growing up that I was told that having dimples meant I was a flirt



Number  912
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More:Kathy Griffin defends Samantha Bee with long Twitter account of her own tangle with TrumpMore:Kathy Griffin impersonates 'incredible liar' Kellyanne Conway on 'The President Show'”
“After Joan died I just called DeGeneres and I said Woman to woman comic to comic let it go and do a tribute to her We got into a screaming match said Griffin adding She s scarier than the government Kim and Kanye are actually good neighbors Only in Hollywood...”
“The comedian brought her Laugh Your Head Off World Tour to Hollywood Thursday night, serving up almost three hours of comedy in a high-octane set.”
“In front of a packed house, Griffin gleefully spilled the tea on everything from the federal investigation surrounding her controversial fake and bloody Donald Trump photo shoot that went round the world to how she really feels about Ellen DeGeneres.”
“(Spoiler: They are not friends).”
“At the sold-out Dolby Theater, Griffin, gearing up for the long haul in a pair of flats, ran out on stage jumping and dancing.”
““They said I would never work again, and you came!” she said to the packed crowd.”
“Here s what to expect from Griffin s latest act Kathy Griffin Truth is Roseanne has displayed herself to be a Nazi More Kathy Griffin on tour that harmless bloody Trump photo her gripe with Kevin Hart There s plenty of President Trump and his family I ve known this...”
“...fool off and on for 20 years said Griffin harking back to the time she first met Trump on the set of Suddenly Susan...”
“"He said, 'Call me The Donald,' to which I said, 'OK – call me The Kathy.'”


"More: Kathy Griffin Samantha bee defends her with a long account on twitter. Trumpmore: Kathy Griffin mimics" incredible liar "Kelly Conway on the president show
"After Joan died, I called DeGeneres and I said women to women comics, let it go, and salute her, we entered a scream contest," Griffin said. She was more terrifying than the government. Kim and Kanye were actually good neighbors, only in Hollywood
"The comedian took her to Hollywood on a" laugh your head "world tour on Thursday night, putting on nearly three hours of comedy in a high octane scene."
"In front of a crowded house, Griffin happily spills tea on everything from the federal investigation surrounding her controversial fake Donald Trump photos taken around the world to her real feelings about Ellen DeGeneres."
"(spoiler: they're not friends."
In the sold out Dolby theater, Griffin, dressed in a pair of flat shoes for a long journey, hopped out on the stage
"They say I'll never work again. Here you are! "She said to the crowd."
"From Griffin's latest performance, we can expect that the truth of Kathy Griffin is that rosani shows that she is a Nazi, and Kathy Griffin shows her complaint with Kevin Hart on the tour. I know a lot of President trump and his family..."
“…… After 20 years of fooling around, Griffin recalled that when she first met trump on the set of suddenly Susan, she said
"He said," call me Donald. "I said," OK, call me Casey. "



Number  913
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, in the meantime, here are some other Spanish shows to help pass the time.”
““I’m getting to humanize this living legend, cause no one really knows anything about him.”As for the man himself, Luis — who once famously dated Mariah Carey — authorized the mini-series, which means he is most likely also a fan of the finished product.”
“Fans of the Telemundo series, which looks back at the life of the iconic Mexican singer, have noticed that the Spanish show is not on the streaming platform if you live in the U.S.”
“However, that does not mean you can’t watch all past and future episodes on your computer.”
“Thanks to Telemundo Now, you can watch Diego Boneta as Luis Miguel as he struggles with the disapperance of his mother and his estranged relationship with his father and manager all while becoming a world-famous musician.”
“Joining Diego in the star-studded cast is Oscar Jaenada as Luis Rey, Camila Sodi as Luis’ first girlfriend, and JuanPa Zurita as the singer’s brother Alex.”
“NBCUniversal“It was something that we all put a lot of time, blood, sweat and tears into for the past two years,” Diego told Billboard magazine of the mini-series.”
““It took me a year to just prep for the project, and then another year to shoot it, and it’s quite amazing to see this positive, warm reaction.” He went on to explain on he lost 20 pounds for the role as well as undergo extensive singing training.”
““Acting-wise, it’s such a complex character who is an icon that everyone knows,” he added.”
““I will have to tell the real story of what has been my personal and professional life.”


"In the meantime, however, there are other Spanish shows to kill time."
"I want to humanize this living legend, because no one really understands him." As for him, Louis - who dated Maria Kelly - authorized the mini series, which means he's probably also a fan of the finished product
"The telemundo series reviews the life of the Mexican idol singer, and fans notice that if you live in the United States, Spanish shows are not on the streaming platform."
But that doesn't mean you can't watch all the past and future episodes on your computer
"Thanks to telemundo now, you can see Diego bonetta playing Luis Miguel. While becoming a world-famous musician, he struggles with his mother's disappointment and the estrangement between his father and his manager."
Along with Diego's star cast are Oscar janada as Louis ray, Camilla Soddy as Louis' first girlfriend and juanpa sulita as the singer's brother Alex
"It's something that we've invested a lot of time, blood, sweat and tears in the past two years," Diego told Billboard magazine
"It took me a year to prepare for this project, and then another year to shoot, and it was amazing to see this kind of positive and enthusiastic response." He went on to explain that he had lost 20 pounds because of the role and had received extensive singing training
"It's such a complicated role in terms of acting skills, and it's an idol everyone knows," he added
"I will have to tell the true story of my personal and professional life."



Number  914
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Top Gear host admitted: "I said, 'Hey, I killed it as Mitch today at the table read, thanks for the opportunity!'"”
“However, on the day the cast refused to show up for work as part of their dispute, Matt couldn't resist playing a text message prank on Jesse, who plays Mitchell Pritchett.”
“If you stick together, you have power."”
“And Matt recalls telling the actor: "You have to walk out, or they won't take you seriously.”
“...higher pay deal...”
“In 2012 the Modern Family cast sued 20th Century Fox in a salary dispute but before then the show s Jesse Tyler Ferguson called Matt for negotiating advice as the Friends cast had previously joined forces to negotiate their own...”
“Plus, I'm having too much fun laying on the couch."”
“I know what I can do, I know what I can't do.”
“I'd be doing the project an injustice to take this.”
“He told USA Today: "I remember reading it thinking, this is a really good script, [but] I'm not the guy for this.”


Top gear host admits, "I said," Hey, I killed Mickey while he was reading on his desk today. Thank you for giving me this chance! "
"However, on the day the actors refused to go to work, Matt couldn't help playing a text prank on Jesse, who played Mitchell Pritchett."
"If you unite, you have strength."
Matt recalls saying to the actor, "you have to leave or they won't take you seriously."
“… High pay deals... "
"In 2012, the crew of modern family sued 20th Century Fox for a wage dispute, but before that, Jesse Tyler Ferguson called Matt for negotiation, because the crew of friends had worked together to negotiate their own wages..."
"Besides, I had too much fun lying on the sofa."
"I know what I can do, I know what I can't do."
"It's not fair for me to do this project."
"I remember reading this book and thinking," he told USA today, "it's a very good play, [but] I'm not that person."



Number  915
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See the cover below.”
“Director James Wan Says He's the Reason Why“Aquaman,” which also stars Willem Dafoe, Dolph Lundgren and Patrick Wilson, will hit theaters on Dec. 21.”
“Also Read: No 'Aquaman' Trailer Yet?”
“However, since then, she’s won an Academy Award and has been nominated multiple times.”
“Because, you’ve got to have some fun.”Her role in the DC film marks her return to the superhero franchise — the last time she starred in a movie like that was in 1995’s “Batman Forever,” when she played Bruce Wayne’s girlfriend, Dr. Chase Meridian.”
“If there is one thing I have to do in my life, I have to be that.”
““As soon as he said I could wear mother-of-pearl and be a mermaid warrior, I said ‘I’m done.’ Please.”
“He’s a really good friend of mine, and he offered to let me play Queen Atlanna,” she told Entertainment Weekly.”
“Also Read: James Wan and 'Aquaman' Cast Offer First Look at Work-in-Progress Atlantis“The reason why I love [‘Aquaman’] is James Wan is an Australian, and I’ve followed his career since he started.”
“In March 2017, Kidman confirmed she was playing Aquaman’s mother in “Aquaman,” and there was a simple reason as to why she wanted to take on the role.”


"Look at the cover below."
Director James Wan says he's the reason for "Aquarius man," also starring William Duff, Dolph Lundgren and Patrick Wilson, which will be released on December 21
"Also read: there is no 'Aquarius' Trailer yet?"
"But since then, she has won Oscars and has been nominated many times."
"Because you have to have some fun." Her role in Washington films marks her return to the superhero series - the last time she starred in such a film was in 1995's "Batman Forever," when she played Bruce Wayne's girlfriend, Dr. chase meridine
"If there's one thing I have to do in my life, it's what I have to do."
"When he said I could wear mother of Pearl and be a mermaid warrior, I said," I'm fed up with that. " Please
"He's really a good friend of mine," she told Entertainment Weekly. "He offered me to play queen atrana."
"Please also read: James Wan and the 'aquarium' actors provide the first time to watch work on Atlantis." the reason I love ['aquarium '] is that James Wan is an Australian and I have been following his career as he started
"In March 2017, Kidman confirmed that she played the mother of the Aquarius man in Waterman, and the reason why she wanted to take over the role was simple."



Number  916
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just a thought.”
“Maybe MTV will film cast members visiting him in prison?”
“If renewed for a third season though, it’s highly unlikely Sorrentino would be able to continue.”
“According to media reports he plans to marry his fiancee next month before reporting to prison, so it’s likely be able to finish work on Jersey Shore Family Vacation, which is currently in production on Season 2.”
“It’s not known when Sorrentino will begin serving his sentence.”
“Sorrentino starred on MTV’s Jersey Shore from 2009 to 2012 and currently appears on the show’s spinoff Jersey Shore Family Vacation.”
“Several of The Situation’s cast mates came to court to support Sorrentino at his sentencing including, Deena Nicole Cortese, Paul “Pauly D” Delvecchio,” Jenni “JWoww” Farley, Vinny Guadagnino and Ronnie Ortiz-Magro.”
“Marc Sorrentino also was sentenced Friday to two years in prison and a $75,000 fine.”
“Mike Sorrentino pleaded guilty to tax evasion and concealing income in January.”
“Sorrentino and his brother Marc Sorrentino were charged for filing false tax returns and inaccurately reporting some $8.9 million in income.”


"It's just an idea."
"Maybe MTV will film crew members visiting him in prison?"
"However, if the contract is renewed for the third season, the possibility of Sorrentino's renewal is very small
"According to media reports, he plans to marry his fiancee next month and then report to prison, so he is likely to finish the work of" family holiday on the west coast ", which is currently in the second season of production
"I don't know when Sorrentino will start serving his sentence."
"Sorrentino starred in MTV's Jersey coast from 2009 to 2012 and is currently appearing in the show's derivative Jersey coast family vacation."
Several members of the situation crew came to court to support Sorrentino's verdict, including Dina Nicole Curtis, Paul Delvecchio, Jenny Farley, Winnie guadanino and Ronnie Ortiz Magro
"Mark Sorrentino was also sentenced on Friday to two years in prison and a $75000 fine."
"Mike Sorrentino pleaded guilty in January to tax evasion and income concealment."
"Sorrentino and his brother Mark Sorrentino are charged with filing false tax returns and inaccurate returns of about $8.9 million in income."



Number  917
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The due date is March 1st, [Robin’s late father] Alan’s birthday!” Months later, in November, she announced the couple is expecting a girl.”
“Image zoom Credit: April Love Geary InstagramImage zoom Credit: April Love Geary InstagramGeary announced her pregnancy on Instagram in August, writing: “Robin and I are very excited to share with you all that we’re having a baby!”
“...the pregnant model said of her surprise birthday stay at The Beverly Hilton with Robin Thicke Robin Thicke s Pregnant Girlfriend Poses for an Impromptu Nude Photo Shoot to Celebrate Birthday Robin Thicke s pregnant girlfriend April Love Geary celebrated her 23rd birthday be evoking the iconic rose petal scene...”
“...from American Beauty...”
“One day before her birthday, the 40-year-old singer surprised the mother-to-be with a romantic stay at The Beverly Hilton hotel in Beverly Hills, California.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““And it’s not even my birthday!!”
“(tomorrow) I have the best boyfriend in the world!” Geary captioned the photo of herself dressed in the hotel’s famous Martinique-printed robe on Tuesday.”
“In another photo, the expectant model, who has been dating Thicke for two years, lay naked in a bed with strategically placed rose petals.”
“The snap showed off her growing baby bump.”


"The due date is March 1, Alan's birthday! A few months later, in November, she announced that the couple were pregnant with a girl
Image zooming credit: April love gear instagram image zooming credit: April love gear instagram gear announced her pregnancy on instagram in August this year, and wrote: "Robin and I are very excited to share with you all that we are going to have a baby!"
“… The pregnant model said that she and Robin hick had a surprise birthday at Beverly Hilton. Robin Hick's pregnant girlfriend put out an impromptu nude photo to celebrate her birthday. Robin Hick's pregnant girlfriend April love gear celebrated her 23rd birthday, which reminds people of the symbolic scene of rose petals... "
“… Beauty from America... "
"The day before her birthday, the 40 year old singer surprised the mother to be by spending a romantic night at the Beverly Hilton Hotel in Beverly Hills, California."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's not even my birthday today!"
(tomorrow) I have the best boyfriend in the world! "Geary added a headline to his photo on Tuesday wearing the famous Martinique printed robe of the hotel."
"In another photo, the model to be has been dating hick for two years, lying naked on a bed with rose petals."
"That picture shows the little lump she's growing up with."



Number  918
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I [made] dinner and we had a nice, a very romantic second anniversary.””
“Amal paired the dress with black tights and black booties.”
“Amal Clooney stepped out in a stunning, loose-fitting two-piece dress for an event in Davos, Switzerland, on Tuesday, January 17, amid reports that she may be pregnant.”
“The 38-year-old human rights attorney looked poised in a flattering taupe-colored dress that cut away at the midriff to reveal a silvery-gray sheath material underneath.”
“Her husband, George Clooney, opted for a classic black-on-black look for the Tina Brown–helmed Women of Impact dinner.”
“Also in attendance at the high-profile dinner was outgoing Vice President Joe Biden, who sweetly greeted the Hollywood couple at the dinner.”
“Amal has been dogged with reports of a possible pregnancy since she and Oscar winner George, 55, appeared at an L.A. screening for the Netflix documentary The White Helmets on Monday, January 9.”
“That night, the Lebanese-born lawyer ditched her signature figure-hugging outfits for a floral frock that hung loosely on her slender frame.”
“Shortly afterward, several outlets reported that Amal was not only pregnant, but pregnant with twins.”
““We mostly drank,” he said.”


"I made dinner and we had a very romantic second anniversary."
"Amar matches this skirt with black tights and black boots."
Amar Clooney appears at an event in Davos, Switzerland, on Tuesday, January 17, wearing a stunning two-piece dress that is loose fitting and has been reported to be pregnant
"The 38 year old human rights lawyer looks calm in a taupe dress with the middle cut to reveal a silver gray sheath."
Her husband, George Clooney, chose the classic black-on-black look for women at Tina Brown's impact dinner
Biden, the outgoing vice president, also attended the high-profile dinner, where Biden cordially paid tribute to the Hollywood couple
"Amar has been plagued by reports of possible pregnancy since she and Oscar winner George, 55, showed the Netflix documentary White Helmets in Los Angeles on Monday, January 9."
"That night, the Lebanon born lawyer abandoned her iconic tights for a floral dress that hung loosely over her slender body."
"Soon after, several media reported that Amar was not only pregnant, but also pregnant with twins."
"We drink most of the time," he said



Number  919
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The star agreed to get alcohol abuse treatment as part of a settlement related to the incident.”
“In 2014, LaBeouf pleaded guilty to one count of disorderly conduct after an outburst at a Broadway theater.”
“Other instances include arrests for public intoxication in 2015 in Texas and a DUI in 2008 in California.”
“Those charges were later dismissed.”
“In January, he was arrested in New York after police said he got in a scuffle with a man at his own art exhibit.”
“Saturday wasn’t the first time the star of the “Transformers” films had trouble with the law.”
“The actor is in Savannah filming a movie, “The Peanut Butter Falcon,” with Dakota Johnson and Bruce Dern.”
““LaBeouf was arrested in the hotel lobby, where his disorderly behavior continued.”CNN has reached out to LaBeouf’s publicist and manager for comment.”
““When the officer attempted to place LaBeouf under arrest, LaBeouf ran to a nearby hotel,” the police statement said.”
“He was told to leave the area but refused and became aggressive toward the officer, police said.”


"The star agreed to receive treatment for alcoholism as part of a settlement agreement related to the incident."
"In 2014, after riots broke out at Broadway theater, Labov pleaded guilty to a crime of disturbing order."
"Other examples include public drunkenness arrest in Texas in 2015 and drunk driving arrest in California in 2008."
"The charges were later dismissed."
In January, he was arrested in New York, where police said he wrestled with a man at his art show
"Saturday wasn't the first time Transformers movie stars had legal problems."
The actor is in Savannah working with Dakota Johnson and Bruce Dean on the movie peanut butter falcon
"Labov was arrested in the hotel lobby, and his disorderly conduct continues." CNN has contacted rabov's PR and manager for advice
"When the police tried to arrest Labov, Labov ran to a nearby hotel," the police statement said
"He was told to leave the area, but was refused and became aggressive with the police officers," police said



Number  920
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They're great under makeup."”
“They just kind of disappear and they're not too heavy.”
“Honest Beauty Gentle Gel CleanserHonest Beauty Gentle Gel Cleanser: "I'll put cleanser [on my cleansing brush]."”
“I don't want to be a morning gym person, but I kind of feel like if I don't get it done in the morning, I'll never get it done."”
“Cleansers:Honest Beauty Makeup Remover WipesHonest Beauty Makeup Remover Wipes: "I like to use these before I go to the gym.”
“Jessica’s Morning Skincare Routine1.”
“Read on!”
“Jessica Alba (Photo: @jessicaalba)Ready to see which products keep Jessica's complexion clear and glowing?”
“("I wanted a product that could address both issues," she told InStyle.)”
“Recently, she also launched a Clearing range specifically targeted at acne and anti-aging.”


"They look good in makeup."
"They just disappear, and they're not too heavy."
"Honesty, beauty, mild gel cleanser, nesting beauty, gentle Gel Cleanser:" I will put cleansing milk on my cleansing brush. “
"I don't want to be a morning exercise fan, but I kind of feel that if I don't do it in the morning, I'll never do it."
"Cleanser: honest and beautiful makeup removal wipes nest beauty makeup removal wipes:" I like to use these before going to the gym. "
"Jessica's morning routine 1."
"Read on!"
"Is Jessica Alba (photo: @ Jessica Alba) ready to see what products will keep Jessica's complexion clear and bright?"
"(" I want a product that can solve both problems at the same time, "she told InStyle.)
"Recently, she has also launched a series of acne treatments specifically for acne and anti-aging."



Number  921
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the full Coachella 2018 schedule.”
“Follow along with our full coverage of Coachella 2018.”
“She and JAY-Z are embarking on their joint tour On the Run II, which has been extended.”
“This year, she joined the Weeknd and Eminem as headlining acts.”
“Last year, Bey was slated to headline Coachella but ultimately cancelled due to doctor’s advice regarding her pregnancy.”
“Bey also brought out Rowland and Williams during her Super Bowl performance.”
“In 2013, they released a compilation called Love Songs.”
“Destiny’s Child last rejoined in the public eye in 2016 for a #MannequinChallenge clip.”
“Watch it all go down below.”
“Beyoncé also brought out her sister Solange to dance through “Get Me Bodied.” “Thank you for allowing me to be the first black woman to headline Coachella,” she told the crowd at the end of the set.”


"See the full timetable for kocera in 2018."
"Follow our full coverage of kocera in 2018."
"She and Jay-Z are starting their run II Joint tour, which has been extended."
"This year, she joined weeknd and Eminem and made headlines."
"Last year, Bei was made the headlines of cochella, but eventually cancelled her pregnancy due to the doctor's advice."
"Bei also brought Roland and Williams to the super bowl."
"In 2013, they released a collection called love songs."
"The last time destiny's son returned to public view was in 2016, when a mannequin challenged the clip."
"Look down there."
"Beyonce also danced with her sister, Solange, in let me be healthy." "Thank you for making me the first black woman to make cochella's headlines," she told the audience at the end of the set



Number  922
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jen says that getting treated like a queen by John has taken some getting used to, but she’s loving it.”For more on this story, pick up the latest issue of In Touch Weekly, on newsstands now!”
“...with John is like a dream...”
“Jennifer Garner wasn’t exactly fond of Ben Affleck‘s last girlfriend (Shauna Sexton), and now he’s not a fan of her new man.”
“A source tells In Touch magazine that even though Cali Burger CEO John Miller is the “nicest guy,” Ben can’t help but not like him.”
““Ben is used to his ex-wife dropping everything for him, but that’s all changed and he’s no longer at the top of her list of priorities,” an insider tells the mag, on newsstands now.”
“Apparently, the Gone Girl actor is also a tad jealous.”
““He winces whenever Jen brings up John’s name.”
“He can’t help finding faults with him, even though John’s the nicest guy and hasn’t done anything wrong.”MEGAJen was initially apprehensive about jumping back into the dating pool.”
“Just last year, the 13 Going on 30 star said she didn’t want to be set up on a date.”
“She told reporters at the Hollywood Foreign Press Conference, “I would not choose to be single or be in this position.”


"Jane said it took some time to get used to being treated as Queen by John, but she loved it." To learn more about this story, click on the latest issue of contact weekly, which is now on the newsstand
“… Being with John is like a dream... "
"Jennifer Garner didn't like Ben Affleck's last girlfriend (Shawna Sexton), and now he's not a fan of her new boyfriend."
A source told in touch magazine that Ben couldn't help but dislike carliburg's chief executive, John Miller, even though he was "the best man."
"Ben was used to his ex-wife giving up everything for him, but it all changed and he was no longer her priority," a person familiar with the matter told the magazine, on the newsstand
"Obviously, the actress is a little jealous, too."
"When Jane mentions John's name, he flinches."
"Even though John is the most amiable man and has done nothing wrong, he can't help but get hairy." Megajane initially worried that she would jump into the dating pool
"Just last year, the 13-to-30 star said she didn't want to be arranged for a date."
"I'm not going to choose to be single or hold this position," she told reporters at a foreign press conference in Hollywood



Number  923
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Baby bump: The Mudbound actor and his model/actress wife are also expecting their second baby boy...”
“The 24th Annual SAG Awards will air both on TNT and TBS at 8pm EST/ 5pm EST.”
“Morgan Freeman will be the recipient of the 2017 SAG Life Achievement Award.”
“The dark comedy received acting nominations for Frances McDormand, Sam Rockwell, and Woody Harelson.”
“After a successful night at the Golden Globes just a few weeks ago, Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri led the nominations with four.”
“Family affair: They've been together since 2010 and share a three-year-old sonSurely it will be a night celebrating women as the SAG Awards will feature mostly female presenters including Halle Berry, Olivia Munn, Emma Stone, Lupita Nyong'o, Marisa Tomei, and Gina Rodriguez.”
“The plunging dress put her delicate decolletage on center stage as she paired the look with a small black clutch.”
“Cecile dared to impress in an intricate see-through couture gown that showcased her growing baby bump.”
“His salt and pepper hair was kept shortly cropped as he rocked a slight stubble on his ruggedly handsome face.”
“Jason Clarke, 48, and Cecile Breccia revealed they are married at the red carpet of the 2018 SAG Awards in Los Angeles on SundayThe Australian hunk cut a dapper figure in a classic black tuxedo that belied his muscular frame underneath.”


"Baby lumps: the muddy actor and his model / actress's wife are also looking forward to their second boy..."
"The 24th sag annual awards ceremony will be broadcast on TNT and TBS at 8pm / 5pm est."
"Morgan Freeman will win the 2017 sag Life Achievement Award."
The black comedy was nominated by Francis mcdorman, Sam Rockwell and woody Harson for acting
"Just a few weeks ago at the Golden Globe Awards, Missouri's three billboards led the nominations with four."
"Family Romance: they've been together since 2010 and shared a three-year-old song. Of course, it will be a night to celebrate Women, because the sag awards ceremony will be mainly attended by female hosts, including Halle Berry, Olivia moon, Emma stone, Lupita Niono, Marissa tome and Gina Rodriguez. "
"This drop dress puts her exquisite striptease in the middle of the stage because she matches it with a small black bag."
"Cecil dares to put on a complicated perspective dress to show her growing lumps and impress people."
"His salt and pepper hair was cut short because he shook a slight stubble on his rough, handsome face."
"Jason Clark and Cecile breccia, 48, revealed that they will be married on Sunday on the red carpet at the 2018 sag awards in Los Angeles. The Australian handsome man wore a classic black tuxedo to set off his muscular body and cut off a smart figure



Number  924
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO Dwayne The Rock Johnson s Daughter Simone honored as first Golden Globe Ambassador It Makes Me So Happy...”
“Going into it our focus is far more on the worlds that make these films and less on anything that s happening in Washington Image zoom Dwayne The Rock Johnson and Simone Alexandra Johnson at the 2016 Golden Globes Credit Alberto Rodriguez NBC NBCU Photo Bank via Getty Images RELATED”
“...of sexual misconduct...”
“With the monologue as far as talking about anything in the news right now it seems like this year more than ever Hollywood has its own internal politics that obviously deserve to be talked about he said referencing the headlines made by Harvey Weinstein and other major entertainment figures accused...”
“Be sure to check out PEOPLE’s full Golden Globes coverage to get the latest news on Hollywood’s big night.”
“The 44-year-old host of Late Night with Seth Meyers recently told PEOPLE how he planned to handle the hosting gig in the wake of the sexual harassment scandals that have rocked Hollywood in recent months.”
“Seth Meyers will take the stage as host of the 2018 Golden Globe Awards.”
“ET — the Globes, awarded by the Hollywood Foreign Press Association, will honor nominees in film and TV.”
“ET while NBC’s begins at 7 p.m.”
“Red Carpet starts 6 p.m.”


"Simone, daughter of rock star Dwayne, was awarded the first Golden Globe Award ambassador, which made me very happy..."
"Into it, our focus is more on the world, making these movies, rather than anything that happens in Washington, D.C., at the 2016 Golden Globe credit Alberto Rodriguez NBC through Getty pictures related to NBC pictures of kudwayne's rock Johnson and Simon Alexandra Johnson."
“… Sexual misconduct... "
"As far as anything in the news is being talked about right now, Hollywood seems to have more internal politics of its own this year than ever before, which is clearly worth talking about," he said. Referring to the headlines of Harvey Weinstein and other major entertainers, he said
"Be sure to check out people's full coverage of the Golden Globes and get the latest news on Hollywood night."
"The 44 year old host of" late at night with Seth Meyers "recently told people how he plans to handle the hosting concert after the sexual harassment scandal that has rocked Hollywood in recent months."
"Seth Meyers will be the host of the 2018 Golden Globe Awards."
The global award, presented by the Hollywood Association of foreign journalists, will go to nominees in the field of film and television
"Eastern time, NBC starts at 7 pm."
"The red carpet starts at 6pm."



Number  925
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nicole also has her two kids and she’s so busy with her TV show [Great News], and I’m so busy.””
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“The heiress, 37, has been longtime friends with Kardashian— who gave birth to her first child, a baby girl, on Thursday in Cleveland — and said “this all that she’s ever wanted.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I talked to Kim [Kardashian West] yesterday and they were flying out there for the birth,” Hilton told PEOPLE exclusively at Rachel Zoe’s fourth annual ZOEasis style retreat at Coachella on Friday.”
““Khloé has always wanted to be a mom and she has such a big heart and is so loving.”“She’s a natural,” continued Hilton.”
““This is her dream come true.”
“She’s so happy, and I’m thrilled for her.”Watch the full special Born Kardashian streaming now on PeopleTV.com, or download the PeopleTV app on your favorite device.”
“The exciting chapter comes in the midst of scandal: Tristan Thompson, Kardashian’s boyfriend and the baby’s father, has been accused of cheating on her with multiple women.”
““I’ve known that girl my entire life and she’s a strong, resilient woman,” said Hilton.”
““I think that all she’s focusing on right now is this baby.”WATCH: Then & Now: Khloé Kardashian & Tristan Thompson’s Relationship Whirlwind —How Did We Get Here?”


"Nicole has two kids. She's busy watching TV (good news), and I'm busy too."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
The 37 year old heiress has always been an old friend of Kardashian, who gave birth to her first child, a baby girl, in Cleveland on Thursday. "It's all she's ever wanted," she said Get news, feature, etc
"I talked to Kim (Kardashian West) yesterday and they were flying there to have a baby," Hilton told people exclusively on Friday at Rachel Zoe's fourth zoysian holiday in cochella
"Gloria has always wanted to be a mother. She has a big heart and is full of love." "She was born," Hilton continued
"It's her dream come true."
"She's so happy. I'm excited for her." Now watch the full special of "born Kardashian" on people's TV network, or download the peopletv app on your favorite device. “
"An exciting chapter takes place in the scandal: Tristan Thompson, Kardashian's boyfriend and father of the child, is accused of cheating on a number of women."
"I've known that girl all my life. She's a strong, resilient woman," Hilton said
"I think it's just the child that she's focused on right now." Look: then and now: the relationship between heloka Dashan and Tristan Thompson - how did we get there? "



Number  926
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What a gift.”
“She told Henry, “I feel like in my mind you jam out to me,” which I totally believe she does feel.”
“He promised Iggy she’d have new springtime career opportunities and then have time for love.”
“Now he’s clairvoyant thanks to “them”?”
“No dead people from Azalea’s past felt like talking to Henry, I guess, so he instead advised Azaela on her love life and career and it was like...what does this guy even do anyway?”
“Henry did not pretend to not know who she was, as he often has in the past when pulling up to a celebrity’s house (he said he thought Larry Birkhead was Keith Urban).”
“Especially that, actually.)”
“(I also believe she says this to a lot of people and will continue saying this for decades even if she ends up living in a bedroom with her mother in a crumbling mansion.”
“Lo, “Pretty Girls” with Britney Spears).”
“...own show...”


"What a gift."
She said to Henry, "I think in my mind, you feel strongly about me," and I'm fully convinced that she does. "
"He assured ejie that she would have a new spring career and then time to fall in love."
Thanks to them, he has insight? "
"In the past of azaleas, no dead people wanted to talk to Henry, I guess, so he suggested azaella's love life and career, just like What the hell did this guy do? "
"Henry didn't pretend he didn't know who she was, as he used to do when parking at celebrity homes (he said he thought Larry berkhead was Keith Urban)
"Especially this, in fact."
"I'm sure she'll say that to a lot of people, and will continue to say that for decades, even if she ends up living with her mother in a bedroom in a dilapidated mansion."
"Look at the beautiful girls with Britney Spears."
“… My own show... "



Number  927
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Jessie Graff Nick Swisher former Yankees outfielder with Drew Drechsel Jeff Dye comedian with Meagan Martin and film star Mena Suvaru American Beauty the American Pie movies with Natalie Duran...”
“Additionally the Red Nose Day edition of American Ninja Warrior will see celebs Erika Christensen Parenthood pair with Flip Rodriguez Derek Hough Dancing with the Stars with Daniel Gil Natalie Morales NBC s Today with Grant McCartney Ashton Eaton Olympic gold medalist with Kevin Bull Nikki Glaser comedian host with...”
“Amell will be partnered with the show’s female standout and poster-woman Kacy Cantanzaro.”
“The special edition will pair celebrities with veteran participants called “Elite Ninjas,” who will act in a coaching capacity as the celebs navigate the elaborately arduous courses.”
“As the preview reveals, Stephen Amell will shed Oliver Queen and the Green Arrow to participate in television’s ultimate obstacle course proving ground.”
“Amell’s American Ninja Warrior run will air as part of NBC’s upcoming annual celebration of Red Nose Day, showcasing a celebrity edition of the obstacle course mainstay series.”
“Even if Amell ultimately ends up taking an ignominious header into the drink below, the preview already proves that what we see of Oliver Queen’s training on Arrow is pretty much ALL Stephen Amell.”
“While the clip obviously doesn’t divulge the ultimate outcome, it does show Amell absolutely crushing the early – but nevertheless difficult – obstacles of the initial course with athletic ease.”
“NBC has released a sneak preview of Stephen Amell’s imminently airing American Ninja Warrior run.”
“Now, Amell will get a chance to showcase his skills in real life!”


"Jesse Graf Nick Swisher, former Yankees outfielder drew Drexel Jeff day, comedian Migan Martin and movie star MENA suvaru, American Beauty Natalie Duran's American movies..."
"In addition, the red nose day version of the American Ninja Warrior will see celebrity Erica Christensen's parents dancing with flipped Rodriguez Derek Hof with star Daniel gilnatalie Morales on NBC today with grant McCartney Ashton Eaton Olympic gold medalist Kevin buniki Glazer comedian host and..."
"Amel will work with the heroine and poster girl Kathy cantanzaro of the play."
The special edition will pair celebrities with senior "elite ninjas" who will play the role of coaches to help celebrities walk through tough courses
"As the announcement shows, Stephen amel will get rid of Oliver Quinn and green arrow and take part in the ultimate obstacle training ground of TV station."
"Amel's" Ninja Warrior of America "will be broadcast as part of NBC's upcoming" Red Nose Day "annual celebration, which will feature a celebrity version of the" obstacle course "series
"Even if amel eventually header in the next game, the trailer has proved that Oliver Quinn's arrow training is almost Stephen amel."
"Although this video obviously does not reveal the final result, it does show that amel can absolutely easily overcome the initial (though difficult) obstacles."
"NBC has released a trailer for Stephen amel's upcoming" Ninja Warrior of America. "
"Now, amel will have a chance to show his skills in real life!"



Number  928
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on the happy family, watch the video below.”
““Again, she likes how much I dig it, because I'm very vocal about my approval when she's riding that thing."”
“"She rode for three hours, never crashed...she digs it,” he continued.”
“That makes me happier than anything."”
“"Come on!”
“...said Shepard, who is a proclaimed motorcycle enthusiast.”
“"Look at her!"”
“Watch the moment in the video below.”
“...on the motorcycle...”
“So in that time I bought my 4 year old an electric motorcycle and taught her to ride it WATCH Kristen Bell Shares Moving Flashback Photo of Her and Dax Shepard Patiently Waiting Out First Pregnancy He then showed footage to the audience of his little girl s first ride...”


"For more information about happy families, watch the video below."
"Again, she likes how much I like it, because when she's riding it, I really agree with me."
"She's been riding for three hours and never had a crash She dug it out, "he continued
"It makes me happier than anything else."
"Hurry up!"
“…… "He calls himself a motorcycle enthusiast," Sheppard said
"Look at her!"
"Watch the moments in the video below."
“… On a motorcycle... "
"So at that time, I bought my 4-year-old an electric motorcycle, taught her to ride a motorcycle, shared the moving flashback photos of Christine bell and Darth Shepard waiting patiently for their first pregnancy, and then he showed the audience the mirror of the little girl's first motorcycle ride..."



Number  929
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Rise” is produced by Universal Television, True Jack Productions and Seller Suarez Productions.”
“Michelle Lee, Jeffrey Seller and Flody Suarez also executive produce.”
“So it was natural for the newcomer to take over hit This Is Us when the latter wraps its season.”
“(This Is Us produces 18-episodes seasons vs. the standard 22.)”
“There will be a passing of the baton, with Rise, from creator Katims and Hamilton producer Jeffrey Seller, launching Tuesday, March 13 at 10 PM immediately following the season finale of This Is Us.”
“Rise will then move to its regular 9 PM time slot the following Tuesday, March 20.”
“Good Girls, from creator Jenna Bans, will take over the post-Voice Monday 10 PM slot currently occupied by military drama The Brave, which will not be getting additional episodes.”
“Per NBC, The Brave, which has been a modest but steady performer in the hour, was designed to do a 13-episode season, with a Season 2 renewal decision to be made at a later date.”
“Good Girls will debut Monday, February 26 at 10 PM, immediately following the spring-cycle premiere of The Voice, featuring new coach Kelly Clarkson alongside Alicia Keys, Adam Levine and Blake Shelton.”
“In Live+7 ratings, The Brave has grown by 60% in the 18-49 demographic and by 3.2 million viewers overall (5.3 million to 8.5 million).”


Rise is produced by universal TV, true Jack productions and seller Suarez productions
Michelle Lee, Jeffrey seller and Floyd Suarez are also executive products
"So when the latter ends the season, it's natural for the rookie to take over this is us."
"This is the fourth quarter of 18 episodes produced in the United States, compared with the standard 22 episodes."
"There's going to be a baton pass, up from creator Katims and Hamilton producer Jeffrey seller, launched Tuesday, March 13 at 10 p.m., followed by the last one of the season for us."
"Next Tuesday, March 20, Reese will switch to the normal 9 p.m. period."
Good girl's creator, Jenna bans, will take over the post voice role at 10 p.m. on Monday, and the film is currently airing the military drama the brave, with no additional episodes
"According to NBC," the brave "has been flat in an hour, but stable. It plans to air 13 episodes this season, and the decision to renew its contract for the second season will be made later."
"Good girl" will premiere at 10pm on Monday, February 26, followed by the spring Premiere of "good girl", where new coach Kelly Clarkson will appear with Alicia case, Adam Levin and Blake Sheldon
"Among live + 7 viewers," the brave "grew by 60% among 18-49 year olds, with a total increase of 3.2 million (5.3 million to 8.5 million)



Number  930
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There are way more things that I love about him than things that drive me crazy.””
““[Janetti is] very, very funny and also so easy to live with.”
““The strange thing is, [my career] made our relationship so much better because now we have this really weird, strange experience that we’ve been through together,” the celebrity stylist said during an interview on HuffPost Live in February 2016.”
“Goreski previously said his successful career in reality TV helped bring him closer to Janetti, who is best known for his work on Family Guy, Will & Grace and the British sitcom Vicious.”
“Thank you @isaia for our custom suits and @davidyurman for our custom wedding bands.”The longtime couple met in Athens, Greece, and became engaged in August 2014.”
“We couldn’t be happier!”
““After over 16 years together @garyjanetti and I finally tied the knot aboard the @seabourncruise Sojourn with our close family in attendance!”
““We’re married!” Goreski gushed on Instagram.”
“Their wedding rings were crafted by David Yurman.”
“The Fashion Police cohost, 40, wore a custom royal blue suit by Isaia, while his 51-year-old groom donned a gray suit that was also designed by the Italian menswear brand.”


"I love him more than anything that drives me crazy."
"It's very, very interesting and easy to get along with."
"It's strange that [my career] has made our relationship better, because now we have this very strange, strange experience we've had together," the Celebrity Stylist said in an interview with huffport live in February 2016
Goresky has previously said that his successful career on reality TV has helped him get closer to Janet, whose most famous works are "family boy", "will and grace" and the British sitcom "viciousness"
"Thank you @ isaia for the suit and @ davidyurman for the wedding ring." The old couple met in Athens, Greece, and got engaged in August 2014
"We can't be happier!"
"After more than 16 years together, @ garyjanetti and I finally got married on the @ seabourncrue sojourn boat, and our relatives were present!"
"We are married! "Goresky talks a lot on instagram."
"Their wedding rings were made by David youman."
"The 40 year old fashion police cohabitant is wearing isaya's custom royal blue suit, while his 51 year old groom is wearing a grey suit, also designed by the Italian men's wear brand."



Number  931
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More on the Creative Arts Awards ceremony can be found here.”
“CBS also led all networks and streaming services with a total of 70 noms.”
“The 44th annual Daytime Emmy Awards were handed out Sunday night.”
“General Hospital, The Ellen DeGeneres Show, The Talk, Entertainment Tonight, Good Morning America, Jeopardy!”
“...and Steve Harvey were among the night's big winners.”
“Harvey, in fact, won two awards: best game show host for Family Feud and best informative talk show host for his eponymous talker.”
“Heading into the ceremony, CBS' The Young and the Restless led all nominees with a total of 25, followed by the network's The Bold and the Beautiful.”
“Both series were nominated for best daytime drama alongside NBC's Days of Our Lives and last year's winner, ABC's General Hospital.”
“Also at the 44th Daytime Emmy Awards, former Entertainment Tonight host Mary Hart was honored with the lifetime achievement award.”
“A list of Daytime Emmy winners in select categories follows.”


"More information about the creative arts awards ceremony can be found here."
"CBS also leads all Internet and streaming services with 70 domains."
"The 44th day Emmy Awards will be presented on Sunday night."
"General hospital, Alan DeGeneres Show, tonight's speech, entertainment show, good morning, America, danger!"
"Steve Harvey was the big winner of the night."
In fact, Harvey won two awards: best game host for "family grudge" and best information talk show host for his speaker of the same name
"Before the ceremony, CBS's young and the restless led all nominees with a total of 25 votes, followed by the network's bold and beautiful
"Both series have been nominated for best daytime TV series, juxtaposed with NBC's our lives and last year's champion ABC's general hospital."
At the 44th day Emmy Awards ceremony, former Entertainment Tonight host Mary Hart won the lifetime achievement award
"The following is a list of day Emmy winners for the selected categories."



Number  932
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN’s Jennifer Hansler contributed to this report...”
““It had one of those wrenches … and it only had like four parts or something.”
“...the entire move in process...”
“Michelle she had like a cleaning glove one of those yellow ones she s scouring the bathroom Obama told Letterman in the first episode of his new Netflix series My Next Guest Needs No Introduction Sasha was helping make the bed and fold clothes and I was basically useless Malia...”
“...started her undergraduate career at Harvard University last year after a taking a gap year following her high school graduation...”
“The former President and first lady were spotted helping her move into her dorm at the end of August 2017.”
“Obama went on to describe that his only task, delegated to him by his daughters, was to set up a desk lamp – and even that proved to be difficult for the emotional father.”
““It should have taken like five minutes or three minutes,” he joked.”
“I’m sitting there just toiling away at this thing, it’s taking half an hour.”
“Other scheduled guests on Letterman’s show include George Clooney, Malala Yousafzai, Jay-Z, Tina Fey and Howard Stern.”


"CNN's Jennifer Hensler contributed to this report..."
"It has a wrench like this And there are only four parts. "
“… The whole check-in process... "
"Michelle, she has a cleaning glove, a yellow one, and she's cleaning the bathroom. Obama told Letterman that in the first episode of his new Netflix series, my next guest doesn't need to introduce. Sasha is helping to make the bed and fold clothes. I'm basically useless Maria..."
“… She started her undergraduate career at Harvard University last year, in a gap year after graduating from high school
"At the end of August 2017, the former president and the first lady were found helping her move into the dormitory."
"Obama went on to say that the only task his daughters gave him was to install a lamp - even so, it was difficult for this emotional father."
"It should take five or three minutes," he joked
"I just sat there working hard for half an hour."
Other scheduled guests for Letterman include George Clooney, malala Yusuf, jay z, Tina Fey and Howard Stern



Number  933
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He’s attracted to that, but it makes their relationship volatile.”Viall previously looked for love on Andi Dorfman’s season 10 of The Bachelorette, Kaitlyn Bristowe’s season 11 of The Bachelorette and Bachelor in Paradise season 3.”
“She’s not going to just do whatever he wants,” the insider said.”
“Vanessa Grimaldi broke her silence after announcing her split from Nick Viall on Friday, August 25.”
“It’s okay to feel broken.”
“It’s okay to cry.”
“It’s okay to lean on a friend.”
“In the end, it will always be okay.”
“A post shared by VanessaGrimaldi (@vanessagrimaldi30) on Aug 28, 2017 at 1:23pm PDTThe Montreal-based special education teacher shared a photo of herself leaning on a friend’s shoulder at the park while looking out at a lake.”
““It’s okay to feel broken,” she wrote on Monday, August 28.”
““It’s okay to cry.”


"He was attracted to it, but it made their relationship unstable." Prior to that, vials had been searching for love in Andy doffman's singles season 10, Caitlin Bristol's singles Season 11 and singles in paradise Season 3
"She won't just do what he wants to do," the person familiar with the matter said
On Friday, August 25, Vanessa Grimaldi broke her silence after breaking up with Nick Villar
"It's OK to feel broken."
"It doesn't matter to cry."
"It's OK to rely on friends."
"In the end, everything will be fine."
"Vanessa Grimaldi (@ Vanessa Grimaldi 30) posted a post at 1:23 p.m. on August 28, 2017. A special education teacher in Montreal shared a picture of her leaning against a friend's shoulder to see the lake in the park."
On Monday, August 28, she wrote, "it's OK to feel broken."
"It doesn't matter to cry."



Number  934
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Luis Fonsi's Daughter Dances to "Échame La Culpa" and We Can’t Even (VIDEO)Speaking of, remember this?”
“Tracks battling "Despacito" for song of the year include Mars' "That's What I Like," Sheeran's "Shape of You," the Chainsmokers and Coldplay's "Something Just Like This," and "Wild Thoughts" by DJ Khaled, Rihanna and Bryson Tiller.”
“A slew of artists are behind the Latin hit makers with five nominations each, including Bruno Mars, Taylor Swift, Rihanna, DJ Khaled, Shawn Mendes, the Chainsmokers, Ed Sheeran, Camila Cabello and Khalid.”
“It will air live on TBS, TNT and truTV, and also on iHeartMedia radio stations.”
“The fifth annual awards show will be held March 11 at the Forum in Inglewood, California.”
“IHeartMedia announced Wednesday that Fonsi and Yankee scored seven nominations each, including song of the year for the tune's version with Justin Bieber.”
“NEW YORK (AP) — "Despacito" dominated 2017, but it's still bringing success to Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee: The artists are the leading nominees at the iHeartRadio Music Awards.”


Louis fonsey's daughter dances with "É chame La culpa" and we can't even talk about it. Remember that? "
"The songs competing for" despair "of the year include Mars's" that's what I like, "Sheeran's" your shape, "chain smoker and Coldplay's" something like this, "and DJ Khalid, Rihanna and Bryson Tiller's" fantasy. "
"A lot of artists support popular Latin producers, and they have won five nominations, including Bruno Mars, Taylor Swift, Rihanna, DJ Khalid, Sean Mendes, chain smoker, ed Sheeran, Camilla Cabello and Khalid."
"It will be broadcast live on TBS, TNT and truTV, as well as iheartmedia radio."
"The fifth annual awards ceremony will be held on March 11 at a forum in Inglewood, California."
Iheartmedia announced on Wednesday that Fonsi and Yankee had received seven nominations each, including the song of the year with Justin Bieber
"New York (AP) -" despacito "dominated 2017, but it still brought success to Louis fonsey and dad Yankee: these artists are the main nominees for the iHeartRadio Music Award."



Number  935
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Swift now give your song the thumbs up is amazing...”
“Right Said Fred are shocked, too.”
“Meanwhile, their publishers negotiated on the band’s behalf, though Fairbrass isn’t sure whose idea it was to make them co-songwriters versus clearing a sample.”
““We trust our publisher to know what we agree and don’t agree to,” Fairbrass says, so he and his bandmates never thought to ask.”
“But it was unbeknownst to the band that the woman making the request was the Taylor Swift.”
“(Meaning Swift and Antonoff incorporated an original recording of “I’m Too Sexy” into their mix, rather than use the original masters.)”
“Fred Fairbrass tells Vulture that, not long ago, Swift, Antonoff, and their publishers reached out to Right Said Fred’s publishing company, Spirit Music Group, and asked for permission to interpolate the song.”
“...world...”
“The three members weren t even aware of Taylor s interest in tinkering with I m Too Sexy until two days ago and none of them got to listen to the finished product until today with the rest of the...”
“...to any compensation for the artists who came up with the original...”


"Swift's thumbs up to your song now is amazing..."
"Yes, I said Fred was shocked, too."
"At the same time, their publishers negotiated on behalf of the band, but fairblas was not sure whose idea made them co composers or cleaned up a sample."
"We believe our publishers know what we agree with and disagree with," fairblas said, so he and his band never wanted to ask
"But the band didn't know that the woman who asked was Tyler swift."
(meaning swift and Antonov added an original recording of "I'm too sexy" to their mix, rather than using the original master.)
Fred fairblas told the vulture that swift, Antonov and their publishers contacted Fred's publishing company spirit music group not long ago and asked for permission to insert the song
“… The world
"It wasn't until two days ago that the three members realized that Tyler was too interested in fixing me. To this day, they haven't been able to listen to the finished product with others."
“…… Any compensation to the artists who put forward the original works.... "



Number  936
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I didn’t want Becca to see our friendship as the most important thing and not give him that chance.””
“And Becca!!”
“I don’t like the situation either, but if you said you’d stop bashing Tia, then you should keep your word.”The feud showed no signs of slowing down, with Gates cryptically tweeting about the social media showdown without mentioning Martinez’s name.”
“And you’re entitled to your opinion.”
“That’s the reason I tweeted that thing about Colton and Tia in the first place, because it looked like they both played her on this one.”However, it didn’t end there as Gates said, “You know that Tia didn’t.”
“To which Martinez replied, “Girl I would never talk s–t on Becca because she’s as real as it gets.”
“(But don’t worry, Bachelor Nation had the receipts to prove it!)”
“!” Gates said in a since-deleted tweet.”
“Come on now hurry up!”
““Make sure you follow @whats_ur_sign_ so she can get those followers so she can stop talking s–t about her friends.. like tia!!”


"I don't want Becca to see our friendship as the most important thing and not give him the chance."
"And Becca!"
"I don't like that either, but if you say you don't attack TIA anymore, you should keep your word." There is no sign that the feud will slow down. Gates mysteriously talked about the social media showdown on twitter, but did not mention Martinez's name
"You have the right to express your opinion."
"That's why I tweeted about Colton and TIA in the first place, because it looks like they both played her in the play." However, it didn't end as Gates said, "you know TIA didn't."
In response, Martinez replied, "girl, I'll never talk about Becca's s S-T, because she's real, because it gets."
"But don't worry, the bachelor country has a receipt to prove that!"
"!" Gates said in the deleted microblog
"Come on, come on!"
"Be sure to pay attention to @ What, so that she can get those followers, so that she can stop talking about her friends.. Just like TIA! "



Number  937
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I recall Miramax telling us they were a nightmare to work with and we should avoid them at all costs,” Jackson admitted.”
“In the week before Christmas, Lord of the Rings director Peter Jackson revealed how Weinstein pressured him to blacklist actors Ashley Judd and Mira Sorvino after they fell victim to an alleged “smear campaign” by the Hollywood mogul.”
“AdvertisementWeinstein’s fall from grace is widely viewed as the catalyst for a slew of sexual assault allegations faced by high-profile Hollywood figures in recent months.”
“It is expected to feature interviews with some of Weinstein’s most prominent accusers – including Rose McGowan, Asia Argento, Salma Hayek, and Paz de la Huerta.”
“The film, which has been given the working title ‘Weinstein’, will focus on the slew of sexual assault allegations that have been levelled at the Hollywood mogul in recent months.”
“The BBC has recently announced it is making a feature-length documentary on the fall of Harvey Weinstein.”
“Diamond’s Weinstein ultimately meets a grisly endWatch the video below.”
“AdvertisementDirected by Joshua Mendez, the video references details made in allegations by the dozens of women who have accused Weinstein of rape and sexual assault.”
“In the video, Diamond as Weinstein is seen snorting cocaine in a hotel bathroom and doing shots at a bar before he is taken to a hotel bed room by a nun played by actress Kelly Cunningham.”
“Diamond, best known for playing Screech in the iconic ’90s teen sitcom, stars as the disgraced Hollywood mogul in the video for ‘Kill All The Things’ by rock band TENLo.”


"I remember Miramax telling us that they were a nightmare and we should avoid them at any cost," Jackson admitted
The week before Christmas, Peter Jackson, director of the Lord of the rings, revealed how Weinstein pressured him to blacklist the actors Ashley Judd and Mira sowino, who were victims of what Hollywood tycoons call the "defamation campaign."
"Weinstein's fall from grace is widely seen as a catalyst for a series of sexual assault charges that Hollywood celebrities have faced in recent months."
"Interviews are expected with some of Weinstein's most prominent plaintiffs, including Ross McGovern, Argento of Asia, Salma Hayek and pas de la Huerta."
"The film's working name is Weinstein, and it will focus on a series of sexual assault charges against the Hollywood tycoon in recent months."
"The BBC recently announced that it is making a long documentary about the fall of Harvey Weinstein."
"Diamond's Weinstein finally had a terrible ending. Watch the video below."
"In an ad directed by Joshua Mendes, the video mentions the details of dozens of women accused of rape and sexual assault by Weinstein."
In this video, Weinstein, played by diamond, takes cocaine in a hotel bathroom, takes pictures in a bar, and is taken to the hotel bedroom by a nun played by actress Kelly Cunningham
"Diamond is famous for his role in the classic teenage sitcom scream of the 1990s, and in the video of rock band tenlo's kill everything, diamond plays a notorious Hollywood tycoon."



Number  938
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Of course it felt rewarding in the beginning.”
“In a particularly vengeful twist, he’s now dating one of Kyle’s ex-boyfriends.”
“And I wanted to make her proud, because I feel like out of every one of the [five] children, I was the one that was the outcast,” she says.”
““I wanted to get revenge on my mom.”
“Her mother became even more critical of her weight, career and lack of a boyfriend.”
“The 28-year-old’s 70-pound weight gain affected her career, as she began to bail on singing gigs because she was too ashamed to perform onstage at 207 pounds.”
“Contestant Ranella Ferrer, a 5-foot-4 vocalist, turned to food to deal with a breakup and a mother who wasn’t supportive of her music ambitions.”
“Along the way, participants receive encouragement and tough love from Khloé, who has struggled with her weight since being dubbed the “fat sister” of the famous Kardashian clan.”
“Boldface trainers include Gunnar Peterson, Harley Pasternak, Simone De La Rue and others.”
“In the eight-episode series, which premieres Thursday at 8 p.m., LA-based participants spend three months working out with a personal trainer to lose weight, motivated by a desire to prove themselves to someone in their life, such as an ex or a parent.”


"At first, of course, it was very rewarding."
"He's dating one of Kyle's ex boyfriends now, and it's a particularly vengeful turn."
"I wanted to make her proud because I felt like I was the one left out of these five children," she said
"I want to get back at my mother."
"Her mother has become more critical of her weight, her career and her lack of boyfriends."
"At the age of 28, she gained 70 pounds, which affected her career. Because she was ashamed to perform 207 pounds on stage, she began to give up concerts."
Contestant ranella Ferrer, a 5-foot-4-inch singer, turned to food to cope with her breakup and a mother who didn't support her musical ambitions
"Along the way, the participants got encouragement and strong love from Heroe. Since she was known as the" fat sister "of the famous Kardashian family, she has been trying to lose weight."
"Coaches in bold include gunner Peterson, Harley Pasternak, Simone delaru, etc."
"In the eight episode series that premiered at 8 p.m. on Thursday night, participants in Los Angeles spent three months working out with their personal trainer to lose weight, motivated by the desire to prove themselves to someone in their life, such as their ex boyfriends or parents."



Number  939
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Coco Rocha Has The Creepiest Pregnancy Announcement EverRelated Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Bella Hadid Suffers Wardrobe Malfunction on the Runway in Paris Haute Couture Fashion Week: PicsAre You One of 23K People Following Coco Rocha's Newborn Daughter on Instagram?”
“The 29-year-old Canadian model and her daughter, Ioni, closed out the Jean Paul Gaultier Spring 2018 show on Wednesday, stealing hearts as they strutted down the runway together.”
“Coco and Ioni matched in very Alice in Wonderland-meets-Cindy Lou Lou ensembles.”
“The mother-daughter duo rocked sparkly, asymmetrical baby blue dresses with white piping and black hearts, which were paired with black gloves, white stockings and shoes and sky-high curly-cue black wigs.”
“Getty ImagesPascal Le Segretain/Getty ImagesThe proud mom posted a short clip to Instagram from the show, which showed her doing a quick twirl on the catwalk to reveal her daughter behind the train of her sparkly pastel frock.”
“Ioni adorably mimicked mom, doing her best to strike a pose and strut along as mom beamed proudly.”
“The crowd can be heard breaking out into murmurs of "ooh" and clapped enthusiastically as the pair glided down the runway.”
“"Carrying my son in my belly with my daughter @ioniconran by my side, I will never forget this day!"”
“...she wrote on Instagram.”


"Coco Rocha's most creepy pregnancy announcement ever..."
"Embedded code restart" content: Bella Hadid encounters a wardrobe failure on the catwalk of Paris haute couture week: picture are you one of the 23K people following coco Rocha's new daughter on instagram? "
"The 29 year old Canadian model and her daughter, ionie, swaggered off the catwalk on Wednesday to win the hearts of the audience as they finished the Jean Paul Gaultier 2018 spring show."
"Coco and ioni are a perfect match for Alice in Wonderland and Cindy Lou."
"The mother daughter Duo is rocking a shiny asymmetrical royal blue dress with white piping, black heart shape, black gloves, white stockings and shoes, and a sky high price curly black wig."
"Getty imagespascal Le segrain / Getty Images this proud mom posted a short video on instagram showing her spinning on the catwalk to show her daughter behind the glittering array of pastel dresses."
"Ionie lovingly imitates her mother, trying to put on a pose and walk with her head high. Her mother smiles with pride."
"As they slide down the runway, you can hear the crowd murmuring" Oh "and clapping warmly."
"Holding my son in my stomach and my daughter @ ioniconran by my side, I will never forget this day!"
“…… She wrote on instagram



Number  940
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From the Hood to Hollywood.”Haddish is set to host SNL with musical guest Taylor Swift on November 11th.”
“She most recently starred in the hit comedy "Girls Trip," alongside Jada Pinkett Smith, Queen Latifah and Regina Hall, and can also be seen on her new Showtime comedy special, “Tiffany Haddish: SHE READY!”
“As for Haddish, when she’s not helping make the world a cleaner place, she's been keeping busy acting and bringing her comedy show to venues around the world.”
“-Talking on the phone in the bathroom can spread germs from your respiratory system onto the screen, those particles can live on the surface of your devices for up to 24 hours.”
“-111 million workdays will be lost, costing nearly $7 billion in lost productivity between October and May.”
“When it comes time to wash your hands after going to the bathroom, here are some facts to consider:-80% of common infections are spread by hands, according to the CDC.”
“As one man DOES decide to lather up, Haddish responds, “Oh yes, he went for the soap, thank you God, a clean man is a good man!”
““She just rinsed — she didn’t put no soap —that’s how you get sick!” Haddish says as she watches a woman skip out on the soap.”
“It’s all part of Method’s newest PSA about washing your hands.”
“Actress and comedian Tiffany Haddish, recently took a peek into what really happens when unsuspecting bathroom goers try to ditch the soap and water, and let's just say it's not pretty.”


"From hood to Hollywood." Hadish will co host SNL with music guest Taylor Swift on November 11
She recently starred in the hit comedy girl's journey, alongside Jada pinkert Smith, Queen Latifa and Regina hall, or in her new comedy feature Tiffany hadish: she's ready
"As for hadish, when she didn't help make the world cleaner, she was busy acting, bringing her comedy shows to places around the world."
"- making a phone call in the bathroom will spread bacteria from the respiratory system to the screen, and these particles will survive on the surface of your device for 24 hours."
"It will lose 111 million working days and nearly $7 billion in productivity between October and may."
"When it comes time to wash your hands after going to the bathroom, here are some facts to consider: - 80% of CDCs say that most common infections are transmitted by hand."
When a man decided to use a soap bubble, hadish replied, "Oh yes, he went to get the soap. Thank God, a clean man is a good man!"
"She just rinsed - she didn't put any soap in - that's why you're sick! "Hadish said as he watched a woman jump over the soap."
"It's all part of method's latest PSA on hand washing."
"Actress and comedian Tiffany haddish recently observed what happens when unsuspecting toilet goers try to throw away soap and water, which we can only say is not beautiful."



Number  941
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...are best friends and talk to each other all the time For the latest beauty and style trends subscribe to our new podcast Get Tressed With Us below...”
“It didn t mean that any love was lost or that they lost any feelings for one another but they both have realized that they love each other and want to be with one another When asked if he and Bella 32 had been speaking Cena told TMZ that they...”
““Calling off the wedding was the right decision at the moment and their relationship only grew from it.”
““Nikki called off the wedding so she could have more time to make a decision with what she wanted in life,” an insider close told Us at the time.”
“The pair are now back together, Us Weekly exclusively revealed on Thursday, May 31.”
“In May, Cena declared on the Today show that he had a change of heart and wanted to “be the father of her children” – a revelation that Bella said she was “speechless” by.”
“...that Cena 41 had split from Nikki Bella after six years together partially due to the fact that he didn t want to have children...”
“I would love it only because I dedicated my life to my work and now I m realizing that there is life and life exists and it s beautiful and I think part of that is being a parent so we ll see Us Weekly broke the news in April...”
“At age 18, we say things different at age 25, at 35.”
“But I’m a little bit older now, a bit wiser.”


“… Is the best friend, at any time to exchange the latest beauty and fashion trends, subscribe to our new podcast, share with us below... "
"It doesn't mean that they have lost any love, nor that they have lost any feelings for each other. But when they were asked if he and Bella 32 had spoken, they all realized that they love each other and want to be with each other. Senna told TMZ that they
"Canceling the wedding is the right decision at the moment, and their relationship just grew out of it."
"Nicky canceled the wedding so she had more time to decide what kind of life she wanted," a person familiar with the matter told us at the time
"The two are now reunited," US weekly said on Thursday, May 31
In May this year, seiner announced on the "Today Show" that he had changed his mind and wanted to "be the father of his children" - Bella said the news left her "speechless"
“…… Senna 41 broke up with Niki Bella after six years together, partly because he didn't want to have children... "
"The reason why I like it is because I have devoted my whole life to my work. Now I realize that life exists and life is beautiful. I think part of it is to be a parent, so we will see our news every week in April..."
"At 18, we say different things at 25 and 35."
"But I'm a little older and a little smarter now."



Number  942
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I Suck at Dating.”
“Unglert, meanwhile, launched a podcast last September titled Help!”
“Murphy underwent an additional surgery in July to get breast implants.”
“She shared a photo in April of her chest post-surgery before getting implants and admitted that her recovery wasn’t easy as her mom, who is a breast cancer survivor, had to wash and dress her.”
“Murphy revealed in March 2017 that she was undergoing a double mastectomy after finding out she was at high risk for breast and ovarian cancer after testing positive for the BRCA2 gene.”
“A source previously told Us that Unglert — who sparked controversy on the most recent season of Bachelor in Paradise with his love triangle between Kristina Schulman and Danielle Lombard — found redemption at the Winter Games and embarked on a new romance on the upcoming series, which premieres next month.”
“...travel blogger on his Instagram Story and the pair have been liking each other s Instagram posts since December...”
“They were holding hands walking through the party and looked very much like a couple an eyewitness tells Us Weekly adding that they pair stood by themselves and were talking only to each other Unglert who appeared on Rachel Lindsay s season of The Bachelor has shared images of the...”
“The new couple, who met while filming The Bachelor Winter Games, were spotted together at a Chase Sapphire on Main party at the Sundance Film Festival in Park City, Utah, on Friday, January 19.”
“The Bachelorette‘s Dean Unglert and Lesley Murphy, who appeared on Sean Lowe‘s season of The Bachelor, are dating, Us Weekly can confirm.”


"My date sucks."
At the same time, unglert released a program called "help!" last September
"For breast augmentation, Murphy had another operation in July."
"In April, she shared a picture of her chest before breast augmentation surgery and admitted that her recovery was not easy because her mother, a breast cancer survivor, had to wash her clothes."
"In March 2017, Murphy revealed that after her BRCA2 gene test was positive, she found that she had a high risk of breast and ovarian cancer and was undergoing double mastectomy."
"A source told us earlier that angert found redemption at the Winter Olympics and started a new relationship in the series of singles in heaven, which premiered next month, after a controversial love triangle between Kristina Schulman and Danielle Lombard in the latest season of singles in heaven
“… Travel blogger's story on his instagram and the two have always liked each other's instagram Posts since last December... "
"They walked through the party hand in hand and looked very much like a couple," one witness told us, adding that they were standing alone and talking to each other. Unglert, who appeared in Rachel Lindsay's "Bachelor" season, shared
On Friday, January 19, at the Sundance Film Festival in Park City, Utah, the couple met while filming the bachelor Winter Olympics and were found together at a major party chasing sapphire
American weekly confirmed that Dean unglert and Lesley Murphy, who appeared in Sean Lowe's singles season, are dating



Number  943
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Now, Will and Kate Middleton have announced what the baby boy’s name is.”
“The royal baby name is Louis Arthur Charles, Kensington Palace announced on Twitter Friday.”
“His royal title will be His Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge.”
“While the royal baby name odds on Louis were 33/1 could make it appear to be a surprising choice, the names Louis, Arthur and Charles have significance within the royal family.”
“Louis was the name of Prince Phillip’s grandfather, Prince Louis Alexander of Battenberg, as well as Prince Charles’ great-uncle Earl Louis Mountbatten, who was assassinated by the IRA in 1979.”
“Louis is also a middle name for both Prince William and Prince George.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and their newborn son.”
“Kirsty O'Connor - PA Images—PA Images via Getty ImagesAs for Prince Louis’ middle names, Arthur was a middle name of Queen Elizabeth’s late father King George VI and is a middle name to both William and Prince Charles.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Now, will and Kate Middleton have announced the baby boy's name."
Kensington Palace announced on twitter on Friday that the Royal baby's name is Louis Arthur Charles
"His royal title will be his Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge."
"Although the chance of Louis' Royal baby name is 33 / 1, it seems to be a surprising choice. The names of Louis, Arthur and Charles are of great significance in the royal family."
"Louis is the name of Prince Philip's grandfather, Prince Louis Alexander of Battenberg, and Prince Charles's uncle count Louis montbarton, who was assassinated by the IRA in 1979."
"Louis is also the middle name between Prince William and Prince George."
"The Duchess of Cambridge and their new born son."
"Costy O'Connor PA images PA images" is the middle name of Prince Louis. Arthur is the middle name of Queen Elizabeth's late father King George VI, and is also the middle name of Prince William and Prince Charles



Number  944
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Last night, the rapper-turned-designer debuted a new campaign for his Yeezy 500 Supermoon sneaker campaign on Twitter, and it turned heads to say the least.”
“The shots feature a diverse roster of models wearing West’s new footwear, along with other Yeezy pieces like sports bras, leggings, and sweatshirts.”
“But a few models really wore nothing but the shoe.”
“One of them included adult-film actress Lela Star (who has an uncanny resemblance to West's wife, Kim Kardashian).”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“The campaign was photographed by Eli Linnetz (who shot the 2017 Kardashian Christmas card).”
“He shared another revealing angle from the shoot.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Last night, the rapper turned designer launched a new campaign on twitter for the first time, which was surprising, to say the least."
The photo shows a group of models wearing new West shoes, as well as fashionable styles such as sports bras, tights and sweatshirts
"But a few models really only wear shoes."
Among them is adult film actress Lyra Starr (who shares an incredible resemblance to West's wife, Kim Kardashian)
This content was imported from {embedded name}
"The event was filmed by Eli linnetz (who filmed Kardashian's Christmas card in 2017)."
"He shared another angle."



Number  945
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the promo here or above.”
“The 90th Oscars will be held on March 4 at the Dolby Theatre in Hollywood.”
“As previously announced, Kimmel will return to host, and Michael De Luca and Jennifer Todd will be back to produce.”
“The 90-minute Oscars pre-show, featuring interviews on the red carpet with nominees, presenters, and performers, will begin at 6:30 p.m. ET/3:30 p.m. PT.”
“...p m PT a half hour earlier than prior telecasts...”
“The trailer also features a montage of 2017 s standout films including Wonder Woman Beauty and the Beast Girls Trip It Baby Driver Get Out Lady Bird and The Post ABC and the Academy announced on Monday that the 90th annual event will begin at 8 p m ET 5”
“Host Jimmy Kimmel jokes, “Warren, what did you do?” after footage rolls of “La La Land” producer Jordan Horowitz revealing “Moonlight” had actually won the top prize.”
“A new promo for the 2018 Academy Awards features the chilling moment from last year’s broadcast when Warren Beatty and Faye Dunaway mistakenly announced “La La Land” as the best picture winner.”
“While the rest of the world is still reeling from envelopegate, the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences is ready to make light of the 2017 Oscars flub.”


"Watch the promo here or on it."
"The 90th Academy Awards will be held on March 4 at the Dolby theatre in Hollywood."
"As announced earlier, Kimmel will return to the organizers and Michael deluka and Jennifer Todd will return to production."
The 90 minute preview of the Oscars will start at 6:30 p.m. EST / 3:30 p.m. Pacific time, interviewing nominees, hosts and performers on the red carpet
“… Half an hour earlier than the previous TV show... "
"The trailer also includes montage of 2017's outstanding films, including" the beauty of Wonder Woman "and" the journey of the beast girl ", baby driver" the bird lady going out "and" post ABC "and the American Film Academy announced on Monday that the 90th Annual Film Festival will start at 8 p.m. EDT on the 5th."
The host, Jimmy Kimmel, joked, "Warren, what did you do? "After Earth producer Jordan Horowitz revealed the rolling of moonlight, the film actually won the highest prize."
"In the new promotional film for the 2018 Academy Awards, there was a chilling moment when Warren Beatty and Faye Dunaway mistakenly declared la la land the best picture winner last year."
"While the rest of the world is still reeling for envelope gate, the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences is ready to belittle the failure of the 2017 Oscars."



Number  946
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“= Main role = Recurring role...”
“[8] Scandal and How to Get Away with Murder, premiered in 2012 and 2014, respectively, with Scandal airing its final episode on April 19, 2018 and How to Get Away with Murder airing its final episode on May 14, 2020.”
“[1] She founded it to be one of the production companies of her first series Grey's Anatomy in 2005.”
“It has since gone on to produce Rhimes s other creations Grey s spinoff Private Practice and the widely popular political drama Scandal and her other productions the short lived Off the Map the Viola Davis starring legal thriller How to Get Away with Murder and the crime thriller The...”
“Catch all of which are co produced with ABC Studios and air on ABC”
“As of 2017, it has a partnership affiliation with Netflix, and before that Disney-ABC.”
“History [ edit ]Programming block [ edit ]In 2014, the ABC network programmed its entire Thursday primetime lineup with television series produced by Shondaland, then branded the Shondaland-filled programming block as "Thank God It's Thursday," also referred to in its shortened form, TGIT.”
“[2] This echoes ABC's former TGIF branding of its Friday night family sitcoms[3] and NBC's Must See TV promotion of formidable Thursday night television hits in the 1990s.”
“Thursday is an especially important night for American television networks because it is the last chance for advertisers of weekend purchases, like movies and cars, to reach a large TV audience, and networks schedule highly rated programming for the night to attract those advertising dollars.”
“[4] The Associated Press called Rhimes' reign of an entire night of network television "unmatched in TV history.”


"= main role = regular role..."
"[8] scandal and how to escape murder premiered in 2012 and 2014 respectively, and scandal aired its last episode on April 19, 2018, and how to escape murder aired its last episode on May 14, 2020."
"[1] she started the company in 2005 and became one of the production companies for her first series of anatomy of grey."
"Since then, it has continued to produce Rhimes' other creative gray spin offs of private practice and popular political drama scandals and her other short-lived works outside the map of Viola Davis' starring legal thriller how to get rid of the murder and crime thrillers..."
"All of these are co produced with ABC studio and ABC broadcasting"
"As of 2017, it had a partnership with Netflix and, prior to that, with Disney ABC."
"History [Edit] program block [Edit] in 2014, ABC television network compiled its entire Thursday prime time series into a TV series produced by Sandra LAN, and then titled the program block full of Sandra LAN with the name" thank God, today is Thursday ", or TGIT for short."
"[2] it's the same as ABC's former TGIF brand on Friday night's family sitcom [3] and NBC's must see promotion on Thursday night's hit TV series in the 1990s."
"Thursday is a particularly important night for the U.S. television network because it's the last chance for advertisers who buy products such as movies and cars on weekends to reach a large number of TV viewers. The network will arrange high ratings programs to attract these advertising revenue."
"[4] according to the associated press, Rhimes' ruling of the whole Internet TV night is" unparalleled in the history of TV "



Number  947
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“She was completely MIA from the Kardashian-Jenner Christmas card:This content is imported from Instagram.”
“She continued her sweats and t-shirt trend:This content is imported from Instagram.”
“At this point, she would not have been too far along in her pregnancy, so a bump would not have been too hard to hide.”
“During a spa day with her girlfriends, Kylie posed at the edge of a photo where a mirror frame conveniently curved right by her stomach.”
“And she quickly mastered the art of optical illusions:This content is imported from Instagram.”
“The wardrobe selection was an interesting choice because, even considering the Kardashian-Jenner fam's forays into athleisure of late, Kylie usually wears tighter, glam clothing at public appearances.”
“She wore a giant t-shirt to the iHeart Radio Music Festival:Getty ImagesOne day after news broke that Kylie was reportedly pregnant, she was photographed at the iHeart Radio Music Festival wearing an oversized black t-shirt.”


You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"She's all Kardashian Jenner's Christmas card: it's imported from instagram."
She continues to wear the T-shirt and T-shirt trend: this content was imported from instagram. "
"At this point, she won't go too far when she's pregnant, so a lump won't be too hard to cover."
"On the hot spring day with her girlfriend, Kelly posed at the edge of a picture, with a frame bent just beside her stomach."
She quickly mastered the artistic illusion of Optics: this content was imported from instagram. "
"The wardrobe choice is an interesting choice, because even considering the recent move of the Kardashian Jenner family into leisure sports, Kelly usually wears tighter, brighter clothes in public."
"She wore a big T-shirt to the iHeart radio Festival: according to Getty pictures, the day after the news of Kelly's pregnancy came out, she was photographed wearing a big black T-shirt at the iHeart radio Festival



Number  948
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  949
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan Still Have the Matching Tattoos They Got on Their HoneymoonInside Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan's Split: It's Been 'Brewing For a While' (Exclusive)Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan Tatum Split: A Timeline of Their RomanceRelated Gallery...”
“"They have tried working on things and had therapy, but nothing changed," the source added.”
“The 37-year-old dancer was snapped leaving SoulCycle in West Hollywood, California, on Tuesday, sporting simple black leggings, a jacket and Nike sneakers.”
“Jenna pulled her brunette locks into a ponytail and sported a pair of sunglasses as she headed out after presumably taking a spin class.”
“Although Jenna was still sporting her wedding ring while out and about in L.A. on Monday when she was photographed just hours before announcing her breakup, it is unclear if she wore the ring on Tuesday.”
“Xxplosive/Splash NewsMultiple sources told ET on Tuesday that Jenna and Channing's split after eight years of marriage has actually been a long time coming.”
“"They have been fighting the last couple of years -- quite a bit," one source said.”
“"There is a sense of relief on both of their parts."”
“However, the Step Up stars made it clear in a joint statement on Instagram that they were still on good terms, and will continue to co-parent their 4-year-old daughter, Everly.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Changning Tatum and Jenna Dewan still keep the matching tattoo they got during their honeymoon separation: this has been "brewing for a while" (exclusive) Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan Tatum: their romantic Gallery schedule... "
"They tried treatment, but nothing changed," the source added
The 37 year old dancer was photographed leaving soulcycle on Tuesday in West Hollywood, California, wearing simple black tights, a jacket and Nike sneakers
"Jenna probably had a rotation class, and when she went out, she wore dark hair in a ponytail and a pair of sunglasses."
"Although Jenna was still showing off her wedding ring when she was out in Los Angeles on Monday, she was photographed just hours before the announcement of the breakup, and it's not clear whether she was wearing the ring on Tuesday."
"It's been a long time since Jenna and Channing broke up after eight years of marriage," several sources told et on Tuesday
"In the past few years, they have been fighting - quite fiercely," a source said
"Both of them have a sense of relief."
"However, the stars made it clear in instagram's joint statement that their relationship is still good and that they will continue to raise their 4-year-old daughter Everly together."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  950
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’ve never ever felt better than I do now.””
“I have no plans to retire.”
“The legendary TV host told Us Weekly Wednesday he received the shocking news during a routine visit with his doctor.”
““I go for my checkup and they say, ‘Let’s do a chest X-ray,’ and the doctor said to me, ‘Something looks funny,’” he explained.”
““They said the spot looked pretty small...”
“I then did a CAT scan then a PET scan and then he said to me You have lung cancer but it looks very small in the beginning stages King 83 immediately underwent surgery at Cedars Sinai Medical Center in...”
“Los Angeles on July 17”
““The doctor said to me, ‘It was malignant, but you were in the first stage.”
“If it had stayed and we didn t find it you would have had trouble in two or three years but we got it and you were lucky King told the celebrity news magazine it took two weeks to recover...”
“...after surgery and he then immediately went back to work...”


"I've never felt better."
"I have no plans to retire."
"The legendary TV host told us on Wednesday that he received this shocking news during his regular interview with doctors."
"I went for a test and they said," let's have a chest X-ray, "and the doctor said to me," it's a little strange, "he explained
"They say this place looks small..."
"Then I had a CAT scan, then a PET scan, and he said to me that you had lung cancer, but it looked small at the beginning, and King 83 immediately underwent surgery at Sida Sinai Medical Center..."
"July 17, Los Angeles"
"The doctor said to me, it's malignant, but you're in the first stage."
"If it's always there and we don't find it, you'll be in trouble in two or three years, but we got it, and you're lucky, King told celebrity news magazine that it took two weeks to recover..."
“…… After the operation, he went back to work immediately... "



Number  951
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Later on, the guests - who were treated to canapes and a free-flowing bar - played a game of 'Chrissy Bingo'.”
“The birthday girl, who playfully gets told off by John for smoking while pregnant, looked the part in a coral coloured skirt, matching jacket and a chic black hat.”
“(Image: Instagram/kimkardashian) (Image: Instagram/kimkardashian)Shay shared her own hilarious videos of Chrissy puffing on a fake cigarette as she struggled to put a life jacket on.”
“Other guests at the bash, put on by Air Hollywood's Pan Am Experience, included Pretty Little Liars actress Shay Mitchell, 30, who looked ultra glamorous in a monochrome skirt suit and sexy black rimmed specs.”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play now(Image: Instagram/kimkardashian)A beaming Kim, 37, posed for snaps with Kanye who looked a little less enthused to be there.”
“The reality star obviously pulled out all the stops in an elegant pale pink button up dress and a 70s style over the top back combed hair 'do.”
“(Image: Instagram/kimkardashian) (Image: Instagram/kimkardashian) (Image: Instagram/kimkardashian)From there they were taken into a lounge filled with balloons and other birthday treats, before getting on a plane.”
“As guests arrived at 'Chrissy Teigen's Pan Am birthday party' at 'LAX', they had to check-in at a desk where they were handed over their boarding passes by actors dressed in 70s-era uniforms.”
“An excited Kim Kardashian, who was first to share a string of videos and snaps from inside the fun bash, was joined by Kanye West who decided to resurface after keeping a low-profile for weeks.”
“The pregnant mum-of-one, along with hubby John Legend, hosted an epic Pan Am-themed birthday party in Los Angeles that was attended by all her star pals.”


"Later, the guests were entertained in snacks and free flowing bars and played a game of" Chris bingo. "
The birthday girl was jokingly scolded by John for smoking when she was pregnant. She wore a coral skirt, a matching jacket and a fashionable black hat
(picture: instagram / KimKardashian) (picture: instagram / KimKardashian) Shea shares her own funny video of Chris smoking a fake cigarette as she tries to put on her life jacket
"Other guests at the Hollywood air Hollywood party included Shay Mitchell, a 30-year-old" little liar "actress who looked glamorous in a monochrome dress suit and sexy black framed glasses."
"Video loading video is not available Click to play Click to play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel play (picture: instagram / kimkardishian) Kim, 37, poses happily for a photo with Kanye, who doesn't seem so keen to be there."
"The reality TV star is wearing an elegant pink button dress with a 70's style back combed" do "on his hair. Obviously, he is doing everything he can."
"(picture: instagram / KimKardashian) (picture: instagram / KimKardashian) (picture: instagram / KimKardashian) before boarding the plane, they were taken to a lounge filled with balloons and other birthday gifts."
"When guests come to Chris tegan's Pan American birthday party at Los Angeles International Airport, they have to check in at a table where actors in '70s uniforms hand them boarding passes."
"The excited Kim Kardashian was the first to share videos and snapshots from a series of entertainment feasts, and Kanye West joined in. After a few weeks of low profile, he decided to reappear."
"The mother of a pregnant child, together with her husband John Legend, held an epic Pan American theme birthday party in Los Angeles, attended by all her star friends."



Number  952
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I look forward to actively participating in that conversation.”
“After 14 seasons, that’s how I learned of this inquiry, from the streets.”
“Variety knew before I did.”
“I have the utmost respect for women and celebrate the courage of those who have come forth to tell their truth.”
“To be clear, I have never groped, coerced, or exposed myself inappropriately to any workplace colleague in my entire broadcast career, covering 6 networks over 30 years.”
“Never.”
“Ever.”
“PBS launched a so-called investigation of me without ever informing me.”
“I learned of the investigation when former staffers started contacting me to share the uncomfortable experience of receiving a phone call from a stranger asking whether, I had ever done anything to make them uncomfortable, and if they could provide other names of persons to call.”


"I look forward to actively participating in this dialogue."
"That's how I learned about the survey from the streets 14 seasons later
"I knew that a long time ago."
"I have great respect for women and praise the courage of those who stand up and tell the truth."
"To be clear, in my entire broadcasting career, I have never groped, coerced or improperly exposed myself to any workplace colleagues. In the past 30 years, I have covered six networks."
"Never."
"Never."
"PBS launched a so-called investigation into me without informing me."
"When I learned about this survey, former employees began to contact me and share an uncomfortable experience with me, that is, they received a call from a stranger asking if I had done anything that made them uncomfortable, and if they could provide other people's names to make a call."



Number  953
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shop the Shoes Pippa Middleton Has Been Wearing on Her HoneymoonPippa Middleton’s Chic Australian Honeymoon Sandals Are Now on SalePippa Middleton Brought Only a Few Pairs of Shoes on Her Honeymoon — But These Are Her Favorite...”
“Want more?”
“Pippa Middleton and James Matthews at Jons Bartholdson and Anna Ridderstad wedding in Stockholm, Sweden on June 10. CREDIT: REX ShutterstockWatch on FNStay tuned for more Pippa Middleton news.”
“According to the Swedish press, about 190 guests were in attendance to help the couple celebrate their big day.”
“Pippa Middleton and James Matthews at Jons Bartholdson and Anna Ridderstad wedding in Stockholm, Sweden on June 10. CREDIT: REX ShutterstockThe lavish “white-tie” society wedding took place at Stockholm’s Oscar Church, and from there, guests took a steamboat to Villa Pauli, a grand villa, for the reception.”
“Next to her, Matthews looked dapper in a black tux and black patent shoes, complete with a white bow tie.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge’s younger sister, 33, donned a beautiful black, white and floral silk ‘Kenzie’ gown from Erdem for the wedding of her friend, entrepreneur Jöns Bartholdson, who married Anna Ridderstad.”
“Holding hands and smiling, the couple, who have been honeymooning in Australia, were dressed to the nines for the occasion.”
“Newlyweds Pippa Middleton and James Matthews made their first public appearance since their nuptials in May to attend a friend’s wedding in Stockholm, Sweden, on June 10.”
“Pippa Middleton and James Matthews at Jons Bartholdson and Anna Ridderstad wedding in Stockholm, Sweden on June 10.”


"Buy Pippa Middleton's shoes for her honeymoon Pippa Middleton's fashionable Australian honeymoon sandals are now on sale. Pippa Middleton only brought a few pairs of shoes for her honeymoon - but these are her favorite..."
"Want more?"
Pippa Middleton and James Matthews marry Jones bartolson and Anna ridstad in Stockholm, Sweden, on June 10. Credit: Rex shutterstock watch continues to focus on fnpa's more Pipa Middleton news
"According to Swedish media reports, about 190 guests were present to help the couple celebrate their big day."
Pippa Middleton and James Matthews marry Jones bartolson and Anna ridstad in Stockholm, Sweden, on June 10. Credit: Rex said: "the lavish wedding of the" white collar band "society is held at Oscar Church in Stockholm, where guests take a steamboat to the villa poly for a reception."
"Next to her, Matthews looks smart in a black evening dress, black lacquered shoes and a white bow tie."
The Duchess of Cambridge's sister, 33, wore a beautiful black-and-white silk "Kenzie" dress from Erdem for the wedding of her friend, entrepreneur J ó ns bartholdson and Anna ridderstad
"The couple, who have been honeymooning in Australia, hand in hand, smile and dress up."
"The newlyweds Pippa Middleton and James Matthews made their first public appearances after their marriage in May to attend a friend's wedding in Stockholm, Sweden, on June 10."
Pippa Middleton and James Matthews marry Jones bartolson and Anna ridstad in Stockholm, Sweden, on June 10



Number  954
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“On Instagram, Kardashian West wrote, "These @fendi memories ✨ I will always cherish shooting this campaign with my mom @krisjenner & daughter."”
“It's all set to husband Kanye West's "Love Lockdown."”
“North, dressed in a ruffled shirt, skirt and oversized blazer, can be seen trailing her mom (sporting thigh-high Fendi logo boots, as one does on hikes) through tall grass, picking wildflowers and sitting in an open field with Granny Kris before retreating to the pool.”
“The three generations of Kardashian women also starred in a heavily desaturated video that makes the cinematography of "The Handmaid's Tale" look downright vibrant.”
“"Starting with @kimkardashian, her mother @krisjenner and daughter North West, who for the first time share a different side of their personalities through a series of candid and spontaneous shots," read an Instagram post from the Italian label.”
“The three appeared in a video and stills designed to elicit the family bond of three generations of women.”
“North, who turned 5 on June 15, appeared with her mother and grandmother, Kris Jenner, in the second series of an international fashion campaign to celebrate Fendi's 10th anniversary of their Peekaboo bag.”
“She was even honored as an influencer by the Council of Fashion Designers of America this year.”
“Though better known for her controversial reality television series, Kardashian West is deeply entrenched in the world of fashion.”
“Matthew WilsonUSA TODAYIt was only a matter of time before Kim Kardashian West's oldest daughter North West followed in her mother's footsteps by appearing in an advertising campaign for a fashion house.”


"These memories of @ Fendi," Kardashian West wrote on instagram ✨  I will always cherish filming this campaign with my mother
"Everything is ready for Kanye West's" love blockade. "
"North is wearing a pleated shirt, skirt and oversized coat, dragging her mother (like on a hike, wearing Fendi sports boots) through the tall grass, picking wild flowers, sitting in a clearing with grandma Kris, and then retreating to the swimming pool."
"Three generations of Kardashian women also starred in an extremely unsaturated film, which makes the photography of the maid's story look full of vitality."
"Starting with @ KimKardashian, her mother @ krisjenner and daughter North West shared the other side of their character for the first time through a series of frank and spontaneous scenes," the instagram post of the Italian brand wrote
"These three people appear in a video and stills to bring out the family ties of three generations of women."
North, who turned five on June 15, joined her mother and grandmother, Kris Jenner, in a second round of international fashion events to celebrate the 10th anniversary of Fundy's hide and seek bag
"This year, she was even named an influencer by the Council of fashion designers of America."
Although Kardashian West is famous for her controversial reality TV series, her position in the fashion world is deeply rooted
"Matthew Wilson, it's only a matter of time before Kim Kardashian West's eldest daughter, North West, follows in her mother's footsteps and appears in the advertising campaign of a fashion shop today."



Number  955
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We would love to hear from you.”
“...s lady bits...”
“Just like every year the most sought-after celebs made it to the event in their best of looks.”
“Victoria’s Secret star Adriana Lima also was present at the Met Gala in a daring thigh-high slit outfit.”
“Though she looked quite stunning, the model soon became a victim of a wardrobe malfunction and ended up almost exposing her crotch.”
“(ALSO READ Priyanka Chopra and Deepika Padukone’s hot Met Gala 2017 looks are simply gorgeous!”
“VIEW PICS).”
“Also Read - 'Tape Came Off!'”
“Priyanka Chopra Reveals How Her Miss World Moment Could ve Been The Worst Wardrobe Malfunction Ever Also Read Katy Perry Shared What Would Have Been Her Maternity Look For Met Gala 2020 Adriana Lima turned plenty of heads in her gorgeous silk black gown that had a plunging neckline and...”
“...a slit high up her thighs...”


"We'd love to hear from you."
“… Ladies bite... "
"It's like every year the most sought after celebrities take part in activities with their best looks."
"Victoria's Secret" star Adriana Lima also wore bold thigh high slit dress to attend the metropolitan party
"Although she looks quite amazing, the model soon becomes the victim of the wardrobe failure, and finally almost shows her crotch."
"(reading both Priyanka Chopra and Deepika Padukone's hot met Gala 2017 is gorgeous!"
"View pictures."
"And I read -'the tape's gone!"
"Priyanka Chopra revealed that her" Miss World "moment may be the most serious wardrobe failure in history. She also read that Katy Perry shared her expression when she was wearing the maternity dress of met Gala 2020. Adriana Lima wore her gorgeous black silk robe with a drooping collar and turned her head a lot..."
“… A crack in the thigh... "



Number  956
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““You didn’t go to a surgeon, you went to an assassin,” Dubrow said.”
“Jessica said that the only solution was to remove both implants, and that she was stitched vertically, which left her with no breasts.”
“MRSA is a bacterial infection that's resistant to many different antibiotics and can cause a variety of symptoms ranging from skin infections to sepsis and pneumonia, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).”
“Jessica alleges that she then went to her family physician, who was horrified at the sight of her incisions and immediately identified the infection as MRSA.”
“She claims her surgeon told her that the wound would absorb itself and gave her no further instructions.”
“MOM WARNS ON VENOMOUS CATERPILLARS AFTER SON'S HARROWING MEDICAL SCAREJessica said that her nipple turned black and was crusting over, and that she could smell the infection.”
““There are a few absolutes in medicine and surgery, and one of the most significant is when you get a pool of blood in a pocket of the body, you go right to the operating room and you remove it,” Dubrow said in the clip.”
“...experiencing a hematoma which they said requires immediate medical attention...”
“I went back to her doctor and she said Why don t you come back Friday I ve got surgery all day but if you get to the hospital early enough I ll take a look to see what s going on Both Dubrow and Nassif surmised that Jessica was...”
“She did not identify her surgeon, or reveal where the operation took place, but claimed that the day after the operation her left breast had swelled to twice the size of her right breast, and the nipple was turning purple.”


"You're not going to see a surgeon, you're going to see an assassin," dubro said
Jessica says the only solution is to take out the two implants and sew them vertically so that she has no breasts
According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), MRSA is a bacterial infection that is resistant to a variety of antibiotics and can cause symptoms ranging from skin infections to sepsis and pneumonia
"Jessica said she later went to see her family doctor, who was terrified at the sight of her wound and immediately confirmed that the infection was methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus."
"She claimed that her surgeon told her that the wound would absorb itself without giving her further instructions."
"After her son suffered a terrible medical panic, her mother warned the poisonous caterpillar. Jessica said her nipples were black and scabby, and she could smell the infection."
"There are some absolute principles in medicine and surgery, and one of the most important is that when you get a pool of blood in your pocket, you go straight to the operating room and take it out," dubro said in the clip
“… They said the hematoma needed immediate medical attention... "
"I went back to her doctor and she said," why don't you come back on Friday? I've had surgery all day, but if you get to the hospital early, I'll see what happened. Both dubro and nayff conjectured that Jessica was... "
"She did not disclose the identity of the surgeon or the location of the operation, but claimed that the day after the operation, her left breast swelled to twice the size of her right breast and her nipple turned purple."



Number  957
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Advertisement1 of 1 Next...”
“They followed Shark Tank‘s Barbara Corcoran and Keo Motsepe.”
“That’s what I take away.”Debbie and Alan were the second pair to get eliminated from the 25th season of the show.”
“So that’s a really profound life moment.”
“The inspiration of doing this has healed me more than any doctor, any supplement—anything.”
“I started to think that I couldn’t count on my self and that I needed all this outside help to stay healthy.”
“Yeah, for me, I’ve overcome a lot of challenges.”
“Advertisement“What’s that worth, really?”
“Debbie and her dancing partner Alan Bernsten were eliminated from the show, but she said that overall it was wonderful for his struggle with Lyme disease.”
“Debbie Gibson has expressed that her time on Dancing With the Stars was a very healing experience for her.”


"Page 1 of 1, next..."
"They followed Barbara Cochran and KIO mosepe of the shark tank."
"That's what I'm going to say." Debbie and Allen are the second pair to be eliminated from season 25
"So this is a very profound moment in life."
"The inspiration to do this is more than any doctor, any supplement can cure me."
"I started to think I couldn't rely on myself, I needed outside help to stay healthy."
"Yes, for me, I've overcome a lot of challenges."
How much is an advertisement worth
"Debbie and her partner Alan Bernstein were eliminated, but she said it was wonderful for him to fight Lyme disease in general."
"Debbie Gibson said her time dancing with the stars was a very healing experience for her."



Number  958
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The book details Jenelle’s life as a teen mom in the public eye.”
“The new season of Teen Mom 2 premieres July 17 and Jenelle’s book Read Between the Lines comes out July 25.”
“All three children have different fathers.”
“I don’t ever think there’s really coming back at any point in time.”Jenelle currently has primary custody of her other two children, 3-year-old son Kaiser and 6-mos old daughter Ensley.”
““I think our relationship’s lost.”
“...any better in the future...”
“You know we went to court about Jace and I got a visitation schedule set but she s still kind of bent out of shape because I still have resentment towards her for still keeping my son and we still butt heads And she doesn t foresee their relationship getting...”
“News,“We are in the same situation.”
“Evans told E!”
“Babs has had custody of Jace since 2010, but this is the first time the two have a formal visitation schedule set in place.”


"The book details jennell's life as a teenage mother in the eyes of the public."
"The new season of young mom 2 will premiere on July 17, and Janel's book reading between the lines will be published on July 25."
"All three have different fathers."
"I never thought I would come back at any time." Jennell currently has primary custody of her two other children, her three-year-old son, kather, and her six-year-old daughter, ensley
"I think we've lost our relationship."
“… The future will be better... "
"You know, we went to court for Jess, and I made a visit schedule, but she was still a little out of shape, because I still had a grudge against her, because she still had my son, and we were still bumping into each other, and she didn't foresee that their relationship would become..."
"News," we're in the same boat
"Evans, tell me!"
"BABS has had custody of Jess since 2010, but this is the first time the two have a formal visit schedule."



Number  959
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s a time for mourning, really.””
““All the women who have been hurt deserve dignity and respect, so I want to give it the time it deserves.”
“...of Art fully supported Johansson s decision...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I totally agree with that,” Wintour said during a visit to The Late Show with Stephen Colbert.”
““Georgina is a brilliant designer and I don’t think she should be blamed for her husband’s behavior.”
““I think it was a great gesture of support on Scarlett’s part to wear a dress like that, a beautiful dress like that, on such a public occasion,” she added.”
“Looking for more style content?”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Johansson was the first star to give Marchesa a high-profile red carpet moment in months since Weinstein was accused of sexual harassment and assault by dozens of women last fall.”


"It's a time of mourning, really."
"All women who have been hurt deserve dignity and respect, so I want to give them the time they deserve."
“…… The art world fully supports Johnson's decision... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I totally agree with that," Wintour said while watching the evening show with Stephen Colbert
"Georgina is a great designer and I don't think she should be blamed for her husband's behavior."
"It's a good gesture of support for Scarlett to wear such a dress, such a beautiful dress on such a public occasion," she added
"Looking for more style content?"
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"Since Weinstein was accused of sexual harassment and assault by dozens of women last fall, Johnson is the first star in months to put marqueisa on the red carpet."



Number  960
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s the best thing that’s happened to American tennis in the last 10 to 15 years.””
““But, either way, I wish her the absolute best.”
“The seven time Grand Slam winner who is father to Emily McEnroe with ex wife Tatum O Neal Anna McEnroe Ava McEnroe and stepdaughter Ruby Meyers with wife Patty Smyth told Stephen Colbert during The Late Show Tuesday that his...”
“...sexist remarks didn t go over big with his daughters...”
““My girls don’t think I can beat her now,” McEnroe said.”
““I thought I could beat her.” In 2015, the retired athlete famously told Jimmy Kimmel that he believed he could take on Williams in a showdown; he speculated at the time that his daughters thought otherwise.”
“Earlier this week, McEnroe caused a ruckus when he claimed in an interview with NPR that though he holds Williams in high regard, he does not believe that she would crack the top 700 in men’s tennis.”
““That doesn’t mean I don’t think Serena is an incredible player,” he said at the time.”
““I do, but the reality of what would happen would be I think something that perhaps it’d be a little higher, perhaps it’d be a little lower.”
“And on a given day, Serena could beat some players.”


"She's the best thing that's happened to US tennis in the last 10 to 15 years."
"But anyway, I wish her all the best."
"The seven time Grand Slam champion, the father of Emily mckenroe and his ex wives Tatum O'Neill Anna mckenroe, EVA mckenroe, and stepdaughter Ruby Meyers and his wife Patty Smythe, told Stephen Colbert on Tuesday night that his
“… The sexist remarks didn't have much impact on his daughters. "
"My daughters think I can't beat her now," McEnroe said
"I thought I could beat her." In 2015, the retired athlete told Jimmy Kimmel that he believed he could beat Williams in the showdown; he guessed at the time that his daughters didn't think so
Earlier this week, McEnroe caused a stir when he told NPR that although he attached great importance to Williams, he did not believe that Williams would win the men's top 700
"That doesn't mean I don't think Serena is an incredible player," he said at the time
"I know, but the reality is, I think it could be higher, it could be lower."
"One day, Serena can beat some players."



Number  961
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If you can share that, at the end, it makes a huge difference.'”
“We all have to deal with what life throws at us, so you got to have a sense of humor about it.”
“Over the years the couple starred in several comedies together, including Zoolander, Zoolander 2, Dodgeball: A True Underdog Story, Tropic Thunder and Arrested Development.”
“I love her."'”
“'It was like, "Wow, this is a great person.”
“'When I met her, I pretty much thought, "That's the person,"' Ben told ET in a 2007 interview.”
“They married in 2000 at an oceanfront ceremony in Kauai, Hawaii and share two children, daughter Ella Olivia, 15 and son Quinlin Dempsey, 12.”
“Ben, 51 and Christine, 45, first met on the set of Fox TV pilot Heat Vision and Jack in 1999.”
“We kindly ask that the media respect our privacy at this time.'”
“...and the closest of friends...”


"If you can share that, in the end, it will be very different."
"We all have to face the impact of life, so you have to have a sense of humor."
Over the years, the couple have starred in several comedies, including zoo man, zoo Man 2, dodgeball: the story of a real loser, tropical thunder and blocked development
"I love her." “
"It's like," Wow, this is a great man. “
"When I met her, I almost thought, 'that's the man,'" Ben told ET in 2007
"They got married at a seaside wedding in Kauai, Hawaii, in 2000. They have two children, their daughter Ella Olivia, 15, and their son Kunlin Dempsey, 12."
Ben, 51, and Christina, 45, first met in 1999 on the set of fox pilot hot TV and Jack
"We urge the media to respect our privacy at this time."
“… And my closest friends... "



Number  962
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo: DOBN/RMBI/BACKGRIDOne small blessing from this week:Martin’s ex-wife, Gwyneth Paltrow, is preparing to marry her fiancé, the television producer Brad Falchuk at the end of the summer.”
“They were photographed walking a dog in Malibu on Sunday.”
“I try hardest to be the best mother,” she said in her speech, according to People.”
“Then, Victoria gave a speech at the Forbes Women Summit in New York, where she mentioned David specifically and called him an “incredible husband.”“I try really, really hard.”
“This, to me, would be the strongest sign of an impending split, but the Beckhams quickly denied the report.”
“Last week, the Daily Mail reported that David left his longtime manager, who also manages Posh, for a new team led by his friend David Gardner.”
“(It’s F-I-N-E, according to their publicist, who called the rumors “Journalist Chinese whispers and fake news fueled by social media.”) And another is: What’s going on with the Beckhams’ businesses?”
“Another is: What have the Beckhams said about their marriage?”
“One is: Do you care?”
“There are a few factors to consider when weighing the possibility of divorce.”


"Photo: dobn / RMBI / backgridone blessing week from here: Martin's ex-wife Gwyneth Paltrow is planning to marry her fiance, television producer Brad falchuk this summer
"They were photographed walking dogs in Malibu on Sunday."
"I try my best to be the best mother," she said in her speech, according to people
Later, Victoria delivered a speech at the Forbes women's summit in New York, especially referring to David as "an incredible husband" and "I really, really worked hard."
"For me, it would be the strongest sign of a breakup, but the Beckhams quickly denied the report."
Last week, the Daily Mail reported that David left his old club and he also managed bosh for a new team led by his friend David Gardner
"This is f-i-n-e. according to their PR, he called the rumors" the whispers of Chinese journalists and the fake news promoted by social media. " Another question is: what happened to the Beckhams' business
Another question is: what do the Beckhams think of their marriage? "
"One is: do you care?"
"There are several factors to consider when weighing the possibility of divorce."



Number  963
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And I suggested the middle name Love after her mommy."”
“"Julian came up with the name.”
“On Monday, March 26, 2018, the "Blurred Lines" singer took to Instagram to share a sweet snapshot of his son, Julian, meeting his newborn sister, Mia.”
“"Lucky Daddy!"”
“Thicke captioned a precious photo documenting the moment his son officially became a big brother.”
“In the pic, both dad and son lovingly gaze upon the newest addition to their family.”
“Over the weekend, the pop star's girlfriend, April Love Geary, introduced the couple's little girl to the world, sharing the first image showing her face.”
“"My little love," the new mom wrote, captioning a photo of herself cradling her little bundle of joy while sporting a pink hoodie, which read, "Baby girl."”
“As Nicki Swift previously reported, the pair welcomed their first child together on Feb. 22, 2018.”
“A couple days later, Thicke, who shares 7-year-old Julian with ex-wife Paula Patton, announced the happy news on Instagram.”


"I suggest that love be named after her mother."
"Julian came up with the name."
"On Monday, March 26, 2018, the singer of fuzzy lines shared a sweet snapshot of her son Julian's meeting with her newborn sister MIA on instagram."
"Lucky Dad!"
"Hick wrote an inscription for a precious photo, recording the moment when his son officially became a big brother."
"In the photo, father and son are watching their new family members affectionately."
"Last weekend, the pop star's girlfriend, April love gear, introduced the couple's little girl to the world and shared her first face revealing photo."
"My little baby," the new mother wrote, holding a small bag of happiness and wearing a Pink Hoodie with the words "baby girl" on it under the title of one photo
"As Nicky swift previously reported, the two had their first child together on February 22, 2018."
A few days later, hick announced the good news on instagram. Hick shares 7-year-old Julian with his ex-wife Paula button



Number  964
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Listen, I think we’ve all done things under the influence.””
“Can your children read and write?”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““NDAs are real, so I’m not saying s— about nothing,” Haddish, 38, said, while getting her hair done.”
“The Girls Trip star stepped out later on Wednesday night for the launch of LL Cool J’s SiriusXM channel “Rock The Bells Radio” at Los Angeles roller rink World on Wheels — her first appearance since “bite-gate” broke out.”
“Image zoom Tiffany Haddish | Credit: Neilson Barnard/Getty Images for SiriusXMImage zoom Anthony Anderson, Tiffany Haddish and LL COOL J | Credit: Neilson Barnard/Getty Images for SiriusXMBut before revealing her NDA, it appeared Haddish was ready to spill the beans.”
““You wanna know who bit Beyoncé?”
“I’m gonna just tell you all.”
“And it’s the last time I’m talking about it, I ain’t going to say nothing else about it.”
“Let me sip some of my tea,” Haddish said on her Instagram Live, sipping a glass of water.”


"Listen, I think we all work under this influence."
"Can your child read and write?"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The NDA is real, so I didn't say anything," hadish, 38, said as he did his hair
Later on Wednesday, the "girl's journey" star launched LL Cool J's Sirius XM channel "rock the bells radio" at roller skating world in Los Angeles, making her debut since the outbreak of bite the door
"Image zooming Tiffany hardish | credit: Nelson Barnard / Getty Images for siriusxmimage zoom, Anthony Anderson, Tiffany hardish and LL Cool J | credit: Nelson Barnard / Getty Images for siriusxmbut before revealing her confidentiality agreement, it seems that hardish is ready to leak."
"Do you want to know who bit Beyonce?"
"I'm going to tell you all."
"This is the last time I talk about it. I won't say anything else."
"Let me have some tea," hadish said on instagram live over a glass of water



Number  965
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“People request it at every gig regardless of the band on stage for a reason.”
“And if you wanna know what that sounds like, it sounds like fucking Freebird.”
“The squares needed a rock anthem too.”
“Night Ranger was never cool, and neither is this song, really, but not everybody was cool back then.”
“...faux fun of mainstream 80 s America on this one...”
“Night Ranger You Can Still Rock In America This one always gets short shrift since it s on the same album as the undeniably amazing power ballad Sister Christian but good ol Ranger perfectly captured the plastic fantastic mall crawling...”
“Say what you will, but we really nailed it when we created Diamond Dave.”
“And that’s pretty much what he did.”
“All at once.”
“The whole country.”


"No matter what kind of band is on the stage, there are people who ask for it in every concert. There's a reason for that."
"If you want to know what it sounds like, it sounds like a free bird."
"The square also needs rock carols."
"The night ranger was never cool, and this song was not cool, really, but not everyone was cool at that time."
“… This is a fake joke of the mainstream American in the 1980s. "
"Night Ranger you can still rock in America this one always gets short attention because it's on the same album as undeniably amazing power ballad sister Christian, but good ol Ranger perfectly captures the plastic magic mall crawling..."
"You can say what you want, but we did it when we created the diamond."
"That's what he did."
"All at once."
"The whole country."



Number  966
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She referred to Ferguson as her "best friend" and "the greatest love" of her life.”
“A post shared by Elle King (@elleking) on Jan 24, 2018 at 11:24am PSTKing, the daughter of actor Rob Schneider, had announced in a post in December that she and Ferguson were giving their relationship another try after splitting in spring 2017.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoJan. 25 (UPI) -- Elle King is celebrating two years of marriage after reconciling with her estranged husband.”
“The 28-year-old singer enjoyed cupcakes on her second wedding anniversary Wednesday after getting back together with Andrew Ferguson.”
“AdvertisementKing shared a photo of the sweet treats with her 155,000 followers on Instagram.”
“The cupcakes featured pink icing hearts and photos of the star with Ferguson.”
“"2 yrs," she captioned the picture.”
“2 yrs.”
“"This year tore me to [expletive] shreds," the singer wrote.”
“A post shared by Elle King (@elleking) on Dec 30, 2017 at 12:54am PSTKing confirmed her split from Ferguson in May after secretly marrying him in March 2016, three weeks after they met in London.”


She called Ferguson her "best friend" and "the greatest love of her life"
"Elle King (@ elleking) announced in a post of pstking (daughter of actor rob Schneider) at 11:24 a.m. on January 24, 2018 that she and Ferguson will try their relationship again after their breakup in the spring of 2017."
"Information photo by Jim rumen / UPI | license photo. On the 25th, Elle king was celebrating two years of marriage after reconciliation with her separated husband
"The 28 year old singer enjoyed cupcakes on her second wedding anniversary after reuniting with Andrew Ferguson on Wednesday
"Advertising King shared a picture of a dessert with 155000 fans on instagram."
"The cupcake has a pink sugar coated heart-shaped design and a group photo of the star and Ferguson."
"Two years," she added a caption to the picture
"2 years"
"Tear me to pieces this year," the singer wrote
"At 12:54 noon on December 30, 2017, Elle King (@ elleking) posted a post on pstking, confirming that she broke up with Ferguson in May after her secret marriage to Ferguson in March 2016, that is, three weeks after they met in London."



Number  967
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the adorable video in the player above...”
“...released on Monday and already has been viewed over 360 000 times...”
“In this Despacito parody Ernie Bert and Rosita sing along for the chorus in Spanish Oh el patito es mi favorito Donde quiera que vaya hace su sonido El patito es tu buen amigo El patito The YouTube video was...”
“Sesame Street is bringing back the “Rubber Duckie” song with a parody of one of the most popular songs of 2017 – “Despacito.”“El Patito,” which is Spanish for “rubber ducky”, pays homage to Ernie’s most beloved toy duck.”
“Please look at the time stamp on the story to see when it was last updated.”
“This is an archived article and the information in the article may be outdated.”


"Watch cute videos in the player above..."
“… Released on Monday, it has been viewed more than 360000 times... "
"In this desperate imitation, Ernest and lucita sing together in Spanish chorus Oh El Patito es mi favorito Donde quiera que Vaya hace Su sonido El Patito es Tu buen amigo El Patito YouTube video is..."
Sesame Street launched rubber duck in the form of despair, one of the most popular songs of 2017. "El Patito", which means "rubber duck" in Spanish, pays homage to Ernie's favorite toy duck
"Look at the time stamp on the story and see when it was last updated."
"This is an archive article, and the information in the article may be out of date."



Number  968
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m not having another.’ ””
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“The singer and actress announced on Instagram Friday that she and boyfriend Matthew Koma are expecting their first child together, a daughter.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Guess what guys!”
“@matthewkoma and I made a little princess of our own and we couldn’t be more excited!!!!!”
“!” she captioned a photo of herself and Koma sharing a sweet smooch, while the mom-to-be wears a long maxi dress that shows off a hint of a baby bump.”
“Wrote Koma on a share of the same photo, “We made a baby girl!”
“She will be as beautiful and sweet as her mother hilaryduff another incredible chapter begins Hilary whose post caption is likely referring to sister Haylie Duff who welcomed her second daughter Lulu Gray on Tuesday is also mom to son Luca Cruz 6 whom she welcomed in March 2012 with...”
“...ex husband Mike Comrie...”


"I won't drink any more."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
The singer and actress announced on instagram on Friday that she and her boyfriend Matthew KOMA will have their first child, a daughter
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Guess what!"
"@ Matthew KOMA and I made a little princess ourselves, we couldn't be more excited!!"
"!" she wrote in the title of one photo that she and KOMA were kissing sweetly, while the mother to be was wearing a long skirt, revealing a baby bump. "
"We have a baby girl!" KOMA wrote in the same photo
"She will be as beautiful and sweet as her mother Hilary Duff. Another incredible chapter begins. The title of Hilary Duff's post may refer to her sister Haley Duff, who welcomed her second daughter Lulu gray on Tuesday and mother to son Luca Cruz 6, who welcomed her and..."
“… My ex husband, Mike comry... "



Number  969
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow TODAY.com writer Scott Stump on Twitter.”
“Rich Fury / Getty Images"I don’t know if I should even say 'Hi' to her, I mean, I play Jeff!"”
“The polarizing two-time Olympian made a buzzed-about appearance at Tuesday's Los Angeles premiere of "I, Tonya," a new movie about her life in which Margot Robbie portrays Harding.”
“Tonya Harding walked the red carpet at the Los Angeles premiere of "I, Tonya" at the Egyptian Theatre.”
“Jordan Strauss / APRobbie appeared starstruck after chatting and posing for photos with Harding, 47, who was famously implicated in a plot led by ex-husband Jeff Gillooly to injure rival skater Nancy Kerrigan so that she would not be able to compete in the 1994 Winter Olympics.”
“Tonya Harding and star Margot Robbie hit it off at the premiere of the "I, Tonya" movie in which Robbie portrays Harding.”
“Getty ImagesThe movie portrays Harding's rough upbringing under a domineering mother in Oregon and then the attack that made her a notorious sports figure.”
“The figure skater once famous for her '90s-style outfits, complete with a scrunchie, wore a floor-length gown with orange straps as she mingled with stars of the film, including Allison Janney, who plays her mother, and Sebastian Stan, who plays Gillooly.”
“(L-R) Craig Gillespie, Sebastian Stan, Steven Rogers, Allison Janney, Tonya Harding, Paul Walter Hauser, Margot Robbie and Tom Quinn attend the after party for the premiere of "I, Tonya" on December 5, 2017 in Hollywood, California.”
“Stan told People.”


"Follow today writer Scott stump tweeted
"Rich fury / Getty Images" I don't know if I should say hello to her. I mean, I play Jeff
"This polarized two time Olympian made a splash at the Los Angeles Premiere of" me, Tonia "on Tuesday, a new film about her life in which Margot Robbie plays Harding
"Tonia Harding is on the red carpet for the premiere of" I, Tonia "at the Egyptian theater in Los Angeles."
"Jordan Strauss / aprobi is very eye-catching after chatting and taking a picture with Harding, 47, who is known to have been involved in a conspiracy led by his ex husband, Jeff Gillooly, in an attempt to hurt rival skater Nancy Kerrigan and prevent her from participating in the 1994 Winter Olympics."
Tonia Harding and star Margot Robbie hit it off at the premiere of Robbie's movie I, Tonia
"The image of Getty this film depicts Harding's difficult growing up under an overbearing mother in Oregon and the attack that made her a notorious sports figure."
The figure skater, known for her 1990s style clothes, wears a floor length skirt with orange shoulder straps and mingles with movie stars, including Alison Jennie, who plays her mother, and Sebastian Stein, who plays gilloli
(left right) Craig Gillespie, Sebastian Stein, Steven Rogers, Alison Jennie, Tonia Harding, Paul Walter Hauser, Margot Robbie and Tom Quinn attend the evening of the premiere of "I, Tonia" in Hollywood, California on December 5, 2017
"Stan told people."



Number  970
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“*Netflix has ordered six episodes of the series(Pictured: Dwayne Johnson, Robert De Niro, Emilia Clarke and David Letterman)”
“In some cases, the per episode fees reflect additional compensation for their work as producers or for their profit participation stakes.”
“It’s good to be Dwayne Johnson.”
“Some of these figures include fees for producing and back end compensation...”
“000 Mandy Moore This Is Us NBC 85 000 Milo Ventimiglia This Is Us NBC 85 000 Sterling K Brown This Is Us NBC 75 000 Claire Foy The Crown Netflix 40 000 Justin Hartley This Is Us NBC 40 000 Chrissy Metz This Is Us NBC 40 000 Note...”
“000 Elisabeth Moss The Handmaid s Tale Hulu 200 000 Jeffrey Donovan Shut Eye Hulu 175 000 Michael Weatherly Bull CBS 175 000 Bob Odenkirk Better Call Saul AMC 150 000 Caitriona Balfe Outlander Starz 100 000 Jonathan Banks Better Call Saul AMC 100 000 Sam Heughan Outlander Starz 100”
“Emmy Rossum Shameless Showtime 350 000 Billy Bob Thornton Goliath Amazon 350 000 Jason Bateman Ozark Netflix 300 000 Laura Linney Ozark Netflix 300 000 Anthony Hopkins Westworld HBO 300 000 Kiefer Sutherland Designated Survivor ABC 300 000 James Spader The Blacklist NBC 300 000 Kerry Washington Scandal ABC 250”
“Harington Game of Thrones HBO 500 000 Lena Headey Game of Thrones HBO 500 000 Kevin Costner Yellowstone Paramount 500 000 Kevin Spacey House of Cards Netflix 500 000 Claire Danes Homeland Showtime 450 000 Ellen Pompeo Grey s Anatomy ABC 450 000 William H Macy Shameless Showtime 350 000”
“DRAMA ACTOR SHOW NETWORK Per Episode Estimate Robert De Niro Untitled David O Russell project Amazon 775 000 Mark Harmon NCIS CBS 525 000 Emilia Clarke Game of Thrones HBO 500 000 Nikolaj Coster Waldau Game of Thrones HBO 500 000 Peter Dinklage Game of Thrones HBO 500 000 Kit...”
“Here’s a sampling of estimates for the paychecks banked by some of TV’s most notable stars.”


"* Netflix has ordered six episodes of the series (Dwyane Johnson, Robert De Niro, Amelia Clark and David Letterman shown here)"
"In some cases, the cost of each episode reflects the extra compensation for their work as producers or for their participation in profits."
"It's good to be Dwyane Johnson."
"Some of the figures include production costs and back-end compensation..."
"000 mandimore, this is NBC 85000 Milo Ventimiglia, this is NBC 85000 pounds K brown, this is NBC 75000 Claire foy crown Netflix 40000 Justin Hartley, this is NBC 40000 Chris Metz, this is NBC 40000 notes..."
"The story of Elizabeth Moss's maid Hulu 200 000 Geoffrey Donovan closed his eyes Hulu 175 000 Michael Wesley bull CBS 175 000 Bob odenkek best call sol AMC 150 000 katriona BALF outlander stats 100 000 Jonathan banks best call sol AMC 100 000 Sam horn outlander stats 100"
"Amy Rosen's shameless show 350 000 Billy Bob Thornton Goliath Amazon 35 000 Jason Bateman ozak 30 000 Laura Lynne ozak 30 000 Anthony Hopkins west world HBO 30 000 Kiev Sutherland designated survivor ABC 30 000 James Spade blacklist NBC 30 000 Kerry Washington scandal ABC 250"
"Harrington power game HBO 500000 Lena Heidi power game HBO 500000 Kevin Costner Yellowstone paramount 500000 Kevin Spacey card house Netflix 500000 Claire Dan homeland show 450 000 Ellen Pompeo gray anatomy ABC 450 000 William H. Macy shameless show 350 000"
"Actor show network estimates Robert De Niro untitled David Russell project Amazon 775000 mark Hammond NCIS CBS 525000 Emilia Clarke power game HBO 500000 Nicolas costwaldo power game HBO 500000 Peter dinkleger power game HBO 500000 Kit..."
"Here's a sample of income estimates for some of the most famous TV stars."



Number  971
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Courtesy TruliaCourtesy TruliaCourtesy TruliaCourtesy TruliaCourtesy TruliaThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The home includes lounge space in and out of the sun, a large lawn perfect for a jungle gym and much more.”
“Courtesy TruliaOutside, the 16,107-square-foot La Villa Contenta has more sitting areas for relaxation, work and watching the tots play.”
“Their dining room seats 10, leaving room for multiple guests.”
“Courtesy TruliaCourtesy TruliaIn the $54.5 million estate, dinner for the family of five won't be an issue.”
“In the next room over, the Carters might enjoy a sitting around the table in front of a floor-to-ceiling window, where they can look out on the blue tides while having breakfast.”
“Courtesy TruliaWhen the kids are hungry, they'll probably have a meal in this all-white kitchen, where the wooden details on the cabinets balance with the marble countertops for a rustic charm.”
“Courtesy TruliaExquisite paintings and chandeliers hang in rib vault hallways, like this one, which leads to a dreamy garden overlooking the beach—manicured hedges and fountain included.”
“Courtesy TruliaPlus, the baby grand piano is a necessary fixture for a family of music royalty.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
Courtesy Trulia courtesy Trulia courtesy Trulia courtesy Trulia courtesy Trulia this content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported to this page to help users provide their e-mail address
"There's a lounge in and out of the sun, a big lawn for the jungle gym and so on."
"Outside, the 16107 square foot lavilla CONTENTA has more rest areas to rest, work and watch children's games."
"Their restaurant has 10 seats and can accommodate multiple guests."
"Etiquette Trulia etiquette Trulia in a $54.5 million estate, dinner for a family of five will not be a problem."
"In the next room, the cartels may like to sit around a table in front of a French window, where they can have breakfast and watch the blue tides."
"When the children are hungry, they may eat in this all white kitchen. The wooden details on the cupboard and the marble countertops form a rural charm."
"Exquisite paintings and chandeliers hang from the ribbed vaulted corridors, like this one, leading to a dreamlike garden overlooking the beach's trimmed hedges and fountains."
"Courtesy trullia plus, the baby grand piano is a necessary fixture for the royal family of music."



Number  972
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Voting is now open on the award show's website.”
“Other nominees include actors such as , , , , , and , groups such as and , singers such as , , , , , , , , , and Stranger Things' .”
“Gustin is nominated for Favorite TV Actor.”
“Zendaya is nominated for Favorite TV Actress and Favorite Movie Actress.”
“, The Flash star Grant Gustin, and Storm Reid, star of Disney's new movie A Wrinkle in Time, will also appear on the show.”
“News has learned exclusively.”
“They have been confirmed to make appearances during the annual ceremony, E!”
“...and may be on the list of stars who will get painted in green at Nickelodeon's 2018 Kids' Choice Awards.”
“Kevin Winter/Getty ImagesAre you ready to see celebs get slimed?”


"Voting is now available on the website of the awards ceremony."
"Other nominees include actors, such as,,, and, groups, such as and, singers, such as,,, and strangers."
"Gustine was nominated as the most popular TV actor."
"Zeng Daya has been nominated as the most popular TV actress and the most popular movie actress."
"Lightning star grant Gustin and Disney's new film" wrinkles in the years "star storm reed will also appear on the show
"Exclusive news."
"They've decided to show up at the annual celebration, e!"
“…… And it could be on the list of stars painted green at the Nickelodeon 2018 children's Choice Award. "
"Kevin winter / Getty pictures are you ready to see celebrities getting sticky?"



Number  973
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prior to WrestleMania 33, The Miz roasted Cena – who “stole his girlfriend from Dolph Ziggler” – on an episode of Talking Smack.”
“And then he tried to kiss me.”Ziggler had approached Bella back in 2015 to tell her that he still had feelings for her.”
“And that s it wasn t a one page it s a 75 page agreement We should note here that John Cena and Nikki Bella have put their relationship on display on reality television for years and it s up to you whether you want to believe the scenes are...”
“I had to have your sister sign an agreement to live in the house.”
“Without it, it’s a dog fight.”
“And those who buy a handgun for self defense pray, pray they never have to use it.”
“It gives you a sense of security, and it gives you a failsafe in case something happens.”
“It is like buying a handgun for home defense.”
““Having been through that process, here is how I view it.”
“Reflecting on his failed first marriage, Cena revealed on the second episode of Total Bellas that Nikki Bella had to sign a 75-page contract before she was able to move in with him.”


Before wrestling storm 33, Miz baked senna, who "stole his girlfriend from Dolf Ziegler," in an episode of talking smack
"And then he tried to kiss me." Ziegler found Bella in 2015 and told her that he still had feelings for Bella
"This is not a one page agreement, but a 75 page agreement. We should note that John senna and Nicky Bella have been showing their relationship on reality TV for many years. Would you like to believe that these scenes are..."
"I have to get your sister to sign an agreement to live in this house."
"Without it, dogs fight."
"Those who buy pistols to defend themselves pray that they will never use them."
"It gives you a sense of security and gives you a fail safe when something happens."
"It's like buying a pistol for family defense."
"Through this process, I see it this way."
"Recalling his failed first marriage, senna revealed in the second episode of complete Bella that Nicky Bella had to sign a 75 page contract to live with him."



Number  974
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 33-year-old reality star, who is expecting her first child with Tristan Thompson this spring, took to her website on Wednesday to reveal her baby-focused goals for the new year.”
“"For me, health and wellness resolutions are especially important this year.”
“Being pregnant, it's a whole different type of self-care," the Revenge Body health and fitness guru explains.”
“"I still exercise to maintain my sanity and also to feel good about myself, but my workouts are not as intense as they once were.”
“I'm also eating differently because, of course I have cravings, but I want to make sure I'm supplying my baby with the proper nutrients."”
“"I'm focused on being healthy mind, body and soul for myself and the baby -- but man, I can't wait to be a beast in the gym already, LOL," she adds.”
“"Still, for as active as I have been during my pregnancy, I feel great.”
“So my new year's resolution will be to stay as healthy mentally and physically as I can!"”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
The 33 year old reality star, who will have her first child with Tristan Thompson this spring, announced her new year's goals on her website on Wednesday
"For me, this year's health and health resolution are particularly important."
"Pregnancy is a completely different type of self-care," explains vengeance health and fitness guru
"I still exercise to keep my head clear and feel good about myself, but my exercise is not as intense as it used to be."
"I don't eat the same because of course I want to, but I want to make sure that I provide the right nutrition for my baby."
"I'm focused on being a healthy person for myself and my kids - but, man, I can't wait to be a beast in the gym, ha ha," she added
"Still, even though I was active during my pregnancy, I felt great."
"So my new year's resolution will be to keep as healthy as possible!"



Number  975
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I spent 23 years carting them around."”
“She spent a lot of 2017 in a war of words with Kris and the Kardashian children who believed Jenner s memoir The Secrets of My Life was filled with lies and the trans community who took issue with her...”
“"I spend a lot of time by myself here in the house," she revealed in an in-depth interview with Broadly published Tuesday.”
“"I have a lot of children, but sometimes just because of circumstances, maintaining a close relationship with your kids is very tough.”
“They all have lives.”
“They've all moved on."”
“"We're just human beings; we're going to be here for a very short time," Jenner added.”
“"We come and we go and at the end, when it's all said and done, hopefully your family is going to be there."”
“Caitlyn shares son Burt Jenner, 39, and daughter Cassandra Marino, 37, with first wife Chrystie Crownoves.”
“She also shares sons Brandon and Brody Jenner with second wife Linda Thompson ... and, most famously, daughters Kendall Jenner and Kylie Jenner with most recent ex-wife Kris Jenner.”


"It took me 23 years to drive them around."
"For most of 2017, she was fighting with Chris and Kardashian's children, who believed that Jenner's memoir the secret of my life was full of lies, and the cross community people who argued with her..."
"I spent a lot of time at home alone," she revealed in an in-depth interview with advertiser magazine on Tuesday
"I have a lot of children, but sometimes it's just because of the environment that it's very difficult to have a close relationship with them."
"They all have lives."
"They're all gone."
Jenner added: "we are just human beings and we will be here for a short time."
"We come and go, and finally, when everything is said and done, I hope your family will be there."
"Caitlin and her first wife, Christie clough, have a 39 year old son, Bert Jenner, and a 37 year old daughter, Cassandra Marino."
"She also shared her sons Brandon and Brody Jenner with her second wife, Linda Thompson... Most famously, daughters Kendall Jenner and Kelly Jenner, and most recently, ex-wife Chris Jenner



Number  976
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now let’s talk about that bananas skydiving sequence, shall we?”
“Ethan plans to purchase and intercept the plutonium himself, but he loses it when he’s forced to choose between it and the life of his friend and teammate Luther (Ving Rhames).”
“The two of them HALO jump out of a plane to sneak into a rave in Paris where Lark and the White Widow plan to meet.”
“In this case, CIA chief Erica Sloan (Angela Bassett) blames Ethan and the IMF for losing the plutonium in the first place, and assigns agent August Walker (a mustachioed Henry Cavill) to tag along with Ethan.”
“If there’s one thread that’s been common among all the “Mission: Impossible” movies, it’s that Ethan and the IMF (Impossible Mission Force) are always in need of supervision and oversight from the CIA.”
“Also Read: Can 'Mission: Impossible - Fallout' Ride Critical Acclaim to Box Office Success?”
“Fun Easter Egg: When we first meet the White Widow, she refers to her mom “Max,” who was the arms dealer played by Vanessa Redgrave in the very first “Mission: Impossible” film.”
“The terrorists are working with an agent known only by the alias John Lark, who will rendezvous with a broker called the White Widow (Vanessa Kirby) to obtain the plutonium and arm the nuclear bombs.”
“Already these stakes are delightfully absurd.”
“Got all that?”


"Now let's talk about banana skydiving, OK?"
"Ethan plans to buy and intercept plutonium on his own, but when he is forced to choose between plutonium and the lives of his friend and teammate Luther (VIN Reims), he loses plutonium."
"The two of them jumped out of the plane and sneaked into the carnival in Paris, where the lark and the white widow planned to meet."
"In this case, CIA director Erica Sloan (Angela Bassett) first accused Ethan and the International Monetary Fund of missing plutonium, and assigned agent Auguste Walker (bearded Henry Carville) to work with Ethan."
"If there's one thing in common in all mission: impossible movies, it's that Ethan and the IMF (mission impossible force) always need the supervision and supervision of the CIA."
You can also read: "can mission: the aftermath of the impossible win the box office with the praise of the critics?"
Interesting Easter eggs: when we first met the white widow, she was referring to her mother "Max", the arms dealer played by Vanessa Redgrave in the first mission: impossible movie
"The terrorists are working with an agent under the pseudonym of John Lacker, who will join a broker named Vanessa Kirby to get plutonium and equip the bomb."
"These bets are ridiculous."
"Do you understand?"



Number  977
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign Up Now An unexpected error has occurred with your sign up.”
“Please attempt to sign up again.”
“In The Assassination of Gianni Versace, Cunanan is played by Glee star Darren Criss.”
“The FBI believes that in addition to working odd jobs, Cunanan was a prostitute.”
“The California native, who could speak two languages, dropped out of college and funded his lifestyle thanks to relationships with older, wealthier gay men, federal investigations found.”
“The FBI painted Cunanan as a highly intelligent and dangerous man who desired a life of luxury.”
“The 27-year-old was on the FBI’s Ten Most Wanted Fugitives list, suspected in the killings of four other people in Minnesota, Illinois and New Jersey.”
“Hours after Versace’s shooting death, authorities identified Andrew Cunanan as the prime suspect.”
“Time Life Pictures—The LIFE Picture Collection/Getty ImagesWho was Andrew Cunanan?”
“Here’s what to know about suspected serial killer Andrew Cunanan:Four mug shots of Andrew Cunanan, who shot and killed fashion designer Gianni Versace.”


"Register now. There was an unexpected error in your registration."
"Please try to register again."
"In Versace's assassination, kunanan is played by glee star Darren Chris."
"The FBI thinks that besides odd jobs, kunanan is a prostitute."
A federal investigation found that the bilingual Californian dropped out of college and funded his lifestyle because of his relationship with older, wealthier gay men
"The FBI portrayed kunanan as a very smart and dangerous man who longed to live a luxurious life."
The 27 year old man is on the FBI's top 10 wanted list for the killing of four others in Minnesota, Illinois and New Jersey
Hours after Versace was shot, authorities identified Andrew kunanan as the prime suspect
"Time life pictures life pictures / Getty pictures who is Andrew kunanan?"
"Here's the information about serial killer Andrew kunanan: four cups of Andrew kunanan, who shot and killed fashion designer Gianni Versace."



Number  978
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MailOnline has contacted a representative for further comment.”
“'I was in New York on Election Day and it was the most bizarre energy I've ever felt in my life.”
“The Pretty Little Liars star, 28, is thought to be calculating the exact financial loss following the raid on her property in the city’s San Fernando Valley in the early hours of Friday morning.”
“TMZ report a front window was smashed and valuable jewellery and handbags snatched during what was believed to be an opportunistic burglary.”
“Scroll down for video Drama Lucy Hale has lost jewellery worth in excess of 15 000 following a reported burglary at her Los Angeles home While the collective loss has been estimated at 15 000 Hale is reportedly still in the process of conducting a full inventory of the house...”
“...and its contents...”
“Speaking in May 2017, the Memphis born actress told Elle that moving to Los Angeles had been a cultural change.”
“She said.”
“'I'm from Tennessee.”
“So a lot of people there think the same, which is fine if you think that way.”


"Mailonline has contacted a representative for further comments."
"I was in New York on election day, and it was the strangest energy I've ever felt in my life."
The 28 year old "little liar" star is believed to be calculating the exact financial loss after attacking her property in the San Fernando Valley early Friday morning
"TMZ reported that in a burglary considered opportunistic, a front window was smashed and valuable jewelry and handbags were stolen."
"After a theft at her home in Los Angeles, Lucy Hale lost more than 15000 pounds worth of jewelry. According to the report, the collective loss is estimated at 15000 pounds. Hale is still making a comprehensive inventory of the house..."
“… And its contents... "
"In May 2017, the Memphis born actress told Elle that moving to Los Angeles was a cultural change."
"She said
"I'm from Tennessee."
"So a lot of people there think that, if only you do."



Number  979
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“WATCH: Chris Pratt Says He Misses Son Jack, Shares Video of Family Time on the FarmRelated Gallery...”
“Chris Pratt, Josh Duhamel and More Stars Bring Their Kids to Monster Jam -- See the Fun Pics!”
“The Guardians of the Galaxy star recently welcomed a new cow to his farm, which is located on the San Juan Islands off the coast of Washington State, and took to social media on Wednesday to introduce her to the world.”
““Love at first sight,” Pratt captioned his proud Instagram pic of the long-horned brown and white heifer.”
““This good lookin lady is from the great state of Texas.”
“She’s adjusting quite well to life on the farm.”
“Welcome home Baby Girl!”
“#farmlife #texasgirl.”Pratt’s new cow isn’t the only recent addition to the farm.”
“Earlier this month, he showed off pictures of their "last lamb of the season," a baby ewe named Santa Maria.”
“The actor -- who will next appear in Avengers: Infinity War and Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom -- clearly loves spendingdowntimee on the farm in between projects, frequently showing off pics and enjoying father-son time with his 5-year-old son, Jack, with ex Anna Faris.”


"Watch: Chris Pratt says he misses his son Jack, sharing family time in a farm related gallery..."
"Chris Pratt, Josh Duhamel and more stars took their kids to Monster Jam - look at those funny pictures!"
"The guardian of the Galaxy star recently welcomed a new cow to his farm in the San Juan Islands off the coast of Washington state and introduced it to the world through social media on Wednesday."
"Love at first sight," Platt wrote in instagram's proud photo of a brown and white Longhorn heifer
"This beautiful lady is from the great state of Texas."
"She adapted well to life on the farm."
"Welcome home, baby!"
"Farm life" Texas girl. "Pratt's new cows are not the only new members of the farm recently."
Earlier this month, he showed a picture of their "last lamb of the season," a baby ewe named Santa Maria
"The actor, who will be next in Avengers: Infinite War and Jurassic world: Fallen Kingdom, obviously enjoys spending time on the farm between projects, flaunting photos and enjoying father son time with his five-year-old son Jack and former Anna Faris."



Number  980
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“I would be hesitant if he was so young.”The Sinner premieres on USA on Wednesday, August 2, at 10 p.m.”
“Justin Timberlake took to Instagram on Monday, July 31, to praise his wife, Jessica Biel, for her performance on her new TV series, The Sinner.”
““OK, I know I’m not exactly fair and maybe biased here, but my wife’s new show – @thesinnerusa – is amazing,” the 10-time Grammy winner, 36, captioned a trailer for the eight-episode USA Network crime drama.”
““It’s like nothing I’ve seen her in before, and she’s incredible in the role.”
“You should check it out when it premieres Wednesday on USA.”
“–JT.”The actress, 35, plays Cora, a young mother living in upstate New York who commits a brutal act of violence against a stranger.”
“The series, which many critics are calling a “whydunit” rather than a “whodunit,” follows Cora and her inner struggles as viewers attempt to decipher whether her crime was motivated.”
““I just did it.”
“And I don’t know why,” a blood-soaked Cora says in one teaser.”


"Wait a minute."
"If he was so young, I would hesitate." The culprit will premiere in the United States at 10 p.m. on Wednesday, August 2
On Monday, July 31, Justin Timberlake praised his wife Jessica bell on instagram for her performance in her new TV series the sinner
"Well, I know I'm not fair here, maybe biased, but my wife's new show, @ the sinerusa - is fantastic," the 36 year old, 10-time Grammy winner wrote in the trailer for eight episodes of American cybercrime dramas
"I haven't seen her before. It's incredible that she plays this part."
"You should see it when it premieres in the United States on Wednesday."
The 35 year old actress plays Cora, a young mother living in upstate New York, who acts cruelly and violently against a stranger
This drama, which many critics call "whydunit" rather than "whodunit", tells about Cora and her inner struggle, and the audience tries to interpret her criminal motive
"That's what I did."
"I don't know why," a bloody Cora said in a joke



Number  981
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can find the products and custom labels on The Home Edit’s website.”
“Feeling inspired to make your own playroom this gorgeous?”
“Paltrow’s children, Apple and Moses, are 13 and 11 respectively, so perhaps they’ll be a little more tidy than, say, a toddler might be.”
“We just wonder how long the meticulous organization will actually last once a kid gets into it.”
“The result is a beautiful crisp white room with strategically placed pops of color.”
““We categorized books and stuffed animals by color so that everything is easy to find (not to mention pretty to look at),” they added.”
“To organize it even more, they created zones for reading, games, art, crafts and science.”
““Our favorite project from the trip (and of all time) was the playroom.”The room features two walls of bookshelves with activities (like board games and a globe) on the left and leisure (like books and plush animals) on the right.”
““We just spent the most INCREDIBLE few days at @gwynethpaltrow's Hamptons house,” they posted on Instagram.”
“...thehomeedit/Instagram/NBCThey were the ones who did the now-famous pantry, and recently shared snaps of the gorgeous playroom.”


"You can find products and custom tags on the home edit website."
"Do you think your playroom is so gorgeous inspired?"
"Paltrow's children, apple and Moses, are 13 and 11 years old, respectively, so maybe they'll be cleaner than, say, a toddler."
"We just want to know how long this meticulous organization can last once a child enters the organization."
"This creates a beautiful white room with all kinds of colors."
"We sort books and stuffed toys by color so that everything is easy to find (not to mention good looking)," they added
In order to organize more activities, they set up reading area, game area, art area, handicraft area and science area
"Our favorite project on the trip (which has always been) is the playroom." On the left side of the game room are two wall bookshelves with activities (such as board games and globes) and on the right side are leisure (such as books and plush animals)
"We just had the most incredible days at @ GwynethPaltrow's Hampton house," they wrote on instagram
“… Homeedit / instagram / NBC, they created the now famous pantry and recently shared a snapshot of the gorgeous game room. "



Number  982
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...at 9pm...”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play nowIt then cuts to Kourtney talking to Scott on the phone as she explains that she was on a date.”
“...friendly relationship for the sake of their kids...”
“However, in an upcoming episode of Keeping Up With The Kardashians, things get tense between the former couple when Scott is left out of a family event.”
“The teaser shows Kourtney telling her ex that she's been too soft on him before.”
“(Image: YouTube/E!”
“Entertainment) (Image: YouTube/E!”
“Entertainment)"You think you can hurt me and still get invited to everything," the 38-year-old says.”
“A visibly angry Scott then fires back: "It's funny how fake you really are."”
“(Image: E!)”


“… 9 pm... "
"Video loading video not available click play click play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel play now then switch to Kourtney talking to Scott on the phone, she explained that she was dating."
“… For the sake of their children... "
"However, in the upcoming follow the kardashians, Scott was excluded from family activities, and the relationship between the former couple became tense."
"The teaser shows Courtney telling her ex that she used to be too gentle with him."
"(picture: YouTube / E!"
"Entertainment" (image source: YouTube / E! "
"You think you can hurt me and get invited to any event," the 38 year old said
An apparently angry Scott then hit back: "you're really fake. You're funny."
"(image: e!)"



Number  983
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...year before sharing last fall that her surrogate was pregnant with a baby girl...”
“We ve watched Kim open up about the process of using a surrogate on Keeping Up with the Kardashians admitting that finding someone that you really trust really is so much more difficult of a situation than you could really imagine She shared that the process took nearly an entire...”
“Kim Kardashian and Kanye West’s surrogate has given birth, meaning that Kim and Kanye are officially parents to three.”
“And while Kim’s journey to motherhood hasn’t been easy, she’s been open about her pregnancy struggles — as well as her decision to use a surrogate — every step of the way.”
“So why did Kim explore surrogacy when she and husband Kanye West decided they wanted to try for another baby?”
“It turns out that Kim’s first two pregnancies came with lots of complications, and her medical team advised her that trying to carry a third baby could come with potentially life-threatening risks.”
“In a post on her website during her second pregnancy Kim explained in her own words the struggles she experienced in both pregnancies with North and Saint writing Last pregnancy I had a condition called preeclampsia which is a serious condition you can get during pregnancy often the only way...”
“...to get rid of it is to deliver early to protect yourself and the baby Preeclampsia is extremely rare and Kim explained It causes your body and face to swell and that was very uncomfortable for me Kim revealed she had early onset preeclampsia which forced her to deliver North...”
“...about six weeks early...”
“She also revealed she experienced an additional complication during delivery called placenta accreta.”


“… Last fall, her surrogate mother conceived a baby girl
"We saw Kim disclose the process of using surrogate mothers and admit to the kardashians that it's much more difficult to find someone you really trust than you think. It took almost the whole process..."
"The surrogate mother of Kim Kardashian and Kanye West has given birth, which means Kim and Kanye are officially parents of three children."
"Although Kim's journey to pregnancy was not easy, she was open to every step of her struggle to get pregnant - and her decision to use a surrogate mother."
"So when Kim and her husband Kanye West decided to have another child, why did Kim explore surrogacy?"
"It turns out that Kim's first two pregnancies were accompanied by many complications, and her medical team advised her that trying to have a third child could be potentially life-threatening."
"During her second pregnancy, Kim posted an article on her website explaining in her own words the struggles she had with North and Saint during the two pregnancies. The last time I was pregnant, I had a disease called preeclampsia. It's a serious disease. The only way you can get this disease during pregnancy... "
“… To get rid of it is to protect yourself and your baby. Preeclampsia is extremely rare. Kim explains that it will cause swelling of your body and face. It's very uncomfortable. Kim reveals that she has early-onset preeclampsia, which forces her to give birth. "
“… About six weeks in advance... "
"She also revealed that she had another complication during delivery, called placenta accreta."



Number  984
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Make sure to tune in to Nickelodeon on March 24 to (hopefully) see your favorites take home the big awards!”
“Among other fan-favorite nominees include Selena Gomez for Favorite Female Artist, Despacito (Remix) for Favorite Song, Stranger Things for Favorite TV show, and tons more.”
“It's officially less than a month away from the big night, and many of our favs are nominated for big awards.”
“The nominees for the 2018 Kids' Choice Awards are here!”
“#KCAs https://t.co/s87SJWBJCY — HollywoodLife (@HollywoodLife) February 26, 2018For the Best Breakout Star award, Camila Cabello, Alessia Cara, Cardi B, Khalid, and Noah Cyrus are nominated.”
“Woah, talk about a tough category.”
“They're all superstars already!”
“Both Camila and Alessia have talked to E!”
“News on their excitement for the nominations, and their reactions are as cute as you'd think they'd be.”
“Camila Cabello and Alessia Cara up for the Teen Choice Award for Favorite Breakout Star: "I'm so excited to be nominated for Favorite Breakout Star at the KCAs.”


"Be sure to watch Nickelodeon on March 24 to (hopefully) see your favorite take home the prize!"
"Other fans' favorite nominations include Selena Gomez's favorite female singer, despacito's favorite song, and her favorite TV show stranger, etc."
"It's less than a month before the competition starts. Many of our favs have been nominated for the grand prize."
"The nominees for the 2018 children's choice award are here!"
“#KCAs” https://t.co/s87sjwjcy-HollywoodLife (@ Hollywood Life) February 26, 2018 best breakthrough Star Award nominates Camilla Cabello, alexia Carra, CADI B, Khalid and Noah Cyrus. "
"Wow, say a tough category."
"They're all superstars already!"
"Camilla and Alicia have talked to Alice!"
"On the news of their excitement about the nomination, their reaction was as lovely as you think."
Camilla Cabello and Alicia Carra will win the best breakthrough Star Award for teenagers: "I'm very happy to be nominated for best breakthrough star at kcas."



Number  985
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Becky G Channels Minnie Mouse in Disney's 'Magical Holiday Celebration'Becky G Launches New Cosmetics Collection 'Salvaje'Why Becky G Was Nervous to Go Country With Kane Brown Collaboration (Exclusive)”
“But the fact is that I'm doing it because it's authentic to who I am, and because it's what I'm about.”
“The 21-year-old singer has been dating soccer superstar Sebastian Lletget for over two years, and couldn't have a better partner and cheerleader by her side.”
“ET s Deidre Behar was with Becky at the Pandora Presents El Pulso at Academy Nightclub in Hollywood on Thursday where she not only took the stage to perform a few songs during a free show she also opened up about her beau s support and how he feels about...”
“...her sexy music videos...”
“"I think it's really special when in a relationship you can find someone that isn't just your boyfriend but your partner in life or your best friend," Becky explained.”
“"He's never looked at me like, 'Oh, babe!”
“Oh, no, I'm jealous!”
“You can't do that!'”
“He's more like, 'You go girl!”


"Related content: Becky g, Minnie Mouse channel in Disney's" Magic Festival Celebration ", Becky g launches new cosmetics series" salvaje "why Becky g nervously cooperates with Kane Brown (exclusive)"
"But the truth is, I do it because it's true who I am, because that's what I'm for."
"The 21-year-old singer has been dating football superstar Sebastian letgett for more than two years, and there is no better partner or cheerleader
"On Thursday, et s Deidre Behar and Becky were in Pandora presents El Pulso at the Hollywood academy nightclub, where she not only performed several songs in a free show, but also disclosed her boyfriend's support and his feelings..."
“… Her sexy music video... "
"I think it's really special that in a relationship you can find someone who is not only your boyfriend, but also your partner in life or your best friend," Becky explained
"He never looked at me like this," Oh, baby! "
"Oh, no, I'm jealous!"
"You can't do that!"
"He's more like," go ahead, girl! "



Number  986
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Take a peek at The Platinum Life!”
“The African gem who is also vegan is ready to let the world know why she’s up next in the rap and fashion sphere.”
“Network is ready to turn up your Sunday nights starting October 15, 2017 at 10 PM with its latest reality show – The Platinum Life – starring Shantel Jackson, Asiah Azante, LoLa Monroe, Nazanin Mandi, La’Myia Good, Crystal Smith, and Alycia Bellamy, who are independent women making it on their own!”
“So, what are they famous for – do tell?”
“Outside of being married to or dating famous musicians, these ladies are also friends who are about big business.”
“Scroll through Instagram and you will see that Crystal Smith is an up-and-coming chef who has been featured on numerous food segments with her unique recipes, and Nazanin Mandi designs fab swimwear.”
“Before you write The Platinum Life off as another reality fix where water bottles are thrown over petty arguments, tune in and see why these ladies are moving to the front of the scene and your flatscreen.”
“Shantel JacksonIG: MissJacksonShe’s been on the blogs for years, however, Miss Jackson has weathered the storms successfully.”
“On The Platinum Life, the actress takes control of her wheel by letting the world know that she is more than a beautiful arm-piece to a well-known Midwest rapper.”
“In fact, Shantel shares candidly why she has earned platinum status.”


"A glimpse of platinum life!"
"African treasure, also a vegetarian, is ready to let the world know why she is next in rap and fashion."
"The Internet is ready to launch the latest reality show platinum life from 10 pm on October 15, 2017, starring independent women such as Shantel Jackson, Asia azante, Lola Monroe, Nazanin Mandi, la'myia good, crystal Smith and alycia Bellamy!"
"Well, what are they famous for - don't you think?"
"In addition to marrying or dating famous musicians, these ladies are also friends in big business."
"Browse instagram and you'll find crystal Smith is a rising chef who has appeared in many food fields with her unique recipes. Nazanin Mandi designed Fab swimsuit."
"Before you think of platinum life as another realistic solution for throwing water bottles at trivial arguments, see why these women move to the scene and your flat screen."
"Miss Jackson, she's been blogging for many years, but she managed to survive the storm."
"In platinum life, the actress took control of her steering wheel and let the world know that she is not just the beautiful arm of a famous Midwestern rapper."
"In fact, Shantel frankly shared the reason for her platinum status."



Number  987
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You make a dedication to each other, and that’s it.””
““For me, nothing feels any different, and I think that’s the way it should be.”
“Image zoom Credit: Splash News OnlineJamie Bell and Kate MaraAt the AMD British Academy Britannia Awards in October, Bell told Entertainment Tonight that he and Mara are “having a great time” as newlyweds.”
“The former couple separated in 2014.”
“...and Mrs. B.”Bell has a son, 4 — whose name he has kept under wraps — from his previous marriage to Evan Rachel Wood.”
“Mara posted a photo of her and Bell kissing on what appeared to be the dance floor at their wedding, captioning the photo “nuptials.” Bell shared the same photo with the caption, “Mr.”
““Every day we come out of the house, we see the house we were married in, which is beautiful.”RELATED VIDEO: Rooney and Kate Mara Visit LiberiaThe former Fantastic Four costars initially announced their marriage on social media.”
“...honeymoon phase noted that the convenient spot has added bonuses...”
“So we walked across the street and then when it was done we spent the night on that property and we crossed the street and came home Image zoom Credit Presley Ann Patrick McMullan Getty Jamie Bella and Kate Mara Bell who said he and Mara are still in the...”
“...house When we couldn t find anything we just asked the woman who owns the house across the street Do you mind if we do it there And she was like Yes that s amazing he explained...”


"You give to each other, that's it."
"For me, there's nothing different. I think it should be."
Image zooming credit: splash news online Jamie bell and Kate Mara told entertainment tonight at the AMD British Academy Britannia awards ceremony in October that they "had a great time" as newlyweds
"The first two separated in 2014."
“…… And Mrs. B Bell has a 4-year-old son whose name has been kept secret. It was left by his ex-wife and Evan Rachel wood
Marla posted a photo of her and bell kissing at the wedding, titled "wedding."
"Every day when we come out of the house, we see the house where we get married. It's beautiful." Related video: Rooney and Kate Mara, former stars of "the magic four" who visited the statue of liberty, initially announced their marriage on social media
“… During the honeymoon phase, I noticed that the convenient location increased the bonus... "
"So we cross the street, and when it's over, we stay in that house for a night, we cross the street and come home, and Presley Ann Patrick McMullen Getty Jamie Bella and Kate Mara bell say he's still with Mara..."
“… House when we couldn't find anything, we just asked the owner of the house across the street, do you mind if we do it there, she said yes, it's amazing, he explained



Number  988
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"So we'll have each others backs through the time where we have to stay private.”
“I feel like I truly found that," she added.”
“I'll laugh a lot.”
“I'll cry a lot.”
“"You'll get every type of emotion.”
“...things do actually get a little emotional...”
“I had 28 guys but they all stuck out in their own way and they all did something that put a smile on my face or make me laugh or keep me on my toes she said before revealing that...”
“And at the show's junket last week, she praised her guys for making her laugh.”
“"At the end of the day, I never want to take myself too seriously."”
“I can laugh at it all and just go with the flow and have fun," she told ET's Lauren Zima at her first official Bachelorette photo shoot.”


"So when we have to keep it secret, we will support each other."
"I think I really found it," she added
"I'll laugh a lot."
"I'll cry a lot."
"You get all kinds of emotions."
“… It's a little emotional... "
"I have 28 people, but they all stick to their way, they all do something to make my face smile, make me laugh, or keep my toes, I said, she revealed before..."
"At the reception last week, she praised her boyfriend for making her laugh."
"At the end of the day, I never want to take myself too seriously."
"I can laugh it off, go with the flow and have a good time," she told et's Lauren zima during her first official single photo shoot



Number  989
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In addition, musician Jon Batiste, bandleader The Late Show with Stephen Colbert, performed with Gary Clark Jr. in a special tribute to Recording Academy Lifetime Achievement Award recipients Chuck Berry and Fats Domino.”
“Ben Platt Rihanna Zuleyka Rivera Sam Smith Chris Stapleton Sting SZA Bryson Tiller and U2”
“Entertainment for the evening was provided by Brothers Osborne Alessia Cara Cardi B Childish Gambino Eric Church Gary Clark Jr Miley Cyrus Daddy Yankee DJ Khaled Luis Fonsi Emmylou Harris Elton John Kesha Khalid Lady Gaga Kendrick Lamar Little Big Town Logic Patti LuPone Bruno Mars Maren Morris P nk...”
“Many of the recording artists who walked the Grammy red carpet — Kelly Clarkson, Cyndi Lauper, Cardi B and Lady Gaga among them — carried or wore white roses in support of the Time’s Up and MeToo movements.”
“Legend Shemar Moore Trevor Noah Sarah Silverman Hailee Steinfeld and Donnie Wahlberg...”
“The Late Late Show s James Corden returned to host the Recording Academy s award show for the second time overseeing a list of presenters that included Tony Bennett Dave Chappelle Kelly Clarkson professional football player Victor Cruz Eve Jim Gaffigan Katie Holmes Nick Jonas Anna Kendrick Alicia Keys John...”
“Sunday night was Music’s Biggest Night® when the 60th Annual Grammy Awards® were broadcast live on CBS from Madison Square Garden in New York City.”


"In addition, musicians Jon Batiste and Stephen Colbert are co leaders of the band and perform with Gary Clark Jr. to pay tribute to Oscar winners Chuck Berry and fat domino."
"Ben Pratt Rihanna Zuleika Rivera Sam Smith Chris Stapleton sting sablison tiller and U2"
"That evening's entertainment program by Osborne brothers alexia karacadi B childish Gambino Eric church Gary Clarke little Miley Cyrus dad Yankee DJ Khalid Louis foncey emilo Harris Elton John Kesha Khalid Lady Gaga Kendrick Rama small big city logic Patty luponebruno Mars Marlon Morris P NK..."
"Many of the recording artists who walked on the Grammy red carpet - Kelly Clarkson, Cindy Lauper, Katie B and Lady Gaga - carried or wore white roses to support the up and metoo movements of the time."
"The legends Shema Moore, Trevor Noah, Sarah Silverman, Haley Stanfield and Donny Walberg..."
"James Colden, the late host of the show, once again presided over the awards ceremony of the Academy of sound recording. This is the second time he has supervised the list of hosts, including Tony Bennett, Dave chapel, Kelly Clarkson, professional footballer Victor Cruz, Eve, Jim gaffegan, Katie, Helms, Nick Jonas, Anna Kendrick, Alicia Kay Johns... "
"Sunday night was the biggest night in the music world, and the 60th annual Grammy Awards ceremony was broadcast live on CBS in Madison Square Garden, New York."



Number  990
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When I'm home, I'll smoke and then play guitar for seven hours."”
“"I had this thought: 'I have to get paparazzied with someone.”
“Second of all, it shouldn't make a difference if I was or wasn't."”
“"First of all, I'm not gay.”
“"I noticed a lot of people were saying I gave them a 'gay vibe,'" he told millions of followers at the time in the selfie-style video.”
“Before this interview, he took to Snapchat to declare his heterosexuality.”
“That's why I am me," he said.”
“"Maybe I am a little more feminine -- but that's the way it is.”
“He couldn't pinpoint why people are so convinced he's gay, but did venture to guess that growing up in Canada with 15 female cousins "braiding hair and painting nails" could have something to do with it.”
“And I hate that side of me."”


"When I get home, I smoke and play guitar for seven hours."
"I have this idea:" I have to be captured by paparazzi with someone. "
"Secondly, it doesn't make any difference whether I am or not."
"First of all, I'm not gay."
"I've noticed a lot of people saying I gave them a 'gay atmosphere'," he told millions of fans at the time in this self portrait style video
"Prior to this interview, he declared himself heterosexual on snapchat."
"That's why I'm me," he said
"Maybe I'm more feminine - but that's the truth."
"He doesn't know why people believe that he is gay, but he boldly speculates that his 15 cousins who grew up in Canada may have something to do with" knitting hair and painting nails. "
"I hate my side."



Number  991
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So get voting now, because a mind filled with Real Housewives knowledge is a terrible thing to waste.”
“Luann will discuss her divorce with the WWHL host from her home in the Hamptons.”
“Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!”
“Luann de Lesseps will sit down with Andy Cohen to discuss her split from Tom D'Agostino at her home in Sag Harbor on Wednesday, September 6 at 11/10c.”
“The special, Watch What Happens Live One-on-One with Luann de Lesseps, will mark her first interview of this nature since announcing her divorce earlier this month.”
“Check out a preview of the interview, above.”
“The Real Housewives of New York City mom will get candid about the red flags she ignored, the rumors surrounding Tom's loyalty to the Big Apple pal and what finally led to the separation.”
“Andy and Luann will sit down and discuss her split from Tom in an interview debuting on September 6.”
“And don't forget to tune in this Wednesday, August 30, at 8/9c to check out Part 3 of the RHONY Season 9 reunion.”
“Until then, be sure to check out all things Real Housewives Awards at Bravotv.com/RHAwards for lots more fun and extra credit.”


"So vote now, because a mind full of real housewife knowledge is a terrible waste."
"Luan will be at her home in Hampton to discuss the divorce with wwhl hosts."
"Create a free profile to get unlimited exclusive videos, raffles, etc!"
"LuAnn de Lesseps will discuss her breakup with Tom D'Agostino with Andy Cohen at her home in port saga on September 6 (Wednesday) at 11 / 10."
"The special," one-on-one live observation of what happened with Luan de Lesseps, "will be her first such interview since she announced her divorce earlier this month
"Please see the interview preview above."
"The mothers of Real Housewives in New York City will be honest about the danger signs she ignored, the rumors about Tom's loyalty to big apple friends, and the reasons that eventually led to the breakup."
"Andy and Luan will sit down and discuss her breakup with Tom in the premiere interview on September 6."
"Don't forget to watch the third episode of Lonnie's season 9 reunion at 8:9am on Wednesday, August 30."
"Before that, be sure to look at everything, the real housewife award Bravotv.com/RHAwards Get more fun and extra credit. "



Number  992
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Windsor often shares flirty snaps of her beau, and we must say, he has some serious modeling skills himself!”
“...this was the best day of my life and I cannot wait to marry the best person in the whole universe!”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The Victoria's Secret model got engaged to her longtime boyfriend over the weekendVictoria's Secret Model Devon Windsor Just Got Engaged in the Dreamiest Proposal EverShe has her wings — and now she has some new bling!”
“Victoria’s Secret model Devon Windsor is engaged to her boyfriend of two years, Johnny Dex.”
“And the proposal was truly heavenly.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Dex’s whole plan all started with the couple taking a plane ride over a private beach, which he where he had the words “Marry Me?” written in the sand, and Windsor, 24, was completely surprised.”
“Image zoom Credit: Devon Windsor/Instagram“When you think you’re flying into a photoshoot and then you look down and see this….”
“I’m the luckiest woman in the world!”


Windsor often shares her boyfriend's flirting scenes. We have to say that he has some serious modeling skills himself
“…… This is the best day of my life. I can't wait to marry the best person in the world
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Victoria's Secret model is engaged to her longtime boyfriend. Victoria's Secret model, Devon Windsor, has just proposed to her dream girl - now she has new jewelry
Victoria's Secret model Devon Windsor is engaged to her boyfriend of two years, Johnny DEX
"It's a fantastic proposal."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
DEX's whole project started with a couple flying over a private beach, where he wrote, "marry me?"? "On the beach, Windsor, 24, was completely surprised."
"Image scaling credit: German Windsor / instagram" when you feel like you're flying into a picture, and then you look down and you see this
"I'm the luckiest woman in the world!"



Number  993
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I joke with my friends that I’m going to be that 45-year-old who’s pregnant.””
““I think one thing about me and Chip is that we never like to look really far in advance and plan, that’s never been how we are.”
“Joanna Gaines shared a new photo of her newborn son Crew to Instagram on Saturday, giving an update on how her sweet baby boy doing in the caption.”
“The Fixer Upper star, 40, gave birth to Crew — her fifth child with husband Chip Gaines — on June 21.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s been a little over a week and he’s settling in just fine ,” Joanna wrote on Instagram of a shot showing Crew swaddled in a rocker in his nursery.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Before Joanna gave birth to Crew, it had been eight years since she and Chip last parented a newborn.”
“The couple are also mom and dad to sons Drake, 13, and Duke, 10, and daughters Ella, 11, and Emmie Kay, 8.”


"I joked with my friends that I wanted to be the 45 year old who was pregnant."
"I think one thing that chip and I have is that we never like to look too far ahead of time, and we don't like planning. We've never been like that."
"Joanna Gaines shared a new picture of her new son on instagram on Saturday and updated her lovely baby boy in the caption."
"The 40 year old repairman Shangxing gave birth to cruise, the fifth child of her husband chip Gaines, on June 21."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's been more than a week and he's adapted well," Joanna wrote on instagram
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Before Joanna gave birth to Crewe, it was eight years since she and chip last parented a new baby."
"The couple are also parents of 13-year-old son Drake and 10-year-old Duke, as well as 11 year old daughter Ella and 8-year-old daughter Amy Kay."



Number  994
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comment section.”
“So what.”
“The comedy actor and comedian wrote on the Fourth Of July, “Happy White People Proud Of Their Racist Ancestors Day.”Happy white people proud of their racist ancestors day — Damon Wayans Yunior?”
“(@wayansjr) July 4, 2017Around 1,100 people liked the tweet, while more than 1,200 replied to it and many users were not pleased.”
“One person wrote, “Just another example of Hollywood talking down to Americans.”
“They hate this country & their fans.”
“#FabricatedRacism sadly returns @wayansjr,” replied user @ViperNTheTemple.”
“Just another example of Hollywood talking down to Americans.”
“#FabricatedRacism sadly returns @wayansjr — DÃ©plorable EspÃ©cial (@ViperNtheTemple) July 4, 2017And how did the Wayan brother respond?”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"So what."
"Happy white people are proud of their racist ancestors," the comedian and comedian wrote on July 4 Happy white people are proud of their racist ancestors day: Damon Waynes Uniol
(@ wayansjr) on July 4, 2017, about 1100 people liked this microblog, and more than 1200 people replied to it, many users were not satisfied
One wrote, "this is just another example of Hollywood's low voice towards Americans."
"They hate this country and their fans."
User @ viperntthetemple replied: "fabricated racism has sadly returned to @ wayansjr."
"It's just another example of Hollywood demeaning Americans."
"How does the wayan brothers respond to the fabricated racism that sadly returns to @ wayansjr-d Ã plural ESP Ã commercial (@ vipernthemple) on July 4, 2017?"



Number  995
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN reports...”
“...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed...”
“That “incident,” which reportedly involved Pitt and son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce.”
“Back in September 2016, we learned that an “incident” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved.”
“So what went wrong?”
“They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together.”
“But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt and Jolie proved to be the real deal.”
“Eventually, he and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie (officially) came to light.”
“Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant.”
“The pair met while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston.”


"CNN report..."
“…… In the case one month ago, before and after Pitt paid child support in the legal document submitted on August 7, Julie's lawyer claimed that Pitt did not pay any meaningful child support because Julie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay the money she owed... "
It is reported that the "incident" between Pitt and her son, Maddox Jolie Pitt, is the reason for Julie's divorce
"As early as September 2016, we learned that there was a reported" incident "in a private plane, involving the Los Angeles Department of children and family services and the FBI."
"What's wrong?"
"They've been dating for 12 years, with six children and a French vineyard."
"But, even though they, er, started off as lewd, Pete and Julie proved to be a real deal."
"In the end, he broke up with Aniston and his relationship with Julie came to light."
"There's a lot of talk about what happened or didn't happen to Pete and Julie on the set."
"The couple met when filming the Smiths in 2004, when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston."



Number  996
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can check out the full infographic below.”
“He was also partially responsible for selling Daenerys off to Khal Drogo in Season 1.”
“The constant back-and-forths between the people who see the Iron Throne as their right, and the masterful manipulations they employ to get there, have made up some of the show’s most shocking moments.”
“That’s why when you look at the data to confirm who in Westeros and Essos has done the most backstabbing, it’s easy to see who’s holding the knife.”
“Venngage, an infographics firm, compiled a list of every “Game of Thrones” betrayal in order to map out the manipulations and deaths among six seasons.”
“When pointing them out, you can see all the people who were at the receiving end of the most betrayals and the ones that were at the throwing end.”
“Also Read: Game of Thrones: Cersei Lannister's Character Evolution, as Told Through Her WardrobeAccording to that data, Varys — Master of Whispers and known spider — has raked in the most with seven.”
“This includes the complicated plan where he testified against Tyrion in Season 4, then helped Jaime Lannister to free Tyrion, only to get him to Daenerys in Meereen.”
“Considering he’s been in the Lannister’s employ and lives in King’s Landing, it makes sense that most of his plans have been against the Lannisters.”
“Another high roller in the betrayal department includes another non-surprise — Petyr Baelish, who comes in with six.”


"You can see the complete information chart below."
"He's also partly responsible for the sale of danielis to halderogo in the first season."
"The constant back-to-back and fortress between those who regard the iron throne as their right, and the ingenious means they take to get there, constitute the most shocking moment of the play."
"That's why it's easy to see who's holding the knife when you look at the data to see who's doing the most back stabbing in Westeros and Aesop."
Venngage, an information charting company, compiles a list of every "power game" betrayal in order to map the manipulation and death of six seasons
"When you point out them, you can see all the people, they are the most easily betrayed people, and the most easily betrayed people."
"Read also: the game of power: cersei Lannister's character evolution, as she said through her wardrobe, according to this data, Wallis - the Whisperer and the famous spider - got the most income with seven."
"It's a complicated plan. He testified against Tyrion in the fourth quarter, then helped James Lannister save Tyrion, and finally took him to Danielle in Millin."
"Considering that he had been employed by Lannister and lived in the king's territory, most of his plans were aimed at Lannister."
"The other high-ranking official who betrayed the Department included another man who was not surprised - pettil belish, who had six people."



Number  997
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you use any of the quotes in this article, please credit ACE Comic Con with an H/T to Wrestling Inc. for the transcription.”
“Nikki said that she has tried to change the show’s name, but it’s not that easy.”
“Before that began, Lillian Garcia (who moderated) spoke to the Bellas about turning on WWE Raw Women’s Champion Ronda Rousey, which has now led to Nikki receiving a title shot at WWE Evolution on October 28.”
“Nikki also noted that she wanted the current title added to her resume, something beyond her reign as Divas Champion.”
““I guess that was the only way to get my match,” Nikki said.”
““I had to turn on her, she’s the champ.”
“I’ve been here for 12 years, she hasn’t, so I have to teach her a lesson.”
“… I need to have a reign that [goes beyond] the Divas Championship, so I’m not always called a diva and then one day I can actually be called a Raw Women’s Champion.”
“I got red in my eyes, I’m looking for that championship.”Garcia then asked if it was strange for WWE to refer to everyone as WWE Superstars, yet they are still on E!’s show, Total Divas.”
““Being an Executive Producer of Total Divas, we’ve had so many discussions about changing the name of the show,” Nikki responded.”


"If you quote any sentence in this article, please transfer H / T to ace Comic Con, a wrestling company."
"Nicky said she tried to change the name of the show, but it wasn't that easy."
"Before that, Lilian Garcia (host) talked with Bellas about the launch of the WWE original women's champion Ronda Rossi, and now Nicky has won the championship in the WWE evolution competition on October 28."
"Nicky also points out that she wants to add her current title to her resume, which goes beyond her status as the queen of heaven champion."
"I think it's the only way to match me," Nicky said
"I had to betray her. She's the champion."
"I've been here for 12 years and she hasn't, so I have to teach her a lesson."
“…… I need to have a rule over the queen of heaven champion, so I'm not always called the queen of heaven, and then one day I can be called a primitive woman champion
"My eyes are red. I'm looking for a champion." Garcia then asked if it was strange for WWE to call everyone a WWE superstar, but they were still in WWE! Our program, the total number of days
"As executive producer of total divas, we've talked a lot about changing the name of the show," Nikki responded



Number  998
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...in the downward dog position Booty ful Rosie revealed why she was a top model...”
“Backside Her pert derriere was on center stage New attire Splashing around in the turquoise surf the Mad Max Fury Road starlet showed off a new bikini Up next For her next exercise in sultriness Rosie threw on a white two piece that had the same tropical floral design Strut...”
“And Rosie Huntington-Whiteley bounced right back to her supermodel physique as she posed for a photo shoot in the Bahamas on Wednesday.”
“The stunning 30-year-old showed off her slender post-baby body as she changed into a bevy of skimpy bathing suits.”
“Scroll down for videoStunner: Rosie Huntington-Whiteley, 30, posed for a sensational photo shoot in the Bahamas on WednesdayDaring to impress, the Burberry spokesperson started the photo shoot off in a tropical flower black one piece.”
“Her trademark golden tresses were wrapped up in a soft pink scarf as she rocked retro shades.”
“For her next exercise in sultriness, Rosie threw on a white two-piece that had the same tropical floral design.”
“She wore a large flower pinned in her hair as she strutted around with a petite wooden parasol.”
“Daring Daring to impress the Burberry spokesperson started the photo shoot off in a tropical flower black one piece Cover girl She posed like a professional for the ocean side shoot Touch up As a production assistant applied makeup to her body Rosie held her pose like a Roman statute...”
“All hands on deck The camera crew of entirely men made sure that Rosie was captured to perfection As a production assistant applied makeup to her body Rosie held her pose like a Roman statute...”


“… In the downward dog position, the trophy fuller Rossi reveals why she is a top model... "
"In the back, her pet delier is standing in the middle of the stage, her new clothes are splashing in the turquoise waves, the crazy Max Frey road actress shows a new bikini, and then her next practice in the heat, Rosie wears a white two-piece swimsuit with the same tropical flower pattern on it..."
"Rosie Huntington Whiteley regained her supermodel figure while posing for a photo in the Bahamas on Wednesday."
"This amazing 30-year-old shows off her slim baby figure when she changes into a light swimsuit."
Video stunt: Rosie Huntington Whiteley, 30, made a hit in the Bahamas on Wednesday. To impress, burberry's spokesperson started filming in a tropical floral black jumpsuit
"Her signature blonde hair is wrapped in a soft pink scarf, with a retro hue."
"In the next muggy training, Rosie put on a white two-piece suit with the same tropical flower pattern."
"She's got a big flower pinned to her head, and she's swaggering around with a tiny wooden parasol in her hand."
"In order to impress Burberry's spokesperson, she boldly started taking photos from a black one-piece cover girl with tropical flowers. She posed professionally and took photos at the seaside. As a production assistant, Rosie put on makeup on her body, and she posed as a Roman law..."
"All the hands on the deck are made up of men, and the film team ensures that Rosie is perfectly captured, because the production assistant makes up Rosie's body, and Rosie keeps her posture like Roman law..."



Number  999
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“The revival consists of 18 episodes, the last of which is set to air on September 3.”
“READ MORE: Cannes Film Festival Accepts TV: Why Shows From David Lynch and Jane Campion Are Only The BeginningThe third season of “Twin Peaks” debuts on May 21 with a two-part premiere.”
“We don’t actually see anybody — most of the main cast is returning, with a few notable exceptions; there are also a number of new additions — suggesting that they must all be in another place.”
“READ MORE: ‘Twin Peaks’ New Teaser Sums Up the First Two Seasons in Less Than Three Minutes — WatchCarrying the tagline “Something old is new again…,” the teaser returns us to a few familiar locations: the red room, the sheriff’s department, the Double-R Diner.”
“Showtime has released a new teaser for the series, and though the 30-second ad consists of nothing more than a few establishing shots, it does serve to remind that this truly is happening and is just a few weeks away.”
“We still don’t know what’s in store for us when “Twin Peaks” makes its long-awaited return next month, but we do finally have some new footage — kind of.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"
"Pay attention to the latest sudden film and television news!"
Renaissance has 18 episodes, and the final episode is scheduled to air on September 3
"What to watch: Cannes Film Festival accepts TV: why David Lynch and Jane Campion's show is just the beginning of the third season of bimodal, which premieres on May 21 in two parts."
"We don't actually see anyone - most of the main actors are back, with a few obvious exceptions; there are some new actors joining - which means they must be in another place."
"Read more: 'twin peaks' New Teaser summed up the first two seasons in less than three minutes - Watch carrying the slogan" old things are new again... " "Tease, let's go back to a few familiar places: red room, sheriff's Department, double dining room."
"Showtime has released a new trailer for the series, and although the 30 second ad contains only a few definite shots, it does remind us that it's really happening, and it's only a few weeks away."
"We still don't know about the long-awaited return of bimodal next month, but we finally have some new shots - to some extent."



Number  1000
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT”
““For the People” drew a 0.8 and 2.8 million viewers at 10.”
““Roseanne” averaged a 3.9 rating in adults 18-49 and 15.2 million viewers.”
“The first two episodes of “Roseanne,” airing back-to-back last week, stunned industry analysts when they averaged a 5.2 and 18.4 million viewers between them.”
“That means this week’s episode was down 25% in the demo and 17% in total viewers.”
“However, only one episode aired this week and it was always likely that it would see some kind of decline.”
“The “Roseanne” bump translated into a good night for “The Middle,” which was up significantly airing immediately after the revival with a 2.2 and 8.3 million viewers.”
“That is a new season high in both measures for the comedy series.”
““Black-ish” (1.5, 5.4 million) and “Splitting Up Together” (1.4, 4.8 million) both came down from the increases they saw thanks to “Roseanne” last week, but were still the top shows in their half hour time slots in the key demo.”
“For NBC, “The Voice” (1.8, 9.3 million) was even while “Rise” (0.9, 4.5 million) ticked up in the demo, as was “Chicago Med” (1.1, 6.2 million).”


"Related content"
Serving the people attracted 800000 and 2.8 million viewers
Rosani has an average audience rating of 3.9% among adults aged 18-49 and 15.2 million viewers
"Last week, the average ratings of the first two episodes of Anne of the rose were 5.2 million and 18.4 million, respectively, which surprised industry analysts."
"It means that this week's shows are down 25% in demos and 17% in total audience."
"However, with only one episode on air this week, there is always the possibility of a certain degree of decline."
"The success of rosani turned into a wonderful night for the man in the middle. After the revival of the man in the middle, the TV series was broadcast immediately, with 2.2 million and 8.3 million viewers."
"It's a new season high for the two indicators of the comedy series."
"Black" (1.5 million, 5.4 million) and "split together" (1.4 million, 4.8 million) are both lower than the growth of "Roseanne" they saw last week, but they are still hot shows in half an hour of key presentations
For NBC, "sound" (1.8 million, 9.3 million) is uniform, while "rise" (900000, 4.5 million) is checked in the demo, just like "Chicago medicine" (1.1 million, 6.2 million)



Number  1001
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s just when you can tell other people and I kind of would like to be on that totem pole somewhere — I don’t have to be at the top, I just would like to be on it.””
““What you did before you met me is what you did before you met me, I don’t need to know everything about you.”
““I don’t care,” he told her.”
“She revealed to John that she had previously been married for three years and he was extremely forgiving and understanding — probably because he was also previously married to his high school sweetheart and got divorced after only three years, too.”
“But Nikki eventually gathered enough courage to tell John at her sister Brie Bella’s 2014 wedding to her husband Daniel Bryan.”
“She was worried about breaking the news to him because they’ve had multiple conversations about marriage before and she never mentioned her own previous marriage to him.”
“But her family weren’t the only ones in the dark — she hadn’t even told John at that point.”
“...kept such a big secret from her for all those years and Nikki said that it was because she was ashamed of the whole situation...”
“We drove to Vegas did it and even when I started walking down the aisle I know this was a huge mistake like how can I get out of it and I couldn t and I tried to forget about it Nikki s mom Kathy Colace was shocked that she...”
““Basically, we got married by Elvis.”


"You can tell people that I kind of want to stand on a totem pole somewhere - I don't have to stand on the top, I just want to stand on it."
"What you did before you met me is what you did before you met me. I don't need to know everything about you."
"I don't care," he told her
"She revealed to John that she had been married for three years before, and he was very tolerant and understanding - probably because he had been married to his sweetheart in high school before, and divorced after only three years."
"But Nicky finally summoned up enough courage to tell John at her sister Bree Bella's wedding to her husband Daniel Blaine in 2014."
"She was worried about telling him the news because they had talked about marriage many times before and she never mentioned her previous marriage to him."
"But it wasn't just her family - she didn't even tell John at the time."
“…… He kept a big secret from her for so many years. Nicky said it was because she was ashamed of the whole situation... "
"We drove to Vegas, and even though I started walking down the aisle, I knew it was a huge mistake, just like how I could get rid of it, I couldn't, I tried to forget it, and Nicky's mother Kathy CORAS was shocked that she
"Basically, we were married by Elvis."



Number  1002
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Other animated movies Tom has voiced include Mulan II, Kim Possible: The Secret Files, Kim Possible Movie: So The Drama, Batman Beyond: Return of the Joker, the four Futurama movies Bender's Big Score, The Beast with a Billion Backs, Bender's Game, and Into the Wild Green Yonder.”
“...and Numbuhs 44 and 45 on Codename: Kids Next Door, Teen Titans, Yan Lin, Susan, Alchemy on W.I.T.C.H., The Replacements, Legion of Super Heroes, Jake's mom, Counselor Chang on American Dragon: Jake Long, and Avatar the Last Airbender (as Joo Dee).”
“She played Julie on Friends.”
“BiographyEarly lifeTom, a Chinese American, was born in Highland Park, Illinois, the daughter of Nancy (née Dare) and Chan Tom, who worked in the frozen food business.”
“She was born on the same day as President Barack Obama: August 4, 1961.”
“She was raised Catholic.”
“In an article for Detour Magazine, Tom describes an experience she had as a child where other children were teasing her about her Chinese heritage.”
“This caused her to become a rather introverted person which, in turn, is what originally inspired her to get into dancing.”
“TheaterAt the age of 17, Tom landed a spot with a touring company of A Chorus Line.”
“She was cast in the Broadway version of the show less than a year later.”


Tom has also voiced other animated films, including Mulan II, Kim may: secret files, Kim may's film: so drama, Batman beyond: the return of the clown, four future films Bender's score, a billion beasts on his back, Bender's game and green into the wilderness
“…… Hemp cloth codenamed 44 and 45: children next door, young Titan, Lin Yan, Susan, alchemy of w.i.t.c.h., substitute, superhero legion, Jack's mother, Zhang consultant of American Dragon: Jack long, and the last air sect of avatar (Jody)
"She plays Julie in her friends."
Biographer Tom, born in Highland Park, Illinois, is the daughter of Nancy and Tom Chen, who works in the frozen food industry
"She was born on the same day as US President Barack Obama: August 4, 1961."
"She was a Catholic when she was a child."
In an article in circuitous magazine, Tom described an experience when she was a child when other children were teasing her about her Chinese tradition
"It turned her into a rather introverted person, and that's what made her dance in the first place."
At the age of 17, Tom got a place in the touring company of a choir
"Less than a year later, she was on Broadway."



Number  1003
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The attack was the deadliest modern mass shooting by a single gunman in the U.S. until the events in Las Vegas this week.”
“The mass shooting that killed 49 at Pulse nightclub in Orlando, Fla., occurred days after Grimmie's death.”
“"The Foundation is committed to helping impacted families experience the same type of love and support Christina Grimmie's family experienced from friends, family and the community at large when faced with the shock of losing their precious daughter to gun violence," according to the foundation's website.”
“Her family established The Christina Grimmie Foundation after her death "to provide financial, emotional and encouragement support to individuals and families who suffer from the devastating effects of gun violence."”
“Grimmie, who rose to fame on NBC's The Voice, died at age 22 in June 2016 after she was shot by Kevin James Loibl after her concert in Orlando, Fla.”
“We truly understand what these families are experiencing and hope to help in some way."”
“"Our hearts, thoughts and prayers go out to all the victims and the family and friends of those who were taken last night.”
“Advertisement"We are beyond devastated to hear of last night's tragedy in Las Vegas," the statement reads.”
“The late singer's family offered support and understanding in a statement Monday after 59 were killed and hundreds injured when, police say, Stephen Paddock opened fire on an outdoor country music festival on the Las Vegas strip Oct. 1.”
“File Photo by James Atoa/UPI | License PhotoOct. 3 (UPI) -- Christina Grimmie's family is reaching out to those affected by the mass shooting in Las Vegas this week.”


"This attack is the deadliest mass shooting by a gunman in the United States before this week's incident in Las Vegas."
The shooting that killed 49 people at pulse nightclub in Orlando, Florida, took place a few days after grimy's death
"The foundation is committed to helping affected families experience the same type of love and to supporting Christina guimi's family, friends, family and society as a whole, when faced with the impact of gun violence in the face of losing their precious daughter," the foundation's website said.
After her death, her family founded the Christina grimy foundation to "provide financial, emotional and encouraging support to individuals and families who are devastated by gun violence."
"Grimy made a name for herself on NBC's the voice, and was shot by Kevin James Loibl after her concert in Orlando, Florida, in June 2016, at the age of 22."
"We really understand what happened to these families and hope to help to some extent."
"We express our hearts, thoughts and prayers to all the victims and to the families and friends of those who were taken away last night."
"We were shocked to hear of the tragedy in Las Vegas last night," the statement said
Police say Stephen padock shot at an outdoor country music festival on Las Vegas Boulevard on October 1, killing 59 people and injuring hundreds. The family of the late singer expressed support and understanding in a statement Monday
"Information photos of James ATOA / UPI | license photooct. According to foreign reports on the 3rd, Christina grimy's family is in contact with the people affected by the massive shooting incident in Las Vegas this week. "



Number  1004
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And that's just the inside.”
“...his and hers closets his and hers dressing rooms and even an outdoor sitting place with a fireplace...”
“They're also homes that are great for hosting.”
“'I create homes that feel like a home — it could be a palace or a mansion — but each one has a comfortable feeling.'”
“I don’t follow trends so I make my own,' he told the magazine.”
“'The homes I have done in the Los Angeles area are a combination of neoclassical style with a very modern interior.”
“He designed Ritz-Carlton hotels and has developed other high-end properties including resorts and mansions ever since.”
“In addition, they have an informal dining room and a breakfast roomMohamed knows a thing or two about luxury.”
“...market Home for the holidays Their formal dining room where they host dinner parties seats 20 Lots of places to eat...”
“...area Decorating in style The home is filled with art and antiques that Mohamed has collected from around the world Homey The couple particularly loves the kitchen which has a walk in fridge and was designed with a single piece in mind a wood cabinet Mohamed found at a flea...”


"It's just an internal problem."
“… He and her wardrobe, he and her dressing room, even an outdoor living room with a fireplace... "
"They are also very suitable for boarding homes."
"The house I built felt like a home - it could be a palace or a mansion - but each one felt comfortable."
"I don't follow suit, so I do it myself," he told the magazine
"The house I built in the Los Angeles area is a combination of neoclassical style and very modern interior design."
"He designed the Ritz Carlton Hotel and developed other high-end properties, including resorts and mansions."
"In addition, they have an informal restaurant and a breakfast room, and Muhammad knows a little about luxury."
“… Holiday market house, their official restaurant, where they have dinner seats, 20 places to eat... "
“… The home is full of art and antiques collected by Muhammad from all over the world. The couple especially like the kitchen. The kitchen has a walk-in refrigerator, and the design takes into account a wooden cabinet. Mohamed found it in a flea shop... "



Number  1005
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the NFC South...”
“I am deeply sorry and apologize Newton who slumped badly last season after his spectacular MVP campaign in 2015 has passed for 882 yards with five touchdowns and five interceptions in four games this year leading the Panthers to a 3 1 record and a tie for first place in...”
“Dannon, the maker of Oikos yogurt, has dropped Newton from all advertising campaigns following what the company perceives as “sexist” remarks he made on Wednesday to Jourdan Rodrigue, a beat reporter with the Charlotte Observer.”
“Company spokesperson Michael Neuwirth released a statement Thursday saying it was “shocked and disheartened” at the former league MVP’s behavior.”
“Newton made light of a straightforward question from Rodrigue during his regular media availability on Wednesday, saying it was “funny to hear a female” ask about football.”
“The 28-year-old quarterback, who smirked derisively as the reporter asked about Carolina wide receiver Devin Funchess’s route-running, prefaced his response with a dig: “It’s funny to hear a female talk about routes.”
“It’s funny.”The Dannon statement noted the company perceives Newton’s comments as “sexist and disparaging to all women.”
“It’s simply not OK to belittle anyone based on gender.”
“We have shared our concerns with Cam and will no longer work with him Here s the video of Cam Newton saying it s funny to hear a female talk about routes pic twitter com hd9Kg4CCeu Carlin Reese CarlinReeseWIP October 4 2017 The company later clarified The agreement has not...”
“...been terminated...”


“… NFC South... "
"I'm very sorry for Newton's poor performance last season after his wonderful MVP campaign in 2015. He scored five touchdowns and intercepted five times in four games this year, ran 882 yards, and led the Panthers to set a record of 31, tied for the first..."
"Dannon, the maker of okos yogurt, gave up all its advertising campaigns after Newton made what the company saw as" sexism "to Jordan Rodrigue, a prominent reporter for the Charlotte Observer, on Wednesday."
In a statement Thursday, company spokesman Michael noworth said the company was "shocked and frustrated" by the former League MVP's actions
In a regular media interview on Wednesday, Newton downplayed a straightforward question from Rodriguez, saying it was "interesting to hear a woman ask a football question."
The 28 year old quarterback, when asked by reporters about the running route of Carolinas' Catcher Devon fenchez, laughed with derision. Before answering, he sarcastically said, "it's fun to hear a woman talk about the route."
Dannon's statement said the company considered Newton's remarks "sexist and contemptuous of all women."
"It's impossible to despise anyone on the basis of gender."
"We have shared our concerns with cam and will no longer work with him. This is a video of cam Newton. He said it was interesting to hear a woman talking about routes pic twitter com hd9kg4cceu Carlin Reese carlinresewip. On October 4, 2017, the company later clarified whether the agreement had been reached..."
“… Terminated



Number  1006
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Ant Anstead/Instagram...”
“Despite his exhaustion, he seems to be all smiles next to the HGTV host as they smooch and sip on wine.”
“!”Now he’s back in Los Angeles catching up with El Moussa, who finalized her divorce with ex Tarek in January.”
“Proudest daddy ever!!”
“Won all games to get here!!”
“The three of them posed for a group selfie that he captioned “She’s in the final!!!!”
“And some serious amounts of coffee!” he wrote on this video explaining his adventures, all “to surprise my incredible little girl.”He also caught up with his “little chap,” son, Archie as they sat on the sidelines.”
“One crappy hotel.”
“...miles of planes trains and automobiles...”
“Love you Not about to let his queen get the last word Anstead responded love you MORE Image zoom Anstead is returning from a surprise visit to Newcastle England where he was cheering on his 14 year old daughter Amelie at her netball finals Well it s taken around 6000”


"Image scaling credit: ant Anstead / instagram..."
"Although he was exhausted, he seemed to be smiling when the HGTV host kisses and sips wine."
"!" now he's back in Los Angeles, catching up with El Moussa, who divorced the former Tarek in January. "
"The proudest dad ever!"
"I won all the games to come here!"
The three of them pose in a group selfie. The title of his selfie is "she's in the finals!!"
"More coffee! In this video, he explains his adventures, all of which are to "surprise my incredible little girl.". When they sat on one side, he also caught up with his "little partner", his son Archie
"A broken hotel."
“… Miles of planes, trains and cars... "
"Love you don't let his queen get the last word ansteder responds love you more picture zooming ansteder is back in England from a sudden visit to Newcastle, where he cheers for his 14-year-old daughter Amelie in her no net final - well, it took about 6000"



Number  1007
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  1008
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Visit INSIDER's homepage for more.”
“People were also searching for "boat neck" and "tuxedo dress" designs.”
“Though they have both worn some memorable ensembles, it looks like Markle may have had a bigger year than her royal sister-in-law when it comes to influencing the latest trends.”
“Both duchesses made it onto global fashion search platform Lyst's new ranking of the most powerful celebrity fashion influencers of the year, with Markle landing in a higher spot on the list than Middleton.”
“The list was generated by tracking more than 100 million searches and using sales data, page views, and social media mentions to determine each celebrity's influence.”
“Kylie Jenner nabbed the top spot on the list, followed by her sister Kim Kardashian West.”
“Markle was found to be the third most popular celebrity fashion influencer of 2018Boat neck dresses have become one of Markle's signature styles.”
“Ben STANSALL - WPA Pool/Getty ImagesRead more: 17 brands that had a great year thanks to Meghan MarkleMiddleton landed outside of the top 10, placing at number 16The Duchess of Cambridge landed in 16th place.”
“Nigel Roddis/Getty ImagesAccording to Lyst's findings, Markle caused a huge spike in search traffic for certain brands and designsBoth Givenchy and Stella McCartney saw boosts in traffic following the royal wedding.”
“Read more: Meghan Markle keeps wearing dresses with the same neckline — and it's quickly becoming one of her signature looksSearches for Stella McCartney were up after Markle's wedding reception.”


"For more information, please visit the home page of insider."
People are also looking for "neck" and "tuxedo" designs
"Although they all wear some unforgettable clothes, in terms of influencing the latest trends, Marcel may be better than her royal sister this year."
"Both Duchess are on the latest annual fashion influence list of the most influential celebrities by global fashion search platform LYST, and markel ranks higher than Middleton."
"This list is created by tracking more than 100 million searches and using sales data, page views and social media mentions to determine the influence of each celebrity."
Kelly Jenner topped the list, followed by her sister, Kim Kardashian West
"Markel is considered to be the third most popular celebrity fashion influencer in 2018. The round neck dress has become one of Mark's signature styles. "
"Ben stansol WPA pool / Getty Images read more: 17 brands that have performed well this year due to Meghan Markle Middleton are out of the top 10, 16th and the Duchess of Cambridge 16th."
"Nigel Roddis / Getty Images according to LYST, Markle has led to a surge in search traffic for certain brands and designs, with Givenchy and Stella McCartney both seeing traffic growth after the royal wedding."
"What to watch: Megan markel has been wearing a skirt with the same neckline - which soon became one of her signature looks. After markel's wedding banquet, Stella McCartney's researchers started



Number  1009
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“That means no spaghetti straps.”
“However, this rule is often broken by her grandchildren (including Kate Middleton) — especially since they like to get involved in sporting events and activities.”
“No casual clothesThe queen would prefer members of her family to avoid casual clothing while on an official engagement.”
“While it’s not the end of the world, the queen likely won’t approve of the look.”
“And, when she bent down to greet fans, her thigh was revealed.”
“No high slitsSpeaking of dressing modestly, Meghan Markle’s Reformation dress also featured a very high, revealing slit.”
“Meghan also wore a thin-strapped dress while visiting Bondi Beach earlier in the week.”
“According to royal style rules, members of the family must dress modestly when on official family business.”
“No wedged-heelsQueen Elizabeth II reportedly hates wedged heels.”


"Check out the memo on Facebook!"
"It means no spaghetti belt."
However, her grandchildren (including Kate Middleton) often break this rule, especially because they like to participate in sports events and activities
"Don't wear casual clothes. The queen wants her family not to wear casual clothes when they are officially engaged."
"It's not the end of the world yet, but the queen probably won't approve of it."
"And when she bent down to greet her fans, her thighs came out."
"There are no high slits - when it comes to dress decently, Meghan Markle's reformed dress also has a very high slit."
"Megan also wore a striped dress when she visited Bondi Beach earlier this week."
"According to the royal style, family members must dress decently when performing family business."
"Without wedge heels, Queen Elizabeth II is said to hate wedge heels."



Number  1010
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Class D felony carries a maximum sentence of five years in prison and a $7,000 fine.”
“Soules previously asked a judge to dismiss the case but the judge declined last month and Soules appealed.”
“But state prosecutors say it does.”
“Soules contended Iowa law doesn’t require fatal wreck surviving drivers to wait for police.”
“The Iowa State Patrol said Soules fled on foot after the 8:20 PM wreck, which occurred about 15 miles south of Soules’ farm in Arlington.”
“Court documents claimed alcoholic beverages or containers were found at the scene of the crash.”
“He was charged with felony hit and run when the tractor driver died at a local hospital.”
“He called 911 and waited for first responders, but left before police arrived.”
“An Iowa farmer in Buchanan County when not on TV, Soules struck a tractor driven by a neighbor on April 24 last year in northern Iowa, sending it into a ditch.”
“Soules also appeared on Dancing With the Stars in 2015.”


"A level D felony carries a maximum sentence of five years in prison and a fine of $7000."
"Suers had asked the judge to dismiss the case, but the judge refused last month, and suers appealed."
"But the state attorney said it was."
"Sules believes that Iowa law does not require surviving drivers to wait for the police."
The Iowa patrol said sours fled on foot after the 8:20 p.m. crash, 15 miles south of his farm in Arlington
"According to court documents, alcoholic beverages or containers were found at the scene of the crash."
"When the tractor driver died at the local hospital, he was charged with the felony of hit and run."
"He called 911 and waited for emergency personnel, but left before the police arrived."
"On April 24 last year, an Iowa farmer in Buchanan County, Northern Iowa, bumped into a neighbor's tractor and drove it into a ditch without getting on TV."
"Sules was also on dance with the stars in 2015."



Number  1011
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Footage from the movie appears in Rimes’ music video for the hit song.”
“Coyote Ugly 2.0!”The end of the 2000 movie features Rimes making a cameo to surprise Piper Perabo’s character, Violet, who sings “Can’t Fight the Moonlight” earlier in the film.”
““No one could resist!”
““This is what happens when your friends at @kemosabe1990 in Aspen move locations and open up a bad ass private bar upstairs and then turn on Can’t Fight The Moonlight,” she captioned the picture.”
“The country singer recreated the iconic scene from “Coyote Ugly” while on vacation in Aspen this week and shared a picture of it on Instagram.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)LeAnn Rimes hasn’t forgotten how to dance on a bar.”


"Clips of the movie appear in rimes' hit song music video."
"Ugly wolf 2.0! "At the end of the 2000 film, REMS guest starred in a surprise Piper Perabo role, violet, who sang" can't fight against Moonlight "earlier in the film."
"No one can resist!"
"That's what happens when your friend in Aspen @ kemosabe 1990 moves, opens a bad private bar upstairs, and then opens a bar that can't fight the moonlight," she wrote in the title of the picture
The country singer recreated the iconic scene from "ugly Coyote" while on holiday in Aspen this week and shared a photo on instagram
"Click send this email to a friend (open in a new window) Click share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) LeAnn Rimes didn't forget how to dance in a bar."



Number  1012
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pop star might be taking her surprises abroad as she later shared a photo of herself on her way to the airport.”
“On Sunday Swift took to Instagram to thank fans for "illuminating her night and her life" and promised there were "so many other things coming up and I can't wait to meet you."”
“The "Shake It Off" singer held a second Secret Session in her Nashville home on Sept. 29.”
“At the events, fans are required to leave all their belonging behind before entering Swift's home to sample "1989," her first official pop album, and to hang out with the star.”
“AdvertisementThe "Shake It Off" singer held the first of her "1989 Secret Sessions" on Sept. 20, for which 35 fans were invited to her Los Angeles home to munch on home baked cookies and listen to the singer's unreleased new album.”
“The 24-year-old star shared several photos from the gatherings on Instagram Saturday under captions like: "NYC memories" and "Miss you already".”
“On Thursday, the singer held another event at her Rhode Island home.”
“NEW YORK, Oct. 6 (UPI) -- Taylor Swift continued her famous "1989 Secret Sessions" last week and invited several fans to her NYC apartment on Friday so they could listen to her upcoming record before its released on Oct. 27.”


"The pop star may go abroad with her surprise because she later shared a picture of herself on her way to the airport."
"On Sunday, swift was on instagram thanking fans for" lighting up her night and life "and promising" there's a lot more to do and I can't wait to see you. "
The "shake off" singer held his second secret meeting at his home in Nashville on September 29
During these activities, fans were asked to leave all their belongings and stay with swift before entering her home to taste her first official pop album 1989
The "shake off" singer held her first "1989 secret meeting" on September 20, at which 35 fans were invited to her home in Los Angeles, munching on biscuits baked at home and listening to the singer's new album that has not yet been released
The 24-year-old star shared several photos of the party on instagram on Saturday, titled "memories of New York" and "I've missed you"
On Thursday, the singer held another event at her home in Rhode Island
New York, October 6 (AP) - Taylor Swift continued her famous "1989 secret meeting" last week and invited several fans to her apartment in New York on Friday so that they could listen to her upcoming album before its release on October 27



Number  1013
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m beyond elated to be having a boy.””
“...might not be a great situation for Marley added Marcille with a laugh However I found out soon after that I was having a boy and I felt like she willed it in her favor...”
“I thought that was adorable but at the time I had no idea what I was having so my fear about this extremely expressive and outgoing young girl was if this baby came out to be a little girl that...”
“Make it a brother,’ ” she recalled of her sweet conversation with her little girl.”
“Maybe a baby brother.”
““I said, ‘Marley, would you like to have a little brother or sister?’ And she said, ‘Yes, Mom, but you know what?”
“(She is already a mom to daughter Marley Rae, 3½, with ex Kevin McCall.)”
“Marcille, 33, is also expecting a baby boy with Sterling, she revealed exclusively to PEOPLE in November.”
“,” she captioned an Instagram on Monday of herself showing off her elegant sparkler.”
““I said yes!!!!”


"I'm so happy to have a boy."
"Maybe it's not so good for Marley," Marcel added with a smile, but I soon found out that I had a boy, and I thought it was good for her that she was willing to do it... "
"I thought it was cute, but I didn't know what I was doing at that time, so my fear of this very expressive and outgoing young girl was that if the child was a little girl, then..."
"Be a brother," she recalled her sweet conversation with her little daughter
"Maybe a little brother."
"I said," Marley, do you want to have a brother or a sister? She said, "yes, mom, but you know what?"
"She's the mother of three-and-a-half-year-old daughters Mary ray and former Kevin McCall."
Last November, Marcel, 33, told people exclusively that she was pregnant with a baby boy with Stirling
"On Monday, she added a headline to instagram to show off her elegance."
"I promised!!"



Number  1014
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She describes a moment in her first season on the show, a scene set in a yoga studio, when she had trouble finding her mark.”
“For Lysette, an acting neophyte who came to Hollywood directly from New York City, where she worked as a dancer, Tambor's attentions began early and innocently enough.”
“It was discreet.”
“Billings was not present for this alleged incident, and several crewmembers were nearby "but they were focused on their jobs.”
“Lysette pushed Tambor away and "rolled my eyes."”
“I felt his penis on my hip through his thin pajamas," Lysette says.”
“"He came in close, put his bare feet on top of mine so I could not move, leaned his body against me, and began quick, discreet thrust back and forth against my body.”
“That's when she says Tambor, dressed as Maura, wearing a green satin kimono and gray wig, approached her.”
“A few minutes later, while waiting for a camera setup between takes, Lysette was standing in a corner of the soundstage set.”
“Both "laughed it off because it was so absurd," Lysette says.”


"She described a scene from her first season show, which was in a yoga studio, when it was hard for her to find her goal."
"For lesette, a new performer who came directly from New York City to Hollywood as a dancer, Tambor's attention started early and naively."
"It's very cautious."
"Billings didn't attend the so-called incident and several crew members were nearby," but they focused on their work
Lester pushed Tambor aside. "Rolled my eyes."
"I felt his penis on my hip through his pajamas," lesette said
"He came very close, put his bare feet on me so that I couldn't move, put his body on me, and began to push my body back and forth quickly and carefully."
"Just then, she said, Tambor, dressed as a Mullah, in a green satin kimono and gray wig, approached her."
A few minutes later, Lester was standing in a corner of the stage, waiting for the camera to be set in between shots
"Both" laughs because it's ridiculous, "said Lester



Number  1015
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1983 classic All Night Long All Night while dressed in some Santa themed sleepwear minus the pants...”
“The onlooker added Sofia even placed Disick s phone in his back pocket before giving him a sweet kiss on the cheek First Christmas The lovebirds went on to celebrate their first Christmas season together with Sofia getting into the holiday spirit by dancing around the kitchen to Lionel s...”
“Scott takes care of her, opens the car door and pays for everything.”Instagram OfficialThe two made things official on Instagram days later, when videos surfaced of the two sharing a kiss and receiving a “congratulations” cake during a trip to Miami.”
“They are very flirty.”
““She constantly giggles around him.”
“Sofia seems smitten.”“It’s obvious she looks up to Scott,” said another source.”
““They are spending every day together.”
““Since returning to L.A., Scott and Sofia are inseparable,” said the source.”
“Image zoom Credit: SplashNews‘Inseparable’Things started to heat up in September, when sources told PEOPLE the two had grown closer.”
“The very next day, Sofia joined the self-proclaimed “lord” in Las Vegas for a late dinner at Stack restaurant along with a group of friends.”


"Classic 1983, wearing Santa Claus themed pajamas all night without pants..."
"Bystanders added that Sofia even put desik's cell phone in his back pocket and gave him a sweet kiss on his cheek. On the first Christmas, the couple continued to celebrate their first Christmas. Sophia danced for Lionel s in the kitchen to blend in the festive atmosphere.... "
"Scott takes care of her, opens the door and pays for everything." The official announcement was made on instagram a few days later, when a video of the two sharing a kiss and receiving a "Congratulations" cake while traveling in Miami surfaced
"They're flirting."
"She's always giggling around him."
"Sophia seems to be fascinated." "It's clear that she respects Scott," another source said
"They're together every day."
"Since returning to Los Angeles, Scott and Sofia have been inseparable," the source said
"Image scaling credit: when the source told people that these two" inseparable "things began to heat up in September."
The next day, Sofia had dinner with a group of friends at the stark restaurant in Las Vegas



Number  1016
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the aftermath of the controversy, Thurman had clarified that she blamed the producers of the film, including disgraced media mogul Harvey Weinstein, the most for the accident and revealed that Tarantino had already apologised to her for his role.”
“But you can’t reduce that type of history and legacy,” she added.”
“Sure.”
“When you know someone for as long as I’ve known him, 25 years of creative collaboration… Yes, did we have some tragedies take place?”
““We’ve had our fights over the years.”
“Thurman told the magazine that she always “had a good relationship” with Tarantino even after the incident.”
“Thurman and Tarantino, 55, first collaborated on the cult favourite Pulp Fiction and they followed it up the Kill Bill movies.”
“The director, on his part, had admitted that he still blames himself for convincing Thurman to sit in the car and called the incident “one of the biggest regrets of my life”.”
“Earlier this year, Thurman had said in an article that she suffered severe injuries after she was pressured into driving a stunt car she did not feel comfortable operating on the sets of Tarantino’s film.”
“I understand him and if he wrote a great part and we were both in the right place about it, that would be something else,” Thurman said.”


"After the controversy, Thurman clarified that she blamed the accident on the film producers, including the infamous media tycoon Harvey Weinstein, and revealed that Tarantino had apologized to her for her role."
"But you can't diminish that history and legacy," she added
"Of course."
"When you meet someone as long as I've known him, 25 years of creative cooperation Yes, have we had any tragedies? "
"We've been fighting all these years."
Thurman told the magazine that even after the incident, her relationship with Tarantino had been good
Thurman and Tarantino, 55, first collaborated on the cult's favorite vulgar novel, and then on the film Kill Bill
"The director admitted that he still blamed himself for persuading Thurman to sit in the car, calling the incident" one of the biggest regrets of my life. "
"Earlier this year, Thurman said in an article that she was seriously injured under the pressure of driving a stunt car and that she felt uncomfortable on the set of Tarantino's film."
"I understand him that if he wrote a great part and we were all in the right place, it would be another thing," Thurman said



Number  1017
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...her fellow Potter alums including her series classmate Evanna Lynch Luna Lovegood brother Rupert Grint Ron Weasley and husband Daniel Radcliffe Harry Potter as well as director Christopher Columbus Now if only they can all find their way back to Platform 9 3 4 Read more from Yahoo Entertainment...”
“There s something more real about being here than being on the sets thisisbwright on what s she s most excited about this weekend HPCelebration UniversalORL pic twitter com sVew8PSIWX The Leaky Cauldron leaky January 26 2018 And on her official Instagram page Wright has also routinely posted photos with...”
“...and Oliver Phelps Fred and George Weasley joined Wright at Universal Studios Orlando for a Q A as part of the park s Harry Potter celebration...”
“There s a HarryPotter reunion on the red carpet for The Circle tribecafilmfest Bonnie Wright catching up with Emma Watson pic twitter com tmTPZbzbWR Keira Alexander keira_alexander April 27 2017 Earlier this year many of the film s cast members Stan Ianevski Viktor Krum Natalia Tena Nymphadora Tonks and James...”
“Story continuesHERMIONE GRANGER AND CEDRIC DIGGORY THIS IS REAL pic.twitter.com/KJeMqU6ooI — danielle (@taronegertuns) January 8, 2018Watson also ran into Bonnie Wright (Ginny Weasley) on the red carpet at the 2017 Tribeca Film Festival premiere of The Circle.”
“Love you Longbottom A post shared by Tom Felton (@t22felton) on Jan 30, 2017 at 6:13pm PSTAt this year’s Golden Globes, Watson found herself in an impromptu Potter reunion when she presented the award for best limited series or TV movie with Robert Pattinson (Cedric Diggory).”
“That event produced a number of photos from Felton alongside his Malfoy father, Jason Isaacs, as well as other notable co-stars.”
“When The Wizarding World of Harry Potter opened at Universal Studios Orlando in 2014, many of the films’ cast members were on hand to celebrate the event.”
“Studio Tour in London.”
“Fortunately for them, they’ve had numerous such chances in recent years, as the Harry Potter stars have often been spotted together, whether in social situations or at Potter-related events such as last year’s opening of the “Forbidden Forest” exhibit at Warner Bros.”


“… Her colleagues Porter alumni include her series classmates Ivana Lynch, Luna lovewood, brother Rupert Greene, Ron Weasley and husband Daniel Radcliffe, Harry Potter and director Christopher Columbus. Now as long as they can find their way back to the platform 9 3 4 read more from Yahoo entertainment... "
"There are more real things here than on the set, which is the most exciting thing for her. This weekend, on her official instagram page, Wright often posted "This is my picture."
“…… Oliver Phelps Fred and George Weasley and Wright came to Orlando Universal Studios to participate in a Q & A as part of the Harry Porter celebration of the park.
"Earlier on April 27, 2017, many movie actors Stan inyevsky Victor Krum Natalia Taina nifadola Tonks and James held a Harry Potter reunion on the red carpet, with Bonnie Wright, the cutest actress in the circle, posing with Emma Watson on twitter..."
The story goes on, Granger and Cedric Diggory. It's true pic.twitter.com/KJeMqU6ooI -Danielle (@ taronegertuns) on January 8, 2018, Watson also met Bonnie Wright on the red carpet at the premiere of Tribeca Film Festival 2017
"Love you Longbottom Tom Felton (@ t22felton) on January 30, 2017 at 6:13 p.m. at this year's Golden Globe Awards ceremony, Watson and Robert Pattinson (Cedric Digory) presented the best limited series or TV movie awards together, and found himself in a temporary reunion of Porter."
"The event produced some photos of Felton and his Malfoy father Jason Isaacs, as well as other famous co stars."
"In 2014, the world of Harry and Potter opened at the opening of Universal Studios Orlando, and many movie actors were present."
"London studio tour."
"Fortunately for them, they have had countless such opportunities in recent years, because Harry Potter stars are often found together, whether in social occasions or in Potter related activities such as the opening of the" forbidden forest "exhibition held by Warner Bros last year."



Number  1018
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...known about for awhile The Mindy Project s final sixth season debuts on Hulu on September 12”
“I think that happily ever after can sometimes be romantic happiness and sometimes it can be a feeling of contentment with your life as a professional and as a mother We just have such a good finale that we ve...”
“When asked if it’s important that her character gets a happily ever after, Kaling replied: “I think that we do, I think we’re romantics.”
“The fave TV couple called it quits and she has since moved on with nurse Ben (Bryan Greenberg).”
““[A] lot those juicy storylines.”Dr. Mindy Lahiri, of course, is mom of son Leo with ex Danny Castellano (Chris Messina).”
““[It’s] a little bit about mom-shaming and that’s cool,” she said.”
“...neck brace as he recently broke his neck five weeks ago on set of the film The Pact said that the episode was was really fun to do...”
“We have a really funny episode where Modern Family s Julie Bowen plays a rival mother who thinks that Mindy s not doing that great of a job Kaling who was joined by costar Ike Barinholtz the star wore a...”
“Executive producer Matt Warburton chimed in: “I think she’s going to learn a little bit more about how to be a good, involved parent.”
“...with it over the course of the season Kaling 38 told the crowd...”


“…… Mindy plans to make its final season 6 debut on Hulu on September 12
"I think the happiness after that is sometimes romantic happiness, sometimes the satisfaction of career. As a mother, we have a good ending, we have..."
When asked if it was important for her character to live happily ever after, Karin replied, "I think we are. I think we are romantics."
"The TV loving couple broke up, and then she continued to date with nurse Ben (Brian Greenberg)
"A lot of interesting storylines." Dr. Mindy rahiri, of course, is the mother of Leo, the son of former Denny Castellano (Chris Messina)
"(it's) a little bit about mom's humiliation, which is cool," she said
“… Neck bracket, because he recently broke his neck five weeks ago in the movie agreement, said this episode is really fun to do... "
"We have a very interesting episode in which Julie Bowen of the modern family plays the mother of a competitor. She thinks Mindy's work is not very good. Carlin is joined by the star Ike barinholtz. She wears a..."
Executive producer Matt Warburton echoed: "I think she'll learn more about how to be a good, engaged parent."
“… Throughout the season, Carlin 38 told the audience



Number  1019
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Crusoe Steals the Spotlight...”
“"If you've ever been doubted, this award tonight is for all of us."”
“People's Choice Awards brought together plenty of star power.”
“Reality royalty rubbed shoulders with fashion royalty and even though the headlines seemed to cast a shadow over the night's festivities, there was plenty of applause for the night's winners.”
“Here's what you missed — and what everyone will be talking about tomorrow.”
“The Shoutouts To Veterans and First RespondersAttendees and honorees alike thanked first responders, firefighters, police officers, and volunteers.”
“On the red carpet, Mila Kunis made sure that everyone was aware that the awards show was happening during something much larger — the fires raging across California.”
“And the stars gave America's veterans some love, too.”
“The show fell on Veteran's Day, so the homage was fitting.”
“According to E!, when they accepted the award for Movie of 2018, Avengers: Infinity War co-stars Pom Klementieff, Scarlett Johansson, and Danai Gurira, mentioned the hard work taking place throughout California to contain the flames.”


"Robinson took the spotlight..."
"If you've ever been suspected, tonight's award is for all of us."
"People's Choice Awards bring together a lot of star power."
"The real royal family and the fashion royal family passed each other. Although the headlines seemed to cast a shadow on the celebration that night, the winners of that night still received a lot of applause."
"That's what you missed - everyone will talk about it tomorrow."
Shouts to veterans, first responders and recipients thank first responders, firefighters, police and volunteers
"On the red carpet, Mira Kunis made sure everyone knew that the awards ceremony was held at a time when something bigger happened - the California fire."
"The stars also gave American veterans some love."
"The show is on Veterans Day, so it's appropriate to pay homage."
"According to e! In accepting the 2018 Film Awards, Nemesis: Infinite War co stars Bohm clementif, Scarlett Johnson and Danai gurilla mentioned that efforts are being made across California to contain the flames



Number  1020
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the premiere alone, they face possible bullet holes in the windows, unsightly facades, and 100 years worth of potential damage — and that’s all before they step inside.”
“But I’m always looking for growth, always looking into tomorrow,” he says.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Chi Town Flip which follows husband and wife team Bryan and Maira Segal as they transform homes in the Windy City follows the same model as Tarek and Christina s successful series and will be the first launched by the production company the El Moussas formed last year before they...”
“...separated...”
““We’ve been working together for a really long time, It’s our job.”
“Obviously, we know each other really well,” says Tarek of the former couple’s dynamic as business partners.”
“They’re co-executive producing the series, which he notes they began working on “before separation.”
“So it’s been a long, long process.”But they’re not simply seeing the project through before parting ways.”
“Tarek tells PEOPLE exclusively, he’s not ruling out the possibility of working together again down the line.”


"At the premiere alone, they were faced with bullet holes in the windows, ugly exterior walls, and 100 years of potential damage - all before they stepped inside."
"But I've been looking for growth, looking forward to tomorrow," he said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Chi Town flip is launched after the couple team Bryan and Maira Segal renovated the house in Fengcheng. It is the same as Tarek and Christina's successful series. It will be the production company founded by El moussas last year. In their..." The first one launched before
“… Separated... "
"We've been working together for a really long time, it's our job."
"Obviously, we know each other very well," Tariq said of the former couple's vitality as business partners
He said they were co executives of the series, and they started writing the series "before they separated."
"So it's a long process." But they don't simply go through the project before they go their separate ways
"Tariq told people exclusively that he did not rule out the possibility of working together again."



Number  1021
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We explore all the ways.”
“How much does Beyonce love the number 4?”
“Beyoncé and her mother-in-law Gloria Carter were honored for their humanitarian work at the even hosted by Tina Lawson and her hubby, Richard Lawson.”
“The duo rocked matching gowns that slayed the ’From WACO to Wakanda’ theme.”
“As the bid got higher and reached $19,000, Blue proudly raised her paddle, and beamed with joy as the auctioneer said “Yes, 19, Miss Blue.”When she wasn’t dropping bands on the auction, Blue Ivy stole the show when she hit the red carpet with her mom, Beyoncé.”
“Video footage captured proud dad, Jay-Z hilariously trying to stop Blue Ivy from raising her paddle when the bid on an item began at $17,000.”
“While attending her grandmother, Tina Lawson’s second annual Wearable Art Gala, the adorable 6-year-old bid nearly $20,000 during an art auction.”
“By Jasmine WashingtonBlue Ivy Carter has proven to be quite an art connoisseur.”


"We explore all the ways."
"How much does Beyonce like number four?"
"Beyonce and her mother-in-law, Gloria Carter, were honored for their humanitarian work at a charity party hosted by Tina Lawson and her husband, Richard Lawson."
"This combination shocked the matching dress and killed the theme of" from Waco to wakanda. "
As the bid got higher and higher, reaching $19000, blue held up her oars with pride and laughed happily. The auctioneer said, "yes, 19 years old, Miss blue." When she didn't play a band at the auction, blue Ivy took the lead when she and her mother Beyonce walked down the red carpet
"The video shows proud dad, and when Jay-Z cheerfully tries to stop blue Ivy from lifting his racket, the starting price for an item is $17000."
"At grandmother Tina Lawson's second annual wearable art party, this lovely 6-year-old girl bid nearly $20000 at an art auction."
"Jasmine Worthington's blue Ivy proves that Carter is an excellent art connoisseur."



Number  1022
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the Know with Michelle Buteau: Post Baby Bod Edition...”
“Congrats Kail!”
“Earlier this year, Kailyn announced that she would be celebrating the arrival of her third child this summer.”
“Walking across the stage to receive her degree is one of the latest accomplishments the reality starlet has achieved this year.”
“...recent blog post...”
“Between teen motherhood financial hurdles in the beginning then moving to a new state marriage babies and divorce and then of course just wanting to give up I barely held on and I m FINALLY graduating she said in a...”
““If you follow any amount of the show, you know I’ve been struggling to get through school and earn my bachelor’s over the last 6 years… Yes, 6 years.”
“#DSU.”Kailyn’s journey towards achieving her degree hasn’t been an easy one.”
“??‍??”
“Lowry shared footage from her big day beaming, ”Guess what today is!”


"Understanding with Michelle buteau: after birth version..."
"Congratulations, Kay!"
Earlier this year, Karin announced that she would celebrate the arrival of her third child this summer
"Walking the stage to get a degree is one of the latest achievements of the reality TV star this year."
“… Recent blog posts... "
"Being a mother as a teenager, I had financial difficulties at first, then moved to a new state, got married, had children, divorced, and of course just wanted to give up. I could hardly hold on and finally graduated," she said in a report
"If you know anything about the show, you'll know that I've been working hard for the past six years to complete my studies and get my bachelor's degree Yes, six years. "
"DSU" Kailin's degree journey is not easy
“??‍??”
Lori shared a clip of her big day, "guess what it is today!"



Number  1023
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Weinstein has denied any allegations of non-consensual sex, but the Board of Governors determined “the conduct described in the allegations against Harvey Weinstein to be repugnant, abhorrent, and antithetical to the high standards of the Academy and the creative community it represents.””
“Academy s Bylaws including suspension or expulsion Weinstein the now former head of The Weinstein Company was stripped of his Academy membership when decades of sexual misconduct claims against him came to light from droves of women throughout the industry...”
“The Board of Governors believes that these standards are essential to the Academy s mission and reflective of our values Should any member violate these standards or compromise the integrity of the Academy as determined by the board the Board of Governors may take any disciplinary action permitted by the...”
““The Academy is categorically opposed to any form of abuse, harassment or discrimination on the basis of gender, sexual orientation, race, ethnicity, disability, age, religion, or nationality.”
“There is no place in the Academy for people who abuse their status, power or influence in a manner that violates recognized standards of decency.”
“The Academy asks that members embrace their responsibility to affirm these principles and act when these principles are violated.”
“According to the new guidelines, “members must also behave ethically by upholding the Academy’s values of respect for human dignity, inclusion, and a supportive environment that fosters creativity.”
““On behalf of the Governors, I want to thank the specially formed task force, led by Governor and Academy Officer David Rubin, whose members dedicated many hours of research and discussion to drafting this document and evaluating future steps,” Academy CEO Dawn Hudson wrote in the letter.”
“A memo was sent out that night, as shown through screenshots posted to the web by journalists.”
“On Wednesday, the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences’ Board of Governors approved new “standards of conduct” for members amid the fallout of the Harvey Weinstein revelations.”


"Weinstein denies any accusation of involuntary sexual behavior, but the Board finds that" the behavior described in Harvey Weinstein's accusation is disgusting, disgusting and contrary to the high standards of the college and creative community he represents. "
"The rules and regulations of the college, including suspension or dismissal, Weinstein is now the former head of Weinstein Company, and he was deprived of the membership of the college when decades of sexual misconduct charges were exposed among many women in the whole industry..."
"The Council believes that these standards are essential to the mission of the college and reflect our values. If any member violates these standards or impairs the integrity of the college as determined by the Council, the Council may take Any disciplinary action permitted. "
"The college firmly opposes any form of abuse, harassment or discrimination based on gender, sexual orientation, race, nationality, disability, age, religion or nationality."
"No one in the college is allowed to abuse his position, power or influence in violation of generally accepted standards of decency."
"The society holds its members responsible for recognizing these principles and acting in violation of them."
"According to the new guidelines," members must also show their moral character by upholding the values of the college, respecting human dignity, tolerance, and an environment conducive to creativity. "
"On behalf of the governors, I would like to thank the specially established working group led by governor and College Officer David Rubin, whose members spent a lot of time studying and discussing, drafting this document and evaluating the future steps," Dean Hudson, chief executive of the college, wrote in the letter
"It can be seen from the screenshot that the reporter released on the Internet that a memorandum was issued that night."
On Wednesday, under the influence of the Harvey Weinstein incident, the Council of the Academy of film arts and Sciences approved a new code of conduct for its members



Number  1024
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““New Becky” Sarah Chalke will also take a break from blocking Rick & Morty fans on Twitter to take a new, top-secret role.”
“As reported before, the entire original cast is returning—including a not-dead-after-all John Goodman—along with Johnny Galecki, who will descend his mountain of Big Bang Theory money to reprise his role of David for one episode.”
“It’ll keep that 8 p.m. time slot the following week, but return to its normal half-hour episodes.”
“ET with an hourlong premiere, per Variety.”
“Photo: Adam Rose/Getty ImagesAs foretold by the vague promise last May of a midseason premiere, ABC today revealed that the nine-episode Roseanne revival will officially debut Tuesday, March 27 at 8 p.m.”


"New Becky" Sarah chuck will also temporarily stop blocking Rick and modi's fans on Twitter and start a new top secret role
"As previously reported, all the original actors are back, including John Goodman and Johnny gelecki, who are not dead after all. He will remake the role of David in an episode of big bang theory."
"In the next week, it will stay at 8pm, but return to the normal half-hour series."
The premiere time of ET is one hour, for each type
"Photo: the vague promise of Adam Ross / Getty Images' mid season premiere last May heralds the official Premiere of nine episodes of rosani's resurrection on Tuesday, March 27, at 8 p.m., ABC revealed today."



Number  1025
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FROM PEN: Lea Michele Dream-Casts Her Own Real-Life Girl Squad — from Country Darling Maren Morris to Beyoncé...”
“Category winners are then selected by teens themselves, who choose new award categories and favorites from the past.”
“Teen Choice honors the year’s biggest names in television, music, film, fashion and comedy.”
“With five multi-platinum studio albums and more than 20 million albums and 70 million singles sold worldwide, Maroon 5 has become one of the top touring acts in popular music, as they continue to achieve worldwide success while expanding their impact on pop culture and the music industry.”
“RELATED VIDEO: You Have to Meet Adam Levine’s Biggest Fan!”
“We are never going to go away!”The accolade celebrates the advancement of the band –lead vocalist Adam Levine, keyboardist and rhythm guitarist Jesse Carmichael, bassist Mickey Madden, lead guitarist James Valentine, drummer Matt Flynn and keyboardist PJ Morton – over the past 10 years.”
“After a brief pause, Levine laughed and said, “Just kidding.”
“The group eschewed the traditional long speech for the big award, instead joking about how old they are (Levine is 38) and teasing the crowd with a hint that their next album will be their “final” record.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Maroon 5 received the Decade Award at the 2017 Teen Choice Awards on Sunday night.”


"From pen: Leia Michelle dreams of casting her own women's team in real life - from country talent Marlene Morris to Beyonce..."
"Category winners are chosen by teenagers themselves. They choose new categories and the most popular awards from the past."
"Teen choice" is a recognition of the big names of the year in television, music, film, fashion and comedy
"With more than five platinum studio albums and more than 20 million albums and 70 million singles sold worldwide, maroon 5 has become one of the top touring shows in the field of pop music as they continue to achieve global success while expanding their impact on pop culture and the music industry."
"Related video: you have to meet Adam Levin's biggest fan!"
"We will never leave! "The award is to celebrate the band's progress over the past 10 years - lead singer Adam Levin, keyboard player and rhythm guitarist Jesse Carmichael, bassist Mickey Madden, lead guitarist James Valentine, drummer Matt Flynn and keyboard player PJ Morton."
After a short pause, Levin said with a smile, "you're kidding."
Instead of traditional long speeches, the band joked about how old they were (Levin, 38) and hinted that their next album would be their "last" album
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Maroon 5 won the decade award at the 2017 youth Choice Awards on Sunday night."



Number  1026
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The parents to new twins partied with fellow famous pals like Usher, Jermaine Dupri, and A$AP Rocky, and it looks like the crew had an amazing time.”
“According to TMZ, Kelly’s Couture Costume Party was held in West Hollywood.”
“Beyoncé has yet to post any photos of their couples’ costume on social media, but we’re sure she will soon, and we cannot wait.”
“Jay managed to coordinate perfectly with his other half, donning a Biggie-inspired red leather jacket, a white tee, jeans, and Biggie’s signature cane.”
“In true ’90s fashion, Beyoncé rocked dark lipliner, black shades, and Kim’s signature beauty mark above her upper lip.”
“...falseThere were plenty of iconic Kim looks for Bey to choose from, but she went with her white blouse, red leather pants, and Chanel suspenders from Missy Elliott’s “The Rain” music video.”
“...and this year, it seems they’re following in Kim Kardashian’s footsteps by dressing up as music icons with their incredible Biggie and Lil’ Kim costumes, and you have to see these looks.”
“The Carters always slay when it comes to their costume choices (remember when Beyoncé and Jay-Z dressed as Barbie and Ken last year?)”
“Beyoncé and Jay-Z dressed up as Lil’ Kim and Notorious BIG for pal Kelly Rowland’s Halloween party, and we are so obsessed with these two paying homage to their fellow hip-hop legends.”
“So big, in fact, we might even say they go Biggie.”


"The parents of the new twins went to the party with their famous friends, such as Arthur, Jermaine Dupree and rocky. It looks like they had a good time."
According to TMZ, Kelly's fashion party was held in West Hollywood
"Beyonce hasn't posted any photos of their couple's clothes on social media yet, but we believe she will soon, we can't wait."
"Jay managed to coordinate perfectly with his partner by wearing a red leather jacket inspired by Daji, a white T-shirt, jeans and Daji's signature walking stick."
In the true '90s fashion, binok spoils the black lip liner, the black hue and Kim's iconic beauty logo above her upper lip.
“…… There are a lot of iconic Kim styles for bey to choose from, but she chose Miss Elliott's white top, red leather pants and Chanel sling from the "the rain" music video
“…… This year, they seem to be following in Kim Kardashian's footsteps, dressing up as music idols in incredible big and little Kim's clothes. You have to look at these shapes. "
"Cartel always flies into a rage when it comes to her clothing choices (remember last year when Beyonce and Jay dressed up as Barbie and Ken?"
"Beyonce and Jay-Z dress up as little golden men and are notorious at friends Kelly Rowland's Halloween party. We are obsessed with these two people and pay homage to their hip-hop legend partners."
"It's too big. In fact, we can even say they're getting bigger."



Number  1027
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Oteri stayed with the program until 2000.”
“In an era when TV viewers routinely hear Samantha Bee utter all kinds of profanity on basic-cable’s TBS and listen to all sorts of once-offensive language on networks ranging from FX to HBO, who cares if someone drops a discouraging word on “SNL”?”
“...of the country...”
“Viewers in New York heard the epithet clearly in the first half hour of the January 13th broadcast, during a sketch in which Rockwell played a science teacher on a spoof of a PBS kids program.”
“Cast members Cecily Strong and Mikey Day seemed surprised, but kept the action going.”
“Some people watching the show in Los Angeles and Las Vegas reported on Twitter that NBC bleeped out the profanity and Rick Ludwin a former longtime head of NBC s late night programming said on the social media outlet that the network delays its west coast feed by a few...”
“...seconds...”
“NBC has broadcast “SNL” live across the nation since mid-Spring.”
“An “SNL” spokeswoman said producers declined to comment on the incident.”
“Rockwell’s utterance threatened to distract from a strong broadcast of the program that featured cameos from former cast members Bill Murray and Fred Armisen, as well as a strong opening sketch that made fun of MSNBC morning hosts Joe Scarborough and Mika Brzezinski.”


"Audrey held on until 2000."
"In an era when TV viewers often hear Samantha bee say all kinds of blasphemous words on TBS of basic cable and listen to all kinds of once offensive language on the Internet from FX to HBO, who cares if someone throws a depressing word on" SNL "
“… "National..."
"Audiences in New York clearly heard the nickname in the first half hour of the broadcast on January 13. In a sketch, Rockwell played a science teacher and imitated PBS children's program."
"Sicily strong and Mickey day seemed surprised, but continued to perform."
"Some people who watched the show in Los Angeles and Las Vegas reported on twitter that NBC had beeped out the blasphemies, while Rick Ludwin, who had long been NBC's late night program director, said the blasphemy On social media, Ludwin said NBC delayed the West Coast show for a few days... "
“… Seconds... "
NBC has been broadcasting "SNL" nationwide since mid spring
A SNL spokesman said the producers declined to comment on the matter
"Rockwell's speech may be a distraction from the show, which features guest appearances by former actors Bill Murray and Fred armisen, as well as a brilliant opening sketch that teases MSNBC morning hosts Joe Scarborough and Mika Brzezinski."



Number  1028
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’ve been with him literally every day and I’m not sick of him, and I miss him when he’s not in my visual sight, it’s gross.””
“She told BANG Showbiz: “It’s that cheesy line of ‘You know when you know’ and that’s so real because I’ve never had anything like this with any other human, I’ve never not got sick of someone.”
“LONDON - Meghan Trainor is planning to have a winter wedding.”
“The 24 year old pop star got engaged to her significant other Daryl Sabara at the end of last year and she is keen to tie the knot in a chilled ceremony in her own backyard around 12 months after...”
“...he got down on one knee...”
“She said: “I was thinking, my backyard’s real pretty.”
“Like, real beautiful.”
“And I just want it be chill and with my family in the backyard so I think I’m going to do that around Christmas time because it’s my favourite.”
““My mom is like, ‘Stop telling them.’ It’ll be fine mom.”
“No one knows where I live.”


"I'm with him every day. I don't hate him. When he's out of my sight, I miss him. It's disgusting."
She told Bang showbiz: "it's a tacky line like 'you know it when you know it.' it's too real, because I've never had anything like this with anyone else, and I've never felt sick of anyone."
"London - Megan Turner plans a winter wedding."
"The 24-year-old pop star was engaged to another important Daryl Sabara at the end of last year. She is eager to have a cold wedding in her backyard in 12 months..."
“… He went down on one knee... "
"I was thinking, my backyard is beautiful," she said
"Like, it's really beautiful."
"I just want the weather to be cooler and my family in the backyard, so I think I'll do it around Christmas because it's my favorite."
"My mother said," don't tell them. " It's going to be all right, mom
"No one knows where I live."



Number  1029
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At the time, she said on Teen Mom 2: “I’m excited that we got this done before my baby’s born and I’m just happy that my last name is Evans again and not Rogers.””
“...with ex fiancé Nathan Griffith...”
“Rogers, who was married to the Teen Mom 2 star from 2012-2014, was arrested on Sunday at about 3:10 p.m. in Leland, North Carolina, according to a spokesperson for the Leland Police Department.”
“According to the spokesperson, there had been an outstanding warrant for his arrest.”
“He was booked into the Brunswick County Jail for one misdemeanor assault charge, one count of communicating threats and one count of interfering with an an emergency communication.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Rogers’ court date has been set for Sept. 26.”
“TMZ was the first to report the news of Rogers’ arrest.”
“According to the outlet, his bail has been set at $100,000.”
“In the arrest warrant obtained by TMZ, the court magistrate reportedly found probable cause to believe Rogers attacked a woman named Lindsey Frazier.”


At that time, she said in "young mother 2:" I'm glad we finished this task before the baby was born. I'm glad my last name is Evans, not Rogers. "
“… And former fiance Nathan Griffith... "
Rogers was arrested at 3:10 p.m. Sunday in Leyland, North Carolina, according to a Leyland Police Department spokesman. Rogers married the young mom 2 star from 2012 to 2014
"According to the spokesman, there is a pending arrest warrant."
"He was jailed for one misdemeanor assault, one threat of communication and one interference with emergency communications."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Rogers' court date is September 26."
"TMZ was the first to report Rogers' arrest."
"According to the media, his bail has been set at 100000 yuan."
According to reports, in the arrest warrant obtained by TMZ, the court judge found possible reasons to believe that Rogers had attacked a woman named Lindsay Fraser



Number  1030
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision GettyImagesForUnivision...”
“The six "Agentes de Cambio" were Iván Ceja (26) and Justino Mora (28) from Compton, California, Dante Alvarado León (22) from Berkeley, California, Sarahí Espinosa Salamanca (27) from Palo Alto, California, Xiuhtezcatl Martínez (17) from Boulder, Colorado and Nalleli Cobo (16) from Los Ángeles, California.”
“Some of the stars that walked through the press line were Maluma, Iggy Azalea, Clarissa Molina, the "Rosario Tijeras" star Bárbara De Regil, Wilmer Valderrama, Diane Guerrero and many more.”
“See all the looks in the photo gallery down below and tell us which ones were your favorite!”
“The musical extravaganza aired live from the Watsco Center at the University of Miami in Coral Gables, FL with hosting duties carried by Alejandra Espinoza, Danilo Carrera, Jesse & Joy, Chyno and Leslie Grace.”
“Appearances from stars throughout the night include: Jake T. Austin, África Zavala, Bárbara de Regil, Natalia Jiménez, Adrián Martín, and many more.”
“Performing for the first time in a Latin network in the U.S. is Iggy Azalea who will bring her new hits to the party.”
“Also joining the lineup is DNCE, Maluma, J Balvin, Bad Bunny, Gente de Zona, De La Ghetto, Wisin, Farruko, Jacob Forever, Ozuna, and Zion y Lennox.”
“The duo that was Chyno y Nacho will be going solo and Calibre 50 and Ulices Chaidez y sus Plebes will also be at the event.”
“Other confirmed performers include Enrique Iglesias, Yandel, Silvestre Dangond, Carlos Rivera, Arcángel and Sebastián Yatra.”


“GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision GettyImagesfournivision…”
The six "cambio agents" are Ivan CheA (26) and justino Mora (28) from Compton, California; Dante Alvarado Leon (22) from Berkeley, California; Sarah Espinosa Salamanca (27) from Palo Alto, California; and Boulder, Colorado Schuchtz, Carter Martinez (17), and narelli Cobo (16), from lausangrad, California
"Some of the stars who walked through the press line were maruma, IQI azalea, Clarissa Molina," Rosario di Geras "stars Barbara de Regel, wilmerwaldrama, Diana Guerrero and more."
"Look at all the expressions in the photo gallery below and tell us which ones you like best!"
The music event, hosted by Alejandra Espinoza, Danilo carrela, Jesse joy, Gino and Leslie grace, was broadcast live at the University of Miami's waters Science Center in coral gable, Florida
"The stars of the night include: Jack T. Austin, frica zawara, Barbara de Regel, Natalia jimenes, Adrian Martin and so on."
"In the United States, the first performance on the Latin language network is IQI Azaria, who will bring her new work to the party."
"Dnce, maluma, J balvin, bad bunny, gent de zona, de la ghetto, wisin, farruko, Jacob forever, ozuna and Zion y Lennox are also in the lineup."
"Zino and Nacho will play solo, calibre 50, ulix Chades and SUSE prebes will also take part in the competition."
"Other confirmed performers include Enrique Iglesias, jandel, Sylvester dangond, Carlos Rivera, angel and Sebastian Yatra."



Number  1031
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That's a little different than this sh-- going on right now," Bryan told her.”
“You sing karaoke?”
“I cannot compete with that sh--!"”
“"You know what, he works out a lot.”
“Bryan admitted that drinking too much beer gets in the way of his figure, unlike Sam Hunt, who opened the MetLife Stadium show.”
“After taking a sip from each one, he'd hand them out to fans in the crowd — a much-appreciated gesture.”
“While performing his 2007 single "All My Friends Say," he grabbed several beers from a cooler placed onstage.”
“Can I dance with you, Luke?"”
“Later in the set, the superstar would invite two girls up after noticing a sign that read, "It's my 8th birthday.”
“The New Jersey audience was dancing right along with him, including a young boy Bryan brought onstage who imitated the Backpack Kid dance.”


"It's a little different from what's happening now," Brian told her
"You sing karaoke?"
"I can't compete with that woman --!"
"You know, he exercises a lot."
"Brian admits that drinking too much beer will affect his figure. Unlike Sam hunt, he's the prologue to the MetLife stadium show."
"After everyone has a sip, he will give them out to the fans in the crowd - it's a gesture of great gratitude."
"When he sang the 2007 single," all my friends said, "he snatched a few beers from the fridge on stage."
"Can I dance with you, Luke?"
Later on the set, the superstar noticed a sign saying "today is my eighth birthday" and invited two girls
"The New Jersey audience danced with him, including a little boy, Bryan, on stage, who imitated the knapsack boy's dance."



Number  1032
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  1033
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Pregnant sisters Khloé Kardashian, 33, and Kylie Jenner, 20, skipped, continuing to keep low profiles.)”
“We will see.”Still, the Olympic icon and Kris, 62, both attended daughter Kendall’s 22nd birthday bash at Petit Taqueria restaurant in Los Angeles, along with Kim, 37, and sister Kourtney Kardashian, 38.”
““I don’t know what the future holds.”
“It really hurt,” Caitlyn continued.”
“It’s devastating when your kids do that.”
““They don’t want me in their lives, the bashed me pretty badly.”
“Kim, I haven’t talked to in a year.”Former stepdaughter Kim Kardashian West publicly supported Caitlyn’s journey but cut ties after reading her book, which alleged Kris Jenner — Caitlyn’s ex-wife and Kim’s mom — knew more about her gender identity crisis than she’s admitted.”
““To be honest, I don’t talk to them anymore.”
““It’s been a little bit tough over the last couple of years on the Kardashian side,” she told the crowd, according to the Cambridge News.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Pregnant sisters Carol Kardashian, 33, and Kelly Jenner, 20, were skipped and kept a low profile."
"We'll see." Despite this, the Olympic idol and Chris, 62, attended their daughter Kendall's 22nd birthday party at the little taquaia restaurant in Los Angeles, as did Kim, 37, and his sister Courtney Kardashian, 38
"I don't know what the future will be like."
"It really hurts," Caitlin continued
"When your kids do that, it's devastating."
"They didn't want me in their life, they beat me up."
"Kim, I haven't spoken to her in a year." Former stepdaughter Kim Kardashian West publicly supported Caitlin's journey, but broke up after reading Caitlin's book, which claims that Caitlin's ex-wife, Kim's mother, Chris Jenner, knows more about her gender identity crisis than she admits
"To be honest, I'll never talk to them again."
According to Cambridge news, she told the audience: "things have been a bit tough on Kardashian's side over the past few years."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  1034
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...week The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here...”
“...verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every...”
“...assassin Villanelle...”
“Netflix TV preview The 18 shows to look out for before the end of 2018 Killing Eve 15 September BBC iPlayer Starring Sandra Oh Jodie Comer Fiona Shaw Kim Bodnia Fleabag star Phoebe Waller Bridge s series follows a desk bound MI5 officer who begins to track down talented psychopathic...”
“Netflix TV preview: The 18 shows to look out for before the end of 2018 BoJack Horseman 14 September, Netflix Starring: Will Arnett, Paul F. Tompkins, Alison Brie The animated sitcom in which humans and animals live side-by-side returns for its fifth run.”
“...his dreams fall in love with him...”
“HBO TV preview The 18 shows to look out for before the end of 2018 You 10 September Netflix Starring Penn Badgley Shay Mitchell A dark 21st century love story about an obsessive yet brilliant twentysomething who uses the hyper connectivity of today s technology to make the woman of...”
“US porn industry in 1977”
“Netflix TV preview The 18 shows to look out for before the end of 2018 The Deuce 10 September Sky Atlantic Starring Maggie Gyllenhaal James Franco Dominique Fishback Picking up five years after the events of the first season this new run will focus on the Golden Years of the...”
“Netflix Starring Jonah Hill Emma Stone Justin Theroux Emma Stone Jonah Hill star as two people in a three day drug trial which promises no complications or side effects whatsoever Things do not go as planned...”


“…… This week, the independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to be contacted, please read our complete mailing list and agree to the terms.... "
“… Verifyerrors the independent would like to inform you of the offers and updates by e-mail. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list agreement terms here independent culture newsletters best movies music TV broadcasts are sent directly to your inboxes every... "
“… Villanell the assassin... "
Netflix TV previews 18 shows killing before the end of 2018. On September 15, BBC Apple starred Sandra oh jodiecoulter, Fiona shokim, Kim bodia frababg, star Phoebe Waller bridge s series, followed a MI5 officer bound by a table to start tracking genius psychopaths
"Netflix TV Preview: 18 programs worthy of attention before the end of bojack Horseman on September 14, 2018. Netflix stars will Arnett, Paul F. Tompkins and Alison Brie, the fifth return of the animated sitcom that people live side by side with animals."
“… His dream fell in love with him... "
"HBO TV station forecasts 18 programs to be focused on before September 10, 2018. Netflix, starring Penn Badgley Shay Mitchell, tells a dark love story of the 21st century. It tells the story of an infatuated but intelligent young man in his 20s who uses today's technology to make this woman happy
"American pornography in 1977"
"Netflix TV has previewed 18 noteworthy shows by the end of 2018. Sky Atlantic, starring Maggie Gyllenhal James Franco Dominique fishback, will launch this new series on September 10, five years after the first season event, focusing on It's a golden age. "
"Netflix starring Jonah hill, Emma stone, Justin seru, Emma stone, Jonah hill, the two men in the three-day drug trial, promised that there would be no complications or side effects, no matter whether things go as planned or not..."



Number  1035
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Heartbroken,” she wrote on Instagram.”
““Our thoughts and our prayers are going out to Carson and his family over the sudden passing of his mom, Pattie.”“We spoke to him, and he wanted to share this message with all of you,” said Matt Lauer before reading a statement from Daly.”
“The Voice and TODAY host’s mother, Pattie Daly Caruso, died Sunday at her home in Palm Desert, California.”
“A family spokesperson told The Desert Sun that Caruso suffered a heart attack in the early morning.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““There are no words for the loss of mom.”
“Thank u for the incredible outpouring of love.”
“It helps,” Daly, 44, tweeted on Monday.”
““Please hug the ones you love most tonight.”Daly’s TODAY colleagues announced the sad news Monday on-air, one day after The Voice won the 2017 Emmy for outstanding reality competition series.”
““We’re sorry to start this hour with some sad news,” Savannah Guthrie began.”


"Heartbreak," she wrote on instagram
"We express our thoughts and prayers to Carson and his family for the sudden death of his mother patty," Matt Raul said before reading a statement from Dali
The voice of today host's mother, Patty Dali Caruso, died Sunday at her home in the Palm Desert, California
"A family spokesman told the desert sun that Caruso had a heart attack early in the morning."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Without mom, there's nothing to say."
"Thank you for the incredible outpouring of love."
"It helps," Daley, 44, tweeted on Monday
"Please hug your favorite tonight." Daley's colleagues announced the sad news on the radio on Monday, a day after Daley's voice won the 2017 Emmy Award Series
Savannah Guthrie began: "we're sorry to hear some bad news at the beginning of the hour."



Number  1036
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rather, Bliss will retain to move forward into a storyline angle with the 'Rowdy’ superstar.”
“But there’s no way that she will be able to take the title away from Alexa Bliss even after Ronda Rousey is present by her side at the upcoming show.”
“This is why Nia Jax was the helping hand to Alexa Bliss’ championships reigns after coming to Monday Night Raw, last year.”
“Things started to change from this year’s Wrestlemania.”
“Alexa Bliss talked trash about Nia ending the bond.”
“This set up a championship match between the two at the grandest stage where Nia took the title away from her.”
“The rivalry continued as Alexa Bliss cashed in her Money in the Bank contract on the champion to steal the championship away.”
“Now all of these happened on a storyline perspective.”
“We did not have a clue that this might be happening based on a real-life heat, too.”
“Dave Meltzer of published the news first on F4WONline.com about an off-screen feud going on between the former two members of Team Rude.”


"On the contrary, bliss will continue to work with this" noisy "superstar in the story."
"But even if Ronda Lucy is around her in the upcoming show, she won't be able to take the championship from Aleksa bliss."
"That's why niaajax helped Alexa bliss win the championship last Monday night."
"From the beginning of this year's wrestling frenzy, things began to change."
"Aleksa bliss said NIA ended her marriage."
"It set up a championship between the two. At the biggest stage, NIA took the championship."
"The competition continues. Aleksa bliss cashes in on her bank contract and steals the champion."
"Now all this is happening from a storyline perspective."
"Based on the high temperature in real life, we didn't know it could happen."
Dave Melzer made his first news release on F4 WONline.com Website "about the discord between the first two team members outside the screen."



Number  1037
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is great with the baby when he is around.””
“Things with Travis are the same.”
“Jenner – who welcomed her first child with boyfriend Travis Scott 11 days ago – took a brief break from mommy duties to attend her friend Heather Sanders‘ baby shower on Sunday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Sanders and the 20 year old star describe each other as pregnant sisters so Jenner pulled herself away from her little one for only the second time since the baby arrived Jenner stepped out on Saturday with BFF Jordyn Woods for the first time since giving birth in black bicycle...”
“...shorts and a fanny pack...”
“Image zoom Kylie Jenner headed to Heather Sander’s baby showerOn Monday, the star shared her baby shower look, posting two pictures on her Instagram.”
“For the shower, Jenner remained relatively covered up, wearing a red Gosha Rubchinskiy X Adidas tracksuit with white sneakers.”
“Eagle-eyed fans spotted a ring on her left ring finger, though the star has been known to fake us out with different rings worn on that finger before.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Selfies!”


"When he's around, he gets on well with the kids."
"It's the same thing with Travis."
"Jenna had her first child 11 days ago with her boyfriend Travis Scott. She took a break from her duties as a mother and attended a baby shower with her friend Heather Sanders on Sunday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Sanders and the 20-year-old star described each other as pregnant sisters, so Jenna pulled herself away from her little daughter for the second time after her baby was born. Jenna came out for the first time after giving birth to her baby in a black bicycle with her boyfriend Jordan woods last Saturday..."
“… Shorts and purse... "
Kelly Jenner went to Heather Sander's baby shower on Monday. The star shared her baby shower look and posted two photos on instagram
"In the shower, Jenna was still a little more secretive, wearing a red Gosha rubchinsky x adidas sportswear and white sneakers."
"Sharp eyed fans found a ring on the ring finger of her left hand, but we all know that the different rings the star used to wear on her ring finger will let us pretend to be her."
"Related videos: selfie!"



Number  1038
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"Se Acabó El Amor" introduces the singers in a story of a fallen relationship through lively performances and intricate dance moves, giving the nearly four-minute music video a certain charm reminiscent of classic films such as Singin' in the Rain.”
“The Spanish singer's new track is met with a clip that features global stars Yandel and Lopez, who throws a bunch of clothes off a balcony in a dramatic, colorful and liberating display.”
“The love is over, and Jennifer Lopez, Yandel and Abraham Mateo get down to tell the tale in Mateo's "Se Acabó El Amor" video.”
“The visual for 'Se Acabó El Amor' delivers must-see scenes starring Lopez, Mateo and Yandel.”


"Se acab ó El Amor" introduces a singer in a love story through vivid performance and intricate dance movements, which makes this nearly four minute music video have some charm reminiscent of classic movies such as "singing in the rain"
"There is a clip of the Spanish singer's new song, starring world stars jandel and Lopez, who throw a pile of clothes down from the balcony, presenting a dramatic, colorful and free picture."
"The love is over, and Jennifer Lopez, jandel and Abraham Matteo begin to tell the story in Matteo's" acaboer's love "video."
The visual effect of "acaboer amore" is a must see shot starring Lopez, Matteo and youndel



Number  1039
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Most of us falsely assume we are going to come across on the screen looking like champions and don't see ourselves as "villains," so how could they make us look like that?”
“But in all reality, we are at least cognizant of the fact that we may not look great.”
“I can't help but think about [season-one couple] Jade and Tanner [Tolbert], the fast-approaching birth of their baby and how that beautiful family wouldn't exist without Paradise.”
“I am troubled thinking about the allegations happening on my favorite beach, and I'm sad that some couples will not have the opportunity to find love in a powerful and unique way.”
“While to some it's a silly TV show, for me, it was an experience that changed my life in unimaginable ways.”
“When the news about Paradise production broke the internet, it also broke my heart.”
“Personal redemption, lifelong friends and the woman of my dreams are just a few of the many takeaways I found living on set for weeks at the air-condition-less resort.”
“It's my jam.”
“Bachelor in Paradise is my show.”
“Below, Bass begs ABC not to cancel the series, describes the protocol for alcohol on set and explains the way he believes consent is and should be dealt with on and off the reality show.”


"Most of us mistakenly think that we're going to look like champions on the screen instead of 'villains', so how can they make us look like this?"
"But in all reality, we recognize at least one fact: we may not look good."
"I can't help thinking about (the first season couple) Jed and Tanner (Talbot), their children are about to be born, and without heaven, this beautiful family won't exist."
"I'm upset to think about the accusations that happened on my favorite beach, and I'm sad that some couples will not have a chance to find love in a strong and unique way."
"Although it's a stupid TV show for some people, it's an experience that has changed my life in an unimaginable way for me."
"When the news of the production of Paradise reached the Internet, my heart broke."
"Personal salvation, lifelong friends and the woman of my dreams are just a small part of the many takeaway I found on the set where I spent a few weeks in this air-conditioned resort."
"This is my jam."
"The Bachelor in heaven is my show."
Next, Buss pleaded with ABC not to cancel the series, describing the alcohol agreement on the spot and explaining how he thought consent would be handled on and off the reality show



Number  1040
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...in Somewhere Hovering Over Indiana...”
“Ryder Carbine Action Two Hundred Shot Range Model Air Rifle...”
“In case you missed it: Here’s a video recap from the event starring Maya Rudolph, Jane Krakowski, Ana Gasteyer, and more.”
“On December 17, the musical adaptation of the beloved Christmas movie A Christmas Story hit the small screen in the live television event A Christmas Story Live!”
“With music by Tony and Oscar winners Benj Pasek and Justin Paul (Dear Evan Hansen, La La Land), there was much anticipation leading up to Fox’s second live musical broadcast.”
“(The network first jumped into the scene with Grease: Live in 2016.)”
“Co directed by eight time Tony nominee Scott Ellis She Loves Me as the stage director and Alex Rudzinksi as the live television director the broadcast starred Saturday Night Live alum Maya Rudolph as Mrs Parker Chris Diamontopoulos Waitress as Mr Parker Tony winner Jane Krakowski as Miss Shields Ana...”
“Gasteyer as Mrs Schwartz and Andy Walken as Ralphie Parker...”
“Just as Grease Live kicked off with a pop star performance from Jessie J Bebe Rexha opened the broadcast with the new song Count on Christmas Tony winner Matthew Broderick served as the grown up version of Ralphie Parker narrating the story of the kid desperate for an Official Red...”
“In this clip Broderick narrates the opening scene and audiences meet Walken as young Ralphie singing the Act 1 opener It All Comes Down to Christmas Viewers got to know Ralphie s dad played by Diamontopolous a bit better in the next number The Genius On Cleveland Street as he...”


"Somewhere over Indiana"
"Ryder carbine operation 200 range model air rifle..."
"In case you miss it: Here's a video summary of the activities starring Maya Rudolph, Jane Krakowski and Anna Gastel."
"On December 17, a musical adapted from the popular Christmas movie a Christmas story was shown on the small screen of the live TV activity a Christmas story!"
"With the music of Tony and Oscar winners Benjamin Pasek and Justin Paul (dear Evan Hansen, Los Angeles land), there's a lot to look forward to Fox's second live music broadcast."
(the first time that the network jumps into the scene with grease: live broadcast in 2016)
"Co directed by eight time Tony nominated Scott Ellis, she loves me as stage director and Alex rudzinksi as live TV director, the show is hosted by alumni Maya Rudolph and Parker Chris diamontopoulos who live on Saturday night Diamontopoulos as a waitress, Mr. Parker Tony winner
"Gastel as Mrs. Schwartz, Andy Walken as Ralph Parker..."
"Just as grease live kicks off with a pop star performance by Jessie J Bebe Rexha, Tony Award winner Matthew Broderick tells the story of a child's desire for official red wine with adult version of Ralphie Parker as the protagonist..."
"In this video, Broderick tells the opening scene. The audience sees Walken and young Ralph sings the opening speech of the first act. It all comes down to the fact that the audience knows more about Ralph's father at Christmas, played by Damon tropoulos. The next number is the genius on Cleveland street, because he..."



Number  1041
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Santa Clause 7 10 p m The Santa Clause 3 The Escape Clause 9 15 p m Dr Seuss How the Grinch Stole Christmas 2000 11 55 p m No Sleep Til Christmas Saturday Dec 22 7 00 a m A Miracle on Christmas Lake 9 40 a m...”
“McStuffins Christmas Special 10 30 a m Winnie the Pooh and Christmas Too 11 00 a m Mickey s Christmas Carol 11 30 a m Santa Claus Is Comin To Town 12 30 p m Love the Coopers 3 00 p m Ice Age Continental Drift 5 05 p m...”
“2009 4 25 p m Santa Claus Is Comin To Town 5 30 p m Disney Pixar s Toy Story 3 8 00 p m Disney s Fairy Tale Weddings Holiday Magic 2018 Freeform Original Premiere 9 00 p m The Santa Clause 11 00 p m The Santa Clause...”
“8 7 00 a m The Little Drummer Boy 1968 7 30 a m Winnie the Pooh and Christmas Too 8 00 a m A Belle for Christmas 10 10 a m Unaccompanied Minors 12 15 p m Deck the Halls 2 20 p m Disney s A Christmas Carol...”
“15 p m Disney Pixar s Toy Story 5 15 p m Disney Pixar s Toy Story 2 7 20 p m Disney Pixar s Toy Story 3 9 50 p m Disney s A Christmas Carol 2009 11 55 p m A Belle for Christmas Freeform Premiere Saturday Dec...”
“...p m Disney Pixar s Toy Story 8 55 p m Disney Pixar s Toy Story 2 12 00 a m Call Me Claus Friday Dec 7 7 30 a m Jingle All the Way 2 11 00 a m Call Me Claus 1 10 p m Unaccompanied Minors 3”
“7 30 a m Santa Paws 2 The Santa Pups 12 00 p m Richie Rich s Christmas Wish 2 05 p m Santa Claus Is Comin To Town 3 10 p m Tim Burton s The Nightmare Before Christmas 4 50 p m Christmas with the Kranks 6 55”
“...p m Tim Burton s The Nightmare Before Christmas 6 50 p m The Santa Clause 3 The Escape Clause 8 55 p m Christmas with the Kranks 12 00 a m I ll Be Home for Christmas 1998 Thursday Dec 6 7 00 a m Mickey s Christmas Carol...”
“Christmas 1998 9 00 a m Mickey s Christmas Carol 11 00 a m Disney s Fairy Tale Weddings Holiday Magic 2017 12 00 p m Home Alone 3 2 00 p m Richie Rich s Christmas Wish 4 05 p m Santa Claus Is Comin To Town 5 10”
“...p m The Family Stone 4 10 p m This Christmas Freeform Premiere 6 50 p m The Santa Clause 8 55 p m The Santa Clause 3 The Escape Clause 12 00 a m Home Alone 3 Wednesday Dec 5 7 00 a m I ll Be Home for...”


"Santa Claus clause 7 10:00 p.m. Santa Claus Clause 3 prison break clause 9 15:00 p.m. Dr. suss Christmas 2000 how Greench stole it 11:55 p.m. don't sleep before christmas december 22 Saturday 7:00 a.m. miracle on Christmas Lake 9:40 a.m..."
"Maxitins Christmas Special 10:30 a.m. Winnie the Pooh and 11:00 a.m. Mickey's Christmas carols 11:30 a.m. Santa Claus comes 12:30 p.m. the love Cooper 3:00 p.m. ice age continental drift 5:05 p.m.."
"2009 4:25 PM Santa Claus comes 5:30 pm Disney Pixar Toy Story 3:8 PM Disney fairy tale wedding 2018 free form original premiere 9:00 PM Santa Claus clause 11:00 pm Santa Claus clause..."
"8:7 a.m. drummer boy 7:30 a.m. Winnie the Pooh and 8:10 a.m. unaccompanied minors 12:15 noon deck hall 2:20 p.m. Disney's Christmas Carol..."
"15:00 p.m. Disney Pixar Toy Story 5:00 p.m. Disney Pixar Toy Story 2:20 p.m. Disney Pixar Toy Story 3:50 p.m. Disney's Christmas Carol November 55, 2009 afternoon a beautiful woman's Christmas free form premiere Saturday December..."
“… P M Disney Pixar's toy story 8 55 p m Disney Pixar's Toy Story 2 1200 a m call me Klaus Friday December 7 30 a m all the way jingle 2 1100 a m call me Klaus 1 10 p m unaccompanied minors 3 "
"7:30 a.m. Christmas claw 2 Christmas Dog 12:00 p.m. Richie rich's Christmas wish 2:05 p.m. Santa Claus comes 3:10 p.m. Tim Burton's pre Christmas nightmare 4:50 p.m. Christmas and Kranks 6:55 p.m."
“… P M Tim Burton's pre Christmas nightmare 6 50 p m Santa Claus Clause 3 prison break Clause 8 55 p m Christmas and clanks 12 00 am I'm going home for Christmas Thursday 6 December 1998 7 00 am Mickey's Christmas Carol... "
"Christmas 1998 9:00 a.m. Mickey's Christmas Carol 11:00 a.m. Disney's fairy tale wedding holiday magic 2017 12:00 noon go home alone 3:00 p.m. Richie Richie's Christmas wish 4:05 p.m. Santa Claus comes 5:10"
“… P m the family stone 4 10 p m this Christmas freeform premiere 6 50 p m the Santa Clause 8 55 p m the Santa Clause 3 The Escape Clause 12 00 a m home solo 3 Wednesday 5 December 7 00 a m ill be home for... "



Number  1042
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Noelle Devoe Entertainment Editor When I'm not holed up in my room going on a completely unproductive Netflix binge or Tumblr stalking Timothée Chalomet, I'm searching for awesome celeb news stories that Seventeen readers will love!”
“Samantha has appeared on MTV’s Teen Wolf and Freeform’s The Fosters among others.”
“Getty ImagesNina is a respected track star with a secret that's bound to cause trouble in season two.”
“She's also appeared in CBS All Access’s The Good Fight.”
“Kelli is a Broadway star who won a Tony for The King and I in 2015.”
“Courtesy of Advantage PRJackie is a warm, intelligent, passionate advocate for victims of bullying.”
“This is Cass’s first major role.”
“Mackenzie's brother, Cyrus is an edgy, cynical mischief-maker who champions the downtrodden.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Noelle Devoe entertainment editor when I'm not hiding in my room for a fruitless Netflix carnival or Tumblr following Timothy é e chalmet, I'm looking for wonderful celebrity news stories that 17 readers will love!"
"Samantha appeared in MTV's wolf and freeform's foster."
"Getty Images Nina is a respected track star with a secret that is sure to cause trouble in the second season."
"She also appeared on CBS's all visit good fight."
"Kelly is a Broadway star and won the Tony Award for me and the king in 2015."
"Courtesy" Jackie is a passionate, intelligent and enthusiastic advocate of bullying victims
"This is Cass' first major role."
"McKenzie's brother, Cyrus, is an impatient, cynical prankster who supports the oppressed."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information



Number  1043
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Parker and Broderick live in New York City, but have been known to escape to their second home in Ireland and another house they own in The Hamptons.”
“She gave birth to their first son, James Wilkie, in 2002, and they welcomed a set of twins, Marion Loretta Elwell and Tabitha Hodge, via a surrogate seven years later.”
“The couple married in a synagogue in Manhattan in 1997 after they were set up by one of Parker’s brothers.”
“Husband Matthew Broderick is the winner of two Tony Awards and is well-known for playing the lead character in the 1986 success “Ferris Bueller’s Day Off” and for voicing Simba in the Disney classic “The Lion King” (1994).”
“She is a four-time Golden Globe winner and two-time Emmy Award winner for her work on the show.”
“Parker is best known for her portrayal of Carrie Bradshaw on the HBO hit series “Sex and the City”.”
“Sarah Jessica Parker and Matthew Broderick Net Worth: Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress and the wife of actor Matthew Broderick.”


Parker and Broderick live in New York City, but they are known to have fled to their second home in Ireland and another house in Hampton
"She gave birth to their first son, James Wilkie, in 2002, and seven years later they had twins through surrogate mothers, Marion Loretta Elwell and Tabitha Hodge."
"In 1997, a brother of Parker founded the couple and they got married in a synagogue in Manhattan."
Husband Matthew Brodrick, two Tony Award winners, is famous for his leading role in the 1986 success film "the holiday of Ferris Buller" and his voice dubbing for Simba in the Disney classic "the lion king" (1994)
"She's a four time Golden Globe winner and two time Emmy winner because of her performance on the show."
Parker is best known for her role as Kelly Bradshaw in the HBO hit sex and the city
"Sarah Jessica Parker and Matthew Broderick net worth: Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress and the wife of actor Matthew Broderick."



Number  1044
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kanye West, who was also at the celebration, shared a photo of the cake on Twitter, writing: “Happy birthday Trav.”Scroll down below to see more photos from the rapper’s birthday celebration.”
“Kim Kardashian, Kourtney Kardashian, Jordyn Woods and Jenner’s assistant Victoria Villarroel Gamero were all there for the celebration, as well the Grammy nominee’s friends.”
“The Life of Kylie star, 20, also gave an ode to Scott’s hometown of Houston, Texas, by turning Magic Mountain park in California into AstroWorld, which closed down in his city in 2005.”
“The group enjoyed a customized cake shaped like a roller coaster, which had tiny replicas of the pair with their 2-month-old daughter, Stormi Webster, on the ride.”
“The couple and their friends headed to the amusement park wearing matching customized hoodies with the “Goosebumps” rapper’s birthday printed on them.”
“The makeup mogul rented out Six Flags Magic Mountain on Saturday, April 28, just a few days before the rapper turns 26 on Monday, April 30.”
“Kylie Jenner went all-out for boyfriend Travis Scott’s birthday.”
“Birthday love!”


Kanye West, who also participated in the celebration, shared a picture of the cake on Twitter and wrote, "happy birthday, trav." Scroll down to see more pictures of rappers' birthday celebrations
"Kim Kardashian, Courtney Kardashian, Jordan woods and Jenner's assistant Victoria villarol gamero, as well as friends of the Grammy nominees, attended the celebration."
"The life of 20-year-old Kelly Starr also celebrates Scott's hometown of Houston, Texas, who turned Magic Mountain Park in California into a celestial world closed in 2005."
"The group enjoyed a custom-made cake shaped like a roller coaster with their two month old daughter, stormi Webster, and their little replica."
The couple and their friends went to the amusement park wearing custom-made hoodies with rap singer's birthday printed on them
"The make-up tycoon rented six flag magic mountain on April 28 (Saturday), just days before the rap singer turned 26 on April 30 (Monday)," he said
"Kelly Jenner went all out for her boyfriend Travis Scott's birthday."
"Birthday love!"



Number  1045
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See the latest health and fitness features here.”
“– and we've done our best to stay healthy together.”
“...traditions she established while she was there...”
“The former First Lady has revealed that she still hosts regular "boot camp weekends" with her friends like she used to, and took to Instagram to share some photos from their most recent meetup.”
“GALLERY See inside Michelle and Barack Obama s new home Posting a series of snaps of herself and a group of women exercising in the park Michelle wrote When I was at the White House I often hosted boot camp...”
“...weekends for my close girlfriends...”
“It didn't matter that we were all at varying fitness levels.”
“Our boot camp weekends were a reminder that if we want to keep taking care of others, we need to take care of ourselves first.”
“And even though I'm no longer at the White House, I've continued this tradition and wanted to share some photos."”
“Michelle Obama hosted a boot camp weekend for her friendsThe mother-of-two continued: "My girlfriends have been there for me through all kinds of life transitions over the years – including a pretty big one recently!”


"Check out the latest health and fitness features here."
"We've done our best to stay healthy."
“… The tradition she built there... "
The former first lady revealed that she still held regular boot camp weekends with her friends as in the past, and shared some photos of their recent meeting on instagram
"In the gallery of Michelle and Barack Obama's new home, you can see a series of photos of herself and a group of women exercising in the park. When Michelle was in the White House, she wrote, "I often hold boot camps..."
“… My close girlfriend's weekend
"It doesn't matter that we are all at different physical levels."
"Our training camp weekend reminds us that if we want to continue to take care of others, we have to take care of ourselves first."
"Even though I'm no longer in the White House, I've continued this tradition and want to share some photos with you."
Michelle Obama held a weekend boot camp for her friends. The mother of two went on to say, "over the years, my girlfriends have gone through all kinds of life changes for me - including the most recent, quite a big one!"



Number  1046
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’ve been working so hard for so long, I’m looking forward to making plans to settle down and just enjoy doing nothing once in a while.””
““I’m most looking forward to spending more time together,” says Scott.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The HGTV realtor tied the knot with his twin brother, Jonathan, at his sideDrew Scott is officially a married man!”
“The Property Brothers star married Scott Brothers Global creative director Linda Phan in a whimsical outdoor ceremony on Saturday in Italy.”
“The couple said their vows in front of 300 guests, including family and friends who flew in from the United States, Canada, Latin America and Scotland.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We are still floating on clouds… today couldn’t have been more magical,” the couple exclusively tells PEOPLE.”
““Surrounded by so many loved ones in such a beautiful place was unreal.”
“We are very, very lucky.”


"We've been working so hard for a long time, and I'm looking forward to a plan to settle down and just enjoy doing nothing once in a while."
"I'm looking forward to more time together," Scott said
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
The HGTV real estate agent is married to his twin brother Jonathan, and Scott is officially married! "
"On Saturday, the real estate star married Linda pan, Scott brothers' global creative director, in a fantastic outdoor wedding in Italy
The couple took the oath in front of 300 guests, including family and friends from the United States, Canada, Latin America and Scotland
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We're still floating in the clouds It's amazing today, "the couple told people exclusively
"It's not true to be surrounded by so many relatives in such a beautiful place."
"We are very, very lucky."



Number  1047
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“—DR”
“And on top of all that, Ali and Robert made a pretty cute couple, even if it wasn’t forever.”
“The images of Justin trying to flee the show while in a foot cast and Kasey being stranded on a glacier are some of the best of the series to date.”
“Thankfully for us she did, because her season offered up Justin “Rated R” Rego and Kasey Kahl.”
“She quit The Bachelor instead of her job… but then she wound up quitting anyway and becoming the Bachelorette.”
“The sixth Bachelorette almost never had her own season of the reality franchise: On Jake Pavelka’s season 14 (aka The Bachelor: On the Wings of Love), Ali made history by putting her career ahead of a man — gasp!”


"- doctor"
"In addition, Ali and Robert have a very lovely couple, if not forever."
"Justin is trying to escape the show's footage while in foot plaster and Casey is trapped on the glacier in some of the best series so far."
"Thankfully, she did because her season provided Justin with a" rating of R "for Rego and Kathy Carr
"She quit her bachelor job But then she quit and became a bachelor
"The sixth bachelor has almost never had her own reality series season: in Jack Pavelka's 14th season (aka bachelor: on the wings of love), Ali made history and put her career ahead of a man - gasp!"



Number  1048
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“— Khloé (@khloekardashian) January 26, 2018I feel like I've always had cellulite but it's way more prominent at the moment ‍♀️ — Khloé (@khloekardashian) January 26, 2018But on a positive note, Kardashian admitted that she does not have stretch marks, nothing she is "happy about that."”
“The 33-year-old Revenge Body star, who is expecting her first child with boyfriend Tristan Thompson, may be working out and staying healthy during her pregnancy, but she's definitely noticed the changes that come with having a baby.”
“"Body, I miss you ?," she wrote on Instagram on Thursday alongside a pic of herself in a Good American bodysuit and metallic silver thigh-high boots.”
“She also took to Twitter to talk about how her body is changing, namely the cellulite that's appeared on her legs.”
“"I now have cellulite on my legs!”
“Cute!”
“'Pregnancy may make cellulite look worse for a while, because the weight that you gain in pregnancy could make it more noticeable,'" she wrote.”
“"I feel like I've always had cellulite but it's way more prominent at the moment ?”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"- khlo é (@ KhloeKardashian) January 26, 2018 I think I always have cellulite, but now it's more prominent" ♀️  -Khlo é (@ KhloeKardashian) January 26, 2018, but on the positive side, Kardashian admits that she has no stretch marks, and she is not "happy" about it
"The 33 year old Avenger star, who is about to have her first child with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson, may exercise and stay healthy during her pregnancy, but she must have noticed the changes brought about by having a baby."
"Body, I miss you? "She wrote on instagram on Thursday, along with a picture of herself in an American tights and metallic silver boots."
"She also talked on twitter about the changes in her body, the fat mass in her legs."
"I have cellulite on my legs now!"
"Lovely
"Pregnancy may make the cellulite worse over time because the weight gain during pregnancy makes it more pronounced," she wrote
"I think I've always had cellulite, but now it's more prominent?"



Number  1049
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We can be one thing one day and someone else the next.” Balmain, Saint Laurent, Alexandre Vauthier, and Marc Jacobs are on her style agenda for the season.”
“She’s really versatile and that’s a total reflection of the modern woman.”
“Everything both '80s and '90s is stylish again, and almost every beloved film or series from the past four decades has been rebooted and reworked for modern day.”
“So, it wasn’t a complete surprise that the CW wanted to take on one of the shadiest, most stylish dramas of all time: none other than Dynasty.”
“Since Gossip Girl ended almost five years ago, we haven’t truly had another soap opera-level, style-focused show to indulge in, thus the series’ revamp couldn’t have come at a better time.”
“And it’s absolutely kismet that the 2017 Dynasty has the Upper East Side-centric show’s creators, Josh Schwartz and Stephanie Savage at its design helm, as well as costume designer Eric Daman’s right hand, Meredith Markworth-Pollack working on the wardrobe.”
“Christopher Fragapane/The CW Network/Everett CollectionDynasty is indeed a series about the upper crust of the one percent, but the revamp has come a long way from some of the sexist and homophobic undertones present in the '80s run.”
“The 2017 version boasts a diverse, inclusive, and gorgeous cast, including Steven Carrington, who is openly gay and environmentally conscious; Cristal and Sammy Jo, both Venezuelan and proud of their heritage; and the Colbys, who are now played by black actors.”
“And though there is a catfight — bringing back one of the most infamous moments from the original show — this time, the squabble is happening because both Fallon Carrington and Cristal are vying for a leadership position at Carrington Atlantic.”
“The show is steeped in female empowerment and gives us a taste of how powerful women are dressing in the office in 2017.”


Balman, Saint Laurent, Alexander watser and mark Jacobs are all her fashion themes this season
"She's really versatile, which is a complete reflection of modern women."
"In the 1980s and 1990s, everything has become fashionable again. In the past 40 years, almost every favorite film or drama has been restarted and rebuilt for the modern era."
"So it's not entirely surprising that CW wants to stage one of the darkest and most fashionable dramas ever: it's Dynasty."
"Since gossip girl ended almost five years ago, we don't have a real soap opera level, style oriented program to indulge in, so the revision of this series is just in time."
"In 2017, Josh Schwartz and Stephanie savage, the creators of the Upper East Center show, are at the helm of the design, and Meredith markworth Pollack, the right hand of Eric Daman, the fashion designer, is in charge of the wardrobe design, which is definitely a masterpiece of kismith."
"Christopher fragapane / CW network / Everett collectiondynam is really a series about 1% of the upper class, but this revision is far away from some of the undertones of sexism and homophobia that appeared in the 1980s."
"The 2017 version is proud of its diverse, inclusive and gorgeous cast, including Steven Carrington, who is openly gay and environmentally conscious; Kristal and Sammy Joe, both Venezuelans, are proud of their traditions; and the Colby family, now played by black actors."
"Although there was a fight - reminiscent of one of the most infamous moments of the original show - this time, it's happening because both Fallon Carrington and Christo are fighting for leadership at Carrington Atlantic."
"The show is imbued with women's empowerment and gives us a glimpse of how women dress in the office in 2017."



Number  1050
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Weeks ago, the MTV personality posted a 33-week bump photo.”
“Image zoom Credit: Chelsea Houska/InstagramThroughout her third pregnancy, Houska has been sharing progress shots of her growing baby bump.”
“,” she wrote in the caption.”
“We could not be more excited!”
“A sweet baby girl will be joining the DeBoer clan in a few short months!”
“Houska posted a sweet photo of her ultrasound framed with a black and white checkered bow with the words, “It’s a Girl.”“….GUESS WHAT!”
“RELATED VIDEO: Teen Mom’s Chelsea Houska Is Pregnant with Baby Number 3 and She’s Having a Girl!”
“Houska also has 8-year-old daughter Aubree Lind DeBoer from a previous relationship with ex-boyfriend Adam Lind.”
“The couple welcomed their son, Watson Cole, in January 2017.”
“In mid-March, the MTV personality and her husband Cole DeBoer announced that they were expecting their second child together, a baby girl.”


"A few weeks ago, the MTV celebrity released a 33 week photo of a crash."
"Image zooming credit: during her third pregnancy, houska shared photos of her growing lump."
She wrote in the title
"We can't be more excited!"
"A lovely baby girl will join the Debo family in just a few months!"
"Houska posted a sweet ultrasound photo with a black-and-white check bow on the border, which said" it's a girl. "..." Guess what
"Related video: young mother's Chelsy hosca is pregnant with baby number 3, she has a girl!"
"Hosca also has an 8-year-old daughter, Aubrey Linde de Boer, who had a relationship with her ex boyfriend, Adam Linde."
"The couple welcomed their son, Watson Cole, in January 2017."
"In mid March, MTV celebrity and her husband, Cole DEB, announced that they were pregnant with their second child, a baby girl."



Number  1051
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It also sparked rumors he's banging Bella Hadid.”
“As we reported ... the rapper's new album has already made a big splash -- both because it features a song with Michael Jackson, and it admits Drake has a son.”
“Play video content TMZ.comWe're told Drake's DJ hopped up in the booth to play both the A and B sides from "Scorpion," along with some past Drake tunes ... like "Yes Indeed" with Lil Baby.”
“Drizzy and a crew of about 50 people from OVO hit up E11EVEN in Miami Friday night -- along with Party Next Door and Murda Beatz -- and enjoyed the tracks from his new album from their VIP section.”
“Pretty fitting.”
“Exclusive DetailsDrake looked happy as hell celebrating the release of 'Scorpion' at the club -- partying, rapping and singing along to his songs ... all while cash rained down from the sky.”


"It also sparked rumors that he had sex with Bella Hadid."
"As we reported... The rapper's new album has caused a big stir - both because there is a Michael Jackson song in the album and because Drake has a son
"Play video content" TMZ.comWe We were told that Drake's DJ jumped up on the stand to play both a and B from "scorpion," as well as some past Drake tunes... Like "yes" and "baby"
"Tracy and the staff of about 50 people from owo visited e11even in Miami on Friday night - as well as the party next door and Murda Bitz - and enjoyed the tracks from his new album in the VIP area."
"It's a good fit."
When the club celebrated the release of scorpion, the exclusive detail shooting looked very happy - party, rap, singing... Cash came from the sky. "



Number  1052
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Nikki Bella and John Cena are working on their relationship and taking it day by day," the rep said.”
“Last month, a rep for Nikki revealed to ET that the WWE stars are "working on their relationship."”
“The reality star tells her former flame, "I feel like there's so much more I want to do with you and experience with you.”
“You said him," John points out.”
“"It's going to be a him?”
“"To constantly wake up and just look at this beautiful thing that I made and to teach him new things," she says dreamily.”
“Nikki assures John that she "just want[s] to be a mom."”
“There's no way that I can interpret your actions over the last three months as anything different."”
“Because it kind of feels like both.”
“...ve fallen out of love with me...”


"Nicky Bella and John Senna are trying to improve their relationship and keep it going day by day," the representative said
Last month, a representative of Nikki revealed to et that WWE stars were "dealing with their relationship."
"I think there's a lot more I want to do with you and a lot more I want to experience with you," the reality star told her ex lover
"You're talking about him," John pointed out
"Could it be him?"
"Constantly waking up, looking at the beautiful things I made, teaching him new things," she said dreamily
Nicky assured John that she "just wanted to be a mom."
"I can't explain your behavior in the past three months as anything different."
"Because it feels like both."
“… I don't love me anymore... "



Number  1053
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[31]Keeping Up With the Kardashians debuted in 2007, and the drama of the couple's relationship became a popular subplot.”
“Kardashian family friend and Girls Gone Wild creator Joe Francis has said he introduced them at a party at his home.”
“According to one source, the family lost its fortune.”
“[9]ParentsThere are conflicting stories about Disick's parents and their wealth.”
“[8] As a teen, Disick modeled and appeared on the cover of young adult books.”
“His nickname at the time was STD.”
“There were plenty of rumors about Disick in high school, and he was supposedly a hard partier.”
“[Source: Kristen Hyland, Director of Public Relations].”
“[7] He did not, however, graduate from Ross.”
“[6]Disick attended The Ross School, a private school in East Hampton.”


"[31] following the kardashians' debut in 2007, the couple's relationship became a hot subtitle."
"Joe Francis, a friend of the Kardashian family and creator of crazy girls, said he introduced them at a party at home."
"According to one source, the family has lost wealth."
"There are many contradictory stories about Disick's parents and their wealth."
[8] When he was a teenager, he was a model and appeared on the cover of teenagers' books
"His nickname at the time was venereal."
"There are a lot of rumors about Disick in high school. It is said that he is a stubborn party."
"[source: Christine Herland, director of public relations]."
However, he did not graduate from Ross University
Desik attended rose school, a private school in East Hampton



Number  1054
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Barrymore is still producing and acting; her latest project, the Netflix series “Santa Clarita Diet,” premiered in February.”
“Tracee Ellis Ross also launched a lifestyle collection for J.C. Penney and Eva Longoria has her own namesake label.”
“...witness Reese Witherspoon s Draper James and Gwyneth Paltrow s Goop...”
“Under new chief executive officer Christine Beauchamp who took the reins in June Amazon s U S apparel gross merchandise volume could reach as much as 62 billion according to a report by Cowan and Co Fortysomething actresses have also carved out a niche for themselves in the lifestyle market...”
“Amazon is continuing its push in the fashion world, where it already dominates with basics.”
“It started also selling on flower beauty.com this year.”
“Barrymore has proven herself to be an apt entrepreneur; her company Flower Beauty, founded in 2013, is sold exclusively in 4,000 Wal-Mart doors in the U.S. and 300 in Mexico.”
“Amazon Fashion Europe this summer launched a collection with Nicopanda, Nicola Formichetti’s unisex streetwear label.”
“Moon Mae Paris Sunday Amazon Essentials Buttoned Down Good Threads and Scout Ro but Dear Drew is the first celebrity driven fashion brand launching on the e tailer...”
“We re delighted to be teaming up with Drew Barrymore to debut her new brand on Amazon Fashion said Amazon Fashion director Kate Dimmock who praised Barrymore s impressive career and creative energy as well as her free spirited style Amazon Fashion has private label basics brands Lark Ro Ella...”


"Barrymore is still making and performing; her latest project, Netflix's" Santa Clarita diet, "premiered in February."
"Tracy Ellis Ross has also launched a lifestyle line for J.C. Penney, and Eva Longoria has her own brand of the same name."
“… The witnessing of rip James of Reese Witherspoon and Gwyneth Paltrow's fool... "
"According to a report by Cowen and fortysomething, under the leadership of Christine Beauchamp, the new CEO who took office in June, Amazon's total clothing sales in the United States may be as high as $62 billion, and actresses have opened up a niche market for themselves in the lifestyle market..."
"Amazon continues to play a big role in the fashion industry. It has already occupied a dominant position in the fashion industry."
"It also began to sell flowers this year."
"Barrymore has proved to be a good entrepreneur; her company, flower beauty, was founded in 2013 and sold exclusively in 4000 Wal Mart stores in the United States and 300 Wal Mart stores in Mexico."
This summer, Amazon European fashion launched a line with Nicola Formichetti's Unisex Street clothing brand nicopanda
"Moon Mae Paris Sunday Amazon essentials buckled good lines and boy scout RO, but dead drew was the first celebrity driven fashion brand launched on e-tailer..."
"We are very happy to work with Drew Barrymore to launch her new brand on Amazon fashion for the first time," said Kate dimcock, Amazon's fashion director, who praised Barrymore's impressive career and creativity, as well as her unrestrained style. Amazon fashion owns its own brand, basic brands lark ro Ella……”



Number  1055
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The former child star told PEOPLE at the RHOBH Season 8 premiere party on Dec. 15 that her family was still in the process of moving in and renovating the house.”
“A representative for Richards did not immediately return PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“The Los Angeles Police Department told PEOPLE they have no information at this time.”
“Surveillance camera footage is being investigated to help nab culprits.”
“The property was reportedly broken into via a window, and the home security system was not armed, though a closet sensor triggered by the burglars clocked the incident around 1:15 a.m. local time.”
“Image zoom Credit: Mauricio Umansky/InstagramThe break-in was discovered by a housekeeper, TMZ reported.”
“Over $1 million dollars in jewelry, including $150,000 worth of watches owned by Umansky, was stolen from the property, according to TMZ, which first reported the news.”
“PEOPLE confirmed...”
“Image zoom Credit Mauricio Umansky Instagram Image zoom Credit Mauricio Umansky Instagram The couple s daughter Sophia also shared a photo of herself hugging her parents with the caption all that matters The couple s home was burglarized while the two were on vacation in Aspen Colorado with their children...”
“They can steal your belongings but they can’t steal your memories or your love.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"The former child star told people at the RHOBH Season 8 premiere party on December 15 that her family is still moving in and decorating the house."
"A representative of Richards did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
"The LAPD tells people they don't have any information at the moment."
"Surveillance video is being investigated to help capture criminals."
"It's reported that the property was broken in through a window and the security system of the house is unarmed, but the burglar triggered closet sensor recorded the incident around 1:15 a.m. local time."
"Image zooming source: Mauricio umansky / instagram according to TMZ, the intruder was found by a housekeeper."
According to TMZ, which first reported the news, more than $1 million worth of jewelry was stolen from the property, including a $150000 watch owned by umansky
"People confirm that..."
"Image zoo credit Mauricio umansky instagram image zoo credit Mauricio umansky instagram's daughter Sofia also shared a picture of her hugging her parents, which said," everything is important. "The couple's home was stolen while they were on holiday with their children in Aspen, Colorado..."
"They can steal your things, but they can't steal your memory or your love." Get news, feature, etc



Number  1056
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See the full list here.”
“On Wednesday, Netflix announced all the titles coming to and leaving the online distributor in September with plenty of ’90s nostalgia including Dead Poets Society and Pulp Fiction as well as an assortment of Disney flicks such as Mulan and Hercules and a slew of Netflix originals.”
“The movie, which stars Emma Watson and Dan Stevens in the titular roles, was released in theaters in March and grossed over $1.2 billion worldwide, thereby becoming the highest-grossing live-action musical movie in history as well as the highest grossing film of 2017.”
“The live-action adaptation of the Walt Disney Pictures animated classic Beauty and the Beast arrives at the streaming service on Sept. 19.”
“Beauty and the Beast (2017) type MovieThe tale as old as time is coming to Netflix.”


"Please see the complete list here."
"On Wednesday, Netflix announced all the works that entered and left online publishers in September, including" dead poets society "and" vulgar novels ", as well as Disney films such as Mulan and Hercules, and a large number of original Netflix works."
"The movie, starring Emma Watson and Dan Stevens, opened in March this year and grossed more than $1.2 billion worldwide, making it the highest grossing live music movie in history and the highest grossing movie in 2017."
"On September 19, the classic cartoon" beauty and beast ", adapted from Walt Disney Pictures, was officially launched on the streaming media service."
"The beauty and the beast (2017) movie" time flies "is coming to Netflix."



Number  1057
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...exes especially if there s a kid involved...”
“We really were rooting for Khloe and she s really doing the best that she can it s a really sad situation all over Kim added before telling Ellen she has vowed not to bad mouth any of her siblings...”
“Speaking to host Ellen, Kim took a deep breath before speaking about the situation, telling her: “I just don’t know how to describe it, besides it’s just so f–ked up!”
“...the decision to publicly unfollow him on Instagram with him then returning the favour...”
“Try refreshing your browser or Kim Kardashian Tristan Thompson unfollow each other on social media Back to video Just hours after Kim addressed Tristan s behaviour during an interview on The Ellen DeGeneres Show which aired on Monday she made...”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
“...when Khloe was three months pregnant also surfaced...”
“The disgraced basketball player was caught on camera kissing an unidentified woman in a nightclub just days before his girlfriend gave birth to their daughter True last month while video of another woman joining him at his home last year...”
“Article contentKim Kardashian and Tristan Thompson have unfollowed each other on social media, amid claims the sportsman cheated on the reality star’s sister Khloe.”


“… Ex boyfriends, especially if they have kids... "
"We really support Khloe, she really did her best, it's a very sad situation," Kim added, and then told Ellen that she vowed not to speak ill of any of her brothers and sisters... "
Before talking to the host, Alan, Kim took a deep breath and told her, "I just don't know how to describe it, and it's terrible!"
“… I decided to follow him publicly on instagram, and then pay him back... "
"Try refreshing your browser, or Kim Kardashian Tristan Thompson put the other person back on social media, just a few hours after Kim talked about Tristan's behavior in an interview with Ellen DeGeneres Show on Monday..."
“… Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"Sorry, this video can't be loaded."
“… When Khloe was three months pregnant, she also came to the surface... "
"Just a few days before his girlfriend gave birth to her daughter last month, the notorious basketball player was caught on camera kissing an unidentified woman in a nightclub, while another woman met him at his home last year..."
Kim Kardashian and Tristan Thompson don't talk to each other on social media. The athlete is said to have cheated the reality TV star's sister, Chloe



Number  1058
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hear more on their split in the video below.”
“WATCH: Janet Jackson Shares First Photo of Baby EissaShe shared the first pic of her and Al Mana's son, Eissa, over Instagram on Friday, captioning it, "My baby and me after nap time."”
“Earlier this week, a source close to the Jackson family told ET that the 50-year-old singer is doing well despite the breakup.”
“"I love you so much, inshallah we will be together in the Great Forever x."”
“...the pop icon read...”
“WATCH Janet Jackson Doing Well After Wissam Al Mana Split She s So Happy With Her Baby To the most beautiful person in the world thank you for your divine love your eternal support and for being my best friend the post accompanied with a black and white photo of...”
“Less than a week after news broke that the two were separating after five years of marriage, the Qatari billionaire penned a message dedicated to his ex on his website.”
“Wissam Al Mana has love for Janet Jackson.”


"Please learn more about their breakup in the video below."
"Watch: Janet Jackson shared her first picture of baby isash, who shared her first picture with Al mana's son isasha on instagram on Friday, titled" my baby and after my nap. "
"Earlier this week, a source close to the Jackson family told et that despite the breakup, the 50 year old singer did well."
"I love you so much, we will always be together."
“… Pop up icon display... "
"Watching Janet Jackson perform well after the breakup of vissam al mana, she is very happy to be with her children and become the most beautiful person in the world. Thank you for your sacred love, your eternal support, you are my best friend, and a black and white photo is attached to the post..."
"Less than a week after the news of their separation after five years of marriage came out, the Qatari billionaire wrote a message on his website dedicated to his ex girlfriend."
"Vissam al mana loves Janet Jackson."



Number  1059
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No one stands up to powerful men.’”A second allegation of sexual harassment was made against Hoffman by producer Wendy Riss Gatsiounis who alleges that, as a playwright in 1991, a meeting with the actor and Tootsie screenwriter Murray Schisgal turned unprofessional following inappropriate remarks.”
““It is reflective of who you were.”
“The Last Week Tonight host and actor entered a heated debate during a Tribeca Institute 20th anniversary panel and screening of 1997 film Wag the Dog, during which Hoffman vehemently defended his behaviour and accused Oliver of “making a very quick judgement”.”
“Oliver has now opened up about the incident, revealing that he believed, “the first person that he talked to (publicly) was going to have to ask him questions about it.”
“Unfortunately, that was me.” He said that the discussion continued for so long because he thought Hoffman’s answers “were pretty bad”.”
““I wanted to try and get him to a point of self-reflection and to try and get something out of the conversation, but that didn’t happen,” he added.”
“During the panel Oliver first breached the subject by stating This is something we re going to have to talk about because it s hanging in the air The host was referencing allegations that he sexually harassed Anna Graham Hunter as a 17 year old production assistant on the set...”
“...of his 1985 TV film Death of a Salesman...”
“Audience members – including The Washington Post journalist Steve Zeitchik – were said to be “visibly shocked” by the interaction, in which Oliver expressed disappointment in Hoffman’s original apology in which he claimed the behaviour is not reflective of who he is.”
““It’s that part of the response to this stuff that pisses me off,” Oliver stated.”


"No one can fight a powerful man." Producer Wendy riss gatsiouns has filed a second sexual harassment charge against Hoffman, claiming that in 1991, as a playwright, a meeting with actor and Tootsie writer Murray schisgal became unprofessional after making inappropriate remarks
"It reflects who you are."
"Last week, tonight's hosts and actors took part in the Tribeca college 20th anniversary panel discussion and the screening of the 1997 film" wagging dog ". During the debate, Hoffman fiercely defended his behavior and accused Oliver of" making a very quick judgment. "
"Oliver has now made the incident public and revealed that he believes that" the first person he talks to (publicly) will have to ask him about it. "
"Unfortunately, that's me." He said the discussion lasted so long because he thought Hoffman's answer was "pretty bad."
"I tried to get him to reflect on himself and try to get something out of the conversation, but that didn't happen," he added
"During the group discussion, Oliver first violated the theme. He said that this is what we are going to talk about because the matter is pending. The host refers to the accusation that he sexually harassed 17-year-old production assistant Anna Graham hunt on the set..."
“… About his 1985 TV movie death of a salesman
Audiences, including Washington Post reporter Steve zeitschke, were "obviously shocked" by the interaction. Oliver expressed disappointment at Hoffman's initial apology, in which he claimed that Hoffman's behavior did not reflect who he was
"It was the reaction to this that made me angry," Oliver said



Number  1060
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Ivor Prickett/UNHCR”
“Their siblings, 9-year-old twins Vivienne and Knox, stayed in France with their big brothers, Maddox, 16, and Pax, 14.”
“...her family...”
“The actress was joined by daughters Zahara, 13, and Shiloh, 11, during a UNHCR trip to the Zataari refugee camp in Jordan on Sunday.”
“There, they met with Syrians who fled the violence of the ongoing civil war in the country, including girls around Jolie’s daughters’ ages who were part of the TIGER (These Inspiring Girls Enjoy Reading) project, which focuses on education and empowerment even in displacement.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The trip was Shiloh’s third visit to a refugee camp and the first for Zahara.”
“One girl told Jolie and her daughters We believe if the adults can make peace now we young women will build on that peace and help The project in partnership with International Relief and Development is designed to fight the epidemic of refugees dropping out of school with only 20”
“...percent completing a secondary school education...”
“TIGER works with Syrian female coaches to help the girls build confidence.”


"Image scaling credit: Ivor sprickett / UNHCR"
"Their brothers and sisters, 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox, stayed in France with their big brothers, 16-year-old Maddox and 14-year-old parks."
“… Her family... "
Zahara, 13, and Shilo, 11, joined the U.N. refugee agency in zatari refugee camp in Jordan on Sunday
"There, they met Syrians fleeing the violence of Syria's civil war, including girls around the age of Julie's daughter, who are part of the tiger (these inspiring girls like reading) project, which focuses on education and empowerment, even in cases of displacement."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"This is Shiloh's third visit to the refugee camp and Zahara's first."
"A girl told Julie and her daughters that we believe that if adults can achieve peace now, we young women will build on peace to help this international relief and development cooperation project, which aims to fight the epidemic of 20-year-old refugees dropping out of school."
“… Percentage of secondary education completed... "
"Tiger works with Syrian female coaches to help girls build confidence."



Number  1061
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...second time for the votes of the public separate from the previous round s votes...”
“Color key Artist received the highest number of votes on his her team and directly advanced to the Top 12 Artist was not chosen by the public and was left to perform again in Round 2 Round 2 edit For Tuesday and Wednesday nights the 20 remaining artists performed a...”
“...in the Battle rounds Stolen in the Battle rounds Eliminated in the Battle rounds Eliminated in the Battle rounds Withdrew Coaches Top 48 artists Adam Levine Rayshun LaMarr Jackie Verna Sharane Calister Mia Boostrom Drew Cole Reid Umstattd Gary Edwards Jackie Foster Jordyn Simone Miya Bass Tish Haynes Keys Angel...”
“Teams edit Color key Winner Winner Runner up Runner up Third place Third place Fourth place Fourth place Eliminated in Live Shows Eliminated in Live Shows Eliminated in the Live Playoffs Stolen in the Knockout rounds Stolen in the Knockout rounds Eliminated in The Knockouts Eliminated in The Knockouts Stolen...”
“[7]· Notes: At nineteen, Shawn Mendes became the youngest advisor on the American version of this show's history.”
“Adam Levine and Blake Shelton duet on "Fly Me to the Moon", Kelly Clarkson and Alicia Keys perform an amazing version of "Feeling Good".”
“[6]The coaches perform a medley set in vintage Las Vegas in the promo.”
“[5]This season's advisors for the Battle Rounds were Julia Michaels for Team Adam, Shawn Mendes for Team Alicia, Hailee Steinfeld for Team Kelly, and Trace Adkins for Team Blake.”
“Miley Cyrus and Jennifer Hudson were replaced by new coaches Kelly Clarkson, who was Team Blake's battle advisor in the second season and key advisor for the Knockout Rounds in thirteenth season, and Alicia Keys who returned to the panel, Carson Daly returned for his fourteenth season as host.”
“Adam Levine and Blake Shelton returned as coaches, making them the only members of the coaching panel to be part of all fourteen seasons.”


“… The second is a public vote, separate from the previous round
"The color key artist won the highest number of votes in his team and went straight to the top 12. The artist was not selected by the public and could only perform again in the second edition of the second round on Tuesday and Wednesday nights. The remaining 20 artists gave a performance... "
“… Being stolen in the battle wheel being eliminated in the battle wheel being eliminated in the battle wheel former 48 artists Adam Levin ray shunla Mar jekyweina saran karistmia bustrom druckered umm stadgary Edwards jekyforster Jordin Simon Mia bastish Haines key angel... "
"Team editor color key winner runner up runner up third third third fourth fourth eliminated in live performance eliminated in live playoffs eliminated in knockout stolen in knockout eliminated in knockout eliminated in knockout stolen in knockout..."
[7] Note: at the age of 19, Sean Mendes became the youngest consultant in the history of the American version of the show
Adam Levin and Blake Sheldon perform an amazing "feel good" version of Kelly Clarkson and Alicia case in the send me to the moon duet
"[6] in the promo, the coaches perform a medley against the backdrop of Las Vegas."
[5] This season's battle advisors are Julia Michaels of Adam, Sean Mendes of Alicia, Haley Stanfield of Kelly and tres Adkins of black
"Miley Cyrus and Jennifer Hudson have been replaced by new coach Kelly Clarkson, who is black's combat advisor in the second season and key advisor in the knockout in the 13th season. Alicia case has returned to the group and Carson Daley has returned to his 14th season as host."
"Adam Levin and Blake Sheldon have returned as coaches, making them the only coaching staff in 14 seasons."



Number  1062
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Viewers have been particularly invested in Kufrin's happily ever after ever since she was subjected to the on-camera breakup, and on Tuesday, she revealed that she does in fact find love at the end of her journey, which wrapped filming weeks ago.”
“Because of how things ended, I think our relationship is stronger and I wouldn't change it."”
“On Wednesday, the pair said neither of them has watched the finale to this day.”
“Think pieces and takedowns ran in the week that followed and as Kufrin accepted her new role as the next star of The Bachelorette, Luyendyk and Burnham largely disappeared from the spotlight, choosing to keep viewers updated on their relationship via their social media channels.”
“The choices made by Luyendyk and producers to ambush Kufrin, and by ABC to air the breakup footage, sent backlash Luyendyk's way and turned off some fans of the franchise.”
“At the end of the day, it's a TV show but this is the rest of our lives, and Lauren was the person I was supposed to be with."”
“"Going back to that time, it was a big risk to do what I did and I know that it wasn't a popular decision," Luyendyk explained, "but it was a decision I had to make for myself.”
“He then turned around and proposed a second time on live television to Burnham, who accepted.”
“After a two-month engagement, Luyendyk called off his relationship with Kufrin during a difficult-to-watch on-camera breakup that played out unedited and ran for nearly an hour.”
“After he proposed to an accepting Becca Kufrin on the pretaped March 5 episode, it was revealed on the post-finale After the Final Rose special that Luyendyk had changed his mind.”


"Since kufulin was filmed breaking up, the audience has been particularly devoted to her happy forever. On Tuesday, she revealed that in fact, she did find love in the journey that ended filming a few weeks ago."
"Because of the outcome, I think our relationship is stronger and I will not change it."
"On Wednesday, they said neither of them had seen the ending so far."
"In the following week, as kuflin accepted her new role and became the next star of bachelor, luyendyk and Burnham basically disappeared from the spotlight, and they chose to let the audience know their latest relationship through social media channels."
"Luyendyk and the producer chose to ambush kufrin and ABC broadcast the breakup scenes, which made luyendyk have a strong response and made some fans of franchise stores flinch."
"At the end of the day, it's a TV show, but it's the rest of our lives and Lauren is the one I should be with."
"Back then, it was a big risk to do what I did, and I knew it wasn't a popular decision," luyandick explained, "but it was a decision I had to make for myself."
"Then he turned around and asked him to marry him a second time on live TV, and he accepted."
"After two months of dating, luyandick canceled his relationship with kuflin and broke up in a hard to watch scene, which lasted nearly an hour without editing."
"After he proposed to Becca Coughlin in the trailer on March 5, luyandick revealed in the finale after the final episode of the rose special that he had changed his mind."



Number  1063
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Is There a Pre-Show?”
““iHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so to get to be part of this celebration is a huge honor,” the deejay previously told iHeartRadio.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will broadcast live from the Forum in Los Angeles on Sunday, March 11th at 8 p.m.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTVEverything You Need to Know About the 2018 iHeartRadio Music AwardsGet ready to pop off your couch and dance the night away right from your living room!”
“The iHeartRadio Music Awards celebrates the most popular artists and biggest hits over the past year as determined by listeners tuning into iHeartMedia radio stations nationwide and on iHeartRadio, iHeartMedia’s digital music platform.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTV.”
“Here’s everything you need to know.”


"Is there a preview?"
"IHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so it's a great honor to be able to participate in this celebration," the host told iHeartRadio earlier
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will be broadcast live on the forum in Los Angeles at 8pm on Sunday, March 11."
"About TBS, TNT and truTV, everything you need to know about the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards, please be ready to jump off the sofa and dance in the night away from the living room!"
"The iHeartRadio music award is to celebrate the most popular artists and songs of the past year, which is decided by the audience listening to iheartmedia National Radio and iHeartRadio, iheartmedia's digital music platform."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Et on TBS, TNT and truTV."
"That's all you need to know."



Number  1064
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This is all anathema to his mother.”
“He has also dismissed the monarch's birthday parade as a waste of money, and feels that inspecting the guard is an unnecessary chore.”
“Seven years after the Dimbleby book, Graham Turner published a semi-authorised biography of Philip.”
“...confined in a Swiss clinic for eight years with paranoid schizophrenia...”
“Geidt was made a Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath by Queen Elizabeth II at Buckingham Palace in 2014 Preoccupied by his own emotions he showed no sympathy for the Duke of Edinburgh s own childhood as an exile forced to move home constantly while his mother was...”
“Prince Charles demanded the Queen fired her courtier Christopher Geidt.”
“In Jonathan Dimbleby's 1994 biography, the Prince publicly blamed both his parents, though particularly Philip, for giving him an unhappy childhood and forcing him into an unsuitable marriage.”
“Since then, most of Charles's battles have been with his father, often conducted at one remove through favoured authors.”
“These include ordering him to wear corduroy trousers to a birthday party; even as a middle-aged man, he still felt the sting of the trivial humiliation of being the only boy in cords.”
“Similarly, Philip believes that his son will never forgive him for his apparent 'sins' when Charles was a boy.”


"It's an abomination to his mother."
"He also thinks that the monarch's birthday parade is a waste of money and that inspecting the guards is an unnecessary chore."
Seven years after the publication of Dumbledore, Graham Turner published a half authorized biography of Philip
“… Eight years in a Swiss clinic, paranoid schizophrenia... "
"In 2014, Queen Elizabeth II appointed gate as commander of the Knights of bath at Buckingham Palace, concentrating on his own feelings. He had no sympathy for the Duke of Edinburgh's own childhood, because he was an exile and was forced to move back home, while his mother..."
"Prince Charles asked the queen to fire her courtier, Christopher gate."
In Jonathan timberby's 1994 biography, the prince publicly accused his parents, especially Philip, of giving him an unhappy childhood and forcing him into an inappropriate marriage
Since then, most of Charles's fighting has been with his father, often through beloved writers
"It includes ordering him to wear corduroy trousers to a birthday party; even for middle-aged people, he still feels the sting of the insignificant humiliation of being the only boy wearing corduroy."
"Similarly, Philip believes that his son will never forgive him for his apparent" sin "when Charles was a child."



Number  1065
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...rock album The War On Drugs A Deeper Understanding Best R B album Bruno Mars 24K Magic Best rap album Kendrick Lamar Damn...”
“Newcomer Alessia Cara won best new artist, considered the least important category of the main five.”
“His album 24K Magic picked up record of the year for the title track, song of the year for That's What I Like and best R&B album.”
“But Mars' victory was rap's defeat.”
“Jay-Z was the leading nominee with eight nods but left empty handed, one year after his wife Beyonce missed out on album of the year to Adele.”
“Kendrick Lamar, widely expected to pick up the evening's main prize for his fourth album DAMN, was limited to rap-only categories.”
“AdvertisementHe picked up five awards, including best rap album and best rap performance.”
“Hillary Clinton s Fire And Fury skit at Grammys Image Jay Z with his wife Beyonce and daughter Blue Ivy at the Grammys The evening was not just a disappointment for those who hoped to see rap break out from genre specific categories but it was also noticeably short on...”
“...female winners...”
“In a politically charged ceremony where the Time's Up movement and the #MeToo campaign were celebrated, and where invitees wore white roses to support victims of sexual harassment, only one female artist picked up a major award.”


“… Rock albums better understanding of the war on drugs best RB album Bruno Mars 24K magic best rap album Kendrick Lamar damned... "
"Newcomer Alicia Carra won the Best Newcomer Award and was considered the least important of the five categories."
"His album 24K magic won the album of the year, the song of the year," that's what I like, "and the best R & B album."
"But Mars' victory was rap's defeat."
"Jay-Z became the main nominees with eight nods, but returned empty handed. A year ago, his wife Beyonce missed Adele's album of the year."
Kendrick Lamar is widely expected to win the night's major award for his fourth album, damned, which is limited to rap
He won five awards, including best rap album and best rap performance
"Hilary Clinton's passionate and angry sketches at the Grammy Awards with his wife Beyonce and daughter blue Ivy not only disappoint those who want to see rap stand out from a particular genre, but also show a clear lack of..."
“… Women's winners... "
"In a political ceremony to celebrate the" progress of the times "movement and the" Mayo movement ", the invitees wore white roses to support the victims of sexual harassment, and only one female artist won the prize."



Number  1066
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s really hard when I would want to spend so much time hiding things,” she said in an interview with On Air With Ryan Seacrest.”
“Gomez was spotted spending time with Bieber — whom she dated on-and-off from 2011 to 2015 — over the weekend.”
“Selena Gomez, 25, and The Weeknd, 27, have ended their relationship, multiple sources confirm to PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She and Abel have been going back and forth for a few months about their relationship,” says an insider.”
““It’s been hard with him being on tour and her shooting in New York.”
“That wasn’t easy on them.”While Gomez “always made an effort” to attend his shows when she could, “that played a part in them getting distant,” adds the insider.”
““It’s over for now, but they’re still in touch.”The breakup also hasn’t been easy on the couple.”
““It’s been hard for them to come to the realization that this is the direction things were heading, but it’s been hard for months,” says the insider, who adds that Gomez is not back together with her ex Justin Bieber.”
“The duo attended church together and were photographed by TMZ grabbing breakfast at a café in Westlake Village, California, in late October.”


"It's really hard when I want to spend so much time hiding things," she said in an interview with Ryan Seacrest
"It was found that Gomez was with Bieber on weekends - she dated Bieber intermittently from 2011 to 2015."
"Several sources exclusively confirmed to people that Selena Gomez, 25, and the weekend, 27, have ended their relationship."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She and Abel have been talking about their relationship for months," one person familiar with the matter said
"He's on tour and she's shooting in New York, which makes me sad."
"It's not easy for them." While Gomez "always tries" to be on his show when she can, "it plays a role in their estrangement," the source added
"It's over now, but they're still in touch." It's not easy for the couple to break up, either
"It's hard for them to realize that this is where things are going, but it's been hard for months," said the person familiar with the matter, adding that Gomez didn't make up with her former Justin Bieber
"They went to church together and were photographed by TMZ having breakfast in a cafe in West Lake Village, California, in late October."



Number  1067
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Damon did not comment on Harvey Weinstein during his Kimmel appearance, even though the actor has appeared in several of Weinstein's films, including Good Will Hunting, Chasing Amy, Dogma, The Brothers Grimm and Rounders.”
“The comedy bit marks the latest installment in the mock feud existing between Kimmel and Damon, which has lasted for more than a decade.”
“Matt Damon crashed Chris Hemsworth’s interview during a surprise appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“Tuesday night.”
“Hemsworth said he brought his Thor: Ragnarok co-star Mark Ruffalo and director Taika Waititi with him to the show.”
“When Kimmel cut to the green room to see Ruffalo and Waititi, Damon sneaked into their shot.”
“Immediately trying to have the camera ignore Damon Kimmel yelled It s the mighty Thor not the mighty bore Kimmel then explained to Ruffalo and Waititi that Damon isn t allowed to go into his show s guest room for...”
“...he has his own room to stay in...”
““They have snacks in here,” Damon tells the camera.”
“While Ruffalo and Waititi continue to discuss the film, Damon reappeared, telling Kimmel, “I’m on the show!”


"Damon didn't comment on Harvey Weinstein during his appearance at Kimmel, although Harvey Weinstein has appeared in several films, including good hunting, Chasing Amy, dogma, brothers green and round man
"This comedy marks the latest in a decade long simulated feud between Kimmel and Damon."
"Matt Damon smashed Chris Hemsworth's interview when he unexpectedly showed up at the Jimmy Kimmel scene!"
"Tuesday night."
"Hamsworth said he took his Raytheon: ragnaro co star Mark rufaro and director Teka vetiti to the show."
"Damon sneaks into the camera of rufaro and vetiti when Kimmel cuts to the green house to see them."
"Immediately try to make the camera ignore Damon Kimmel shouting that it's a powerful Thor, not a powerful boring Kimmel, and then explain to rufaro and vetiti that Damon is not allowed to enter the guest room of his performance..."
“… He has his own room... "
"They have snacks here," Damon told the camera
As rufaro and vetiti continued to discuss the film, Damon reappeared and told Kimmel, "I'm acting!"



Number  1068
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The city of Las Vegas has established a Family Reunification Center to help connect relatives with the more than 500 people who were injured.”
““I hugged my family and talked about what I was going to do this week as far as this show that I am going to play tonight,” he said in a video shared on Twitter and Instagram.”
“Chris Young performed at a previously scheduled concert in Fresno California...”
“On Wednesday, the country star, 32, opened his show at The Big Fresno Fair with a cover of Vince Gill’s 1994 classic “Go Rest High on That Mountain,” and dedicated it to the victims of Sunday’s massacre, the deadliest mass shooting in U.S. history.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I was in Vegas the other night.”
“I heard this song a lot, I’ve never attempted to sing it because I have a huge amount of respect for the guy who did it originally,” Young said on stage.”
““But I’m going to give it my best.”
“Music can heal.”Image zoom Credit: Scott Legato/GettyYoung decided against canceling the performance in the hope he could continue to heal and help others do the same.”
“I m a musician and music can heal so I m hoping this is a night of trying to do that for a lot of people that are here RELATED GALLERY Remembering the Victims of the Las Vegas Mass Shooting The four time ACM Awards nominee did not perform at...”


"The city of Las Vegas has established a family reunion center to help reach the relatives of more than 500 injured people."
"I hugged my family and talked about what I'm going to do this week and what I'm going to do tonight," he said in a video he shared on Twitter and instagram
"Chris young performed at a previously scheduled concert in Fresno, California..."
"On Wednesday, the 32 year old country star opened the show at the Fresno Expo with Vince Gill's 1994 classic" rest on that mountain "as the cover, and dedicated it to the victims of Sunday's massacre, the most deadly massacre in American history."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I was in Vegas that night."
"I often hear this song, and I've never tried to sing it, because I have great respect for the people who first sang it," Yang said on stage
"But I'll try my best."
"Music can cure disease." Photo zooming credit: Scott leggetto / Getty young decided not to cancel the show, hoping he could continue to cure the disease and help others do the same
"I'm a musician and music can heal, so I hope this is a night to try and do it for a lot of people here, remembering the victims of the Las Vegas mass shooting, four ACM nominees not in Performance. "



Number  1069
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Image: Getty)The actress says: “I couldn’t even do one pull-up when I started.”
“She spent months eating pasta and salmon to fuel a gruelling training regime to gain 17lb of muscle.”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto play soon 8 Cancel Play now With Monster s Patty Jenkins at the helm it s the first superhero movie this millennium directed by a woman and the biggest opening weekend box office taking for a...”
“But her standalone movie is now smashing a fair few glass ceilings.”
“The only thing that changed is he has started training more because I became so strong!”Gal first slipped on Wonder Woman’s Bracelets of Submission in last year’s Batman v Superman.”
““He’s my biggest fan.”
““He’s super-happy to be married to Wonder Woman,” she laughs.”
“Some men might find that intimidating, but not Gal’s husband of eight years, property developer Yaron Versano, 39.”
“She also juggled her intense training with caring for Alma on set.”
“She has served in the military, competed in Miss Universe and rides a motorbike.”


(photo: Getty) the actress said, "I didn't even start with a pull-up."
"She spent months eating spaghetti and salmon, energizing a heavy training program to gain 17 pounds of muscle."
"Video loading video not available Click to play Click to play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel play now, led by Patty Jenkins of monsters, this is the first superhero movie directed by a woman in a thousand years and the biggest box office movie released this week..."
"But her indie movies are now breaking quite a lot of glass ceilings."
"The only thing that changed was that he started training more because I became so strong! "In last year's Batman V Superman, Gail slipped on wonder woman's bracelet for the first time."
"He's my biggest fan."
"He was so happy to marry wonder woman," she said with a smile
"Some men may think it's scary, but it's not Gale's husband of eight years, 39 year old real estate developer Aaron fansnow."
"She also combines intense training with taking care of Alma on set."
"She served in the army, competed in Miss Universe and rode a motorcycle."



Number  1070
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That fucks my number up.”West has boycotted the Grammys several times before — once because Frank Ocean wasn’t nominated, and another time in 2013 when he was in Brazil.”
“I don’t want to have 11 Grammys.”
“The answer is not what he wantedUpdate, January 23rd, 2020, 5:30 p.m.”
“ET: The 62nd annual Grammy Awards will air on Sunday, January 26th on CBS at 5:00 p.m. PT.”
“The 2020 Grammy Awards will be hosted by Alicia Keys at Los Angeles’ Staples Center.”
“Kanye West has won 21 Grammys and he’s been nominated 69 times.”
“West doesn’t have any 2020 Grammys nominations, but he was nominated for Producer Of The Year, Non-Classical in 2019.”
“To say Kanye West has a complicated relationship with the Grammy Awards is an understatement.”
“The two seem to have a love/hate relationship with each other, and we’re just spectators along for the ride.”
“While it often seems like West isn’t a big fan of the show — there’s no indication he’ll attend this year, and he hasn’t attended in recent years—it’s still a fact that he is one of the top Grammy winners of all time.”


West has boycotted several Grammy Awards before, one because Frank Orson was not nominated, and the other in 2013, when he was in Brazil
"I don't want to have 11 Grammys."
"The answer is not the update he wants, 5:30 p.m. on January 23, 2020."
Eastern time: the 62nd annual Grammy Awards will be broadcast on CBS at 5:00 p.m. on Sunday, January 26
"The 2020 Grammy Awards will be hosted by Alicia case at the Staples Center in Los Angeles."
"Kanye West won 21 Grammy Awards and 69 nominations."
"West doesn't have any Grammy nominations for 2020, but he's named nonclassical producer of the year in 2019."
"It's understatement to say that Kanye West has a complicated relationship with the Grammy Awards."
"There seems to be a love / hate relationship between them. We are just bystanders along the way."
"Although West doesn't seem to be a big fan of the show - there's no sign that he's going to be there this year, and he hasn't been in recent years, in fact, he's one of the top winners in Grammy history."



Number  1071
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Everything is going great and I was like, ‘Hey, this is awesome!’ And then, kaboom.”Despite Bush and Davis struggling at the time, he remained hopeful that their marriage could “find its next leg” even after they experienced “difficulties” even before he began working at Today.”
““I was a happy-go-lucky guy,” Bush said.”
“For a man, that’s the ultimate degradation.”Image zoom Billy Bush with Sydney Davis and daughters Josie, Mary and Lillie | Credit: Billy Bush/InstagramThe release of the tapes completely blindsided him.”
““And then I went through stages of grieving because I lost my career.”
““I was ashamed and embarrassed,” he said at the time.”
“In January, Bush spoke to PEOPLE about the impact the scandal had on his career and marriage.”
“Their split came nearly a year after Bush was abruptly fired from the Today show after a videotape was leaked to The Washington Post in which then Apprentice host Donald Trump bragged to Bush about groping women...”
“They love each other and their children deeply and are committed to a bright future Image zoom Billy Bush and Sydney Davis Credit John M Heller Getty Bush s lawyer Marshall Grossman also confirmed their separation to PEOPLE at the time saying the two were on a short term break...”
“The estranged couple married in April 1998 but announced their separation in September 2017 in a statement to PEOPLE: “After almost 20 years of marriage, they have separated for the moment to evaluate their life together.”
“A rep for Bush did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”


"Everything went well and I said," Hey, that's great! Although Bush and Davis were struggling at that time, he still hoped that their marriage would "find the next way", even though they experienced "difficulties" before he started working today
"I'm an optimist," Bush said
"For a man, this is the ultimate fall." Image zooming Billy bush with Sydney Davis and daughters Josie, Mary and Lily credit: Billy Bush / instagram released the tape completely fooled him
"Then I went through the sad phase because I lost my career."
"I feel ashamed and embarrassed," he said at the time
In January, Bush told people about the impact of the scandal on his career and marriage
"Their breakup happened nearly a year ago when a video was leaked to the Washington Post, and then apprentice host Donald Trump boasted to bush about touching a woman, and Bush was suddenly fired..."
"They love each other and their children deeply and are committed to a better image of the future. Marshall Grossman, a lawyer for Billy Bush and John M. Heller Getty bush of Sydney Davis credit company, also confirmed their breakup at that time and said that they were taking a short break.... "
"The separated couple married in April 1998, but announced their separation in a statement to people magazine in September 2017:" after nearly 20 years of marriage, they are temporarily separated to assess their life together. "
"A representative of Bush did not immediately respond to requests for comment."



Number  1072
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...prevnext...”
“In 2017, Oxman revealed she does not have children.”
“The pair reportedly connected over their shared love of design and architecture, with Oxman and Pitt sharing a "professional friendship."”
“A source told Page Six that despite being just friends, Pitt is "interested in spending more time" with the accomplished MIT scholar.”
“Scroll through to find out more about the new woman in the famous actor's life, according to PEOPLE.”
“(Photo: Instagram/Portal Estrelando)How They Met Pitt and Oxman, 42, reportedly met through an architecture project at MIT, where she works as a professor of media arts and sciences at the university's Media Lab.”
“While the nature of the project is unknown, Pitt is an architecture enthusiast and founded the Make It Right Foundation, which builds affordable and environmentally friendly homes in New Orleans for people in need.”
“...prevnextShe was born in Israel (Photo: Instagram/Zucker Prince) Oxman was born in Haifa, Israel.”
“She enjoyed splitting her time between her grandmother's garden and her parents' architectural studio, which is set to be the inspiration for her work fusing elements of nature with architectural design.”
“Her parents, Robert and Rivka were well-known architects.”


“… Last... "
"In 2017, Oxman revealed that she had no children."
According to reports, the two are linked by their love for design and architecture. Oxman and Pitt have a "professional friendship"
A source told page that although Pitt was just a friend, he was "interested in spending more time" with the accomplished MIT scholar
According to people magazine, scroll through to learn about the new woman in the life of the famous actor
(photo: instagram / portal estrelando) how did 42 year old Pitt and Oxman get to know each other? It is reported that they got to know each other through an architectural project at MIT. She is a professor of media art and science at MIT's Media Lab
"Although the nature of the project is not known, Peter is an architecture enthusiast and has set up the make it right foundation to build affordable green homes in New Orleans for those in need."
“…… Prevenks was born in Israel (photo source: instagram / Zucker Prince) Oxman was born in Haifa, Israel. "
"She likes to spend time between her grandmother's garden and her parents' architectural studio, which will be the inspiration for her works that combine natural elements with architectural design."
Her parents Robert and rifka are famous architects



Number  1073
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Click here for reprint permission.”
“...the kiss...”
“...the room to ask if he could check on his fantasy football team...”
““I was wondering if I could check my fantasy team?” the boy asked his dad.”
““What do I get?” Mr. Brady replied.”
“That’s when Jack walked over to his dad and leaned over to kiss him on the mouth.”
““Everything comes with a cost, bud,” the message therapist quipped.”
““That was like a peck,” Mr. Brady complained.”
“Jack walked over again and kissed his father on the mouth a second time, for what some people called an “uncomfortably long” time — roughly two and half seconds.”
“Can we talk about Tom Brady s uncomfortably long kiss with his son or is now not a good time https t co zCw7egz4Lv pic twitter com HA0NcckI6s Brett Bachman BrettABachman February 2 2018 A CBS News affiliate in New York asked people on the street what they thought of...”


"Click here to get permission to reprint."
“… Kiss... "
“… Ask him if he can see his dream football team room... "
"I wonder if I can check my fantasy team? "The boy asked his father."
"What did I get? "Mr. Brady replied
"Just then Jack came up to his father and leaned over to kiss him on the mouth."
"It all comes at a price, bud," joked the information therapist
"It's like a peck," Mr. Brady complained
Jack comes back and kisses his father on the mouth a second time. Some say it was an "uncomfortable long time" - about two and a half seconds
"Can we talk about Tom Brady's disturbing kiss with his son? Or is it not a good time to ask people on the street what they think on February 2, 2018 at a news branch of CBS in New York... "



Number  1074
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“After Gomez watched Bieber’s hockey game, the duo attended a Hillsong Church service together.”
“The couple were most recently spotted together on Wednesday, January 31.”
“It s about a particular moment in my life when someone very close to me wanted the attention of somebody else Puth told Billboard in their new cover story published on Thursday February 1 about his duet with Gomez We Don t Talk Anymore When I found that out and...”
“...we ended it I might have done some shady things too and she might have asked me How long has this been going on...”
“'” the 26-year-old singer continued.”
““I don’t kiss and tell, but the only way a song like that can come across as real is if there’s something else going on behind the scenes.”
“And that’s what was happening.”
“Very short-lived, very small, but very impactful.”
“And it really messed me up.”
“I’m trying to put this the best way possible: It wasn’t like I was the only person on her mind.”


After watching Bieber's hockey game, Gomez and Bieber attended the ceremony of hillsson church
"The couple were last seen together on Wednesday, January 31."
"This is a special moment in my life. A person who is very close to me wants to attract people's attention. In the new cover story billboard published on Thursday, February 1, booth said that his duet with Gomez, when I found out this time, we stopped talking about it, and..."
“…… We're over. I may have done something disgraceful. She may ask me how long it lasted... "
"The 26 year old singer continued
"I don't say it personally, but such songs can make people feel real. The only way is that something else happens behind the scenes."
"That's what happened."
"It's very short, very small, but it's very influential."
"It really screwed me up."
"I want to express this in the best way: I'm not alone in her heart."



Number  1075
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Roseanne's new season airs episodes every Tuesday night on ABC.”
“"By the time Sunday morning rolled around, I was shaking, I was still drinking but I was still drinking," Goodman said.”
“Goodman, who is celebrating 10 years of sobriety, admitted in an interview with Willie Geist on Sunday TODAY that his alcoholism got so bad at one point, that he found himself in the habit of drinking at work.”
“"I got so lucky because I was still getting hired for things, but the fact is, I was drinking at work," Goodman said.”
“"My speech would be slurred.”
“I thought I was fooling people.”
“My cheeks would turn bright red when I was liquored up and I just looked like a stop sign."”
“Goodman finally entered rehab to combat his alcoholism in 2007 a month after he finished filming, Speed Racer.”
“He claims his tipping point came after "a long weekend playing golf with my friends," which was the same weekend he won the only Emmy Award of his career for a guest role on Studio 60 on the Sunset Strip.”
“Goodman admitted he missed rehearsals for the show because he was too drunk.”


"Roseanne's new season is on ABC every Tuesday night."
"By Sunday morning, I was shaking, I was still drinking, but I was still drinking," Goodman said
Goodman, who is celebrating his 10 years of abstinence, admitted in an interview with Willie gaster on Sunday that his drinking problem had become so serious that he found himself in the habit of drinking at work
"I'm lucky because I'm still looking for a job for something, but the fact is, I drink at work," Goodman said
"My words will be vague."
"I thought I was fooling people."
"After drinking, my cheeks will turn bright red. I look like a stop sign."
"Goodman finally entered the rehab center in 2007, one month after he finished filming" speed racing. "
"He claimed that his turning point came after a long weekend of golf with friends, the same weekend when he won the only Emmy of his career for his guest role in studio 60 Sunset Boulevard."
"Goodman admitted that he missed the rehearsal because he was too drunk."



Number  1076
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CBS Ellen s Game of Games NBC RuPaul s Drag Race CBS The Voice NBC”
“Queer Eye Netflix Vanderpump Rules Bravo COMPETITION CONTESTANT OF 2018 Nikki Bella Dancing With the Stars ABC Brynn Cartelli The Voice NBC Eva Igo World of Dance NBC Cody Nickson The Amazing Race CBS Maddie Poppe American Idol ABC COMPETITION SHOW OF 2018 America s Got Talent NBC Big Brother...”
“...on Monday revealed the top five finalists in each category of the newly minted E!”
“People’s Choice Awards (airing Sunday, November 11 at 9/8c).”
“All told, Grey’s Anatomy and Shadowhunters lead the field with five nominations a piece.”
“Fellow scripted series 13 Reasons Why and Riverdale are close behind (with four nominations each), followed by The Big Bang Theory and This Is Us (with three nominations each).”
“Of Grey’s Anatomy‘s five nominations, two are for leading lady Ellen Pompeo (who is nominated for both Drama TV Star and Female TV Star), while another two are for the series itself (which is nominated for both TV Show and the more specific Drama TV Show category).”
“If we may take a moment to nitpick the Revival Show category doesn t pay any mind to the actual definition of revival Nominees include reboots One Day at a Time and Dynasty which are in no way continuations of the original series on which they re based and therefore...”
“...not...”
“...reboots.”


"CBS Allen's game NBC rupaul's car CBS voice NBC"
"Queer eye fly van der Pol rules Bravo competition 2018 player Nicky Bella and star dance ABC Brian Catley's voice NBC EVA Igo dance world NBC Cody Nixon amazing competition CBS madipop American Idol ABC competition 2018 America's got talent NBC big brother..."
“…… The top five finalists of the latest E-Series were announced on Monday
"People's Choice Award" (Sunday, November 11, 9 / 8C)
"In general, Gray's anatomy and shadow hunter led the field with five nominations."
"Co screenwriter series 13 why and Riverdale followed (with four nominations each), followed by big bang theory, and that's us (with three nominations each),"
"Of the five nominations for Gray's anatomy, two are for the heroine Ellen Pompeo (she was nominated as both a TV star and a female star), and the other two are for the series itself (both TV series and more specific categories of TV Series)
"If we can take a little time to find out, the category of Renaissance show does not care about the actual definition of Renaissance show. The nominees include the restart and Dynasty of one time a day. They are not the continuation of the original series they are based on, so..."
“… It's not... "
“… Restart. "



Number  1077
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Trump Jr. in recent months has started a relationship with former Fox News host Kimberly Guilfoyle, even joining the campaign trail together.”
“They walked out of the courtroom side by side, exchanging quick whispers, before parting ways.”
“Trump Jr.'s estranged wife, Vanessa, slapped the real estate scion with divorce papers on March 15.”
“And what had initially appeared to be an amiable, "uncontested" split in court filings was recently reclassified as a "contested" proceeding—meaning things had the potential of getting nasty.”
“While the few public court filings available about their divorce do not reveal Vanessa s motivation for leaving Trump Jr reports abound about his alleged ongoing infidelity as well as one New York Post report that the president s eldest...”
“...son was just too cheap treating her like a second class citizen according to one of the tabloid s sources...”
“The Trumps, 40, married in 2005 and have five kids.”
“During a brief proceeding in Manhattan Supreme Court on Thursday, however, the estranged couple revealed that they had already reached a custody agreement and were close to brokering a deal on their finances.”
“"My understating is that the parties have agreed, at least in principle, to resolve all issues regarding custody decision-making and parenting," said Manhattan Supreme Court Justice Michael Katz.”
“"Obviously, you have prioritized your children and taken steps to shield them from what could have been an invasive litigation process, not everybody is able to do that, so I congratulate you on working those issues out," Katz said.”


"In recent months, little trump has begun to build a relationship with former Fox News Anchor Kimberly Guilfoyle and even join the campaign together."
"They walk out of the courtroom side by side, talk quietly, and then go their separate ways."
"On March 15, little Trump's separated wife, Vanessa, slapped the real estate heir with her divorce papers."
"What initially seemed amiable and uncontroversial in court documents has recently been reclassified as a" controversial "procedure, which means things can get worse."
"Although there are not many public court documents about the divorce, Vanessa's motive for leaving little trump has not been revealed. Reports abound about his suspected continued infidelity. A New York Post report says that the president's eldest son..."
“…… According to a source in the tabloid, it's too stingy for my son to treat her as a second-class citizen... "
"The 40 year old trumps married in 2005 and have five children."
"However, in a brief lawsuit in Manhattan's Supreme Court on Thursday, the estranged couple revealed that they have reached a custody agreement and are close to reaching an agreement on their financial issues."
"As far as I know, at least in principle, both sides have agreed to resolve all issues related to custody decisions and parenting," Manhattan Supreme Court justice Michael Katz said
"It's clear that you've given priority to your children and taken steps to protect them from potentially intrusive proceedings, and not everyone can do that, so I congratulate you on solving these problems," Katz said



Number  1078
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas Enjoy Date Night in NYC This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“RELATED CONTENT:Nick Jonas Goes Instagram Official With Priyanka Chopra as Source Says They're Getting SeriousPriyanka Chopra Wears Stunning Satin Dress for Date Night With Nick JonasNick Jonas Takes Priyanka Chopra to Family Wedding -- See the Pic!”
“See more of their recent date nights in the video below.”
“Jonas also took his new lady to a cousin's wedding at the beginning of the month.”
“Earlier this year, the two enjoyed an epic Memorial Day weekend together, including a night at Beauty and the Beast Live in Concert, a visit to a Dodgers game and a day on a boat with pals.”
“The twosome was first linked after they walked the red carpet together at the 2017 Met Gala.”
“"Her," the "Jealous" singer wrote alongside the clip, with a heart-eye emoji.”
“In the Instagram Story video, Chopra flashed an adorable smile as she ran towards Jonas on a balcony.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas have a date night in New York. This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's message."
"Related content: Nick Jonas instagram officially announced that Priyanka Chopra wore a beautiful satin skirt for his date night with Nick Jonas. Nick Jonas took Priyanka Chopra to the family wedding - see photo!"
"Please check out their latest date nights in the video below."
"Jonas took his new wife to his cousin's wedding at the beginning of the month."
"Earlier this year, the two spent an epic Memorial Day weekend together, including a night at the beauty and the beast live concert, a visit to a Dodgers game, and a day on board with friends."
"The two were first connected after walking the red carpet together at the 2017 blind date party."
"She," the jealous singer wrote next to the clip with a heart eye emoticon
"In the instagram story video, Chopra shows a lovely smile as she runs to Jonas from the balcony."



Number  1079
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In 2003 he launched a successful solo music career and segued into television when he starred on MTV's Newlyweds.”
“NICK LACHEY (pro partner Peta Murgatroyd) – Nick Lachey, a multi-platinum recording artist, television personality and businessman, first rose to stardom as the front-man of the popular band 98 Degrees, selling over 10 million albums worldwide and charting several top-40 hits.”
“SEE DEBBIE GIBSON'S EXTENDED BIO ON HER CAST PAGE.”
“Now she has dreams of dazzling us in the ballroom with partner Alan Bersten on Season 25 of Dancing with the Stars.”
“A music prodigy, Debbie exploded on the Billboard Pop Charts at the tender age of 16 with the self-penned "Only in My Dreams."”
“DEBBIE GIBSON (pro partner Alan Bersten) - From singer, songwriter and musician to actress and dancer, Debbie Gibson embodies what it truly means to be an entertainer.”
“SEE BARBARA CORCORAN'S EXTENDED BIO ON HER CAST PAGE.”
“Now Barbara is swimming into uncharted waters with partner Keo to add the coveted Mirrorball trophy to her collection of successes.”
“She would parlay that $1,000 loan into a $5 billion real estate business.”
“Years ago, Barbara borrowed $1,000 to start a tiny real estate company in New York City.”


"In 2003, he started a successful solo career and starred in a TV series in MTV's newlyweds."
"Nick Lachey (professional partner PETA murgatroyd) - Nick Lachey, an artist, TV celebrity and businessman with multi platinum records, first became the leader of pop band 98 degrees, sold more than 10 million albums around the world and created several top 40 hot songs."
"Look at Debbie Gibson's expanded resume on the actors page."
"Now she dreams of dazzling us in the ballroom of dancing with the stars, season 25, with her partner Alan belsten."
As a musical genius, Debbie made it to the charts at the age of 16 with her own "only in my dreams."
"Debbie Gibson (professional partner Alan belsten) - from singer, composer, musician to actor and dancer, Debbie Gibson embodies the true meaning of being an artist."
"Look at Barbara Cochran's expanded resume on her cast page."
"Now Barbara and her partner KIO are swimming to unknown waters to add the coveted mirror ball trophy to her successful collection."
"She's going to invest a $1000 loan in a $5 billion real estate business."
A few years ago, Barbara borrowed $1000 to start a small real estate company in New York



Number  1080
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Olympios is beefing up her team big time — in addition to hiring Singer to take on her case, as of today, the reality star has also started working with veteran Hollywood publicist Stan Rosenfield.”
“This past Sunday, Warner Bros. Television, which produces “Bachelor in Paradise” for ABC, announced production had been shut down due to “allegations of misconduct,” though the studio did not offer any further details on the matter.”
“In a statement released to Variety, Olympios breaks her silence, saying: “I am a victim and have spent the last week trying to make sense of what happened the night of June 4.”
“Although I have little memory of that night, something bad obviously took place, which I understand is why production on the show has now been suspended and a producer on the show has filed a complaint against the production.”
“As a woman, this is my worst nightmare and it has now become my reality.”
“As I pursue the details and facts surrounding that night and the immediate days after I have retained a group of professionals to ensure that what happened on June 4 comes to light and I can continue my life including hiring an attorney to obtain justice and seeking therapy to...”
“...begin dealing with the physical and emotional trauma stemming from that evening The statement officially confirms Olympios as the contestant in question following a wildfire of unconfirmed tabloid reports that allege she was reportedly heavily under the influence of alcohol and involved in a sexual situation with a male co...”
“...star which Variety has opted not to name until he speaks out while Bachelor in Paradise cameras were rolling...”
“Since the production shut down, the tabloid press has played out as a he-said-she-said saga with numerous conflicting reports over the past 48 hours.”
“A formal investigation, led by Warner Bros. TV, is currently underway.”


"Olympus is working hard to strengthen her team - in addition to hiring Singh to take over her case, the reality TV star is starting to work with Stan Rosenfield, a veteran Hollywood PR from today on."
Warner Bros., which produced "Bachelor in heaven" for ABC last Sunday Bros.Television ）It announced that the station had stopped production because of "misconduct charges," but it did not provide any further details on the matter
In a statement to variety magazine, Olympus broke the silence, saying: "I'm a victim and last week I've been trying to figure out what happened on the night of June 4."
"Although I have little memory of that night, obviously something bad happened, which is why the production of the play has been suspended and one of its producers has complained about the production of the play."
"As a woman, it's my worst nightmare, and now it's my reality."
"When I trace the details and facts of that night, and a few days after I hired a group of professionals to make sure what happened on June 4 came to light, I can continue my life, including hiring lawyers to do justice and seek treatment..."
“…… Starting to deal with the physical and mental trauma caused that night, the statement officially confirmed Olympus as the player concerned. Before that, a large number of unconfirmed tabloids reported that Olympus was seriously affected by alcohol and had sex with a male colleague.... "
“… When the camera of "Bachelor in heaven" is rolling, the star chooses not to reveal his name until he says his name... "
"Since the shutdown, the tabloid media has been putting on a legend he said she said. There have been a lot of contradictory reports in the past 48 hours."
"A formal investigation, led by Warner Bros., is currently underway."



Number  1081
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[fb_instant_article_ad_01]?”
“Share your thoughts with us!”
“Robbie s latest confession...”
“Despite her one regret Margot Robbie is still on to polishing her celebrity status as she recently took on the role of an abused and a disgraced figure skater in the movie I Tonya What do you think of Margot...”
““I wouldn’t have resented the position I found myself in because I would’ve known what I was getting myself into,” the actress shared.”
“...of things to her before she joined the DC universe...”
“And every time you do a background check it s going to cost 2 000 so take that into consideration when you re getting yourself into this Having said that Robbie actually regrets not having someone who explained these kinds...”
“...past history of violence because you ll need to know whether you need security to go to certain events she told The Hollywood Reporter...”
“There s just all this stuff you learn along the way like when you get those death threats it s smart to have a security team do a background check on whoever sent them to see if there is any...”
“Her popularity comes with a price, and it definitely isn’t cheap.”


"[FB / instant / article / advertisement / 01]
"Share your thoughts with us!"
"Robbie's latest confession..."
"Although Margot Robbie has a regret, she is still trying to improve her celebrity status, because she recently played an abused and disgraced figure skater in the movie my Tonya. What do you think of Margot..."
"I don't resent where I am because I already know where I am," the actress said
“… Before she joined the DC Universe "
"And every time you do a background check, it costs 2000 pounds, so when you say Robbie really regrets that no one has explained such things, take that into consideration..."
“…… History of violence in the past, because you need to know if you need security to go to certain events, "she told Hollywood reporters
"You've learned a lot along the way. For example, when you receive death threats, it's wise for a security team to do background checks on the people who sent them to see if there are any..."
"Her popularity comes at a price. It's definitely not cheap."



Number  1082
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She's like, actually my girlfriend Samantha goes, 'Actually Scott and Shannon would be a great, great match.'”
“The date night did not end there.”
“The blonde bombshell is a mother of three girls, while Scot has two teen daughters of his own, Brooke and Brittany.”
“@bret.matteson @scotmattesonshe,' the California native captioned a shot of her enjoying dinner with her new guy and his brotherScot is a co-founding partner of Centurion Partners, LLC, which is a corporation that develops real estate properties in the United states.”
“❤️ Having a ball!”
“Social media official: 'Lunch with old friends in NYC!”
“The following day, Shannon, whose divorce from David Beador is currently playing out on her reality TV show, revealed she was so excited to be headed to Broadway for a showing of Dear Evan Hansen.”
“The duo then attended a party with their Big Apple friends.”
“@bret.matteson @scotmattesonshe,' the California native captioned the shot of them snuggling up at dinner.”
“She doesn't have, like she doesn't harbor any ill feelings towards him.”


"She said, in fact, my girlfriend Samantha said," actually Scott and Shannon are going to be a very, very good couple. "
"The date night is not over."
The blonde is the mother of three girls, while Scott himself has two teenage daughters, Brooke and Brittany
"@ Brett Mattson @ the Californian describes her dinner with her new boyfriend, whose brother Scott is a co founding partner of Centurion partners, LLC. Centurion partners, LLC is a real estate development company in the United States
“ ❤️  Have a good time
Social media official: "lunch with old friends in New York!"
"The next day, Shannon revealed that she was very excited to be on Broadway for dear Evan Hansen. Shannon's divorce from David biddo is on her reality show
"They then went to a party with their big apple friends."
"@ Brett Mattson @" Scotsman, "the Californian, captioned the scene of them cuddling together at dinner
"She didn't, just as she didn't mean him any harm."



**Something goes wrong**
“Not to be crass, but I’m also hearing rumors that rabbit stew will be served on Pole-hare-is flights next month out of O’Hare.. We all cope with hare loss differently…”
“Or perhaps not…Edwards claims he died on the flight but also states that United told her the rabbit died in a storage room at O’Hare Airport.”
“Simon the Rabbit was already three feet long and destined to becomes world’s largest rabbit.”
“Here’s his father with breeder Annette Edwards–Edwards claimed–Simon had a vet’s check-up three hours before the flight and was fit as a fiddle.”
“Something very strange has happened and I want to know what.”
“I’ve sent rabbits all around the world and nothing like this has happened before.”
“In any case, the rabbit had been purchased by a celebrity client, cost $2500 to send to Chicago, and costs $5000/year to care for.”
“But he was found dead after a longhaul flight in the cargo hold of a United 767-300.”
“United is apologetic–We were saddened to hear this news.”
“The better solution: identify it as an emotional support animal and keep it in the cabin.”


"You're welcome, but I also heard that there will be a rumor of stewed rabbit meat on Polish Airlines flight from O'Hare next month.".. We all deal with rabbit losses in different ways... "
"Maybe not Edwards claimed that he died on the plane, but also said that the United States told her that the rabbit died in the storeroom at O'Hare Airport. "
"Simon rabbit is three feet long and destined to be the biggest rabbit in the world."
"This is his father and keeper, Annette Edwards - Edwards claimed - Simon had a veterinary examination three hours before the flight and was in excellent health."
"A very strange thing happened and I want to know what happened."
"I've sent rabbits all over the world. Nothing like this has happened before."
"Anyway, this rabbit was bought by a famous customer, it costs 2500 dollars to send to Chicago and 5000 dollars a year to take care of it."
"But he was found dead after a long flight in the cargo hold of a United 767-300 airliner."
"Manchester United are sorry for that - we are sorry to hear that
"A better solution is to identify it as an emotional support animal and lock it in the cabin."



Number  1084
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Besides, dealing with a little dirt and diapers seems pretty worth it to save tens of thousands of dollars from winding up in the local landfill.”
“...life and is an old pro at this point...”
“...success While Lachey should undoubtedly be nominated for the best husband award of 2017 for this recovery feat given that he has three small children he s probably pretty used to dealing with some of the less glamorous things in...”
“...digging through dirty diapers and trash to find your wife s missing wedding ring...”
“On Saturday morning the former boy bander posted a photo of his wife s ring sitting in the midst of a pile of trash dirt and hair writing in the caption This is true love after 6 years of marriage...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“But having such heavy bands clearly comes with some consequences as it seems Vanessa recently lost hers in the family trash can by accident.”
“...with includes 24 square diamonds...”
“The couple returned to New York jeweler David Bader of Bader and Garrin who designed Minnillo s engagement ring to pick out a substantial platinum eternity band of Asscher cut diamonds that also would match Lachey s own platinum band...”
“...very substantial wedding ring to add to his bride s bling...”


"In addition, a little bit of soil and diapers seems to be worth it, because it saves tens of thousands of dollars to end up in a local landfill."
“… Living at this point is an old profession... "
“…… It's a success, and Lach should undoubtedly be nominated for the best husband award in 2017 for this restoration feat, because he has three children, and he may have been used to dealing with some less glamorous things... "
“… Looking for your wife's lost wedding ring in dirty diapers and garbage... "
"Last Saturday morning, the former boy band member posted a picture of his wife's ring sitting in a garbage dump with the words in her hair:" this is true love after six years of marriage... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"But having such a heavy band obviously has some consequences, because Vanessa seems to have accidentally lost her in the garbage can at home recently."
“… Including 24 square diamonds... "
"The couple returned to New York jeweler David Bede of Bede and Garlin, who designed Minnillo's engagement ring to pick out a substantial Asher cut diamond platinum eternal band that will also match Lach's own platinum band..."
“… A very substantial wedding ring to add to his bride's shine... "



Number  1085
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The producer also tried his hand at novels, writing “Death by Hollywood,” a darkly comic satire with a struggling screenwriter as its protagonist.”
“Bochco also produced the legal drama “Raising the Bar” for TNT that ran two seasons in 2008 and 2009.”
“Law” co-star Jimmy Smits, and the program went on to run for 11 years.”
“Bochco replaced him with former “L.A.”
“In one of the highest-profile tiffs, his rift with David Caruso during the first season of “NYPD Blue” led to the actor’s exit, a considerable gamble for a series in its first season.”
“...with recalcitrant stars...”
“Asked how he could risk gambling on a musical like Cop Rock given the richness of his ABC pact Bochco once joked With my deal how could I not Bochco wasn t above engaging in public spats and power struggles from complaining about his treatment by network executives to tussling...”
“As virtual proof the latter was ahead of its time, Bochco essentially revived it in 2014, under the title “Murder in the First,” for TNT, where it ran for three years.”
“The relationship produced some clear hits (“NYPD Blue,” “Doogie Howser, M.D.”) and notable failures, including the musical police drama “Cop Rock” and the serialized courtroom drama “Murder One,” which followed a single murder trial over an entire season.”
“Law” for NBC before entering into a landmark 10-series deal with ABC in the late 1980s.”


The producer also tried to write a novel, death by Hollywood, a black satirical comedy in which the protagonist is a struggling screenwriter
Bocchko also produced a legal drama "raising standards" for TNT, which aired for two seasons in 2008 and 2009
Law co stars with Jimmy Smits, who has been on the show for 11 years
Bocchico replaced him with the old "Los Angeles."
"In one of the most eye-catching quarrels, his discord with David Caruso in the first season of New York Police Department blue led to the actor's withdrawal, which was a considerable gamble for a first season series."
“… And the star who resisted... "
"When asked how he could risk gambling on a musical such as police rock, considering the richness of his ABC agreement, boqiko once joked about my deal and said," how can I stop boqiko from disdaining to participate in public quarrels and power struggles, from complaining about the treatment of network executives to quarreling... "
"As the leading virtual evidence of the latter, boqike RE activated TNT in 2014 under the title of" the first murder "and ran it on TNT for three years."
"This relationship has had some obvious effects (" NYPD blue "," DuGe Hauser, MD ") and notable failures, including the music police drama" police rock "and the serial court drama" murder one, "which was tried in a single murder case for a whole season."
Before the landmark 10 series deal with ABC in the late 1980s, NBC's "law"



Number  1086
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Can't wait to see the rest of their vacation pics!”
“The source also explained that there was quite a large group with them:It was a big group and they looked like they were ready to have some fun.”
“Earlier this month, on June 10, Jenner revealed that she wouldn’t be sharing photos of her daughter anymore.”
“Unfortunately, I wouldn’t expect any photos of Stormi to show up on social media during this trip.”
“But I’m sure more pics are coming.”
“Jenner posted a photo of herself rocking some sunglasses and looking amazing:And Woods, who is Jenner’s BFF, also posted a shot of herself on her Instagram account:This little family vacation has only just gotten started, so the group has shared very few pics so far.”
“And, by the looks of things, they are.”
“I’m sure they’re having a blast!”
“Wow, that definitely sounds like a wild and fun ride.”
“News that Scott and Jenner first landed in Nice and then went out to Cannes.”


"Can't wait to see the rest of their holiday photos!"
"The source also explained that there are quite a number of them: Yes, a large group of people, they seem to be ready for fun."
"Earlier this month, on June 10, Jenner revealed that she would not share her daughter's photos any more."
"Unfortunately, I don't want any of Tommy's photos on social media during this trip."
"But I'm sure there will be more photos."
Jenna posted a picture of herself rocking her sunglasses and looking at it. Amazing: and Jenna's boyfriend in the woods also posted a picture of herself on her instagram account: this small family vacation has just begun, so so so far, the group has shared very few photos. "
"And, on the surface, they are."
"I'm sure they had a good time!"
"Wow, that sounds like a wild and interesting trip."
"Scott and Jenner landed in nice first and then went to Cannes."



Number  1087
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's nice to be in the family I'm in with all their support."”
“I don't really feel any pressure, which is nice.”
“...as one of the presenters Noah stopped by Live From the Red Carpet where she couldn t help but gush over her sister s new song Malibu...”
“When asked if this is a new Miley, however, Noah couldn't help but disagree.”
“"I see new music, but I don't really see a Miley change.”
“Miley is always going to be Miley to me and I don't see a new Miley [or] an old Miley," Noah explained to E!”
“News' Jason Kennedy.”
“"Some people do and I get really confused when people say that.”
“I don't know.”
“I just see her as my sister and the person I've loved since I was a baby.”


"It's great to be with me with their support."
"I really don't feel any pressure, it's good."
“… As one of the hosts, Noah stops on the red carpet. She can't help talking about her sister's new song Malibu. "
"However, when asked if it was a new Miley, Noah couldn't help but disagree."
"I see new music, but I really don't see Miley changing."
"Miley will always be Miley to me. I don't see a new Miley [or] an old Miley," Noah explained
"Jason Kennedy news"
"Some people do, and when people say that, I'm really confused."
"I don't know."
"I just think of her as my sister and someone I've loved since I was a child."



Number  1088
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hudson has made out just fine, too — he is currently starring on ABC’s Splitting Up Together with Jenna Fischer, where the pair star as a couple who find their relationship rejuvenated after they file for divorce.”
“Fishing is a big part of my life and it was this 10-day fishing trip.”
“Oliver Hudson missed the chance to play Jack Pearson on This is Us — because he went fishing!”
“The Splitting Up Together star, 41, appeared on the LadyGang podcast on Tuesday, May 15, where he spoke with hosts Keltie Knight, Becca Tobin and Jac Vanek.”
“During their chat, Hudson mentioned that he read for the part of the beloved patriarch and did “very well” — well enough that he was asked to do a chemistry read with Mandy Moore.”
““But this will tell you how much I love to fish.”
“I had a 10-day fishing trip planned.”
“It’s my life.”
“And my agent says, ‘We have to test, and they really like you, and this, this, and that.’ And I said, ‘Oh, I’m supposed to go on a fishing trip’… And he’s like, ‘Okay, yeah, so?”
“Milo Ventimiglia, who snagged the role of Jack, and his costars have broken records — and hearts — with the captivating series.”


"Hudson is also doing well - he's currently playing a couple on ABC's" splitting up together with Jenna Fischer "and they find their relationship revived after they filed for divorce."
"Fishing is an important part of my life. It's my 10 day fishing trip."
"Oliver Hudson missed the chance to play Jack Pearson in this is us - because he went fishing!"
The 41 year old breakup star appeared on Lady Gang's podcast on Tuesday, May 15, talking to hosts Keltie knight, Becca Tobin and JAC Vanek
In their conversation, Hudson mentioned that he had read for beloved patriarch and had done it "very well" - well, he was asked to read chemistry with Mandy Moore
"But it will tell you how much I love fishing."
"I planned a 10 day fishing trip."
"This is my life."
"My agent said," we have to test, they really like you, and this, this, that. " I said, "Oh, I should go fishing." He said, "well, yes, so what?"
"Milo Ventimiglia broke the record and broke people's hearts with this fascinating series."



Number  1089
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No matter if you were #TeamBryan or #TeamPeter going into Rachel’s finale, there’s no doubt — she and Bryan are still in love, and they don’t care who knows it.”
“That didn’t fly with Rachel, and the two had a really emotional breakup, one that Rachel thinks overshadowed the fact that she found longtime love with Bryan.”
““And I really haven’t talked to him because I don’t have anything else to say.”
““For me, the reason there was so much emotion [in the finale] was because that was closure for me, that was it,” Rachel told Us Weekly.”
“...took away from him And for the record Peter and Rachel do not talk...”
“I ve never been engaged before and neither has Bryan and I felt like we were more on the defense about our relationship and having to explain more of it than rather it just showing So I just wish you really got to see Bryan and I hate that it...”
“[The breakup with Peter] really did overshadow, I felt, a happy moment for us, like one of the best moments of my life,” Rachel told Us Weekly.”
““I wish you were able to really see more of Bryan.”
“The finale was tough to watch, as Peter and Rachel seemed like a better match to many fans but Peter wasn’t convinced that he could be engaged after knowing someone for, like, six weeks (imagine that).”
“Rachel and Bryan are, too!”


"Whether you're team Bryan or team Peter walking into the end of Rachel, there's no doubt - she and Bryan are still in love, they don't care who knows."
"It wasn't just a take-off with Rachel. They really broke up in love. Rachel thinks it conceals the fact that she and Brian have found a long-term love."
"I really didn't talk to him because I had nothing else to say."
"For me, the reason there's so much emotion [in the end] is because it's the end for me, that's it," Rachel told us weekly
“…… It's taken away from him, and Peter and Rachel are not allowed to talk... "
"I've never been engaged before, and Brian and I feel that we are more defending our relationship and have to explain more than just show it, so I just hope you can really see Brian. I hate this..."
"It's really overshadowed our happy moments, like one of the best in my life," Rachel told weekly
"I wish you could see Brian more."
"It's hard to see the ending because Peter and Rachel seem to be a better match for many fans, but Peter doesn't believe he can get engaged after six weeks of meeting someone (imagine it),"
"So are Rachel and Brian!"



Number  1090
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“3 With Prince WilliamPrince William Attends Royal Event as Kate Middleton Awaits Third Baby’s ArrivalPrince William May Have Just Revealed the Gender of His and Kate Middleton's Third ChildRelated Gallery...”
“...the forecourt at the Palace...”
“3 is officially here!”
“Kate Middleton and Prince William have officially welcomed a baby boy, Kensington Palace confirmed in a statement on Monday.”
“Kate gave birth at 11:01 a.m. local time to a baby boy weighing 8 pounds, 7 ounces at the Lindo Wing of St. Mary's Hospital in London, England.”
“Prince William was present for the birth.”
“"Her Royal Highness and her child are both doing well," the statement from Kensington Palace reads.”
“"The Queen, The Duke of Edinburgh, The Prince of Wales, The Duchess of Cornwall, Prince Harry and members of both families have been informed and are delighted with the news."”
“The Duchess of Cambridge was admitted to the hospital early Monday morning with her husband by her side.”
“The Queen, The Duke of Edinburgh, The Prince of Wales, The Duchess of Cornwall, Prince Harry and members of both families have been informed and are delighted with the news.”


"3 Prince William is at the royal event and Kate Middleton is waiting for her third child. Prince William may have just revealed the gender of the gallery related to Kate Middleton's third child... "
“… The front yard of the palace... "
"The third is officially here!"
Kate Middleton and Prince William have officially welcomed a baby boy, Kensington Palace confirmed in a statement on Monday
"Kate gave birth to a baby boy weighing 8 pounds and 7 ounces at 11:01 a.m. local time at linduoyi, St Mary's Hospital in London, UK."
"Prince William was at the wedding."
"His highness and her children are very well," the Kensington Palace statement said
"The queen, the Duke of Edinburgh, the prince of Wales, the Duchess of Cornwall, Prince Harry and members of both families have been informed and are pleased with the news."
"The Duchess of Cambridge was admitted to the hospital early Monday morning, accompanied by her husband."
"The queen, the Duke of Edinburgh, the prince of Wales, the Duchess of Cornwall, Prince Harry and members of both families have been informed and are pleased with the news."



Number  1091
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See Photos Of The Mystery Mark...”
“Amy Poehler Sports Food On Her Feet For A Grocery Store Run — See PhotosPHOTOSIs That A Black Eye On 'Selling Sunset' Star Chrishell Stause?”
“See How His Recent Beach Shots Compare To The Instagram Thirst TrapsPHOTOSSay Cheese(burger Sneakers)!”
“LooksPHOTOSAre Max Ehrich's Abs Too Good To Be True?”
“Sarah Jessica Parker Models Sexy Shoes At Her Own Retail Boutique In New York CityPHOTOSHarry Styles Isn't Afraid To Break The Rules When It Comes To Fashion — See His Most Memorable (& Talked About!)”
“Take A Peek At Cobie Smulders & Taran Killam New Year's PurgePHOTOSIs That You, Manolo?”
“Being Involved In Several Love Triangles See Her Sexiest Photos PHOTOS Out With The Old In With The New...”
“PHOTOS Bad Boy Trey Songz Is No Stranger To Stripping Down On Stage See The Rapper s Sexiest Pics PHOTOS Kristin Cavallari Has Always Been A Hot Commodity On Reality TV See The Laguna Beach Alum s Most Daring Photos PHOTOS Southern Charm Star Madison LeCroy Is No Stranger To...”


"Look at the pictures of the mysterious mark..."
Amy poller was running in a grocery store with sports food on her feet - see the picture? "Is the star of selling sunset, Krisher Stass, black eyed?"
"Take a look at his recent photos on the beach and compare them with instagram shout trapsphotossay cheese!"
"Look at the picture. Is Max Ehrlich's ABS great?"
"Sarah Jessica Parker models sexy shoes at her own retail boutique in New York City. When it comes to fashion, she's not afraid to break the rules - look at his most memorable (and talked about!) "
"Look at the new year cleaning photos of Kobe smolder and Taran kiram. Is that you, Manolo?"
"Participated in several love triangle, saw her sexiest old photos, new photos..."
"It's not strange to take off your clothes and watch the sexiest picture of a rap singer on stage. Christine cavalari has always been a popular commodity on reality TV. It's not strange to see the boldest picture of alum on Laguna Beach and the southern glamour star Madison LeCroy..."



Number  1092
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“This is a time of reckoning.”
“UPDATE (1/9/18): Tessa Thompson has clarified her statements regarded Time’s Up and Lena Dunham in a Twitter post.”
“EARLIER: Tessa Thompson is among the many women taking part in the Time’s Up initiative, which made its presence felt at last night’s Golden Globes ceremony.”
“In an Instagram comment, the star of “Thor: Ragnarok” said planning for the red carpet the day before the event required “6 hours, 60 artists, 8 activists and a lot of coffee.” And one of those people, Thompson said, was not Lena Dunham.”
“In the celebratory photo Thompson posted yesterday are Michelle Williams, Billie Jean King, Rashida Jones, Susan Sarandon, Laura Dern — and, on the end of the middle row, far right, is Dunham.”
“The “Girls” creator and star has lain low of late; the last Tweet she wrote was an apology for casting doubt on Aurora Perrineau’s rape accusation.”
“And according to Thompson her participation in Time s Up planning was limited to the photo op Lena was not anywhere present in our group during the countless hours of work for the last two months Thompson s statement which came in response to several commenters questioning why Dunham was...”
“...in the picture at all reads in full Lena was not anywhere present in our group during the countless hours of work for the last two months...”
“We hosted an open house for actresses for red carpet messaging and Lena presence was a surprise to us all.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Now is the time for liquidation."
"Latest news (1 / 9 / 18): Tessa Thompson clarified her statement on twitter about the time and Lena Dunham."
"Earlier: Tessa Thompson was one of many women who took part in time magazine's action up, which made people feel its existence at the Golden Globe Awards ceremony last night."
The star of Raytheon: Ragnarok commented on instagram that it would take "six hours, 60 artists, eight activists and a lot of coffee" to prepare for the red carpet the day before the event Thompson said one of them was not Lena Dunham
"Thompson released photos of Michelle Williams, Billy Jean King, Rashida Jones, Susan Sarandon, and Laura Dean yesterday - Dunham is on the right in the middle row."
"The creator and star of this' girl 'has been keeping a low profile recently; her last tweet is an apology for suspecting Aurora Perino's rape charges."
"According to Thompson, her involvement in the planning of time magazine is limited to photos, and Lena has not been anywhere in our group during countless hours of work in the past two months. Thompson's statement responds to several commentators' questions about why Dunham is... "
“…… In the past two months, Li Na has not been anywhere in our group at all... "
"We held an open red carpet speech for the actresses, and Li Na surprised us all."



Number  1093
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 37-year-old chiropractor popped the question to Rachel Lindsay in Monday’s finale and now is ready for their happily ever after.”
“Bryan took to Instagram after the episode aired to pour out his heart to his future bride in a sweet video post.”
“WATCH: 'The Bachelorette': Rachel Lindsay and Fiancé Bryan Abasolo Dish on Their Relationship & Wedding Plans“Rachel my love, my rock!!”
“It's felt like forever, but the wait is finally over!!”
“!” he captioned the video, which was soundtracked by Brian McKnight’s “Back to One.” “No longer do I have to hide the fact that you are and always have been the one for me!”
“No longer do I have to keep secret how in love w you I truly am from the rest of the world!”He went on to gush about their proposal, saying, “Hearing you say ‘yes’ on the top of that castle in Spain was the greatest moment of my life!”
“I was optimistic about what could be prior to stepping out of that limo but never in my wildest dreams could I had foreseen us building such a strong foundation and deep bond in the last 6 months He also opened up about their journey after The Bachelorette as the...”
“...couple prepares to meet the press together on Tuesday...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 37 year old chiropractor asked Rachel Lindsey this question in Monday's final and is now ready for their happy life."
"After the episode, Bryan confided in his future bride in a sweet video post and went on instagram."
Watch: Bachelor: Rachel Lindsay and fiance Brian abasolo talk about their relationship and wedding plan "Rachel, my love, my rock!"
"It's like forever, but the waiting is finally over!"
"! he subtitled the video, which was voiced by Brian McKnight's back to one person," I don't have to hide that you're the only one for me anymore, and you'll always be the only one for me! "
"I don't have to hide how much I love you anymore. I really come from all over the world! He went on to talk about their proposal and said, "it's the greatest moment of my life to hear you say 'yes' on the top of a Spanish castle."
"I'm optimistic about the prospect of getting out of luxury cars before, but in my wildest dream, I never foresee that we have built such a solid foundation and deep bond in the past six months, and he has also opened their journey after Bachelorette."
"The couple are going to meet the media on Tuesday..."



Number  1094
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Especially because they say if you’ve had postpartum once, you have a higher chance of getting it with your next.””
“We were using protection and everything and still got pregnant.”
“Teen Mom OG star Catelynn Lowell is expecting her third child with husband Tyler Baltierra, they revealed to US Weekly.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Opening up about the pregnancy, Lowell admitted that the baby news came as a surprise to the couple.”
““The big news is that we are expecting our rainbow baby.”
“This baby is our rainbow after the storm.”
“I’m super excited,” Lowell told US.”
““It was a huge shock at first.”
“We were not planning it, especially after the miscarriage and how I went downhill with my mental illness.”Image zoom Credit: Kevin Mazur/WireImageShe added: “We were going to wait a really long time.”


"Especially because they say that if you've ever had a postpartum experience, you're more likely to experience it the next time."
"We used protection and everything, but we got pregnant."
"Teen mom og star catelyn Lowell is expecting her third child with her husband Tyler baltierra, they told us weekly."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Lowell made the pregnancy public and admitted that the news of the baby surprised the couple."
"The most important news is that we are looking forward to our rainbow baby."
"This child is our rainbow after the storm."
"I'm so excited," Lowell told us
"It was a huge shock at first."
"We don't have plans, especially after the abortion, and how I'm going down with mental illness." Image zooming credit: Kevin Mazu / wiremegeshe added: "we have to wait a long time."



Number  1095
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Salvation” averaged a 0.4 and 2.7 million viewers on CBS, while “Elementary” drew a 0.5 and 3.1 million.”
“Back-to-back episodes of “Castaways” on ABC drew a 0.6 and 3.3 million and a 0.6 and 3 million respectively.”
“Fox aired the special ” Inside the Manson Cult: The Lost Tapes,” which drew a 0.7 and 2.5 million viewers.”
“Very few broadcast originals aired against the Emmys.”
“This year’s Oscars telecast was down 24% in the key demo and 19% in total viewers compared to last year, while the Grammy Awards were down 23% in total the demo and 24% in total viewers.”
“This marks the latest instance of a major award show taking a hit in the ratings.”
“That also represents a new low in that measure for the Emmys telecast.”
“In metered market households, the awards show drew a 7.4 rating Monday night, down approximately 10% from an 8.2 last year.”
“For context, an episode of “America’s Got Talent” on NBC last Wednesday drew the same viewership as this year’s Emmys.”
“That is down only a scant few percentage points in the demo from the 2.5 rating the Emmys drew last year on CBS, but down 11% from the previous viewership low of 11.4 million viewers the Emmys drew in 2017 and 2016.”


Save's average ratings on CBS were 400000 and 2.7 million, compared with 500000 and 3.1 million for primary school
"ABC's successive episodes of" drifter "attracted $600000 and $3.3 million, and $600000 and $3 million, respectively."
Fox broadcast the special program inside the Manson cult: the lost tape, which attracted 700000 and 2.5 million viewers
"There are very few original shows against Emmy Awards."
"Compared with last year, the number of major presentations and audiences at the Oscars decreased by 24% and 19%, respectively, while the number of presentations and audiences at the Grammys decreased by 23% and 24%, respectively."
"This marks the latest example of a big award show that ratings have been hit."
"It also represents a new low for Emmy TV."
"Among the market families who pay by traffic, the award ceremony scored 7.4 on Monday night, down about 10% from 8.2 last year."
As a background, an episode of "America's got talent" broadcast on NBC last Wednesday attracted the same audience as this year's Emmy Awards
"This is only a few percentage points lower than the 2.5 ratings that Emmy received on CBS last year, but 11% lower than the 11.4 million ratings that Emmy received in 2017 and 2016."



Number  1096
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Listen, like, and subscribe to Bravo TV's The Daily Dish podcast on Apple Podcasts, Spotify, and Google Play, and make yourself part of the conversation by tweeting @Bravotv and using the hashtag #BravoDailyDish.”
“New episodes of Bravo's The Daily Dish are available on Thursdays.”
“Fans of Vanderpump Rules have experienced a roller coaster of emotions in Season 6.”
“From the season premiere, Brittany Cartwright and Jax Taylor were off to a rough start when cheating rumors around Jax bubbled to the surface and turned out to be true.”
“From there, the hits kept coming for Brittany and their relationship.”
“From audio recordings to reiki masters, last summer was a rocky road for Brittany, who stayed by her man after he cheated on her.”
“In her recent interview with The Daily Dish podcast, Brittany shared with hosts Rachael Roberts and Megan Segura all the ups and downs — and even the regrets — she had in her relationship last summer.”
“"I didn't really take time for myself after everything happened over the summer, like, after he cheated and everything," Brittany explained.”
“"I really didn't have time to just even get away from him."”
“This created a lot of confusing feelings for the Kentucky native.”


"Listen to, like and subscribe to Bravo TV's daily menu podcasts on Apple podcasts, spotify and Google play, via Twitter@Bravotv And use the label "Bravo dailydish" to make yourself part of the conversation
"Bravo's new episode of the daily menu will air on Thursday."
"Fans of the Vanderbilt rules went through an emotional roller coaster in season 6."
"Brittany Cartwright and Jacques Taylor have had a difficult start since the premiere of the season, when the deceptive rumors surrounding Jacques surfaced and finally proved to be true."
"Since then, Brittany's relationship with them has been under constant attack."
"From recording to Reiki Master, it was a rough road for Brittany last summer. After he cheated Brittany, Brittany was always with her man."
Brittany recently told hosts Rachel Roberts and Megan Segura about her ups and downs, and even regrets, in an interview with daily podcast
"After what happened all summer, for example, after he cheated, I didn't really spend time for myself," Brittany explained
"I really don't have time to leave him."
"It's a lot of confusion for people in Kentucky."



Number  1097
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more from Yahoo Entertainment:”
“I’ve waited my whole life to make this trip.”
“Story continuesHer smile kinda says it all.”
““I’m so grateful.” (Make sure you play this too because there are more great gorilla noises.)”
““I can’t begin to describe what this experience was like, or how much it means to me,” DeGeneres wrote.”
“She was more excited to spend time with the gorillas, watching them play and make gorilla noises.”
“Landing in Rwanda #ThisIsIt A post shared by Ellen (@theellenshow) on May 27, 2018 at 9:45am PDTOnce there, she got to sit at her hero’s desk, a moving moment for sure.”
“...pic.twitter.com/J2GNciu9Oy — Ellen DeGeneres (@TheEllenShow) May 31, 2018She was thrilled to touch down in the country.”
“She’s also said that as a kid, she read every word of a 1970 National Geographic cover story on Fossey that detailed her research camp in the Virunga Mountains of Rwanda.”
“...research and conservation activities enhance our educational and community programs and engage people from Rwanda and the world to join the effort on behalf of wild gorillas Depending on fundraising the goal is to open the facility by 2020”


"Read more about Yahoo Entertainment:
"I've been waiting all my life for this trip."
"The story goes on, and her smile says it all."
"I'm so grateful." (be sure to put this in too, because gorillas are loud.)
"I can't describe what the experience was like, or what it meant to me," DeGeneres wrote
"She's more excited to stay with gorillas, watch them play and make gorilla calls."
"Landing in Rwanda" is a post shared by Ellen (@ theEllenShow) at 9:45 a.m. on May 27, 2018. It must have been a touching moment for her to sit at the hero's desk there. "
“... pic.twitter.com/J2GNciu9Oy -Ellen DeGeneres (@ the EllenShow) May 31, 2018 she is very happy to be in this country
"She also said that when she was a child, she read every word of the 1970 cover story of fossi in National Geographic magazine, describing in detail her research camp in the veronga mountains in Rwanda."
“…… Research and conservation activities strengthen our education and community programs and attract people from Rwanda and around the world to join in efforts for wild gorillas, depending on funding. The goal is to open the facility by 2020. "



Number  1098
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...clash...”
“With the battle between the two artists having heated back up XXL looks back on the history of the beef from its onset compiling the key run ins diss tracks interviews and clashes that have added to this age old...”
“What ensued was one of hip-hop's longest-lasting, most-heated beefs—a conflict that's still simmering to this day.”
“Although the circumstances are murky, somewhere along the line, the two artists bumped heads, resulting in 50 Cent throwing down the gauntlet and waging war with Ja Rule and Murder Inc. as a staff, record label and as a crew.”
“Holla making him one of New York City s leaders of the new school...”
“While 50 Cent was considered a buzzworthy prospect at the time he was a relative unknown in comparison to Ja Rule who s own debut album Venni Vetti Vecci was certified platinum off the strength of the lead single Holla...”
“He quickly became known for calling rappers out by name on songs like his infamous 1999 single "How to Rob," which included jabs at heavyweights like JAY-Z, Ma$e, DMX and Big Pun.”
“Prior to becoming one of hip-hop's biggest success stories with his debut album Get Rich or Die Tryin', 50 Cent was an up-and-coming rapper looking to make his way in the game.”
“Few hip-hop feuds are as bitter as this rivalry between Queens music legends, which has spanned nearly two decades, powered by savage diss tracks, spiteful interviews that stoked the fires, social media bashing and physical altercations.”
“50 Cent and Ja Rule's beef is officially old enough to vote.”


“… Collision... "
"As the struggle between the two artists heats up, XXL reviews the history of beef from the beginning, editing the key running in diss, tracking interviews and conflicts, which adds to this ancient history..."
"What followed was the longest and most intense conflict in hip-hop music - a conflict that is still brewing."
"Although the situation is not clear, in one place, two artists collided with each other, leaving 50 cents behind the challenge and waging a war with Ja Rule and current Inc. as a staff member, record company and crew."
"Hora made him one of the leaders of the new school in New York City..."
"While 50 cents was considered a hot prospect at the time, he was a relatively unknown player compared to Jia rule, whose own debut album vinivitch was platinum certified by the strength of the leading single Hora..."
"He soon became famous for his role as a good rapper in 1999's infamous single how to rob, which included attacks on heavyweights like Jay-Z, Ma $e, DMX and big pun."
"Before becoming one of the biggest success stories of hip-hop music with its debut album get rich or die tryin, 50 cent was a budding rapper who wanted to make a difference in the game."
"Few hip-hop feuds are as fierce as the competition between the Queen's music legends, which has been going on for nearly 20 years, driven by savage diss tracks, malicious interviews that set off fires, social media attacks and physical conflicts."
"50 cents and jarur's beef is old enough to vote."



Number  1099
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"NCIS" airs Tuesdays, 8 p.m. on CBS.”
“She talked to "48 Hours" about her experience with a stalker.”
“The actress, who played forensic specialist Abby Sciuto, will sign off after the current season wraps.”
“On Wednesday, she cleared the air about her departure on Twitter and emphasized that there is no drama behind her decision.”
“She wrote: "There has been all kinds of false stories as to why (NO I DON'T HAVE A SKIN CARE LINE AND NO MY NETWORK AND SHOW ARE NOT MAD AT ME!)”
“It was a decision made last year.”
“I hope everyone will love and enjoy EVERYTHING ABBY not only for the rest of this season but for everything she has given all of us for 16 years.”
“All the love, all the laughter, all the inspiration…I love her as much as you do."”
“So it is true that I am leaving NCIS...”
“There have been all kinds of false rumors as to why NO I DON T HAVE A SKIN CARE LINE pic twitter com gugM2a2ckT Pauley Perrette PauleyP October 4 2017 Former NCIS cast member Lauren Holly tweeted You will be missed while former cast member Sasha Alexander said I love...”


"NCIS" is on CBS at 8 p.m. Tuesday
She talked to 48 hours about her experience with the stalker
"The actress, who plays Abby Sciuto, a forensic expert, will sign at the end of the season."
"On Wednesday, she clarified her resignation on Twitter and stressed that there was no drama behind her decision."
She wrote: "about why (no, I don't have a skincare line, and I don't have my network and programs that don't get angry with me!) There are all kinds of false reports
"It was a decision made last year."
"I hope everyone will like and enjoy Abby, not only for the rest of the season, but also for all of us over the past 16 years."
"All the love, all the laughter, all the inspiration I love her as much as you do
"So I'm really leaving NCIS..."
"On October 4, 2017, former NCIS actor Lauren Holly tweeted that you would be missed, while former actress Sasha Alexander said that I love you..."



Number  1100
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Justin Hartley This Is Us Matthew Macfadyen Succession Richard Schiff The Good Doctor Shea Whigham Homecoming BEST SUPPORTING ACTRESS IN A DRAMA SERIES Dina Shihabi Jack Ryan Julia Garner Ozark Thandie Newton Westworld Rhea Seehorn Better Call Saul Yvonne Strahovski The Handmaid s Tale Holly Taylor The Americans BEST COMEDY”
“Sorry For Your Loss Julia Roberts Homecoming Keri Russell The Americans Also Read Homecoming Yes Sam Esmail Knows the Geist Group Looks a Lot Like Mr Robot s E Corp BEST SUPPORTING ACTOR IN A DRAMA SERIES Richard Cabral Mayans M C Asia Kate Dillon Billions Noah Emmerich The Americans...”
“Hervé...”
“The nominations were a mixture of shows that were Emmy favorites Atlanta The Marvelous Mrs Maisel Barry Killing Eve new shows that were singled out by Golden Globes voters last week A Very English Scandal Homecoming The Kominsky Method and ones that are even newer Dirty John My Dinner With...”
“In the television categories, which are chosen by members of the BTJA, the final season of “The Americans” was the most-nominated series, while the limited series “The Assassination of Gianni Versace” and “Escape at Dannemora” were tops among movies and miniseries.”
“But even with the expanded slates of nominees, the Critics’ Choice nominations correctly predicted all five Oscar nominees in only two categories, Best Actress and Best Original Screenplay.”
“Also Read: Golden Globes Nominations Analysis: 'Vice' and 'Green Book' Emerge as Curious Front RunnersBecause of that, slightly fewer than 75 percent of last year’s Oscar nominees had first been Critics’ Choice Award nominees.”
“...claim accuracy as an Oscar predictor...”
“BFCA officials have said the expansions come because of close vote totals but the distribution of the supersized categories seven nominees in directing best actor and best actress six in almost everything else suggests a deliberate strategy to cast as wide a net as possible and make it easier to...”
“Not only have they added a number of comedy, action-movie and sci-fi/horror categories, but most of their categories have six or even seven nominees instead of the usual five.”


"Justin Hartley, this is Richard Schiff, our successor to Matthew mcfaden. Good doctor. Shea wham. Best supporting actress drama series. Dina shehabi. Jack Ryan Julia. Ghana. Ozak. Sandy Newton. Sylvia seahorn best calls sol Yvonne strahovsky a maid story. Holly Taylor is the best comedy in America."
"I'm sorry to lose you Julia Roberts Homecoming Day Kerry Russell Americans also read Homecoming Day is Sam esmell knows that gaster group looks like Mr. robot's best supporting actor in E company in a drama series Richard Cabral Mayan M C Asia Kate Dillon billion Noah Emmerich Americans..."
"Hervey..."
"Nominations are a hybrid of Emmy's most popular shows, the amazing Mrs. Messier Barry in Atlanta killed Eve. The new show was picked out by Golden Globes voters last week for a very British scandal. Comensky's method and those updated dirty John my dinner..."
"Among the TV shows selected by btja members, the last season of" American "is the most nominated series, while the limited series" the assassination of Versace "and" the escape of Danielle Mora "are the best in films and miniseries."
"But even if the nominations were expanded, the critics' choice of nominations correctly predicted that there were only two categories of nominations for all five Oscars, best actress and best original play."
"Please also read: Golden Globe nominations analysis: 'vice' and 'green paper' appear curious leaders. Because of this, slightly less than 75% of last year's Oscar nominations were critics' choice nominations for the first time."
“… Claiming Oscar prediction is accurate... "
"Bfca officials say the reason for the expansion is that the number of votes is close to the total, but the distribution of the seven Best Actor Nominees and six best actress nominees in the super category in almost all other aspects shows that it is a deliberate strategy to cast the net as widely as possible to make it easier..."
"Not only have they added nominations for comedy, action and science fiction / horror, but most categories have six or even seven nominees instead of the usual five."



Number  1101
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...he wrote.”
“"Baby Boy de Ravin-Bilitch coming soon!!"”
“Bilitch, a writer and director, shared the same snapshot on his own account.”
“@ericbilitch," the star captioned the picture.”
“Eric & I could not be more excited to share our happy news with y'all & Vera is over the moon about becoming a big sister!"”
“"Coming this fall...Baby boy makes 4!”
“She announced her pregnancy by posting a photo of herself holding up a positive pregnancy test.”
“De Ravin is already parent to 2-year-old daughter Vera Audrey with Bilitch.”
“The 36-year-old Australian actress said in an Instagram post Friday that she's expecting a baby boy with fiancé Eric Bilitch in the fall.”
“Emilie de Ravin is going to be a mom of two.”


“…… He wrote
"The little boy, delavin Bilich, is coming soon!"
"Author and director billige shared the same snapshot in his own name."
"@ ericblitch," the star wrote in the title of the picture
"Eric and I are very happy to share our good news with you. Willa is going to be a big sister!"
"This autumn is coming The baby boy is four years old! "
"She announced her pregnancy by posting a picture of herself holding a positive pregnancy test."
"Delavin is the parent of Bilic's 2-year-old daughter Vera Audrey."
"The 36 year old Australian actress said in an instagram post on Friday that she and her fiancee Eric Bilich will have a baby boy in the fall."
"Emily delavin will be a mother of two."



Number  1102
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: In PEOPLE’s The Best of HGTV Special Edition Get Up Close with Your Favorite Renovation and Real Estate StarsIt concluded, “We continue to be proactive with our efforts to ensure total compliance moving forward, and remain committed to raising awareness in our community and our industry.””
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
““Additionally, to take its commitment a step further, Magnolia Homes made the decision to implement a compliance management program in which it adopted an enhanced renovation record-keeping checklist for use by Magnolia Homes staff and subcontractors,” the Magnolia statement continued.”
“Shortly after being first contacted by the EPA three years ago, Magnolia Homes took immediate steps to bring its activities into compliance with [the Toxic Substances Control Act],” the statement said.”
““The United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) filed a complaint alleging that Magnolia Homes did not comply with all of the requirements of the RRP (Renovation, Repair and Painting) Rule.”
“Image zoom Joanna and Chip Gaines | Credit: Joanna Gaines/InstagramA Magnolia spokesperson addressed the EPA penalty in a statement to PEOPLE on Tuesday.”
“The Gaines have also opted to make further amends by spending $160,000 on a lead-paint abatement program for homes and child-occupied facilities in their hometown of Waco, Texas.”
“The couple’s company, Magnolia Homes, has agreed to pay a $40,000 civil fine and also made sure to demonstrate how to properly remove lead paint in an episode that aired in March.”
“From not following statutes to minimize risks from lead paint exposure to not covering floors and vents with plastic to capture paint chips, the EPA found multiple violations of regulations which are particularly important in homes built before 1978 are being renovated.”


"Related videos: get close to your favorite decoration and real estate stars in the people's best HGTV special edition," concludes, "we continue to work hard to ensure full compliance and continue to work to raise awareness in the community and the industry."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"In addition, in order to further fulfill its commitment, Mulan home has decided to implement a compliance management plan, in which Mulan home has adopted an improved maintenance record keeping list for Mulan home employees and subcontractors," the statement continued
"Shortly after the EPA first contacted Mulan house three years ago, Mulan house immediately took steps to bring its activities into compliance with [the toxic substances control act]," the statement said
"The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) filed a complaint alleging that the Mulan house did not meet all the RRP (renovation, repair and painting) requirements."
"Image zooming Joanna and chip Gaines | image source: Joanna Gaines / instagra a magnolia spokesperson talked about the EPA's punishment in a statement to people on Tuesday."
"The Gaines also opted for further compensation, spending $160000 on a lead paint emission reduction project at a home and children's home in Waco, Texas."
"Magnolia homes, the couple's company, has agreed to pay a $40000 civil fine and ensure that a demonstration on how to properly remove lead paint was broadcast in March."
"From non-compliance with regulations to minimizing the risk of lead paint exposure, to not using plastic to cover floors and vents to capture paint debris, the EPA has found a number of violations, particularly when houses built before 1978 are being renovated."



Number  1103
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our daily Hollywood newsletter and never miss a story.”
“Looking for more?”
“Hulu has released a first look at its upcoming adaptation of Joseph Heller’s Catch-22: a new round of photos featuring Clooney himself (taking a break from executive producing and directing), as well as Girls alum Christopher Abbott, Friday Night Lights fave Kyle Chandler, and more.”
“Debuting in spring 2019, the six-part limited series sees Abbott playing World War II Air Force bombardier Yossarian, who wants desperately to finish his service and leave military life behind.”
“But requirements for his discharge are continually changing, and there’s a “hilariously sinister” Catch-22 rule that prevents servicemen from citing mental health as a reason to depart.”
“As the series synopsis puts it a man is considered insane if he willingly continues to fly dangerous combat missions but a request to be removed from duty is evidence of sanity and therefore makes him ineligible to be relieved from duty In addition to Abbott s role as Yossarian...”
“Catch 22 also features Chandler as Colonel Cathcart Clooney as Scheisskopf House star Hugh Laurie as Major de Coverley as well as additional cast that includes Giancarlo Giannini Daniel David Stewart Rafi Gavron Jon Rudnitsky Tessa Ferrer Julie Ann Emery and more...”
“Clooney executive produces with Grant Heslov for Smokehouse Pictures, and Richard Brown and Steve Golin of Anonymous Content.”
“Luke Davies and David Michôd co-write and executive produce, while Clooney, Heslove and Ellen Kuras each direct two episodes.”
“For the moment, Hulu has yet to set an official premiere date beyond this coming spring.”


"Sign up for our daily Hollywood newsletter and never miss a story."
"Do you want any more?"
"Hulu has released the upcoming adaptation of Joseph Heller's" catch 22: a new round of photos of Clooney himself "(a break from executive production and director), as well as schoolgirl Christopher Abbott, Friday night light fave Kyle Chandler and so on."
"This six part limited edition series will premiere in the spring of 2019. Abbott will play Bombardier usarian, the World War II air force. He is eager to end his service and forget his military life."
"But the requirements for his discharge are constantly changing. There is also a" ridiculous and dangerous "military regulation 22, which forbids soldiers to leave on the grounds of mental health."
"As stated in the series of summaries, if a person is willing to continue to carry out dangerous combat tasks, he is considered to be insane, but the requirement to be removed is evidence of insanity, so he is not eligible to be removed except for Yossarian played by Abbott..."
"Catch 22" also includes Chandler as captain keskat Clooney, shaskopf house star Hugh Laurie as major covley, and other actors, including Giancarlo Giannini Daniel David Stuart Raffi gavron Jon rudnitsky Tessa Ferrer, Julie Ann Emory, etc
Executive Clooney collaborated with grant hesloff to produce smokehouse images, and Richard Brown and Steve Goering to produce anonymous content
"Luke Davis and David Mitch are co writers and executive producers, and Clooney, herslov and Ellen kulas each direct two episodes."
"Hulu has yet to set an official premiere date after this spring."



Number  1104
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Why is there a portrait of a cat Queen?”
“The uncanny valley is "a common unsettling feeling people experience when androids (humanoid robots) and audio/visual simulations closely resemble humans in many respects but are not quite convincingly realistic."”
“If you've ever seen an animation that looked a little too real (like The Polar Express) and found yourself entirely spooked by it, that's the uncanny valley.”
“Anyway, famed wax museum Madame Tussauds in Berlin unveiled their new live waxworks of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle, and...uh...I don't think I've ever seen anything this creepy.”
“The bizarre waxworks have our favorite royals deep into holiday celebrations and cradling Meghan's baby bump.”
“We're so deep into the uncanny valley we're basically in the Grand Canyon.”
“Getty ImagesHELLO THERE, THE ANGEL FROM MY NIGHTMARES.”
“Forget MarieClaire.com's Best Horror Films of 2018, because I have found it.”
“If I went to a holiday party and these wax figurines were there, I'm fairly certain I'd be looking around for the nearest axe.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Why is there a picture of Elvis Presley?"
"Mystery Valley" is "when robots (humanoid robots) and audio / video simulations are very similar to humans in many ways, but not very convincing and realistic, people usually feel uneasy."
"If you've seen an animation that looks a little too real (like polar express), and you find yourself completely scared by it, it's Mysterious Valley."
"In any case, the famous wax museum in Berlin, Madame Tussauds, has unveiled a new wax figure for Prince Harry and Megan marcel, and Er I don't think I've ever seen anything so horrible. "
"These fantastic wax figures allow our favorite royal family members to go deep into the festival celebrations and the little lumps holding Megan."
"We're in a mysterious valley, basically in the Grand Canyon."
"Getty Shiloh, the angel of my nightmare."
"Forget it MarieClaire.com Website because I found it
"If I go to a festival party and these wax figures are there, I'm sure I'll look around for the nearest axe."



Number  1105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[9]Filmography [ edit ]Jackson on January 15, 2009Singles [ edit ]Imma Do It Big (featuring T-Pain and One Chance)References [ edit ]”
“[6] After graduation, he moved to Los Angeles to pursue stand-up comedy and started at the Laugh Factory,[7] as well as opened for Wayne Brady and Chris Tucker.”
“He is known for his roles in the films Roll Bounce (2005), Tropic Thunder (2008), Percy Jackson & the Olympians: The Lightning Thief (2010), Lottery Ticket (2010), Big Mommas: Like Father, Like Son (2011), and Percy Jackson: Sea of Monsters (2013).”
“Background [ edit ]Jackson was born in Detroit, Michigan.”
“His mother, Beverly Yvonne, is a pastor.”
“His father, Bishop Wayne Timothy Jackson, is the senior pastor of Great Faith Ministries International, and author of the book Miracles Do Happen: The Power and Place of Miracles as a Sign to the World.”
“[1][2][3] His maternal grandfather, Royal Titus Bozeman, was a Pentecostal child preacher named a "Boy Wonder" by Indiana newspapers.”
“[4][5]Career [ edit ]Jackson attended West Bloomfield High School.”
“His role as Junior in the film Roll Bounce won him the 2006 Black Reel Award for Breakthrough Performance.”
“In 2013, he played Axel Foley's son in an unaired pilot for a Beverly Hills Cop TV series.”


"[9] film [Edit] Jackson's January 15, 2009 single [Edit] Emma do it big (featuring T-Pain and one chance) reference [Edit]"
"After graduation, he moved to Los Angeles to work in stand up comedy, starting with the laughter factory and opening for Wayne Brady and Chris Tucker."
"He is famous for his roles in the movies" bouncing ball "(2005)," tropical thunder "(2008)," Percy Jackson and the Olympians: the lightning thieves "(2010)," lottery "(2010)," big Mom: like Dad, like son "(2011) and" Percy Jackson: the sea of monsters "(2013)
Background [editor] Jackson was born in Detroit, Michigan
"His mother, Beverly Yvonne, is a priest."
His father, bishop Wayne Timothy Jackson, is a senior pastor of the Ministry of information technology and the author of miracles do happen: the power and status of miracles
His grandfather, Royal Titus Bozeman, was a Pentecostal children's missionary who the Indiana papers called "miracle boy."
"[4] [5] career [editor] Jackson attended West Bloomfield high school."
"His teenage role in the film" roll bounce "won him the 2006 black reel Award for his breakthrough performance in the film."
"In 2013, he played Axel Foley's son in a police TV series in Beverly Hills, when he was an absent pilot."



Number  1106
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just take a look at Vogue’s Editor in Chief, Anna Wintour, who mesmerized while remaining perfectly still.”
“But sometimes less is more.”
“Elle Fanning whipped her hair back and forth so enthusiastically, she had to run to the loo to fix her ponytail.”
“Even the most reserved guests took to twirling, laughing, and sashaying for the camera.”
““My daughter is going to be so embarrassed by that,” Crawford quipped on her way out.”
“The Balmain army—Cindy Crawford, Joan Smalls, Jourdan Dunn, Doutzen Kroes, and Alessandra Ambrosio—assembled in rhinestone frocks and put on their best faces.”
““That was your cardio!” Tisci cheered.”
“...to the walls and slithered to the ground as Riccardo Tisci applauded from the sidelines...”
“Léa Seydoux followed with a leggy number so good it compelled Willow to say to the French actress I just want to tell you that you re beautiful and I love you And Madonna dressed in a Givenchy bodysuit clung...”
“Siblings Jaden and Willow Smith performed an impromptu dance-off.”


"Look at Anna Wintour, the editor in chief of vogue. She's still perfectly, and she's fascinated."
"But sometimes less is more."
"Al fanning was whipping her hair back and forth so enthusiastically that she had to run to the toilet and tie her ponytail."
"Even the most conservative guests turn around, laughing, and shaking around the camera."
"My daughter would be embarrassed about that," Crawford quipped on the way out
"Cindy Crawford, Joan smalles, Jordan Dunn, dotzen cross and Alexandra Ambrosio of the balman army were all dressed up in Rhinestone robes."
"That's your aerobic exercise! "Cheer, tissy."
"When Ricardo tissi was clapping on the sidelines, he climbed up to the wall and fell to the ground..."
"L é a Seydoux is followed by a good number of long legs, which forces willow to say to the French actress," I just want to tell you that you are beautiful, I love you and Madonna in Givenchy's tights... "
"Brother and sister Jaden and Willow Smith improvised a dance."



Number  1107
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Happy Mother’s Day to all you kick ass Mamas out there!””
““This is the best Mother’s Day gift to me!”
“Nicole “Snooki” Polizzi clapped back at mommy-shamers in an Instagram post on Saturday, May 13.”
“The trouble appears to have started earlier in the day, when the Jersey Shore alum, 29, posted a photo that showed her putting makeup on her 2-year-old daughter, Giovanna.”
“Getting sissy ready for her dance recital.”
“This is the best Mother’s Day gift to me!”
“??”
“#mommysgirl #minime @essexdanceacademy A post shared by Nicole “Snooki” Polizzi (@snooki) on May 13, 2017 at 7:16am PDT“Getting ready for her dance recital,” Polizzi — who also has a son, Lorenzo, 4, with husband Jionni LaValle — captioned the pic that showed her applying mascara to her toddler’s lashes.”
“#mommysgirl #minime.”While a lot of commenters wrote that it was a cute pic and reminisced about getting their own daughters and granddaughters ready for dance recitals, some criticized the reality TV star for putting makeup on the little girl.”
“Well most of the time.)”


"Happy Mother's day, you stupid moms!"
"This is the best mother's Day gift for me!"
On Saturday, May 13, Nicole Polizzi published an article on instagram to fight back against "shameful mom."
"The trouble seems to have started earlier in the day when a 29 year old Jersey coast alumni released a photo showing her putting on make-up for her 2-year-old daughter, Giovanna."
"Prepare for her dance recital."
"This is the best mother's Day gift for me!"
“??”
“#mommysgirl# minime@essexdanceacademy  At 7:16 on the morning of May 13, 2017, Nicole, @Snooki, shared a post on PDT to prepare for her dance recital. Po Lizzie - she also had a son, 4 year old Lorenzo and her husband Gioni Ravale, writing under the title of the photo that she was putting mascara on toddlers.
Many critics think it's a lovely picture. Recalling the preparation of her daughter and granddaughter for the dance recital, some people criticized the reality TV star for dressing up the little girl
"Most of the time."



Number  1108
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We have contacted Chris' reps for comment.”
“Now Nia's lawyer is reportedly planning to file legal documents, demanding the singer pay up.”
“As he refused, he has reportedly stopped the payments altogether, with the site claiming he felt $15,000 was "ridiculous".”
“According to TMZ, Chris had been paying $2,500 a month towards his daughter, but Nia asked him for six times that in future - $15,000.”
“It comes amid reports Chris is in a child support battle with Royalty's mum Nia.”
“I Love u."”
“(Image: chrisbrownofficial/instagram)He wrote (with a whole load of love heart and cake emojis): "HAPPY BIRTHDAY TO MY LIL LADY ROYALTY!!!!”
“Selfie queen already, sorry Miley.”
“The singer posted THE most adorable snap of his tot on Instagram as she appears to have just got out the bath and his sticking her tongue out at the camera.”
“And while most of us get burdened with an embarrassing dad photo at some point on our big days, Royalty has got it early on in life.”


"We have contacted Chris's representative for advice."
"It's reported that now NIA's lawyers are planning to submit legal documents to ask the singer to pay."
According to reports, he has completely stopped paying because of his refusal, and the website claims that he thinks $15000 is "ridiculous"
"According to TMZ, Chris gives his daughter $2500 a month, but NIA asks him to pay another six times - $15000 in the future."
"There are reports that Chris is fighting a child rearing battle with royal mother NIA."
"I love you."
(picture: Chris Brown official / instagram) he wrote (full of love and cake expression): "Happy Birthday to my little princess, the royal family!"
"The selfie queen has come. I'm sorry, Miley."
"The singer posted the cutest picture of his child on instagram because she seemed to have just taken a bath and he stuck out his tongue in front of the camera."
"Although most of us worry about an embarrassing picture of our father at some point in our big day, the royal family has this picture for a long time."



Number  1109
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““When we go out on date nights we talk more and it’s just brought us together on a different level than before.”Image zoom Jordin Sparks and DJ | Credit: Coral Von Zumwalt...”
““We’ve bonded and connected even more,” says Isaiah.”
“Jordin Sparks and Dana Isaiah s Son DJ Has Bonded the Newlyweds We went from being two individuals to being one to preparing to bring a child into this world Isaiah 26 tells PEOPLE exclusively about becoming parents to son DJ on May 2 just 10 months after he and...”
“Sparks eloped...”
““It was a real whirl.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Though the newlyweds — who met for the first time last April and wed during an impromptu wedding ceremony in Hawaii three months later — were understandably overwhelmed when they first found out they were expecting a baby, they dived head-first into preparing for parenthood.”
“Image zoom Jordin Sparks, Dana Isaiah and DJ | Credit: Coral Von ZumwaltWatch the full episode of People Features: Jordin Sparks – And Baby Makes Three, streaming now on PeopleTV.com, or download the PeopleTV app on your favorite device.”
““It’s transformed both of us,” the singer, 28, says about expanding their family.”
““I feel like as humans we should always be trying to be better and trying to grow.”
“With him, it’s just expedited the process.”


"When we go out on date night, we talk more, which brings us together on a different level." Image zooming: jodin sparks and DJ | source: Coral von Zumwalt “
Isaiah said, "we are more connected."
"Jordin Sparks and Dana Isaiah's son DJ connect the newlyweds. We've changed from two to one, ready to bring our children to the world. Isaiah 26 tells people that on May 2, just 10 months after his son DJ became a parent, he and..."
"Sparks eloped..."
"It's a real whirlwind." Get news, features and more about push notifications
"Although the newlyweds - who first met in April last year and had an impromptu wedding in Hawaii three months later - were understandably overburdened when they first found out they were pregnant, they plunged into parenting."
"Image zooming: jottin sparks, Dana Isaiah and DJ | image source: Coral von Zumwalt watch the complete episode of" people's close up: jottin sparks and baby make three ", now it's playing people's TV network, or download the peopletv application on your favorite device. “
"It changed both of us," the 28 year old singer said of expanding their family
"I think as human beings, we should always strive to become better and grow up."
"For him, it's just speeding up the process."



Number  1110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thor: Ragnarok is now available on Digital HD, and will premiere on Blu-ray and DVD on March 6th.”
“But at the moment that's it."”
“Including star Chris Hemsworth, who is using the opportunity to indoctrinate his children!”
“The actor posted a video to social media featuring his kids watching the film on an iPad, proud that he's "brainwashing" them into becoming Marvel- no, THOR fans.”
“Check it out in the video below.”
“To be fair, this is a marked improvement from the last update about Hemsworth's kids and their fondness for superheroes.”
“He previously told E!”
“...that they preferred a different god from the DC Comics' pantheon.”
“"They want to be Wonder Woman, both my sons and my daughter," Hemsworth said.”
“"Yep, that's alright, I love Wonder Woman, it's cool.”


Raytheon: Ragnarok is now available in Digital HD and will premiere on Blu ray and DVD on March 6
"But that's how it is right now."
"Including the star Chris Hemsworth, who is using this opportunity to inculcate ideas in his children!"
The actor posted a video on social media about his children watching the movie on their iPad, and he "brainwashed" them and made them Marvel fans - no, Thor fans
"Please see it in the video below."
"To be fair, this is a significant improvement over the last update about the children of Hemsworth and their love of superheroes."
"He told me before!"
“… They prefer a god different from the pantheon of Washington comics. "
"They want to be amazing women, including my son and daughter," hensworth said
"Yes, it doesn't matter. I love wonder woman. It's cool."



Number  1111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I will carry your words with me for the rest of my days.” Several women groaned when he faced them and sobbed as he spoke.”
“...shaken me to my core...”
“Given an opportunity to address the court before sentencing Dr Nassar apologized to the young women and occasionally turning to them in the courtroom said Your words these past several days have had a significant effect on myself and have...”
““I just signed your death warrant,” she said as she imposed the sentence.”
“Judge Rosemarie Aquilina, who had opened her courtroom to the young women, including several prominent Olympic athletes, bluntly made clear that Dr. Nassar, 54, was likely to die in prison.”
“...young women to publicly confront him and speak of their abuse...”
“LANSING Mich The former doctor for the American gymnastics team Dr Lawrence G Nassar was sentenced to 40 to 175 years in prison on Wednesday for multiple sex crimes capping an extraordinary seven day hearing that drew more than 150”


"I'll take your words with me for the rest of my life." When he faced them, several women moaned and sobbed as they spoke
“… Shocked my heart... "
"Having the opportunity to address the court before sentencing, Dr. Nasar apologized to these young women and occasionally turned to them in court to say that your words these days have had a great impact on me, and
"I just signed your death warrant," she said in sentencing
"Judge rosemary Aquilina, who opened the court to young women, including several famous Olympic athletes, said bluntly that Dr. Nasar, 54, was likely to die in prison."
“…… Young women confront him openly and talk about their abuse... "
"Lawrence g. Nassar, a former U.S. gymnastics doctor, was sentenced to 40 to 175 years in prison for a number of sexual crimes on Wednesday, ending a seven-day special hearing that attracted more than 150 people."



Number  1112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s what it felt like.”But overall, the night ended on a high note for Kenny: Host Chris Harrison surprised him by bringing out his daughter Mackenzie — and gifted the two with tickets to Disneyland.”
“To me, it was very reactionary.”
“DeMario had the opportunity to acknowledge, apologize and move on from the whole Lexi situation — or at the very least, calmly explain his side of the story — but alas, he did not.”
“DeMario, DeMario, DeMario.”
“DeMario didn’t do himself any favors.”
“3.”
“Thankfully ABC only allowed him enough screen time to utter a single “whaboom.” And that was still one too many.”
“Whaboom is still the worst.”
“Surprise!”
“2.”


"That's how it felt at the time." But overall, Kenny had a good night: host Chris Harrison surprised him by bringing out his daughter Mackenzie and gave them tickets to Disneyland
"For me, it's very reactionary."
"Demario had a chance to admit, apologize and move from the whole Lexi situation - or at least, calmly explain his story - but unfortunately, he did not."
"Demario, demario, demario."
"Demario didn't help himself in any way."
“3.”
Thankfully, ABC only gave him enough screen time to say a bang, but it was too much
"Prosperity is still the worst."
"Surprise
“2.”



**Something goes wrong**
“Her father, “Partridge Family” star David Cassidy, passed away last year.”
“I ❤️ YOU to the moon and back @mattyice432 Thank you for a magical evening I will forever remember.”This is Cassidy’s first marriage.”
““I’m the luckiest girl in the whole world.”
““I can’t wait to spend forever with you my darling,” she shared.”
“Cassidy, 32, announced her engagement to Rodgers back in June 2017.”
“#MrsRodgers I love you my husband,” the bride gushed on Instagram.”
“It’s official!”
““I can’t help falling in love with you… YES!”
“...over the weekend...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Katie Cassidy is officially a Mrs On Sunday the Arrow actress revealed she married fiancé Matthew Rodgers in Sunset Key Florida...”


Her father, David Cassidy, star of the partridge family, died last year
"I ❤️  Thank you for giving me a wonderful night, I will always remember it. "This is Cassidy's first marriage."
"I'm the luckiest girl in the world."
"I can't wait to be with you forever, honey," she said
"Cassidy, 32, announced her engagement to Rogers as early as June 2017."
"Mr. Rutgers, I love you, my husband," the bride gushed on instagram
"It's official!"
"I can't help falling in love with you Yes
“… Weekend... "
"Click to send this email to a friend to open in a new window click to share on Twitter to open in a new window click to share on Facebook to open in a new window Katie Cassidy officially became Mrs. arrow actress revealed on Sunday that she married her fiance Matthew Rogers in sunset base, Florida..."



Number  1114
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Paramount is opening the movie on April 6.”
“Production began in September of 2016.”
“The couple married in 2010.”
“Noah Jupe and Millicent Simmonds star as the children in a “Quiet Place.” It’s the first time that Krasinski and Blunt have appeared on screen together.”
“Krasinski and his Sunday Night Productions partner Allyson Seeger will serve as executive producers alongside Beck and Woods.”
“Michael Bay will produce along with his partners Andrew Form and Brad Fuller of Platinum Dunes.”
“Krasinski previously helmed “The Hollars” and “Brief Interviews With Hideous Men” in 2009.”
“Krasinski is directing from a script he wrote, revising the screenplay from Scott Beck and Bryan Woods, which the studio acquired prior to Krasinski and Blunt’s involvement.”
“If they can’t hear you, they can’t hunt you.”The trailer features a creepy wooden crucifix on a bridge, the family attempting to play Monopoly, and a fire starting when a lantern is knocked over.”
“The tagline reads, “Listen closely, move carefully, and never make a sound.”


"Paramount will be on April 6."
"Production started in September 2016."
"The couple got married in 2010."
Noah Juppe and Millicent Simmonds play children in quiet places. It's the first time krazinski and Bronte have been on the screen together
"Krazinski and his Sunday night production partner Allyson Seeger will be executive producers with Beck and woods."
"Michael Bay will work with his partners Andrew Frome and Brad Fuller to produce" Platinum Dunes. "
Krazinski was in charge of "horars" and "interview with ugly man" in 2009
"Kraschinsky was directed by a script he wrote, modifying the scripts of Scott Baker and Brian woods, which the studio acquired before kraschinsky and Bronte got involved."
"If they don't hear you, they can't go after you." In the trailer, there is a creepy wooden cross on the bridge. The family tries to play monopoly game, and a lantern catches fire when it is knocked over
The slogan read, "listen carefully, move carefully, don't make a sound."



Number  1115
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“Don’t call it a torch-passing, but a torch-sharing.”
“At last night’s Glamour Women of the Year Awards, held at Brooklyn’s historic Kings Theatre, the lauded magazine handed out its annual awards to the women who have made the biggest mark on 2017 in all areas, from politics to culture, sports to journalism.”
“Honoree “Wonder Woman” director Patty Jenkins was hailed for her work on the smash hit superheroine film, and original Wonder Woman Lynda Carter was on hand to introduce a gamechanger who she’s very happy to also call her friend.”
“Can’t we all be Wonder Women together?”
““She got the essence of Wonder Woman because it lives inside her,” Carter said.”
“She took the challenge of this miracle of an idea and a 70s iconic TV show and she made the she become the we on the big screen all over the world In a tribute video dedicated to Jenkins the filmmaker opened up about her own path to Hollywood success...”
“...explaining that in her early years in the industry she encountered a lack of interest a lack of opportunity I just had gotten used to it and kept trudging forward...”
“All of the success that I have seen in Hollywood behind the scenes is pure perseverance Wonder Woman star Gal Gadot also weighed in saying in that same video Patty s legacy for women in Hollywood is basically paving the way to so many of us and so many female...”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"
"Don't call it passing the torch, but sharing it."
"At the annual glamour women's awards ceremony at Brooklyn's historic King's Theatre last night, this award-winning magazine presented the annual awards to women who achieved the most in politics, culture, sports and journalism in 2017."
"Award winning" Wonder Woman "director Patty Jenkins is highly praised for her role in the blockbuster superhero movie. Original Wonder Woman Linda Carter also introduced a game changer, and she is very happy to call her a friend."
"Can't we be amazing women together?"
"She got the essence of wonder woman because it lives in her," Carter said
"She accepted the challenge of the creative miracle and the iconic TV show of the 1970s. In a Memorial Video dedicated to Jenkins, she made her" we "on the big screen all over the world. Jenkins tells about her own road to Hollywood success... "
“… She explained that in her early career, she encountered a lack of interest and opportunities. I just got used to it and continued to trudge forward... "
"All the success I see behind the scenes in Hollywood is pure perseverance. Marvel actress Gail gado also said in the same video that Patty's legacy to Hollywood women is basically to pave the way for so many of us and so many women..."



Number  1116
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The collection will be available starting at 9 a.m. PT.”
“For more info on Kids Supply drop 3, click here.”
“The inaugural collection saw a variety of Calabasas-themed pieces, including a cameo hoodie and a long-sleeve flames tee.”
“I'm so excited about this."”
“"Kids Supply has been what we've been working on for a long time.”
“"For the past few years Kanye and I have made almost all of our kids clothes and we have collaborated on a new kids line," Kardashian said at the time.”
“CloseThe long-teased line launched its first collection back in May.”
“Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply The latest drop follows previous releases from the Kardashian Wests children s line including customizable Yeezys and sketchbook denim jackets...”
“Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply...”
“Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via Kids Supply Image via...”


"The collection will go on sale at 9 a.m. est."
"For more information about children's products launch 3, click here."
"There were various karabasas themed works at the first collection, including a cameo Hoodie and a long sleeve flame T-shirt."
"I'm excited."
"Children's products are what we have been working on for a long time."
"Kanye and I have made almost all of our children's clothing in the past few years, and we have also worked together to develop a new children's collection," Kardashian said at the time
"Close the long challed line launched its first collection as early as may."
"Image via kids supply the latest image via kids supply models follow the early versions of the Kardashian West children's collection, including the customizable yeezys and sketchbook denim jacket..."
"Through kids supply image through kids supply image through kids supply image through kids supply image through kids supply image through kids supply image through kids supply image through kids supply image..."
"Images via kids supply images via kids supply images via kids supply images via kids supply images via kids supply images via kids supply images via kids supply images via kids supply images via kids supply images..."



Number  1117
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The hopeful quality of the show in a landscape that has a lot of crime and whatnot, we give people hope."”
“Now I'm like, I don't know that.”
“Drama Series nominee Milo Ventimiglia channeled his inner Jack Pearson on the red carpet reflecting on the many life lessons that come with turning the big 4 0”
“Milo celebrated the milestone birthday only a few a months ago, which he described as "pretty great" when chatting with E!”
“News' Giuliana Rancic.”
“"I turned 40," the actor shared.”
“"It was pretty great.”
“One of my older sisters sent me an 'Over the Hill' hat.”
“I can finally wear that not that I've arrived into complete manhood.”
“"So now that he's officially 40, is there anything Ventimiglia knows now more than ever before?”


"In a place with a high crime rate, we give people hope."
"Now I think, I don't know."
"On the red carpet, Milo Ventimiglia, the drama series nominator, conveyed his innermost thoughts to Jack Pearson and reflected on many life lessons when the 40th anniversary came."
"Milo just celebrated his milestone birthday a few months ago, and when he chatted with E, he described it as" pretty good! "
"Giuliana ranch news"
"I'm 40 years old," the actor said
"Great."
"One of my sisters gave me a" roller coaster "hat."
"I can finally put on that dress, but it's not that I'm an adult."
"So now that he's 40, is there anything he knows better than ever?"



Number  1118
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Click through the gallery above to see all of their hottest photos to date!”
“Beneath her leather boy shorts, Nikki wore a pair a fishnet tights, only adding to the sex appeal of the photo.”
“Nikki & Brie Bella celebrate their birthday on Nov. 21, and we’re having a celebration of our own with their all-time hottest photos.”
“Nikki Bella & Brie Bella are the ultimate dynamic duo.”
“The twin sisters are WWE superstars, but when they’re not in the ring, they’re still commanding attention with their undeniable sex appeal.”
“The two brunette goddesses have it all: perfectly toned bodies, stunning faces, and gorgeous long locks.”
“These ladies don’t only kick butt in the WWE ring, but IRL too!”
“Join us in taking a look at all of the twin’s hottest photos to date.”
“Nikki posted a snap on Nov. 7 that had our hearts beating a little faster.”
“The wrestler posed in just a bra top and tight leather boy shorts for her 8 million followers, and she was looking hotter than ever!”


"Click on the gallery above to see their most popular photos so far!"
Nicky was wearing a pair of leather pants and a fishnet tights, which just made the photo more sexy
"Nikki and Brie Bella celebrate their birthdays on November 21, and we celebrate our birthdays with their hottest photos ever."
"Nicky Bella and Bree Bella are the most dynamic combination."
"The twin sisters are WWE Superstars, but when they are not in the ring, they still attract attention with undeniable sexuality."
"These two black haired goddesses have everything: perfect body, charming face, gorgeous long hair."
"These ladies are not only kicking butt in WWE ring, but also IRL!"
"Let's take a look at all the hottest photos of the twins so far."
"Nicky posted a snapshot on November 7, which made our heart beat a little faster."
The wrestler, who only wears a bra and leather tights to photograph 8 million fans, looks sexier than ever



Number  1119
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Macaulay Culkin Says He Wants to Have Kids With Girlfriend Brenda SongMacaulay Culkin Says He Stays Indoors at Christmastime to Avoid Intense ‘Home Alone’ FansParis Jackson Wishes Godfather Macaulay Culkin a Happy Birthday: 'Make 37 Your B**ch'Related Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Macaulay Culkin Opens Up About His Bond With Paris Jackson This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Check out the video below to hear more from the interview.”
“It’s great."”
“When asked simply how Paris is doing, the Home Alone star answered, "She’s tall, and beautiful and smart.”
“"I am a very open book when it comes to things but like with her, she is beloved by me."”
“"I'm going to warn you now, I am very protective of her so just look out," the actor said when Maron broached the subject.”
“Culkin -- who is also the godfather to the King of Pop's two sons, Michael "Prince" Jackson Jr., 21, and Prince "Blanket" Jackson II, 16 -- admitted that he's "very protective" toward the Sound Flowers singer during a conversation with Marc Maron on his WTF podcast back in January.”
“Always."”


"Embedded code restart" content: Macaulay Calkin he said he wanted to have a baby with his girlfriend Brenda Sanger Macaulay Calkin he said he stayed at home at Christmas to avoid nervous "alone at home" fans sparis Jackson happy birthday to Godfather Macaulay Calkin: "make 37 your b * * ch related gallery..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Macaulay Calkin disclosed his relationship with Paris Jackson, and this video can't be played because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"Check out the video below to learn more about the interview."
"Great."
When asked simply about Paris, the lone star replied, "she's tall, beautiful and smart."
"I'm a very open-minded person, but like her, she's my love."
"I'm going to warn you now that I'm very protective of her, so be careful," the actor said when Malone raised the subject
Kalkin, who is also the godfather of the pop king's two sons, 21-year-old Prince Michael Jackson and 16-year-old Prince Jackson II, admitted in a talk with mark Malone on WTF Podcast in January that he was "very protective" of the voice flower singer
"Always."



Number  1120
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The after party was hosted in the Dartmoor Suite ballroom where people danced the night away until the early hours of the morning.”
“The lovebirds were happily married in the Cathedral Room at the stately home before guests toasted to the couple's happiness with a glass of champagne.”
“Making the romantic snap more light-hearted however, the filmmaker wrote teasingly beside it: 'So... what did you get up to this weekend?'”
“The duo, who share a twenty-year age gap, look more loved-up than ever in the snap as they posed on a bridge in the stunning Bovey Castle grounds, gazing into each other's eyes.”
“Meanwhile Dustin shared a more intimate moment of the day to commemorate their union - posting a photo of him and Tom clasping hands after the ceremony, away from their family and friends.”
“The pair sports their matching wedding bands as they headed out for continued celebrationsHe then followed the caption up with the playful hashtag '#NoRomeo'.”
“...s native Plymouth Put a ring on it...”
“The newlyweds were then looking slightly bleary eyed on Monday as they stepped out in London following a weekend of celebrations Honeymoon period The newly married couple headed out for a Bucks Fizz lunch in London together for the first time since their lavish wedding at Bovey Castle in Tom...”
“Partied too hard?”
“Thank you to everyone who made this weekend the most special weekend of our lives!'”


"The post conference Party was held in the Dartmoor suite ballroom, where people danced all night until early in the morning."
"The couple married happily in the cathedral room of their solemn home, and then the guests drank a glass of champagne to the couple's happiness."
However, to make the romantic scene easier, the filmmaker jokingly wrote: "so... What are you going to do this weekend
"The two are 20 years old apart. They are photographed together on a bridge at the amazing Bowie Castle stadium, gazing into each other's eyes. They are more loved than ever in the camera."
At the same time, Dustin also shared a more intimate moment to commemorate their union - after the ceremony, he and Tom took a group photo away from family and friends
"The two continued to celebrate with matching wedding rings, and then she put an interesting label behind the title," no Romeo. "
“… Plymouth put a ring on it... "
"The newlyweds spent a weekend celebrating their honeymoon in London, and on Monday they walked out with hazy eyes. This is their first time to have an American lunch in London after their grand wedding at Tom's bovis castle... "
"The party was too fierce?"
"Thank you all for making this weekend the most special weekend in our lives!"



Number  1121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...twitter com cGl269tuTr AALIYAH LEGION AaliyahLegion April 1 2020”
“Her discography is deeply underestimated and we need to make it right for our jerrica jerricaofficial March 29 2020 Before Megan The Stallion drove the boat Aaliyah rocked the boat FreeAaliyahMusic pic twitter com iXNwssD3sY Al Bei _albei March 29 2020 i think we should have that conversation FreeAaliyahMusic pic...”
“"I don't think Aaliyah gets the vocal credit that she deserves.”
“"It was amazing, she was incredible from top to bottom," he told OkayPlayer of working with the singer on "Come Over" and "I Don't Wanna."”
“With Aaliyah's music getting the attention it deserves, Johnta Austin discussed the singer's impact on R&B today.”
“The singer recently re-recorded her first two albums.”
“There's also JoJo, who had to break from the label after they refused to release her third album.”
“Recordings from Timbaland and Toni Braxton have been hidden from the world with both taking legal action against the label over the years.”
“Sadly, Aaliyah's music isn't the only recordings lost in the shuffle.”
“The deal was made in 1996 when Blackground featured artists like Aaliyah, Toni Braxton, R. Kelly, then-production duo Timbaland and Magoo as well as Missy Elliott.”


“… Twitter com cgl269tutr Aaliyah Legion Aaliyah Legion April 1, 2020 "
"Her intervertebral disc is seriously underestimated. We need to prepare for our official competition of jellica jellica on March 29, 2020 before Megan (stallion) drives the boat. Aaliyah shakes the boat to free aaliyahmusic pic twitter com ixnwssd3sy al Bei on March 29, 2020, I think we should have a free dialogue of aaliyahmusic pic..."
"I don't think Elia got the credit she deserved."
"It's amazing, she's incredible from top to bottom," he told okayplayer of "come here" and "I don't want to" that he worked with the singer
"With Elia's music getting the attention it deserves, John TA Austin today discussed the singer's influence on R & B."
"The singer recently re recorded her first two albums."
"And Jo Jo, after they refused to release her third album, she had to break the shackles of the record company."
"The records of Timbaland and Toni Braxton have been concealed for years, and both companies have taken legal action against the record company."
"Unfortunately, Aria's music is not the only record lost in the shuffle."
"The deal was made in 1996, when blackground invited artists like Aaliyah, Toni Braxton and R. Kelly, followed by filmmakers Timbaland and Magoo and miss Elliott."



Number  1122
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Scott Disick Approves of Khloe Kardashian's 'Unbelievable' BF Tristan ThompsonSee more on Khloe's relationship with Thompson in the video below.”
“"[Out of] six."”
“...a brothel in Nevada...”
“"I landed in London and the first text that popped into my phone was from Kim and it had said that Lamar passed away.”
“And I immediately started sobbing on the plane," Kendall said of her hardest day to work over the last 10 years.”
“"Then I got the next text came through, saying, 'OK, actually, he's OK, but he's not doing well.'”
“So that's why I was so upset, because I wanted to be there to say goodbye."”
“"On the plane, they said he died," shared Khloe, who put her divorce from Odom on hold to care for him after his hospitalization.”
“"Someone faked it."”
“RELATED: Khloe Kardashian Never Wanted to Film Kim’s Robbery or Caitlyn Jenner’s Transition: ‘This Is Our Life’"I was screaming," she continued.”


"Related report: Scott disc agrees with Khloe Kardashian's' incredible 'boyfriend Tristan Thompson see, who tells more about the relationship in the following video."
"[total] six."
"Brothels in Nevada"
"When I landed in London, the first text message popped up on my mobile phone was from Kim. It said Lamar had passed away."
"I immediately started crying on the plane," Kendall said of her hardest day in the past 10 years
"Then I got the next text message saying," well, actually, he's OK, but he's not doing well. "
"So I'm sad because I want to say goodbye there."
"On the plane, they said he was dead," heloy said, postponing her divorce after Odom was hospitalized to take care of him
"Someone faked it."
"Related story: Clarke Daisy never wanted to film the robbery of king or the transformation of Caitlin Jenner: 'this is our life'," I screamed, "she continued."



Number  1123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, I wish it was caused by circumstances other than Hurricane Harvey — I would have enjoyed the moments better."”
“Never miss a parenting story on TODAY.com!”
“"In class called oral history at new school," the text read.”
“"Kerubo behind me."”
“Omete's older sister, Kerubo Anassi, quickly responded, "Get out before we start please!”
“Go.”
“Mommy, come get him."”
“Omete Anassi tweeted this funny text exchange between his family last week.”
“Omete Anassi Omete tweeted the exchange which includes a series of selfies taken by his father with an explanation My pops can t fly back to Houston cause of the hurricane so he s going to grad school with my...”
“...sister...”


"However, I hope it's caused by something other than hurricane Harvey - I'll enjoy the moment more."
"Never miss a story about your parents!"
"In a new school called oral history," it says
"Krib behind me."
"Omey's sister, krupo anasi, quickly replied," before we get out, we start inviting you! "
"Go ahead."
"Mom, come and get him."
"Omet anasi tweeted this interesting text exchange between his family last week."
"Omete anasi omete tweeted a series of self portraits of his father, explaining that my father couldn't fly back to Houston because of the hurricane, so he wanted to talk to my Go to graduate school together. "
“… Sister... "



Number  1124
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments!”
“Source: MEGADo you think Penelope and Javier will act in another movie together?”
“Actor Edgar Ramirez co-starred with Penelope in American Crime Story: The Assassination of Gianni Versace.”
“Source: MEGAThey even had friends show up in support!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGADean Nichols, who produced the movie, was neatly tied together in a traditional black suit.”
“Source: MEGAThe director of the film, Fernando Leon de Aranoa, looked humbled by the attention as he held his hand over his black blazer.”
“Julieth Restrepo, who plays Pablo Escobar's wife Maria Victoria Henao, was seen on the carpet in a long green sequined gown with a high leg split.”
“News, "I love working with him but it’s not something we want to do every year or every couple of years.”Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGAPenelope and Javier were joined by a few of their co-stars.”
“News, “It’s easy for the family ­– for family purposes.” and he continued to compliment her by saying, “She’s a great colleague and that’s what makes it easy.”Source: MEGAAlthough working with each other has been easy Penelope told E!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGAWhen questioned about working with his wife Javier told E!”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"Do you think Penelope and Javier will be in another movie together?"
"Actor Edgar Ramirez and Penelope co starred in the American crime story: the assassination of Jennie Versace
"Source: they even have friends present to support them!"
The article continues with the following advertising source: megardine Nichols, who produced the film, neatly tied together in a traditional black suit
"Photo source: Director Fernando Leon de aranoa looks humble with his hand on his black coat."
Juliet Restrepo plays Barbaro escoba's wife, Maria Victoria Henao, in a green sequined gown with her legs open
"News," I love working with him, but it's not something we want to do every year or every two years. "The article continues with the following advertising source: megapenelope and Javier joined several of their co stars."
"News," it's easy for the family
The article continues with the following ad source: megar told e when asked to work with his wife Javier



Number  1125
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“However, Kim has now revealed she can't wait for her youngest daughter and her newborn niece, Kylie Jenner's baby girl, to become best friends as they grow up, too.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Following the birth of daughter Chicago West last month and Kylie's daughter last week, the 36-year-old has taken to her website to congratulate her sister on the birth of her first child.”
“On her website, Kim wrote: 'Mommy Kylie!!!”
“You did it!!!”
“I'm so incredibly proud of the woman you have grown up to be and I know that you are going to be the best mom to your new baby girl!'”
“Getty ImagesThe star - who's daughter Chicago made her debut to the world in Kylie's pregnancy video - also wrote about her excitement at the fact their daughters were born weeks apart.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"However, Kim has now revealed that she can't wait for her little daughter and the baby girl of her newborn niece, Kelly Jenner, to grow up to be her best friend."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Kelly, 36, has congratulated her sister on giving birth to her first child on her website, following the birth last month of her daughter Chicago West and Kelly's daughter last week."
On her website, Kim wrote, "Mom, Kelly!"
"You did it!!"
"I'm very proud of the woman you'll be when you grow up. I know you'll be the best mother for your new daughter!"
"Getty pictures the star's daughter, Chicago, made her world debut in Kelly's pregnancy video, and she wrote about her excitement at the fact that her two daughters were born weeks apart."



Number  1126
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kardashian’s attorney said that his client’s actions were “a spontaneous reaction that he regrets.””
“Chyna was later granted a temporary restraining order against him.”
“Blac Chyna got a new custom Ferrari just a few weeks after she returned her other luxury cars to ex-fiancé Rob Kardashian.”
“The 29-year-old model took to social media to show off her sports car, which has a starting price of $272,000, on Monday, July 24.”
“The white car features a red interior and red hub cabs.”
““Thank you @clm91302 for my 2017 Ferrari 488 Spider and my custom @forgiato wheels,” she captioned one of the photos.”
“Chyna shared a video of her 4-year-old son King, whom she shares with ex-fiancé Tyga, in the front seat as the convertible top went down.”
““King look,” she says, before giving him a smooch.”
“Thank you clm91302 for my 2017 Ferrari 488 Spider and my custom forgiato wheels A post shared by Blac Chyna blacchyna on Jul 24 2017 at 2 53pm PDT In another photo the Lashed Cosmetics founder holds her 8 month old daughter Dream whom she shares with 30 year old...”
“Kardashian...”


Kardashian's lawyer said his client's behavior was "a spontaneous reaction to his regret."
"Chener was later granted a temporary restraining order against him."
"Blac Chyna got a new custom Ferrari a few weeks after returning other luxury cars to her ex fiance rob Kardashian."
"On Monday, July 24, the 29 year old model showed off her sports car on social media, which starts at $272000."
"The white car has a red interior and a red hub cab."
"Thank you @ clm91302 for my 2017 Ferrari 488 spider and my customized @ forgiato wheels," she wrote in the title of one of the photos
"Chyna shared a video in which her 4-year-old son king and ex fiance tyga were sitting in the front row when the convertible fell off."
"Look at the king," she said, and gave him a kiss
"Thank clm91302 for sharing a post in another photo at 2:53 pm on July 24, 2017 for my 2017 Ferrari 488 spider and my customized forgiato wheel blac Chyna blacchyna. The founder of lashed cosmology holds her 8-month-old daughter's dream, and she shares this dream with a 30-year-old girl..."
"Kardashian..."



Number  1127
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There’s a part of me that’s really sad I can’t be part of the show, but Heidi and I have joked that maybe we could swap an episode.””
“He’s gonna figure it out.”Image zoom Credit: Todd Williamson/GettyThe former Dolphins quarterback quickly became a fan favorite on Very Cavallari thanks to his dry humor, and Cavallari says he’s now fully embraced his new role.”
““We’ve definitely switched roles which has been really interesting, but it’s great,” Cavallari, 31, told PEOPLE at the Los Angeles pop-up of her store Uncommon James at The Grove.”
““I couldn’t do any of this without him.”
“He’s home with the kids, picking the boys up from school and really allowing me to be able to have the time and freedom to do all this.”
“He’s been really supportive.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The slower pace of life is a huge change for Cutler, 35, who up until 2017 had a nonstop football career.”
“On the first season of Very Cavallari, the couple — who are parents to sons Camden, 6, and Jaxon, 4, and daughter Saylor, 3 — often joked about the athlete’s excess of free time.”
““I call him my farmhand because he’s been planting trees around the house.”
“He’s been taking care of all the animals,” says Cavallari, who recently moved with her family into a new home in the Tennessee countryside.”


"Part of me was really sad that I couldn't be on the show, but Heidi and I joked that maybe we could exchange an episode."
"He'll figure it out." Photo zooming credit: Todd Williamson / Getty, the former dolphin quarterback, quickly became a favorite of Cavallari fans with his dry humor. Cavallari said he has now fully accepted his new role
"We did change roles, it was really fun, but it was great," 31 year old cavalari told people at her new store in grove in Los Angeles
"I can't do anything without him."
"He's at home with the kids, picking them up from school, really giving me time and freedom to do all this."
"He's really supportive of me." Get push notification of news, functions, etc. “
"The slowdown in the pace of life is a huge change for the 35 year old Cattler, whose football career has not stopped until 2017."
"In the first season of very cavalry, the couple - parents of their 6-year-old son Camden, 4-year-old son Jackson and 3-year-old daughter Sailor - often joke that athletes have too much free time."
"I call him my farmer because he has been planting trees around the house."
"He's been taking care of all the animals," said cavalari, who recently moved into a new home in rural Tennessee with her family



Number  1128
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...women...”
“A number of Pixar employees have described to Variety a sexist and misogynistic culture at the company with Lasseter at the helm creating something of a whisper network According to sources women at Pixar were warned about Lasseter for the unwanted hugs and other attention he allegedly showered on young...”
“Jones instead said they left over “philosophical differences,” and asserted that their exit was over the fact that they believed women and people of color did not have “an equal creative voice” at Pixar.”
“Lasseter was originally the co-director of “Toy Story 4,” but stepped down in July, with Josh Cooley taking over as the sole director.”
“In a statement first given to the New York Times, and later obtained by Variety, Jones and McCormack said, “We feel like we have been put in a position where we need to speak for ourselves.”
“The break neck speed at which journalists have been naming the next perpetrator renders some reporting irresponsible and, in fact, counterproductive for the people who do want to tell their stories.”
“In this instance, The Hollywood Reporter does not speak for us.”
“We did not leave Pixar because of unwanted advances.”
“That is untrue.”
“That said, we are happy to see people speaking out about behavior that made them uncomfortable.”


“… Women... "
"Some Pixar employees describe that in the company where lassett is at the helm, all kinds of sexism and women aversion culture have created a whispering network. According to the source, Pixar's women have been warned of lassett because of his unwelcome hugs and what he says about other concerns about young people..."
Jones said they left "philosophical differences" and asserted that their exit was because they believed that women and people of color did not have "equal creative say" in Pixar
Lassett was originally co director of Toy Story 4, but he left in July, and Josh Cooley took over as the only director of the film
Jones and McCormack first issued a statement to the New York Times and later to variety, saying: "we feel we need to speak for ourselves."
"The amazing speed with which journalists identify the next perpetrator makes some reports irresponsible. In fact, for those who really want to tell their stories, it's just the opposite."
"In this case, Hollywood journalists don't speak for us."
"We didn't leave Pixar because of unexpected developments."
"That's not true."
"That is to say, we're happy to see people say things that make them uncomfortable."



Number  1129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Green also wrote that he hopes Davis continues to study and do well in school, and hopes to see him at NASA in the future.”
“It's also about protecting other planets and moons from our germs as we responsibly explore the Solar System," Dr. James L Green, director of NASA's Planetary Science Division, wrote.”
“"It's about protecting Earth from tiny microbes when we bring back samples from the Moon, asteroids and Mars.”
“In the letter, the space agency congratulated Davis on his interest and gave him a brief description of the position.”
“NASA replied to the letter and Davis even got a call from Planetary Research Director Jonathan Rall.”
“"I have also seen the show Marvel Agents of Shield and hope to see the movie Men in Black."”
“"I have seen almost all the space and alien movies I can see," he explained.”
“Davis also listed a few of his qualifications for the open position, one of them being that his sister calls him an alien.”
“"I may be nine, but I think I would be fit for the job."”
“"My name is Jack Davis and I would like to apply for the planetary protection officer job," the fourth-grader wrote in a letter.”


Green also wrote that he hoped Davis would continue to study and get good grades at school, and that he would see him at NASA in the future
"In our responsible exploration of the solar system, it's also to protect other planets and moons from bacteria," wrote Dr. James L. green, director of NASA's Planetary Science Division
"When we bring back samples from the moon, asteroids and Mars, it's to protect the earth from micro-organisms."
"In the letter, NASA congratulated Davis on his interest and outlined his position."
"NASA replied to this letter, and Davis even got a call from Jonathan Lal, director of planetary research."
"I've also seen agent aegis, and I hope to see man in black."
"I've seen almost all the space and alien movies I can see," he explained
Davis also listed some of the conditions for him to get the vacant position, one of which was that his sister called him an alien
"I may be nine years old, but I think I'm suitable for the job."
"My name is Jack Davis and I want to apply for the position of planetary protection officer," the fourth grader wrote in the letter



Number  1130
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“13”
“...that Marylynn Is Toxic 01 02 Week 3 Sneak Peek Victoria Makes Some Enemies 04 07 Sarah Opens Up to Matt About Her Family 03 29 This Season on The Bachelor 2021 with Matt James 04 40 Meet the New Bachelor Matt James 01 47 Queen Victoria Has Arrived 03”
“Up Drama 03 24 Katie and Sarah Have an Emotional Talk About Family and Priorities 03 41 Serena P Is Falling Into Like with Matt James 04 45 Sarah Tells Matt She s Leaving 04 17 The Ladies Confront Sarah About Interrupting the Group Date 04 16 Victoria Tells Matt...”
“Hair for Black Women in America 00 54 Week 5 Sneak Peek Matt Makes Big Decisions to Quell Big Drama 03 32 The Fall In Love Fest Obstacle Course 03 45 New Arrival Michelle Makes a Quick Connection with Matt James 01 16 Week 4 Sneak Peek New Arrivals Stir...”
“04 03 Victoria Feels So Sorry for Matt in Her Fiery Goodbye 03 15 Kit Is Falling in Love with Matt 01 06 Week 6 Sneak Peek A Familiar Face Returns 04 39 New Arrivals Shake Up the House in Week 4 01 29 Chelsea Explains the Emotional Side of...”


“13”
“… Marilyn poison 01 02 week 3 peeping at Victoria making some enemies 04 07 Sarah reveals her family to Matt 03 29 Bachelor of the season 2021 meet new Bachelor Matt James 04 40 Queen Victoria has arrived 03 "
"Play 03 24 Katie and Sarah have an emotional conversation about family and priorities 03 41 Serena P falls in love with Matt James 04 45 Sarah tells Matt she's leaving 04 17 ladies face Sarah about breaking group appointments 04 16 Victoria tells Matt..."
"Black American women's hair 00 54 week 5 peeking at Matt makes a big decision to calm down drama 03 32 falling in love festival obstacle course 03 45 new Michelle and Matt James establish quick contact 01 16 week 4 peeking at the new exciting..."
"04 03 Victoria is very sad for Matt. She falls in love with Matt in her fiery farewell uniform 03 15 team uniform 01 06 week 6 peeks at a familiar face and returns 04 39 the new comer changes in week 4 01 29 Chelsea explains the emotional side..."



Number  1131
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We need more softness and more silence and more pause through the chaos.””
“A LOOK AT THE MUSICIAN'S POLITICAL PASTWoodley is not the first star to come forward and mull the potential of running.”
“Woodley brought up the possible run in an interview with The New York Times.”
““There was a point last year when I was working for Bernie Sanders where I thought, ‘Huh, maybe I’ll run for Congress in a couple years.'”
“And you know what?”
“I’m not going rule it out.”
“Who knows?”
“Life is big, and I’m young.”KID ROCK FOR SENATE?”
“Singer Kid Rock has teased his 2018 run for a seat in the Senate representing Michigan.”
““If females start working through the false narrative of jealousy and insecurity fed through a patriarchal society, then not only will we have more women feeling confident in themselves and supportive of one another, but we will start introducing a type of matriarchy, which is what this world needs.”


"We need more tenderness, more silence, more pause in chaos."
"If you look at the political views of this musician, paswoodley is not the first star to come forward and think about his potential."
"Woodley mentioned a possible escape in an interview with the New York Times."
"When I worked for Bernie Sanders last year, I thought," well, maybe I'll run for Congress in a few years. "
"Do you know?"
"I don't rule it out."
"Who knows?"
"Life is great, I'm still young." The senator's rock kid? "
"Singer Kid Rock once teased him about running for the Senate seat on behalf of Michigan in 2018."
"If women start to work through the false narrative of jealousy and insecurity instilled in a patriarchal society, not only will we have more women who are confident in themselves and support each other, but we will also start to introduce a kind of matriarchy, which is exactly what the world needs."



Number  1132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““So she’s like, ‘Mommy, I want a baby sister like Ellie, I want a baby sister.’ I was like, ‘Well, if you really want a baby brother or sister, you have to pray to Jesus.’ ””
““My son is 2, so she doesn’t remember him ever being a baby, they’re 17 months apart,” she said.”
“3It's a Boy!”
“Watch Eric and Jessie James Decker Reveal the Sex of Baby No.”
“3The Decker girls will soon be outnumbered — Eric and Jessie James Decker are having another boy!”
“Jessie took to her Instagram on Monday to share a video of the adorable moment that she and her Tennessee Titans wide receiver husband found out the sex of baby No.”
“3 with her daughter Vivianne “Vivi” Rose, 3½, and son Eric “Bubby” Jr, 2.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““You ready to figure out who’s in Mommy’s tummy?”
“Let’s open it,” Jessie, 29, says in the clip before she and Eric, 30, open up a box full of balloons.”


"So she said," Mom, I want a little sister like Ellie. I want a little sister. " I said, "if you really want a little brother or sister, you have to pray to Jesus."
"My son is two years old, so she doesn't remember that he used to be a baby, 17 months apart," she said
"It's a boy!"
"Watch Eric and Jesse James Decker reveal no baby's gender."
"Three Dirk girls will soon outnumber them - Eric and Jesse James Dirk have another boy!"
"Jesse shared a video on instagram Monday about the moment she and her husband from the Tennessee Titans discovered the gender of baby No."
Three year old daughter Vivian rose and two-year-old son Eric booby
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Are you ready to find out who's in mom's stomach?"
Jesse, 29, and Eric, 30, opened a box full of balloons



Number  1133
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also shares 23-year-old son Connor and daughter Isabella, 25, with her ex Tom Cruise, 56.”
“She shares two daughters, Sunday and Faith, seven, with husband Keith Urban, 51.”
“But after gifting one of her Emmy Awards to daughter Sunday, 10, Nicole Kidman was surprisingly rejected.”
“On Tuesday, the 51-year-old actress revealed her sassy youngster simply 'didn't want' the award.”
“'I want to earn my own': Nicole Kidman revealed she was snubbed by her daughter Sunday, 10, after gifting her an Emmy Award.”
“Pictured at the Emmy Awards in Los Angeles, 2017Making an appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live, Nicole recalled: 'Actually I offered when I won the Emmy for Big Little Lies...”
“I won one for producing and one for acting which was an incredible thing to happen.”
“'I was like okay, I can put one on your shelf, Sunday, and one on your shelf, Faith - they're yours,' she continued.”
“But to Nicole's surprise, Sunday rejected the lavish gift.”
“'Sunday didn't want it': On Tuesday, the 51-year-old actress revealed her sassy youngster simply 'didn't want' the award.”


"She also has a 23-year-old son, Connor, and a 25-year-old daughter, Isabella, with former Tom Cruise, 56."
"She and her 51 year old husband, Keith Urban, have two daughters, Sandy and faith, seven years old."
"But after giving an Emmy prize to her daughter on a 10-year-old Sunday, Nicole Kidman was unexpectedly turned down."
"On Tuesday, the 51 year old actress revealed that her fashionable young people didn't want the award at all."
"I want to make my own money": Nicole Kidman revealed on the 10th that she was ignored by her daughter after she presented her daughter with an Emmy Award. "
"At the 2010 Los Angeles Emmy Awards ceremony, Nicole made a live appearance at Jimmy Kimmel. She recalled:" in fact, when I won the Emmy Award, I volunteered because of some big and small lies... "
"I won a production award and a performance award, which is incredible."
"I was fine, I could put one on your shelf, Sunday, and one on your shelf, faith - they're yours," she continued
But to Nicole's surprise, Sunday turned down the lavish gift
"Don't want to win on Sunday": on Tuesday, the 51 year old actress revealed that her fashionable young people don't want to win at all. "



Number  1134
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I feel like I’d be missing out."”
“"I do want to be a mom," Bella told her then-boyfriend Cena in a 2013 episode of "Total Divas."”
“Cena and Bella constantly bickered over Bella's desire to get married and have kids -- while Cena repeatedly made it clear he did not want those things.”
“Cena likened it to a prenuptial agreement and said it was done to protect his finances.”
“Cena had made Bella sign a 75-page contract before she moved into his house.”
“...that problems between Bella and Cena were “brewing for a while.”JOHN CENA MADE NIKKI BELLA SIGN A 75-PAGE CONTRACT BEFORE SHE MOVED IN WITH HIMFans also pointed to several incidents when the former couple clashed.”
“A source, however, told E!”
“The couple, who have been dating for six years, got engaged last year at Wrestlemania 33 and were scheduled to be married on May 5.”
“"We ask that you respect our privacy during this time in our lives."”
“"While this decision was a difficult one, we continue to have a great deal of love and respect for one another," the couple said via Instagram.”


"I think I'll miss it."
"I really want to be a mom," Bella told her then boyfriend, senna, in a 2013 episode of total queen
"Seine and Bella have been arguing about Bella's desire to get married and have children, and Seine has repeatedly made it clear that he doesn't want these things."
"Seine compares it to a prenuptial agreement and says it's done to protect his economy."
"Senna asked Bella to sign a 75 page contract before moving into his house."
“…… The issue between Bella and Senna "has been brewing for a while." John Senna made Nicky Bella sign a 75 page contract before moving in with him. Fans also pointed out a few incidents when the first two clashed. "
"However, a source told e!"
"The couple, who have been dating for six years, got engaged on wrestling 33 last year and are due to get married on May 5."
"In the meantime, please respect our privacy."
"Although it was a difficult decision, we are still full of love and respect for each other," the couple said through instagram



Number  1135
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to Khloé, she’s lost more than 30 pounds since giving birth to her daughter.”
“But I still need to lose a few more pounds and then I’ll cut it again,” she wrote on Twitter.”
““Short hair is my favorite!!”
“When a fan tweeted a picture of the Good American denim designer with a lob — aka a long bob — hairstyle, saying the look “was everything,” she replied that she had immediate plans to snip off her blonde locks as soon as she was comfortable with her weight.”
“!”Previously, Khloé told fans she wasn’t going to cut her hair until she lost most of the weight she gained during pregnancy.”
“Giving a kissy face to the camera, she wrote alongside the cute family portrait, “Happy Birthday my sweet MJ!”
“The Revenge Body host also shared a picture of her new ‘do while ringing in grandmother Mary Jo “MJ” Houghton’s 84th birthday.”
“Quoting brother-in-law Kanye West , Khloé captioned the sultry snap, “ Not smiling makes me smile .”Three months after welcoming her first child, True Thompson , the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star has given herself a bit of a mommy makeover by chopping off her long tresses.”
“In a new selfie shared on Instagram Thursday, July 26, the 34-year-old debuted a short new bob in celebration of hitting her post-baby goal weight.”
“New baby, new ‘do.”


"According to Heroe, she has lost more than 30 pounds since she gave birth to her daughter."
"But I need to lose a few more pounds, and then I need to lose them," she tweeted
"Short hair is my favorite!"
"When a fan tweeted a picture of the American cowboy designer with a long hair, that is, a long hair, she said the look was" everything. "She replied that once she felt comfortable with her weight, she immediately planned to cut her blonde hair."
"!" previously, heloe told fans that she would not cut her hair until she lost most of the weight she gained during pregnancy. "
She put on a kissing face to the camera and wrote next to the lovely family photo: "happy birthday, my dear MJ!"
The vengeful host also shared a new photo of her grandmother, Mary Joe Horton, on her 84th birthday
Khlo é quoted Kanye West, her brother-in-law, as adding a title to the sultry moment: "don't smile, make me smile." Three months after welcoming her first child, true Thompson, the "keep up with Kardashian" Star cut off her long hair and made a motherly change
"On Thursday, July 26, in a new self portrait shared on instagram, the 34 year old showed a new Bob with short hair for the first time to celebrate reaching her post infancy target weight."
"New baby, new" do. "



Number  1136
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s so hard … I just don’t want to hurt her,” he told the magazine.”
“Thanks.” Stephen Baldwin’s daughter shared the post with her own comment: “genuinely this is cheesy.”The “Love Yourself” singer officially announced that he plans to marry model Baldwin with a loving tribute to her on his Instagram Monday.”
“...fiancée she was just another fan singing his praises on Twitter and shipping his relationship with Selena Gomez...”
“Digging into the 21-year-old model’s social media past, fans found that she used to tweet to and about Bieber, 24, often.”
“She would congratulate the singer on his singles reaching the top of the charts, excitedly talk about going to his shows and retweet his musings on naps or cereal.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“However, it was a post supporting “Jelena” that really caught the attention of fans.”
“In a reply to a now-deleted tweet sent out in 2012, Baldwin appears to defend the pop star’s then-relationship with Gomez.”
““She is beyond flawless and he’s ya know he’s Bieber,” Baldwin wrote.”
“They are the perfect relationship ___ forever alone She also reportedly wrote in a since deleted tweet screengrabbed by Elle and other outlets I don t care what anyone says but Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez together is the definition of a teenage dream Baldwin s tweets also hint to...”


"It's too hard I just don't want to hurt her, "he told the magazine
"Thank you." Stephen Baldwin's daughter shared the post and commented: "it's so tacky." The "love yourself" singer officially announced on instagram on Monday that he plans to marry model Baldwin and extend his love to her
“…… Fiancee she's just another fan, tweeting about him and passing on his relationship with Selena Gomez... "
"Digging into the 21-year-old model's social media past, fans found that she often interacted with 24-year-old Bieber on Weibo."
"She will congratulate the singer for her single at the top of the charts, talk excitedly about going to see his show, and recount his meditation on a nap or porridge."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"However, what really attracted fans' attention was a post in support of" jelina. "
"In response to a deleted microblog sent out in 2012, Baldwin seemed to be defending the pop star's relationship with Gomez at that time."
"She's perfect, he's you know he's Bieber," Baldwin wrote
"They are a perfect relationship and always lonely. It is reported that she wrote in a deleted tweet that she was intercepted by Elle and other media. I don't care what other people say, but Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez together are the definition of a girl's dream. Baldwin's tweet also implies that..."



Number  1137
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More:Women are rarely accused of sexual harassment, and there's a reason whyMore:Creative Coalition urges victims of sexual assault and harassment to #KeepTellingPeople...”
“Send us a secure tip using the instructions at newstips.usatoday.com.”
“The Daily Beast published an account of an anonymous alleged victim who says the Deadpool and former Silicon Valley star sexually assaulted and punched her while studying at George Washington University during the course of a relationship that began in the fall of 2001.”
“The woman tells the outlet of alleged encounters, one of which she admits that, due to excessive drinking, there remain "parts of (the incident) I don’t remember."”
“She says while being intimate, Miller became to shake her and then hit her in the mouth during intercourse.”
“She says in the morning she woke with a fractured tooth and busted lip.”
“As the woman tells it, Miller explained her injuries by saying she had a drunken fall the night before.”
“On another evening, the woman says Miller again became violent while they were having sex and he began to choke her.”
“"We started to fool around, and very early in that, he put his hands around my throat and closed them, and I couldn’t breathe,” she says.”
““I was genuinely terrified and completely surprised ... and I had certainly not entered into any agreement that I would be choked."”


"More: women are rarely accused of sexual harassment for a reason. Why more: Creative alliance urges victims of sexual assault and harassment to" continue to interact with others... "
"Send us security tips using the instructions at the following address: news tips usatoday.com .”
The Daily Beast published a report about an anonymous victim, saying that the dead pool and the former Silicon Valley star sexually assaulted and beaten her while studying at George Washington University during a love affair that began in the fall of 2001
"The woman told the media about the so-called experience, in which she admitted that due to excessive drinking, there was still part of (the incident) I don't remember."
"She said that during intimate contact, Miller started shaking hands with her and then hitting her in the mouth during intercourse."
"She said she woke up in the morning with a broken tooth and a split lip."
As the woman said, in explaining her injury, Miller said she had a drunken fall the night before
"The other night, the woman said that Miller became violent again when they had sex, and he began to strangle her."
"We started fooling around, and early on, he put his hand on my throat and closed it, and I couldn't breathe," she said
"I'm really scared and totally surprised... Of course, I didn't reach any agreement, I would suffocate



Number  1138
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Because she’s so f—ing rude all the time.”
““That was rude, but I wanted to be rude.”
“Get the f— out of here and go,” snapped Kim.”
““No one wants you in the f—ing shoot.”
“The mother of three wanted to prioritize her kids over the rest of the family.”
“Image zoom Kim Kardashian West at the KKW Beauty Pop-Up | Credit: Stefanie Keenan/GettyIt all started with scheduling issues relating to Kourtney Kardashian, 39.”
“...hit show revealed...”
“She usually spends the party with us and then she ll go out The heartwarming photos from the 2017 KarJenner Christmas card which the family revealed day by day were overshadowed by all the sibling fighting surrounding the shoot as the premiere of the 15th season of the family s...”
““I don’t know what the schedule is like, but I know that she will spend Christmas Eve with us,” Kim said during the interview.”
“...t make it home for Thanksgiving she hopes she ll be able to stop by for the festive gathering pending her boyfriend NBA player Tristan Thompson s game schedule...”


"Because she's always so rude."
"That's rude, but I want to be rude."
"Take f-out and go," Kim snapped
"No one wants you to take part in the shooting."
"The mother of three wants to put her children first in the family."
"Kkw beauty show Kim Kardashian West image zooming | image source: Stefanie Keenan / gettyit all started with a schedule issue related to 39 year old Kourtney Kardashian."
“… Hot show exposure... "
"She usually spends parties with us, and then she takes out the warm photos from kajana's Christmas cards in 2017. At the premiere of season 15 of family s, the photos revealed by the family day by day are covered by all the siblings fighting around..."
"I don't know what the schedule is, but I know she will spend Christmas Eve with us," Kim said in an interview
“… She can't go home for Thanksgiving. She hopes to come to the holiday party before her boyfriend, NBA player Tristan Thompson's schedule ends. "



Number  1139
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here In the 911 call placed after the fall a colleague of Mr Bernecker s tells the dispatcher that the stunt man fell about 25 feet off of a balcony straight onto concrete...”
“The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would...”
“...signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter...”
“AMC has confirmed that production on The Walking Dead has temporarily shut down Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for...”
“SAG-AFTRA and the Atlanta office of the Occupational safety and health Administration have launched investigations into the incident.”
“According to Coweta County Coroner Richard Hawk, Bernecker died of blunt force trauma experienced due to his fall.”
““We are grateful for his contributions, and all of us send our condolences, love, and prayers to John’s family and friends.”The show's stars, including Norman Reedus (Daryl), Jeffrey Dean Morgan (Negan) and Lauren Cohan (Maggie), all paid touching tribute to Bernecker.”
“John’s work on The Walking Dead and dozens of other movies and shows will continue to entertain and excite audiences for generations.”
“Gimple said: “Our production is heartbroken by the tragic loss of John Bernecke.”
“AMC released a statement confirming that Bernecker's family had “decided that he will be removed from life support."”


“…… Want to contact us? Please read our complete mailing list of the terms of agreement in the 911 call, which was made after the crash. A colleague of Mr. bernecker told the dispatcher that the stuntman fell 25 feet from the balcony and directly onto the concrete... "
"The best movie music TV broadcast is sent directly to your mailbox every week. Thank you for registering for independent culture press release verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent. I hope to inform you of the offer and update by email. Please check the box if you like..."
“… Register for independent culture newsletters verifyerrors information verifyerrors information verifyerrors information verifyerrors independent culture would like to inform you by email about offers and updates. Please check the box. If you wish to contact, please read our complete mailing list and agree to the terms of this independent culture newsletters... "
"AMC has confirmed that the production of" walking dead "has been temporarily closed. The best movie music TV broadcast of independent cultural communication is sent directly to your mailbox every week. Please enter your email address. Please enter a valid email address. Please enter a valid email address to register. Thank you..."
"Sag-aftra and the OSHA Atlanta office have launched an investigation into the incident."
"According to Richard Hawke, coroner of covetta County, Bernac died of blunt injuries from falls."
"We thank him for his contribution and all of us extend our sympathy, love and prayers to John's family and friends." The stars of the show, including Norman reed (Daryl), Jeffrey Dean Morgan (Nigan) and Lauren Cohen (Maggie), all paid a touching tribute to Bernard
"John's work in walking dead and dozens of other films and shows will continue to bring entertainment and excitement to generations."
"Our work is saddened by the unfortunate defeat of John burnack," said Jim Poole
AMC issued a statement confirming that bernecker's family "decided to remove him from the life support system."



Number  1140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““That love and respect comes through even when Christy and Bonnie are fighting, and it’s what makes those scenes enjoyable to watch.””
““Allison Janney is one of our great actresses, for whatever the requirement might be — she’s the master of the craft,” Lorre says.”
“Tension, especially for a sitcom, was high from the start, with both characters being “extremely flawed,” says co-creator and executive producer Gemma Baker.”
““I think people assume we started ‘Mom’ with a desire to do a show about a mother-and-daughter relationship, but our starting place, as I remember it, was actually the word ‘redemption,’” Baker says.”
““We loved the idea that you would be able to watch characters completely turn their lives around over the course of the series.”
“The whole point of ‘Mom’ was to make a show that would give people hope.”In order to be successful in such a grand endeavor, the series in many ways was going to live or die by its casting.”
“Faris had been in the comedy world since she helped the Wayans brothers launch the “Scary Movie” franchise in 2000, but her resume read much heavier in film titles than television ones.”
“In 2004 she had a recurring guest star arc on the final season of Warner Bros mega hit Friends and then she went on to play a version of herself in HBO s Hollywood set bro comedy Entourage But it wasn t until she booked Mom in 2013 that she...”
“...nabbed her first starring television comedy role...”
““There’s something about Anna as a human being that makes you care and root for her.”


"Even when Christie and Bonnie quarrel, this kind of love and respect will show. It is this kind of love and respect that makes those scenes enjoyable."
"Alison Jennie is one of our great actresses, no matter what the demands are - she's a master of the craft," Lowe said
"The tension, especially for a sitcom, is intense from the beginning, and both characters" have great flaws, "says co-author and executive producer Gemma Baker
"I think people thought we started 'Mom' to make a show about mother daughter relationship, but I remember that our starting point was actually the word 'Salvation'," Baker said
"We love the idea that you can see characters revolutionizing their lives throughout the series."
The whole purpose of mother is to show people hope. "In order to succeed in such a grand career, the success of this TV series depends on the actors in many ways."
Since helping the Waynes brothers launch the "horror movie" series in 2000, Faris has entered the comedy industry, but her resume is much more read in film titles than in TV titles
"In 2004, she had a guest star arc in the last season of Warner Bros.'s hit movie friends, and then she played a version of herself in HBO's Hollywood set brother comedy entourage, but it wasn't until 2013 that she reserved tickets for her mother that she..."
“… She caught her first TV comedy role as a star
"Anna, as a person, has a little bit of concern and support for her."



Number  1141
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watts moved on with actor Liev Schreiber, who she dated for 11 years before breaking up in September 2016.”
“They separated in September 2007.”
“I will never forget his gentle spirit.”RELATED VIDEO: See What Made Heath Ledger Such a Compelling Figure — Even in His Final DaysFollowing their split, Ledger dated Michelle Williams after meeting on the set of their 2005 film Brokeback Mountain and welcomed their daughter Matilda in October 2005.”
““Heart always on his sleeve, with the most powerful charisma, strength, humor and talent.”
“He was a true original,” she wrote at the time.”
“10 years ago he left this world.”
““Thinking about this beautiful soul today.”
““We will never forget you.”Earlier this years, Watts, 49, also remembered Ledger on the 10-year anniversary of his death.”
““Happy birthday to this darling heart,” she wrote on her Instagram Wednesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Watts continued to date actor liev Schreiber, who dated her for 11 years and then broke up in September 2016."
"They separated in September 2007."
"I will never forget his gentle spirit." Related video: see what makes Heath Ledger such an eye-catching figure - even on the last day after their breakup, ledger met Michelle Williams on the set of the 2005 movie Brokeback Mountain, and in October 2005 welcomed their daughter Matilda
"Heart is always on the sleeve, with the most powerful charm, strength, humor and talent."
"He was a true creator," she wrote at the time
"He left the world 10 years ago."
"Think of this beautiful soul today."
"We'll never forget you." Earlier this year, Watts, 49, remembered the 10th anniversary of Ledger's death
"Happy Birthday to this lovely heart," she wrote on instagram on Wednesday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  1142
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The remaining seven episodes will launch at to-be-announced date.”
“The first six episodes of Season 4 will drop on Netflix May 30.”
“Netflix announced the guest star line up for the sitcom’s final run — its fourth season — on Thursday, which includes the returns of Jon Hamm, Amy Sedaris, Mike Carlsen, Zosia Mamet and Derek Klena.”
“Busy Philipps, Greg Kinnear, Bobby Moynihan and Aidy Bryant will also join series regulars Ellie Kemper, Tituss Burgess, Jane Krakowski and Carol Kane.”
“Read below for the official descriptions of some of the guest-centric episodes.”
“Also Read: 'Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt' to End After Season 4, Talks Underway for Possible Movie FinaleEpisode 401: Greg Kinnear plays himself in the first episode — sort of.”
“As he drops his son off at school, Kinnear unwittingly gets caught up in an elaborate Titus scheme to win back his ex-boyfriend Mikey… which brings us to the next guest appearance in this episode: Mike Carlsen, who plays the recently out construction worker.”
“Episode 403: Jon Hamm will reprise his role as Kimmy’s kidnapper Reverend Richard Wayne Gary Wayne, who is currently serving a life sentence in prison in Indiana.”
“A friend from his DJ days visits — Douglas, aka DJ Fingablast, played by guest star Derek Klena.”
“Bobby Moynihan will also appear as men’s rights activist Fran Dodd, who leads the resistance on “the war on men” trying to free the Reverend.”


"The remaining seven episodes will be released on a date to be determined."
"The first six episodes of the fourth quarter will be broadcast on Netflix on May 30."
"Netflix announced on Thursday the return of Jon ham, Amy SEDRIS, Mike Carlson, zoscia Mamet and Derek Kleiner as guest stars for the final season of the sitcom, season four."
"Busy Phillips, Greg Kinnier, Bobbie Moynihan and Eddie Bryant will also join series regulars Ellie Kemper, Titus Burgess, Jane Krakowski and Carol Kane."
"Here are the official descriptions of some guest centered episodes."
"Also read: 'unbreakable Kimmie Schmidt' after the end of the fourth season, is 401 yards for a possible movie ending: Greg ginnier plays himself in the first episode - sort."
"When he sent his son to school, jinnier was involuntarily involved in a well planned Titus plan to win back his ex boyfriend Mickey This brings us to the next guest in the episode: Mike Carlson, who plays the recently out building worker
"403: Jon Ham will re play Richard Wayne Gary Wayne, the pastor who kidnapped Kimmie and is currently serving a life sentence in an Indiana prison."
"A friend from his DJ day visit - Douglas, also known as DJ fingarbrast, played by guest star Derek Kleiner."
Bob Moynihan will also appear as a male chauvinist, Fran Dodd, who leads the Rebellion's men's war and tries to liberate the clergyman



Number  1143
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Surviving members of Linkin Park paid tribute to their fallen bandmate on Oct. 27 with a tribute concert at the Hollywood Bowl.”
“In footage of the clip that had since been released, the frontman looks happy as he sings along with the group.”
“Autopsy and toxicology documents filed by the Los Angeles County Coroner’s Office and obtained by PEOPLE show that the singer had a minute amount of alcohol in his bloodstream.”
“These findings seem to corroborate items that had been found at the scene by investigators, including a pint glass of Corona beer, an empty bottle of Stella Artois, and also a prescription bottle of Zolpidem, a generic of Ambien.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Based on a blood test, Bennington’s body tested “presumptive positive” for MDMA — also known as ecstasy — but two additional urine tests failed to detect the drug.”
“The autopsy concluded the rocker was not under the influence of the drug when he died.”
“Image zoom Credit: Gregg DeGuire/WireImageBennington is described as having “a history of alcoholism, depression, suicidal ideations and prior suicide attempts,” The Blast reports.”
“His wifeTalinda told authorities just after his death that Bennington had been in an outpatient treatment program.”
“Law enforcement officials responded to an emergency call from Bennington’s home in Palos Verdes Estates, California, around 9 a.m., on July 20, an officer told PEOPLE.”


"On October 27, the surviving members of Lincoln Park held a memorial concert at the Hollywood Bowl in memory of their dead band mates."
"In the video clips released since then, the lead singer and the band have a good time singing together."
"The autopsy and toxicology documents submitted by the Los Angeles County coroner's office and the documents obtained by people showed that there was a small amount of alcohol in the singer's blood."
"These findings appear to confirm the items found at the scene by investigators, including a pint of corona beer, an empty bottle of Stella Artois and a bottle of prescription drug zolpidem," he said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
According to blood tests, Bennington's body detected "presumed positive" ecstasy - also known as ecstasy - but two additional urine tests failed to detect the drug
"The autopsy concluded that the wager was not affected by drugs at the time of death."
"Credit for image zooming: Greg dequail / wire image Bennington was described as" having a history of alcohol abuse, depression, suicidal ideation and previous suicide attempts, "the bomb report said
"His wife talinda told authorities after his death that Bennington had been receiving outpatient treatment."
A police officer told people: "law enforcement officers received an emergency call from Bennington's home in Palos Verdes estate, California, around 9 a.m. on July 20."



Number  1144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mourning: The Garfield actress was left devastated after her mother Patricia Mae lost her battle with cancer at just 67”
“The speech-language pathologist, is survived by her famous daughter, and son, Dr. Todd Hewitt.”
“She was like, "Do you think maybe you could do an animated movie next?"”
“Now you're playing a crack ho on TV."”
“Earlier this year, you wrote about your hoo haw in a book.”
“She revealed at the time: 'She was like, "So let's review ... For 15 years people have been talking about your boobs.”
“Chores: The actress has been laying low in the wake of her devastating lossJennifer joked two years ago that she was able to find her role as a prostitute on The Client List 'hilarious'.”
“Patricia was always accepting of her daughter's career moves, which were sometimes controversial.”
“Jennifer kept her relative's illness private throughout the tough time.”
“She was an angel to all who knew her and they are grateful she is now in a better place.'”


"Mourning: the Garfield actress was devastated after her mother, Patricia may, failed to fight cancer when she was 67 years old."
This speech language pathologist was born by her famous daughter and son, Dr. Todd Hewitt
She said, "do you think you can make a cartoon next?"
"Now you have a wonderful role to play on TV."
"Earlier this year, you wrote about your haw in a book."
"She revealed at the time: 'she's like,' so let's look back... People have been talking about your breasts for 15 years. "
"Housework: the actress has been keeping a low profile since she suffered heavy losses. Two years ago, Jennifer joked that it was "funny" that she could find her role as a prostitute on her client list. "
"Patricia always accepts her daughter's career change, which is sometimes controversial."
"During these difficult times, Jennifer kept a secret about her relative's illness."
"She's an angel to all who know her and they appreciate that she's in a better place now."



Number  1145
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Selena Gomez Just Made Justin Bieber’s Glasses Look Super Chic...”
“Selena is an adult and can make her own choices."”
“"They're not on a break because of her relationship with her mom.”
“They have their own issues and are always on and off," a source told People about Jelena this week.”
“"[Selena] wouldn't base her relationship off of what her mom thinks."”
“The insider added, "They've been having disagreements, but it wouldn't be surprising if they're back together in a week."”
“Several outlets reported last week that the duo was spending some time apart, but People's source shares that they were definitely on good terms as recently as March 1, Justin's birthday, part of which they spent together.”
“In honor of the special day Selena appeared to post about Justin on Instagram for the first time since they reunited last fall She shared a picture of herself with a Polaroid photo of someone who looks like JBiebs resting on her forehead writing March 1 1994 someone I know...”
“...that happens to be super cool was born...”
“Boom."”


"Related report: Selena Gomez just made Justin Bieber's glasses look super Chic..."
"Selena is an adult and can make her own choice."
"They didn't rest because of her relationship with her mother."
"They have their own problems, always off and on," one source told people this week
"(Selena) won't base her relationship on her mother's ideas."
"They've always had differences, but it's not surprising if they can get back together in a week," the person said
"Last week, several media reported that they were separated for a period of time, but people sources revealed that on March 1, Justin's birthday, they must have a good relationship, and some of them were spent together."
"To commemorate this special day, Selena appeared on instagram. This is the first time that they met again last fall. She posted a message about Justin on instagram. She shared a picture of herself and a picture of polaroid. In the picture, a person who looks like jbiebs was lying on her forehead and wrote" people I knew on March 1, 1994... "
“… That happens to be the birth of super cool... "
"Bang."



Number  1146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET on ABC.”
“The 90th Academy Awards, hosted by Jimmy Kimmel, will air on Sunday at 8 p.m.”
““In so doing, they’ve not only entertained the world, but illuminated the full range of the human experience.”A previous announcement revealed that Wonder Woman star Gal Gadot, Star Wars: The Last Jedi actor Mark Hamill, and Hamilton creator Lin-Manuel Miranda will also be presenting, among others.”
““These actors have embodied some of the most heroic, aspirational and indelible characters ever brought to the screen,” said De Luca and Todd in a release.”
“She’ll be joined by fellow stars Sandra Bullock, Jane Fonda, Emily Blunt, Dave Chappelle, Eugenio Derbez, Ansel Elgort, Jodie Foster, Eiza González, Ashley Judd, Nicole Kidman, Matthew McConaughey, Helen Mirren, Rita Moreno, and Christopher Walken.”
“Oscar producers Michael De Luca and Jennifer Todd announced Tuesday that Black Panther star Lupita Nyong’o has been added to the list of presenters taking the stage during Sunday night’s Oscars telecast.”
“Lupita Nyong'o, Sandra Bullock, Jane Fonda, and more to present at 2018 Academy AwardsOscars 2018 type TV ShowFifteen more members of Hollywood’s elite have been chosen to present on Hollywood’s biggest night.”


"Et on ABC."
"The 90th Academy Awards, hosted by Jimmy Kimmel, will be broadcast at 8 p.m. on Sunday."
"In doing so, they not only entertain the world, but also illuminate the whole human experience." A previous announcement revealed that magic actress galgado, Star Wars: the last Jedi actor mark Hamil and Hamilton's creator limaniel Miranda will also be present
"These actors embody some of the most heroic, ambitious and indelible characters," DeLuca and Todd said at a press conference
Along with her are Sandra Bullock, Jane Fonda, Emily Bronte, Dave Chappelle, Eugenio debez, Ansel elgott, Judy foster, Aisha Gonzalez, Ashley Judd, Nicole Kidman, Matthew McConnell, Helen Mirren, Rita Moreno and Christopher Walken
"Oscar producers Michael DeLuca and Jennifer Todd announced on Tuesday that leopard star Lupita NiO has been put on the list for Sunday night's live Oscars
"Lupita Nyon, Sandra Bullock, Jane Fonda and others will appear at the 2018 Academy Awards ceremony. Another 15 Hollywood elites will be selected for the 2018 type TV program, which will appear on the biggest night in Hollywood."



Number  1147
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Editorial credit: JStone / Shutterstock.com...”
“Check out the ladies new video below.”
“The single “Bed” was released in June.”
“Nicki and Ariana have collaborated several times on music in the past, such as on the 2014 single “Band Bang” With Jessie J on Ariana’s 2016 track “Side to Side” and the song “The Light Is Coming,” which was also released last month.”
“Nicki Minaj teams up again with Ariana Grande for her new music video “Bed.” In the clip, the rapper and pop star unite at the ocean, and are joined by two men, played by Odell Beckham Jr. and Brad Wing, on daybeds.”


"Editing Credits: jstone"/ Shutterstock.com Website
"Take a look at the new women's video below."
"This single bed was released in June."
"Nicky and Ariana have cooperated in music for many times in the past. For example, in the 2014 single" band Bang ", they cooperated with Jesse J in Ariana's 2016 track" side to side "and released the song" the light is coming "last month
Nicky Minagi is working with Ariana grand again on the new music video bed. In this video, the rapper and pop star join the ocean band and perform together in bed, played by Xiaobei and Rong respectively



**Something goes wrong**
“Rumors of a divorce between Underwood and Fisher have also been spreading as the "Jesus Take the Wheel" singer continues to recover, though Fisher assured fans on Instagram that the two have "never been better."”
“(Photo: Instagram/@carrieunderwood)Along with the selfie, the two celebrated Isaiah's third birthday this past weekend with an impressive Mickey Mouse Clubhouse cake.”
“However the bottom half of her face was covered up by the logo of the End It Movement, an organization that looks to end slavery in the modern world.”
“(Photo: Instagram/@carrieunderwood)Fast forward to Friday and Underwood actually took a selfie with her husband, NHL player Mike Fisher.”
“However, thanks to some camera positioning and Underwood turning her head to her left to look at her son, fans could only see the uninjured right side of her face.”
“Then on Feb. 10, she posted an image working out inside her home with her now 3-year-old son Isaiah.”
“(Photo: Instagram/@carrieunderwood)For the next few weeks, Underwood's Instagram feed mostly didn't have photos of her with the exception of a few throwbacks to pictures from before the injury.”
“When she finally revealed the extent of her injuries in an Instagram post on Dec. 27, she did so by covering most of her face with a scarf.”
“It was later revealed that the fall forced her to get between 40 to 50 stitches on her face to help recover from injuries.”
“The Tennessean first reported that Underwood was hospitalized after the fall back on Nov. 11 with a broken wrist, cuts and abrasions.”


"The rumor of Underwood and Fisher's divorce has spread with the singer's constant recovery, but Fisher assured fans on instagram that they" have never been better than they are now. "
(photo: instagram / @ CarrieUnderwood) while taking a self portrait, the two celebrated Isaiah's third birthday with an impressive Mickey Mouse Club cake last weekend
However, the second half of her face is obscured by the symbol "end of information technology movement", an organization aimed at ending slavery in the modern world
"(photo: instagram / @ CarrieUnderwood) fast forward to Friday, Underwood actually had a self portrait with his husband, NHL player Mike Fisher."
"However, thanks to the positioning of some cameras, Underwood turned her head to the left to look at her son. Fans could only see her right face, which was not injured."
"Then on February 10, she released a photo of her working at home with her 3-year-old son Isaiah."
"(photo: instagram / @ CarrieUnderwood) in the next few weeks, Underwood's instagram feed had few photos of her except for a few photos before she was injured."
"On December 27, when she finally announced her injury on instagram, she covered most of her face with a scarf."
"It turned out that the fall forced 40 to 50 stitches on her face to help her recover."
The Tennessee paper first reported that Underwood was hospitalized on November 11 after falling down with a wrist fracture, cut and bruise



Number  1149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“State Park 301 West Tremont Ave Bronx Department of Motor Vehicles 696 E Fordham Road Bronx Southern Tier Binghamton Armory 85 West End Avenue Binghamton Western New York Connecticut Street Armory 184 Connecticut Street Buffalo...”
“Valley Yonkers Armory 2 Quincy Place Yonkers Mohawk Valley Utica State Office Building 207 Genesee Street Utica New York City Jacob K Javits Center 655 W 34th Street New York Shirley A Chisholm State Office Building 55 Hanson Place Brooklyn Jamaica Street Armory 93 05 168th Street Queens Roberto Clemente...”
“Capital Region Empire State Plaza Main Concourse Albany Central New York Senator John J Hughes State Office Building 333 E Washington Street Syracuse Finger Lakes State Police Zone Station 1155 Scottsville Road Suite 400 Rochester Long Island Perry B Duryea State Office Building 250 Veterans Memorial Highway Hauppauge Mid Hudson...”
“Those interested in donating outside of the New York area can visit Tidal.com/PuertoRico to make a monetary donation.”
“All items must be unopened and in their original packaging.”
“Sites will be opened from 9 a.m. to 6 p.m. daily.”
“See below for NYC-based donation drop-off locations.”
“Angie Martinez will host the event, with special guest appearances by Rosie Perez and Lin Manuel Miranda, both of whom boast Puerto Rican roots.”
“Angie Martinez will host the star-studded affair, which will feature a star-studded line up of performers including DJ Khaled, Jennifer Lopez, Chris Brown, Remy Ma, Vic Mensa, Cardi B and Jay Z himself, among many others.”
“This year’s concert, titled TIDAL X BROOKLYN, is taking place on October 17th at the Barclay’s Center in Brooklyn.”


"State Park 301 West tremor Avenue Bronx motor vehicle department 696 e Forrest road Bronx South floor Binghamton armory 85 West End Avenue Binghamton West New York Connecticut Street armory 184 Connecticut Street buffalo..."
"Yankees Valley armory 2 Quincy square Yankees Mohawk Valley Utica state government office 207 Genesee Street Utica jacobhavitz center 655 w 34 Sherry a Chisholm state government office 55 Hansen square Brooklyn Yamaga Street armory 93 05 168th Street queen Roberto Clement..."
"Empire State Building Central Hall Albany New York Senator John J. Hughes state government building 333 e Washington Street Syracuse finger lake state police department 1155 400 scotsville road Perry B durille state government building 250 Veterans Memorial Highway haupag middle Hudson..."
"Those who are interested in donating outside New York can visit Tidal.com/PuertoRico Donations. "
"All items must be intact and well packed."
"The website is open from 9am to 6pm every day."
"Here are the donation locations in New York City."
"Angie Martinez will host the event, and Rosie Perez and limaniel Miranda will be guest stars, both of Puerto Rican origin."
"Angie Martinez will host the star studded event, featuring DJ Khalid, Jennifer Lopez, Chris Brown, Remy Ma, Vic Mensa, Katie B and jay z himself."
This year's concert, called "trendsetter x Brooklyn," will be held on October 17 at the Buckley center in Brooklyn



Number  1150
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT”
““Hairspray Live” ultimately drew a 2.3 rating in adults 18-49 and just over 9 million viewers, making it one of the lower-rated live broadcast musicals to date.”
“Airing from 8-10:23 p.m., “Jesus Christ Superstar Live” drew a 1.7 rating in adults 18-49 and 9.4 million viewers.”
“NBC’s last live musical, “Hairspray Live,” drew a 2.3 rating in adults 18-49 and 9 million viewers back in December 2016.”
“It is also up slightly over Fox’s live version of the religious-themed “The Passion” musical from March 2016, which drew a 1.6 and 6.6 million viewers.”
“However, as “Jesus Christ Superstar” ended at 10:23 p.m., its initial numbers will be subject to adjustment later today.”
“Elsewhere on broadcast, a new episode of “American Idol” (1.6, 7.4 million) held steady with last week’s Sunday episode.”
““Deception” (0.8, 4.2 million) ticked up slightly in the demo.”
“For CBS, “60 Minutes” (0.7, 8.1 million) unsurprisingly fell from the massive ratings drawn by the Stormy Daniels interview the show aired last week.”
“Freshman drama “Instinct” (0.6, 6.7 million) slipped over 50% in the demo in its third week.”


"Related content"
"Hairspray live" finally won 2.3 ratings among adults aged 18-49, with only 9 million viewers, making it one of the live musicals with low ratings so far
From 8:00 p.m. to 10:23 p.m., "live super star of Jesus Christ" received 1.7 ratings among adults aged 18 to 49, attracting 9.4 million viewers
"NBC's last live musical hairspray live received 2.3 ratings among adults aged 18-49 and 9 million viewers in December 2016."
"This figure is also slightly higher than the live version of fox's religious themed musical passion, which has attracted 1.6 million and 6.6 million audiences since March 2016."
However, since "Jesus Christ Superstar" ends at 10:23 p.m., its initial number will be adjusted later today
Among the other shows on air, the new episode of "American Idol" (1.6 million, 7.4 million) remained stable with last week's Sunday show
"Deception" (84.2 million) rose slightly in the demonstration
"For CBS, it's not surprising that 60 minutes (700000, 8.1 million) ratings have dropped dramatically from last week's" Daniels interview. "
The new drama instinct (600000, 6700000) fell more than 50% in the third week's audition



Number  1151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned.”
“No news yet on a replacement for Wise.”
“Anna Boden and Ryan Fleck are directing with domestic release set for March 8, 2019.”
“Samuel L. Jackson, Jude Law, Ben Mendelsohn and Gemma Chan co-star.”
“The plot for the film is mostly under wraps, but it will take place in the ’90s before other MCU films, with the green-skinned extraterrestrial humanoid Skrulls as the main villains.”
“When her DNA was fused with that of an alien during an accident, the resulting alteration imbued her with the superpowers of strength, energy projection and flight.”
“Captain Marvel will center on Carol Danvers/Captain Marvel (Larson), an Air Force pilot who debuted in the Marvel comics in 1968 as a human companion to the original Captain Marvel.”
“She’s Gotta Have It, based on Spike Lee’s 1986 film and starring Wise as Nola Darling, was renewed for Season 2 in January, just as Wise joined the cast of the Marvel pic.”
“Scheduling conflicts with her Netflix series She’s Gotta Have It are the culprit here, we’re told by sources close to the production.”
“DeWanda Wise is no longer attached to Disney’s Captain Marvel, the MCU superhero tentpole that stars Brie Larson.”


"Please keep watching."
"There's no news of a replacement for wise."
"Anna Boden and Ryan fleck will be shown in China on March 8, 2019."
"Starring Samuel Jackson, Jude Law, Ben Mendelssohn and Gemma Chen."
"The plot of this movie is mostly secret, but it will take place before other MCU movies in the 1990s, with the green skin alien Scrooge as the main villain."
"When her DNA was fused with alien DNA in an accident, the resulting changes gave her the power, the power to project and fly."
"Captain Marvel" will focus on Carol Danvers / Larson, an air force pilot who made his debut in marvel in 1968 and is the human companion of the original marvel
"She had to have it, according to Spike Lee's 1986 film and starring Nora darling smart, which was renewed for Season 2 in January, just as smart joined the actor's amazing picture."
"There's a conflict with the timing of the Netflix series - she must have - and that's the culprit, according to sources close to production."
"Dwanda wise is no longer attached to Disney's Captain Marvel, the MCU superhero starring Bree Larson."



Number  1152
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“You are an amazing thinker and an incredible songwriter.”
“Martin may be rocking cherry red hair in the shot, but she still looks identical to her famous mom.”
“"Happy #nationaldaughtersday Apple Martin, it’s like I conjured you from a dream, you make my life," Paltrow wrote.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“The Goop founder shares Apple and 12-year-old son Moses with her ex-husband, Coldplay frontman Chris Martin.”
“Paltrow rarely shares details about her kids, but she recently posted a photo of them hanging out in her backyard at the end of summer, writing, "Noooooo summer don’t go."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"You are a great thinker and an incredible songwriter."
"As like as two peas, Martin may have a cherry red hair in the camera, but she still looks exactly like her famous mother."
"Happy National daughter's day, apple Martin," Paltrow wrote, "just as I called you from my dreams, you have made my life."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
This content was imported from {embedded name}
Google founder shares apple and his 12-year-old son, Moses, with Chris Martin, the former husband of Coldplay
Paltrow rarely shares the details of her children, but she recently posted a picture of them hanging out in the backyard at the end of the summer, which she wrote: "don't leave in summer."



Number  1153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Story continues below advertisement— With files from Simon Little, CKNW, and Katie Scott...”
“I have got to shake the hand of a real-life hero,” said Johnson.”
“Ten-year-old Jacob O’Connor was invited to the Vancouver set of The Rock’s new movie Skyscraper after a story went viral about Jacob saving his two-year-old brother’s life.”
“The 10-year-old had recently watched San Andreas, in which Johnson plays a rescue helicopter pilot, and at one point rescues his daughter from a near drowning.”
“Jacob said he remembered Johnson doing chest compressions in the scene; he mimicked them on his brother, an act credited with saving the toddler’s life.”
“There was an earthquake then it caused a tsunami and then there was a daughter that was drowning and The Rock had to get her out and he did the same thing Jacob said in late August Story continues below advertisement A few days after the story went viral The...”
“Rock invited Jacob his brother and his mom to meet him in Vancouver...”
“WATCH Dwayne Johnson invites boy who rescued his brother to Vancouver 0 59 Dwayne Johnson invites boy who rescued his brother to Vancouver Dwayne Johnson invites boy who rescued his brother to Vancouver Aug 26 2017 Jacob I m so proud of you so much so I have got to...”
“...meet you...”
“The Rock flew Jacob and his family to Vancouver where they were VIPs on the set of Skyscraper.”


"The story continues with the following ad - with documents from Simon little, CKNW, and Katie Scott..."
"I have to shake hands with a real hero," Johnson said
"10-year-old Jacob O'Connor was invited to take part in the Vancouver set of the new rock and roll film skyscraper because a story about Jacob saving his two-year-old brother has spread widely in Vancouver."
"The 10-year-old recently watched" St Andreas, "in which Johnson plays a pilot of a rescue helicopter and rescued his daughter from a near drowning accident
Jacobs said he remembers Johnson doing chest compressions at the scene; he mimicked his brother's chest compressions, which are believed to have saved the toddler's life
"There was an earthquake, and then there was a tsunami, and then a daughter drowned, and the rock had to rescue her. He did the same thing Jacob said at the end of August, and the story continued in the following advertisement, a few days after the story spread..."
"Locke invited Jacob, his brother and his mother to meet him in Vancouver..."
"Watch Dwayne Johnson invite the boy who saved his brother to Vancouver 0 59 Dwayne Johnson invite the boy who saved his brother to Vancouver Dwayne Johnson invite the boy who saved his brother to Vancouver August 26, 2017 Jacob I'm so proud of you that I have to..."
“… See you... "
"The stone brought Jacob and his family to Vancouver, and they were important people in the skyscraper shooting scene."



Number  1154
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Last week, Kidman successfully pulled a red carpet hat-trick, stepping out in support of three events in three days.”
“I love coconut cake with 7-minute icing.”But for the jet-setting Oscar winner, just having a day off would be a gift.”
“News.”
“Nicole Kidman Reveals Her 50th Birthday Plans with 'Divine' Husband Keith Urban and Kids: 'I Just Need My Family'Nicole Kidman is keeping it low-key for the big 5-0.”
“The Big Little Lies actress recently revealed she’s ringing in the milestone 50th birthday with her husband Keith Urban, her kids and close family.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““[I want] to hang with my divine husband and my kids and my sister,” Kidman told E!”
“News as she walked the red carpet at the Los Angeles premiere of her upcoming thriller The Beguiled.”
“The actress, who turns 50 on June 20, added, “I’ve already been to Australia and saw my mom and it’s too far for her to travel but my sister is coming over with all her children.”
“She has six kids.”Kidman and Urban share two daughters, Sunday, 8, and Faith, 6.”


"Kidman scored a red carpet hat trick last week and supported three events in three days."
"I like coconut cake with seven minutes of icing." But for the Oscar winner in a jet, it's just a day off
"News."
"Nicole Kidman revealed her 50th birthday plans with fairy husband Keith Urban and her children:" I just need my family. "Nicole Kidman kept a low profile in the 5-0 war
The big lie actress recently revealed that she will cheer up with her husband Keith Urban, her children and close family on her landmark 50th birthday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I want to be with my holy husband, my children and my sister," Kidman told me
"The news when she stepped on the red carpet at the upcoming Los Angeles Premiere of the thriller cheated."
The actress, who will turn 50 on June 20, added: "I've gone to Australia and met my mother. It's too far for her to travel, but my sister is coming with her children."
"She has six children." Kidman and urban have two daughters, 8-year-old Sunday and 6-year-old faith



Number  1155
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She's a wonderful performer for what she does, but she is not an actress."”
“She should not be on film or on stage.”
“She couldn't act her way out of a paper bag.”
“"She's dead behind the eyes.”
“That hurt, but LuPone was not nearly done.”
“"Madonna is a movie killer."”
“"I thought it was a piece of s--t," she told host Cohen.”
“The American Theater Hall of Famer took particular issue with Madonna's portrayal of Argentina's Eva Peron in the 1996 movie musical Evita, a role LuPone originated on Broadway in 1979.”
“The Broadway legend went off on Madge during Tuesday's (May 9) episode of Watch What Happens Live with Andy Cohen, where she made it clear she doesn't care for Mad's singing, acting, or anything else, really.”
“Patti LuPone is not a Madonna fan, clearly.”


She's a great actress, but she's not
"She shouldn't be in a movie or on stage."
"She can't get out of the paper bag."
"She died behind her eyes."
"It's painful, but lupon hasn't finished it yet."
"Madonna is a movie killer."
"I thought it was an S-T clip," she told host Cohen
The American theatre hall of fame has raised special questions about Madonna's role as Eva Peron of Argentina in the 1996 musical Ivetta. In 1979, Rupert debuted the role on Broadway
"The Broadway legend became popular on Tuesday (May 9) with Andy Cohen, where she made it clear she didn't like mad's singing, acting or anything else, really."
"Patty lupon is obviously not a fan of Madonna."



Number  1156
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“On the last day of their visit Friday before flying home in time to celebrate Prince George’s fourth birthday, they visited the Maritime Museum in Hamburg to celebrate the joint U.K.-German Year of Science, the Airbus facilities and attended a special performance at the Elbphilarmonie Concert Hall.”
““The Duchess was the center of attention, with several children throwing themselves into her arms for a cuddle,” the Mail reported.”
“The trip was a very deliberate effort by their government to ease relations with European Union leaders as Britain negotiates its exit from the Union.”
“They smiled their best smiles, showed their concern for disadvantaged and sick children and were clearly touched by what they learned about Nazi concentration camps and genocide.”
“They baked pretzels and challenged each other to a boat race, doled out hugs and high-fives, talked with members of the government and people in the streets.”
“And they were acclaimed, applauded and admired by the crowds that followed them by the hundreds at their every step.”
“Prince William Kate Middleton and their young children four year old Prince George and two year old Princess Charlotte have shown yet again that they are the most effective weapon in Britain s armory for charming foreign leaders dignitaries and the general public even if as some British critics warn...”
“...they re being used to endorse a nationalistic government moving ever further from democracy as is the case in Poland...”
““William and Kate Have Been Duped Into Endorsing Poland’s Ugly Nationalism” the Guardian complained on Friday.”
““The Foreign Office already knew that by sending our photogenic young royals – complete with cutesy Prince George and Princess Charlotte – we were whitewashing an appalling government,” writes Kate Maltby.”


"On the last day of Friday, on the last day of flying to Hamburg to celebrate Prince George's fourth birthday, they visited the Maritime Museum in the UK, celebrated the joint German German year of science, Airbus facilities, and participated in a special performance at the elferimani concert hall."
"The Duchess is the focus of attention and several children are all embracing her," the Daily Mail reported
"This visit is a very careful effort by their government to ease relations with EU leaders at a time when the UK is negotiating its exit from the EU."
"They showed their brightest smiles, expressed their concern for disadvantaged and sick children, and were clearly moved by their understanding of Nazi concentration camps and genocide."
They bake pretzels, challenge each other for boat races, hug each other and clap high fives, and talk to government members and people on the street
Every step they took was cheered, applauded and admired by hundreds of people
"Prince William Kate Middleton and their four-year-old children, Prince George and two-year-old Princess Charlotte, once again show that they are the most effective weapons in the British armory, providing weapons for charming foreign leaders, dignitaries and the public, even as some British commentators warn..."
“…… They are used to support a nationalist government, as in Poland, further and further away from democracy... "
"William and Kate have been tricked into supporting Poland's ugly nationalism," the guardian complained on Friday
Kate Malby wrote: "the foreign office has learned that by sending our young photographed royal family, together with the lovely Prince George and Princess Charlotte, we are whitewashing an appalling government."



Number  1157
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'””
“I was going to find you.”
“It was widely believed that Jason Momoa and Lisa “Lilakoi” Bonet married in November 2007, but they didn’t make it official until this October, multiple sources confirm exclusively to Us Weekly.”
““Jason Momoa and Lisa Bonet had an official wedding a few weeks ago at their house in Topanga, California,” one insider reveals.”
““Apparently they weren’t officially married until then!”
“They said they ‘made it official.”
“'”A second source confirms to Us that the couple — who share kids Lola, 10, and Nakoa-Wolf, 8 — purchased a marriage license from the Los Angeles County Registrar-Recorder/County Clerk’s office on October 2, one week before they exchanged vows.”
“Bonet’s daughter Zoë Kravitz, whom she shares with ex-husband Lenny Kravitz, attended the wedding, as did Alicia Vikander, Michael Fassbender, famed rock climber Chris Sharma and several of Momoa’s former costars.”
““He stays close with the people he works with on movies and is a really nice guy,” the first source tells Us.”
““It was a big party and people came from out of town to attend.”According to a Facebook user who saw a friend’s photos from the wedding, the Game of Thrones alum, 38, wore an unbuttoned white shirt and a lei.”


“'””
"I wanted to find you."
"It is generally believed that Jason Momo and Lisa lilacoyi bonette got married in November 2007, but it was not officially announced until October this year," a number of sources exclusively confirmed to us weekly
"Jason Momo and Lisa bonette got married a few weeks ago at their home in Topanga, California," a person familiar with the matter said
"It's obvious that they were officially married at that time!"
"They said they had officially announced it."
"A second source confirmed to us that the couple - Lola, 10, and nacoya wolf, 8 - purchased their marriage certificate on October 2 from the Los Angeles County Register / county clerk's office a week before the exchange of vows."
"Bonette's daughter, Zoroaster Kravitz, was present with her ex husband, Lenny Kravitz, as were Alicia vicander, Michael Fassbender, Chris Sharma, and several former partners of Momoa."
The first source told us: "he has a close relationship with his colleagues in the film and is a very good person."
"It's a big party and people come from out of town." According to a Facebook user who saw a picture of a friend's wedding, the 38 year old alumni of game of Thrones was wearing a white shirt without buttons and a tie



Number  1158
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He also appeared on the reality series Khloe & Lamar, opposite his friend and former teammate Lamar Odom and Khloé Kardashian.”
“Drafted by the Miami Heat in 2002, he finished his playing days with the San Antonio Spurs in 2016, though he played a few preseason games with the Minnesota Timberwolves before last season.”
“Here’s the video for “Sexify”:Butler played for 14 NBA teams including the Los Angeles Clippers during a 13-year NBA career.”
“In 2011, a sampler for record companies was produced that featured “Sexify.” The track dented the national R&B chart in 2012, but her follow-up single “Lolita” failed to chart.”
“She then was spotted by Jermaine Dupri and Pharrell Williams, who eventually signed the Idol alum to a record deal.”
“Here is her audition:Singer Keri Hilson saw a video on LaBelle’s YouTube page in 2009, and LaBelle joined her as a backup singer.”
“LaBelle, whose uncle was a Bulgarian rock star, started out singing in a local choir before appearing on Idol at age 16.”
“Born in Toronto, Ontario, Canada and raised in Seattle, LaBelle was the only child of Troshan and Anastasia Vladowski who’d immigrated from communist Bulgaria where they were members of famous rock/pop bands.”
“Related Story Jay Curtis Dies: Longtime CBS Brand Manager Was 67Leah Labelle Vladowski, known on Idol and professionally as Leah Labelle, finished 12th on Season 3 of the singing competition when it was among the most popular shows on TV.”
“LAPD Valley Traffic Division officer believe that speed was a factor in the crash.”


"He also appeared in the reality series Khloe & Lamar against his friends and former teammates Odom and Kardashian."
"He was drafted by the Miami Heat in 2002 and ended his San Antonio Spurs game in 2016, though he played several pre-season games with the Minnesota Timberwolves before last season."
Here's the sexy video: Butler played for 14 NBA teams including the Los Angeles Clippers during his 13 year NBA career
In 2011, the record company produced a sample featuring sexuality. The song was at the bottom of the 2012 national R & B charts, but her follow-up single Lolita failed to make it to the charts
Later, Jermaine Dupree and Farrell Williams discovered her and finally signed a record contract with her idol alumni
"She's auditioning: singer Kerry Hilson saw a video on rabel's YouTube page in 2009, and rabel joined her as her backup singer."
Label's uncle, a Bulgarian rock star, started singing in a local Choir at the age of 16 and later appeared on idol
Born in Toronto, Ontario, Canada, and raised in Seattle, label is the only son of troshan and Anastasia vladofsky, who are members of famous rock / pop bands and immigrated from Communist Bulgaria
"Jay Curtis died: Leah LaBelle vladowski, 67, a long-time CBS brand manager, was named Leah LaBelle in American Idol and ranked 12th in the third season of the singing competition, when it was one of the most popular shows on TV."
"LAPD Valley Transportation officials believe that speed is a factor in the crash."



Number  1159
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There have been a lot of things said and Kanye and I have not confirmed anything.”
“Speaking to The Hollywood Reporter about the possibility of a third child, she said: "I hope so.”
“Neither Kim nor Kanye has confirmed the news but it's not the first time they've been at the centre of speculation a third child is on the way.”
“"Both of them have been super involved in the process."”
“"Given her health scares in the past, Kim felt the need to hire a surrogacy agency that helped serve as the liaison in finding a healthy woman who would be a great surrogate option for her and Kanye.”
“...com Another source told People The entire family is over the moon...”
“15 According to recent claims the pair are expecting their third baby in January 2018 Credit Getty Contributor 15 Kim was last seen in public out and about in LA on August 24 Credit BackGrid 15 Kanye was seen leaving a recording studio in LA on Tuesday night Credit X17Online...”
“According to TMZ, the pair decided to have a third baby via surrogacy because of Kim's well-documented medical issues during her previous pregnancies.”
“...girl in January...”
“15 The reality star and her husband Kanye West have been at the centre of numerous surrogacy reports over the past few weeks Credit Splash News Earlier this week it was revealed that the couple who are already parents to North four and Saint one will be welcoming a baby...”


"Said a lot, Kanye and I didn't confirm anything."
"I hope so," she said in an interview with a Hollywood Reporter
"Neither Kim Jong Il nor kenno have confirmed the news, but this is not the first time that they have become the center of speculation about the impending birth of their third child."
"Both of them are super involved in the process."
"Considering her past health problems, Kim felt it necessary to hire a surrogate agency as a contact person to help her find a healthy woman, which was a good surrogate choice for her and Kanye."
“… Another source told people that the whole family was on the moon... "
"15 according to a recent report, the two will have their third child in January 2018. Credit Getty contributor 15 Kim's last public appearance was on August 24. Credit background15 Kanye was seen leaving the studio in Los Angeles on Tuesday night credit x17online..."
"According to TMZ, the two decided to have a third child through surrogacy because Kim had adequate medical records during her previous pregnancy."
“… The girl of January... "
"15 reality star and her husband Kanye West have been at the center of a lot of surrogacy coverage in the past few weeks. Earlier this week, it was reported that the couple, who are already parents of Beisi and Shengyi, will have a child... "



Number  1160
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There’s The Woman Who Used To Be In Prison Who Didn’t Turn Over Her Knife To Michonne (otherwise known as Magna, played by Nadia Hilker).”
“After last night’s episode, I can barely tell you a meaningful thing about them.”
“Daryl’s hair is still an unwashed mess, but he’s sporting enough extra length to earn him free admission to an Iron Maiden concert.”
“Ever-practical Carol has ditched her short hair for a billowing witch’s mane.”
“Did nothing happen that altered the fundamental dynamics between this group of survivors?”
“Instead, everybody has a different hairstyle.”
“Walkers are still walkers, and for the most part, nothing has progressed meaningfully from an infrastructure standpoint, apart from the survivors building a windmill.”
“They don’t actually look any older, mind you, and nobody exhibits any real significant behavioral changes, save for Michonne occasionally talking out loud to Rick or Carl.”
“As shown in the trailers for this week’s episode, The Walking Dead is aging up the established characters.”
“Stay with me.”


"There's a woman who used to be in prison who didn't give the knife to mishawn (also known as magna, played by Nadia hilk)
"After last night's episode, I can hardly tell you a meaningful thing about them."
"Daryl's hair hasn't been washed yet, but he's long enough to attend an iron lady concert for free."
"Carol, who has always been pragmatic, changed her short hair into a fluffy witch's mane."
"Isn't there anything that changes the basic dynamics between these survivors?"
"On the contrary, everyone's hairstyle is different."
"Walkers are still walkers, and from an infrastructure point of view, most of the time, no progress makes sense except that the survivors built a windmill."
"Please note that they don't actually seem to be getting older, and no one is showing any really significant behavioral changes, except that mishawn occasionally speaks loudly to Rick or Carl."
"As the trailer for this week's show shows, the character of the walking dead is aging."
"Stay with me."



Number  1161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Episode IX will debut in theaters on May 23rd, 2019.”
“...death...”
“The official Star Wars twitter account also posted this moving video homage to Carrie It was recently revealed that the late actress would in fact make a a posthumous appearance in Star Wars Episode IX The Last Jedi after her family gave Lucasfilm permission to use footage shot before her...”
“Billie concluded her speech by reciting Leia's legendary plea to Obi-Wan Kenobi.”
“She loved you, she loved these movies, she loved the people she got to make them with, and she loved this incredible character she got to create, this force called Leia."”
“Nothing about her was a performance.”
“.”
“...side of our own...”
“That was why she loved you Billie said to fans because you accepted and embraced all of her the strong soldier of a woman she was and also the vulnerable side of her who often openly fought her own dark side knowing early on that we all have a dark...”


"Episode 9 will be released on May 23, 2019."
“… Death... "
"Star Wars Official twitter account also released this touching video to pay homage to Carrie. Recently, it was reported that the late actress would appear in Star Wars Episode 9 and the last Jedi after her death, because her family allowed Lucas film company to use the lens shot in front of her... "
"Billy recited Leia's legendary plea to Obi Wan Kenobi at the end of his speech."
"She loves you, she loves these movies, she loves the people who make movies with her, she loves this incredible character she created, this power called Leia."
"Nothing about her is acting."
“.”
“… Our own side... "
"That's why she loves you, Billy told fans, because you accept and embrace everything she has. She is a strong fighter of a woman, and also her vulnerable side. She often struggles with her dark side openly, and knows that we all have darkness for a long time..."



Number  1162
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In an interview with the Washington Post published on Sept. 16, Blasey Ford said that an intoxicated Kavanaugh pinned her down on a bed and groped her during a party.”
“The Washington Post—The Washington Post/Getty ImagesChristine Blasey Ford, a professor at Palo Alto University, accused Supreme Court nominee Brett Kavanaugh of attempting to sexually assault her when they were both in high school.”
“Gary Miller—FilmMagic/Getty ImagesThe New York Times reported on Feb. 13 that seven women accused singer Ryan Adams of offering to help their music careers but then pursued them sexually.”
“Ryan AdamsRyan Adams performs in concert on the first day of week one of the Austin City Limits Music Festival at Zilker Park on October 6, 2017 in Austin, Texas.”
“143.”
““The assumption that the Conor retirement announcement today is related to this rumor is absolutely false.”A spokesperson for McGregor didn’t immediately respond to TIME’s request for comment.”
““This story has been circulating for some time, and it is unclear why it is being reported now,’’ the statement said, according to the Times.”
“McGregor has not publicly commented on the allegations, but his publicist released a statement calling his retirement unrelated to reports about the investigation.”
“The news of the investigation came on the same day after McGregor announced his retirement on Twitter.”
“McGregor has not been charged with a crime as of March 27.”


In an interview with the Washington Post on September 16, Brasi Ford said a drunken cavano pressed her on the bed and touched her at the party
"Washington Post Washington Post / Getty Images University of Palo Alto Professor Christine Brasi Ford accused Supreme Court nominee Brett cavano of trying to sexually assault her when both were in high school."
"Gary Miller film Magic / Getty Images the New York Times reported on February 13 that seven women accused singer Ryan Adams of offering to help their music career, but then pursuing them sexually."
"Ryan Adams Ryan Adams performed at the concert on the first day of the first week of the Austin City extreme music festival in Zilker Park, Austin, Texas, on October 6, 2017."
“143.”
"The assumption that Conner announced retirement today is related to this rumor is totally wrong." A spokesman for McGregor didn't immediately respond to a request for comment from time
According to the times, the statement said: "the story has been around for some time and it is not clear why it should be reported."
"McGregor did not comment publicly on the charges, but his public relations staff said in a statement that his retirement had nothing to do with reports of the investigation."
"The news of the investigation came on the same day that McGregor announced his retirement on twitter."
"As of March 27, McGregor has not been charged with a crime."



Number  1163
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sadly, the islands were badly hit by this year’s hurricane season so the royal couple might have to look elsewhere.”
“As for the honeymoon, Antigua’s Prime Minister invited Harry to spend his honeymoon on the Caribbean islands of Antigua and Barbuda during a visit in Nov. 2016 (making the royal turn “bright red,” according to sources on the ground).”
“In March, Markle joined Prince Harry at a wedding in Jamaica for one of his close friends.”
“Harry was photographed driving the actress into the Middleton home later that day after picking her up from London after the ceremony.”
“Later that month, she attended part of the wedding of Kate Middleton’s sister, Pippa, to financier James Matthews.”
“Markle attended her first public event with Harry in May this year, at the Coworth Park Polo Club in Ascot, England.”
“The week before, Harry had made a 1,700-mile detour from his tour of the Caribbean to visit Markle at her Toronto home.”
“A few days later they were spotted while on a date to see the hit play The Curious Incident of the Dog in the Night-Time in London’s West End.”
“Prince Harry and Markle were photographed in public together for the first time in Dec. 2016, shopping for a Christmas tree at the Pines and Needles store in London.”
““It is not right that a few months into a relationship with him that Ms. Markle should be subjected to such a storm.”When have Prince Harry and Meghan Markle appeared together in public?”


"Unfortunately, these islands have been badly hit during this year's hurricane season, so the royal couple may have to look elsewhere."
"As for honeymoon, Antigua's prime minister invited Harry to honeymoon in November 2016 when he visited the Caribbean islands of Antigua and Barbuda (which, according to local sources, made the royal family" bright red ")
In March, mark and Prince Harry married a close friend of his in Jamaica
"Later in the day, Harry was photographed picking her up from London to Middleton's home after the wedding."
Later that month, she attended part of Kate Middleton's sister Pippa's wedding to financier James Matthews
In May, markel and Harry took part in her first public event at cowers Park Polo Club in Ascot, UK
"The week before, Harry made a 1700 mile detour from the Caribbean to see Marcel at her home in Toronto."
"A few days later, they were found out on a date in the west end when they were watching the hit TV series the strange incident of dogs at night
"In December 2016, Prince Harry and markel took their first public photo when they were shopping for a Christmas tree at a pine needle shop in London."
"It's not right that Ms. markel will suffer such a disturbance after a few months with him." When will Prince Harry and Megan markel appear in public together? "



Number  1164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pope is scheduled to appear April 2, 3 and 9.”
“Then I got tired and didn’t want to do this anymore and things fell into place.”The “Think of You” star will be back to her old stomping grounds shortly as she returns to The Voice — which she won in 2012 — as Kelly Clarkson‘s adviser.”
“...the singer said of moving on from her broken engagementThe country singer, 28, revealed that although she knew 31-year-old Palladio socially for years, they didn’t connect romantically until December.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We met a long time ago — I think it was at a CMA afterparty — and it was like a hi-bye, never saw him again, never hung out,” she recalled.”
““And then, gosh I think it was December of last year, we decided to take our dogs to the dog park … and we hit it off!”
“For now — I don’t know, it’s still new.”Image zoom Cassadee Pope and Sam Palladio | Credit: Rick Diamond/GettyNot only is the couple’s chemistry a match, but so are their dogs.”
““They’re the complete opposites, but they love each other,” said Pope, who is the proud pet parent of French bulldog Cuppy, while Palladio owns a Whippet named River.”
“I think the original idea for the date was his and then I was like How about tomorrow Pope shared adding that their relationship is super easy breezy This is Pope s first relationship after ending her engagement to All Time Low drummer Rian Dawson last summer after seven years...”
“...together...”


"The Pope is scheduled to appear in court on April 2, 3 and 9."
"Then I got tired and didn't want to do it again, and it happened." The "miss you" star will soon return to her former track, and she will return to the voice of Kelly Clarkson's advisor she won in 2012
The 28 year old country singer revealed that although she and 31 year old Palladio had known each other for many years, they didn't have a romantic connection until December
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We met a long time ago - I think it was at a CMA Party - it was like a goodbye, never seeing him again, never going out again," she recalled
"And then, my God, I think it was last December, and we decided to take the dog to the dog park We're old friends at first sight! "
"For now - I don't know, it's new." Image zooming Cassady Pope and Sam Palladio | source: Rick diamond / Getty is not only the couple's chemical reaction, but also their dog. "
"They're totally antagonistic, but they love each other," said Pope, the proud pet parent of the French Bulldog cubby, while Palladio owns a whipper named river
"The first idea I wanted to date was him, and then I thought about tomorrow," Popper shared, adding that their relationship was super relaxed breeze, which was Popper's first relationship after ending her engagement with all time low drummer Ryan Dawson seven years later last summer... "
“… Together... "



Number  1165
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It was perfect.”Scroll through to see the pics!”
““This year has been an emotional roller coaster to say the least, but getting to share this night with the people I love most reminded me of how important it is to celebrate the joy in our lives,” Burke wrote of the party.”
“Two months later, her now-fiancé, 38, proposed to the reality star with the same diamond that Stephen gave Cheryl’s mother, Sherri.”
““Congratulations on your engagement @matthewlawrence,” he wrote, adding, “So happy for you and @cherylburke.”The night was especially sweet for the bride-to-be, who lost her father, Stephen Burke, in March.”
“One of those friends included Lawrence’s former Boy Meets World costar, Ben Savage, who shared a photo of himself next to the actor.”
““This past weekend @matthewlawrence and I celebrated our engagement with our families and some of our closest friends, and I’ve been daydreaming of it ever since,” the professional dancer wrote of the bash thrown by DWTS pro Kym Johnson and her husband, Shark Tank‘s Robert Herjaveck.”
“Cheryl Burke and Matthew Lawrence celebrated their impending nuptials with a sweet engagement party full of loved ones, as seen in a series of photos posted to the Dancing With the Stars alum’s Instagram on Friday, July 27.”
“Party time!”


"It's perfect." Scroll through the picture
"This year, to say the least, is an emotional roller coaster, but sharing the night with my favorite reminds me of how important it is to celebrate the joy of our lives," Burke wrote of the party
Two months later, her 38 year old fiance proposed to the reality TV star with the diamond that Stephen gave Sheryl's mother Shirley
"Congratulations on your engagement to Matthew Lawrence," he wrote. "I'm so happy for you and Cheryl Burke." The night was especially sweet for the bride, who lost her father, Stephen Burke, in March
"One of his friends, including Lawrence's former" boy meets the world "actor Ben savage, shared a picture of himself with the actors
"Last weekend @ Matthew Lawrence and I celebrated our engagement to our family and some of our closest friends, and I've been daydreaming ever since," the professional dancer wrote of the carnival hosted by DWTS Pro Kim Johnson and her husband, Robert herjaveck of shark tank
"Cheryl Burke and Matthew Lawrence celebrate their upcoming wedding at a sweet engagement party filled with love. On Friday, July 27, dancing with the stars alum's instagram released a series of photos."
"Party time!"



Number  1166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Larry Klein, Barry Adelman and Mark Bracco are producers.”
“Allen Shapiro and Mike Mahan are executive producers.”
“The 2017 American Music Awards is produced by dick clark productions.”
“The Chainsmokers, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, Ed Sheeran and The Weeknd tied with five nominations each, while Justin Bieber, Daddy Yankee and Luis Fonsi received four nominations each.”
“Bruno Mars leads with eight nominations, including Artist of the Year, Video of the Year and Favorite Male Artist – Pop/Rock.”
“Other previously announced performers include BTS, Alessia Cara & Zedd, Kelly Clarkson, Selena Gomez, Niall Horan, Imagine Dragons & Khalid, Demi Lovato, Pink and Portugal.”
“Christina Aguilera also will pay tribute to Whitney Houston and music from The Bodyguard with a performance in honor of the film’s 25th anniversary, which falls on the same week as the awards ceremony.”
““And I’m especially thrilled to host this year when my mother is receiving the American Music Award for Lifetime Achievement.”ABCAs previously announced, honoree Ross will take the stage for a rare performance at the AMAs.”
““I am thrilled to host this special night which honors some of the greatest musical talents in our industry,” said Ross.”
“ABC will air the ceremony live from LA’s Microsoft Theater this Sunday, November 19.”


"Larry Klein, Barry Adelman and mark Blake are producers."
"Alan Shapiro and Mike Mahan are executive producers."
"The 2017 American Music Awards were produced by Dick Clark."
"Smoker, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, ed Sheeran and weekend each received five nominations, while Justin Bieber, Yankee dad and Louis fonsey each received four."
Bruno Mars received eight nominations, including artist of the year, video of the year and pop / rock, the most popular male singer
"Other performers previously announced include BTS, Alessia Cara & Zedd, Kelly Clarkson, Selena Gomez, Niall Horan, imagine dragons & Khalid, Demi Lovato, pink and Portugal."
"Christina Aguilera will also perform in the same week as the awards ceremony to commemorate the 25th anniversary of the film, paying tribute to the music of Whitney Houston and bodyguards."
"This year, when my mother won the American music Lifetime Achievement Award, I was particularly excited." ABCAS had previously announced that winner Ross would be on stage for a rare performance on AMAS
"I'm very happy to host this special evening in recognition of some of our greatest musical talents," Rose said
ABC will broadcast the awards live at the Microsoft theater in Los Angeles on Sunday, November 19



Number  1167
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Written by Dan Fogelman and directed by Glenn Ficarra and John Requa, Crazy Stupid Love embroiled a quality cast, including Steve Carell, Julianne Moore, Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, in multi-stranded storylines steeped in relationship dysfunction.”
“But in the US, the DNA of Crazy Stupid Love has evolved into a cultural phenomenon.”
“If the 2011 romantic comedy, Crazy Stupid Love has any remnant of cultural significance in the UK, it’s as the inspiration for a Cheryl Cole hit of the same name.”
“That’s the hour the country watches the hit drama This Is Us and cries its collective heart out.”
“At 10 o’clock on Tuesday nights, a sizable chunk of America forgets its petty differences and hatred of its fellow man.”
“But there is one hour in the oppressive week when the citizens of the US stop attacking and accusing each other.”
“Even sports are no longer an escape.”
“The workplace is a minefield.”
“Neighbours hate each other.”
“Families are torn apart.”


"Written by Dan Fogelman and directed by Glenn ficarra and John Requa, crazy stupid love involves Steve Carell, Julianne Moore and Ryan gosl in a multi story plot full of emotional barriers
"But in the United States, the DNA of crazy and stupid love has evolved into a cultural phenomenon."
"If there is any cultural legacy of the 2011 romantic comedy crazy stupid love in Britain, it is the inspiration for Cheryl Cole's hit show of the same name."
"At this time, people all over the country are watching the hit drama" this is us "and crying bitterly."
"At 10 p.m. on Tuesday, quite a few Americans forgot their little differences and hatred for their compatriots."
"But in this oppressive week, American citizens have an hour to stop attacking and blaming each other."
"Even sport is no longer escape."
"The workplace is a minefield."
"The neighbors hate each other."
"Families are divided."



Number  1168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This story originally appeared in the New York Post.”
“He says traveling with his troop of five is “unspeakable.”“And then you go through that moral torment – do I actually travel with them or do I make an excuse that they have to go with their mom or a nanny,” he quipped.”
“He has two other kids, Felix and Tabitha, from a previous relationship with Tinglan Hong.”
“Grant and Eberstein, who’ve been together for six years, have three kids together, five-year-old John, a daughter whose name hasn’t been made public and a baby born this spring, whose name is also not known.”
“They exchanged vows in a very small ceremony in Chelsea area of London, reports The Sun.”
“I love her.”Grant tied the knot with Anna Eberstein, 39, in May, bringing his wild bachelor days to an end.”
“I’ve got a great wife.”
“I’m lucky.”
““I’m just lucky.”
““It’s really nice, I can’t pretend it isn’t,” the British actor, 57, shared Wednesday on “Today.”“I should have done it before,” he said.”


"The story first appeared in the New York Post."
"He said traveling with his five people was" indescribable. " "And then you go through the moral torture - do I really travel with them, or do I have to make an excuse that they have to go with their mother or nanny," he quipped
"He has two other children, Felix and Tabitha, who used to associate with Huntington."
"Grant and eberstein have been together for six years. They have three children together. John, five years old, has a daughter whose name has not yet been disclosed, and a child born this spring, whose name is unknown."
According to the sun, they exchanged vows at a very small ceremony in London's Chelsea area
"I love her." In May, grant married Anna eberstein, 39, ending his crazy single life
"I have a good wife."
"I'm lucky."
"I'm just lucky."
"It's really good, I can't pretend it's not," the 57 year old British actor said on today on Wednesday. "I should have done it before," he said



Number  1169
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Raisa Bruner at raisa.bruner@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Best known as Kit Harington’s character’s wildling love interest and fellow fighter Ygritte in the popular HBO show, Leslie and Harington first sparked dating rumors back in 2012 before appearing publicly together for the first time in spring of 2016.”
“Now, however, PEOPLE reports that a source has confirmed the two are engaged.”
““If you’re already attracted to someone, and then they play your love interest in the show, it becomes very easy to fall in love,” Harington told L’Uomo Vogue back in 2016.”
“Leslie moved in with him this year according to a June appearance on James Corden’s show.”
“At that time, fellow guest Nicole Kidman prodded Harington about his proposal plans — but he said he was taking things “step by step.”Harington and Leslie are major fan favorites, thanks to some seriously memorable (and steamy) scenes they’ve shared in the fantasy show.”
“While Daenerys Targaryen may have caught Jon Snow’s eye onscreen for now, it’s clear that Ygritte has been the one for him all along.”
“Game of Thrones returns with its final season next year.”
“Until then, we’ll have to satisfy ourselves with the real-life drama these actors are happily playing out.”


"To Lisa Bruner, La Bruner @ time."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"What Leslie and Harrington are best known for is the role played by kit Harrington, her wild love interest and her HBO hit comrades igrit, who first sparked rumors of a date in 2012 and then made their first public appearance in the spring of 2016."
"However, it is now reported that a source has confirmed that the two are engaged."
"It's very easy to fall in love if you've been attracted to someone and they play you on the show," Harrington told L'uomo vogue in 2016
"According to an appearance on James cordon in June, Leslie moved in with him this year."
"At the time, fellow guest Nicole Kidman revealed his proposal to Harrington, but he said he was advancing it" step by step. ". Harrington and Leslie are fans' favorites, thanks to some of the unforgettable scenes they shared on the fantasy show
"Although Denise tangorian may have caught Jon Snow's eye on the screen by now, it's clear that igritte has always been his man."
"The game of power will be in its last season next year."
"Until then, we can only be satisfied with the real-life drama that these actors happily perform."



Number  1170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So I need to go take a hike today, or I need to go have lunch with a girlfriend.’””
“There’s no trick to doing it, other than having really good communication with your partner, and being able to say, ‘I’m reaching capacity.”
“The adorable couple spent Saturday night at Moonlight Rollerway roller skating rink in Glendale, California, where they showed off their skills with pals — while documenting it all on social media.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Tonight @daxshepard rent[ed] a roller skating rink.”
“And I had one of the best nights of my life,” Bell, 37, captioned a photo with her husband whizzing down the rink on her Instagram stories.”
“They also shared videos highlighting their dance moves while on wheels, including those of friends who joined such as Bell’s former Veronica Mars co-star, Ryan Hansen.”
“At one point, the men even linked up with their hands on each others’ hips and skated around as a four-person chain.”
“Bell proudly announced Incredible night at officialmoonlightrollerway not a single broken bone Image zoom Dax Shepard and Kristen Bell Credit Kristen Bell Instagram Image zoom Dax Shepard and Kristen Bell Credit Kristen Bell Instagram Image zoom Credit Kristen Bell Instagram Image zoom Ryan Hansen Credit Kristen Bell Instagram The couple...”
“...married in 2013 after six years of dating...”


"So I'm going hiking today, or having lunch with my girlfriend."
"There's no trick to doing this, except to have good communication with your partner and to be able to say, 'I've reached my ability.'"
"The lovely couple spent Saturday night at the moonlight rink in Glendale, California, where they showed off their technology with friends and recorded it on social media."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Tonight @ daxshepard rented a rink."
"I had the best night of my life," bell, 37, describes on instagram a picture of her husband roaring down the rink
"They also shared some videos focusing on their own dance steps while driving, including those of friends like Bell's former Veronica Mars co star Ryan Hansen."
"Once, these people even put their hands on each other's hips and skated around in the form of four person chains."
"Bell is proud to announce the incredible night at the official moonlight rollerway without a fracture image scaling DAX Shepard and Kristen bell credit Kristen bell instagram image scaling DAX Shepard and Kristen bell credit Kristen bell instagram image scaling Kristen bell instagram image scaling Ryan Hansen credit Kristen bell instagram Couple... "
“… Married in 2013 after six years of love... "



Number  1171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Louis Missouri Sept 22 Mercedes Benz Superdome in New Orleans Louisiana Sept 29 NRG Stadium in Houston Texas NEW SHOW October 5th AT T Stadium in Dallas Texas Oct 6 AT T Stadium in Arlington Texas...”
“Field in Detroit Michigan NEW SHOW August 31st U S Bank Stadium in Minneapolis Minnesota Sept 1 U S Bank Stadium in Minneapolis Minnesota Sept 8 Arrowhead Stadium in Kansas City Missouri Sept 15 Lucas Oil Stadium in Indianapolis Indiana Sept 18 The Dome at America s Center in St...”
“Ontario Aug 7 Heinz Field in Pittsburgh Pennsylvania Aug 10 Mercedes Benz Stadium in Atlanta Georgia Aug 11 Mercedes Benz Stadium in Atlanta Georgia Aug 14 Raymond James Stadium in Tampa Florida Aug 18 Hard Rock Stadium in Miami Florida Aug 25 Nissan Stadium in Nashville Tennessee Aug 28 Ford...”
“Rutherford New Jersey NEW SHOW July 22nd MetLife Stadium in East Rutherford New Jersey NEW SHOW July 26th Gillette Stadium in Foxborough Massachusetts July 27 Gillette Stadium in Foxborough Massachusetts July 28 Gillette Stadium in Foxborough Massachusetts August 3 Rogers Centre in Toronto Ontario Aug 4 Rogers Centre in Toronto...”
“NEW SHOW July 11th FedExField in Washington D C NEW SHOW July 13th Lincoln Financial Field in Philadelphia Pennysylvania July 14 Lincoln Financial Field in Philadelphia Pennsylvania July 17 First Energy Stadium in Cleveland Ohio July 20 MetLife Stadium in East Rutherford New Jersey July 21 MetLife Stadium in East...”
“May 25 Sports Authority Field at Mile High in Denver Colorado June 1 Soldier Field in Chicago Illinois June 2 Soldier Field in Chicago Illinois June 30 Papa John s Cardinal Stadium in Louisville Kentucky July 7 Ohio Stadium in Columbus Ohio July 10 FedEx Field in Washington D C”
“May 8 University of Phoenix Stadium in Glendale Arizona NEW SHOW May 11th Levi s Stadium in Santa Clara California May 12 Levi s Stadium in Santa Clara California May 18 Rose Bowl in Pasadena California May 19 Rose Bowl in Pasadena California May 22 CenturyLink Field in Seattle Washington...”
“Check out all the Reputation Tour dates below.”
“Fans who register and have been previously verified via Taylor Swift Tix will also receive priority access ahead of any new registrants.”
“...at 10am EST this Friday Jan 5 and continues until 10am EST on Jan 18”


"Lewis, Missouri September 22 Mercedes Benz super dome in New Orleans, Louisiana September 29 NRG stadium in Houston, Texas rookie October 5 t stadium in Dallas, Texas October 6 t stadium in Arlington, Texas..."
"Detroit Michigan new stadium August 31 Minneapolis Bank of America stadium September 1 Minneapolis Bank of America stadium September 8 Kansas City arrow stadium September 15 Indianapolis Lucas Oil Stadium September 18 St. Louis USA center dome."
"Ontario August 7 Heinz stadium Pittsburgh Pennsylvania August 10 Mercedes Benz stadium Atlanta Georgia August 11 Mercedes Benz stadium Atlanta Georgia August 14 Raymond James Stadium Tampa Florida August 18 hard rock stadium Miami Florida August 25 Nissan stadium Nashville Tennessee August 28 Japan, Ford... "
"Rutherford New Jersey rookie July 22 metro life stadium in East Rutherford New Jersey rookie July 26 Gillette stadium in Foxborough, Massachusetts July 27 Gillette stadium in Foxborough, Massachusetts July 28 Gillette stadium in Foxborough, Massachusetts August 3 Rogers center in Toronto Ontario August 4 Rogers center in Toronto ”
"Rookie July 11 federsfield in Washington, D.C. rookie July 13 Lincoln financial field in Philadelphia Pennsylvania July 14 Lincoln financial field in Pennsylvania July 17 first energy stadium in Cleveland, Ohio July 20 metropolitan stadium in East Rutherford New Jersey July 21 metropolitan stadium in East..."
"May 25 Denver, Colorado Sports Bureau June 1 Chicago, Illinois Soldier Field June 2 Chicago, Illinois Soldier Field June 30 Louisville, Kentucky cardinal stadium July 7 Columbus, Ohio stadium July 10 FedEx field, Washington, DC"
"May 8 Phoenix University Stadium rookie in Glendale, Arizona May 11 Levis stadium in Santa Clara, California May 12 Levis stadium in Santa Clara, California May 18 Rose Bowl in Pasadena, California May 19 Rose Bowl in Pasadena, California may 22 Seattle Washington Centennial forest farm..."
"See all the reputation tour dates below."
"Fans registered and previously verified through Taylor Swift tix will also have priority access before any new registrants."
“… Friday, January 5, at 10 a.m. EST, until 10 a.m. on January 18



Number  1172
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gal Gadot Paired a Pink Pantsuit With Nude Sandals at ‘Variety’ BrunchGal Gadot Glows in a Yellow Dress With a Thigh-High Slit and Strappy Sandals at the Palm Springs Film FestivalGal Gadot Is a Vision in Gold Gown and Louboutin Sandals at the ‘Justice League’ Premiere...”
“Want more?”
“Gal Gadot at the L.A. premiere of “Wonder Woman.” CREDIT: Rex ShuttertockFor more of Gal Gadot’s style, check out the gallery.”
“CREDIT: Rex ShutterstockLast May, at the L.A. premiere of “Wonder Woman,” Gal made waves in a red sequined halter gown paired with open-toe sandals.”
“Gal Gadot wearing an Altuzarra spring ’18 Garnier dress.”
“CREDIT: Rex ShutterstockAt the L.A. premiere of “Justice League” this fall, Gadot sparkled in a stunning sequin-embellished Altuzarra spring ’18 “Garnier” dress paired with strappy Louboutin “Gwynitta” sandals.”
“Gal Gadot wears a red dress by Dior that featured shorts under the skirt.”
“CREDIT: Rex ShutterstockAt the GQ Men of the Year Awards last month, the Israeli actress turned heads in a plunging red mididress courtesy of Dior, which showed off sexy strappy Christian Louboutin pumps.”
“Watch on FNGal Gadot at the Palm Spring ‘s International Film Festival.”
“Just this week, the mom of two stepped out in a bright canary yellow gown paired with nude ankle-strap sandals at the Palm Springs International Film Festival Awards Gala, where she took home the Rising Star Award.”


"Gal gadot paired a pair of pink trousers and a pair of nude sandals with a pair of pink trousers at the 'variation' morning lunch. Gal gadot wore a yellow dress, a thigh high slit and a pair of lace up sandals at the palm spring film festival. Gal gadot was shining with a gold robe and louboutin sandals at the 'Justice League' premiere..."
"Want more?"
Gail gado at the premiere of wonder woman in Los Angeles. Photo source: Rex shuttertock to learn more about Gail gado's style, visit the gallery
Credit: last May, at the premiere of wonder woman in Los Angeles, the little girl wore a long red sequined dress with open toe sandals, which caused a stir
"Gail gadote wore the Garnier dress of the spring of '18 in altuzara."
Photo source: at Rex shutterstock's "justice alliance" premiere in Los Angeles this fall, gadot shines in a sequined altuzara 'Garnier' dress in spring 2018, with lace up Louboutin 'gwynitta' sandals
"Gal gadot is wearing Dior's red dress with shorts under it."
Photo source: last month, at the GQ man of the year award ceremony, the Israeli actress wore Dior's red MIDI skirt to show off the sexy Christian Louboutin high heels
"Watch fngal gadot at Palm Springs International Film Festival."
Just this week, the mother of two came out at the Palm Spring International Film Festival Awards party in a bright yellow robe and nude ankle tie sandals, and won the new star award



Number  1173
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I really feel like things happen in your life to teach you things.””
““I don’t want to start crying, but … I’m such a different person.”
“Ever Kim Kardashian West s terrifying Paris heist significantly changed the way she lives her life but it continues to stoke fear...”
“In a sneak peek at this Sunday’s episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians, the 36-year-old mother of two arrives in Punta Mita, Mexico, for sister Kourtney Kardashian‘s birthday trip in April.”
“But within minutes, she starts to worry about their safety at the beachfront estate where they’re staying, which is owned by Girls Gone Wild founder and family friend Joe Francis.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“She calls up Francis and dissolves into tears immediately.”
““I just have anxiety,” she cries over the phone.”
““Are you sure it’s safe here?”“Yeah, it’s safe there — I promise you,” he reassures her.”
““Look, I went through the same thing — I promise you it’s safe.”


"I really think what happens in your life is to teach you something."
"I don't want to cry, but I'm a totally different person. "
"Kim Kardashian West's terrible Paris robbery has greatly changed her way of life, but it continues to arouse people's fear..."
"The 36 year old mother of two arrived in pontamita, Mexico, on April's birthday trip to mother Courtney Kardashian, in order to spy on this Sunday's" follow Kardashian. "
"But a few minutes later, she began to worry about their safety at the seaside manor, where they live, owned by Joe Francis, the founder and family friend of crazy girl."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She called Francis and immediately began to cry."
"I'm just a little anxious," she called on the phone
"Are you sure it's safe here? "Yes, it's safe there - I assure you," he comforted her
"Look, I've been through the same thing - I promise you it's safe."



Number  1174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  1175
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m excited to take her home.””
“I’m just excited to have her,” White told PEOPLE of his daughter ahead of her birth.”
““I just want to meet her.”
“...plans for the first chapter of his baby girl s life...”
“This is 27 and the best is yet to come RELATED VIDEO Shameless Star Jeremy Allen White and Addison Timlin Expecting First Child In September White opened up about his anticipation surrounding first time fatherhood and explained some of his...”
““Today is my birthday but my wish already came true,” continued Timlin.”
““We made a baby and my heart is bursting at the seams,” she captioned a photo of the couple, which captured a smiling White cradling the then-mama-to-be’s baby bump.”
“In celebration of her 27th birthday in June, Timlin announced that she and her Shameless star boyfriend were expecting their first child together.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Parents newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"I'm happy to take her home."
"I'm happy to have her," White told people before her daughter was born
"I just want to see her."
“… Plan for the first chapter of his baby girl's life... "
"It's 27 and the best yet to come video about shameless stars Jeremy Allen White and Edison Timlin looking forward to their first child in September. White opens up his look around being a father for the first time and explains some of his..."
"Today is my birthday, but my wish has come true," Timlin continued
"We had a baby, and my heart was breaking," she wrote in a photo of the couple, which captured a small lump of a smiling white man holding the then mother to be
In June, to celebrate her 27th Birthday, Timlin announced that she and her shameless star boyfriend would be pregnant with their first child
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's parents newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  1176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It officially opens on FridayThose crazy kids: The cast goof offAll star cast: The gang chat to JimmyUnusual punishment: At one point Kimmy made the stars draw their own charactersThe host with the most: Benedict Cumberbatch [L] and Kimmel...”
“Strange himself Benedict Cumberbatch sharing I stand in the middle of the street no crosswalk Not giving up much Elizabeth aka Wanda Maximoff the Scarlet Witch dished I see a train and wear ripped jeans while Don who plays War Machine James Rhodes was no more forthcoming saying Halfway through...”
“But that didn't stop the stars of Avengers: Infinity War hitting ABC's Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...and Conan on TBS just a few hours earlier to reveal what both hosts promised would be a few 'spoilers.'”
“Or not so much as it turned out, although the shows were hilarious.”
“Opening up: From left, Winston Duke, Elizabeth Olsen, Don Cheadle, Benedict Cumberbatch revealed Avengers: Infinity War 'spoilers' on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...hours before its releaseDon Cheadle, Benedict Cumberbatch, Winston Duke and Elizabeth Olsen capped off the cast of the movie's weeklong takeover of Jimmy's show.”
“With the lights dimmed in the studio and a spotlight trained on each actor in turn, Winston Dale, who plays M'Buku, kicked off, revealing: 'I run really fast.'”
“Elizabeth, aka Wanda Maximoff, the Scarlet Witch, dished: 'I see a train and wear ripped jeans.'”
“'At the same time?'”


"On Friday, it's the crazy kids: the actors' pranks, the stars: gang members chatting with Jimmy. The usual punishment is: once, Jimmy asked the stars to draw their own characters. The most popular hosts are: Benedict Cumberbatch and Kimmel..."
"Strange to myself, Benedict Cumberbatch shared that I stood in the middle of the street without a crosswalk and didn't give up too much. Elizabeth, also known as Wanda Maximov, Scarlet Witch disc. I saw a train, wearing jeans, and don who played the war machine, James Rhodes is no longer about to say, midway..."
But that didn't stop the Avengers: Infinite War stars from attacking ABC's Jimmy Kimmel scene! "
"A few hours ago, Conan revealed some" saboteurs "promised by the two hosts in TBS."
"Or not as much as the results, although the program is very funny."
"Prologue: from left, Winston Duke, Elizabeth Olsen, don sheder, Benedict Cumberbatch reveal the Avenger: Jimmy Kimmel live broadcast of the Infinite War" destroyer "!"
“…… A few hours before the film's release, shedler, Benedict Cumberbatch, Winston Duke and Elizabeth Olson ended the week-long performance of the film to take over Jimmy. "
"The lights in the studio dimmed, the spotlight turned on each actor in turn, and Winston Dale, who plays m'buku, revealed at the beginning:" I'm so fast. "
"Elizabeth, also known as Wanda Maximov, the Scarlet Witch, said," I see a train in tattered jeans. "
"At the same time?"



Number  1177
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So things aren’t bad at all.”
“I love u @BellaTwins no 1 knows more than I how dedicated you’ve been to #DWTS your journey is yet another reason why u inspire me everyday — John Cena (@JohnCena) October 31, 2017... and the season premiere of yet another show, Total Divas, coming up on Wednesday, Nov. 1.”
“Probably, it was just that she didn’t get enough votes... so I can assuage my guilt and throw The Bella Army under the bus.”
“Either way, Nikki Bella’s time on Dancing With The Stars came to an abrupt end during their Halloween Night episode on Oct. 30.”
“Her witchcraft-themed jive with professional partner Artem Chigvintsev didn’t wow the judges, who placed them near the bottom of the eight remaining teams with a 24.”
“The duo also competed in a group dance with three other couples, and that didn’t impress the panel either.”
“Their corn maze-themed number earning the same score (24), while the other eight dancers nailed their Phantom of the Opera riff to the tune of a perfect 30.”
“Nikki and Artem were among four pairs under the axe at the end.”
“Not bad odds, especially considering fan voting came after a strong showing last week.”
“But when host Tom Bergeron revealed it would be a double elimination... the longest reigning Divas champion in WWE history was done dancing, along with Vanessa Lachey and her pro.”


"So it's not bad at all."
"I love you @ bellatwins. No one knows your dedication to DWTS better than I do. Your journey is another reason why you inspire me every day - John cena October 31, 2017... The season premiere of the other show "total Queen" will be held on November 1 (Wednesday)
"Maybe, it's just that she didn't get enough votes... So I can ease my guilt and throw Bella's army under the car. "
Anyway, Nicky Bella's time dancing with the stars came to an abrupt end on October 30, Halloween
"Her wizardry themed swing dance with her professional partner Artem chigvintsev did not surprise the judges, who ranked them at the bottom of the remaining eight teams with 24 points."
"They also participated in the group dance competition with three other couples, which did not impress the judges."
"They got the same score (24 points) for numbers on the corn labyrinth theme, while the other eight dancers rated their phantom improvisation as a perfect 30 points."
"Nicky and Artem are four pairs at the end of the axe."
"The odds are good, especially given that the fan vote came after last week's strong performance."
"But when host Tom bergeran revealed that it was going to be a double knockout... The longest serving divas champion in WWE history is dance, as well as Vanessa Lachey and her professional players. "



Number  1178
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: You Missed the Secret Political Message in Michelle Obama's Official PortraitCheck this out:”
“And, as the face of Raf Simons’ first-ever made-to-order line, it seems fitting that her first appearance of the week was at the creative director’s best show to date for the brand.”
“Though the star has been fairly absent from the Fashion Week circuit, she definitely came out of the cannon with a bang for this one.”
“Getty Images Kelly Taub/BFA/REX/ShutterstockMillie Bobby Brown’s velvet look was rife with youthful inspiration, yet tailored and classic at the same time.”
“Expanding on his quilted patterns and overly buttoned-up and structured silhouettes from seasons past, creative director Raf Simons mixed in hints of metallics, easy silks, and sheer ruffles.”
“And each model marched down a runway totally covered in popcorn to drive the point home.”
“The collection itself was Americana-inspired, though futuristic in feel.”
“Owner of the most epic collection of Audrey Hepburn-inspired flats, she chose a pair of bright white pointed toe skimmers for the event.”
“Underneath, she layered a slim white turtleneck and threw a matching white leather jacket over her shoulders.”
“The actress chose a purple-skirted jumper with a large varsity “W” on her torso.”


"Related reports: you missed the secret political message in Michelle Obama's official portrait. Take a look at this:
"And as the spokesperson for Raf Simons' first ever customized series, her debut this week seems to be on the brand's best creative director show to date."
"Although the star has been absent from fashion week, this time she is definitely a big winner."
"Getty Images Kelly Taub / BFA / Rex / Millie Bobby Brown's Velvet design is full of young inspiration, but also cutting and classic."
Raf Simons, creative director, has expanded the quilted patterns, over buttoned and structured silhouettes of the past few seasons with elements of metal texture, simple silk and transparent ruffles
"Every model walks on a runway full of popcorn, take that home."
"The series itself is inspired by Americans, though it feels futuristic."
With Audrey Hepburn's most epic collection of flat shoes, she chose a pair of bright white pointed toe shoes for the event
Next, she wore a long white turtleneck with a matching white leather jacket on her shoulder
The actress chose a pullover with a purple skirt and a large W-shaped school uniform



Number  1179
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“...const FP = tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's what I'd like to know. What I'd like to know before I buy my first book is that it's famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers."
“… Const FP = tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Experts who have learned a lot from the whole process of purchasing my first house have acquired the skill of starting a side push. "



Number  1180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So we are all just praying that it turns around.”The Real Housewives of New Jersey airs Wednesdays at 9 p.m.”
“Like, they truly -- which all little girls love their daddy -- they want him here.”
““There was tension at the wedding,” she reveals.”
“The couple split just months later, a move that Melissa admits did not shock her.”
“Rodrigo Varela / Getty ImagesIt’s an unexpected turn for the group, seeing as Melissa, Teresa and Margaret Josephs all served in Danielle’s May wedding to former baseball player Marty Caffrey.”
“Today, Melissa says it’s really only her sister-in-law, Teresa Giudice, who keeps up with Danielle.”
“That means viewers will only experience all the Danielle drama through the lens of her co-stars, and most of the cast isn’t on great terms with the 56-year-old.”
“Let's put it that way.”Melissa says that as far as she knows, Danielle won’t get confessional interviews this season like the rest of the cast to explain her side of everything.”
“Oh, my God!’ I'm really not mean like this, but somebody must have pushed my buttons!”
“I look like a tough girl.”


"So we're all praying that it will get better." New Jersey's "Real Housewives" airs every Wednesday at 9 p.m
"Like, they really - all the little girls love their dad - they want him here."
"There was tension at the wedding," she revealed
"The couple broke up a few months later, and Melissa admitted that it didn't shock her."
"Rodrigo Valera / Getty Emma, this is an unexpected turning point for this group of people, because Melissa, Theresa and Margaret Joseph all attended Danielle's wedding to former baseball player Marty Caffrey in May."
"Today, Melissa says that only her sister-in-law, Theresa Judith, can keep up with Danielle."
"It means that the audience can only experience all of Danielle's scenes through her partner's lens, and most of the actors don't have a good relationship with 56 year old Danielle."
"So to speak." Melissa said that as far as she knows, Danielle won't give confessional interviews this season to explain her position like other actors
"Oh, my God! I really don't want to, but someone must have pressed my button! "
"I look like a strong girl."



Number  1181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:'Red Sparrow' Review: Jennifer Lawrence Plays a Brutal and Beguiling Round of Spy GamesJennifer Lawrence Says She 'Wasn't in a Huge Hurry to Debunk' Brad Pitt Dating RumorsJennifer Lawrence Reveals the One Role She Was 'Devastated' Not to Get...”
““But, I also wasn’t, like, in a huge hurry to debunk it!”See more in the video below.”
“"I’ve met him once in like 2013, so it was very random,” Lawrence said with a laugh.”
“On Thursday's Watch What Happens Live With Andy Cohen, she opened up about the rumors that she dated Brad Pitt, confessing that she didn't exactly mind seeing herself and the 54-year-old actor together in the tabloids.”
“Watch below:Lawrence has no problem keeping it real.”
“The actress even volunteered information about herself, like the "psychotic" thoughts she has every time she's about to take the subway, why we should all believe in aliens, and her self-tanning habits.”
“She has no shame about her love for reality TV, she's open to dating a non-celebrity and she definitely regrets some of her red carpet looks.”
“The polygraph itself was enough to get her heart racing, but she was pretty honest.”
“First, she's not exactly calm under pressure.”
“So what did we learn about J.Law?”


"Related content: Red sparrow review: Jennifer Lawrence plays a cruel and seductive spy game. Jennifer Lawrence said she was" not in a hurry to expose "Brad Pitt's dating rumors Lawrence revealed a character that she had "been destroyed." she didn't get it... "
"But I'm not in a hurry to expose it! "Please see more in the video below."
Lawrence said with a smile, "I met him once as I did in 2013, so it was casual."
"On what happens live with Andy Cohen on Thursday, she made public the rumors that she was dating Brad Pitt and admitted that she didn't mind seeing her in the tabloids with the 54 year old actor."
"Look at the picture below: Lawrence has no problem being real."
"The actress even offered information about herself, such as her" mental illness "idea every time she wanted to take the subway, why we should all believe in aliens, and her habit of self tanning."
"She's not ashamed of her love of reality shows, she's open to dating non celebrities, and she certainly regrets some of the looks on her red carpet."
"The polygraph itself is enough to make her heart beat faster, but she's quite honest."
"First of all, she's not completely calm under pressure."
"So, what do we know about J. law?"



Number  1182
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 12, the fifth sequel series, is due to be released in June.”
“In 2007, a continuation comic book was released and remains ongoing.”
“Technically the story didn't conclude with the end of the series.”
“Why wait for a Buffy reboot or a revival with the original cast, though?”
“Of course, given that Whedon recently left his role as writer and director of a potential Batgirl movie, perhaps a return to the small screen is in his future.”
“How big a role Whedon would play in any sort of revival or reboot is anyone's guess, but it's reassuring to know that the studio wouldn't move forward with it unless he signed on.”
“"And until Joss decides it's time, it won't happen."”
“When Joss decides it's time, we'll do it," Newman explains.”
“"It's something we talk about frequently, and Joss Whedon is really one of the greatest creators we ever worked with.”
“Still, just because the studio wants to do it doesn't mean it'll go ahead and give the green light without the approval of creator Joss Whedon.”


"Season 12, the fifth sequel, will be released in June."
"In 2007, a comic book series was released, and it's still going on."
"Technically, the story doesn't end with the end of the series."
"But why wait for a buffy to restart or resurrect with the original actor?"
"Of course, given that Whedon recently left his role as a screenwriter and director in a potential Batman movie, maybe he will return to the small screen in the future."
"It's anyone's guess how much role Whedon will play in any form of Renaissance or restart, but the good news is that if he doesn't sign up, the studio won't move on."
"It won't happen until joss decides it's time."
"When Jose decides it's time, we'll do it," Newman explained
"It's something we talk about a lot, and Jos Wheaton is one of the greatest creators we've ever worked with."
"Even so, just because the studio wants to do it doesn't mean it's going to go on and give the green light without the approval of Creator Jos Wheaton."



Number  1183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“So I’ve moved on.”Regarding the season premiere drama with James, Scheana Shay simply added, “Nothing with James surprises me.”Vanderpump Rules airs on Bravo Mondays at 9 p.m.”
““That’s pretty much what he does.”
“That’s his MO.”
“He needs to bring up things that happened years ago because there s nothing for him to talk about Jax Taylor told Us Weekly exclusively when asked about James rapping about the former SUR bartender s indiscretion with Faith Stowers in front of Jax s fiancée Brittany Cartwright during the...”
“Monday December 3 episode of Vanderpump Rules...”
““He doesn’t really have much going on in his life.”
“There’s nothing there.”
“There’s no substance to him.”
“It gets to the point where it’s like, ‘What else do you got man?’ You’ve got nothing else anymore.”


"Wait a minute."
"So I went on." On the season premiere with James, Shanna Shay simply added, "nothing with James will surprise me." The van der Pol rules are on air in Bravo at 9 p.m. Monday
"That's what he did."
"That's his task list."
"He needs to mention what happened a few years ago, because he has nothing to talk about. When asked about James' rap, Jakes Taylor told our weekly exclusively that the former sur bartender was in front of Jakes' fiancee Brittany Cartwright with the faith hoarder
"Monday, December 3, the episode of van der Pol's rules..."
"He's really nothing in his life."
"There's nothing there."
"There is nothing substantial for him."
"At this point, 'what else do you have, man? "You have nothing else."



Number  1184
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Scroll down to see the pics!”
“A post shared by Paris-Michael K. Jackalope (@parisjackson) on Mar 19, 2018 at 10:19pm PDTThe pair, who reportedly met at the MTV Movie Awards last year, were also seen holding hands while out in London in February.”
“Earlier this week, Jackson, who hasn’t spoken about her sexuality, posted a photo on Instagram of Delevingne standing on top of a bed, captioning it “a r t.”a r t .”
“The pair didn’t hold back on the PDA outside the steakhouse as they even slow-danced together, sharing another kiss as they wrapped their arms around each other.”
“The daughter of the late Michael Jackson, 19, and the British model, 25, were affectionate towards each other, with the Suicide Squad actress sitting on the teen’s lap at one point outside Carlitos Gardel restaurant in West Hollywood on Thursday, March 22.”
“Paris Jackson and Cara Delevingne were spotted kissing while on a double date with Jackson’s godfather, Macaulay Culkin, and his girlfriend, Brenda Song.”


"Scroll down to see the picture!"
"Paris Michael K. jacarop (@ parisjackson) shared a post at 10:19 pm on March 19, 2018. According to reports, the couple met at the MTV Film Awards last year and were seen holding hands in London in February
Earlier this week, Jackson posted a photo on instagram showing delaviny standing on the bed with the title "a r T." a r t
"They didn't flinch on the PDA outside the Steakhouse, even danced slowly together, and shared a kiss when they hugged each other."
The daughter of the late 19-year-old Michael Jackson and the 25-year-old British model treat each other affectionately, while the suicide team actress sits on the lap of the teenager outside the Carlitos Gardel restaurant in West Hollywood on Thursday, March 22
Paris Jackson and Carla delaviny were found kissing on a double date with Jackson's godfather, Macaulay Calkin, and girlfriend, Brenda song



Number  1185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’ve gained a lot of progress over the last year, but there still is some more work to be done.””
“According to E!, documents stated that Johnson contacted Schulenberg to ease Prince with hip pain, for which he prescribed clonidine, hydroxyzine pamoate and diazepam, medications typically used for anxiety and high blood pressure.”
“According to reports by E!, the documents filed last year provide clearer view into the days leading up to the star’s accidental opioid overdose, including medications he acquired without prescriptions.”
“According to the affidavits, substances were found within the compound, particularly in places that Prince regularly visited, like his bedroom and laundry room.”
“Many pills were found stored in bottles for other medications, often in vitamin bottles.”
“Per NBC News, some were in a suitcase labelled with a Prince alias, Peter Bravestrong, along with a handwritten lyrics to the 1987 hit “U Got The Look.”According to E!, several medications were prescribed to Prince’s longtime friend and aide, Kirk Johnson.”
“Dr Michael Todd Schulenberg who saw Prince twice before his death arrived on the premises on April 21 to drop off test results and when later questioned by authorities NBC News reports he confessed that he prescribed oxycodone on April 16 2016 the same day that the pop star s...”
“...plane made a post concert emergency landing when he passed out while aboard after taking pain killer medication...”
“Warrant says that Schulenberg told investigators he put it under Johnson s name for Prince s privacy The doctor s attorney however said in a statement that he never directly prescribed opioids to Prince nor did he ever prescribe opioids to any other person with the intent that they would...”
“...be given to Prince According to NBC News investigators discovered a suitcase next to Prince s bed and found at least two bottles with pills prescribed by Schulenberg under Johnson s name on April 7 the anti nausea drug ondansetron hydrochloride in a Vitamin D bottle and the painkiller Percocet...”


"We have made great progress in the past year, but there is still some work to be done."
"According to e! Johnson contacted Schulenberg to relieve Prince's hip pain by prescribing clonidine, zinc hydroxide and diazepam, which are commonly used to treat anxiety and high blood pressure, the document said
"According to e! The paper submitted last year shows more clearly the days before the star accidentally overdosed opioids, including the drugs he took without prescription. "
"According to the testimony, material was found in the yard, especially in places the prince frequented, such as his bedroom and laundry."
Many pills have been found in bottles of other drugs, usually vitamins
According to NBC news, some people were put in a box with the prince's pseudonym Peter braffstrom and handwritten lyrics from the 1987 hit show you got that look! He prescribed several drugs to Kirk Johnson, an old friend and assistant of Prince
"Dr. Michael Todd Schulenberg, who met Prince twice before his death, arrived at the scene on April 21 and presented the test results. Later, when the authorities asked NBC news reports, he admitted that he had prescribed oxycodone on April 16, 2016, and the pop star died on the same day
“…… The plane made an emergency landing after the concert when he fainted after taking painkillers on the plane... "
"The search warrant said Schulenberg told investigators that he put it under Johnson's name for the prince's privacy, but the doctor's lawyer said in a statement that he had never prescribed opioids directly to the prince or to anyone else, with the intention that they..."
“…… According to NBC news, investigators found a suitcase beside Prince's bed, and on April 7 found at least two bottles of sullenberg's pills in the name of Johnson, a bottle of ondansetron hydrochloride, an anti nausea drug in vitamin D, and the painkiller percocet.... "



Number  1186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was not okay,” said Nicole, while Deena added that Ronnie’s face was “all f—ed up.”“Honestly, I don’t want him to come,” Jenni admitted.”
““He texted me yesterday [saying] he’s at urgent care.”“Literally, flesh was coming out of his arm.”
““Here we go again,” he said.”
“And when Ronnie revealed to Pauly that he and Jen had gotten back together, Pauly was shocked.”
“A reconciliation between the volatile couple — but somehow, that’s exactly what happened.”
“We can just hope for the best.”Image zoom Credit: Jen Harley/InstagramOne thing they certainly weren’t hoping for?”
“He has a lawyer now, so he has a good support system around him.”
““It’s not something that happens overnight, where someone just becomes magically better, but we did our best setting him up with the tools that he needed to succeed.”
““I’m a little concerned about leaving Ron,” admitted Vinny Guadagnino.”
“(Ronnie and Pauly “DJ Pauly D” DelVecchio live in Vegas, but the rest of the cast lives on the East Coast.)”


"It's not good," Nicole said, while Dina added that Ronnie's face was "totally crazy." "To be honest, I don't want him to come," Jennie admitted
"He texted me yesterday that he was in an emergency." "Literally, all the meat came out of his arm."
"Again," he said
"When Ronnie revealed to Paulie that he and treasure were going well, Paulie was surprised."
"The reconciliation between this fickle couple - but somehow, that's the truth."
"We can only hope for the best." Image scaling credit: Jan Harley / instagram one, what they certainly don't want? "
"He has a lawyer now, so he has a good support system around him."
"It's not something that happens overnight. A person just magically gets better, but we do our best to provide him with the tools he needs to succeed."
"I'm a little worried about leaving Ron," admitted Vinny guadanino
(Ronnie and Paulie DJ Paulie d'erviccio live in Vegas, but the other actors live on the east coast.)



Number  1187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Watch below:Jessica Simpson Flashes Her Butt to Celebrate Husband Eric Johnson's 38th Birthday This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Jessica Simpson Can't Stop Rocking Cleavage-Baring Outfits in New York City -- See the Pics!”
“"38 IS GREAT #IAMSOHOTFORYOU," Simpson wrote.”
“On Sunday, Simpson paid tribute to Johnson on his birthday with a racy Instagram pic of her bending down and flashing her panties in front of him, as he spread his arms wide.”
“Splash NewsClearly, the couple's marriage is better than ever since tying the knot in July 2014.”
“BackgridJessica Simpson Shares Adorable Pic of Daughter Maxwell on 'Picture Day'Simpson, 37, looked stylish in an all-black outfit and a large black tote, while Johnson kept it simple in a blue T-shirt and black jeans.”
“However, Johnson was there to help her back on her feet!”
“The singer went out to dinner with husband Eric Johnson at celeb hot spot Craig's restaurant in Los Angeles on Tuesday night to celebrate his 38th birthday, where she almost took a spill walking back to their car after dinner.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Look at the picture below: Jessica Simpson flashes her ass to celebrate her husband Eric Johnson's 38th birthday. This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor information."
Jessica Simpson is rocking her topcoat in New York City - look at the pictures
"38 is great for you," Simpson wrote
"On Sunday, Simpson paid homage to Johnson on his birthday. On instagram, he opened his arms and took a vivid picture of her bending down and flashing her underwear in front of him."
"It's clear that the couple's marriage has been better than ever since they got married in July 2014."
Background picture Jessica Simpson shares a lovely picture of her daughter Maxwell on picture day. Simpson, 37, looks fashionable in an all black suit and a large black handbag, while Johnson, wearing a blue T-shirt and black jeans, keeps it simple
"Johnson was there, however, to help her stand up!"
"On Tuesday night, the singer had dinner with her husband Eric Johnson at Craig's restaurant in Los Angeles to celebrate his 38th birthday. After dinner, she almost walked back to her car and fell."



Number  1188
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“Press Secretary Jason Knauf announced that Markle will not have a Maid of Honor because she has a very close knit circle of friends and she didn t want to choose one over another Many royal wedding enthusiasts had their sights set on Markle s future sister in law Catherine...”
“Duchess of Cambridge as the Maid of Honor...”
“Others speculated that if the maid of honor title didn’t fall on Kate Middleton, it would have gone to Markle’s friend Jessica Mulroney.”
“According to Vanity Fair, Mulroney is Meghan Markle’s “secret wedding planner” and one of her best friends.”
“Although Markle will not have a Maid of Honor, Prince William and Kate Middleton’s children Prince George and Princess Charlotte are expected to have official roles during the ceremony.”
“George and Charlotte were a page boy and bridesmaid at Aunt Pippa Middleton’s wedding in 2017.”
“Newborn royal baby Prince Louis Arthur Charles is probably too young to be a page boy.”
“On April 26, Kensington Palace announced that Prince William will serve as Prince Harry’s Best Man, just like the Harry did for his brother’s wedding in 2011.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
Please enter a valid email address
"News secretary Jason knuf announced that markel would not have a bridesmaid because she has a very close circle of friends. She does not want to choose one rather than another. Many royal wedding enthusiasts have turned their eyes on markel's future sister-in-law Catherine..."
"Duchess of Cambridge as Bridesmaid..."
"Others speculated that if the title of Bridesmaid didn't fall on Kate Middleton, it would fall on Marcel's friend Jessica muroni."
Muroni is Megan markel's "secret wedding planner" and one of her best friends, Vanity Fair reported
"Although Marcel will not have a bridesmaid, Prince George and Princess Charlotte, the children of Prince William and Kate Middleton, are expected to play official roles during the wedding."
"George and Charlotte were a paging boy and bridesmaid at Aunt Pippa Middleton's wedding in 2017."
"The new royal baby, Prince Louis Arthur Charles, may be too young to be a pager."
"On April 26, Kensington Palace announced that Prince William would be Prince Harry's best man, just as Prince Harry did at his brother's wedding in 2011."



Number  1189
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click through and let the nostalgia hit you hard.”
“Selena has more than proved that she always has something completely different in store for her followers, which may be the very reason why they’re so devoted to her.”
“Yes, the one and only purple dinosaur.)”
“(We’ll even take you all the way to her humble beginnings on Barney and Friends.”
“As you wait for her to wow you with her next hit, get lost in our roundup of all her tracks.”
“The star certainly has her way of keeping people guessing.”
“Now as she teased new music from the studio over the weekend on Instagram, we can’t help but wonder what she’ll surprise us with next.”
“Most recently she dabbled with the likes of EDM as she released her newest single “It Ain’t Me” with DJ Kygo, who also worked with her collaborator Charlie Puth.”
“...there s no type of music Selena isn t afraid to explore...”
“From releasing the ultimate pop jam One and the Same to accompany one of her first Disney Channel Original Movies in 2009 with Demi Lovato to doing the ultimate Revival for her 2015 album and working with A AP Rocky...”


"Click browse, let nostalgia give you a heavy blow."
"Selena has proved that she always has something totally different waiting for her followers, which may be why they are so committed to her."
"Yes, the only purple dinosaur."
"We'll even take you all the way to the beginning of her humble treatment of Barney and her friends."
"As you wait for her to amaze you with her next song, get lost in our review of all her tracks."
"Stars have ways of guessing, of course."
"Now, when she teases about the studio's new music on instagram over the weekend, we can't help wondering what surprise she will bring us next."
Recently, she released her latest single "not me" with DJ kygo, who also worked with her collaborator Charlie booth
“… There's no music type. Serena's not afraid to explore... "
"From the 2009 release of ultimate pop jam one and the same with Demi Lovato, to the ultimate renaissance of the album in 2015, to the associated press rocky..."



Number  1190
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read all of our Kardashians coverage here.”
“Paparazzi photos of Kim at the beach quickly surfaced online, prompting some people to criticize the reality TV star's cellulite.”
“"I'm already having this anxiety attack over security, and I'm already just, like, on high alert and now paparazzi's found us, it's like just the scrutiny that we get all the time, we try to avoid that," she said.”
“Speaking directly to the camera, the 36-year-old "KUWTK" star elaborated on her reaction.”
“Like, I literally don't look like this!"”
“"Like, I don't get it!”
“"Oh my god," Kim said, as she looked at the photos while lounging by the pool with her friends.”
“A teaser for this week's upcoming episode of "Keeping Up With the Kardashians" shows Kim reacting to the photos after her former assistant and Kardashian West Brands COO Stephanie Shepherd came across them on her phone.”
“In April, Kim Kardashian West went on vacation in Mexico to celebrate her sister Kourtney's birthday.”
“Want more?”


"Please read all of our coverage of Kardashian."
"The paparazzi photos of Kim on the beach soon surfaced on the Internet, causing some people to criticize the reality TV star's fat mass."
"I've started to worry about safety, I'm on high alert, and now the paparazzi have found us, just like we've been supervised, and we're trying to avoid that," she said
"The 36 year old 'kutek' star elaborated on his reaction in front of the camera."
"Like, I really don't look like this!"
"Like, I don't understand!"
"Oh, my God," Kim said, looking at the photos and hanging out with her friends by the pool
"A tease in this week's follow Kardashian shows Kim reacting to the photos after her former assistant, Stephanie shepherd, chief operating officer of Kardashian's western brand, saw them on her mobile phone."
"In April this year, Kim Kardashian West went to Mexico on holiday to celebrate his sister kurtany's birthday."
"Want more?"



Number  1191
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Weigh in below.”
““There’s a lot of travel involved, and I think that’s the joy of the show — it’s never the same thing, it’s constantly moving, so next season should be quite an adventure.”What are you most looking forward to seeing in “Outlander” season 3?”
“If you want to go into season 3 with no knowledge of what might come, turn back now.”
“Season 2 of “Outlander” began with a disoriented Claire Fraser (Caitriona Balfe) returning through the standing stones at Craigh na Dun, alone and pregnant, to reluctantly reunite with her first husband, Frank (Tobias Menzies) in 1948.”
“In the premiere, we saw Claire and Frank negotiating how they might raise a child together, with their relationship irrevocably strained by the events of Claire’s absence and the man she fell in love with during that time away.”
“Sunday s finale titled Dragonfly in Amber showed us the harrowing moments leading up to that reunion as Claire s second husband Jamie Sam Heughan convinced her to return to her own time in order to protect her and their unborn child since he believed that he was destined to...”
“...die with his men at the Battle of Culloden...”
“That seemed like the end of Claire and Jamie s story although fans of Diana Gabaldon s novels already knew that there s plenty more of this tale to be told with eight books currently published and more to come not to mention the fact that the show was already...”
“...renewed for season 3 and season 4 until Claire discovered that Jamie survived both Culloden and the execution of Jacobite soldiers that followed the battle meaning that there was a chance they could still reunite if she went back through the stones albeit after 20 years apart...”
“Given the number of books in Gabaldon’s series (and the fact that viewers would probably riot if Sam Heughan suddenly disappeared from the show), it’s not much of a spoiler to say that Claire and Jamie will someday find each other again.”


"Weigh below."
"What are you most looking forward to seeing in the third season of stranger?"
"If you want to get into the third season without knowing what's going to happen, go back now."
The second season of outsider begins when a disoriented Claire Fraser (Katrina barf) walks through Craig Nathan's stilt with her first husband Frank (Tobias Menzies) in 1948
"At the premiere, we saw Claire and frank negotiate how to raise their children together, and their relationship became irreparably tense due to Claire's absence and the man she fell in love with during that time."
"The last episode of Sunday's Amber Dragonfly shows us that Claire's second husband, Jamie Sam heughan, persuades her to return to her own time to protect her and their unborn child, because he believes that he is destined to..."
“… He died with his men in the battle of kuloden. "
"This seems to be the end of the story of Claire and Jamie, although fans of Diana galwalden's novel already know that there are still more stories to tell in the eight books published so far, not to mention that the play has been completed
“… The contract was renewed in the third and fourth seasons until Clare found out that Jamie survived the battle of kuloden and the execution of Jacobian soldiers, which means that if she crosses the stone again after 20 years of separation, they still have a chance to reunite.... "
"Given the number of gaberton's series (and the fact that if Sam Hohan suddenly disappears from the play, the audience could riot), it's not much of a saboteur to say that Claire and Jamie will find each other again one day."



Number  1192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...who joined the reception later in the evening...”
“The newlyweds' faces were projected onto the windows of Bucklebury Manor along with psychedelic lights and, at one point, what appeared to be the silhouette of a shapely dancing woman against a green background.”
“And just over 24 hours on, it appears Pippa Middleton and her new husband have had precious little time for sleep, as they were pictured looking somewhat bleary-eyed at Los Angeles International Airport.”
“The newlyweds were spotted chatting with fellow travellers while in transit from Britain to the Pacific Islands, where they will be spending their honeymoon on a private hideaway once owned by Marlon Brando.”
“Scroll down for video It appears Pippa Middleton and her new husband have had precious little time for sleep since her wedding day as they were pictured at LAX Airport in the US looking slightly bleary eyed The newlyweds were spotted chatting with fellow travellers while in transit from Britain...”
“...to the Pacific Islands where they will be spending their honeymoon Pippa is pictured left and her new billionaire hedge fund manager husband James Matthews right at LAX Airport in the US The new Mr and Mrs James Matthews were seen mingling with fellow passengers while travelling through LAX Airport...”
“The weary couple celebrated their nuptials on Saturday which was followed by an evening bash where guests partied till 4am Waving for the cameras Pippa Middleton and James Matthews smile after their wedding at St Mark s Church in Berkshire It is thought that Pippa and James Matthews will arrive...”
“...today at Tetiaroa a two and a half square mile necklace of coral islets encircling a crystal clear lagoon...”
“It is unclear which flight the newlyweds took to get to LAX, but they subsequently boarded an Air New Zealand flight at Los Angeles, bound for Tahiti.”
“It was while filming Mutiny On The Bounty in 1962 that Brando was bewitched by the atoll, 30 miles north of Tahiti.”


“… People at the reception later in the evening... "
"The faces of the newlyweds, together with psychedelic lights, were projected on the windows of buckbury manor, and once, against a green background, the silhouette of a well proportioned dancer appeared."
"24 hours later, Pippa Middleton and her new husband don't seem to have much precious time to sleep, because their eyes are a little hazy at Los Angeles International Airport."
The newlyweds were found chatting with other travelers on their way from the UK to the Pacific Islands, where they would spend their honeymoon in a private hideout once owned by Marlon Brando
"Scrolling down to see the video, it seems that Pippa Middleton and her new husband have little precious time to sleep since their wedding day, because they were photographed at Los Angeles Airport in the United States, looking a little sleepy. The newlyweds were found chatting with their peers while they were crossing the border from the UK.... "
“… To the Pacific Islands, where they will spend their honeymoon, Pippa photo left and her new billionaire hedge fund manager husband James Matthews right at Los Angeles Airport, new Mr. and Mrs. James Matthews are seen as mixing with other passengers while traveling through Los Angeles Airport... "
"The frazzled couple celebrated their wedding on Saturday, followed by a party where the guests reveled until 4 a.m. and waved to the camera. Pippa Middleton and James Matthews got married at St. Mark's Church in Berkshire, where they were supposed to arrive..."
“…… Today in teyaroa, a 2.5 square mile coral island Necklace surrounds a clear lagoon... "
"It's not clear which flight the newlyweds took to Los Angeles, but they later boarded the Air New Zealand flight to Tahiti in Los Angeles."
"When filming the mutiny on the bounty in 1962, Brando was fascinated by the atoll 30 miles north of Tahiti."



Number  1193
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“The star has posted several pictures throughout her pregnancy highlighting her growing stomach and undeniable glow.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Khloé Kardashian is days away from becoming a mother for the first time.”
“The reality star and designer shared some thoughts about her pregnancy and impending deep dive into motherhood in a post on her app this week.”
“"I can't believe my little girl will be here soon!”
“These past nine months have flown by, and I've loved every minute of it," she wrote.”
“"After my first trimester everything has been a breeze," she added, referencing the early struggles in her pregnancy that she documented on Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"The star posted several pictures during her pregnancy, highlighting her growing stomach and undeniable radiance."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Kardashian is a few days away from becoming a mother for the first time."
"The reality TV star and designer published an article on her app this week to share some thoughts about her pregnancy and about to go deep into her maternal life."
"I can't believe my little daughter is coming soon!"
"The past nine months have flown by and I love every minute of them," she wrote
"After the first three months of my pregnancy, everything was easy," she added, noting her struggles at the beginning of her pregnancy and documenting how to keep up with the Kardashian family
"This content was imported from YouTube."



Number  1194
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Giulia Caruso & Ki Jin KimBen LeClairSummer Shelton...”
“Amman Abbasi, Director of “Dayveon”Justin Chon, Director of “Gook” (WINNER)Kevin Phillips, Director of “Super Dark Times”PIAGET PRODUCERS AWARD – The 21st annual Producers Award, funded by Piaget, honors emerging producers who, despite highly limited resources, demonstrate the creativity, tenacity and vision required to produce quality, independent films.”
““Call Me by Your Name” was up for six nominations, and won for best cinematography and best male lead for Timothee Chalamet.”
“Get Out won two awards including best feature and best director and Frances McDormand took home the best female lead award for Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Ingrid Goes West won for best first feature and Emily V Gordon and Kumail Nanjiani won best first screenplay for The Big Sick...”
“Greta Gerwig took home the award for best screenplay for Lady Bird BEST FEATURE Call Me by Your Name The Florida Project Get Out WINNER Lady Bird The Rider BEST FIRST FEATURE Award given to the director and producer Columbus Ingrid Goes West WINNER Menashe Oh Lucy Patti Cake JOHN”
“CASSAVETES AWARD Given to the best feature made for under 500 000”
“(Award given to the writer, director and producer.”
“Executive Producers are not awarded.)”
“Dayveon A Ghost Story Life and Nothing More WINNER Most Beautiful Island The Transfiguration BEST DIRECTOR Sean Baker The Florida Project Jonas Carpignano A Ciambra Luca Guadagnino Call Me by Your Name Jordan Peele Get Out WINNER Benny Safdie Josh Safdie Good Time Chloé Zhao The Rider BEST SCREENPLAY Greta...”
“Gerwig Lady Bird WINNER Azazel Jacobs The Lovers Martin McDonagh Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Jordan Peele Get Out Mike White Beatriz at Dinner BEST FIRST SCREENPLAY Kris Avedisian Story By Kyle Espeleta Jesse Wakeman Donald Cried Emily V Gordon Kumail Nanjiani The Big Sick WINNER Ingrid Jungermann Women Who...”


"Julia Caruso and Ki Kim Kim Ben lekler, Samuel Sheldon..."
"Amman Abbasi, director of dayveon, Justin Chon, director of gook, director of super dark age, Piaget producer of the Year Award - the 21st Annual Producer Award, funded by Piaget, is a recognition of emerging filmmakers who, despite their limited resources, demonstrate creativity, tenacity and foresight necessary to produce high-quality, independent films."
"Call me your name" won six nominations, as well as best cinematography and best actor for Timothy chalamit
"Going out" won two awards, including best feature film and best director. Francis mcdorman won the best actress award for three billboards outside of "the ebb of Missouri". Ingrid Goz west won the best first feature film award. Emily Gordon and kumael nanjani won the best first feature film of "seriously ill" Screenplay Award
"Greta Gerwig won the best screenplay Award for the best feature film" call me your name "in" Lady Bird. "The Florida project winner" Lady Bird "rider's best first feature film award is awarded to director and producer Columbus Ingrid and winner of the West tour menash Lucy Patty Keck John."
"Best feature for less than 500000 users"
(Awards for writers, directors and producers.)
"Not to the executive producer.)"
"A ghost story of life and no more winners the most beautiful island metamorphosis best director Sean Beck Florida project Jonas capinia Xi'an braluka guadanino call me your name Jordan peel out winner Benny Saffi Josh Saffi good time Chloe Zhao rider best play Greta..."
"The Gerwig Lady Bird winner Azazel Jacobs the lovers Martin McDonagh Missouri Jordan Peele get out Mike White Beatriz at diner best's first screenplay Kyle espeleta Jesse Wakeman Donald's Kris avedisian story cried. Emily V Gordon kumail nanjiani is very ill. Ingrid jungermann woman who..."



Number  1195
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I never wanted to have children of my own.”
“When Lamas’ eldest daughter suffered a near-fatal miscarriage in 2014 that resulted in a full hysterectomy, Craig volunteered to become her surrogate.”
“Still, Craig insisted Lamas’ past didn’t make her think twice about the marriage.”
“...a new role as a commercial pilot...”
“In 2015 Lamas told Fox News he didn t have his former wives sign prenuptial agreements because It s like you re almost professing failure at the outset In addition he grew tired of waiting for a phone call to get me on another B movie prompting him to pursue...”
“Lamas, who was previously married four times and has six children, was faced with financial issues.”
“It was great.”But marrying the actor wasn’t all glitz and glamour.”
““I mean, it had only been three months… [but] we were engaged for a little over a year and then got married in Mexico.”
“And I said, ‘Oh, no, no, no,'” said Craig.”
““He showed me the ring.”


"I never wanted to have my own children."
"In 2014, Lama's eldest daughter suffered a near fatal miscarriage, resulting in total hysterectomy, and Craig volunteered to be her surrogate mother."
However, Craig insisted that Lama's past did not make her think twice about the marriage
“… A new role as a commercial pilot... "
"In 2015, Lama told Fox News that he didn't ask his ex-wife to sign a prenuptial agreement because it's like you almost admitted defeat in the first place. In addition, he was tired of waiting for a phone call to let me see another B-class movie, prompting him to pursue... "
"The Lama has been married four times before and has six children. He is facing financial problems."
"Great." But it's not always flashy and glamorous to marry that actor
"I mean, only three months (but) we're engaged for a little more than a year, and then we get married in Mexico. "
"I said, 'Oh, no, no, no,'" Craig said
"He showed me the ring."



Number  1196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I was told that [Carter] had the most powerful litigator in the country and that I didn’t have the money to pay for an attorney to essentially defend me, if he were to come after me,” she said.”
““I’d actually confided in my manager at that time about pressing charges.”
“The Santa Monica Police Department confirms to PEOPLE that a complaint against Carter about an early 2003 incident was filed on Wednesday.”
“An investigation is being conducted.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Though authorities could not disclose the name of the individual who submitted the report, Schuman shared a tweet that same day that read: “I’m finally doing what I thought I could no longer do.”
“I’m filing a police report #timesup #bebrave #bethechange #metoo thank you @RAINN [the Rape, Abuse & Incest National Network] for empowering me to take this step.”A rep for Carter did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“In November, Schuman, now 33, detailed the alleged incident on her personal blog, claiming that Carter had raped her in the early 2000s when she was 18 and he was 22.”
“Image zoom Aaron Carter; Melissa Schuman | Credit: Alberto E. Rodriguez/Getty; Matthew Simmons/GettyCarter, now 38, responded to the allegations in November with an exclusive statement to PEOPLE.”
““I am shocked and saddened by Ms. Schuman’s accusations.”


"I've been told that [Carter] has the most powerful litigation lawyer in the country, and if he comes to me, I don't have the money to have a lawyer to defend me," she said
"In fact, I had already told the manager about the prosecution."
"Santa Monica police confirmed that the complaint about Carter's early 2003 incident was made on Wednesday."
"An investigation is under way."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Although the authorities were unable to disclose the name of the individual who submitted the report, Schumann shared a microblog on the same day, which said:" I am finally doing what I think I can no longer do. "
"I am submitting a police report ţ timesup ţ be brave ţ be the change ţ metoo thank @ rain (national network of rape, abuse and incest) for authorizing me to take this step." A representative of Carter did not immediately respond to requests for comment
Schumann, 33, described the incident in detail on her blog last November, claiming that Carter raped her at the beginning of the 21st century, when she was 18 and he was 22
"Image zooming Alan Carter; Melissa Schumann | credit: Alberto e Rodriguez / Getty; Matthew Simmons / Getty Carter, now 38, responded to the November charges and exclusive statement to the people."
"I am shocked and saddened by Ms. Schumann's accusations."



Number  1197
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He captioned the adorable snap “Rare sighting in London.” Whether he was referring to the sighting of unicorns or the couple’s sighting, the two simply couldn’t look cuter!”
“...shared the first photo of himself and Smith together both sporting sport blue and pink unicorn travel pillows...”
“It s weird bringing out an album and not being single cause when I brought In the Lonely Hour I was so lonely Smith admitted but now I m singing songs about another guy and I m quite happy so it s quite weird Flynn took to Instagram Thursday and...”
“Then came Smith’s appearance on The Ellen DeGeneres show where he confirmed to the daytime host that he is no longer single.”
“A snap of the two sharing a kiss and walking arm to arm in New York City definitely fueled the relationship speculations.”
“With no official confirmation of the relationship as of yet, the singer and 13 Reasons Why star have been linked romantically since the fall.”
“Sam Smith and boyfriend Brandon Flynn made a sort of announcement that they are going steady uploading a silly snap of themselves to the social media platform.”
“It ain’t official until it’s on Instagram apparently.”


He added the title "rare sightings in London" to this lovely snapshot. Whether he's referring to the unicorn sightings or the couple's sightings, these two people look so cute! "
“… Shared his first photo with Smith, including sports blue and Pink Unicorn Travel Pillow... "
"It's strange to come up with an album instead of being single, because when I brought lonely moments, I was so lonely, Smith admitted, but now I'm singing about another man, and I'm happy, so it's strange that Flynn was on instagram on Thursday, and..."
"Then Smith appeared on Alan DeGeneres to confirm to the daytime hosts that he was no longer single."
"The moment when they were kissing and walking hand in hand in New York undoubtedly encouraged people's speculation about this relationship."
"So far, there has been no official confirmation of the relationship. The singer and 13 stars have been romantically linked since the fall."
"Sam Smith and boyfriend Brandon Flynn have announced that they will steadily upload a stupid picture of themselves to the social media platform."
"Obviously, before instagram appeared, it wasn't official."



Number  1198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Locklear is best known for appearing on "Dynasty" and "T.J. Hooker" in the 1980s and "Melrose Place" in the 1990s.”
“However, those charges were later dismissed and she was sentenced to three years of informal probation and ordered to pay a $700 fine.”
“The Ventura County Sheriff's Office said they responded to a 911 call at Locklear's home shortly after 11 p.m. PT.”
“Locklear appeared "heavily intoxicated" and was "arguing with other subjects at the residence."”
“"The responding deputy believed it was necessary to separate her from the others," a spokesperson for the police department told Fox News.”
“"In the process of trying to separate her, she battered the deputy...There was no injury to the deputy.”
“That action caused her to get arrested."”
“CLICK HERE TO LISTEN TO THE 911 CALLDue to her "behavior and level of intoxication," police called an ambulance to check on Locklear, who is 56.”
“LOCKLEAR'S FRIENDS, FAMILY 'DESPERATELY' TRIED TO HELP ACTRESS BEFORE HOSPITALIZATIONLocklear then proceeded to allegedly kick an EMT, who was attempting to put her on a gurney, in the chest.”
“She was then taken to the hospital to be examined before being taken to jail where she spent the night before posting $20,000 bail at 9:10 a.m. PST.”


Lockriel is best known for his roles in Dynasty and T.J. hooker in the 1980s and Melrose square in the 1990s
"However, the charges were later dismissed and she was sentenced to three years of informal probation and ordered to pay a $700 fine."
"Ventura County Sheriff's office said they received a 911 call from the lockrier family shortly after 11 p.m."
Rockill looked "very drunk" and "quarreling with others in the house"
A police spokesman told Fox News: "the deputy director thinks it is necessary to separate her from others."
"In trying to separate her, she beat her deputy The deputy was not injured
"That operation led to her arrest."
"Click here to listen to the 911 call. Due to her" behavior and poisoning level ", the police called an ambulance to check the 56 year old lockrier."
"Rocril's friends and family" desperately "tried to help the actress before she was hospitalized. Rocril then continued to kick the chest of a paramedic who was trying to put her on the gurney."
"Then she was taken to the hospital for examination and sent to prison, where she spent the night and paid $20000 in bail at 9:10 a.m. pacific standard time."



Number  1199
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or you may be interested in: What Is The Longest English Word Containing No Letter More Than Once?”
“See other Vocabulary Questions.Take a look at: What Is The Longest One-syllable English Word?”
“We don't tend to regard these terms as proper 'words'.”
“These can be almost unlimited in length (for example, (40 letters) and many contain numerals, Roman and Greek letters, and other symbols, as well as ordinary letters.”
“The same is true of the formal names of chemical compounds.”
“The answer is no: they're regarded as chemical names rather than genuine words in the sense of meaningful items of vocabulary.”
“...considered as the longest English word given that they can run to many thousands of letters...”
“These include otorhinolaryngological 22 letters immunoelectrophoretically 25 letters psychophysicotherapeutics 25 letters thyroparathyroidectomized 25 letters pneumoencephalographically 26 letters radioimmunoelectrophoresis 26 letters psychoneuroendocrinological 27 letters hepaticocholangiogastrostomy 28 letters spectrophotofluorometrically 28 letters 30 letters People sometimes ask whether a DNA string can be...”
“The 20-volume historical Oxford English Dictionary includes other very long words, most of which are highly technical.”
“In terms of sheer size, however, the longest word to be found in Britain is the Welsh place name For obvious reasons, it's usually abbreviated to Llanfair PG.”


Or you may be interested: what is the longest English word that does not contain more than one letter
"See other words have problems. Answer: what is the longest monosyllabic English word
"We are not inclined to regard these terms as appropriate 'words'," he said
The length of these letters is almost unlimited (for example, (40 letters), and many contain numbers, Roman and Greek letters, other symbols, and common letters
"So is the official name of the compound."
"The answer is no: they are considered chemical names, not real words."
“… They are considered the longest English words because they can run thousands of letters... "
It includes 22 letters of Otorhinolaryngology, 25 letters of immunoelectrophoresis, 25 letters of psychophysical therapy, 25 letters of thyroidectomy, 25 letters of pulmonary cerebral meteorology, 26 letters of radioimmunoelectrophoresis, 26 letters of psychological neuroendocrine, 27 letters of hepatobiliary gastrostomy, 28 letters of fluorescence spectrophotometry, 28 letters, 30 letters. People sometimes ask if DNA strings are OK
The 20 volume Oxford Historical English dictionary also contains some other very long words, most of which are highly technical words
"However, in terms of absolute size, the longest word in the UK is a Welsh place name, for the obvious reason that it is often abbreviated as llanfair pg."



Number  1200
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Since the controversy Left Bank Pictures have confirmed they will pay Olivia Colman who will take over the role of The Queen in series three of The Crown the same wage as the yet to be announced actor who portrays the older Prince Philip...”
“...out for 13 Reasons Why Start date TBA Netflix TBA Netflix TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for This Is Us season 2 Start date TBA Channel 4 TBA Channel 4 Ron Batzdorff NBC TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for Unforgotten series 3 Start date TBA ITV1”
“Recently it emerged that the 33-year-old star of the hit Netflix show was paid less than the former Doctor Who actor, despite having the lead role.”
“The Sun reported that Foy, who played Queen Elizabeth II in the first two series of The Crown, received a lower wage than Smith, who starred as Prince Philip, due to his larger reputation in the industry.”
“The report was confirmed by producers Suzanne Mackie and Andy Harries.”
“Foy told Entertainment Weekly following the uproar: "I'm surprised because I'm at the centre of it, and anything that I'm at the centre of like that is very, very odd, and feels very, very out of ordinary.”
“"But I'm not [surprised about the interest in the story] in the sense that it was a female-led drama," she added.”
“"I'm not surprised that people saw the story and went, 'Oh that's a bit odd'.”
“"But I know that Matt feels the same that I do, that it's odd to find yourself at the centre [of a story] that you didn't particularly ask for."”
“Producers at Left Bank Pictures apologised for the pay disparity in a statement which said: "We want to apologise to both Claire Foy and Matt Smith, brilliant actors and friends, who have found themselves at the centre of a media storm this week through no fault of their own.”


"As a result of the dispute, left bank pictures confirmed that they will pay Olivia Colman, who will take over the role of queen in the third film of the crown prince, for the same remuneration as the actor who has not yet been announced playing the old Prince Philip..."
“… For 13 reasons, why the start date is TBA Netflix TBA Netflix TV preview 2018? This is the second season in the United States. The start date is TBA channel 4 TBA channel 4 Ron batzdorff NBC TV preview 2018. Pay attention to the unfinished series 3. The start date is TBA Itv1
"Recently, it was reported that although the 33 year old star of Netease popular show played the leading role, his film payment was lower than that of the former who doctor."
The Sun reported that foy, who played Queen Elizabeth II in the first two crown films, was paid less than Smith, who played Prince Philip, because of his higher reputation in the industry
"This report was confirmed by producers Susan McKee and Andy Harris."
"I'm surprised because I'm at the center of it, anything that I'm at the center of it is very, very strange, it feels very, very unusual," foy told entertainment weekly after the uproar
"But I'm not surprised (by the interest in the story) because it's a female dominated play," she added
"I'm not surprised that people see this story and say, 'Oh, it's a bit strange.'
"But I know Matt feels the same way as I do, finding himself at the center of (a story) and you don't ask for it, which is strange."
"We apologize to two talented actors and friends, Claire foy and Matt Smith, who have found themselves at the center of this week's media storm, not because of their own fault," the producer of left bank pictures said in a statement apologizing for the pay gap



Number  1201
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...lovebirds actually met over Fourth of July weekend when Conor s aunt Rory a documentary filmmaker invited Swift to the family compound...”
“...did appear to be a number of music industry heavy hitters staying at the property with Swift s father Scott center in red hat a part owner of her record label Big Machine Records a man who looks similar to WME execuitve Marc Geiger on right in blue hat The...”
“The 26-year-old star of 'Billy Flynn's Long Halftime Walk' was born and raised in the suburbs of London.”
“She did not forego all tradition however, as she likely spent Fourth of July with her latest boyfriend, Joe Alwyn.”
“No famous faces or British-born beaus made the journey East to the smallest state in the union for the biggest party of the year this Fourth of July though, as even Swift, skipped the annual trip to the Ocean State.”
“Calvin Harris had been the chosen beau back in 2015, and back in 2014 Andrew Garfield played the role of English rose when he accompanied his then-girlfriend Emma Stone.”
“...will live on forever.”
“And while their relationship may be no more, the images of Hiddleston, 36, and his decade-younger lover cavorting in the surf while he wears a skin-tight tank reading 'I heart T.S.'”
“...the holiday weekend...”
“...the British crown right Last year the up and coming stars in the fields of music film and fashion were also joined by a heartthrob hailing from across the pond as per tradition with Swift welcoming then boy toy Tom Hiddleston to spent some time with her sacred squad for...”


“…… Love bird actually met on the weekend of July 4, when Connor's aunt Rory, a documentary producer, invited swift to the family compound... "
“… It seems that some of the heavyweights in the music industry are staying in the hotel with Swift's father Scott center in red hat. Part of the recording company owns her big machine record of a man who looks like WME executive director Mark Geiger in the blue hat on the right. "
"The 26 year old star of" Billy Flynn's midfield Trek "was born and raised in a suburb of London
"But she didn't give up all her traditions because she was likely to be with her new boyfriend, Joe Alvin, on July 4."
"On July 4, no celebrity or British born beauty went to the smallest state in the eastern United States for the biggest party of the year, but even swift didn't take part in the annual ocean state tour."
"Calvin Harris was chosen as a lover as early as 2015, and Andrew Garfield played the role of English rose when he accompanied his then girlfriend Emma stone as early as 2014."
“… Will live forever. "
Although their relationship may no longer exist, hilderston, 36, and his 10-year-old lover are playing in waves in a tank top with the words "I heart T.S." written on it
“… Holiday weekend... "
“… Crown rights UK's rising stars in music, film and fashion last year also joined a sweetheart cheering from across the pond according to tradition and a quick welcome to the then boy toy Tom sidleston spent some time with her sacred team for... "



Number  1202
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The busy celebrity has also released a book, Living in Style: Inspiration and Advice for Everyday Glamour .”
“Multi tasking mom The 42 year old cradled baby Kaius on her chest as she watched a New York Fashion Week show on her laptop in an Instagram shot posted on Tuesday The fashion mogul is seen reclining on her bed as her second son born December 22 sleeps on...”
“Rachel Zoe posts Instagram snap of cute sons Skyler and newborn Kaius snuggling up on Valentine's DayShe is very much the proud mother of two adorable sons.”
“And Rachel Zoe ensured the world could coo over her boys this Valentine's Day as she posted two cute shots on Instagram, along with a shout out to her husband of 18 years Roger Berman.”
“The 42-year-old TV star captioned the image: 'I feel so lucky to have 3 Valentines forever my loves @rbermanus and my angels #skylermorrison #kaiusjagger.'”
“Heart breakers: Rachel Zoe posted this adorable collage of three photos of her sons, two-year-old Skyler and baby Kaius, on Instagram on Valentines DayIn the photo trio, one cute snap shows two-year-old Skyler snuggling up to his eight-week-old brother Kaius.”
“Another shows the curly-haired Skyler in a blue and white stripey T-shirt with a big red heart on the front while the third shot features the adorable newborn.”
“Rachel cancelled her New York Fashion Week show due to the arrival of little Kaius.”
“But the star managed to work from home, posting a snapshot of herself with Kaius in her lap, watching a New York Fashion Week show on her laptop in an Instagram shot posted on Tuesday.”
“...her chest while her colleague lies next to her as they watch the Oscar de la Renta show...”


The busy celebrity also publishes a book, "lifestyle: inspiration and advice for everyday glamour."
"A 42 year old mother with a baby, kaius, is sitting on her chest. In an instagram photo released on Tuesday, she watches a show at New York Fashion Week on her laptop. The fashion tycoon is lying in bed with her second son, who was born on December 22, sleeping..."
"On instagram, Rachel Zoe posted pictures of her lovely son Skyler and newborn keus cuddling together on Valentine's day. She is the proud mother of two lovely sons."
"This Valentine's day, Rachel Zoe posted two lovely photos on instagram and yelled at her husband of 18 years, Roger Berman, to make sure the world cheers for her sons."
"The 42 year old TV star wrote an inscription for the photo:" I feel very lucky to have three Valentine's Day gifts, always my lover, my angel, Skyler, Morrison, keus Jagger. "
"Heartbreak: Rachel Zoe posted this lovely jigsaw puzzle on instagram on Valentine's day with three photos of her son, two-year-old Skyler and little Skye. In these three photos, a lovely snapshot shows two-year-old Skyler nestling up to his eight week old brother, Keith
"Another photo shows Skyler with curly hair wearing a blue and white striped T-shirt with a big red heart on the front, while the third photo shows a lovely newborn."
"Due to the arrival of little case, Rachel canceled her New York Fashion Week show."
"But the star managed to work from home. In an instagram photo released on Tuesday, she watched a New York Fashion Week show on her laptop and put herself and kaius on her lap."
“… Her breasts, and her colleagues lying next to her, because they're watching Oscar de la Renta... "



Number  1203
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...past...”
“The 28 year old model was joined by a group of friends while spending time on a boat on Friday February 5 in Miami Beach Fla It s not clear if Olivia will be going to the Super Bowl this year but she has been a regular there in years...”
“After she got home, Lucy took to Instagram to introduce fans to new puppy, which she adorably named Ethel.”
“The 31-year-old Pretty Little Liars actress picked up her new puppy from the shelter on Saturday afternoon (February 6) in Los Angeles.”
“Lucy Hale has adopted a new puppy!”
“He was nominated for Best Actor for his role in Ma Rainey’s Black Bottom, Best Supporting Actor for his role in Da 5 Bloods, and was Read moreLucy Hale's New Puppy Ethel Was Once Fostered by This Famous Actress!”
“Chadwick made history becoming the first actor to be nominated for four SAG Awards in a single year.”
“The 33-year-old Creed actor took to Instagram on Friday (February 5) to pay tribute to his late Black Panther co-star after he made history with all of his nominations at the 2021 SAG Awards.”
“A few days earlier, Emily took to Instagram to Read moreMichael B Jordan Honors Late Chadwick Boseman After Making History with SAG Awards Nominations Michael B. Jordan is remembering his late friend Chadwick Boseman.”
“Emily showed off growing baby bump in a short, black sweatshirt paired with black sweatpants, a gray blazer, and tan boots while the 33-year-old film producer sported bright orange sweats for their walk.”


“… In the past... "
"A group of friends joined the 28 year old model on a boat ride in Miami Beach, Florida, on Friday, February 5. It's not clear if Olivia will go to the Super Bowl this year, but she has been a regular there for many years... "
"When she got home, Lucy went to instagram and introduced a new puppy to her fans. She lovingly named it Ethel."
"The 31 year old beautiful little cheater actress picked up her new puppy from a shelter in Los Angeles on Saturday afternoon
"Lucy Hale has adopted a new puppy!"
"He was nominated for Best Actor for his role in Marlene's" black butt "and best supporting actor for his role in" big five blood ", and got more information. Lucy Hale's new dog Ethel was raised by the famous actress!"
"Chadwick made history as the first actor to be nominated for four sag awards in one year."
"The 33 year old creed actor saluted his late Panther partner on instagram last Friday (February 5) after making history by winning all nominations at the 2021 sag awards ceremony."
"A few days ago, Emily read more on instagram. Michael Jordan made history with his sag nomination in memory of the late Chadwick Bosman. Jordan is remembering his late friend, Chadwick Bosman
Wearing a black sweatshirt, black sweatpants, gray blazer and tan boots, Emily showed the audience the growing baby lump, while the 33 year old filmmaker walked in a bright orange sweatshirt



Number  1204
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The website cited 'multiple sources' for news that Blake was told Miranda 'hooked up' with country singer Chris Young and a second man in recent years.”
“TMZ claimed he was 'very upset' in the wake of the separation but was forced to file for divorce when information of two separate men confirmed to him that she had been unfaithful.”
“According to Us, it was Blake's role on NBC's The Voice which put a lot of pressure on them not only distance wise, but also because while he was enjoying the extra added fame, it was not something Miranda wanted.”
“Another source revealed the pair never saw each other which made the situation much worse.”
“The magazine also said the pair, despite saying they tried not to spend more than two weeks apart, they were rarely in the same state.”
“Kids were the main issue.'”
“A source said: 'He wanted them and she didn't...she kept putting it off and coming up with excuses.”
“The magazine reported their split was down to the fact Blake desperately wanted to start a family while she wanted to wait.”
“Us that for her Divorce was not an option...”
“Cheating rumours The pair also had to deal with allegations they had both strayed which they denied as well as the pressures of a long distance relationship down to Blake s role on NBC s The Voice they are pictured here at the 56th Grammy Awards Miranda had previously told...”


"Blake was told that Miranda was" in league "with country singer Chris young and that he had a second man in recent years," the website quoted "multiple sources" as saying
"TMZ claimed that he felt" very uneasy "after the separation, but he was forced to divorce when the information from the two separated men confirmed to him that she was unfaithful."
"As far as we know, it's Blake's role in NBC's" the voice "that puts a lot of pressure on them, not only in terms of distance, but also because he enjoys extra fame, which is not what Miranda wants."
"Another source revealed that the two had never met, which made the situation worse."
"The magazine also said that although the two said they would try not to be separated for more than two weeks, they were rarely in the same state."
"Children are the main problem."
"One source said: 'he wanted them and she didn't She's been procrastinating and coming up with excuses. "
"The magazine reported that the reason they broke up was that black was desperate to get married while she wanted to wait."
"We know it's impossible for her to divorce..."
"Deceiving rumors, two people also have to deal with the accusations that they are both misguided, that they deny, and that the pressure for a long-distance relationship drops to black's role, NBC's voice, which they are filming here before the 56th Grammy Awards Miranda told..."



Number  1205
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This story was originally published on Oct. 7, 2017.”
“DonaCarmen.esKeep rocking the shorts, Prince George — they couldn’t be any cuter!”
“But there’s something else that people have noticed recently about the young royal: He’s always wearing shorts!”
“The royal family arrives at a children's party in British Columbia, Canada on Sept. 29, 2017.”
“CHRIS WATTIE Reuters Rain or shine when the little prince steps out in public he sports a pair of adorable shorts often paired with knee socks a preppy striped belt and a tucked in polo yes at age 4 young George is already more put together than most of us...”
“...will ever be...”
“Prince William, Duchess Kate, Prince George and Princess Charlotte arrive in Victoria, Canada.”
“Pool / Getty ImagesWhy is Prince George never spotted in jeans or other long pants?”
“Harper’s Bazaar UK did some investigating, and they found that dressing young boys in shorts is a long-standing tradition among the British royalty and aristocracy.”
“33 photos Slideshow The life of Prince George From the steps of St. Mary's Hospital in London to posing with his little sister Charlotte, take a look at the royal baby's adventures.”


"The story was first published on October 7, 2017."
"Donakaman. Eskeep swing shorts, Prince George - they can't be more lovely!"
"But recently it has been noticed that the young royal family has one more thing: he always wears shorts!"
"On September 29, 2017, the British royal family arrived at a children's party in British Columbia, Canada."
"Chris Wattie (Reuters) - when the little prince walked out of public places, he wore a cute pair of shorts, often paired with knee high socks, a college striped belt and a pleated polo shirt. Yes, at the age of 4, little George was more fit than most of us... "
“… Always... "
Prince William, Duchess Kate, Prince George and Princess Charlotte arrive in Victoria, Canada
Why did Prince George never wear jeans or other trousers? "
Harper market has done some research and found that wearing shorts for young boys is a long tradition of the British royal family and aristocracy
"The 33 photos show Prince George's life in the form of slides. From the steps of St. Mary's Hospital in London to his group photo with his sister Charlotte, let's take a look at the adventures of the Royal baby."



Number  1206
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jones tells a story about the first time they filmed a scene in Luke’s room where actor Jahi Di'Allo Winston had to put a VHS tape in the VCR.”
“There were, however, a few things lost in translation.”
““With the character of Luke, we thought about ourselves, and the fact that we were obsessed with girls, wear your heart on your sleeve — all these things that have nothing to do with race,” Mohan said.”
“Much of the show’s drama revolves around Luke’s crush on Kate, as it collides with Kate’s coming out process.”
“Now, step into “Everything Sucks!,” where the main characters are Luke, a black boy, and Kate, a sophomore girl coming to terms with her attraction to other girls.”
“Step back to 1996, before Ellen came out, before “Will and Grace.” In that era, gay and lesbian characters and people of color were generally relegated to a supporting friend role in mainstream shows.”
““Everything Sucks!” features characters who would have never gotten their own show in the ‘90s, but should have.”
““So for kids watching it today that weren’t even born in the ‘90s, it’ll feel like the olden days for sure, but hopefully that’s just a footnote to the emotional arc of the story.”2.”
““I guess it seemed like a slightly different world, and that was fascinating to me as a kid, but ultimately it was a backdrop,” he said, adding that that’s their goal, too.”
“Growing up in the ‘90s himself, creator Ben Jones says he loved watching the “Wonder Years,” which was about a boy his age living in the ‘60s.”


"Jones tells the story of the first time they filmed a scene in Luke's room, and actor Jesse diaro Winston had to put a VCR in the VCR."
"However, some things have been lost in the process of translation."
"With the role of Luke, we think of ourselves and the fact that we're obsessed with girls, putting your heart on your sleeve - all of which has nothing to do with race," Mohan said
"Most of the plot of the play revolves around Luke's infatuation with Kate because it conflicts with Kate's coming out process."
Now, go to "everything sucks! "The main characters in the play are Luke, a black boy, and Kate, a sophomore girl, who is accepting her attraction to other girls."
Back in 1996, before Allen appeared in will and grace, gay and lesbian characters and people of color were often relegated to supporting roles in mainstream programs
"Everything is terrible! "These characters never had their own performances in the '90s, but they should have."
"Therefore, for today's children who have not been born in the 1990s, it will certainly make them feel like the past, but I hope it is just a footnote of the emotional arc of the story."
"I think it seems to be a slightly different world, which was fascinating when I was a kid, but in the end it's a background," he said, adding that it's also their goal
Creator Ben Jones, who grew up in the '90s, said he liked to watch' the age of miracles', a film about a boy his age in the '60s



Number  1207
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She is trying to stay healthy and enjoy her pregnancy, but the latest drama is too much.””
““It’s still ballin.’ It’s just on a budget.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“The couple celebrated the impending arrival of their baby boy — their first child together — with a jungle-themed baby shower over the weekend.”
“33-year-old Parrish used a sweet Instagram filter to reveal the name of the little one: Kenzo.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kenzos mama,” Parrish wrote on a photo posted to her Insta Story of herself cradling her baby bump.”
“On another shot, she added: “a lioness & her cub.”Hart, 38, was sure to serve a few jokes on his Snapchat at the event held at Calamigos Beach Club in Malibu, California.”
“He showcased a furry guest at the party: a dog with a plush lion mane fitted on its neck.”
“Image zoomImage zoom“When you couldn’t afford the lion so you got a dog and just put the thing around the dog,” he said.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"She's trying to stay healthy and have fun with pregnancy, but the latest story is too much."
"It's still Bahraini, it's just budgetary." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"The couple held a jungle themed baby shower over the weekend to celebrate their upcoming baby boy, their first child together."
"Parrish, 33, revealed the little guy's name with a sweet instagram filter: Kenzo."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Mother kenzos," Parrish wrote in a photo posted on insta, in which she holds her little lump
In another photo, she added: "a lioness and her cubs." Hart, 38, is sure to tell a few jokes on snapchat at an event at the calamigos Beach Club in Malibu, California
"He showed a fluffy guest at the party: a dog with a fluffy lion's mane around its neck."
"When you can't afford a lion, you have a dog and put it around the dog," he said
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  1208
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Nick Jonas was cute back when he was in the Jonas Brothers but now he looks like a ferrit (sic)," the singer and Jumanji star read, ignoring the typo.”
“For Jonas, the tweet was aimed more at his looks than his work.”
“They are both entirely overused."”
“The members of pop punk band Fall Out Boy gathered to read a scathing tweet from a "fan" that said: "Fall Out Boy is the Comic Sans MS of music.”
“"I would have said Waffle House, but whatever," Pink said.”
“"Pink makes music for obnoxious white bridal parties that drunkingly walk into a Denny’s and ruin everyone’s evening," the singer read, laughing.”
“...on Tuesday.”
“Pink, Fall Out Boy and Nick Jonas read a special musician edition of Mean Tweets on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”


"Nick Jonas was cute when jonas brothers were, but now he looks like a ferret," read the singer and Jumanji star, ignoring spelling mistakes
"For Jonas, this tweet is more about his looks than his works."
"They're all overused."
Members of the popular punk band fall out boy got together and read a pungent tweet from fans, which read: "fall out boy is a cartoon of music."
"I would say waffle house, but anyway," Pinker said
"The pink band made music for the disgusting White Bride party, and they came into Denny's house drunk and ruined everyone's night," the singer read with a smile
"Tuesday."
"Pink, lovelorn boy and Nick Jonas watched a special musician's version of vulgar twitter live in Jimmy Kimmel!"



Number  1209
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 10 premieres April 4 on Bravo.”
“The Real Housewives of New York co-stars Ramona Singer, Sonja Morgan, Dorinda Medley and Tinsley Mortimer.”
“"I've been traveling, I've been in prison, and I just want to be close to home," she says during a phone call.”
“The television personality was arrested and charged with disorderly intoxication and battery on a police officer in December.”
“De Lesseps, meanwhile, is shown returning from rehab in January after seeking treatment for alcohol abuse.”
“I've never been alone since I'm 20 years old," Zarin tearfully asks Frankel in the clip.”
“"What am I going to do?”
“The pair had stopped speaking in 2010 following conflicts on the show, but reconciled at Bobby's funeral, according to Page Six.”
“In contrast, Frankel is seen comforting Zarin following Bobby's death in January.”
“Frankel responds.”


"Season 10 premiered in Bravo on April 4."
"The real housewife of New York" co stars Ramona Singh, Sonia Morgan, Dorinda medley and Tinsley Mortimer
"I've been traveling, I'm in prison, I just want to be closer to home," she said in a phone call
"The television celebrity was arrested in December last year and charged with drunkenness and beatings of a police officer."
Meanwhile, dreiseps returned from rehab in January after seeking treatment for alcoholism
"I've never been alone since I was 20," zarin asks Frankel in tears
"What should I do?"
According to page 6, the two stopped talking after a clash on the 2010 show, but reconciled at Bobbie's funeral
"By contrast, Frankel comforted zarin after Bobbie died in January."
"Answered Frankel



Number  1210
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Elegant yet easy to make at home, the cocktail captures the beauty and glamour of Hollywood’s biggest night while drawing from Camilla’s Brazilian roots to highlight the international flavor of the evening.”
“During the evening, the French Maison debuted ‘The Moët Belle’, the official cocktail of the 76th Golden Globe Awards, created by actress and filmmaker Camilla Belle.”
“Backstage, presenters and winners celebrated withgolden glasses of Moët & Chandon and Moët Minis including Lady Gaga, Mark Ronson, Michael Douglas, Jeff Bridges, Patricia Arquette and more.”
“1 000 in the participants names...”
“Celebrities including Moët Chandon Golden Globes Ambassadors Gemma Chan and Camilla Belle Amy Adams Glenn Close Idris Elba Luke Evans Dakota Fanning Willem Dafoe Gina Rodriguez Darren Criss Laura Harrier and many more raised a celebratory Moët Mini in honor of their charity of choice to which Moët Chandon donates...”
“Over 1.500 Moët Minis were served to a roster of stars on the red carpet, celebrating the 10th anniversary of the Maison’s popular philanthropic initiative, “Toast for a Cause”.”


"This cocktail is elegant and easy to make at home. It not only captures the beauty and charm of Hollywood's biggest night, but also draws on Camilla's Brazilian heritage to highlight the international flavor of the night."
That night, Mason premiered the official cocktail "Mott bell" of the 76th Golden Globe Awards, created by actress and film producer Camilla bell
"Backstage, hosts and winners celebrate with Mo chanden and Mo Minnie's golden cup, including Lady Gaga, mark Ronson, Michael Douglas, Jeff Bridges, Patricia Arquette, etc."
"1000 participant names..."
"Celebrities including mort chanden Golden Globe Ambassador Gemma Chen and Camilla bell Amy Adams Glen close Idris Elba Luke Evans Dakota Fanning William Dafo Gina Rodriguez Darren Chris Lara Harrell held a small celebration for the charity donated by mort chanden..."
On the red carpet, more than 1500 Miniatures were put on the star list to celebrate the 10th anniversary of Mason's "cheers to business."



Number  1211
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More to come.””
“That’s a whole other level of f—boy s— right there.”T.I.”
“...said he thinks Rob Kardashian is going to have a hard time hooking up with women after exposing Blac Chyna TI Responds to Rob Kardashian s Claim He Had a Threesome with Blac Chyna Don t Tell Women s Business...”
“T I”
“...has a few words for Rob Kardashian after the reality star claimed the rapper had a threesome with his ex-fiancée Blac Chyna and T.I.’s ex-wife Tameka “Tiny” Harris back in the day.”
“TMZ caught up with the 36-year-old rapper at Los Angeles International Airport over the weekend.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Don’t tell women’s business.”
“That’s bad.”
“That’s very, very bad.”


"There's more."
"That's a completely different level of f-boy s-right there." T.I
“… He said he thought rob Kardashian had a hard time with women after exposing Blake chener. As for Rob Kardashian's claim that he had a trio with Blake chener, I replied, "don't tell women..."
"Me"
"I'd like to say a few words to reality star rob Kardashian after she claimed that rapper and his ex fiancee Blake chener and T.I.'s ex-wife tameka TiNi Harris had a trio."
"TMZ caught up with the 36 year old rapper at Los Angeles International Airport over the weekend."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Don't tell women."
"That's too bad."
"That's too bad."



Number  1212
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I don’t think I’ll ever really forget my experiences in Paris — the good or the bad — and I think that’s okay,” Kim said in an on-camera interview.”
“I didn’t really have a lot of anxiety.”The reality star even believed she could go back for a longer visit.”
“I hope that this trip will just be so good that I can start to remember all the magical things about Paris and why Kanye and I fell in love with it In the car after landing in Paris where West was fascinated with the number of bike shops he...”
““I have so many special memories in Paris,” the KKW Beauty guru said.”
““But it’s a good putting your toe in the water.”RELATED VIDEO: Kim Kardashian Says She Was High on Ecstasy During First Wedding — and When She Made a Sex TapeKim expressed hope that the quick visit would help bring back a positive view of Paris.”
““You’re a really good friend to go back to a place where you’re not the most comfortable,” she told Kim.”
“But I guess you never know what could happen.”Khloé, 34, agreed, “It’s time.”Momager Kris Jenner also encouraged her daughter to head to France.”
““You know, I’m going really cautiously, and I think going for such a short period of time def helps me mentally.”
““I definitely want to be there to support Kanye and Virgil but the last time I was there obviously [was] like a horrific experience for me,” Kim said in an on-camera interview.”
“When the mother of three consulted her sisters Khloé and Kourtney offered support of her one day trip to Paris...”


"I don't think I'll really forget my experience in Paris - good or bad - I don't think it matters," king said in an interview
"I really don't have much anxiety." The reality star even thought she could go back for a longer visit
"I hope this trip will be so wonderful that I can start to recall all the magical things in Paris and why Kanye and I fell in love with it in the car after landing in Paris. West is fascinated by the number of bike shops he owns..."
"I have a lot of special memories in Paris," said the kkw beauty guru
Related video: Kim Kardashian said she was ecstatic at her first wedding. When she made a sex video, Kim Kardashian said she hoped the quick visit would give people a positive view of Paris
"You're such a good friend, going back to a place where you're not the most comfortable," she told Kim
"But I don't think you ever know what's going to happen." Khlo é, 34, agreed, "it's time." Mother Kris Jenner also encouraged her daughter to go to France
"You know, I'm really cautious. I think such a short period of time is good for my spirit."
"Of course I want to go there to support Kanye and Virgil, but the last time I went there was obviously a terrible experience for me," king said in an interview
"When the mother of three asked her sister for advice, khlo é and Kourtney expressed their support for her one-day trip to Paris..."



Number  1213
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Your birthday is Saturday.'”
“She explained: 'Well, like, if it's a Wednesday, and we can't celebrate and we're both working late, then guess what?”
“Kristen swung by the Today show in September and revealed one of her quirky parenting tricks - 'I've also lied to them about when their birthday is.'”
“...and Delta three...”
“Back in action Her sitcom The Good Place was just renewed for a fourth season she is pictured with her co stars Jameela Jamil Manny Jacinto and William Jackson Harper In her own life Kristen has been married to Dax since 2013 and the couple share two daughters Lincoln five...”
“Michael is a veteran of NBC sitcoms - he was on the writing staff of The Office and co-created both Parks And Recreation and Brooklyn Nine-Nine.”
“Created by Michael Schur, who is also the showrunner, The Good Place has been picked up for another season at NBC, Variety reported Tuesday.”
“...and face perdition...”
“Hoofing it The 38 year old sitcom star kept cozy in a thick peach coat sweeping her blonde hair into a bun and slipped into a flowing white tee She must now reform her behavior and keep up the pretense of being a decent person or else blow her cover...”
“The series stars Kristen as a bad person who dies and mistakenly winds up in 'The Good Place,' an afterlife analogous to Heaven.”


"Your birthday is Saturday."
"Well, for example, if it's Wednesday, we can't celebrate, and we all work late, guess what?" she explained
"Christine made a splash on today show in September and revealed one of her bizarre parenting tricks -" I lied about when their birthday was. "
“… And delta three... "
"Going back to the fourth season of the sequel to her sitcom good place, she and her partners, Jamila Jamil Manny jacintol and William Jackson Harper, are taking pictures in their own lives. Christine has been married to Darth since 2013, and the couple have two daughters, Lincoln, who are five years old..."
"Michael's a veteran of NBC sitcoms - he's an office screenwriter and co authored parks and entertainment and Brooklyn 99
The great position created by Michael Schur has been selected for NBC's next season, the variety reported on Tuesday
“… In the face of destruction... "
"Nonsense, the 38 year old sitcom star wears a thick pink coat, combs her golden hair into a bun, and then puts on a flowing white T-shirt. Now she must change her behavior and continue to pretend that she is a decent person, or she will expose her identity..."
"This series plays Christine as a bad man. He dies in a" good place ", a paradise like afterlife



Number  1214
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...a Nonsense Interview Jimmy Remixes Fred Armisen s Random Exertion Noises into a Sick Beat...”
“Speak for Yourself with Ben Stiller and Fred Armisen Click inside to watch the rest of Ben Stiller and Fred Aremisen s appearance Ben Stiller Hung out with Rodney Dangerfield at Wild Family Seders Ben Stiller Hung out with Rodney Dangerfield at Wild Family Seders Fred Armisen and Jimmy Have...”
“Watch the video below to see the fictitious teen drama and hilarity unfold!”
““So we ended up having to lip sync each other’s lines while, you know, the other person spoke for us,” Ben said.”
“Jimmy told the audience that the show was “great,” but that there were “some weird audio issues.” Ben explained further by adding that the show’s director preferred to use his voice for Jimmy‘s character and Jimmy‘s voice for his own character.”
“In the sketch about a fictitious show, Ben and Jimmy play two high school guys who have crushes on the same girl, played by Fred.”
“Ben Stiller and Fred Aremisen served as the special guests on last night’s (September 20) episode of The Tonight Show, and both participated in a hilarious sketch called “Speak for Yourself” with host Jimmy Fallon!”


“… A bullshit interview, Jimmy mixes Fred amison's random force noise into a sick beat... "
"Speak for yourself with Ben Stiller and Fred amison. Click inside to watch other performances of Ben Stiller and Fred aremison. Ben Stiller and Rodney Dangerfield hang out at the outdoor dinner. Ben Stiller and Rodney Dangerfield hang out at the outdoor dinner. Fred amison and Jimmy have..."
"Watch the video below to see the fictional Youth Drama and funny unfolding!"
"So we had to synchronize each other's lines as they spoke for us," Ben said
"Jimmy told the audience that the play was" great, "but" there were some strange audio problems. " Ben further explained that the director of the play preferred to play the role of Jimmy with his voice and play his own role with Jimmy's voice. "
In a fictional sketch, Ben and Jimmy play two high school boys who are infatuated with the same girl played by Fred
Ben Stiller and Fred aremison were special guests in last night's (September 20) tonight show. They both participated in a comedy called "speak for yourself" with host Jimmy Fallon



Number  1215
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If the “Meghan Markle effect” on Strathberry handbags, Hiut denim, or yellow gold sales are any indication, designers may soon see a bump in requests for personal coats of arms.”
“Thomas Woodcock, who oversees such assignations, said in a release from Kensington Palace that “the Duchess of Sussex took a great interest in the design.” Here are some the key elements within.”
“The new Duchess of Sussex, aka Meghan Markle, got her very own royal coat of arms—a classy but standard gift for spouses of British royalty.”
“Some newly married couples get monogrammed towels; others get personalized stationery.”
“May 25, 2018 This article is more than 2 years old.”
“This article is more than 2 years old.”


If there is any sign of the "Megan markel effect" in the sale of strasbury handbags, Heit jeans or gold, designers may soon see an increase in the demand for individual military uniforms
"The Duchess of Sussex is very interested in this design," Thomas Woodcock said in a press release at Kensington Palace. Here are some of the key elements. "
"The new Duchess of Sussex, also known as Megan markel, received her own royal insignia, which is an elegant and standard gift for the British Royal spouse."
"Some newlyweds get a towel with a monogram; others get personalized stationery."
"May 25, 2018, this article has been more than two years."
"This article has been more than two years."



Number  1216
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Titleholders [ edit ]This is a list of women who have won the Miss United States beauty pageant since 2001.”
“2014 where she placed as 2nd runner up and earned the title of Continental Queen of Beauty of the Americas...”
“2 Notable past Miss United States titleholders include Miss United States 2013 Candiace Dillard who is a reality television personality on Bravo s Real Housewives of Potomac and Miss United States 2014 Elizabeth Safrit who also represented the United States at Miss World 2014 in London England on December 14”
“The reigning Miss United States is Tiffany Rea of Tehachapi, California, who was crowned on October 15, 2020 in Palm Beach, Florida.”
“In 2016, Miss United States organizers held the national pageant in Las Vegas, where it initially was held, for a 30th anniversary celebration.”
“Mrs. United States Pageant, Inc. is the official and exclusive owner of the Mrs.United States Pageants trademarks.”
“Teen United States, Miss Teen United States, Miss United States, Ms. United States, Ms. Woman United States, and Mrs. United States.”
“Miss United States is part of the system known as Mrs. United States Pageants, Inc. [1] which has eight divisions starting at the age of 8: Little Miss United States, Miss Pre-Teen United States, Miss Jr.”
“The pageant includes women selected to represent all 50 states, District of Columbia, American Samoa, Guam, Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, Puerto Rico, and the U.S. Virgin Islands.”
“Miss United States Pageant is a pageant held in the United States for unmarried women between the ages of 20-29.”


"Title holder [editor] this is the list of women who have won the Miss America beauty pageant since 2001."
"In 2014, she won the second place and the title of beauty queen of the American continent..."
"The two famous Miss America champions include Candace Dillard of 2013, the reality TV host of Bravo's" the Real Housewives of Potomac "and Elizabeth safrit of 2014. She also represented the United States in the 2014 Miss World competition held in London on December 14."
The current Miss America is Tiffany Leia of tehachabi, California, who was crowned in Palm Beach, Florida on October 15, 2020
"In 2016, the organizers of Miss America held a national beauty contest in Las Vegas, which was originally held, to celebrate its 30th anniversary."
"Madame American beauty contest, the company is the official and exclusive owner of Madame united" American beauty contest trademark. "
"American teenagers, Miss American teenagers, Miss America, Ms America, Ms America, Mrs America."
"Miss America is known as the American ladies beauty pageant（ Mrs.UnitedStates  As part of the system of pages, Inc., the company has eight divisions since the age of eight: Miss America, Miss American teenagers, Miss America. "
The contest included women who were selected to represent all 50 states, the District of Columbia, American Samoa, Guam, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, Puerto Rico and the United States Virgin Islands
"Miss America is a beauty contest for unmarried women aged 20-29 in the United States."



Number  1217
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...thank you for letting me create magic with you @siamusic.”While Sia’s left breast was exposed from under her white robe, a banana emoji helped keep some of the star’s chest private.”
“...she had no idea her boob was out.”
“Sia’s make-up artist, Tonya Brewer, shared the photo of the singer, writing in the caption, “she just directed her first film.”
“...her breast bared...”
“RELATED VIDEO Sia Goes Without Her Wig as She Reveals Her Face and Her Breast in Instagram Post The Titanium singer isn t afraid to show off her body either giving fans an eyeful in early October when she appeared on a friend s Instagram wearing a white rob with...”
“PEOPLE could not immediately reach a representative for the songstress Monday.”
“Unlike other nude celebrity photographs that have come up for sale after their phones were hacked, Sia’s appears to be snapped unbeknownst to her while she was outside some sort of residence.”
“While a serious matter, the Tweet was also a reference to her new album “Everyday is Christmas”.”
“Everyday is Christmas!” the 41-year-old wrote, explaining the bold move.”
“Save your money, here it is for free.”


“…… Thank you for letting me work miracles with you As SIA's left chest emerges from under her white robe, a banana emoticon helps keep the star's chest private
“…… She didn't know her chest was showing
Tonya brewer, SIA's makeup artist, shared the singer's photo and wrote in the title: "she just directed her first film."
“… Her chest is bare... "
"In the related video, SIA didn't wear a wig because she showed her face and chest on instagram, and the titanium singer was not afraid to show off her body. In early October, she appeared on her friend's instagram wearing a white rob to show her fans..."
"On Monday, people couldn't immediately contact the singer's representative."
"Unlike other photos of naked celebrities on sale after their mobile phones were bugged, the photos of SIA seem to have been taken outside a certain residence without her knowing it."
Although it's a serious matter, the microblog also mentioned her new album "every day is Christmas"
"Every day is Christmas! "The 41 year old, he wrote, explains this bold move."
"Save money. It's free."



Number  1218
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I believe there is more upside potential on the table.”
“For this pick of the growth stocks, investors can see potential dips as buying opportunities.”
“BFTR stock — which has 62 holdings — tracks the Russell 2500 Growth Index.”
“As an actively managed fund, its managers also target industries they believe could impact the future of the global economy.”
“Its focus is small-cap and mid-cap businesses.”
“This fund seeks long-term capital appreciation by holding innovative companies.”
“...an exchange traded fund ETF the Blackrock Future Innovators ETF”
“Expanded Tech Software Sector ETF BATS IGV Ørsted OTCMKTS DNNGY Upwork NASDAQ UPWK Growth Stocks to Buy BlackRock Future Innovators ETF BFTR Source Shutterstock 52 Week Range 35 22 53 67Expense Ratio 0 8 or 80 on a 10 000 investment First on my list of growth stocks is actually...”
“8 Biometric Stocks to Consider as We Eye a Return to Normal With that in mind the following stocks carry a certain business momentum and long term potential into 2021 Blackrock Future Innovators ETF NYSEARCA BFTR Cloudera NYSE CLDR Crowdstrike NASDAQ CRWD Direxion Work From Home ETF NYSEARCA WFH iShares...”
“Some may carry less risk than others, based on their competitive advantages, market positioning or size.”


"I believe there is still more potential for growth at the table."
"For these growth stocks, investors can see the potential decline as a buying opportunity."
"Bftr Stocks - 62 Stocks - track the Russell 2500 growth index."
"As an actively managed fund, its managers also target industries that they believe may affect the future of the global economy."
"It focuses on small and medium-sized businesses."
"The Fund seeks long-term capital appreciation by holding innovative companies."
“… Exchange traded fund ETF BlackRock future innovator ETF
"Expand the technology and software sector ETF bats IGV Ø rsted otcmkts dnngy upwork NASDAQ upwk growth stocks buy BlackRock future innovator ETF bftr source shutterstock 52 week range 35 22 53 67 expense ratio 0 8 or 80 for 10000 investment, the number one on my growth stocks list is actually..."
"8 biometric stocks should be considered when we see a return to normal. Considering this, the following stocks have certain business momentum and long-term potential in 2021. BlackRock's future innovator ETF nysearca bftr cloudera NYSE cldr crowdstrike NASDAQ crwd direxion works from home ETF nysearca WFH iShares..."
"Depending on competitive advantage, market positioning or size, some companies may have less risk than others."



Number  1219
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cosby reminisced about his childhood, telling the crowd about how when he was 4 he grilled a relative about the impending birth of his brother.”
“"I used to be a comedian," Cosby deadpanned.”
“Cosby, handing the drumsticks off to the 11-year-old son of the bass player, asked if the boy knew who he was and then told him.”
“He told stories, honoured old friends and finished by leading the band in a set, first using his mouth to scat in place of a missing horn section and then taking a turn at the drums.”
“The 80-year-old entertainer took the stage for about an hour at a Philadelphia jazz club for his first show since May 2015.”
“Bill Cosby has performed in public for the first time since a sex abuse scandal embroiled him in 2015, telling stories and honouring old friends in his hometown on Monday as a retrial looms in his criminal sexual assault case.”


"Kosby recalled his childhood and told the crowd how he had questioned a relative when he was four years old about the impending birth of his brother."
"I used to be a comedian," Cosby said without expression
Cosby handed the drumstick to the bassist's 11 year old son, asked if he knew who he was, and told him
"He tells stories, respects old friends, and finally leads the band in a set, first replacing the missing corner with his mouth, and then taking turns in the drum."
"The 80 year old artist made his debut at a jazz club in Philadelphia for about an hour, his first performance since May 2015."
"Bill Cosby made his first public performance since the 2015 sexual abuse scandal, telling stories in his hometown on Monday and remembering his old friends because his criminal case of sexual assault is about to be retried."



Number  1220
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He visited police headquarters, a hospital and then attended a service at Manchester Cathedral.”
“Prince William was also in Manchester Friday to pay tribute to the victims of the attack.”
“The pop star visited the Royal Manchester Children’s Hospital, chatting and posing for selfies with the injured children.”
“Pictures of smiling young girls propped up in hospital beds next to the pop star circulated on social media.”
“Grande returned to the city Friday, more than a week after suicide bomber Salman Abedi killed 22 and injured dozens more at her concert on May 22.”
“I got to meet my queen todaylove you @ArianaGrandexxxxxx pic.twitter.com/xTymQaRoN2 — jaden farrell mann (@dustyblu10) June 2, 2017She has returned to headline the One Love charity concert for victims of the attack on Sunday.”
“Related: Ariana Grande Says She'll Hold Benefit Concert for Manchester VictimsJaden Farrell Mann, a young Manchester survivor, tweeted pictures of the pop star along with the message "I got to meet my queen today.”
“Love you @Arianagrande."”
“Tonight's visit from @ArianaGrande was amazing.”
“Just the lift all the kids (and parents) needed!”


He visited the police headquarters, a hospital and then attended a ceremony at Manchester Cathedral
"Prince William was also in Manchester Friday to mourn the victims of the attack."
The pop star visited the Royal Manchester children's Hospital, chatted with the injured children and took photos
"A picture of a smiling young girl standing on a hospital bed next to a pop star circulating on social media."
"Grand returned to the city on Friday, more than a week after suicide bomber Salman Abedi killed 22 people and injured dozens at a concert on May 22."
"I'm going to see my queen today. Love you @ a rianaGrandexxxxxxpic.twitter.com/xTymQaRoN2 -Jaden Farrell Mann (@ dustyblu10) on June 2, 2017, she returned to the headlines of Sunday's "one love" charity concert for the victims of the attack
Related report: Ariane Grande said she will hold a charity concert for victims in Manchester. Young Manchester survivor Aden Farrell Man tweeted a picture of the pop star and said, "I'm going to see my queen today."
"Love you @ arianagrande."
"The interview from @ Ariana Grande tonight is great."
"It's just the elevator that all the kids (and parents) need!"



Number  1221
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Melbourne let’s dance,” she wrote ahead of the show on Instagram.”
“I’m so excited nothing can stop me.”
““My face hurts but i’m ready for a party.”
“I’ve always been an overachiever.”Then on Monday, the star performed in Melbourne despite the pain in her mouth.”
“Image zoom Dua Lipa | Credit: Jeff Kravitz/FilmMagicOn Sunday, Lipa hinted at her dental health with an Instagram photo of an oral X-ray, which she captioned: “Your girls been blessed with 33 teeth.”
“Along with the message, the singer — who won two of the top awards at the Brit Awards in February — also shared a selfie video, offering a glimpse of her swollen cheeks and an ice pack.”
“Thank you for your understanding xx,” she added.”
““I have been enjoying this tour so much and i’m so upset that life has gotten in the way but hopefully i’ll have a speedy recovery and make it back as soon as possible.”
“I’ve been performing with an awful pain due to my wisdom teeth and as advised by my dentist and oral surgeon I have had to have them imminently removed,” the British pop star tweeted.”
““I’m so sorry to have to cancel some of my support shows with @brunomars.”


"Melbourne, let's dance," she wrote before the show on instagram
"I'm so excited that nothing can stop me."
"My face hurts, but I'm ready for the party."
"I've always been a great player Then on Monday, the star performed in Melbourne, despite her sore mouth
Image zooming Dua LiPA | image source: Jeff Kravitz / filmmagicon on Sunday, LiPA took an oral X-ray on instagram with the title: "your daughter has 33 teeth."
"While leaving the message, the singer, who won two awards at the Brit Awards in February, also shared a selfie video showing her swollen cheeks and ice packs."
"Thank you for your understanding," she added
"I've always enjoyed this trip. I feel very sad about the obstacles in my life, but I hope I can recover as soon as possible and come back as soon as possible."
The British pop star tweeted: "my performance has been very painful because of wisdom teeth. According to my dentist and stomatologist's advice, I had to remove them immediately."
"I'm sorry I had to cancel some of my support programs at @ brunomars."



Number  1222
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A month later, Jason Wahler and wife Ashley Slack announced they have a baby on the way.”
“In January, Lauren Conrad announced that she’s expecting her first child with husband William Tell.”
“Talan is the latest to join the string of Laguna Beach and The Hills alums in the soon-to-be parents club.”
“@danielletorriero 13 weeks & counting.”FROM PEN: Today’s Savannah Guthrie Was Very Superstitious About Her Pregnancy: “I Didn’t Want to Jinx It”The married couple tied the knot in June 2014, though they’ve been together for eight years.”
“The couple announced the pregnancy in April on Instagram, writing, “#BabyTorriero coming Oct. 2017.”
““@danielletorriero and I are thrilled to announce that we are having a boy in Oct!” he wrote in the caption.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple announced they are expecting a son, according to an Instagram video Talan posted Monday.”
“It’s going to be a boy for Talan Torriero and his wife Danielle.”


"A month later, Jason Waller and his wife Ashley Shrek announced that they were going to have a baby."
In January, Lauren Conrad announced that she would have her first child with her husband, William Tell
"Taran is the latest prospective parent club to join the Laguna Beach and hills alumni team."
"@ danielletorriero 13 weeks & counting." from pen: Today Savannah Guthrie is very superstitious about pregnancy: "I don't want to be unlucky." the married couple got married in June 2014, even though they have been together for eight years
"The couple announced their pregnancy on instagram in April and wrote," baby torrero will arrive in October 2017. "
"@ Daniel toriero and I are excited to announce that we will have a boy in October! "He wrote in the title."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to the instagram video released by Taran on Monday, the couple announced that they were going to have a son."
"For Taran toriero and his wife Danielle, it's going to be a boy."



Number  1223
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of her phenomenal frame...”
“...furry jacket which kept her warm in the chilly air Glam To ensure she stood out Vanessa topped up her facial features with heavy make up when making her TV appearance Heading out The Powerless star tucked the edge of her cream shirt into her pants to tease a glimpse...”
“The 29-year-old actress donned a thick white fur coat as she kept off the chilly bite to the air outside NBC studios.”
“Vanessa underneath wore a floral print Giambattista Valli top along with printed trousers from the Italian fashion designer.”
“Movie promotion: Vanessa Hudgens bundled up outside NBC Studios in New York City on Tuesday as she was promoting her new movie on Late Night with Seth MeyersShe completed her outfit with white heels and accessorized with dangling earrings.”
“Vanessa had her black hair parted down the middle and accentuated her natural beauty with smoky eye makeup.”
“The former Disney Channel star has been promoting the romantic comedy Second Act also starring Jennifer Lopez, 49.”
“She told Late Night host Seth Meyers, 44, that she's been a fan of Jennifer for a longtime and constantly watched her 2001 romantic comedy The Wedding Planner on repeat.”
“Thick coat: The 29-year-old actress kept warm with a thick white fur coatPrint fan: The Spring Breakers star shared her print on print outfit Tuesday on Instagram'It was crazy.”
“It was really cool,' Vanessa said of working with Jennifer.”


“… Her extraordinary body... "
“… The fluffy jacket keeps her warm in the cold air to make sure she stands out. Vanessa's appearance on TV is full of make-up. The incompetent star tucks the edge of the cream shirt into her pants to make her have a look... "
"The 29 year old actress wore a thick white fur coat to protect herself from the cold outside the NBC studio."
"Vanessa is wearing a floral Giambattista Valli top and printed pants from an Italian fashion designer."
"Movie promotion: Vanessa Hudgens and Seth Meyers she promoted her new film late at night outside NBC studios in New York on Tuesday, wearing white high heels and dangling earrings to complete her costume."
"Vanessa's black hair is separated from the middle, and her smoky eye makeup highlights her natural beauty."
The former Disney Channel star has been promoting the romantic comedy act two, starring 49 year old Jennifer Lopez
"She told Seth Meyers, the 44 year old late night host, that she had long been a fan of Jennifer and was replaying the 2001 romantic comedy" wedding planner. "
"Thick coat: the 29 year old actress warms herself with a thick white fur coat fan: the Spring Festival Gala star shared her print on the print on instagram on Tuesday, saying 'it's crazy.'"
"That's really cool," Vanessa said of working with Jennifer



Number  1224
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Today, the social media star visited the City of Lights for Virgil Abloh's inaugural show for Louis Vuitton.”
“The designer is a close friend and collaborator of Kim's husband, Kanye West.”
“The last time Kim was in Paris was also for fashion week.”
“TMZ reports that the Wests were "surrounded by their muscle," so they likely took extra precautions with security this time around.”
“Even behind the big men in suits, Kim could be spotted from a mile away in a bright electric blue wrap coat featuring a waist tie and utilitarian pockets with her go-to biker shorts.”
“Kardashian noted on Twitter that she wore Abloh's collection to the presentation.”
“Getty ImagesHer husband, on the other hand, went with his signature athleisure-inspired look with a printed long sleeve tee that reads messages like "There is only one freedom," "I am loving," and "Awareness."”
“Kim's youngest sister Kylie Jenner was also present, wearing a similar bright ensemble.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Today, the social media star visited the city of light for Virgil Ablow's first performance for Louis Vuitton."
"The designer is a close friend and collaborator of Kim Jong Il's husband Kanye West."
"Kim was last in Paris for fashion week, too."
TMZ reports that the West family are "surrounded by their muscles," so they may have taken extra security measures this time
"Even behind the big man in the suit, people can see Kim a mile away in a bright electric blue jacket with a tie around her waist and her go cycling shorts in her pocket."
"Kardashian tweeted that she was wearing the collection of abloh at the press conference."
Getty Images her's husband, on the other hand, wore a printed long sleeve T-shirt with the words "only one freedom", "I love you" and "consciousness" printed on it, inspired by his iconic sportswear style
"Kim's sister Kylie Jenner was also present, wearing a similar bright colored suit."



Number  1225
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mark Wahlberg Says It 'Didn't Take Much' to Donate 'All the Money in the World' Reshoot Salary (Exclusive)Michelle Williams Reacts to Mark Wahlberg's Time's Up Donation After 'All the Money in the World' ControversyRelated Gallery...”
““I’m trying to find new ways to get my kids interested in science, technology, engineering, things like that.”
“The actor, who is working to stay in shape for his upcoming project, Six Billion Dollar Man, reveals on The Ellen DeGeneres Show Wednesday who would like him to put a top on.”
““My daughters get very annoyed by the pictures.”
“Very annoyed,” the 46-year-old says.”
““I get ‘Dad, put a shirt on’ all the time.”
“Even when I have a shirt on!”
“If I have one shirt, they say put another shirt on.”Though his daughters may find their father embarrassing at times, his anti-dad bod does occasionally come in handy.”
““They don’t like it when I scare the boyfriend and then all of the sudden they’re like, ‘Dad, can you come see me at school?’ because they want me to come and scare the boyfriend,” Wahlberg quips.”
“With four children, Wahlberg is thrilled with any affection they throw his way.”


"Mark Warburg says it doesn't cost much to donate" all the money in the world "to make a paycheck (exclusive) Michelle Williams responds to the donation of mark Warburg era after the controversy over" all the money in the world "
"I'm trying to find new ways to make my kids interested in science, technology, engineering and so on."
"The actor is trying to keep fit for the upcoming $6 billion man, and he revealed on Wednesday's Ellen DeGeneres Show who wants him to wear a top."
"My daughters are mad at these pictures."
"Very angry," the 46 year old said
"Dad, I always wear a shirt."
"Even if I'm wearing a shirt!"
"If I had a shirt, they would say to wear another one." Although his daughters sometimes find his father embarrassing, his anti dad BOD comes in handy occasionally
"They didn't like me scaring my boyfriend, and then they suddenly thought," Dad, can you come to school to see me? "Because they want me to scare my boyfriend," Warburg quipped
"With four children, Walberg was excited by any emotion they threw at him."



Number  1226
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The MCU Phase 3 capper will hit theaters on May 3, 2019.”
“Then she upgraded it to the iconic red/yellow/blue!!!!”
“Larson was photographed recently while filming the upcoming movie in Atlanta and she was outfitted in black and green.”
“For those who are out of the loop, there is a reason why Captain Marvel is in this costume.”
“While it looks weird for some, it is actually not a deviation from the comics.”
“Savvy comic book readers will recognize that the color scheme matches the old costume by the original Captain Marvel, aka Mar-Vell, before he switched it out for a red and blue one.”
“According to reports, Carol Danvers herself donned a similar suit before she upgraded it to the most recognizable gear.”
“Don’t forget the first Kree uniform!”
“MY HEART ITS HAPPENING #CaptainMarvel pic.twitter.com/zJLq78wnd6 — Captain Marvel NewsIt remains to be seen how Danvers gets the suit in the film.”
“Whether or not Larson will debut as the character in this May 4's "Avengers: Infinity War" is unclear, but she is definitely joining the squad in the upcoming "Avengers 4."”


"MCU phase 3 capper will be released on May 3, 2019."
"Then she upgraded it to the iconic red / yellow / blue!!"
"Larson was recently filmed in Atlanta shooting an upcoming movie. She was dressed in black and green."
"For those who are not in the circle, Captain Marvel is wearing this dress for a reason."
"It may seem strange to some people, but it's not really a departure from the comics."
"Astute comic readers will realize that the color scheme matches the old costume, from the original Captain Marvel, also known as malville, before he changes it into red and blue."
"It's reported that Carol Danvers himself wore a similar suit and then upgraded it to the most famous equipment."
"Don't forget the first clay uniform!"
"What happened to my heart?" the captain was surprised pic.twitter.com/zJLq78wnd6 -Captain Marvel: we'll see how Danvers got the suit in the film
"It's not clear whether Larson will play that role in Avengers: Infinite War on May 4, but she will definitely be in the lineup for the upcoming Avengers 4."



Number  1227
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Vergara is pictured without her wedding ring was taken in Los Angeles on April 15 after she returned from Rome and appears on page 34 of the magazine said the insider...”
“RELATED VIDEO Sofia Vergara Reveals Why She Didn t Want to Date Joe Manganiello According to an AMI spokesperson Vergara incorrectly claimed the that Star removed her wedding ring from a photograph on its cover that was taken during that award night in Rome Instead the photograph in which Ms...”
“Do the world a favor and don’t buy their garbage,” he captioned his post.”
“They are run by malicious trash.”
““Big surprise everyone but Star created a fake story and then photo shopped my wife’s engagement ring off of her finger in order to sell magazines.”
“By the way…thats my friend the producer of the movie Bent that I was shooting in Rome and who came to spend Easter at my home the week later.”Manganiello even had his say in it, advising his followers to not buy the magazine.”
““If he is going to have my ring removed to created a “fake” “news” he should have made sure that he removed from social media all the other pictures of that award night in Rome where Im wearing it.”
““The editor of this magazine is an idiot,” she wrote on Instagram with a laughing emoji.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After a magazine published that the marriage between the Modern Family actress and her husband has ended because of an alleged affair, the couple took to social media to shut down the rumors and slam the editor.”


"The photo of figara without a wedding ring was taken in Los Angeles after returning from Rome on April 15 and appeared on page 34 of the magazine. The person familiar with the matter said
"The video shows Sophia Vera why she didn't want to date Joe mangenello. According to AMI spokesperson Vera, the star mistakenly claimed that she had taken her wedding ring from a picture on the cover, which was taken on prize night in Rome, not in the photo
"Do the world a favor and don't buy their trash," he wrote in his post
"They are managed by malicious garbage."
"It's amazing that everyone except the star made up a fake story and took my wife's engagement ring off her finger in the photo shop to sell magazines."
"By the way That's my friend, the producer of my film "bent" in Rome, who came to my house for Easter a week later Magniello even has his say in it, advising his followers not to buy the magazine
"If he's going to take out my ring and create a 'fake news', he should make sure that all other photos of me wearing the ring on the night of the awards in Rome are removed from social media."
"The editor of this magazine is an idiot," she wrote on instagram with a smile
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After a magazine published that the marriage between the heroine of modern family and her husband ended because of a so-called extramarital affair, the couple shut down rumors on social media and attacked the editor."



Number  1228
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He teased, "I took that case on and it was one of the most extraordinarily difficult cases I've ever been faced with and you've gotta see what happens."”
“Dubrow was especially happy to help a bikini model whose butt was "destroyed" from illegal silicone injections.”
“Dr. Terry Dubrow once credited Kim Kardashian's famous derriere for inspiring the Brazilian butt lift craze, a "dangerous" procedure he now says has thankfully lost popularity.”
“Speaking to TooFab alongside Dr. Paul Nassif ahead of the Season 5 premiere of "Botched," Dubrow used the booty to illustrate just one of the many things that have changed since their show first debuted on E!”
“...in 2014.”
“"In my practice, very few people want the big buttocks now.”
“For a long time it was the big reality show buttock," he said of how his clients' demands have shifted over time.”
“"Now we have discovered in the international plastic surgery community that buttock augmentation with fat is turning out to be extraordinarily dangerous.”
“In fact it's the most dangerous procedure you could have with a really significant morbidity and fatality rate," he continued.”
“"Thank god, not many people are going for the big butt these days."”


"I took that case," he joked. "It's one of the most difficult cases I've ever had. You have to see what happens."
Dubro was particularly happy to help a bikini model whose buttocks were "destroyed" by an illegal silicone injection
Dr. Terry dubro, who once praised Kim Kardashian's famous derriere for sparking Brazil's hip lift, now says the "dangerous" operation has thankfully lost popularity
Dubro, together with Dr. Paul nasif, told tufab before the premiere of "bad" Season 5 that the trophy was just the first time their show had been shown in E! "
“…… 2014. "
"In my practice, few people want a big butt these days."
"For a long time, it was a big reality show hip," he said, noting how his clients' demands shifted over time
"Now we have found in the international plastic surgery field that hip augmentation with fat is very dangerous."
"In fact, this is the most dangerous procedure, and you can have a really significant incidence rate and mortality rate," he continued.
"Thank goodness, not many people like big ass these days."



Number  1229
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for more information and don’t miss the premiere of the movie tomorrow night!”
“AdvertisementHer latest movie, A Bundle of Trouble: An Aurora Teagarden Mystery will make its debut Sunday night at 9/8c so catch it on Hallmark Movies & Mysteries.”
“News that no more babies are on the way, but she has baby Tommy on Fuller House, and she also worked with the two infants.”
“She said that right now she has baby fever and “the shop is closed.” She told E!”
“The theme of the TV event got everyone wondering whether Candace is considering expanding her own family with another baby and her answer to this question is quite surprising.”
“The plot thickens as his niece disappears and the child remains behind.”
“The TV event’s Aurora who is played by Candace and her boyfriend Martin played by Yannick Bisson receive an unexpected visit from his niece and her baby.”
“Her newest movie which is called A Bundle of Trouble: An Aurora Teagarden Mystery also premieres this Sunday.”
“...finish it we will have a chat She only has two more episodes to see and she may need a little more time to conclude season one...”
“I was a parent that got the e mail from my kid s high school saying this show is out there and be sure to have a conversation with your kids if they chose to watch it Candace also stated that They did watch it so as soon as I”


"Stay tuned for more information and don't miss the premiere tomorrow night!"
"Advertising her latest movie, a bunch of trouble: an aurora tea garden mystery will debut Sunday night at 9 / 8 degrees Celsius, so grab it for the holmark movie and mystery."
"There's news that no more children are on the way, but she has children. Tommy is at Fuller's and she works with two babies."
Now she has a baby fever and "the store is closed," she said She told e! "
"The theme of the TV event made everyone wonder if Candice was thinking about expanding her family with another child, and her answer to that question was quite surprising."
"His niece disappeared, the children stayed, and the plot became more and more complicated."
"The TV show Aurora, played by Candace, and her boyfriend Martin, played by Janice bison, unexpectedly welcomed her niece and her children."
"Her latest movie, a bunch of troubles: the mystery of Aurora tea garden, will also premiere on Sunday."
“… To finish it, we will have a chat. She has only two more episodes to watch. She may need a little more time to finish the first season... "
"I'm a parent. I received an email from my child's high school saying that the show is outside. If your child chooses to watch it, be sure to talk to them. Candice also said that they did watch it, so as soon as I see it."



Number  1230
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple officially ended their marriage in July 2010.”
“They tied the knot in 1996 and filed for divorce in 2007 before reconciling shortly after.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“We have very separate relationships with our kids at this point and it seems to work better that way Sean Penn said Sean Penn Says He and Ex Robin Wright Don t Share the Same Ethical Views on Parenting Sean Penn is opening up about his relationship with his ex...”
“...wife Robin Wright...”
“The duo, who divorced in 2010 and share two children — Dylan, 26, and Hopper, 24 — “don’t have a lot of conversation,” Penn told comedian Marc Maron on his WTF Podcast.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We don’t not get along,” he added.”
““We have very separate relationships with our kids at this point and it seems to work better that way because they are making their own decisions.”
“As it turned out she and I did not share the same ethical views on parenting, including the continuing parenting of adult children.”Image zoom (L-R) Dylan Penn, Sean Penn and Hopper Penn.”


"In July 2010, the couple officially ended their marriage."
"They got married in 1996, filed for divorce in 2007, and soon got back together."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"At this point, our relationship with children is very different, Sean Pan said. Sean Pan said that he and former Robin Wright have different moral values in parenting. Sean pan disclosed his relationship with his ex boyfriend, which seems to be more effective."
“… His wife, Robin Wright... "
"They divorced in 2010 and had two children - Dylan, 26, and hopper, 24 -" not much conversation, "Penn told comedian mark Malone on a WTF podcast
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We don't get along well," he added
"At this point, our relationship with our children is very separate, which seems to work better because they are making their own decisions."
"It turns out that she and I have different ethical views on parenting, including the continuing parenting of adult children."



Number  1231
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  1232
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GT Photography/ Instagram/gtphotography_17Thompson is selling the calendars on Etsy for $29.99 and you can check out more of her photography here.”
“From New Year’s Eve tiaras to a sexy back-to-school shoot, no seasonal stone was left unturned.”
“After the unexpected success of the viral photos, Thompson is now giving us a full calendar featuring her husband’s holiday looks.”
“Photographer Gayla Thompson asked her husband Ryan to participate in the fall photoshoot earlier this year, and was shocked to discover he was such a great model.”
“Well, he’s back and ready to give us a seasonal look for every month of the year.”
“Pumpkin Dudeoir Hottie Is Back With A Full Calendar Of Pin-Up PosesRemember the bearded bro who blessed us by laying nearly naked in a field of pumpkins last month?”
“The bearded beauty is serving looks for all seasons.”


"GT photography / instagram / gtphotography17 Thompson sells her calendar for $29.99 on Etsy. You can see more of her photos here."
"From New Year's Eve headdress to sexy back to school shooting, there is no seasonal stone that can not be put away."
"After the unexpected success of the virus photo, Thompson now gives us a complete calendar with her husband on holiday."
"Photographer Gayla Thompson invited her husband, Ryan, to take part in autumn photography earlier this year and was shocked to find that he was such an excellent model."
"Well, he's back, ready to give us seasonal dresses for every month of the year."
"Pumpkin playboy, spice girl is back, with a whole set of wall charts. Do you remember the bearded brother who lay almost naked in the pumpkin field last month blessing us
"Beautiful women with beards are suitable for all seasons."



Number  1233
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sunday May 1”
“The blonde beauty was quick to dismiss Brendan's input about the vegetablesToward the end of the clip the groom-to-be fought back saying, 'I’m tired of my opinions being walked all over.'”
“In a sneak peek of the show's fourth season premiere which was released on Thursday, the 27-year-old exclaimed, 'He doesn’t understand that I am the bride!”
“This is my wedding!'”
“The bride-to-be appeared visibly annoyed and snippy with her fiancé Brendan Fitzpatrick, 26, during a meeting with their wedding planner.”
“Scroll down for videoBridezilla: Morgan Stewart ranted, 'He doesn’t understand that I am the bride!”
“Seen in an exclusive sneak peek of the new season of Rich Kids of Beverly HillsIn the two minute video Morgan and Brendan get into a heated discussion as they struggle to plan their big day.”
“One of the many areas of contention: the menu.”
“In the clip the engaged couple argue over beets and carrots and whether or not they should be served at their nuptials.”


"Sunday, May 1st"
"The blonde quickly refutes Brendan's views on vegetables, and at the end of the film refutes the groom's words," I'm tired of my opinions being spread around. "
"He doesn't understand that I'm the bride," the 27 year old actor exclaimed at the show's fourth season premiere on Thursday
"This is my wedding!"
"In a meeting with the wedding planner of Brendan Fitzpatrick, the 26 year old fiance, the bride to be was clearly annoyed and snickering."
Scroll down to see the video: Morgan Stewart growls, "he doesn't understand I'm the bride!"
"In the exclusive peek of the new season of rich kids, Morgan and Brandon have a heated discussion in the two minute video because they are trying to plan their big day."
"One of the many areas of debate: the menu."
"In this video, the engaged couple quarrels over beets and carrots and whether they should be enjoyed at the wedding."



Number  1234
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Anyway, check out Thor: Ragnarok on Netflix now.”
“Well, when Netflix streams an MCU movie, Disney, which owns Marvel, only gets a cut of the money, since the company licensed the film rights to a third party.”
“The latest Avengers and Ant-Man and the Wasp will be the last Marvel movies to stream on Netflix.”
“Starting with Captain Marvel, MCU films will instead be viewable on Disney’s upcoming streaming service.”
“The news came as part of a story from the New York Times on the still-untitled streaming service.”
““Starting with Captain Marvel in March, all of the films that Walt Disney Studios releases in theaters will subsequently flow to the Disney streaming platform instead of to Netflix,” the Times reported.”
“Disney’s streaming service is expected to launch late next year.”
“Why is Marvel doing this?”
“But by taking all its toys back and putting them on its own streaming service exclusively, Disney gets all of the subscription money that fans will pay because it’ll be the only way to stream Avengers 4 or literally any other Disney movie.”
“That’s just the start.”


"Anyway, let's take a look at Netflix Thor:Ragnarok 。”
"Well, when Netflix plays a MCU movie, Disney, which owns Marvel comics, gets only one cent, because the company grants the movie rights to a third party."
"The latest Avengers, ant man and hornet will be the last surprise movies to be shown on Netflix."
"Starting with Captain miracle, MCU movies will replace Disney's upcoming streaming service."
"This news is part of the New York Times report on the still untitled streaming service."
"Starting with" Captain miracle "in March, all Disney movies released in theaters will then flow to Disney's streaming platform instead of Netflix," the Times reported
"Disney's streaming service is expected to be launched by the end of next year."
"Why did Marvel do that?"
"But by taking back all the toys and putting them on its own streaming service, Disney gets all the subscription fees that fans will pay because it will be the only way to stream vengeance 4 or other Disney movies."
"It's just the beginning."



Number  1235
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nikki also paid special tribute to her niece on social media.”
“Brie, who welcomed her baby girl with husband Daniel Bryan on Tuesday, also gushed about her daughter on Instagram.”
“And Miss Birdie here, she will one day here soon say hi to all of you, but she's sleeping right now, so we don't want to wake her," she added.”
“"So, thank you for all your love and support.”
“But at the end of something so hard and long, the most precious gift in the world came to us, so we couldn't be happier."”
“"It was a very crazy process and a very long labor, and I'm so lucky I had Bryan by my side the whole time and my sister, who's filming this right now, by my side the whole time, which was amazing.”
“"We finally wanted to say thank you for all your support, your prayers and all your cute, little messages about Birdie finally coming in," said Brie, as she held baby Birdie Joe Danielson in the hospital room.”
“The Total Divas star thanked fans for their support in a message posted to her and sister Nikki Bella's YouTube page on Friday.”
“Brie Bella couldn't be happier to finally meet her baby girl.”


"Nicky also paid special tribute to his niece on social media."
"Bree welcomed her baby girl with her husband Daniel Bryan on Tuesday, and she also talked about her daughter on instagram."
"Miss birdie, one day she'll be here to say hello to all of you, but she's sleeping now, so we don't want to wake her up," she added
"So, thank you for your love and support."
"But at the end of such a difficult and long time, the most precious gift in the world came to us, so we couldn't be happier."
"It's a very crazy process, it's also a very long process, and I'm very lucky that Brian has been with me all the time. My sister, she's making this film now, and she's always with me. It's great."
"We finally want to say thank you, thank you for your support, your prayers, and your lovely little message about the bird finally coming," Bree said in the ward, holding the bird in his arms
"In a message posted to her and her sister nikibala's YouTube page on Friday, the general manager thanks her fans for their support."
"At last I saw her baby girl, and bulibera was very happy."



Number  1236
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Find out next week when the Pretty Little Liars two-hour series finale airs Tuesday, June 27 at 8/7c on Freeform.”
“Who is A.D.?”
“It turns out that Mona (Janel Parrish) was the one who pushed Charlotte out of the bell tower the night that Charlotte was released from the mental hospital.”
“Mona saw through Charlotte's alleged redemption and knew that the former A was itching to get back to torturing people again.”
“Mona wasn't about to be another pawn in the game, so she confronted her nemesis.”
“The two got into a fight and Mona pushed Charlotte into the steel pipe that killed her by accident.”
“Mona threw the body out of the bell tower and has been hiding from A.D. ever since.”
“Superlatives Here's what you may have missed this week!”
“TV Guide's weekend editor breaks down the week's best, worst, and weirdest TV moments.”
“By signing up, you agree to our Terms of Use and acknowledge the data practices in our Privacy Policy .”


"Learn about the finale of the two-hour series of" the beautiful little liar "on Freeform next Tuesday, June 27, 8 / 7C."
"Who is A.D
"It turns out that Mona (Janel Parrish) pushes Charlotte out of the clock tower the night she is released from the mental hospital."
"Mona saw through Charlotte's so-called atonement and knew that her former aunt wanted to go back to torture people."
"Mona didn't want to be another pawn in the game, so she faced up to her nemesis."
"They quarreled. Mona pushed Charlotte into the steel pipe and accidentally killed her."
"Mona threw the body out of the clock tower and has been hiding from A.D. ever since."
"You may have missed the best part of the week!"
The weekend editor of TV guide classified the best, worst and Weirdest TV moments of the week
"By registering, you agree to our terms of use and acknowledge the data practices in our privacy policy."



Number  1237
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Tamar Braxton Opens Up About 'Living a Lie' During Marriage to Vince HerbertTamar Braxton Files for Divorce From Husband Vincent Herbert'Tamar & Vince': Tamar Breaks Down After Receiving 'Worst News Ever' About Vince...”
“Hear more on what led to Braxton and Herbert's shocking split in the video below.”
“Amid her divorce from Vincent Herbert, the 40-year-old singer deleted her Instagram account on Wednesday after going off on a woman claiming to be pregnant with her ex's baby.”
“The Braxton Family Values star shared a lengthy story to the social media platform on Saturday, claiming that a woman -- who many believe to be Basketball Wives: L.A. star Laura Govan -- told her she was expecting a child with Herbert.”
“Govan and Herbert have both denied the rumors, according to E!”
“News.”
“"Vincent Herbert is having a baby and his whore decided to let me know about it tonight!!"”
“...the message, which was deleted shortly after Braxton posted it, read.”
“"That stupid broke a** whore should check public records on Christmas before she goes through with it!!”
“He called back (despite of his protection order) begging and lying... like he's hanging out with Joe and Rocxi (from BET) oh yeah... that's credible... no shade."”


"Related content: Tamar Braxton" lives in lies "during her public marriage to Vince Tamar Braxton filed for divorce from her husband Vincent Herbert" Tamar and Vince ": Tamar collapsed after receiving Vince's" worst news ever... ""
"Please learn more about the reasons for Braxton's amazing breakup with Herbert in the video below."
During her divorce from Vincent Herbert, the 40 year old singer deleted her instagram account on Wednesday after having sex with a woman who claimed to be pregnant with an ex-wife's child
"The Braxton family values star shared a long story on the social media platform on Saturday, claiming that a woman - many people think she is basketball wife: Los Angeles star Laura Govan - told her that she was pregnant with Herbert."
"Both govin and Herbert denied the rumor, according to e!"
"News."
"Vincent Herbert is going to have a baby, and his bitch decided to tell me about it tonight!"
“…… The message was deleted shortly after Braxton's release, as follows
"That tattered bitch should check the public records before Christmas!"
"He called back (despite his protection order) begging and lying... It's like he's with Joe and Roxie. Oh, yeah... It's credible... There is no shadow. “”



Number  1238
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Relive Coachella 2018 with our photos from the festival.”
“Passes and more will be available via www.coachella.com.”
“The festival is also offering a new upgrade for car camping.”
“So when is Coachella 2019?”
“The festival happens April 12-14 and April 19-21 at the Empire Polo Club in Indio.”
“As it has done in recent years, promoter Goldenvoice will put a limited number of passes on sale early.”
“This year you can get Coachella 2019 passes for Weekend 1 and Weekend 2 starting at 11 a.m. Pacific Friday, June 1.”
“General admission passes are $429 for the weekend and go up to $504 for the inclusion of a shuttle pass.”
“A VIP pass is $999 and preferred parking (formerly known as VIP parking) is $150.”
“Sign up for our Festival Pass newsletter .”


"Revisit cochella 2018 with our festival photos."
"We will pass www.coachella.com 。”
"The festival also provides a new upgrade for car camping."
"So when is kocera in 2019?"
"The festival will be held on April 12-14 and April 19-21 at the imperial Polo Club in India."
"As has been done in recent years, the sponsor, golden voice, will roll out a limited number of passes ahead of time."
"This year, you will be able to get the permits for weekend 1 and 2 of kocera 2019 from 11 a.m. on Friday, June 1."
"The ordinary admission ticket is 429 yuan at the weekend, plus the ticket to work, the maximum can be increased to 504 yuan."
"The VIP pass is 999 yuan, and the priority parking space (formerly called VIP parking space) is 150 yuan."
"Register our holiday pass newsletter."



Number  1239
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Viewers have been particularly invested in Kufrin's happily ever after ever since she was subjected to the on-camera breakup, and on Tuesday, she revealed that she does in fact find love at the end of her journey, which wrapped filming weeks ago.”
“Because of how things ended, I think our relationship is stronger and I wouldn't change it."”
“On Wednesday, the pair said neither of them has watched the finale to this day.”
“Think pieces and takedowns ran in the week that followed and as Kufrin accepted her new role as the next star of The Bachelorette, Luyendyk and Burnham largely disappeared from the spotlight, choosing to keep viewers updated on their relationship via their social media channels.”
“The choices made by Luyendyk and producers to ambush Kufrin, and by ABC to air the breakup footage, sent backlash Luyendyk's way and turned off some fans of the franchise.”
“At the end of the day, it's a TV show but this is the rest of our lives, and Lauren was the person I was supposed to be with."”
“"Going back to that time, it was a big risk to do what I did and I know that it wasn't a popular decision," Luyendyk explained, "but it was a decision I had to make for myself.”
“He then turned around and proposed a second time on live television to Burnham, who accepted.”
“After a two-month engagement, Luyendyk called off his relationship with Kufrin during a difficult-to-watch on-camera breakup that played out unedited and ran for nearly an hour.”
“After he proposed to an accepting Becca Kufrin on the pretaped March 5 episode, it was revealed on the post-finale After the Final Rose special that Luyendyk had changed his mind.”


"Since kufulin was filmed breaking up, the audience has been particularly devoted to her happy forever. On Tuesday, she revealed that in fact, she did find love in the journey that ended filming a few weeks ago."
"Because of the outcome, I think our relationship is stronger and I will not change it."
"On Wednesday, they said neither of them had seen the ending so far."
"In the following week, as kuflin accepted her new role and became the next star of bachelor, luyendyk and Burnham basically disappeared from the spotlight, and they chose to let the audience know their latest relationship through social media channels."
"Luyendyk and the producer chose to ambush kufrin and ABC broadcast the breakup scenes, which made luyendyk have a strong response and made some fans of franchise stores flinch."
"At the end of the day, it's a TV show, but it's the rest of our lives and Lauren is the one I should be with."
"Back then, it was a big risk to do what I did, and I knew it wasn't a popular decision," luyandick explained, "but it was a decision I had to make for myself."
"Then he turned around and asked him to marry him a second time on live TV, and he accepted."
"After two months of dating, luyandick canceled his relationship with kuflin and broke up in a hard to watch scene, which lasted nearly an hour without editing."
"After he proposed to Becca Coughlin in the trailer on March 5, luyandick revealed in the finale after the final episode of the rose special that he had changed his mind."



Number  1240
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Scarlett Johansson 'Excited' as She Makes Red Carpet Debut With Boyfriend Colin Jost (Exclusive)Chris Evans and Scarlett Johansson Talk Romance and 'Running Rogue' in 'Avengers: Infinity War' (Exclusive)Ava DuVernay and Scarlett Johansson Among First Independent Spirit Awards Presenters (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“She’s my little buddy, love her.”Johannson adds that her daughter is more interested in princesses than her mom's Avengers character, Black Widow.”
“The 33-year-old Avengers: Infinity War actress opens up on Tuesday’s episode of The Ellen DeGeneres Show about her boyfriend, Colin Jost.”
““I guess I’m a Colin fan, I’d have to say,” she teases when DeGeneres asks her which of the “Weekend Update” hosts, Jost or Michael Che, she prefers on Saturday Night Live.”
“DeGeneres then shares a throwback photo of Jost, 35, with writer John Mulaney back when the SNL star had scruffy hair and a beard.”
““I can’t unsee it now.”
“Oh no!” a wide-eyed Johansson exclaims.”
““Have I just broken y’all up?” DeGeneres quips.”
““I can’t say that that’s an image I’ll ever forget,” Johansson admits.”
“The action star also opens up about her 3-year-old daughter, Rose, saying, “It’s true, [motherhood] gets better every day.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Scarlett Johnson's "excited" appearance on the red carpet with her boyfriends Colin Jost (exclusive) Chris Evans and Scarlett Johansen talks about romance and 'running hooligans' in the' Avenger: Infinite War '(exclusive) EVA duvinai and Scarlett Johansen's first independent spirit award ceremony (exclusive) related gallery... "
"She's my little friend, and I love her." Johnson added that her daughter was more interested in the role of the princess than her mother's avenger, the black widow
"33 year old Avenger: Infinite War actress will unveil her boyfriend Colin Jost on Tuesday's Ellen DeGeneres Show."
"I think I'm a fan of Colin, and I have to say," she quipped when DeGeneres asked her if the host of "weekend update" was Jost or Michael Che. She preferred to live on Saturday night
DeGeneres then shared with writer John Mulani a retro photo of 35 year old Jost, who had shaggy hair and a beard
"I can't see now."
"Oh, no! "Exclaimed a wide eyed Johnson
"Did I break you all?"? "Joked DeGeneres."
"I can't say it's an image I'll never forget," Johnson admitted
The action star also revealed the story of her three-year-old daughter rose, who said: "it's true that [motherhood] is getting better every day."



Number  1241
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to Radar, Lind’s next court hearing is schedule for December 21 at 9 a.m.”
“The pair welcomed son Watson in January 2017.”
“Houska moved on from Lind with DeBoe in August 2015.”
“Teen Mom 2 just wrapped its eighth season, and included a storyline where Houska wanted to change Aubree’s name to include her husband Cole DeBoer’s last name.”
“Lind first appeared on MTV during the second season of 16 & Pregnant when Houska was pregnant with Aubree in 2010.”
“During the August 7 episode of Teen Mom 2, it was revealed Lind tested positive for methamphetamines.”
“He was arrested several times for driving under the influence and driving without a license.”
“The reality star, who shares 8-year-old daughter Aubree with Houska, and 4-year-old daughter Paislee with ex-girlfriend Taylor Halbur, has had other run-ins with the law prior to this.”
“Lind was arrested last month and his ex-girlfriend, Stasia Huber, filed and received an order of protection against him.”
““His bail was dropped because he agreed to show up at court for his next hearing,” the clerk reportedly explained to the publication.”


"According to radar, Linde's next trial is scheduled for 9 a.m. on December 21."
"The two met their son Watson in January 2017."
"Hoska and Debbie moved from Linde in August 2015."
"Teen Mom 2" has just finished its eighth season, and there is a plot in which hosca wants to change Aubrey's name to her husband Cole de Boer's
"Linde first appeared on MTV in the second quarter of the 16-year-old season, when hosca was pregnant with Aubrey in 2010."
"In" teenage Mom 2 "on August 7, Linde tested positive for methamphetamine."
"He was arrested several times for drunk driving and driving without a license."
"The reality star has eight year old daughter Aubry with hoska and four year old daughter Paisley with her ex girlfriend Taylor halber. Before that, she had other conflicts with the law."
"Linde was arrested last month, and his ex girlfriend stasia Huber submitted and received a protection order against him."
"His bail was withdrawn because he agreed to appear in the next trial," the clerk explained to the media, according to reports



Number  1242
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Officials are reviewing the play.”
“Here's a replay:9:56 p.m.: Eagles score possible touchdownEagles tight end Zach Ertz completes a pass, but there's discussion whether he had control in the end zone.”
“Their "Next Man Up" mentality when injuries arose was inspiring to anyone who has ever faced a setback, as was their willingness to embrace the role of underdogs.”
“They consistently wowed us with their dynamic play and relentless pursuit of victory.”
“The 2017-18 Philadelphia Eagles are Super Bowl Champions, and they've brought tremendous joy to hundreds of thousands throughout the City and region.”
“...we ve dreamed of...”
“FlyEaglesFly SBLII pic twitter com rJ3F075x9P NFL NFL February 5 2018 Sunday February 4 11 20 p m Philadelphia Mayor Jim Kenney releases statement about Eagles victory For so many who have called themselves Eagles fans for a generation this is the day the game the season and the team...”
“An emotional Jason Kelce reflects on his journey in becoming a @SuperBowl champion.”
“...the world to me...”
“...https t co oKESarSedm CBS Philly CBSPhilly February 5 2018 12 13 a m NFL tweets a video of Super Bowl LII highlights 12 04 a m Eagles center Jason Kelce gets emotional I ve officially accomplished the best thing in this sport with a group of guys that mean...”


"Officials are reviewing the play."
"Here's a replay: 9 PM: 56:00: hawks score, maybe touchdown. Hawks press tuzac eltz to finish the pass, but whether he controls the end zone is still under discussion."
"When injured, their" next man "mentality inspires anyone who has ever faced setbacks, and so is their willingness to accept the role of the weak."
"We've been amazed by their energy and their relentless pursuit of victory."
"In the 2017-18 season, the Philadelphia Eagles are Super Bowl Champions, and they have brought great joy to hundreds of thousands of people in the whole city and region."
“… We dream of... "
"Flyeaglessfly sblii pic twitter com rj3f075x9p NFL NFL on Sunday, February 5, 2018, at 11:20 on February 4, Fei City Mayor Jim Kenney issued a statement to tell so many people who call themselves a generation of eagles fans about the eagles' victory. This day is the day of the game, the season and the team..."
"Jason kelce looks back on his career as a Super Bowl champion with emotion."
“… My world... "
“… HTTPS t co Ke sarsedm CBS Philly cbspilly on February 5, 2018 and December 13, 2018, the NFL released a video of Super Bowl LII on twitter, focusing on the excitement of Jason kelce, the 1204 a m Eagles center. I officially completed the best thing in the sport. A group of people mean... "



Number  1243
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Very sweet.””
““They’re a great couple,” an insider previously told Us.”
“Famous pals including Jake Gyllenhaal, Sienna Miller and Colin Firth attended the pair’s nuptials.”
“The Walker star and the Mumford & Sons frontman were previously childhood pen pals before their friendship turned romantic in 2011.”
“...at people on your behalf telling them to hurry the hell up because you have a nursing mother here Mulligan and her musician hubby 30 tied the knot in a stunning April 2012 wedding ceremony in Somerset England...”
“Doing press and doing it with a tiny baby timing has been very important and babies do what they want which is a challenge She added But it s really helpful when you have Meryl Streep backstage at events shouting...”
“News.”
““The last couple of weeks have been pretty stressful,” the Suffrage star said at the Elle’s Women in Hollywood event in October 2015, per E!”
“Mulligan opened up about first-time motherhood weeks after giving birth.”
““They have been loving being parents and their friends and family are thrilled,” a source told Us at the time.”


"It's sweet."
"They are a very good couple," an insider told us earlier
Famous friends including Jack Gyllenhaal, Sienna Miller and Colin Firth attended their wedding
"The walker stars and the leaders of Mumford and son were childhood pen pals until their friendship became romantic in 2011."
“… On behalf of your people, tell them to hurry up, because you have a lactating mother here, Mulligan married her musician husband on the 30th, at an amazing British wedding in Somerset in April 2012... "
She added: "it's very important to do the media and do these things when the baby is born, it's a challenge for the baby to do what they want to do, but it really helps when Meryl Streep yells backstage at the event..."
"News."
In October 2015, general election star Perry said at Elle's women in Hollywood: "there has been a lot of pressure in the past few weeks."! "
"Mulligan made public his first motherhood a few weeks after giving birth."
A source told us at the time: "they have always enjoyed being parents, and their friends and family are very excited."



Number  1244
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Hopefully she is getting the help she needs.””
“He did not know how many times Locklear struck him.”
“The source was strong enough to force Deputy Alldredge’s leg out of the doorway.”“Sergeant Camou asked Locklear to exit the bedroom several times before she complied,” Hall added in the documents.”
“Heather attempted to push Deputy Alldredge out of the doorway, and screamed, ‘Get the f— out of my house!’ She battered Deputy Alldredge by kicking him in his shin in an attempt to get his foot out of the doorway.”
“Deputy Alldredge put his foot in the doorway to prevent her from closing it, and to continue the investigation.”
“He called her behavior “agitated and uncooperative,” writing that, “Locklear grabbed Deputy Alldredge by the bicep and pulled on it while ordering him to get out of the house.”Hall continued: “Locklear walked to her bedroom and began to close the door.”
“...wrote...”
“Locklear bit his face and described Locklear as being all over him for the last 20 30 minutes acting crazy angry and wild Image zoom Heather Locklear and Chris Heisser Credit Heather Locklear Instagram During the course of the investigation Locklear exhibited combative belligerent and aggressive behavior toward deputies Hall...”
““[Heisser] told Deputy Alldredge that in the bedroom, Locklear attacked [Heisser] while he was on the bed and he defended himself.”
““Everyone hopes she gets well, that she gets better.”“Addiction is obviously a strong disease and as much as friends and family who love her and want her to get better and be happy, no one can do the work for her,” added the friend.”


"I hope she gets the help she needs."
"He didn't know how many times Locklear hit him."
"The source was strong enough to force Deputy Sergeant Aldrich's leg out of the door." "Sergeant camor asked Locklear to leave the bedroom several times before she agreed," Hall added in the document
Heather tried to push Deputy Aldrich out of the door and screamed, "get f-out of my house! "She kicked Deputy Aldrich in the calf and tried to kick his foot out of the door."
"Deputy sheriff Aldrich put his foot on the door to stop her from closing it and continue the investigation."
He called her behavior "excited and uncooperative," and wrote, "lockrier grabs Deputy Sergeant Aldrich's biceps, pulls it, and orders him to leave the house." Hall went on: "Locklear went to her bedroom and began to close the door."
“… Write... "
"Rockhill bit his face and described Rockhill as crazy, angry and wild in the past 20-30 minutes. Heather Rockhill and Chris Heather praised Heather Rockhill instagram during the investigation. Rockhill showed aggressive and aggressive behavior towards the assembly hall..."
"(Heather) tells Deputy sergeant alderger that in his bedroom, lockrier attacked Heather while he was lying in bed, and he defended himself."
"Everyone wants her to get better. She'll get better." "Addiction is obviously a very serious disease, just like loving her friends and family and hoping her to be better and happy, no one can do these jobs for her," the friend added



Number  1245
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My family, my son, and my husband, those are the things that keep me grounded and centered, and there’s no better feeling than coming back and seeing him smile after a long day.””
““Motherhood, oh my gosh, it’s one of the best jobs in life,” she concluded.”
“To mark the first year of happily wedded bliss, the Grammy-winning singer took to the heavens (really!)”
“...to profess her love for the NFL player on Thursday, July 6.”
“The sweet gesture was planned while the two enjoyed a romantic getaway this week in Mexico.”
“Ciara, 31, posted a photo of a custom banner waving above the sea, and wrote on Instagram: “Happy 1 Year Baby.”
“Yay!”
“I [heart] you.”
“I’m Grateful to God for the Love he has given me, by putting you in my life.”
“I have all that I need.”


"My family, my son, and my husband are all things that make me down-to-earth and malicious. There is no better feeling than to come back and see him smile after a long day."
"Being a mother, my God, is one of the best jobs in life," she concluded
The Grammy award-winning singer went to heaven (really!) to celebrate her first year of happiness
“… On Thursday, July 6, she expressed her love to the NFL player
"This sweet move was planned when they were on a romantic trip to Mexico this week."
Sheila, 31, posted a picture of a custom banner waving on the sea and wrote on instagram: "happy 1-year-old."
"Yes
"I love you with my heart."
"I thank God for the love he has given me and for putting you in my life."
"I have everything I need."



Number  1246
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Members of the Kardashian family have yet to publicly comment on the cheating scandal.”
“Us Weekly confirmed on Friday, April 13, that the basketball pro has been unfaithful with multiple women since at least November.”
“...to a hotel with another woman...”
“Even though 9 months feels like a lifetime while I m awaiting the arrival of my baby girl it s really a blink in the grand scheme of life Two days before Kardashian and Thompson welcomed baby True footage emerged of the Cleveland Cavaliers star appearing to kiss and go...”
““Being pregnant has always been a dream of mine,” she tweeted back in March.”
“Mommy and Daddy loooooove you True!”The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star has opened up in the past about her desire to start a family.”
““Such a blessing to welcome this angel into the family!”
““Our little girl, True Thompson, has completely stolen our hearts and we are overwhelmed with LOVE,” Kardashian captioned a photo of pink decorations on Monday, April 16.”
“Four days later, the Revenge Body host announced her daughter’s name and revealed her baby girl weighed 6 pounds, 13 ounces at birth.”
“Weekly previously reported Kardashian gave birth to her first child with Tristan Thompson at a hospital in Cleveland on April 12”


"Members of the Kardashian family have yet to comment publicly on the fraud scandal."
The professional basketball player has been unfaithful to a number of women since at least November last year, US weekly confirmed Friday, April 13
“… Go to a hotel with another woman... "
"Although nine months feels like a lifetime, and I'm waiting for my baby daughter to arrive, two days before Kardashian and Thompson greet their baby, it's really a moment in their life plan. The real scene of Cleveland Cavaliers stars is kissing and leaving..."
"Pregnancy has always been my dream," she wrote on her micro blog in March
"Mom and dad really love you! "Keeping in touch with Kardashian stars has made her wish for a family public in the past."
"That's great. Welcome this angel to our family!"
On Monday, April 16, Kardashian wrote in a pink decorated photo: "our little girl, real Thompson, completely stole our hearts. We were overwhelmed by love."
"Four days later, vengeful body announced her daughter's name and revealed that her baby girl weighed 6 pounds 13 ounces at birth."
"Weekly previously reported that Kardashian gave birth to her first child with Tristan Thompson at a Cleveland hospital on April 12."



Number  1247
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No paralysis, do analysis!’ Like how did he make Thriller like this?”“We took a picture and we signed the basic deal for Fresh Prince and three months later we were shooting the pilot and that’s the story of how I became the Prince of Bel Air,” Smith recalled.”
“I had motorcycles and cars.”
“'”Smith continued, “The IRS took all that stuff, so I was like, broke, broke, broke.”
“In my mind, I wasn’t trying to avoid taxes, I was just like ‘Ah, damn, they need their money.”
“I had spent all my money and I didn’t forget but I didn’t pay the IRS.”
““It was a tragedy, it went, like, double plastic.”
“Smith said...”
“I called the Gucci store in Atlanta and I was like Hey will y all close it down if I bring my friends And I m smiling but that s stupid Image zoom Will Smith Credit Jim Spellman WireImage We released our next album and it was like a flop...”
“We made a bunch of money, we won a Grammy, album was triple platinum.”
“...told him to hang out and try to meet with other creators in Hollywood in an attempt to turn his career around...”


"Don't be paralyzed, do analysis! "For example, how did he make such a thriller? "We took a picture, signed the basic agreement for the new prince, and three months later we photographed the pilot, and that's how I became the prince of bell airlines," Smith recalled
"I have motorcycles and cars."
"Smith went on," the IRS took everything, so I was like, bankrupt, bankrupt, bankrupt. "
"In my opinion, I'm not trying to evade taxes. I'm just thinking, 'Oh, damn it, they need their money.'
"I spent all my money. I didn't forget it, but I didn't pay the IRS."
"It's a tragedy, like double plastic."
"Smith said..."
"I called the Gucci store in Atlanta, and I thought if I brought my friends, everyone would shut it down. I laughed, but it was stupid image zooming Will Smith credit Jim Spelman wireless image. We released our next album, and it was like a failure..."
"We made a lot of money, we won Grammy Awards, and the album won three Platinum medals."
“…… Tell him to go out for a walk, try to meet other Hollywood creators, try to turn his career around... "



Number  1248
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I think we live in a post-Hamilton world where we don’t even need to think about what’s authentic to the character, like faithful to the character.””
“The actress also spoke candidly about her vocal support of Dylan Farrow, who has repeatedly claimed that her father, Woody Allen, sexually abused her as a child.”
“In a wide ranging interview with BuzzFeed the Oscar winning actress who has been heavily involved with the Time s Up initiative that combats sexual harassment in workplaces across industries acknowledged a 2009 petition she signed in support of Roman Polanski the European filmmaker who was convicted of raping a...”
“13 year old girl in 1977”
“The petition sprung up after Polanski was arrested in Switzerland and faced possible extradition to the United States.”
“In the interview, Portman says she regrets the decision and didn’t think it through enough before she signed it.”
““I very much regret it,” she said.”
““I take responsibility for not thinking about it enough.”
“Someone I respected gave it to me, and said, ‘I signed this.”
“Will you too?’ And I was like, sure.”


"I think we live in a post Hamiltonian era, and we don't even need to think about real characters, such as being faithful to characters."
"The actress also spoke candidly about her support for Dylan Farrow, who repeatedly claimed that her father Woody Allen sexually abused her as a child."
"In an extensive interview with buzzfeed, the Oscar winning actress acknowledged a petition she signed in 2009 in support of Roman Polanski. Polanski, a European filmmaker, was convicted of raping a woman
"The 13-year-old girl of 1977"
"After Polanski was arrested in Switzerland and faced possible extradition to the United States, the petition came out."
"In the interview, Portman said she regretted the decision and did not fully consider it before signing it."
"I'm very sorry," she said
"I'm not responsible enough to think about myself."
"The person I respect gave it to me and said," I signed this. "
"Will you, too? "I thought, of course."



Number  1249
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GETTY Critics' Choice Awards: Angelina stood out with her dark red lipstickGETTY Critics' Choice Awards: Angelina attended the event with Activist Loung Ung...”
“...carpet...”
“...for sending you newsletters...”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“The 42-year-old actress posed confidently on the red carpet wearing the figure-hugging bardot ensemble which she paired with silver velvet heels and elegant earrings.”
“The Hollywood star wore her brunette hair down with some pinned back, giving onlookers a full view of her multiple back tattoos.”
“The natural beauty kept her base make-up minimal but stood out with her dark red lipstick which she matched with her nail polish.”
“The Salt actress seemed in high spirits at the event, who she attended with Activist Loung Ung, despite her film First They Killed My Father missing out on the award for Best Foreign Language film, which lost to In The Fade.”
“GETTY Critics Choice Awards 2018 Angelina Jolie stunned in a white feather dress GETTY Critics Choice Awards Angelina posed confidently in the figure hugging bardot ensemble Critics Choice Awards 2018 Best and worst dressed Fri January 12 2018 Critics Choice Awards 2018 The best and worst dressed from the red...”
“Play slideshow Getty 1 of 38 Critics' Choice Awards 2018Angelina was seen mingling with fellow actors, sharing a hug with Best Young Performer winner Brooklyn Prince, seven, and later consuming snacks at her table.”


"Getty film critics' Choice Award: Angelina is the winner of the Getty film critics' Choice Award with her crimson Lipstick: Angelina and talent shows itself."
“… Carpet... "
“… Send you a press release... "
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"The 42 year old actress posed confidently on the red carpet in a tight Bardot suit with silver velvet heels and elegant earrings."
"The Hollywood star spread her black hair and pinned some pins at the back, so that onlookers could see the full picture of her multiple back tattoos."
"Natural beauty minimized her basic makeup, but she highlighted it with her crimson lipstick painted with nail polish."
"The salt star seemed to be in high spirits during the event. She attended the event together with long ang, a rights activist. Although her film" the first time they killed my father "missed the best foreign language film award, she lost to fading magazine."
"Kitty criticcs Choice Awards 2018 Angelina Jolie in a white feather dress surprised Kitty criticcs Choice Awards Angelina confidently poses to embrace Bardot ensemble Critics Choice Award 2018 best and worst dress Friday, January 12, 2018 Critics Choice Award 2018 best and worst dress comes from red..."
"In the 38 film critic awards in 2018, Angelina was with other actors, hugging 7-year-old best young actor winner Brooklyn prince, and then eating snacks at the table."



Number  1250
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She kept his identity secret at first on RHOA, telling PEOPLE he “didn’t sign up for this world,” but has since opened up about their life together.”
“Moore and Daly met in 2016 and began dating after a few months.”
“Before sharing her whereabouts, Moore teased her adventure with this photo of a hotel living room with the caption, “Where in the world am I?” The space was decorated with yellow and red balloons and a cake for the guest of honor.”
“WATCH THIS: Kenya Moore Shares Why She Kept Her New Husband’s Identity Secret, Says She Wants Kids ‘Right Away’“Thank you for the most amazing birthday gift of my life!” she wrote.”
“Home to the Great Sphinx, King Khufu’s tomb and the Great Pyramid, the site was a must for the two tourists.”
““I’ve long romanticized about visiting this historically rich country — and with my husband.”The former Miss USA and businessman Daly stopped for their sweet photo op while sightseeing in the Giza Plateau, near Cairo.”
““Never in a million years did I think I’d actually visit #Egypt,” the reality star said in a photo of the couple on Instagram.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“To celebrate turning 47, the Real Housewives of Atlanta cast member and her husband Marc Daly — whom she married in a private ceremony on the beach in St. Lucia in June — jetted off on a vacation that has topped Moore’s bucket list for years.”
“The reality star and her new husband celebrated her birthday with a bucket list tripRHOA's Kenya Moore on the 'Most Amazing' Birthday Trip in Egypt with Husband Marc DalyKenya Moore is on the birthday trip of a lifetime.”


"She initially kept his identity secret at RhoA, telling people that he" didn't sign up for the world, "but later disclosed their lives together
"Moore and Daley met in 2016 and started dating a few months later."
Before sharing his whereabouts, Moore joked about his adventure with this photo of the hotel living room titled "where on earth am I? "The space is decorated with yellow and red balloons and a cake for the VIP."
"Look at this: Kenya Moore shared why she kept her new husband's identity secret and said she wanted to have a baby right away." "Thank you for giving me the best birthday present of my life! "She wrote
"This is the site of the Great Sphinx, the mausoleum of King Khufu and the great pyramid. It is a must pass for these two tourists."
"I've been romantically thinking about this rich country with a long history - with my husband." The former Miss America and businessman Daley stopped to enjoy their sweet group photo while touring the Giza Plateau near Cairo
"In a million years, I never thought I would really visit Egypt," the reality star said in a photo of the couple on instagram
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
To celebrate her 47th birthday, the Atlanta housewife crew and her husband, Marc Daly, held a private wedding on the beach of Saint Lucia in June. They went on a vacation by plane, Moore's favorite vacation for many years
"The reality TV star and her new husband celebrated her birthday with a bucket list. Triprhoa's Kenya Moore and her husband Marc dalykenya Moore had a" most wonderful "birthday trip in Egypt. It was a lifetime trip."



Number  1251
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A rep for Martinez pointed CNN to the singer’s statement on Twitter and said there was no additional comment at this time.”
“She did not specify when the alleged incident took place.”
“Story highlights Heller tweeted her story Martinez issued a denial(CNN) —A former contestant from “The Voice” is denying a rape accusation made by another female singer.”
“Melanie Martinez, who appeared on the third season of “The Voice” in 2012, posted a statement on Twitter Tuesday in which she denied an allegation from a female friend who accused her of sexual assault.”
“Martinez said in the statement that she was “horrified and saddened by the statements and story told tonight by Timothy Heller [her female friend].”“What she and I shared was a close friendship for a period of time,” the statement read.”
““We came into each other’s lives as we were both starting our careers as artists, and we tried to help each other.”But, according to Heller, things took a dark turn.”
“The former member of the band Dresses shared a lengthy story on social media on Monday in which she said accepting that my best friend raped me seems insane Heller wrote that Martinez pressured her to have sex despite Heller s insistence she had a boyfriend convinced her to smoke...”
“...marijuana then allegedly forcefully performed oral sex and used a sex toy on her...”
““I never said yes.”
““And although we parted ways, I am sending her love and light always.”CNN has reached out to both Heller and Martinez for additional comment.”


"A Martinez representative pointed to CNN's Twitter statement and said there were no other comments at the moment."
"She did not specify when the alleged incident occurred."
"Story highlights Heller tweeted her story and Martinez issued a denial statement (CNN) - a former contestant of the voice denied another female singer's rape charges."
Melanie Martinez, who appeared on voice in the third season of 2012, issued a statement on twitter on Tuesday denying a female friend's accusation of sexual assault
"Martinez said in a statement that she was" shocked and saddened by Timothy Heller's statement and story tonight. " "What she shared with me was a period of close friendship," the statement said
"When we all started our careers as artists, we started each other's lives, and we tried to help each other." But, according to Heller, there's been a dark shift
"Former band member dresses shared a long story on social media on Monday, saying that it seemed crazy for me to accept my best friend's rape. Heller wrote that despite Heller's insistence that she had a boyfriend to persuade her to smoke, Martinez forced her to have sex..."
“…… It is said that marijuana later forced oral sex and used sex toys against her.... "
"I never said yes."
"Although we parted ways, I was always sending her love and light." CNN has contacted Heller and Martinez for more comments



Number  1252
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Figure skater and America's sweetheart Adam Rippon also attended the gala with his boyfriend, Jussi-Pekka Kajaala, making it their big official red carpet debut.”
“Getty ImagesKajaala is from Finland and is a real estate broker and is just an extremely attractive human being, really.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The two started talking in October after Kajaala slid into Rippon's Tinder DM's with a smooth pickup line.”
“Kajaala asked Rippon, "Are you here for business or are you here just to meet me?"”
“Clearly it worked because the two have been dating for a few months now.”
“This is their first red carpet appearance together, but Kajaala has graced Rippon's Instagram feed multiple times.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Figure skater and American sweetheart Adam Rippon also attended the event with her boyfriend, Jessi Pekka kajaala. It was their debut on the red carpet."
"Getty Images kajaala, a real estate agent from Finland, is a very attractive person, really."
This content was imported from {embedded name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"The two started talking in October, when kajalala successfully entered the tinder DM store in Lippen."
Kajara asked Ripon, "are you here on business or to pick me up?"
"Obviously, it works because they've been dating for months."
"It's their first red carpet appearance together, but kajara has added color to Rippon's instagram feed many times."



Number  1253
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe the question then would have been: Could America have taken six more weeks of Harding?”
“Norman was getting better and better.”
“And she cried, as she has each week.”
“It was quite telling after her individual dance Monday that judge Carrie Ann Inaba said to her “We’re all in your corner.”Harding later said “Thank you, America,” for the support.”
“The attack on Nancy Kerrigan and the subsequent revelation of how much she knew were never really mentioned.”
“The way Harding was promoted coming into the season as a figure skating legend, it was clear the producers were riding her story and the controversy off the movie about her life.”
“Which brings us to Tonya Harding, who has made next week’s three-person finale along with Washington Redskins defensive back Josh Norman.”
“Despite consistent performances, she never seemed to gain favor with the fans, her Valley girl persona perhaps becoming a bit grating.”
“...fellow 2018 Olympic figure skater Mirai Nagasu...”
“They have the best partnership of the season More Dancing with the Stars now part of Adam Rippon s fun whirlwind life More Harding rolls on but Rippon Nagasu still rule Dancing with the Stars The only one who could technically catch him was surprisingly sent home close friend and...”


"Maybe the question is: can America spend another six weeks?"
"Norman is getting better and better."
"She cried, like every week."
On Monday, judge Carrie Ann daoyeguigen said to her after the private ball, "we are all in your corner." Harding later said, "thank you, America, for your support."
"The attack on Nancy Kerrigan and what she knew afterwards were never really mentioned."
"Harding's publicity as a figure skating legend has entered this season. It's obvious that the producers are taking advantage of her story and the controversy about her life in the film."
"That brings us to Tonya Harding, who, together with Washington Redskins guard Josh Norman, completes next week's three man final
"Despite her consistent performance, it seems that she has never been favored by the fans and her image as a valley girl may become a bit harsh."
“… Miley NAGase, figure skater of the 2018 Olympic Games... "
"They have the best partners of the season. More dancing with stars is now part of Adam Rippon's fun whirlwind life. More Harding continues, but Rippon NAGase still dominates dancing with stars. The only person who can catch him technically is his close friends and friends who are unexpectedly sent home..."



Number  1254
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: The Best Places to Buy Comfy Bras Online That Actually Fit...”
“With this guide, managing irregular bra cup sizes (yes, even for sports bras) should be a breeze, and sore, achy breasts from ill-fitting bras will be a thing of the past.”
“Bra size shouldn’t be a guessing game.”
“Best of all, knowing how to measure your bust will make adjusting to changes in your breasts (from losing or gaining weight, hormone fluctuations, aging, pregnancy, and more) so much less stressful.”
“All you need is a tape measure and a little free time, and you’ll have saved yourself a lot of bra-shopping misery.”
“Equipment is minimal.”
“...much easier especially for online shoppers...”
“Learning how to measure bra size can feel uncomfortable but knowing your measurements and keeping them written in a note on your phone or somewhere else that s accessible when the bra shopping mood strikes will make bra shopping so...”
“The best option is to know your bra size by taking bust measurements using these simple measuring instructions, which will ensure a perfect fit in band and in cup—and can even help you find the right amount of support.”
“...day or between washings...”


"Related: the best place to buy a really comfortable bra online..."
"With this guide, it should be easy to manage irregular bra cup sizes (yes, even sports bras), and breast soreness caused by unsuitable bras will be a thing of the past."
"Bra size should not be a guessing game."
"Most importantly, knowing how to measure your chest circumference will greatly reduce the stress of adapting to changes in your breasts (from weight loss or gain, hormonal fluctuations, aging, pregnancy, etc.)
"All you need is a tape measure and a little free time, so you don't have to buy a lot of bras."
"There are very few devices."
“… Especially for online shoppers... "
"It's uncomfortable to learn how to measure the size of a bra, but knowing your size and writing it on your mobile phone or other place where you can use it when your bra shopping mood hits will make your bra shopping so..."
"The best choice is to use these simple measurement instructions to measure your bra size, which will ensure that the bra fits perfectly with the cup and even help you find the right amount of support."
“… During the day or between washing and gargling... "



Number  1255
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click here for a Q&A with Schur — and here for another preview with the cast.”
“They had been living in something that was completely untrue just like their characters As she sums up I wanted to see everyone s unique ability to digest this betrayal Image zoom Credit Entertainment Weekly Allen Berezovsky WireImage Adds Danson It was just so satisfying you could see them process...”
“It was as good as you think it is because they were really stunned.”
““I really thought it was going to win me a hundred thousand dollars, their big jackpot prize.”
““I thought it was going to be my first submission to America’s Funniest Home Videos, the best television show ever to grace the planet,” she says.”
“And, well, maybe for other reasons.”
“...for posterity...”
“It was a creative issue and that made me feel better about the decision When he finally did gather the full cast which also includes pleasant know it all human Alexa named Janet D Arcy Carden to clue them in before filming the finale Bell decided to record the moment...”
“...and I decided it wasn t really an ethical issue...”
“I sort of rolled the dice on the idea that they wouldn t hate me if I didn t tell them until later In a show about ethics and morality I did stop and check in with myself every once in a while like What is the ethics of this...”


"Click here for Q & A with Shure, and then click here for another preview with the crew."
"They've been living in a totally unreal environment, just like their characters, and as she summed it up, I want to see that everyone has a unique ability to digest this picture of betrayal. Zoom credit Entertainment Weekly Allen Berezovsky WireImage added, Danson, it's so satisfying that you can see their process..."
"It's as good as you think, because they're really stunned."
"I really thought I could win 100000 yuan, their first prize."
"I thought it would be my first time to take part in the funniest home video in America, the best TV show ever to beautify the earth," she said
"Well, there may be other reasons."
"For future generations"
"It was a creative question, which made me feel better when he finally collected all the actors, including the delightfully familiar human Aleksa named Janet D. asikaden, prompting them in the last episode before filming bell decided to record this moment..."
“… I decided it wasn't really a moral issue... "
"I think that if I don't tell them, they won't hate me until later, in a program about morality and morality, I stopped and asked myself every once in a while, what kind of morality is this..."



Number  1256
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I want it to be the pair of underpants he recorded ‘Love Yourself’ in.”Watch the latest rendition of Carpool Karaoke in the video above.”
““I don’t want it to be a pair of underpants that he just wore on Tuesday,” Corden said.”
“There are conditions, obviously.”
“The “Youth” singer said he would definitely buy the Bieb’s underwear for $500 if it went up for auction.”
“...underwear...”
“It s what keeps me young I feel like On a completely different topic Mendes and Corden played ice hockey together Corden trying his hardest to be goalie is a sight to see and talked about Justin Bieber s dirty...”
““I just love it so much,” he said.”
“He then appeared in full Gryffindor robes with a wand in hand, followed by another costume change into Dumbledore.”
“As he started explaining his passion for all the “magic,” “wands and little weird candies that make you turn into like a lion,” a lightning bolt scar appeared on his forehead, then a pair of round, black glasses.”
““I have a whole book at home that I wrote all the spells in and stuff,” he said.”


"I hope it's a pair of underwear from his" love yourself. " Please see the latest interpretation of carpool karaoke in the above video
"I don't want it to be a pair of underwear he just wore on Tuesday," Colden said
"Obviously, there are conditions."
The "young" singer said that if the underwear was auctioned, he would definitely buy it for $500
“… Underwear... "
"That's what keeps me young. I feel that on a completely different topic, Mendes and Corden play ice hockey together, and Corden tries to be a goalkeeper. It's a sight to see, talking about Justin Bieber's filth..."
"I love it so much," he said
"And then he was in Gryffindor's robe, with a wand in his hand, and then he was in Dumbledore's costume."
"When he began to explain his passion for all magic, wands and strange little candy that could turn you into a lion, a lightning scar appeared on his forehead, followed by a pair of black round glasses."
"I have a whole book at home with all the incantations and things like that," he said



Number  1257
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He was taken into custody again in January 2017 for allegedly attacking a man outside a New York City protest against President Donald Trump.”
“The truth is, in my desperation, I lost the plot.”Prior to the incident in Georgia, the Transformers actor was arrested on similar charges in June 2014 after he disrupted a performance of the Broadway revival of Cabaret.”
“Most of my life.”
“I’ve been falling forward for a long time.”
“I need to take ownership of my s–t and clean up my side of the street a bit before I can go out there and work again, so I’m trying to stay creative and learn from my mistakes.”
“They’re a struggling motherf–ker showing his ass in front of the world.”He continued, “I’ve got to look at my failures in the face for a while.”
“They’re not strategic.”
““My public outbursts are failures.”
““I’m a buffoon,” LaBeouf told Esquire.”
“Footage of the incident was later released online, showing him calling the police officers “bitch” and “whore,” in addition to bragging about his “millionaire lawyers.” Later that month, he apologized in a statement posted on social media and was sent to a court-ordered rehab for 10 weeks.”


"In January 2017, he was detained again on suspicion of attacking a man outside a protest against President Donald Trump in New York City."
"The fact is, in my desperation, I lost the plot." The incident in Georgia comes after the transformers actor was arrested in June 2014 on similar charges for disturbing a Broadway Renaissance Song and dance show
"Most of my life."
"I've been falling forward for a long time."
"I need to have my technology and clean my streets before I can go out to work, so I try to be creative and learn from my mistakes."
"They're a struggling bitch, showing her ass in front of the world," he continued. "I have to face up to my failure for a while."
"They are not strategic."
"My public outburst was a failure."
"I'm a clown," Labov told the gentleman
"The video of the incident was later released on the Internet, showing that in addition to bragging about his" millionaire lawyer ", he also called the police" whores "and" prostitutes ". Later in the month, he apologized in a statement on social media and was sent to court for 10 weeks



Number  1258
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She is pictured last month during Taylor Swift's Reputation Tour...”
“Matthew, who is a dating guru and has appeared on the Today Show as the resident love expert, recently revealed he's ready to start a family.”
“And things appear to be serious between Camila Cabello, 21, and her British beau Matthew Hussey, 31, as the couple stepped out with the singer's mom Sinuhe Estrabao on Tuesday.”
“The duo coordinated in casual khaki green outfits as they strolled around the Venice Beach neighborhood of Los Angeles.”
“Getting serious: Camila Cabello is pictured out in Venice Beach on Tuesday with boyfriend Matthew HusseyThe former Fifth Harmony member sported a camouflage print T-shirt and sweatpants and wrapped a plaid shirt around her waist.”
“The Havana hitmaker finished her off-duty look with some trendy small sunglasses.”
“Her Essex-born beau wore a green T-shirt tucked into navy Nike shorts and covered his head with a baseball cap.”
“The trio stopped for some smoothies and juice as they enjoyed some fresh air in the beach-side neighborhood.”
“Friendly with the family: The 21-year-old singer's mom Sinuhe Estrabao was seen out with the pair'When the time is right I would love to [start a family] and my mum wants me to as well,' the relationship expert told Australian magazine New Idea in July.”
“Songstress: It's just been announced that Camila will be performing at the American Music Awards on October 9.”


"She was photographed last month on Taylor Swift's reputation tour..."
"Matthew is a dating guru who appeared as a resident love expert on today's show and recently revealed that he is ready to start a family."
"The affair between 21-year-old Camilla Cabello and 31 year old British boyfriend Matthew Hussain seems serious because the couple went out with the singer's mother, sinuhe estrabo, on Tuesday."
"Wearing casual khaki green, they strolled around Venice Beach in Los Angeles."
"Take it seriously: Camilla Cabello posed with her boyfriend Matthew Hussey on Venice Beach on Tuesday, a former fifth harmony member wearing a camouflage printed T-shirt and sweatpants and a plaid shirt around her waist."
"The thugs in Havana finished her off-duty look with some fashionable little sunglasses."
"Her Essex born boyfriend was wearing a green T-shirt, Navy Nike shorts and a baseball cap."
"When they were enjoying the fresh air in the seaside community, they stopped to drink some smoothies and juice."
"Get along with your family: sinuhe estrabao, the 21-year-old singer's mother, was seen going out with them." when the time is right, I really want to (form a family), and my mother wants me to do the same, "the relationship expert said in an interview with new ideas magazine in Australia in July
"Female Singer: just announced that Camilla will perform at the American Music Awards on October 9."



Number  1259
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Just surround yourself with positivity and not let the negativity get to you."”
“"It's about being confident in your self [sic], and not letting people's hateful words get to you," she said.”
“The INSIDER Summary:19-year-old actress Ariel Winter often responds to online bullies who shame her body and outfits over social media.”
“Sarah Hyland told People that she and her "Modern Family" co-stars have helped Winter become body-confident.”
“"I tried to be a good role model for her, and a true older sister for her," she said.”
“Hyland also shared how she stays confident despite her own set of body-shamers.”
“Ariel Winter routinely shuts down online bullies who shame her for wearing "revealing" outfits and accuse her of Photoshopping her pictures to appear slimmer.”
“However, the "Modern Family" actress wasn't always so confident.”
“Sarah Hyland, who plays Winter's older sister on the popular TV show, recently opened up to People about how she mentored Winter when they first met.”
“"I mean, she was 11 years old when I met her.”


"Just be positive and don't let the negative affect you."
"It's about having faith in yourself (SIC) and not letting other people's hateful words affect you," she said
"Insider summary: Ariel winter, a 19-year-old actress, often responds to online bullies who humiliate her body and clothes through social media
Sarah Helan told people that her co stars with her modern family helped winter become confident
"I try to be a good example for her and a real sister for her," she said
"Helan also shared how she maintained her self-confidence despite her own set of physical humiliations."
"Ariel winter routinely shut down online bullies, who humiliate her in 'revealing' clothes and accuse her of taking pictures of herself to look slimmer."
"However, the" modern family "actress is not always so confident."
"Sarah Hyland, who plays winter's sister on popular TV shows, recently opened her heart to people about how she mentored them when winter first met."
"I mean, she was 11 when I met her."



Number  1260
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— Khloé, on how True always lifts her spirits...”
“It's just, it's beautiful."”
“It's just the best, and the love that you get and that you also get to give and receive ...”
“I could do this.'”
“I was like, 'Okay, I feel like I can do anything.”
“And just when you see your baby, and how happy [she is], you just get through it.”
“I mean, Christmas Day, I was so hungover and I was like, 'How am I gonna get through this day?'”
“"My favorite part about being a mom, I mean it's so corny, but it's just like, no matter how tired you are, it's complete bliss, no matter what.”


"Heloe, telling the truth always cheers her up..."
"It's just, it's beautiful."
"It's the best, you get the love, you get the give and take..."
"I can do it."
"I thought," well, I think I can do anything. "
"When you see your child and see how happy she is, you survive."
"I mean, on Christmas day, I had a hangover and I thought, 'how do I get through this day?'"
"Being a mom is my favorite part, I mean it's too old-fashioned, but it's like, no matter how tired you are, no matter what happens, it's a complete happiness."



**Something goes wrong**
“EXCLUSIVE: Watch Sophie Turner's Emotional Audition for 'X-Men: Apocalypse'”
“I just completely gave everything to [playing Sansa Stark], all of my emotions.”
“The Game of Thrones star openes up about her romance with the Jonas Brother in the new issue of Marie Claire, revealing that, at times, the media attention surrounding her relationship can be too much to handle.”
“RELATED: Sophie Turner Talks Dating Joe Jonas: 'I Found It Easier to Date Someone Who Understands the Industry'"You do feel like you're living in a fishbowl," Turner shares.”
“"It's frustrating [that] it's the most mundane things that make the news -- how boring!"”
“And though Turner and Jonas have been dating long enough to earn their own ship name, "Jophie," Turner still prefers another one: "Mophie," the fan name for her and Game of Thrones co-star Maisie Williams.”
“"What's that thing they say?”
“Relationships come and go but friendship is always there," she explains.”
“Marie Claire UK/ David RoemerIt's no surprise that Turner and Williams have become such good friends.”
“The actresses have spent nearly half their lives playing Sansa and Arya Stark, respectively.”


Exclusive: watching Sophie Turner's emotional audition for X-Men: Apocalypse
"I just gave it all (to play Sasha Stark), all the emotions."
The star of "game of Thrones" has revealed her love affair with Jonas Brothers in the new issue of "Mary Claire". She revealed that the media attention to her love affair sometimes makes it difficult to deal with
"Related report: Sophie Turner said about dating Joe Jonas:" I find it easier to date people who know the industry. "" you really feel like you live in a fish tank, "Turner shared
"It's depressing that it's the most mundane thing that makes the news - how boring!"
"Although Turner and Jonas have been dating for a long time and have their own ship name" joffy ", Turner prefers another name:" Murphy ", the fan name of Macy Williams, who co stars with" game of Thrones. "
"What do they say?"
"Emotions come and go, but friendship always exists," she explains
"It's not surprising that Mary Claire UK / David romarettner and Williams have become such good friends."
"The actresses spent nearly half their time playing Sansa and Arya stark, respectively."



Number  1262
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“One final note: while the Porgs are indeed adorable, that's something they grow into, as you can see when looking at them as infants.”
“There's no word yet on if that one will become a permanent resident aboard the Millennium Falcon.”
“Wookie...”
“Located on Ahch To which is also the home of the Caretakers Porgs will be hanging around while Luke Skywalker is training Rey but at least one of them will separate from the pack to hang around with our favorite...”
“While Porgs won't be the only fascinating creatures introduced to the Star Wars mythos, they do join the Ewoks as one of the most adorable critters in this franchise.”
“But Chewbacca's dismissal of the Porg who's joined him on the Millennium Falcom is unquestionably the highlight.”
“...greeting someone possibly Finn with a sinister So good to have you back...”
“This latest Star Wars The Last Jedi TV spot includes a sprinkling of other moments like Luke Skywalker stepping back onto the Millennium Falcon after who knows how long Finn driving a speeder during the Crait battle and Captain Phasma...”


One last word: Although pigs are really cute, that's why they grow up. When you see them as babies, you will find that
"There's no word yet on whether this person will become a permanent resident on the Millennium Falcon."
Wookiee
"In aher, also the caretaker's home, when Luke Skywalker trains ray, Boggs will hang out there, but at least one will be separated from our favorite."
"While porgs are not the only fascinating creature to be introduced into the Star Wars myth, they do join Ewok as one of the most adorable animals in the series."
"But chubaka fired Borg, who was riding with him on the Millennium Falcon, which is undoubtedly a bright spot."
“… Say hello to someone who might be Finnish. I'm glad you're back... "
"The last scene of the latest Star Wars and Jedi TV series includes some other scenes, such as how long Luke Skywalker sailed the airship in the battle of Crete and then stepped on the Falcon, while Finn and captain fasma..."



Number  1263
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“...jackandwood September 4 2017 This clip from Zayn Malik s new video is pretty cool pic twitter com UYKNY2k3Rv Grundy GrundyOxford September 4 2017 RIP ZAYN LONG HAIR pic twitter com h4MT75O23O Zayn Squad Brasil ZaynSquadBrasil September 3 2017 Zayn looks beautiful no matter his choice of hairstyle or the...”
“Zayn Malik debuted a bold new look when he posed for a selfie with his mom, Trisha, and girlfriend Gigi Hadid on Sunday, September 3.”
“In the photo that Zayn’s mother shared on her Instagram account, the 24-year-old former One Direction singer smirks alongside the gorgeous model as Trisha kisses her son’s smooth, bald dome.”
“She captioned the post simply with three heart emojis.”
“While this isn’t the first time Malik has changed up the style of his formerly luscious locks, this is the first time he’s gone hair-free, and fans are losing their minds on Twitter, even comparing the crooner to other notable bald characters.”
“See some of the best reactions below!”
“Just had to add @zaynmalik ‘s freshly shaven head to the list of things that are brighter then my future #ZAYN pic.twitter.com/W8RPPxOQmX — Jack Wood ?”
“...lack of it...”
“The short teaser features the singer behind the wheel of a speeding car, a mysterious woman with a brief case, and what appears to be the lighting of some dynamite.”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
“… Jackandwood September 4, 2017 zayn Malik's new video clip is very cool picture twitter com uykny2k3rv Grundy grundyoxford September 4, 2017 rip zayn long hair picture twitter com h4mt75o23o zayn square Brasil zayn squadbasil September 3, 2017 zayn looks beautiful, no matter what hairstyle he chooses or... "
On Sunday, September 3, Zane Malik showed a bold new look for the first time when taking a selfie with his Mother Teresa and girlfriend Gigi Hadid
"In a photo shared by Zahn's mother on instagram, Teresa, a 24-year-old former one-way singer, smiles side by side with her beautiful model as she kisses her son's smooth bald dome."
"She simply added a title to the post with three heart-shaped symbols."
"It's not the first time that Malik has changed his sweet hair, but it's the first time that he's lost his hair. Fans lost their minds on Twitter and even compared the minstrel to other famous bald people."
"Here are some of the best responses!"
"Just add @ zaynmalik's newly shaved hair to the list of things brighter than my future# ZAYNpic.twitter.com/W8RPPxOQmX -Jack wood
“… Missing it... "
"The main characters of this short play are a singer sitting behind the wheels of a speeding car, a mysterious woman with a suitcase, and a thing that looks like it ignites explosives."



Number  1264
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was serving nine life sentences in California’s Corcoran State Prison at the time of his death.”
“Image zoom Hilary Duff (left) dressed as Sharon Tate (right) for the film The Haunting of Sharon Tate | Credit: Hilary Duff/Instagram; Michael Ochs Archives/GettyShe says the dream is false.”
“...late actress who was viciously murdered in 1969”
“Duff, 30, is set to star in The Haunting of Sharon Tate and shared a photo of herself dressed similarly to the actress on Instagram, writing, “Had the incredible opportunity of playing Sharon Tate the past two weeks in an independent movie.”
“She was an amazing woman and it was a true honor.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Debra tells PEOPLE she thinks “it’s classless” and “exploitative.”“It doesn’t matter who it is acting in it – it’s just tasteless,” Debra says.”
“It s classless how everyone is rushing to release something for the 50th anniversary of this horrific event Debra who was 16 when her sister was murdered by Charles Manson s cult followers also commented on what she believed was the premise of the film A scene in which her...”
“...sister has a premonition that she and former boyfriend and hairstylist Jay Sebring would have their throats slit an eerie similarity to how their actual deaths occurred...”
““I know for a fact she did not have a premonition — awake or in a dream — that she and Jay would have their throat cut,” she says.”
“Manson died in November at the age of 83.”


"When he died, he served nine life sentences in Colorado State prison, California."
"Hilary Duff (left) dressed as Sharon Tate (right) in the movie" the ghost of Sharon Tate "; photo source: Hilary Duff / instagram; Michael Oakes archives / Gettys. She says the dream is fake."
“… The late actress murdered in 1969
Duff, 30, who will appear in "the ghost of Sharon Tate" and share a photo of herself dressed similar to the actress on instagram, wrote: "in the past two weeks, she has been fortunate to play Sharon Tate in an independent film."
"She's a great woman, and that's a real honor." Get push notifications with news, features and more
Debra told people that she thought "it's classless" and "exploitative.". "No matter who did it, it was tasteless," Debra said
"Everyone is scrambling to publish something for the 50th anniversary of this terrorist incident. There is no class nature. When Debra was 16 years old, her sister was murdered by a admirer of Charles Manson, and she commented on a scene that she thought was the premise of the film, in which she... "
“… My sister has a hunch that she and her ex boyfriend and hairdresser Jay sablin will cut their throats, which is strikingly similar to the way they actually died... "
"I knew that in fact, she had no premonition - awake or in a dream - that she and Jay would be cut throat," she said
"Manson died last November at the age of 83."



Number  1265
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I have full custody of my daughter and her dad is Michael Sterling, so he is a blast from the past and a memory.”Hit up Essence for the full interview.”
““He’s blocked on all my social media.”
“The America’s Next Top Model winner and proud mother of one is happily engaged to former Atlanta mayoral candidate, Michael Sterling, and is glowingly expecting her second child, first with Sterling.”
“In a new interview with Essence, Marcille shared that she and the popular attorney have decided to wed in the city where they fell in love.”
““We fell in love with each other in Atlanta,” the 33-year-old revealed.”
““We met in Atlanta and fell in love in Atlanta.”
“My fiance is from Beaumont Texas and I m from Los Angeles so I think it only appropriate for us to actually get married like where we met While she s thrilled to walk down the aisle the Real Housewives of Atlanta co star admits she didn t expect the...”
“...love of her life to propose so soon...”
““I am so excited to like start the planning and preparing the process for my wedding.”
“You know, just the whole bridal shower, the party, the dress.”


"I have full custody of my daughter, her father is Michael Stirling, so he is an explosive of the past, a memory." For the full interview, click the essence.
"He's blocked on all my social media."
"This proud mother, the next top model award winner in the United States, is happily engaged to former Atlanta mayor candidate Michael sterling and is looking forward to her second child, the first being sterling."
"In a recent interview with essence, Marcel said that she and the popular lawyer decided to marry in the city they love."
"We fell in love in Atlanta," the 33 year old revealed
"We met in Atlanta and fell in love in Atlanta."
"My fiance is from Beaumont, Texas, and I'm from Los Angeles, so I think we should get married like where we met, and she's very happy to get married. The co stars of Atlanta's Real Housewives admit that she didn't expect..."
“… The love of her life proposed so soon... "
"I'm happy to start planning and planning my wedding."
"You know, it's just the whole wedding, the party, the dress."



Number  1266
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both she and her brother Prince have a number of tattoos honoring the late icon; in April the 20-year-old revealed his latest; a leg tattoo depicting his dad dancing with angel wings.”
“'So understand that the older people that are watching me and seeing what I'm doing don't necessarily agree with all of this because they have very conservative views.'”
“But Paris Jackson still feels the guiding influence of Michael, which she confirmed on Saturday with a new tattoo.”
“The 19-year-old honored her late dad with a new inking of the word 'Applehead' in cursive on her left foot.”
“The eight-year anniversary of the King Of Pop's death falls on Sunday.”
“'You lift my foot and guide me forward': Paris Jackson honored late father Michael with a new 'Applehead' tattoo which she unveiled on Saturday'Applehead' was a term of endearment the icon would often call his loved ones and those close to him.”
“'With every step I take, you lift my foot and guide me forward.”
“...love you,' she captioned the Instagram photo.”
“Just this week the actress went on an expletive-ridden Instagram rant at her haters, who criticize her for - among other things - her tattoos.”
“'A lot of s**t is said about me and people I know and people I'm related to.”


"She and her brother Prince have many tattoos to commemorate the late idol; in April this year, the 20-year-old revealed her latest tattoo; a leg tattoo depicts his father dancing with angel wings."
"So understand that the older people who look at me and see what I'm doing don't necessarily agree with all this, because their views are very conservative."
"But Paris Jackson can still feel Michael's guidance, and she confirmed that with a new tattoo on Saturday."
"The 19-year-old wrote a new word 'applehead' in cursive script on her left foot in memory of her late father."
"The eighth anniversary of pop king's death is Sunday."
"You raise my feet and guide me forward": Paris Jackson commemorates her late father Michael with a new "apple head" tattoo, which she announced on Saturday. The "apple head" is a kind name, and the idol often refers to the people he loves and the people around him. "
"Every step I take, you lift my feet and guide me forward."
“…… "I love you," she wrote in her instagram photo
Just this week, the actress also attacked her enemies on a cursed instagram, who criticized her tattoos
"A lot of comments about me, people I know and my relatives."



Number  1267
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  1268
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Some of her many, many screen credits include War & Peace, American Gods, Hannibal, Viceroy’s House, and Bleak House.”
“The American-English actress has starred as FBI Special Agent Dana Scully in The X Files, DSU Stella Gibson in The Fall, and Jean Milburn in Netflix’s Sex Education.”
“The last time we saw Prince Charles he was only a kid, played first by the child actor Billy Jenkins and then (towards the end of season two) by Julian Baring.”
“I’m playing a character, I’m not playing real life Prince Charles and hopefully bringing something else to a role in a drama rather than replicating the real man.”Who previously played Prince Philip?”
““Hopefully I’m not too similar to him.”
““The ears is where it stops, really,” he explained.”
“However, he has since told RadioTimes.com that this is where the similarities end.”
“Josh O’Connor plays Prince CharlesWhen it was announced he was joining the Netflix biopic, O’Connor joked that he did have the “right ears” for the role.”
“The role was played by Matt Smith in seasons one and two.”
“Who previously played Prince Philip?”


Many of her screen works include war and peace, the gods of America, Hannibal, the house of the governor and the house of desolation
The American and British actress plays FBI Agent Dana Scully in the X-Files, Desu Stella Gibson in autumn and Jean Milburn in sex education for Netflix
"The last time we saw Prince Charles, he was just a kid, first played by kid actor Billy Jenkins and then (towards the end of the second season) by Julian Balin."
"I'm playing a role. I'm not playing Prince Charles in real life. I hope I can bring something else to the character in the play instead of copying the real man." Who has played Prince Philip before? "
"I hope I'm not much like him."
"The ear is where it stops, really," he explained
"But he told me later RadioTimes.com This is the end of the similarity. "
"Josh O'Connor plays Prince Charlie. When it came to the news that he would join Netflix biography, O'Connor joked that he really had the 'right ear' for the role."
"This role was played by Matt Smith in the first and second seasons."
"Who has played Prince Philip before?"



Number  1269
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That move she so vividly describes is NOT WHO I AM.”
“No clenching her neck.”
“Instead I am facing a long list of grievances from a former colleague who left NBC News angry that she had failed in her pursuit of stardom.”
“I am angry, hurt and unmoored from what I thought would be the final passage of my life and career, a mix of written and broadcast journalism, philanthropy and participation in environmental and social causes that have always given extra meaning to my life.”
“I was ambushed and then perp walked across the pages of The Washington Post and Variety as an avatar of male misogyny, taken to the guillotine and stripped of any honor and achievement I had earned in more than a half century of journalism and citizenship.”
“Brokaw's email is published in full below:It is 4:00 am on the first day of my new life as an accused predator in the universe of American journalism.”
“She has unleashed a torrent of unsubstantiated criticism and attacks on me," the anchor, currently a special correspondent at the network, stated in his email to colleagues.”
“"I am facing a long list of grievances from a former colleague who left NBC News angry that she had failed in her pursuit of stardom.”
“The company is nearing the end of an investigation set off by the toppling of Matt Lauer.”
“But it's unclear how NBC News will respond to the allegations.”


"It's not me that she describes so vividly."
"Don't pinch her."
"Instead, I'm facing a long line of grievances from a former colleague who left NBC News angry at her failure to become a star."
"I feel angry and hurt and have no interest in what I think will be the last part of my life and career. It's a mixture of written and broadcast news, philanthropy and participation in environmental and social causes that always give me extra meaning in my life."
"I was ambushed, and then the criminal appeared on the web pages of the Washington Post and variety as the embodiment of misogyny, and was taken to the guillotine, depriving me of any honor and achievement I had gained in my journalism and civic life for more than half a century."
"The full text of brocao's email is shown below: it's 4: 8 a.m. on the first day I started my new life as an accused predator in the American press."
"She launched a lot of groundless criticism and attacks on me," the anchor, who is currently a special correspondent for the network, said in an email to colleagues
"I'm facing a long line of grievances from a former colleague who left NBC News angry at her failure to become a star."
"An investigation triggered by the fall of Matt Raul is coming to an end."
"But it's not clear how NBC news will respond to the charges."



Number  1270
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As they’re left to consider the trade between allegiance and plea bargains, the girls will be left asking both each other and themselves “whose team [they’re] really on.”Season 6 of “Orange Is the New Black” hits Netflix July 27.”
“If there’s one thing that this trailer makes clear, it’s that this family will be tested harder than it ever has before, both by other inmates and the judicial system.”
““Don’t you think it’s weird we’re the only people in here?”From the beginning, “Orange Is the New Black” has effectively balanced its focus between the ensemble and the individual, highlighting each prisoner’s past and how it weaves into a larger, dysfunctional prison family.”
““Where’s Alex?” Piper asks.”
“While Suzanne, Piper (Taylor Schilling), Taystee (Danielle Brooks), and Red (Kate Mulgrew) adjust to maximum security, the fate of others remains unclear.”
“At the start of the new season, we get our answer — for some characters, that is.”
“The fifth season’s finale left us wondering where, exactly, each character would end up.”
“According to the official press release, the sixth season of Jenji Kohan’s “Orange Is the New Black” will pick up one week after emergency response teams finally overpowered Litchfield’s inmate riot.”
“If Litchfield Penitentiary had its fair share of interpersonal complications — and that’s putting it lightly — then one can only imagine what drama Litchfield Max will bring.”
““Navigating adult female friendships is so complicated!” Suzanne (Uzo Aduba) laments as she tries to understand the inner workings of her new surroundings.”


"When they have to consider the deal between loyalty and plea agreement, girls will have to ask each other and themselves' whose team are they '," he said On July 27, Netflix released the sixth season of orange is the new black
"If this trailer makes one thing clear, it's that this family will be put to an unprecedented test, whether it's other prisoners or the judicial system."
"Don't you think it's strange that we are the only people here? "From the beginning, orange is the new black effectively balances the focus between the whole and the individual, highlighting the past of each prisoner and how it weaves into a larger, dysfunctional prison family."
"And Alex? "Piper asked
"Although Susanna, Piper (Tyler Schilling), Tess (Danielle Brooks) and Rhett (Kate murgrove) have been adjusted to the highest security level, the fate of others is still unclear."
"At the beginning of the new season, we got the answer - for some characters, that's it."
"The end of season five makes us wonder where each character will end."
"According to an official press release, Yanji Cohen's" orange is the new black "Season 6 will improve a week after the emergency team finally defeated the prisoner riots in Lichfield
"If Lichfield prison has a fair share of its complex interpersonal relationships - which is an understatement - then one can only imagine what drama Lichfield marks will bring."
"It's too complicated to control the friendship of adult women! "Uzo aduba exclaimed as she tried to understand the inner workings of the new environment."



Number  1271
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pitt and DiCaprio will co-star for the first time in Quentin Tarantino’s new film about the Charles Manson murders, Once Upon a Time in Hollywood, which is due for release in 2019.”
“Van Sant was speaking to promote Don’t Worry, He Won’t Get Far on Foot, which stars Joaquin Phoenix and is widely perceived to be a return to form, following the disappointing Sea of Trees.”
“The career of neither actor was felt to be remotely impaired by taking on gay roles.”
“Both Ledger, who died in 2008, and Gyllenhaal were nominated for best actor, and their work on the film earned them enduring respect and acclaim.”
“It won the best director Oscar, one of three Academy awards the film took home in 2006, although it was controversially beaten to best picture by Paul Haggis’s Crash.”
“Van Sant worked on the film before Ang Lee took over.”
“It was based on a short story by the writer Annie Proulx.”
“Ledger eventually played Ennis, an introverted farmhand, opposite Gyllenhaal’s Twist, the more open of the pair, who continue their affair sporadically over 20 years.”
“They all said no.”The names were confirmed by Diana Ossana, the film’s producer, who said that they “turned down the project, for various reasons”, and that “[casting] Ennis in particular was the ultimate hurdle”.”
“I asked the usual suspects: Leonardo DiCaprio, Brad Pitt, Matt Damon, Ryan Phillippe.”


"Peter and DiCaprio will co star for the first time in Quentin Tarantino's new film" once upon a time "about the murder of Charles Manson, which will be released in 2019."
"Van Sant is here for promotion. Don't worry, he can't walk far. It's starring Joaquin Phoenix. People generally think that he is the return of his form after the disappointing Lin Hai."
"Both actors' careers are considered to be influenced by homosexual roles."
"Both ledger and Gyllenhaal, who died in 2008, have been nominated for best actor, and their work in the film has won them lasting respect and praise."
The film won an Oscar for best director, one of three Oscars it won in 2006, despite being controversially defeated for best picture by Paul Haggis's crash
"Van Sant was making this film before Ang Lee took over."
"It's based on a short story by writer Anne prux."
"Ledger ends up playing Ennis, an introverted farmer, the more open of the two, as opposed to Gyllenhaal's twist, who intermittently continues their relationship for 20 years."
"They all refused." Diana OsanA, the film's producer, confirmed the names, saying they "rejected the project for a variety of reasons" and "in particular, Ennis was the ultimate obstacle."
"I asked common suspects: Leonardo DiCaprio, Brad Pitt, Matt Damon, Ryan Phillips."



Number  1272
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Coming up: Laverne Cox and Amy Schumer.”
““There are no words to express my sorrow and regret for the pain I have caused others by words and actions,” he said, in part.”
““The whole thing has been very painful for me,” Couric, 61, tells PEOPLE.”
““The accounts I’ve read and heard have been disturbing, distressing and disorienting and it’s completely unacceptable that any woman at the Today show experienced this kind of treatment.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I had no idea this was going on during my tenure or after I left,” she continued.”
““I think I speak for many of my former colleagues when I say this was not the Matt we knew.”
“Matt was a kind and generous colleague who treated me with respect.”
“In fact, a joke I once made on late-night television was just that, because it was completely contrary to our brother-sister relationship.”
“It’s still very upsetting.”


"Next up: Lavine Cox and Amy Schumer."
"I have no words to express my sorrow and regret for the pain caused by my words and deeds," he said in part
"The whole thing was very painful for me," Couric, 61, told people
"The reports I've read and heard are disturbing, painful and disoriented. Any woman on today's show has experienced such treatment, which is totally unacceptable."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I don't know if it happened during my tenure or after I left," she continued
"When I say this is not Matt we know, I think I represent a lot of former colleagues."
"Matt is a kind and generous colleague and has a lot of respect for me."
"In fact, one of the jokes I made on late night TV was like this, because it was totally against our brother sister relationship."
"Still upset."



Number  1273
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s a really sad situation all over.””
““Everyone still hates you Tristan,” another comment read.”
“Khloé Kardashian while she was pregnant with their first child and fans weren t too happy about it...”
“Thompson, 27, took to his Instagram not to address the scandal, but to comment on the Cleveland Cavaliers’ win.”
““WHAT AN ATMOSPHERE IN THE Q!!”
“GREAT WIN #OnToTheNextOne,” the basketball player captioned a photo of him on the court.”
“The Cavaliers won Sunday night’s game 105-101 over the Indiana Pacers.”
“Fans weren’t too thrilled about Thompson’s post.”
“Many were quick to defend Kardashian, who gave birth earlier this month to daughter True Thompson just days after photos and videos surfaced of Thompson allegedly cheating.”
““Two-Kid-Tristan, will now be best known for known for TRIFLING while he’s traveling,” one commenter wrote.”


"It's really a sad situation."
"Everyone still hates you, Tristan," wrote another comment
"When Kardashian was pregnant with their first child, the fans were not very happy about it..."
"Thompson, 27, is not on instagram to solve the scandal, but to comment on the Cleveland Cavaliers' victory."
"There's an atmosphere in Q!"
"It was a great victory," the basketball player wrote in the title of a photo of him on the court
"The Cavaliers beat the Indiana Pacers 105-101 on Sunday night
"Fans are not too excited about Thompson's post."
"A lot of people quickly defended Kardashian, who gave birth to her daughter, real Thompson, earlier this month, just a few days after the exposure of photos and videos of Thompson's alleged cheating."
One commentator wrote: "Tristan, two children, will now be best known for his travel fun."



Number  1274
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We sat down one night and we fell in love and that was it.””
“Thank you Harry for stepping in to host the show at 2 and a half hours notice!”
“Now a family of five!”
“James Corden and his wife, Julia Carey, have welcomed their third child together,can confirm.”
““Today we welcomed a beautiful baby daughter into the world,” Corden tweeted on Tuesday, December 12.”
““Both she and her mother are doing great.”
“We can’t stop smiling.”
“Thank you Harry for stepping in to host the show at 2 and a half hours notice!” (Harry Styles hosted the show on Tuesday night.)”
“Today we welcomed a beautiful baby daughter into the world.”
“Both she and her mother are doing great.”


"One night we sat down and fell in love, and that's it."
"Thanks Harry for hosting the show two and a half hours in advance!"
"Now there are five members in the family!"
"James cordon and his wife, Julia Carey, have already had their third child together, which can be confirmed."
"Today we have a beautiful little girl," cordon tweeted on Tuesday, December 12
"She and her mother are doing very well."
"We can't stop smiling."
"Thanks Harry for hosting the show two and a half hours in advance! (Harry stiles hosted the show on Tuesday night.)
"Today we have a beautiful little daughter."
"She and her mother are doing very well."



Number  1275
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I just feel like I've hit the point that I'm just so exhausted and done."”
“I wish it could be different, and I think that's why I've had almost six years of working on us and fighting and just taking in a lot.”
“Following a brief reunion, the WWE Diva ended their relationship for good in July, revealing she wasn't prepared to sacrifice her career for the sake of their would-be marriage.”
“Despite recently ending a six-year relationship, the wrestler has jumped back into the dating game already, but admitted she hasn't clicked with anyone special.”
“The 34-year-old told E!”
“News: "It's kind of boring in the dating life, but other than that, it's been a lot of fun.”
“(Image: Splash News)"I've just been busy working and I just love everything that Brie and I are up to.”
“It's just been a lot of fun.”
“"Gosh, I'm pretty lame.”
“Usually, the person that I date at night is Netflix and my black liquorice.”


"I just feel exhausted."
"I want to be different. I think that's why I spent nearly six years on us, working hard and accepting a lot of things."
"After a brief reunion, the WWE queen ended their relationship in July, revealing that she was not prepared to sacrifice her career for their future marriage."
"Despite the recent end of a six-year relationship, the wrestler has been back in the dating game, but she admits that she hasn't dated anyone special."
"He told me at 34!"
News: "dating life is a bit boring, but beyond that, there's a lot of fun."
"(image: splash News)" I've been busy with my work and I like Bree and everything I do. "
"It's so interesting."
"God, I'm lame."
"Usually, the people I date at night are Netflix and my black licorice."



Number  1276
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The Arrangement” Season 1 finale, titled “The New Narrative,” airs on Sunday, May 7 at 10 p.m. EDT on E!”
“Meanwhile, Terence (Michael Vartan) and DeAnn (Lexa Doig) deal with a possible threat to the Institute for the Higher Mind.”
“In a recent interview with TooFab, Henderson said that he and Evangelista are just friends.”
““Christine and I are close.”
“We’re good friends,” said the actor who plays Hollywood’s biggest movie star Kyle West on the E!”
“...series.”
““I admire her and I respect her and I think she’s great.”
“People always talk about our chemistry on the show, and it’s real.”
“That’s why she got cast.”Henderson, who is also known for his role as John Ross Ewing III on TNT’s revival of “Dallas,” said that he got cast on “The Arrangement” before Evangelista officially got the part of his character’s love interest, Megan Morrison.”
““I got cast before her, and I went through this whole test process with everybody,” the actor recalled.”


The finale of the first season of the arrangement, titled "new narrative," will be held on Sunday, May 7, at 10 p.m. EST at e! "
At the same time, Terrence (Michael valtan) and Dean (LexA doeger) deal with possible threats to the Institute of higher mind
"In a recent interview with tufab, Henderson said he and Evangelista were just friends."
"Christine and I are very close."
"We are good friends," he said in "E!"
“… Series. "
"I admire her and respect her. I think she's great."
"It's true that people are always talking about our chemical reactions on the show."
Henderson, also known for his role as John Ross Ewing III in TNT's Dallas, said he played a role in the arrangement before Evangelista officially won the role of Megan Morrison
"I played a role in front of her and I went through the whole testing process with you," the actor recalled



Number  1277
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[NATL] Celebrity Hookups: David Foster, Katharine McPhee Marry...”
“The Beverly Hills home is about 5,500-square feet and has five bedrooms, six bathrooms, a pool and a tennis court.”
“At the end of 2016, it was revealed that the couple had purchased a house together for $5.25 million.”
“Kate Upton and Justin Verlander Are Engaged: A Timeline of Their RomanceBefore getting engaged, Upton and Verlander had dated for over three years.”
“At the end of the 30 minute ceremony, everyone walked back down the stairs and to a reception at the restaurant on the property.”
“Arrangements of deep red and blush flowers and olive branches mixed in adorned the area.”
“Hurricane candles lined the staircase up to the top and each guest took a name card with their name written in black calligraphy.”
“The ceremony was conducted at an old medieval church at the top of a hill amidst ancient ruins and overlooking the Montalcino valley and vineyards, the eyewitness said.”
“The wedding took place at the Rosewood Castiglion Del Bosco resort.”
“News, Verlander wore a dark tux with a bow tie and bridesmaids wore different blush colored gowns.”


"Star marriage: David Foster, Katherine McPhee Mary..."
"The Beverly Hills house is about 5500 square feet, with five bedrooms, six bathrooms, a swimming pool and a tennis court."
"At the end of 2016, it was reported that the couple bought a house together for $5.25 million."
Kate Upton and Justin Flanders are engaged: Upton and Flanders had been dating for more than three years before their engagement
"After the 30 minute ceremony, everyone went down the stairs to the reception in the hotel restaurant."
"Deep red and blush flowers are intertwined with olive branches and dot the whole area."
"Hurricane candles line up from the stairs to the roof, and each guest takes a business card with his or her name written in black calligraphy."
Witnesses said the ceremony took place in an ancient medieval church at the top of a mountain, in ancient ruins overlooking the montarcino Valley and vineyards
"The wedding was held at the Redwood castiglion del Bosco resort."
"It is said that Flanders are wearing dark evening gowns and bow tie, and the bridesmaids are wearing different blushes."



Number  1278
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Twitter exploded earlier this week after a 2015 Breakfast Show interview with the married DJ resurfaced in which he made it pretty clear that he doesn't like to perform oral sex on women, but thinks that women should be prepared to do the deed for men.”
“He said (via Men's Health): "You gotta understand, we the king.”
“There's some things that y'all might not wanna do, but it got to get done.”
“I just can't do what you want me to do.”
“I just can't.”
“A woman should praise the man — the king."”
“Steven Lawton Getty ImagesHe then continued: "If you holding it down for your woman I feel like the woman should praise.”
“And a man should praise the queen.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Earlier this week, twitter broke out after interviewing a married DJ on the 2015 breakfast show, in which he made it clear that he didn't like oral sex with women, but that women should be ready to do it for men."
"He said (through men's health):" you have to understand that we are kings. "
"There are things you may not want to do, but you have to do."
"I just can't do what you want me to do."
"I just can't do it."
"Women should praise men - the king."
Stephen Lawton Getty went on: "if you keep your woman's mouth shut, I think women should praise you."
"One should praise the queen."



Number  1279
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They could also potentially be missing out on Instagram endorsements, other reality shows, and maybe even becoming the next "Bachelor" or "Bachelorette" themselves.”
“So while the contestants are reacting to the news, it is worth keeping in mind that thousands of dollars could be on the line for them after the show has suspended filming.”
“ABCThe INSIDER Summary:As news continues to break about the alleged "Bachelor in Paradise" incident involving Corinne Olympios and DeMario Jackson, it's worth keeping in mind how much contestants get paid.”
“According to Reality Steve, some contestants made between $7,000 and $15,000 in season one.”
“They also make money off of Instagram endorsements and appearing on other reality shows.”
“Before a recent incident allegedly involving former "Bachelor" and "Bachelorette" contestants Corinne Olympios and DeMario Jackson suspended filming, "Bachelor in Paradise" was merely a silly show where former rejected candidates could try to "find love" once again on the beaches of Mexico.”
“But that all changed when news broke on Sunday that filming for the spinoff show went off the rails immediately after an incident that caused one producer to allegedly file a third-party complaint, according to a source who spoke with Los Angeles Times reporter Amy Kaufman.”
“Cast members have since spoken out — including host Chris Harrison — about how "heartbroken" they are that the show is canceled.”
“And while the alleged incident itself sounds upsetting if what sources say is true, cast members seem more upset that the show isn't filming.”
“Part of that may have to do with how much money they can make off of "Bachelor in Paradise."”


"They may also miss out on instagram endorsements, other reality shows, or even become the next 'Bachelor' or 'Bachelor' themselves."
"So while the contestants responded to the news, it's worth remembering that they may need thousands of dollars after the show is suspended."
”Abstract: as news reports about Corinne Olympus and demario Jackson's involvement in the "Bachelor of heaven" incident, it is worth remembering how much the contestants are paid, "the insider said
"According to reality magazine, some of the players made between $7000 and $15000 in the first quarter."
"They also make money through instagram endorsements and other reality shows."
"Before the latest alleged incident involving former" Bachelor "and" single girl "contestants Corinne Olympus and demario Jackson," Bachelor in paradise "was just a stupid show, and the former rejected candidate could try again to" find love "on the beach in Mexico
According to a source interviewed by the Los Angeles Times reporter Amy Kaufman, "but all this has changed. On Sunday, it was reported that the shooting of the spin off was derailed immediately after an incident led to a producer's alleged third-party complaint."
"Since then, actors including host Chris Harrison have publicly expressed how" sad "they feel about the cancellation of the show
"If what the source said is true, then the so-called incident itself sounds disturbing, but the actors seem even more upset that the play was not filmed."
"Part of the reason may have to do with how much money they can make from" Bachelor in heaven. "



Number  1280
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Nikki jokingly said that she wanted her niece to look like Brie so she could be her mini-me.”
“Birdie Joe Danielson...”
“This was revealed by her twin sister, Nikki Bella, in an interview early this week.”
“"Total Divas" star Nikki, who recently got engaged to John Cena at WrestleMania33, dished to E!”
“Online details regarding the wrestler who is expected to pop in less than a month.”
“Brie is currently 37 weeks pregnant and Nikki said pregnancy has been great for her.”
“"She's in the stage where she is getting a bit uncomfortable and can't wait to have the baby.”
“But she looks so beautiful pregnant, she has this amazing glow," said Nikki.”
“She also added that her twin sister looks like she is due any minute and that she is excited to be an aunt.”


Submit
"Nicky joked that she wanted her niece to look like Bree so she could be her mini me."
"Joe Danielson the bird..."
"This was revealed by her twin sister Niki Bella in an interview earlier this week."
"Total Queen" star Nicky, recently engaged to John Senna in the wrestling field, presents a gift to e
"Detailed information about the wrestler on the Internet is expected to appear in less than a month."
"Bree is 37 weeks pregnant and Nicky says it's good for her to be pregnant."
"She's a little uncomfortable at this stage and can't wait to have a baby."
"But she looked beautiful when she was pregnant, and she had amazing brilliance," Nicky said
"She added that her twin sister seemed to be coming at any time and she was happy to be an aunt."



Number  1281
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...not in the competition yet...”
“Date The contestant went on a date and gave out a rose at the rose ceremony.”
“It is a spin-off of the reality television game shows The Bachelor and The Bachelorette, and is a winter counterpart to the summer series Bachelor in Paradise.”
“The show is hosted by Chris Harrison and Hannah Storm of ABC’s sister station ESPN.”
“It has been described by ABC as "an ode to the Winter Olympic Games", and aired as counterprogramming against NBC's coverage of the 2018 Winter Olympics.”
“Ashley Brewer presents the play-by-play and live interviews during the games.”
“[2]The series reunite previous contestants from The Bachelor and The Bachelorette at a winter resort in Manchester, Vermont, where they are competing with contestants from the various international adaptations of the franchise in various winter sports challenges.”
“1 3 Contestants edit Elimination table edit Place Contestant Episode 1 2 3 4 1st Ashley Last In Date Winner Kevin Date In Date 2nd Courtney In In In Runner up Lily In In In Dean In Date Last Runner up Lesley In Date Last Luke Date Date In Runner...”
“...up Stassi In Date In 9 10 Bibiana Date In In Split Jordan N A a In In Split 11 12 Ally In In Out Josiah Last In Out 13 14 Christian In In Split Clare In Last Split 15 Yuki In In Out 16 Michael In In Quit 17”
“Ben In In Quit 18 Tiffany In In Quit 19 20 Jenny In Out Rebecca Date Out 21 Benoit In Quit 22 26 Eric Out Jamey Out Laura Out Lauren Out Zoe Out Key edit The contestant is male...”


“… I'm not in the game yet... "
"The date player went on a date and gave a rose at the rose ceremony."
"It's a derivative of the reality TV game bachelor and single woman and a winter version of the summer series Bachelor in heaven."
"It's hosted by Chris Harrison and Hannah storm of ABC sister station ESPN."
ABC calls it a "Winter Olympics anthem," which runs counter to NBC's coverage of the 2018 Winter Olympics
"Ashley brewer introduced the match and the live interview during the match."
"[2] at a winter resort in Manchester, Vermont, the series brings together contestants from singles and single women who compete with international adaptations of the franchise from a variety of winter sports challenges."
"13 contestants edit elimination table edit competition location Episode 1 Episode 2 Episode 3 Episode 4 first place Ashley last date champion Kevin date second place Courtney date runner up Lily date Dean date last place runner up Leslie date last place Luke date runner up..."
“… Upper Stacey on the date of 9 10 biana on the date of the split Jordan n a on the date of the split 11 12 allies on the outside Josiah on the last outside 13 14 Christianity on the last split Claire on the last split 15 Yuki on the outside 16 Michael on the inside quit 17 "
"Ben in quit 18 Tiffany in quit 19 20 Jenny in out Rebecca date out 21 Benoit in quit 22 26 Eric out Jamey out Laura out Lauren out Zoe out key edit contestant is male..."



Number  1282
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Seacrest will also be returning when the new season debuts next year.”
“ABC announced in May that it was reviving the long-running Fox reality series, a little more than a year after the show went off the air.”
“Perry, Richie, and Bryan will make their first appearance as a trio on Good Morning America on Oct. 4.”
“It’s gonna be a blast!”Perry and host Ryan Seacrest shared their excitement on Twitter.”
““To be in a position in my career to help facilitate this along with the other judges is just a complete honor.”
“It’s going to be so much fun!”“I’m excited at the chance to help some deserving artists reach their dreams,” said Bryan, whose last three releases all debuted at the top of Billboard’s Top Country Albums chart.”
““As a singer, songwriter, and producer, I feel I can bring a great deal of experience to the table.”
““I am very excited to be joining Katy, Luke, and Ryan on American Idol,” Richie, who has sold more than 100 million albums worldwide and won four Grammys, said in a statement.”
“The pair join Katy Perry just as auditions are getting underway.”
“ABC’s American Idol reboot has added Lionel Richie and country singer Luke Bryan as its second and third judges, Fox announced Friday.”


"Seacrest will be back when the new season premieres next year."
ABC announced in May that it would rebroadcast the fox reality show series, more than a year after the show went off the air
"Perry, rich and Bryan will make their debut as a trio on" Good Morning America "on October 4."
"It's going to be an explosion! "Perry and host Ryan Seacrest shared their excitement on twitter."
"In my career, it's a complete honor to be able to help promote this work with other judges."
"It's going to be fun! "I'm excited to have the opportunity to help some worthy artists realize their dreams," said Brian, whose recent three albums all topped Billboard's top country album list for the first time
"As a singer, songwriter and producer, I think I can bring a lot of experience."
"I'm very happy to be on American Idol with Katie, Luke and Ryan," Ritchie said in a statement
"Right at the beginning of the audition, they joined Katie Perry."
On Friday, fox announced that Lionel Ritchie and country singer Luke Bryan will serve as the second and third judges of ABC's "American Idol" when it reopens



Number  1283
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now that we have their tips for a happy marriage, maybe we can get them to spill their anti-aging secrets...”
“They must have a lot of 'faith' (pun intended) in their relationship to commit to working together onstage!”
“Of course, that doesn't mean that the King and Queen of country music don't have their hangups with each other.”
“Recently, McGraw and Hill dished their marriage secrets... and their pet peeves about their partner.”
“When asked what bothers him about Faith Hill, McGraw was quick to crack a joke before 'ragging' on his wife.”
“"I don't think we have time for that," he said playfully, according to GAC.”
“Instead, his wife took a stab at what habits she has that might bother her husband.”
“"If he answers this question truthfully, he'd probably say he wished I was less Type A," Hill admitted.”
“"He’s gotten better about the clothes on the floor."”
“In October, the pair will celebrate their 16th wedding anniversary.”


"Now we have the secret of their happy marriage, maybe we can let them tell the secret of anti-aging..."
"Their relationship has to have a lot of 'Beliefs' (puns) to commit to cooperation on the stage!"
"Of course, that doesn't mean that the king and queen of country music don't have a hangover with each other."
"Recently, McGraw and hill revealed the secret of their marriage... Their pets are very angry with their partners. "
"When asked what bothered him about Faith Hill, McGraw quickly made a joke and then" lost his temper "with his wife
"I don't think we have time," he joked, according to GAC motor
"Instead, his wife tried out what habits she had that might bother her husband."
"If he had answered the question truthfully, he might have said he wanted me to be a little less type A," hill admitted
"He's getting better and better about the clothes on the floor."
"In October, they will celebrate their 16th wedding anniversary."



Number  1284
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Paul was hit hard with an abundance of criticism from fans, celebrities and fellow YouTubers, who deemed the video to be offensive and disrespectful.”
“Paul and his friends filmed their experience in the forest, which included finding a man who had committed suicide, and put it all on tape.”
“The video, which has since been deleted, was filmed in Japan’s Aokigahara, also known as "suicide forest" due to the high number of suicides that take place within the woods.”
“YouTube star Logan Paul announced Wednesday night (Jan. 3) that he will be taking a break from YouTube and his daily vlogs in order to take "time to reflect" following the controversy he faced from sharing a video of a suicide victim to his viral YouTube channel.”


"Paul has received a lot of criticism from fans, celebrities and other young people who think the video is rude."
Paul and his friends filmed their experiences in the forest, including finding a suicide man and recording it all
"This video was later deleted and was shot in aokanhara, Japan. Because of the large number of suicides in the forest, aokanhara is also known as" suicide forest. "
"YouTube star Logan Paul announced on Wednesday night that he would take a break from youtube and his daily video blog to" take time to reflect "on the controversy he faces from sharing videos of suicide victims to his viral YouTube channel



Number  1285
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If you or someone you know is in emotional distress or suicidal crisis, please call the Lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255).”
“With reporting by Nicholas White.”
““It’s been tough.”
“He was a troubled, troubled guy, and he always was,” Lynch, 57, told Us Weekly exclusively at Adopt the Arts’ Annual Rock Gala on Wednesday, January 31.”
““This is a very sad end to it, but I know that he’s at peace now.”
“He’s in the arms of a beneficent force.”Lynch and Salling costarred in Fox’s Glee from 2009 to 2015.”
“Shortly after the show ended, Salling was arrested for felony possession of child pornography.”
“He pled guilty just one month before his death and was set to appear in court on March 7.”
““I know life was very, very hard for Mark.”
“I think we all do the best we can at the end of the day.”


"If you or someone you know is in emotional distress or suicide crisis, please call lifeline 1-800-273-TALK (8255)."
"Nicholas White's story."
"It's hard."
Lynch, 57, told us weekly exclusively at the "adoption art" annual rock show on Wednesday, January 31: "he's a troublemaker, and always has been."
"It's a very sad ending, but I know he's calm now."
From 2009 to 2015, Lynch and sarin co starred in fox glee
Shortly after the show, sarin was arrested for possession of child pornography
"He pleaded guilty a month before he died and is due to appear in court on March 7."
"I know life is very, very hard for mark."
"I think we all tried our best."



Number  1286
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I would encourage them to do it at school, in safe environments where they can really explore the material in a way that’s not just for public consumption.””
“RELATED VIDEO: Matt Bomer Opens Up About His Marriage“[He’s] very socially confident and has that vibe,” the actor explained to PEOPLE Now last year.”
“Bomer says that he and his husband aren’t necessarily steering their three sons — they also share 10-year-old twins Henry and Walker — away from a future in Hollywood, and that one of the boys “definitely likes to entertain” already.”
“Image zoom Credit: Matt Bomer and Kit HallsKit looked dapper in a classic black tuxedo and bow tie for the awards show, while the 40-year-old actor donned a blue number by Paul Smith that coordinated with his cast mates Zachary Quinto, Andrew Rannells and Jim Parsons.”
“Love you Kit!” the actor wrote, adding the hashtags #tonys2018, #thirteen and #earlyfathersday.”
““Pre @thetonyawards lunch with this amazing guy.”
“#tonyawards2018.”Earlier in the day, Bomer documented their lead-up to the Tonys with a selfie featuring Kit.”
““Thank you @thetonyawards for a perfect night as always- and for such a great memory.”
“),” Bomer captioned a father-son shot from the event on Instagram.”
“(Sorry Simon!”


"I will encourage them to really explore materials in schools, in a safe environment, in a way that is not just for public consumption."
"Related video: Matt bomer made his marriage public" [he] was very social, confident and had that atmosphere, "the actor explained to people now last year
Bomer said he and his husband don't have to keep their three sons - they also have 10-year-old twins Henry and Walker - away from the future of Hollywood, and one of them "must have enjoyed entertainment."
"Photo zooming credit: Matt bomer and kit halskett look smart in their classic black evening dress and bow tie at the awards ceremony, while the 40 year old actor wears Paul Smith's blue number to coordinate with his acting partners Zachary kunto, Andrew lannells and Jim Parsons."
"I love you! "The actor wrote, adding the labels' tones 2018 ',' 13 'and' early father sday '."
"@ the tonywards have lunch with this amazing guy before the awards ceremony."
"Tonya wards 2018." earlier in the day, bomer used a self portrait tool to record their contact with Tony
"Thank you @ Tony Award, as always, for giving me a perfect night and such a wonderful memory."
”A father and son inscribed on instagram for the event
"I'm sorry, Simon



Number  1287
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Matt Damon added his insight in an interview with Entertainment Tonight:“He’ll be great, he’ll be a mess, but [Amal] will take care of everything."”
“Friends are already weighing in on how the 56-year-old will be as a brand new father.”
“The boy and girl are the first children for the attorney and her husband, George Clooney.”
“Clooney's rep has also already weighed in with some humor:Julie Chen, a friend of the couple, first announced the Clooney’s pregnancy news on her CBS show, The Talk, in February.”
“Since then Amal Clooney has been spotted with her husband at the Cesar Awards in February and at the United Nations in March she has been continuing her work as a human rights lawyer which she has done since the...”
“...early 2000s...”
“George Clooney who was one of Hollywood s most famous bachelors before marrying Amal in September 2014 at the age of 53 told People in February that his friends whose children are all grown and in college had taken to...”
“...jokingly ribbing him about his late in life fatherhood...”
“Despite the quips from his pals, Clooney was ready to take on the challenge.”
““Look, it’s exciting,” Clooney said.”


Matt Damon added in an interview with Entertainment Tonight: "he's going to be great, he's going to be a mess, but [Amar] is going to take care of everything."
"Friends are already weighing how the 56 year old father will become a new father."
"The boys and girls are the first children of the lawyer and her husband, George Clooney."
"Representatives of Clooney have also considered a number of issues: Julie Chen, a friend of the Clooney couple, first announced that Clooney was pregnant on CBS's talk in February
"Since then, Amar Clooney has been found to have participated with her husband in the Cesar prize in February and continued her work as a human rights lawyer at the United Nations in March since She's been doing that for the last two years. "
“… At the beginning of the 21st century
"George Clooney is one of the most famous bachelors in Hollywood. In September 2014, he married 53 year old Amar. In February this year, he told people that his friends' children have grown up and are going to college..."
“… Jokingly ridicule his fatherhood in his later years... "
"Despite the banter of his friends, Clooney is ready for the challenge."
"Look, it's exciting," Clooney said



Number  1288
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Prince George, the third in line to the British throne, and his sister, Princess Charlotte, are expected to shine bright at their uncle's wedding.”
“What roles will Prince George and Princess Charlotte play?”
“Harry and Markle will open up the castle grounds (which is normally open to tourists but will be closed on the wedding day) to some local school children, charity workers and select individuals chosen by local leaders throughout the United Kingdom.”
“AFP - Getty ImagesFor those who live in or plan to head to Windsor, it may be possible to catch a glimpse of the couple on their special day.”
“The couple to hold the ceremony at St. George's Chapel, located on the grounds of the royal residence in Windsor, England.”
“The event is expected to be televised, but Americans who want to watch from home will have to set their alarm clocks: The service will begin at noon local time — which means 7 a.m. for folks on the East Coast, and 4 a.m. for West Coast viewers.”
“Compare that to the 1,900 guests that Prince William and the former Kate Middleton invited to their 2011 wedding at Westminster Abbey.”
“Harry was christened inside the 15th century gothic chapel, which can seat about 800 people.”
“With the blessing of Harry’s grandmother Queen Elizabeth, the ceremony will take place in St. George’s Chapel on the grounds of Windsor Castle.”
“The couple revealed their May 19, 2018, wedding date shortly after they publicly announced their engagement.”


Prince George, the third in line to the throne, and his sister Princess Charlotte are expected to shine at their uncle's wedding
"What roles will Prince George and Princess Charlotte play?"
Harry and markel will open the castle site (usually open to tourists, but closed on wedding day) for use by local schoolchildren, charity workers and individuals selected by local leaders across the UK
"For those who live in Windsor or plan to go to Windsor, they may get a glimpse of the couple on their special day."
The couple will be married at St. George's Church in Windsor's royal residence
"The event is expected to be broadcast on television, but Americans who want to watch it at home will have to set an alarm clock: the service will start at noon local time - which means people on the east coast will start at 7 a.m. and viewers on the west coast will start at 4 a.m."
"Compared to the 1900 guests Prince William and former Kate Middleton invited to their wedding at Westminster Abbey in 2011."
Harry was baptized in a Gothic chapel in the 15th century, which can hold about 800 people
With the blessing of Harry's grandmother Queen Elizabeth, the wedding will be held at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle
"The couple revealed the date of their marriage on May 19, 2018, shortly after the public announcement of their engagement."



Number  1289
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I say we make our comeback in 2018, but as the Bella Twins, not individuals,” Brie told Nikki and Nikki agreed: “It’s a deal!””
“Once you have the passion for wrestling, you can’t forget it,” Nikki added.”
““I think about it every day.”
““We miss it terribly,” Brie told In Touch back in September.”
“The Bella Twins opened up about their plans to return to the ring at some point next year.”
“But now that Brie has become a mommy, it looks like she’s ready to get back in the ring with her sister — and it may be sooner than everyone thinks.”
“After struggling to concieve, she finally got pregnant with their daughter Birdie Joe, who was born in May.”
“Brie was open about the reason for her retirement, which was so that she could focus her energy on trying to start a family with her husband, Daniel Bryan.”
“Like Nikki, Brie is also retired from the WWE and she retired just one year before Nikki did after a career-defining match during Wrestlemania 32.”
“Watch the video below to find out what the Bella Twins miss the most about wrestling after retiring from the WWE!”


"I said we would be back in 2018, but as Bella twins, not as individuals," Bree told Nicky, who agreed: "it's a deal!"
"Once you have a passion for wrestling, you won't forget it," Nicky added
"I think about it every day."
"We miss it very much," Bree said in September's contact
"The Bella twins have made public their plans to return to the ring sometime next year."
"But now that Bree's a mom, it looks like she's ready to go back to the ring with her sister - and maybe sooner than you think."
After trying to appease them, she was finally pregnant with their daughter, Bertie Jo, who was born in May
"Bree made public the reasons for her retirement so that she could focus on forming a family with her husband, Daniel Bryan."
"Like Nicky, Bree retired from WWE. After a professional match in wrestling storm 32, she retired one year before Nicky retired."
"Watch the video below to see what the Bella twins miss most about wrestling after retiring from WWE!"



Number  1290
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Veronica and Peter did not know.”
“That is correct.”
“I think her first time on-screen was when Hanna was being tortured in the shed and she dreamt that Spencer came to her to reassure her and give her a clue to get out, that was Alex.”
“How many times did we see Alex as Spencer through the course of the series?”
“I’m intentionally staying off of social media for a couple of days to give myself a breather.”
“I haven’t been online, to be honest with you.”
“She’s original “A.” And then Charlotte stole it from her and she’s “Big A.” And then the death of Charlotte was the genesis for “A.D.”Have you been keeping up with all of the fan reaction to the finale on social media?”
“For the first two seasons, it was Mona.”
“Aside from Alex Drake, can you confirm once and for all, who was the full A-team?”
“...know who it is and why it s happening before starting the story...”


"Veronica and Peter don't know."
"That's right."
"I think the first time she appeared on the screen was when Hannah was tortured in the shed. She dreamt that Spencer came to her to appease her and give her a clue to go out. That was Alex."
"How many times in the series have we seen Alex play Spencer?"
"I deliberately stay away from social media for a few days to let myself take a breath."
"To be honest, I'm not on the internet yet."
She was the original "a" and Charlotte stole it from her. She was "big a". Then Charlotte's death is the origin of "A.D.". Have you been following the reaction of fans on social media to the ending? "
"The first two seasons, it's Mona."
"Apart from Alex Drake, can you confirm once and for all who is the complete a team?"
“… Know who it is and why it happened before the story begins... "



Number  1291
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We can help lift one another up.”Related Gallery...”
““We don’t have to carry the weight of the world ourselves.”
““We will try to be more transparent on our journey as I see it may be helpful for others as well as ourselves,” she wrote on Instagram on Sept. 12.”
“This post comes a little over a week after Lane revealed that she suffered a miscarriage.”
“...view Damascus Cover encouraging fans to please come by and say hello and support our film...”
“RELATED Jonathan Rhys Meyers Wife Mara Says Actor Helped Deliver Son in Intimate Post About At Home Birth MORE Jonathan Rhys Meyer s Wife Mara Lane Reveals He Relapsed After She Suffered a Miscarriage Lane added that the couple will be at the Boston Film Festival over the weekend to...”
“"*Us on a boat in a canal in Venice during the filming of #AspernPapers," she continued.”
“"#TBT this photo is after another reunion and makes me happy so hopefully will make you smile and have nice feels too."”
“"Reunited today after 6 weeks too long," the actress wrote.”
“After Meyers returned home from an almost two month working engagement, Lane took to Instagram on Friday to share an adorable photo of the couple kissing while holding their son, Wolf.”


"We can help each other." Related galleries
"We don't have to bear the burden of the world ourselves."
"We will try to be more transparent on the journey because I think it may help others and ourselves," she wrote on instagram on September 12
"This post was released more than a week after Ryan revealed that he had an abortion."
“… Watch the Damascus cover, encourage fans to come and say hello and support our film... "
"Marla, the wife of relative Jonathan Reese Meyer, said the actor helped give birth to more sons in a private post about home delivery. Marla lane, the wife of Jonathan Reese Meyer, revealed that he relapsed after miscarriage, adding that the couple will be at the Boston Film Festival later this week
"During the filming of the Aspen, we were on a boat in a canal in Venice," she continued
"This picture of TBT is after another reunion, which makes me very happy. I hope it can make you smile and have a good feeling."
"Six weeks later, we meet again today," the actress wrote
"After Meyers got home from nearly two months of work dating, Ryan shared a lovely picture on instagram last Friday, in which they were hugging and kissing their son Wolf."



Number  1292
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Kristen Bell Talks Husband Dax Shepard’s “Unending Support” For SAG Hosting DutiesMunn will be one of the presenters for this year’s awards.”
““I was like, ‘I love you,’ ” Munn said, explaining that Winfrey then walked out of the bathroom.”
“...doesn t mean she doesn t get starstruck...”
“The 37-year-old Newsroom actress walked the red carpet at the 2018 Screen Actors Guild Awards Sunday, gushing to E!”
“News during their pre-show about the time she met Oprah Winfrey.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“It all went down in the bathroom at the Soho House.”
““She was coming out of the stall,” Munn recalled of the 63-year-old talk show host.”
““At the Soho House, there’s a window and not mirrors.”
“And I see her in the reflection so I m washing my hands not saying anything Be sure to check out PEOPLE s full SAG Awards coverage to get the latest news on Hollywood s big night and watch PEOPLE Entertainment Weekly and TNT s official live red carpet show...”


"Related video: Christine bell talks about her husband Darth Shepard's" endless support "for sag. Dutisman will be one of the hosts of this year's awards ceremony."
"I said, 'I love you,'" Munn explained, and Winfrey walked out of the bathroom
“… It doesn't mean she won't be fascinated by stars... "
"The 37 year old newsroom actress walked on the red carpet of the 2018 Film Actors Guild Award on Sunday and made a speech to e!"
"About her meeting with Oprah Winfrey."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's all in the bathroom of SOHO's house."
"She came out of the booth," Munn recalls, the 63 year old talk show host
"In SOHO's house, there are windows and no mirrors."
"I saw her in my reflection, so I was washing my hands and didn't say anything. Be sure to check all the sag awards reports of People magazine, learn the latest news of Hollywood night, and watch people entertainment weekly and TNT's official live red carpet show.... "



Number  1293
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m like ‘Tell me what’s wrong.’ ”“I just don’t know what to do,” she admits.”
““Like, I can’t,” the Kimoji creator says to West’s friend as she wipes away tears from her eyes.”
“In a new E!”
“...clip from Sunday’s upcoming episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians, the reality star receives a phone call from Kanye West‘s worried friend prior to him being hospitalized.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Why, what’s going on?” Kim, 36, says in the clip before she breaks down and bursts into tears.”
““What’s wrong?”“Don’t scare me, please.”
“What’s going on?” she pleads with the rapper’s friend.”
“As the mother of two attempts to comprehend what is happening with her husband, who is on the west coast, her mother, Kris Jenner, and sister, Kourtney Kardashian, sit nearby and remain calm.”
““He is exhausted and currently dealing with sleep deprivation,” a source told PEOPLE.”


"I'm like 'tell me what's wrong.' "I just don't know what to do," she admits
"Like, I can't," kimoji's creator told West's friend, wiping away her tears
"In a new e!"
“…… This is a clip from "follow Kardashian's house," which will be broadcast on Sunday. The reality TV star received a call from Kanye West's friend before he was hospitalized
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"What's the matter? What's the matter? "Kim, 36, said in the clip before collapsing and crying."
"What's the matter? "Please don't scare me."
"What's the matter? "She begged the rapper's friends."
"As a mother of two, she's trying to understand what's going on with her husband on the west coast, and her mother, Chris Jenner, and her sister, Courtney Kardashian, are sitting nearby, keeping calm."
"He's exhausted and is facing a lack of sleep," a source told people



Number  1294
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The CW averaged a 0.5 and 1.6 million.”
“Fox was fourth with a 0.7 and 2.6 million.”
“NBC was third with a 0.8 and 3.6 million.”
“ABC was second with a 1.2 and 5.2 million viewers.”
“CBS led the night with a 1.3 rating and 8.2 million viewers.”
“On The CW, “Supernatural” (0.6, 1.9 million) was down from last week, while “Arrow” (0.4, 1.4 million) was up in viewers.”
“For Fox, “Gotham” (0.7, 2.5 million) was even, and “Showtime at the Apollo” (0.6, 2.7 million) ticked up in viewers.”
““Mom” (1.4, 8.5 million), “Life in Pieces” (0.9, 6.2 million), and “SWAT” (0.8, 5.1 million) were all even.”
“On CBS, “Big Bang Theory” (2.3, 12.7 million) and “Young Sheldon” (1.9, 11.6 million) were steady and were also the top shows of the night in both measures.”
““Scandal” (0.9, 3.9 million) ticked up in the demo.”


"The average CW is 500000 and 1.6 million."
"Fox ranked fourth with 700000 and 2.6 million."
"NBC ranked third with 800000 and 3.6 million."
"ABC ranked second with 1.2 million and 5.2 million viewers."
"CBS led the night with 1.3 ratings and 8.2 million viewers."
On CW, the ratings of "supernatural" (600000,1.9 million) are lower than last week, while the ratings of "arrow" (400000,1.4 million) are higher
"For fox, the ratings of Gotham (700000, 2.5 million) are flat, while the ratings of Apollo Tour (600000, 2.7 million) have risen."
"Mom" (1.4 million, 8.5 million), "debris life" (900000, 6.2 million) and "SWAT" (800000, 5.1 million) are tied
On CBS, the big bang of life (2.3 million, 12.7 million) and young Sheldon (1.9 million, 11.6 million) were stable, and they were also the best programs of the night
"Scandal" (900000, 3.9 million) appeared in the demonstration



Number  1295
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“...const FP = tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's what I'd like to know. What I'd like to know before I buy my first book is that it's famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers."
“… Const FP = tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Experts who have learned a lot from the whole process of purchasing my first house have acquired the skill of starting a side push. "



Number  1296
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From Dave Trumboreadvertising...”
“...of ATL S T E A M”
“In order to get into arrow-shooting, rock-climbing, butt-kicking shape like her impressive and adventurous video game counterpart Lara Croft, Vikander underwent a grueling exercise routine and dietary program with super-trainer Magnus Lygdback.”
“The fellow Swedes worked together for months in order to add 16 pounds of muscle to the 5' 5" Oscar-winner's slender frame.”
“Sound like something you'd like to do?”
“Well, get ready to pay the price for those gains.”
“...advertisingTHR chatted with Lygdback to get the inside scoop on his workout routine, dietary regimen, and the program he put Vikander through for the role.”
“Her training included "mixed martial arts, rock climbing and archery" to craft "a modern Lara Croft, a strong, independent woman, and I think it's exactly what the world needs right now," said Lygdback.”
“Vikander also brought her own ballet training to her character, all the better to scale cliff faces, make death-defying leaps, and take out a multitude of bad guys.”
“So far, so good!”


"More from Dave trumpsin..."
"ATL s t e a m"
In order to get into archery, rock climbing, and kicking ass shapes like her impressive and adventurous video game rival Laura Croft, vicander went through a tough daily exercise and diet plan with super coach Magnus lygdback
My fellow Swedes worked together for months to add 16 pounds of muscle to the 5'5 Oscar winner's slim figure
"Sounds like something you want to do?"
"Well, be prepared to pay for these gains."
“… The advertisers talked to lygdback about his exercise plans, eating habits and the shows he arranged for vikander. "
"Her training includes' mixed martial arts, rock climbing and archery 'to create' a modern Laura Croft, a strong and independent woman, which I think is just what the world needs today, '" said leggeback
"Vicander has also brought his ballet training to the characters, who are better at climbing cliffs, making jumps that are not afraid of death, and killing many bad guys."
"So far, not bad!"



Number  1297
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Random House stands by the book and its author, Maureen Orth.””
“"In her lurid claims, she ignores contrary information provided by members of Mr. Versace's family."”
“"Donatella Versace sent Penelope Cruz a very large arrangement of flowers when she was representing the show at the Golden Globes," he said.”
“Murphy himself told The Hollywood Reporter that Donatella Versace's actions seemed to indicate she wasn't entirely displeased with the drama.”
“Simpson, Edgar Ramirez stars as Versace, while Penelope Cruz stars as his sister Donatella, Ricky Martin plays his longtime partner Antonio D'Amico and Darren Criss stars as Cunanan.”
“We stand by the meticulous reporting of Ms. Orth.”In Murphy's follow-up cycle to The People v. O.J.”
“...the true life crime spree of Andrew Cunanan...”
“The first statement regarding the series was issued Tuesday prompting the following response from FX and Fox21 producers The Assassination of Gianni Versace is based on Maureen Orth s heavily researched and authenticated nonfiction best seller Vulgar Favors which examined...”
“The statement questions Orth's information gathering tactics, specifically regarding the attainment of Gianni's postmortem medical records.”
“The book has stood the test of time and is widely regarded as the definitive account of Andrew Cunanan’s chilling crime spree.”


"Random House supports the book and its author, Maureen orth."
"In her sensational statements, she ignored the contrary information from the Versace family."
"Donatella Versace gave Penelope Cruz a bunch of flowers at the Golden Globes," he said
"Murphy himself told Hollywood reporters that Donatella Versace's behavior seemed to indicate that she was not completely dissatisfied with the play."
Simpson, Edgar Ramirez as Versace, Penelope Cruz as his sister Donatella, rich Martin as his old partner Antonio damiko, and Darren Chris as kunanan
"We support Ms. Oz's meticulous reporting." In Murphy's follow-up report to people's daily
“…… Andrew kunanan's real crime Carnival.... "
"The first statement in the series, released on Tuesday, prompted FX and fox21 producers to respond that the assassination of Jennie Versace was based on Maureen orth's well researched and certified nonfiction bestseller, vulgar grace, which has been a great success for many years
"The statement questioned Oz's information gathering strategy, particularly with regard to obtaining Gianni's autopsy records."
"This book has stood the test of time and is widely regarded as the decisive description of Andrew Cunanan's gruesome crime frenzy."



Number  1298
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to TMZ, Kardashian will reportedly agree to Chyna's request for a restraining order.”
“So I feel as though if one person speaks up, maybe it, hopefully, it will be a domino effect.”Kardashian and Chyna's lawyers are expected in court Monday.”
“Chyna addressed the video in an interview with Good Morning America on Monday, saying that she sent it to Kardashian in hopes that it would convince him to leave her alone.”
“Bustle has reached out to reps for Kardashian and Chyna regarding the allegations made against each other, but did not receive a response.”
“Kardashian's lawyer, Robert Shapiro, told TMZ that Kardashian's rant was "a spontaneous reaction that he regrets."”
“The nude photos that Kardashian posted of Chyna were the main subject of the GMA segment.”
“In the state of California, where both stars reside, posting sexually explicit photos that were understood to be meant to remain private without permission constitutes revenge porn and is punishable by law.”
“Chyna intends to file a restraining order against Kardashian on Monday.”
“In addition to the potential illegality of the photos posted, the conversation also turned to the allegations that Kardashian made in his Instagram posts.”
“In the series of since-deleted posts, he accused his ex of cheating on him, exploiting him for money, and abusing drugs and alcohol.”


"According to TMZ, Kardashian will agree to chener's injunction request."
"So I think if one says it, maybe, hopefully, it will be a domino effect." Lawyers for Kardashian and chener are expected to appear in court on Monday
"In an interview with Good Morning America on Monday, Zina said she sent the video to Kardashian in the hope of persuading her to leave her alone."
"Bustle has contacted representatives of Kardashian and chener to communicate the other side's accusations, but has not received a response."
Robert Shapiro, Kardashian's lawyer, told TMZ that Kardashian's roar was "a spontaneous reaction to his regret."
"Kardashian's nude photos of Gina are the main theme of the GMA section."
"In California, where both stars live, publishing blatant pornographic photos without permission is considered privacy, which constitutes retaliatory pornography and will be punished by law."
"Gina is going to put a restraining order on Kardashian on Monday."
"In addition to the fact that the photos posted may be illegal, the conversation turned to the accusations made by Kardashian in her instagram post."
In a series of deleted posts, he accused his predecessor of cheating him, using him to make money and abusing drugs and alcohol



Number  1299
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“These cotton blankets are versatile and easy to care for, and you’re going to need them anyway so why not splurge on one of the baby products celebrities use the most?”
“Kate MiddletonProduct: Aden + Anais swaddling blanketsPrice: $49.95Of all the baby products the Duchess of York and her royal children can’t live without, the Aden + Anais swaddling blankets are the ones totally worth your money.”
“The actress, known for roles in Pearl Harbor and Sin City, loves how it grows with the child.”
“Jaime KingProduct: Nuna Zaaz high chairPrice: $299.95The Zaaz high chair by Nuna is one of the baby products Jamie King can’t live without.”
“Next: One product, years of use.”
“We’re guessing that’s why they’re one of Halle Barry’s favorite items and one of the baby products celebrities use.”
“Sure, they cost more than standard maternity pants, but they make up for it with their comfort and style.”
“Halle BerryProduct: J Brand maternity jeansPrice: $129.97Being pregnant and looking stylish don’t have to be mutually exclusive.”
“Next: Comfort and style all in one.”
“Storksak just happens to be one of the baby products famous moms can’t live without.”


"These blankets are versatile and easy to care for, and you'll need them anyway, so why not splurge on celebrity baby products?"
"Kate Middleton product: Aden + Anais blanket price: of all the baby products that the Duchess of York and her royal children can't do without, Aden + Anais blanket is definitely worth your money at $49.95."
The actress, known for her roles in "Pearl Harbor" and "Sin City," loves how her children grow up
“Jaime Ki ngProduct:Nuna Zaaz  High chair price: zaaz high chairs produced by nuna is one of Jamie King's indispensable baby products. "
"Next: a product, service life."
"We guess that's why they're one of Harry Barry's favorite products and one of the baby products celebrities use."
"Of course, they are more expensive than standard maternity pants, but their comfort and style make up for that."
“Halle Ber ryProduct:J Brand pregnant woman, jeansprice: $129.97 pregnancy and fashion look don't have to be mutually exclusive. "
"Next step: combine comfort with fashion."
"Storksak happens to be one of the baby products that famous mothers can't live without."



Number  1300
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“Hear more on how the couple decided to name their baby girl Chicago "Chi" West in the video below.”
“Cher Lloyd is only a few months away from becoming a mom.”
“The 24-year-old "Want U Back" singer took to Instagram on Wednesday, announcing that she's five months pregnant with her first child.”
“I know it seems like I ve been quiet for a while but I wanted to take this opportunity to bring you all up to speed on what I ve been up to over the last year the X Factor...”
“...star captioned a black and white snap of her growing baby bump...”
“"I decided to take some time away from the public eye to focus on what really matters and get back to what I truly love doing.”
“As you all know making music and singing is where it all began for me it s what makes me truly happy and I wanted to get back to that happy place once again enter the studio and focus on...”
“...simply making great music for you all...”
“"While Lloyd said she was "so happy" to reveal that she has a collection of new songs on the way, she told fans that she and her husband, Craig Monk, had some other news to share.”


Related libraries
In the video below, we'll learn more about how the couple decided to name their baby girl Chicago "Chi" West
"It's only a few months from being a mom."
The 24-year-old "Wang u back" singer announced on instagram on Wednesday that she is pregnant with her first child in five months
"I know I seem to have been silent for some time, but I want to take this opportunity to let you know what I have done in the past year, X factor..."
“… The title of the star is a black-and-white picture of her growing lump... "
"I decided to spend some time away from the public, focus on what's really important, and go back to what I really love."
"As you all know, for me, music and singing are the place where everything starts, the place where I am really happy. I want to go back to the place where I am happy, enter the studio again, and focus on..."
“… Just making great music for you... "
"While Lloyd said she was" very happy "to reveal that she had a new way of collecting songs, she told fans that she and her husband, Craig monk, had some other news to share."



Number  1301
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Top work: Katy had previously said she was 'humbled' to be part of the ceremony...”
“The atrocity marked Britain's deadliest attack since the 7/7 bombings on the London Underground, which killed 52 back in 2005.”
“And Katy Perry reinforced it with her choice of dress when she hit the stage at the Old Trafford Cricket Ground, in Manchester on Sunday for Ariana Grande's One Love Manchester benefit gig.”
“The songstress, 32, looked ethereal in a feathered wrap, but when she discarded the cover-up her poignant tribute to the 22 victims of the May terror attack was revealed, with the star wearing their photos on her white mini dress.”
“Scroll down for video Tribute Katy Perry made a tribute to the 22 victims of the Manchester terror attack for the One Love concert at the Old Trafford Cricket Ground on Sunday wearing their photographs on the back of her dress as she took to the stage Photos The white...”
“...dress featured a montage of photos on the back The white dress featured a montage of photos on the back and across the neckline and cuffs with viewers soon noticing the photographic tribute online...”
“'katy perry had all victims faces in the shape of a heart on the back of her dress what an angel,' tweeted one fan, while another gushed:'@katyperry's dress honouring those who lost their lives.”
“'Such a small, yet touching, tribute.”
“Absolutely loved #OneLoveManchester.'”
“The star even made her sky-scraper, leather Dear Frances ankle boots looked comfortable as she delivered energy for the crowd.”


"Top work: Katie has previously said that she feels" humble "to attend the wedding
"The atrocity marks the deadliest attack in the UK since the London Underground 7 / 7 bombing in 2005, which killed 52 people."
"Katy Perry reinforced this with her choice of clothing when she appeared on stage at the Old Trafford cricket field in Manchester on Sunday for Arianna Grande's" love Manchester "charity show."
"The 32 year old singer looks very ethereal in her down jacket, but when she put aside her disguise, her bitter mourning for the 22 victims of the terrorist attacks in May was revealed, and the star wore their photos on her white miniskirt."
"Scroll down the video in memory of Katy Perry's" One Love "concert at the Old Trafford Cricket Ground on Sunday to pay homage to the 22 victims of the Manchester terrorist attacks, who put their photos on the back of her skirt as she took the stage and took a white photo..."
“…… The photos on the back of the dress adopt montage technique, while the photos on the back, neckline and cuff of the white dress adopt montage technique. The audience will soon notice the photos on the Internet.... "
"Katy Perry is an angel with a heart-shaped victim's face on the back of her clothes," one fan tweeted Another fan gushed: "the clothes of @ katyperry are in memory of those who lost their lives."
"This is a small but touching tribute."
"Absolutely love Manchester."
"The star even makes her skyscrapers and leather dear Francis ankle boots look comfortable because she delivers energy to the crowd."



Number  1302
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With plenty of time before the series premieres later in the year, though, that is bound to come in due time.”
“Missing from the character art is Baron Draxum, a villain in the series voiced by John Cena.”
“However, images from the new show have been revealed, showing radically different character designs and a peek at the first African-American portrayal of April O'Neil (Kat Graham).”
“According to a synopsis, the series "follows the band of brothers as they encounter new allies and villains and discover a mystical world they never knew existed beneath the streets of New York City."”
“Based on the character art, which you can see below, it looks like the mystical world they discover will come in handy.”
“April's glowing baseball bat looks pretty dangerous.”
“GalleryThe images also show just how different this series is going to be.”
“The art style looks unlike any other incarnation of the Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles.”
“For one, there are some changes to their standard weaponry.”
“Raphael (Omar Benson Miller) has traded his sai for tonfa, Michelangelo (Brandon Mychal Smith) uses a kusari-fundo chain weapon, Leonardo's (Ben Schwartz) typical sword is traded out for an odachi sword, and Donatello's (Josh Brener) bo had gotten some high tech upgrades.”


"However, there is still a lot of time before the premiere of the show later this year, which is sure to come in time."
"What's missing in character art is Baron drachsum, the villain in a series voiced by John seiner."
"However, the pictures of the new series have been exposed, showing a completely different character design and a glimpse of the first African American image of April O'Neill (Kate Graham)
According to the synopsis, the series "follows the brothers as they meet new allies and villains and discover a mysterious world that they never know exists under the streets of New York City."
"Judging from the following figure art, the mysterious world they found seems to be useful."
"April's glowing baseball bat looks dangerous."
"The gallery pictures also show the differences in this series."
"This artistic style doesn't look like the incarnation of any other Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtle."
"First of all, there are some changes in their standard weapons."
"Rafael (Omar Benson Miller) uses his Sai for Tongfa, and Michelangelo (Brandon Mitchell Smith) uses kusari "Leonardo's chain weapon, Leonardo's typical sword (Ben Schwartz) have been replaced by odachi's sword, and Donatello's Bo (Josh Buren) have also been upgraded."



Number  1303
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Listen below.”
“Fatal Voyage: The Mysterious Death of Natalie Wood is a 12-part audio documentary series that breaks new ground on one of Hollywood’s most enduring murder mysteries.”
“The Teen Mom OG star is expecting her third child with her husband, Tyler Baltierra, Us Weekly can exclusively confirm.”
““The big news is that we are expecting our rainbow baby.”
“This baby is our rainbow after the storm.”
“I’m super excited,” Lowell, who teased an upcoming announcement on Instagram in August, tells Us Weekly exclusively.”
““It was a huge shock at first.”
“We were not planning it, especially after the miscarriage and how I went downhill with my mental illness.”She added: “We were going to wait a really long time.”
“We were using protection and everything and still got pregnant.”
“This baby just wanted to be here.”


"Listen to the following."
"Fateful journey: Natalie Wood's mysterious death" is a 12 part audio documentary series, which opens a new horizon for one of Hollywood's most enduring murder mysteries
Us weekly exclusively confirmed that the teenage mother was having a third child with her husband, Tyler baltierra
"The most important news is that we are looking forward to our rainbow baby."
"This child is our rainbow after the storm."
"I'm so excited," Lowell told the weekly exclusive, teasing instagram's upcoming announcement in August
"It was a huge shock at first."
"We don't have plans, especially after the abortion, and how I'm going down with mental illness." She added: "we have to wait a long time."
"We used protection and everything, but we got pregnant."
"This kid wants to be here."



Number  1304
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Like, the Olympics, but also the Oscars?)”
“Vivien Killilea/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesTune in to see if Robbie takes home the gold (GET IT?”
“The Australian actress trained for months on the ice skating rink, and nailed Harding's blue-collar accent with incredible ease.”
“Robbie totally stepped up to the plate (and then some) to play this intricate, complicated, weirdly funny, and profoundly impactful character.”
“That's the gist, but my God, is Harding's personal life so much more complicated.”
“Figure Skating Association for life thanks to her involvement in the attack.”
“Harding took eighth place, and was ultimately banned from the U.S.”
“Ultimately, they bruised Kerrigan badly, but she continued on to win the silver medal in the Olympics.”
“During this time, Harding's ex-husband Jeff Gillooly and Harding's bodyguard Shawn Eckhardt hired a man to attack Kerrigan in hopes of breaking her leg so she would be unable to compete.”
“Her biggest competitor was Nancy Kerrigan, who was renowned far and wide as "America's sweetheart."”


"For example, the Olympics, and the Oscars?"
"Vivien kirileya / Getty infotainment / Getty infotainment came in vaguely to see if Robbie could bring the gold home (see?"
After months of training on the rink, the Australian actress easily learned Harding's blue collar accent
"Robbie went all out to play this complicated, complicated, funny, far-reaching role."
"That's the point, but my God, isn't Harding's personal life too complicated?"
"Thanks to her involvement in the attack, the figure skating association was alive."
Harding finished eighth and was eventually banned from the United States
"In the end, they severely bruised Kerrigan, but she continued to win the silver medal at the Olympics."
"In the meantime, Harding's ex husband, Jeff girulli, and Harding's bodyguard, Sean Eckhardt, hired a man to attack krigan in the hope of breaking her leg and preventing her from competing."
Her biggest competitor is Nancy Kerrigan, known as "American sweetheart"



Number  1305
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Westworld” Season 2 will premiere Sunday at 9/8 c on HBO.”
“...being talked about in a different way Wood added...”
“But the actress who plays the robotic rancher’s daughter in HBO’s sci-fi hit tells TheWrap that her paycheck didn’t match her status for the series’ first two seasons.”
“At least, it wasn’t equal to what the leading men were raking in.”
““I think I’m just now to the point where I’m getting paid the same as my male co-stars,” Wood said in a recent interview with Sharon Waxman, TheWrap’s founder and CEO.”
“Also Read Westworld Season 2 It s Gonna Get Uncomfortable for Lee as Maeve s Unwilling Hostage Video With the sophomore installment about to premiere Wood found out she was getting a bump for Season 3 equal to the likes of Anthony Hopkins and Ed Harris the men of Jonathan...”
“Nolan and Lisa Joy s drama well the latter still is as of that messy freshman year finale...”
““I was just told that, you know, ‘Hey you’re, you’re getting equal pay.’ And I was like [gasp].”
“And I almost got emotional,” Wood said.”
““I was like, ‘I have never been paid the same as my male counterparts … Never, never.”


The second season of journey to the West will premiere on Sunday at home theaters in the United States
“… Talking about wood in another way, he added
"But the actress who played the daughter of a robot farmer in HBO's science fiction film told the wrap that her salary didn't match her status in the first two seasons of the series."
"At least, it's not the money the leaders make."
"I think I've got the same salary as a supporting actor now," Wood said in a recent interview with Sharon Waxman, founder and CEO of the wrap
"Reading the second season of the western hemisphere at the same time will make Lee feel uncomfortable, because MEFF's reluctant hostage video is about to premiere in the second season, and wood finds that her performance in the third season is equivalent to that of Anthony Hopkins and ED Harris, Jonathan's man..."
"The drama of Nolan and Lisa joy - well, the latter is still the end of freshman chaos..."
"I've been told that you know, 'Hey, your salary is the same.' I was like, "he said
"I'm almost emotional," Wood said
"I said, 'I've never been paid the same salary as my male colleagues Never, never. "



Number  1306
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'We all get concerned she is breaking her diet plan…we have seen it happen multiple times…almost every day,' he wrote in June 2012 to Kesha's manager Monica Cornia.”
“Emails submitted to the court in her suit against Dr. Luke even outlines ways in which he likely contributed to her eating issuers.”
“During treatment, Kesha's boyfriend Brad Ashenfelter would fly out on the weekends to visit her at rehab, where they would color.”
“It's going to make me fat, and if I'm fat, I can't be a singer because pop stars can't eat food – they can't be fat"'.”
“Kesha's inner demons continued to torment her: 'I just remember crying into a carbohydrate, being like, "I can't eat it.”
“Her mother sent her to rehab, where she received education from a nutritionist.”
“'At that point, I'd forgotten how to do it.'”
“'I didn't know how to eat': Kesha said she ended up driving to a gas station, and asking her mother Pebe Sebert to meet her there (pictured August 2017)'I didn't know how to even eat,' she said.”
“Kesha said she asked her mother Pebe Sebert to meet her at a gas station she had later driven to.”
“'And I'm just f**king sick of this sh*t. And I remember just shaking because I was so fed up, so anxious, and I was just mad that I had let myself get to that point.'”


"We're all worried that she's breaking her diet plan We've seen it many times Almost every day. "
"In her lawsuit against Dr. Luke, the email submitted to the court even outlined how Luke might contribute to her publisher."
"During the treatment, Kaisha's boyfriend Brad ashenfelt will fly to the rehabilitation center on weekends to see her, where they will be colored."
"It makes me fat. If I'm fat, I can't be a singer because pop stars can't eat - they can't be fat."
Kaisha's inner demons continue to torture her: "I just remember crying into a carbohydrate, like 'I can't eat it.'"
Her mother sent her to a rehabilitation center, where she was educated as a nutritionist
"At that time, I forgot how to do it."
"I don't know how to eat": Kesha said she finally drove to a gas station and asked her mother, pebe sebert, to pick her up there (August 2017) "I don't even know how to eat," she said
"Kesha said she asked her mother, pebe sebert, to pick her up at the gas station she drove to later."
"I'm fed up with it. I remember shaking because I had enough, I was so anxious, I was so angry, I let myself get there



Number  1307
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sure, that feels about right.”
“Is it not something along the lines of, “Time turns into a jar of molasses when you are having a great time poring over adorable social media content created by two celebrities who seem very happy together and very much in love”?”
“No one fell to the ground, no one crashed into anyone’s nether regions, no shoulders were dislocated, no one twisted any limbs, and no one bruised any tailbones.”
““That could’ve went very bad.”Fortunately, the swing dance move attempt did not end poorly for either Grande or Davidson.”
““Oh, my god,” he exclaims.”
“He stumbles backward, she stumbles forward, he catches her, and she laughs.”
“When it comes time to swing her back on her feet, both Davidson and Grande lose their balance.”
“Seconds later, that all changes.”
“Everything seems to be going fine.”
“He swings her through his legs.”


"Of course, it feels good."
"Isn't it similar to the saying:" when you enjoy the lovely social media content created by two celebrities, time turns into a can of syrup. They seem to be very happy and love each other "
"No one fell to the ground, no one hit anyone's lower body, no one dislocated his shoulder, no one sprained any limbs, no one hit any tailbone."
"That could be bad." Fortunately, the swing dance attempt did not end with the failure of grand and Davidson
"Oh, my God," he cried
He falls back, she falls forward, he grabs her, she laughs
"When it comes to getting her to stand up and turn around, Davidson and grand are out of balance."
"After a few seconds, everything changed."
"Everything seems to be going well."
"He threw her with both legs."



Number  1308
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, when the “Woman in Love” singer appeared on C-Span to clarify her comments, Walters became angry.”
““Why lie?”And during a 1990s interview with Barbara Walters, Streisand disagreed with how footage was edited of her supporting Al Gore in his presidential bid.”
““I thought ‘I don’t know what date rape is, it’s terrible, but it was such a violation,” she said of Wallace.”
“When she called him afterward to complain about him being “mean” to her, Wallace, in turn, told viewers that she “loved” the interview, according to Variety.”
“Over the years, Streisand has remained reluctant to participate in interviews and interact with the press, partially due to a 1991 interview with TV journalist Mike Wallace, whose hurtful questions brought her to tears.”
“Image zoom Barbra Streisand | Credit: Kevin Mazur/GettyThe star also opened up about her tricky relationship with the media.”
““We’re in a strange time now, in terms of men and women, and the pendulum swinging this way and that way, and it’s going to have to come to the center,” Streisand said of the #MeToo movement.”
““Maybe that’s why.”However, Streisand said she will continue to stand with those who have been sexually exploited and fight for gender equality.”
““I wasn’t like those pretty girls with those nice little noses,” she added.”
““Never,” she replied when Murphy asked if she had ever been sexually harassed at any point in her career.”


However, Walters became angry when the "woman in love" singer appeared on C-SPAN to clarify her comments
"Why lie? In an interview with Barbara Walters in the 1990s, Streisand disagreed with how she edited videos supporting Gore's presidential campaign
"I thought, 'I don't know what date rape is, it's terrible, but it's an invasion,'" she said of Wallace
When Wallace called him afterwards to complain that he was "mean" to her, she told the audience in turn that she "liked" the interview, according to variety
"Over the years, Streisand has been reluctant to participate in interviews or interact with the media, in part because of the hurtful questions she asked in an interview with TV reporter Mike Wallace in 1991 that made her cry."
"Image zooming Barbara Streisand | image source: Kevin Mazu / Getty, the star also reveals her subtle relationship with the media."
"We are now in a strange era. From the point of view of men and women, the pendulum swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around, swings around pendulum
"Maybe that's why." However, Streisand said she will continue to stand with those who are sexually exploited and fight for gender equality
"I'm not like those pretty girls with pretty little noses," she added
"Never," she replied when Murphy asked if she had ever been sexually harassed in her career



Number  1309
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Get the details about the rumored breakup.”
“News).”
“Let’s sing as loud as we can,” Sam told the crowd (via E!”
“I know I’m going through some sh-t. And tonight I want all of us to just leave all of our worries and all of our heartache aside and let’s have some fun.”
““I know that everyone in this room right now is going through some sh-t.”
“While Sam Smith hasn’t confirmed his rumored split from boyfriend of nine months, Brandon Flynn, he did admit he’s “going through some s**t.”At his concert in Brooklyn, New York on Wednesday (June 27), the 26-year-old singer spoke to the crowd.”


"Understand the details of the rumored breakup."
"News."
"Let's sing as loud as we can," Sam told the audience (via e! "
"I know I'm going through some pain. Tonight, I hope we all put aside all our troubles and heartaches and let's have a good time. "
"I know everyone in this room is going through some pain right now."
"Although Sam Smith has yet to confirm that he broke up with his rumored 9-month-old boyfriend Brandon Flynn, he does admit that he" experienced some s * * t. "the 26 year old singer spoke to the audience at a concert in Brooklyn, New York, on Wednesday (June 27)



Number  1310
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With reporting by Kayley Stumpe...”
“The Hills: New Beginnings is set to premiere in 2019.”
““I’m so torn,” Montag, who shares the baby with Spencer Pratt, told Us Weekly at Switch Boutique in Beverly Hills, on Saturday, December 15, for a MeMe London jewelry event.”
““I know one minute I’m like, ‘OK.”
“We re having the baby and we re doing it next month And then the next I m like Oh let s wait a year It s hard because I want them to be close in age and at the same time maybe I need a little more time in...”
“...between Fellow Hills alum Kristin Cavallari is a proponent of having kids back to back...”
““I talked to Kristin about it and she’s like, ‘Just knock ‘em out!” Heidi said.”
“(Cavallari and Jay Cutler are parents of Camden, 6, Jaxon, 4, and daughter Saylor, 3.)”
“Earlier this month, Justin Bobby Brescia told Us a pregnancy might be coming” on the Hills revival.”
“When Montag was asked on Saturday if she is the cast member with a bun in the oven, she replied: “Maybe.”


"Kelly stump's story..."
"Mountain: a new start" will premiere in 2019
Montag, who shares a baby with Spencer Pratt at the switch boutique in Beverly Hills on Saturday, December 15, told us, "I'm so sad."
"I know that one minute I'll say, 'OK.'"
"We're going to have a baby. Next month we're going to have a baby. Next month I'm going to have to wait for a year. It's hard because I want them to be the same age. At the same time, maybe I need more time..."
“…… Christine Cavallari, an alumnus from the same mountain, is a supporter of back-to-back childbirth. "
"I talked to Christine about it, and she said, 'bring them down! "Said Heidi
(Cavallari and Jay Cutler are the parents of 6-year-old Camden, 4-year-old Jackson and 3-year-old daughter sailor.)
Earlier this month, Justin Bobbie Brescia told us that pregnancy might be around the corner
When asked on Saturday if she was an actress baking bread in the oven, Montague replied, "maybe."



Number  1311
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This past October, Dunham and Antonoff celebrated their five-and-a-half year anniversary, which she celebrated with a photo of the couple donning sweats while out to dinner.”
“I’m really thankful for the love.”The Girls creator and Bleachers frontman met on a blind date set up by Antonoff’s sister Rachel and comedian Mike Birbiglia in 2012.”
“I’m really thankful for the support.”
“She continued, “Things can be, ‘You know what, you’re a drop of water, and then you reenter the ocean.’ Anyway, I really love you all.”
““It doesn’t have to be defined the way that we, in Western culture, define it as beginnings and ends.”The actress has previously shown off some of her jewelry from Antonoff, revealing he gifted her a “friendship ring” for their anniversary in April 2016.”
““I’m wearing this ring that Jack gave me, and I’ll always wear it because love is a really cool, powerful, eternal thing,” Dunham, 31, explained to fans via an Instagram livestream.”
“However, the Girls creator shared that she is not parting with the piece of jewelry he gave her.”
“...lol.”Image zoom Lena Dunham and Jack Antonoff | Credit: Jeff Kravitz/FilmMagicReps for both Dunham and Antonoff confirmed news of their split to PEOPLE earlier this month.”
““those relationships are deeply important and sacred.”The 33-year-old musician clarified, “with that said, i’m not seeing anyone.”
““normally i would never address rumors but i resent having the most important friendships and working relationships in my life reduced to dumb hetero normative gossip,” he wrote.”


Last October, Dunham and Antonov celebrated their five-and-a-half-year anniversary with a picture of the couple in a T-shirt when they went out to dinner
"I really appreciate your love." In 2012, the girl creator and stand leader met Antonov's sister Rachel at a blind date with comedian Mike biglia
"I really appreciate your support."
She went on, "things can be," you know, you're a drop of water, and then you go back to the sea. " Anyway, I really love you
"It doesn't have to be defined as the beginning and the end, as we define it in western culture." The actress previously showed off some of Antonov's jewelry, revealing that he gave her a "friendship ring" in April 2016 as their anniversary
Dunham, 31, explained to fans through instagram livestream: "I'm wearing this ring that Jack gave me, and I'll wear it all the time, because love is a really cool, powerful and timeless thing."
"However, the creator of the girl told us that she would not give up the jewelry he gave her."
“… Ha ha Photo zooming Lena Dunham and Jack Antonov | photo source: Jeff Kravitz / the film magic producers of Dunham and Antonov confirmed their breakup to people earlier this month
"These relationships are very important and sacred," the 33 year old musician clarified. "I said I didn't see anyone."
"Normally, I never talk about gossip, but I hate that the most important friendships and working relationships in life are reduced to stupid heterosexual gossip," he wrote



Number  1312
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Red Table Talk" returns to Facebook Watch on October 22.”
“"I needed to do that to see Will outside of husband and see him as a human being."”
“"It's cheaper to keep me," Pinkett Smith joked.”
“Pinkett Smith has been candid about her relationship with Smith before.”
“The premiere episode of "Red Table Talk" returns to Facebook Watch on October 22.”
“Jada Pinkett Smith and Will Smith have been married for 20 years, but they don't call themselves "married."”
“In a clip from an upcoming episode of her Facebook Watch show, "Red Table Talk," the 47-year-old actress opened up about why she and Smith, 50, never got a divorce in their 20 years of marriage.”
“"You know why I never got divorced?"”
“Smith asked her, to which Pinkett Smith jokingly replied: "It’s cheaper to keep me."”
“Will Smith joins the premiere episode of "Red Table Talk."”


"Red table talks returns to Facebook watch on October 22."
"I need to do this to see will outside of my husband and see him as a person."
"It's cheaper to leave me," pinkert Smith joked
"Pinkert Smith used to be very honest about her relationship with Smith."
"On October 22, the premiere of the red table talks returned to Facebook watch."
Jada pinkert Smith and Will Smith have been married for 20 years, but they don't call themselves "married"
"In her upcoming Facebook watch show talk at the red table, the 47 year old actress talks about why she and Smith, 50, have never divorced in 20 years."
"Do you know why I didn't divorce?"
When Smith asked her, pinkert Smith jokingly replied, "it's cheaper to keep me."
Will Smith will attend the premiere of red table talk



Number  1313
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact him at Follow @johnnykats on Twitter, @JohnnyKats1 on Instagram.”
“See how I did that?”
“...at the fountains to open the 2001 BMAs...”
“Bruno Mars cut across the lake on a Jet Ski in his 24K Magic video Imagine Dragons performed a pop up show in 2014 an acoustic run through of It s Time Bet My Life and Radioactive And lest we forget Britney Spears performed I m A Slave 4 U”
“Last year Pitbull, Joe Perry of Aerosmith, Travis Barker of Blink-182 and Robin Thicke (of “Blurred Lines” fame) and a half-dozen dancers performed a commercial for TNT that aired during the NBA playoffs.”
“The list of such shows is impressive.”
“Nonetheless, the event was one of the splashiest (pun intended) staged performances ever on Lake Bellagio.”
“Producers banked Saturday night’s performance, originally described in media reports as a rehearsal, and aired it during the live telecast.”
“From the scene:Drake’s explosive performance of “Gyalchester” at Bellagio Fountains was presented as “live.” It wasn’t.”
“The Vegas Golden Knights open play here in October, but the music industry’s Vegas golden night was Sunday.”


"Please Click Follow@johnykats Contact @ johnykats1 on instagram. "
"How do you think I did it?"
“… In the fountain open 2001 BMA
"Bruno Mars crossed the lake in a motorboat in his 24K magic video dragon of the imagination, and performed the acoustic penetration of a pop-up show" it's time to bet my life and radioactivity "in 2014, so as not to forget Britney Spears' I'm slave 4U."
Last year pitbull, Joe Perry of Aerosmith, Travis Barker and Robin Thicke of Blink-182 (known for "fuzzy lines") and six dancers performed an ad for TNT, which was broadcast during the NBA playoffs
"The list of such shows is impressive."
Still, it's one of the most eye-catching performances Lake Bellagio has ever had
The producers banked Saturday night's show, which was initially reported as a rehearsal and broadcast live
"From the scene: Drake's explosive performance" jarchester "at the Bellagio Fountain is called" live, "but it's not
"The Vegas king knight starts here in October, but the music world's Vegas King night is Sunday."



Number  1314
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...work on the evening s meal...”
“After a long day there is no sweeter joy than seeing him walk in the door plop a grocery bag down on the counter and woo me with olives and some yummy cheese he has procured before he gets to...”
“I did it in one day.”
“Let me explain: My father’s best friend since summer camp, “Uncle” John, had known Jason and me separately our whole lives, but Jason and I had never met.”
“I went to college out east and took my first job in California.”
“When I moved back home to Chicago, John — who thought Jason and I were perfect for each other — set us up on a blind date.”
“It was 1989.”
“We were only 24.”
“I had precisely zero expectations about this going anywhere.”
“But when he knocked on the door of my little frame house, I thought, “Uh-oh, there is something highly likable about this person.”By the end of dinner, I knew I wanted to marry him.”


“… Working at dinner... "
"After a long day, there's nothing like seeing him plop through the door, put a food bag on the counter, and arrive with olives and him The delicious cheese you bought before courted me is sweeter. "
"I did it in a day."
"Let me explain: my father's best friend since summer camp, Uncle John, we've known Jason and me all our lives, but Jason and I never met."
"I went to college in the East and got my first job in California."
"When I moved back to my home in Chicago, John - he thought Jason and I were a good match - arranged a blind date."
"It was 1989."
"We were only 24 years old."
"I have no expectation of it."
"But when he knocked on the door of my little framed house, I thought," Oh, this man is a little likable. "At the end of dinner, I knew I wanted to marry him."



Number  1315
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“My dad would be so happy and love her so much."”
“The Saturday Night Live star revealed on Instagram on Friday that he had gifted Ariana Grande his necklace featuring a gold pendant of his late father's FDNY badge.”
“Davidson's father, New York firefighter Scott Davidson, died while trying to rescue victims of the 9/11 terrorist attacks at the World Trade Center.”
“His badge number, 8418, is displayed front and center on the necklace.”
“"???⚡️?☁️?”
“?," Davidson captioned an image of Grande wearing the precious gift, before jumping in again to defend his decision to give Grande the pendant.”
“"No girl should ever wear your dad's chain.”
“So disrespectful," one follower wrote.”
“"For ur information that's not just some girl, that's my fiancé," Davidson responded.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"My father will be happy and love her."
"The Saturday night live star revealed on instagram on Friday that he gave Ariana grand a necklace with a gold pendant on his late father's FDNY badge."
"Davidson's father, New York firefighter Scott Davidson, died when the World Trade Center tried to rescue the victims of the 9 / 11 terrorist attacks."
His badge number is 8418, which is displayed in the front and middle of the necklace
“"??? ⚡ ️? ☁️ ?”
"
"No girl should wear your father's necklace."
"It's rude," one of the followers wrote
Davidson replied, "it's not just a girl you need to know, but my fiance."



Number  1316
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So I’m like, ‘Who’s Brandi Glanville?’ She got pretty upset.”RELATED VIDEO: Brandi Glanville Splits from Donald Friese — Social Media ‘Ruined’ My RomanceButler previously told Howard Stern that he “felt bad” he didn’t know who Glanville was when paparazzi asked him.”
““Suddenly, I was walking down the street with a director and these guys from TMZ go, ‘Hey, what about you and Brandi Glanville?’ And I’m like, ‘Who’s Brandi Glanville?’ because I didn’t even know her last name.”
“Butler...”
“The former Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star critisized the actor Thursday on Twitter after he appeared to cringe while discussing their fling on Watch What Happens Live with Andy Cohen this week.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Let’s set the record straight, “she wrote.”
“Gerard Butler hit on me at a party asked for my phone number called me up the next day and asked me out so if he wants to cringe now he can f off Gerard Butler did not know my last name or what I did that is true but...”
“...he hit on me and asked me out end of story she continued...”
““Moving on.”“I’m sorry but when you meet someone that clearly doesn’t know who you are, are you suppose to be a d— and say bye I’m famous???”
“?” she added.”


"So I thought," who's brandy Granville? Related video: Brandy Granville and Donald Frith break up - social media "ruined" my romance. Before butler told Howard Stern that when the paparazzi asked him, he didn't know who Granville was, and he "felt very sad"
"All of a sudden, I was walking down the street with a director, and TMZ people asked," Hey, how are you doing with brandy Granville? "I thought," who's brandy Granville? "Because I don't even know her last name."
"Butler..."
"The former Beverly Hills housewife criticized the actor on twitter on Thursday for his timidity in discussing their live broadcast with Andy Cohen this week."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Let's clarify the facts," she wrote
"Gerald Butler called me at a party, asked for my phone number, and called me the next day to ask me out, so if he wants to flinch now, he can go away. Gerald Butler doesn't know my last name or what I've done. It's true, but..."
“… He came to me all of a sudden and asked me out. At the end of the story, she continued
"Go on." "I'm sorry, but when you meet someone who obviously doesn't know who you are, do you want to be a d-man and say goodbye? I'm famous???"
"?" she added



Number  1317
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more great stories, head to INSIDER's homepage.”
“Glasshouse/Wikimedia CommonsMuch like their coat of arms, Markle and Harry's joint monogram seems to fit in seamlessly with royal traditions while also reflecting a few of their personal touches as well.”
“The couple's joint monogram was first revealed when television presenter Georgie Gardner from Australia's "The Today Show" received a thank you letter from the couple for the wedding gift she sent, and Twitter user Prince Harry Watch captured a closer look at the unique symbol atop the letter.”
“—Prince Harry Watch (@HWalesWatch) July 26, 2018It features their individual monograms intertwined into one elegant design with a small crown at the top.”
“People reports that the crown features two crosses pattée (a type of Christian cross), four fleurs-de-lis, and two strawberry leaves.”
“Markle previously received her individual cypher in May following the royal wedding.”
“It features the same handwritten calligraphy style as Prince Harry's.”
“Prince Harry's royal monogram.”
“Glasshouse/Wikimedia CommonsWhether intentional or not, Markle and Harry's connection seems to be reflected in the seamlessly intertwined design, which happens to be quite different from Kate Middleton and Prince William's.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge's monogram features Middleton's initial sitting atop William's instead of combined into one design.”


"For more stories, please visit the insider home page."
"Glass house / Wikipedia is very similar to their coat of arms, and the joint monogram of markel and Harry seems to fit perfectly with the royal tradition, but also reflects some of their personal styles."
"The couple's joint monogram was first exposed when Australian TV host George Gardner received the couple's thank-you letter for their wedding gift. Twitter user Prince Harry watch more carefully captured the unique symbol on the top of the letter."
-Prince Harry watch (@ hwareswatch) July 26, 2018 it features their respective monograms interwoven into an elegant design with a small crown at the top
It is reported that there are two crosses on the crown (a kind of Christian Cross), four lilies and two strawberry leaves
"Marcel had previously received her personal code after the royal wedding in May."
"It's the same style as Prince Harry's handwriting."
"Prince Harry's Royal monogram."
"Whether intentional or not, the connection between markel and Harry seems to be reflected in the seamless design, which is very different from the design of Kate Middleton and Prince William."
"The monograms of the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge are characterized by Middleton's initials, rather than being combined into a single pattern."



Number  1318
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And Vivi [is] trying to change his diaper and pick him up, and I’m like ‘Ahh!’ But it’s good.””
““After three children, you kind of know what to expect and he’s been super easy and just chill and the kids love him.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Jessie James Decker Doesn't Have a Nanny for Her Three Kids: 'I Take Care of My Children'Despite Jessie James Decker‘s busy life as a singer, television star, fashion designer and newly minted author, she still has time to parent her children without hired help.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I honestly feel like I’m the voice of all the moms,” said Decker addressing a recent incident when she received backlash after nursing Forrest while drinking a glass of wine.”
““I definitely feel like they get heat for certain things.”
“I know I m a great mother there s not one doubt in my mind I know that I take care of my babies I know that they feel loved and they feel happy added the author of Just Jessie My Guide to Love Life Family and Food out Oct...”
“2”
““I don’t have nannies; I take care of my children.”“So if I want to have a cocktail to celebrate my husband doing something great in his work, I’m going to, and I can still breastfeed,” added Decker, 30.”


"When vivi wanted to change his diaper and pick him up, I thought," ah! "But it's good."
"After having three children, you know what's going to happen. He's very easy to get along with, just calm, and the children love him."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Jesse James Decker doesn't have a nanny to take care of her three children:" I take care of my children. "Despite her busy life as a singer, TV star, fashion designer and new writer, Jesse James Decker still has time to be a parent for her children without hiring help."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I really feel like I'm the face of all moms," Decker said of a recent incident, when she was feeding Forrest over a glass of wine and was strongly opposed
"I'm sure they're interested in something."
"I know I'm a great mother, there's no doubt in my heart, I know I take care of my children, I know they feel loved, they feel happy to add just Jesse my guide, love life, family and food in October..."
“2”
"I don't have a babysitter. I take care of my children." "So if I want to have a cocktail to celebrate something great that my husband has done at work, I go, and I can still breastfeed," added Dirk, 30



Number  1319
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The licensed aesthetician and Cole are parents of 16-month-old son Watson, and will welcome a baby girl in September!”
““That would be cute,” said Kailyn.”
“The Teen Mom 2 star revealed on Thursday, May 24, that she sees a fourth child in her future.”
““I want one more,” the 26-year-old shared on her podcast Coffee Convos With Kail Lowry and Lindsie Chrisley.”
“Kailyn is open to having No.”
“4 on her own, but she wants her next pregnancy to be with fellow Teen Mom 2 star Chelsea Houska, who appeared on the Thursday episode.”
““I think we should make a pact that you and Cole [DeBoer] and I go to the sperm bank and we’ll get pregnant together at the time same,” the Hustle and Heart author declared.”
“She then clarified that she will make a solo trip to the sperm bank, but wants Chelsea, 26, and husband Cole to get busy around the same time as her insemination.”
““You know how Snooki and JWoww did their little show on MTV.”
“Chelsea, meanwhile, shares daughter Aubree, 8, with ex-boyfriend Adam Lind.”


"The licensed aesthetician and Cole are the parents of their 16 month old son Watson, who will have a baby girl in September!"
"That's lovely," said Karin
"The young mother, star 2, revealed on Thursday, May 24 that she will have a fourth child in the future."
"I'd like another cup," the 26 year old shared her coffee team with kailloury and lindsie christley on her podcast
"Kailyn would be happy not to."
"Four people, but she hopes her next pregnancy will be with No. 2 star Chelsea hosca, who is also a teenage mother, who appeared on Thursday's show
"I think we should make an agreement that you and Cole (DEB) and I will go to the sperm bank and we will be pregnant together at the same time," declared the author of the sound and the heart
"She later clarified that she would go to the sperm bank on her own, but hoped that 26 year old Chelsea and her husband Cole would be busy at the same time of insemination
"You know how snooki and jwow do their little show on MTV."
"At the same time, Chelsea and former boyfriend Adam Linde share their 8-year-old daughter Aubrey



Number  1320
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And she's like, 'Sure mama, and we are going to live with you while our house is getting ready.'"”
“LOOK: Beyonce wows in killer vamp lipstick: get her gothic lookThe singer's fans adored the tutorial, which Pink speeded up using the app's fast forward function.”
“Pink's six-year-old daughter Willow has given her first ever makeup tutorial and it's too cute for words.”
“The singer shared the clip with her followers and it's already got a 1.4million views.”
“In the video we see Willow sitting at her dressing table with a mirror and sparkly vanity case.”
“The little girl proceeds to test an array of products, and not in all the right places - we're talking blue eyeshadow under her eyes, lipstick on the chin, bronzer everywhere.”
“It's hilarious!”
“Pink captioned the clip: "My little girl and her first makeup tutorial #backstage#rockstarintraining #likemamalikedaughter."”
“Willow's dad Carey Hart shared a photo of her recent makeup fun Photo credit: Instagram/ hartluckWillow is Pink's daughter with Carey Hart and she certainly looks to have inherited her parents' performing talents.”
“We loved watching the fun clip, which sees their daughter start off with a touch of lippy and finish with all the colours on her face.”


"She said," sure, mom, we'll stay with you when the house is ready. "
"Look, Beyonce uses deadly lipstick on the upper: let her fans see that fans love this tutorial, and pink speeds up with the app's fast forward feature."
"Pinker's 6-year-old daughter, Yang Liu, gave her her her first make-up course in history. She was too cute to speak."
"The singer shared this video with her followers, and 1.4 million people have watched it."
"In the video, we see willow sitting at the dresser, holding a mirror and a shiny make-up box."
"The little girl continues to test a series of products, rather than in all the right places. We are talking about the blue eye shadow on her eyes, the lipstick on her chin, and the bronze everywhere."
"How funny
The title of "pink" is: "my little daughter and her first make-up course backstage rock star are like a beautiful daughter."
"Willow's father, Carey Hart, shared a photo of her latest makeup. Photo source: instagram / hartlick willow, the daughter of pink and Carey Hart, looks like she must have inherited her parents' acting talent."
"We love watching this funny video. Their daughter started with lipstick and ended up with color all over her face."



Number  1321
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...make a few new episodes of the show...”
“I have no idea what they d do necessarily with the storyline but yeah sure While this isn t exactly the reunion we were looking for we ll take it and who knows maybe this might spark Disney to get the cast back together sometime before the year 2121 and...”
“While the end of the show made our hearts break (and we'd be lying if we said we're over it), this sweet reunion between the two responsible for our heartbreak is a step in the right direction.”
“Read more A live action Kim Possible movie is in the works For those of you who didn t obsessively watch the show we can t imagine why the show followed the lives of the Diffy family a futuristic family from the year 2121 who got stuck in the year...”
“2004 after their time machine broke during a family vaction...”
“During their time in 2004, Phil meets his best friend, Keely, and let's just say we shipped them before we even knew shipping was a thing.”
“To make a long story short, the show ended with the two confessing their feelings for one another and Phil going back to the future, which completely broke our hearts.”
“The moment our hearts swooned and broke at the same time While we re still not over the fact that these two didn t get a happy ending Aly Michalka and Raviv Ullman made up for our childhood heartbreak by giving us this sweet reunion Ullman posted the moment onto...”
“...his Instagram which made our Disney Channel nostalgia hit us all at once especially because it featured Aly s sister and music partner AJ which you might remember the sisters as being the rocking duo of Aly and AJ”
“As Teen Vogue explains, the reason for this wonderful reunion was because of the AMO Ferragamo party Tuesday night.”


“… Make a few more episodes of the play... "
"I don't know what they're going to do with the storyline, but yes, although it's not the reunion we want, we're going to accept it, who knows it might inspire Disney to reunite the actors sometime 2121 years ago, and..."
"Although the end of the show breaks our hearts (if we say we're over, we're lying), the sweet reunion of the two people responsible for our heartbreak is a step in the right direction."
"More information, a live action movie is being prepared for those who are not obsessed with watching this TV series. We can't imagine why this TV series will follow the life of the diffy family, a futuristic family from 2121, who are in trouble this year..."
"In 2004, their time machine broke down during a family vacation..."
"During their time in 2004, Phil met his best friend, Kiley, and we could say that we brought them here before we knew it was a matter of delivery."
"To make a long story short, at the end of the show, the two admitted their feelings and Phil went back to the future, which broke our hearts completely."
"At that moment, our hearts fainted and broke at the same time, but we were not over yet. These two did not get a happy ending. Alimichalka and Raviv Ulman made up for our heartbreak in childhood and pasted this moment on our sweet reunion...."
“… His instagram made us feel nostalgic about Disney Channel, especially because its protagonist is Ali's sister and music partner AJ. You may still remember the rock group sisters of Ali and AJ. "
"As Teen Vogue explains, this wonderful reunion was due to the AMO Ferragamo party on Tuesday night."



Number  1322
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...s biggest power couple...”
“— Lili Reinhart (@lilireinhart) September 27, 2017Never one to take an insult lying down, Miss Piggy clapped back: "@lilireinhart Tell your diary that moi has moved on from walking over the frog.”
“Let's all get checking out KJ Apa discussing a bunch of dark details from Season 2 of Riverdale...”
“The battle for Cole's heart kicked off after Riverdale's Lili took to Twitter to throw a bit of shade at the way Miss Piggy treats her longtime love and now ex, Kermit The Frog.”
“"9/26/2017, 9 pm: Dear diary, I'm still thinking about how Miss Piggy walks all over Kermit.”
“And he lets her!"”
“...she wrote.”
“"It's so messed up, diary."”
“9/26/2017, 9 pm:Dear diary, I'm still thinking about how Miss Piggy walks all over Kermit.”
“And he lets her!”


“… The most powerful couple in the world... "
"Lily Reinhart (@ liliireinhart) on September 27, 2017, no one has ever been insulted in bed. Miss Piggy clapped back and said: @ lilieiinhart told your diary that MOI has gone from stepping on a frog."
"Let's take a look at kJ APA and discuss some dark details of Riverdale Season 2..."
"After Lilly of Riverdale tweeted a little bit of a shadow over the way miss piggy treats her longtime lover, now former frog Kermit, Cole's heart fight began."
"September 26, 2017, 9:00 p.m.: Dear diary, I'm still thinking about how miss piggy went all over Kermit."
"He told her to go!"
“…… She wrote
"It's a mess, diary."
"September 26, 2017, 9:00 p.m.: Dear diary, I'm still thinking about how miss piggy went all over Kermit."
"He told her!"



Number  1323
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It should make people reassess the story of why their relationship ended.”The source added that D’Agostino — who is currently in Palm Beach — didn’t know de Lesseps was in town until he read about the arrest.”
““At the time people didn’t believe Tom when he said that Luann had scratched him,” said an insider, “But what happened in Palm Beach shows that this is consistent behavior on Luann’s part.”
“But sources close to the former couple say that the incident casts new light on their breakup.”
“We’re told he’s very sad about de Lesseps’ arrest, especially since it happened close to where their wedding was held almost exactly a year ago.”
“As for D’Agostino, he’s got his own feelings over his ex-wife’s behavior.”
“She is due back in court on January 25, 2018.”
“Judge Booras also gave her permission to leave Florida and return to New York.”
“She also allegedly threatened those nearby, saying: “I’m going to kill you all.”On Sunday, she appeared before Judge Ted Booras and was released without bond.”
“During her encounter with police, de Lesseps reportedly slammed a door and kicked an officer.”
“The Bravo fixture was arrested Sunday morning for disorderly intoxication, battery of an officer, resisting arrest and threatening a public servant.”


"It should allow people to reassess why their relationship ended." Dagostino - currently in Palm Beach - didn't know he was in town until he read about dreiseps' arrest, the source added
"People didn't believe Tom said that Luan scratched him at the time," a person familiar with the matter said, "but what happened in Palm Beach showed that Luan's behavior was consistent."
"But sources close to the former couple said the incident provided new clues to their breakup."
"We heard that he was very sad about the arrest of de Lesseps, especially when it happened near the place where they had their wedding almost exactly a year ago."
"As for dagostino, he has his own feelings about his ex-wife's behavior."
"She will be back in court on January 25, 2018."
"Judge brass also allowed her to leave Florida and return to New York."
She is also said to have threatened people nearby, saying, "I'm going to kill all of you." On Sunday, she appeared before Judge Ted Blass and was released without any guarantee
"It's reported that dreisepps slammed a door and kicked a policeman when he met a policeman."
On Sunday morning, the "wonderful" man was arrested for drunkenness, beating an official, resisting arrest and threatening a civil servant



Number  1324
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Megan McCluskey at megan.mccluskey@time.com.”
“* The request timed out and you did not successfully sign up.”
“If you thought that seeing Jon Snow come face to face with a dragon was majestic, just wait until you see him imitating one of Daenerys’ fire-breathing children.”
“In an Instagram video shared by Mother of Dragons Emilia Clarke on Thursday, Kit Harington — who plays the King in the North — can be seen flapping his fur-lined cape as if it was a pair of wings on the same windy cliff where his character was introduced to Drogon.”
“MORE: To stay up to date on everything Game of Thrones, follow our all-encompassing Facebook page and sign up for our exclusive newsletter.”
““I mean, JEEEZE, one pet of a dragon and he thinks he’s one of them,” Clarke captioned the hilarious clip.”
“Watch the behind-the-scenes video below.”
““Beyond the Wall,” the sixth episode of Game of Thrones‘ seventh season, airs Aug. 20 at 9 p.m. on HBO.”
“Get The Brief.”
“Sign up to receive the top stories you need to know right now.”


"To Megan McCluskey Megan McCluskey @ time.com."
"* the request timed out. You did not register successfully."
"If you think it's dignified to see Jon Snow face-to-face with a dragon, wait to see him imitate a flaming child of danielis."
"In an instagram video shared by Emilia Clarke, mother of dragons, on Thursday, kit Harington, who plays the king in the north, can be seen flapping his fur lined Cape as if it were a pair of wings on the same windy cliff his character was introduced to drogon."
"More information: to learn the latest information about game of thrones, please follow our all inclusive Facebook page and sign up for our exclusive newsletter."
"I mean, Geez, the pet of a dragon, he thinks he's one of them," Clark wrote in this funny clip
"Watch the video behind the scenes below."
"Beyond the wall," the sixth episode of game of Thrones Season 7, was broadcast on HBO at 9 p.m. on August 20
"Get the briefing."
"Sign up now to receive the top stories you need to know."



Number  1325
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I got skinny, true, but the pills caused my heart to race, and I knew in my gut that I was hurting myself.””
“Diet and cooking out of my cook book #wholenewyou,” she captioned the photo.”
“After being diagnosed with endometriosis, the Sister Sister actress overhauled her diet and has been sticking to the principles outlined in her cookbook Whole New You.”
“She shuns “processed, packaged” foods and instead opts for “whole foods” like fruits, vegetables, seeds and whole grains, she told PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“And the Tia Mowry At Home star, 38, is thrilled with the results, which she recently shared on Instagram.”
“The mom posted an image of herself wearing leggings and lifting up her t-shirt to reveal her abs, “I’ve lost 20 pounds!”
“Many asked how?”
“Although she mostly sticks to clean eating, Mowry will still indulge in the occasional treat.”
““I’m not proud of it.”


"I'm thin, yes, but these pills make my heart beat faster, and I know in my heart that I've hurt myself."
"Recipes and cooking are all from my cookbook," she wrote in the title of the photo
After being diagnosed with endometriosis, the sister actress radically changed her eating habits and stuck to the principles outlined in the recipe "the new you."
She told people that instead of eating "processed, packaged" foods, she chose fruits, vegetables, seeds and whole grains
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"TIA Mowry, 38, a star at home, is very excited about the result, which she recently shared on instagram."
The mother posted a picture of herself wearing tights and lifting her T-shirt to show her abs. "I lost 20 pounds!"
"A lot of people ask what's going on?"
"Although she mostly insists on a clean diet, mowey still enjoys it occasionally."
"I'm not proud of that."



Number  1326
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Kendall Jenner Will Never Have Her Own Spinoff, According to Kris...”
“As this chapter of Kardashian-Jenner life comes to a close, we can go back to focusing on the A plot, aka Kylie Jenner's maybe pregnancy.”
“Prior to that, Jenner and Griffin were spotted on another double hang-out in August, during which, it was said, Jenner was less than enthused about Griffin's affections.”
“Also seen canoodling were rumored parents-to-be Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott, who were there in attendance on a double-date.”
“Jenner and Griffin were previously seen canoodling at Universal Studios's Halloween Horror Nights in October.”
“"There was nothing that caused this specifically and they will always be friends," the source continued, adding that Jenner "has a lot on her plate and isn't really looking for a serious relationship."”
“News that indeed, things were not serious, and that the frequent hangouts have lessened in the past month, but added that this wasn't due to any major event.”
“Another source told E!”
“Said insider is reportedly not the only one who can confirm the "slowing down" of things.”
“Kendall always says that Blake makes her laugh and that's why she loves being around him."”


"Related report: according to Chris, Kendall Jenner will never have his own offspring..."
"As this chapter of Kardashian Jenner's life draws to a close, we can refocus on plot a, which is Kelly Jenner's pregnancy."
"Before that, Jenna and Griffin were found out on another double date in August, when Jenna was said to be less passionate about Griffin."
"There are also rumors that Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott's parents went on a double date."
"Jenna and Griffin were seen before the Universal Studios on the Halloween night in October.
"Nothing in particular leads to this, they are always friends," the source continued, adding that Jenner "has a lot to do, not really looking for a serious relationship."
"In fact, it's not serious, frequent loitering has decreased in the past month, but it's not because of any major events," he added
"Another source told me!"
"It is reported that people familiar with the situation are not the only one who can confirm that the situation is" slowing down. "
"Kendall always says black makes her laugh, that's why she likes to be with him."



Number  1327
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“TotalBellas, Sundays, 9/8c, E!”
“And maybe potential proof that John is willing to change and win Nikki back?”
“To her, it’s another example of Nikki sacrificing so much for John.”
“Brie is surprised sis would not do it in Napa Valley and Wine Country.”
“It’s revealed that Nikki put her dream wedding plans on the back burner to make John happy with nuptials taking place in John’s hometown of West Newberry, Massachusetts.”
“Never question a rug man.”
“He loves those.”
“But if there is one thing John apparently can’t get enough of is rugs.”
“By the way John was reacting even near Birdie it’s hard to picture him in the parental role.”
“It’s something Nikki began accepting, but she is hinting toward the opposite.”


"Total Bellas, Sunday, 9 / 8 degrees Celsius, e!"
"What's the potential evidence that John might be willing to change and win back Nicky?"
"For her, it's another example of Nicky sacrificing so much for John."
"Bree was surprised that her sister would not do that in Napa Valley and wine country."
"It's revealed that Nicky put aside her dream wedding plan to make John happy about the wedding in his hometown of sinuiberry, Massachusetts."
"Never ask the carpet man."
"He likes these."
"But if there's one thing John obviously can't be satisfied with, it's the carpet."
"By the way, John's reaction is even close to that of a bird. It's hard to imagine him playing the role of a parent."
"That's what Nicky started to accept, but she hinted at the opposite."



Number  1328
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I'm glad it's all being exposed and I hope that we can eventually put an end to it."”
“"Thinking about what so many women have gone through and the courage they have to come out as well.”
“"It's horrific listening to all the stories," she said.”
“News that she hasn’t been in a situation similar to the victims who are stepping forward, but has nothing but love and support for the women who have been put in these dangerous situations.”
“Cameron Bure noted to E!”
“...wrong and what s appropriate for people to ask of you and not and not to be afraid to speak out Making sure to emphasize incredible lessons like this may explain why Cameron Bure and her children are so close...”
“News that Those are conversations that we have and really that I ve been having with my children since they were young because that s what parenting is about and helping them be secure with who they are and having moral boundaries and knowing what s right and what s...”
“Based on her exposure, Cameron Bure stated that she’s already had the conversation with her before, telling E!”
“Natasha is already in the public eye, having competed on The Voice back in 2016.”
“The Fuller House star has three teens at home — Natasha, Lev, and Maksim.”


"I'm glad it's been exposed, and I hope we can finally end it."
"Think about what so many women have gone through and have courage."
"It's terrible to hear these stories," she said
"It is reported that she is in a different situation from the victims who are coming forward, but she has only love and support for these women in danger."
"Cameron Bray to e!"
“… Wrong, people ask you what's right, don't be afraid to say it, be sure to emphasize an incredible lesson like this, which may explain why Cameron Bray and her children are so close... "
"These are all conversations between us. I've been talking to children since they were very young, because that's the meaning of parenting, helping them understand their identity, have moral boundaries, know what's right and what's right..."
"According to her exposure, Cameron Bray said she had talked to her before. Tell e!"
"Natasha participated in the dubbing competition as early as 2016, and now she is in the public eye."
The heroine of Fuller's house has three children - Natasha, Lev and maxim



Number  1329
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Mehera Bonner Contributor Mehera Bonner is a news writer who focuses on celebrities and royals— follow her on InstagramThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Follow Marie Claire on Facebook for the latest celeb news, beauty tips, fascinating reads, livestream video, and more.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“And yeah, you better believe legendary makeup icon Pat McGrath is responsible for that bold lip.”
“Getty ImagesStylist Eugene Souleiman used a heavy coating of gold glitter/paint on Hadid's hair in the place of dye, and we can all agree that the results are incredible—not to mention incredibly "do try this at home" inspiring.”
“She actually hacked her way to a "blondes have more fun" moment thanks to the power of glitter.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Mehera Bonner writer Mehera Bonner is a news writer who follows celebrities and royalty - follows her on instagram. This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Follow Marie Claire on Facebook for the latest celebrity news, beauty tips, great reading, livestream videos, etc."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Yes, you'd better believe that the legendary makeup idol pat McGrath is responsible for this bold lip."
"Getty Images stylist Eugene Souleiman replaced the dye with a thick layer of golden flash / Pigment on Hadid's hair, and we can all agree that the results are incredible, not to mention the incredible 'try this at home' inspiring."
"In fact, thanks to the power of flash, she had a moment when" blondes have a better time. "



Number  1330
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Puma's cool streetwear styles are now a hot commodity in the fashion world.”
“PumaBlame Rihanna (and possibly Kylie Jenner, and possibly The Weeknd) for this one.”
“GuessCourtesy of GuessA$AP Rocky has been collaborating with Guess on a few collections and has successfully brought the brand back to the forefront of pop culture.”
“4.”
“Calvin KleinCalvin Klein has made such an aggressive comeback that you can't even go a day without seeing a model on Instagram sporting the brand.”
“3.”
“EspritCourtesy of Opening CeremonyEsprit was popular back in the 1980s and 90s, and thanks to a collaboration with Opening Ceremony, you're starting to see the logo more and more places again.”
“2.”
“Juicy CoutureFirst Kylie Jenner wore a black Juicy Couture track suit and then Urban Outfitters collaborated with Juicy Couture for a limited-edition collection of velour track suits, rompers, crop tops and more.”
“1.”


"Puma's cool street style has now become a hot commodity in the fashion world."
"Name Rihanna (maybe Kelly Jenner, maybe this week),"
"Guess is provided by guess a $AP, and rocky has been working with guess to launch a number of series and successfully bring the brand back to the forefront of popular culture."
“4.”
"With Calvin Klein's strong comeback, you can't even spend a day without seeing a model showing off the brand on instagram."
“3.”
"Opening ceremony etiquette" was very popular as early as the 1980s and 1990s. Due to the cooperation with the opening ceremony, you begin to see this sign in more and more places
“2.”
"Firstly, Kylie Jenner wore a black jersey, and then Urban Outfitters cooperated with Jersey to launch a series of limited edition velvet sportswear, jumpsuits, and so on."
“1.”



Number  1331
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Congratulations ... looks like someone already has a Godfather!”
“Darcell's family wasn't at the show but she immediately texted them a video and they "freaked out," naturally.”
“We're told the pregnancy announcement was a huge success.”
“Of course, Darcell didn't get partake.”
“JT then proclaimed, "this deserves a toast" and walked off the stage to grab a platter full of shots, as he does.”
“She eventually got the okay but was warned security inside the venue would probably take her sign – so she hid it underneath her shirt ... along with her tiny baby bump.”
“"[Security] was literally taking it out of my hands and I was like 'noooo, please, please!'"”
“Darcell tells The Blast security initially told her there were no signs allowed.”
“"Baby Baxtresser arriving November 1, 2018," the singer read aloud, and even gave the kid a catchy nickname: Baby Bax.”
“The singer lit up as he helped the mommy-to-be make the big announcement to her immediate family – and a packed arena.”


"Congratulations... It seems that someone already has a godfather! "
Dassel's family was not on the show, but she immediately sent them a video, and they were naturally "scared"
"We were told that the pregnancy declaration was very successful."
"Of course, dassel didn't participate."
JT goes on to announce, "it's worth cheering," and then goes off the stage and grabs a plate full of cameras, just like he did
"She finally got permission, but was warned that security at the venue might take her logo - so she hid it under her shirt... And her little lump
It's like, "no, please, please!"
"Dassel told the security guard that there was no sign at first."
"Baby Baxter will arrive on November 1, 2018," the singer read aloud, even giving the child an attractive nickname: Baby Bax
"The singer lights up when she helps the mother to be announce this big news to her immediate family - a packed arena."



Number  1332
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Kylie Minogue Opposes Kylie Jenner's Attempt to Trademark the Name 'Kylie'Kylie Minogue Reportedly Wins Legal War With Kylie Jenner Over Name TrademarkChrissy Teigen Is Asked About Khloe Kardashian and Kylie Jenner’s Pregnancies on ‘WWHL’”
“Minogue appeared to majorly shade Jenner in her letter to the U S Patent and Trademark Office last year which described her as a secondary reality television personality while she called herself an internationally renowned performing artist humanitarian and breast...”
“The 49 year old singer opened up about her trademark battle with Kylie Jenner over the name Kylie in a new interview with Rolling Stone explaining that the dispute which she won in 2017 after Jenner attempted to trademark the...”
“...name in 2014 was nothing personal...”
“"I've never met Kylie Jenner.”
“I've never met any member of the family -- actually, I've met Kendall just in passing at a fashion event -- but I honestly don't know them," Minogue says.”
“"It's awkward, because fans get so loyal and vocal, and we love that!”
“But it was nothing personal at all, I'm at pains to say."”
“"Trademark is long, it's boring, it's expensive, and it's really important.”
“I've been doing that for years and years.”


"Related content: Kelly Milo opposes Kelly Jenner's attempt to brand the name" Kelly. "Kelly Milo is reported to have won a legal battle with Kelly Jenner over trademarks. Chris tegan was asked about Carol Kardashian and Kelly Jenner's pregnancy on" wwhl. "
"Milo seemed to exaggerate Jenna in her letter to the U.S. patent and trademark office last year, saying that Jenna is the second reality TV character, and she claims to be an internationally renowned performing artist, humanitarian and breast..."
"In a new interview with Rolling Stone magazine, the 49 year old singer made public her trademark dispute with Kylie Jenner over the name Kelly and explained the dispute she won in 2017, when Jenner tried to use the name Kelly as a trademark..."
“… The name of 2014 is not personal... "
"I've never met Kelly Jenner."
"I've never met any members of the family - in fact, I just ran into Kendall at a fashion event - but I really don't know them," Milo said
"It's embarrassing because fans have become so loyal and outspoken, and we like that!"
"But it's not personal at all, it's hard for me to say."
"Trademarks are long, boring, expensive and important."
"I've been doing this for years."



Number  1333
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To see how it all went down, check out our live blog of the Season 30 finale.”
“Love you Jess and Cody!”
“Reactions from the reality TV show’s passionate fanbase range from supportive cheers to negative jeers.”
“Are YOU happy that Cody and Jessica won the $1 million prize and will now start a family?”
“Sound off down in the comments section after reading a sampling of fan reactions.”
“SEE Jessica Graf and Cody Nickson deserved to win ‘The Amazing Race,’ say 60% of fansTracie Parker: “Way to go ‘Big Brother’ lovebirds!!!!!!!!”
“I’ve been for those guys since the first day of ‘Big Brother.”
“Hk Never watching this show again I hate the Big Brother couple they should have never had the chance to even be on this show SEE The Amazing Race 30 winners Jessica Graf and Cody Nickson interview After Big Brother this was our redemption project WATCH Jasmine Porter This is...”
“...redemption for them being screwed on Big Brother...”
“Whoooooooo!”


"To see how it all works, check out our live blog for season 30 finale."
"Love you, Jesse and Cody!"
"The response of the enthusiastic fans of reality TV shows ranges from cheers of support to negative ridicule."
"Cody and Jessica won a million dollars and are you happy to be married now?"
"After reading the fan response sample, please make a sound in the comments section."
"Seeing that Jessica Graff and Cody Nixon deserved to win the" magic game ", 60% of van Stracy Parker said:" big brother love bird, good job ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
"I've been supporting those guys since big brother's first day."
"Hong Kong won't watch this show any more. I hate big brother and his wife. They shouldn't have had the chance to watch this show. Watch the interview of Jessica Graf and Cody Nixon after big brother. This is our salvation plan. Watch Molly Potter. This is..."
“… They were fooled by big brother... "
"Wow



Number  1334
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's 2018 and awful guys don't deserve great girlfriends.”
“Randall Emmett is 46.”
“It might mean that he's lying to this girl -- and maybe to someone else in his life.”
“It might mean that he's unsure about this relationship.”
“"He's like inconsistent, which as women I think is f--ked up, like don't be inconsistent."”
“That's not a great sign.”
“Uh-oh.”
“"And they've never been official but he was like really cute at the beginning and then he falls off the earth."”
“Lala will turn 28 this year.”
“"There's quite an age gap, it's kind of like me and my man, she's my age, maybe a little older...he's like in his later 40s."”


"It's 2018, and bad men don't deserve good girlfriends."
"Randall Emmett is 46 years old."
"It could mean he's lying to this girl - it could mean he's lying to other people in his life."
"It may mean that he's not sure about the relationship."
"He's an unstable person, and as a woman, I think he's a bad person, just like not being unstable."
"It's not a good sign."
"Ah, oh."
"They've never been formal, but he was cute at first, and then he fell off the ground."
"Lala will turn 28 this year."
"The age gap is quite big. It's a bit like me and my man. She is the same age as me, maybe a little bigger He looks like he's in his 40s. "



Number  1335
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign up here for our daily Thrillist email, and get your fix of the best in food/drink/fun.”
“Watch David's uncontrollable laughter above, and catch the last couple installments of "Mean Tweets" here and here.”
“It makes sense that a guy who plays a jerk on TV would have a real understanding the kind of trolling he had to perform.”
“He read a handful of tweets and could hardly get through any of them.”
“Kimmel decided to air the outtakes of David's shoot the next night.”
“It turns out David couldn't handle reading any of the tweets he was given during the shoot.”
“David wasn't able to keep it together afterward, which is fair because that's a savage tweet.”
“He had a tweet that read, "I forgot Jimmy Kimmel's name so I googled 'Ugly late night talk show host' and I got him, top link."”
“The most notable tweet -- besides Chris Hemsworth's confusion -- might have been Larry David's.”
“However, instead of reading the tweets himself, the show invited celebrity friends to read mean tweets about Kimmel.”


"Sign up for our daily adventure email here and get your best food / drink / fun."
"Take a look at David's uncontrollable laughter above, and capture the last issues of" mean twitter "here and here."
"It makes sense that someone who plays a jerk on TV will really understand the kind of prank he has to perform."
"He read a few microblogs, but he couldn't see through any of them."
"Kimmel decided to broadcast David's photos the next night."
"David didn't understand any tweets he received during the shooting."
"It's fair that David didn't put it together later, because it was a savage tweet."
"I forgot Jimmy Kimmel's name, so I googled 'ugly late night talk show host,' and I found him, the link," he tweeted
"Aside from Chris Hemsworth's confusion, the most compelling tweet is probably Larry David's."
"However, the show is not to watch Weibo by itself, but to invite celebrity friends to watch the caustic Weibo about Kimmel."



Number  1336
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Rock and dog-JLo are pretty cute together, but we gotta say, the real deal is hard to beat.”
“Well, kind of.”
“These two also teamed up for another very special project a couple months back.”
“But this isn’t their first collab.”
“Whether it’s on stage…Or with some heavy-duty weights…These two know how to get the job done.”
“Just thinking about the kind of workouts JLo and The Rock must get up to is exhausting.”
“!” JLo wrote in her post, adding the hashtags #hardworkwins and #youcantstopwhatwontstop.”
““Thanks for the love and for all the positive energy and inspiration you put out into the world!”
“Yesterday, Lopez and Johnson teamed up for a sweat sesh and wee can only imagine the kind of routine they came up with.”
“No, they’re not a couple—but they are a “couple of gym rats” according to JLo’s Instagram post.”


"Rock and dog JLO are lovely together, but we have to say that the real deal is hard to beat."
"Well, a little."
"The two worked on another very special project a few months ago."
"But it's not the first time they've worked together."
"Whether it's on stage Or in the case of loading Both of them know how to get the job done. "
"It's exhausting to think about the training that JLO and rock have to do."
"!" JLO wrote in her post, adding the labels "hardworkwins" and "you can top what wontstop"
"Thank you for your love, for the positive energy and inspiration you bring to the world!"
"Yesterday, Lopez and Johnson sweated together, and Seth and vie could only imagine the routine they came up with."
"No, they're not a couple, but according to JLO's instagram post, they're a pair of 'gym mice'."



Number  1337
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““That’s kinda what this record is about, it’s just like 360-degree liberation,” she said.”
“AdvertisementWhile the Song to the Rythm songstress still had to respond to all these comments coming from Rose, she revealed the meaning behind her newest diss track with Nicki Minaj, Swish Swish.”
“After this, rumors began speculating the fact that Ruby’s rand was inspired by her friendship with Taylor Swift who is currently in a feud with Perry.”
“She also said that she think that everything that is going on in the world from re-branding as political activist only to ditch it and go low is quite a bummer.”
““However I shouldn’t stoop because then the [message] is mixed.”The whole drama began when Ruby Rose targeted Katy Perry and her “sloppy mess” (how she called it) of newly released tracks and also the singer’s participation in Hillary Clinton’s run for president.”
““Clearly comes from being bullied in school & wanting to stick up for the underdogs,” she concluded.”
“She also admitted the fact that she is not God and she is not able to tell when this will happen.”
“...that Karma does exist and the truth always comes to the surface no matter what you do...”
“Truth is being mean leaves more leaks in your camp than the titanic and I get so triggered when I think bullies don t get held accountable and it makes me think I should say something but it s not my place She continued saying that she has always believed...”
““Being mean doesn’t suit me and leaves me feeling dirty,” the Orange Is the New Black starlet posted.”


"That's what this record is about, like a 360 degree liberation," she said
"Although the song was given to rythm, she still had to respond to all the comments from rose, revealing the meaning behind her latest diss track with Nicki Minaj, swish swish."
"After that, rumors began to speculate that Ruby's Rand was inspired by her friendship with Taylor Swift, who is currently at odds with Perry."
"She also said that she believes that everything that is going on in the world, from reshaping the image of political activists to abandoning the image of political activists to going to the bottom, is pretty bad."
"However, I shouldn't bend down because [information] was mixed up at that time." At the beginning of the play, Ruby Rose's goal is Katie Perry and her new release of "dirty mess" (what she calls it), as well as the singer's participation in Hillary Clinton's presidential campaign
"Obviously, it's because of being bullied at school and trying to stand up for the weak," she concluded
"She also admits that she is not God, and she can't tell when it will happen."
“… Karma does exist, and no matter what you do, the truth always comes to the surface... "
"The truth is despicable. There are more leakers in your camp than Titanic. When I feel that the bullies are not held responsible, I am triggered. It makes me feel that I should say something, but this is not my place. She continues that she always believes in..."
"Being mean doesn't suit me, it makes me feel dirty," orange is the new black star posted



Number  1338
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share this: TwitterFacebook...”
“This journey is yours!”
“In a new clip released by E!”
“...ahead of Wednesday night’s WAGS, Kesha reveals that she and CJ have separated since he found the hidden camera in the house.”
“She is now staying in the townhouse, and he is staying at the couple’s mansion.”
““Since he found the secret security camera that I put in, C.J.”
“...and I are separated,” Kesha shared.”
““Things have been very uncomfortable for us…It really was for me to know if my relationship is where it needs to be right now.”“Realistically, when someone hurts you, they have to be willing to put the time in to help you get over that,” Kesha shared with Kierra.”
“Okay, so I shared last week in my recap of the premiere episode that Kesha was still dealing with trust issues and hurt from CJ’s past infidelities.”
“Now in the clip, Kesha is saying that CJ has to be willing to put in the time to help her get over it?”


"Share this: Twitter, facebook..."
"This trip is yours!"
"Release the E in a new clip!"
"Before the party on Wednesday night, Kesha revealed that she and CJ had separated since CJ found the hidden camera in the house."
"She lives in a townhouse now, and he lives in the couple's mansion."
"Ever since he discovered the secret camera I put in, C.J."
"Separated from me," said Kesha
"Things make us uncomfortable I really want to know if my relationship is needed now. " "Realistically, when someone hurts you, they have to be willing to take the time to help you overcome that," Kesha and Kira share
"Well, so I said last week in the replay of the premiere that Kesha is still dealing with trust issues and hurt by CJ's past infidelity."
"Now in the clip, does Katha mean CJ has to be willing to put in time to help her out?"



Number  1339
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementIt seems like we will get multiple opportunities to see both Alex Rodriguez and Michael Strahan on television in the future.”
“In addition to GMA, Strahan is also the host of the $100,000 Pyramid, and he co-hosts FOXs NFL pregame show during football season.”
“Sources say that the move comes after Strahan got upset over the addition of future baseball Hall-Of-Famer Alex Rodriguez as a GMA contributor.”
““Tell your friends, tell your family, tell the whole town, shout it from the rooftops,” Strahan tweeted.”
““Starting September 10th @sarahaines and I will be hosting the 3rd hour of @GMA!”
“#gmaday #gma”Strahan has been a popular part of the morning news show since he left his job as co-host of Live!”
“...with Kelly Ripa in 2016.”
“But recently, when the network hired Rodriguez without his input, he was not happy and felt threatened by the move.”
“We’re so excited to announce that @michaelstrahan and @sarahaines will be co-hosts of #GMADay – our new third hour, premiering Sept. 10 at 1pm ET / 12pm C/P!”
“...https://t.co/W5KClVZvJP pic.twitter.com/z9GkaM5irv — Good Morning America (@GMA) July 23, 2018Instead of battling Rodriguez for airtime – or being worried about the former baseball player taking his place – Strahan made the move to the spinoff, and his future co-host is excited about the new show.”


"It seems that we will have a lot of opportunities to see Alex Rodriguez and Michael Strahan on TV in the future."
"In addition to GMA, Strahan is also the host of the $100000 pyramid. He co hosted fox NFL's pre game show during the football season."
"It's been reported that Strahan is upset about future Hall of fame player Alex Rodriguez joining the GMA contributors."
"Tell your friends, tell your family, tell the whole town, shout out from the roof," Strahan tweeted
"From September 10, @ sarahaines and I will host the third hour of @ GMA!"
Since he quit his job as live co host, Strahan has been a hot part of the morning news
“…… Working with Kelly Ripa in 2016. "
"But recently, when the network hired him without Rodriguez's participation, he was not happy and felt threatened by the move."
"We are very pleased to announce that @ michaelstrahan and @ sarahaines will co host gmaday, our new third hour, premiere at 1:00 p.m. / 12:00 p.m. EST on September 10!"
“... https://t.co/W5KClVZvJPpic.twitter.com/z9GkaM5irv- Good morning, USA (@ GMA) on July 23, 2018, Strahan did not compete with Rodriguez for broadcast time, nor did he worry that the former baseball player would replace him, but chose another position, and his future co host was excited about the new program



Number  1340
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He did tone it down in 2014 when he played the show, but in 2015, he tweeted, "I'm five minutes into the #VMAs and I already need a shower."”
“...f**k you VMA's."”
“Actually, make that two people: His wife, Behati Prinsloo, was also unimpressed with the show.”
“Levine, who is also a coach on "The Voice," was not afraid to burn any bridges with MTV's signature awards show.”
“But the Maroon 5 singer actually started off the night encouraging his fans to vote for his friend, Julia Michaels, for best new artist.”
“My girl @imjmichaels is in the final round for Best New Artist at the VMAs!”
“Use hashtag #VoteJuliaMichaels to vote.”
“Retweets don't count!”
“ — Adam Levine (@adamlevine) August 28, 2017Then things turned sour when the VMAs cut to a commercial break during Michaels' performance of her song "Issues" (she did not win the award for best new artist, either).”
“Levine tweeted, "It's always exciting to see how utterly horrible the VMAs will be.”


"He did tone down in 2014, but in 2015, he tweeted," I've been in 'Vmas' for five minutes, and I need to take a bath. "
“… You're from VMA. "
"As a matter of fact, those two people, his wife, beharty prinslow, are not interested in the play either."
"Levin, who is also the coach of the voice, is not afraid to bridge with MTV's signature award program."
"But the maroon 5 singer actually started encouraging his fans to vote for his friend Julia Michaels as the best newcomer that night."
"My girl @ imjmichaels entered the final round of Vmas Best Newcomer Award!"
"Use the label # votejulia Michaels to vote."
"Forwarding doesn't count!"
——Adam Levine (@ adamlevine) on August 28, 2017, when Michael sang the song issues, VMA entered a business break (she didn't win the Best Newcomer Award), and things got worse
"It's always exciting to see how terrible VMA is going to be," Levin tweeted



Number  1341
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...t Back Down From 2017 CMT Artists of the Year Keith Urban feat...”
“...the Year Backstreet Boys and Florida Georgia Line Everybody From CMT Crossroads Charles Kelley Jason Aldean Darius Rucker and Derek Trucks Midnight Rider From 2017 CMT Music Awards Earth Wind Fire and Lady Antebellum September From CMT Crossroads Jason Aldean Keith Urban Chris Stapleton and Little Big Town I Won...”
“Other categories were announced by the Associated Press.”
“Ballerini helped announce the nominees in three categories during Tuesday’s (May 8) Today show on NBC.”
“Andra Day, Backstreet Boys, Carly Pearce, Common, Derek Trucks, Devin Dawson, High Valley, LANco, Russell Dickerson, Walker Hayes and Earth, Wind & Fire are also among the CMT Music Awards’ first-time nominees.”
“Additionally, the 2018 nominations mark the first time pop musicians Rexha, Ludacris and Justin Timberlake are recognized in the video of the year category along with videos from Rhett, Blake Shelton, Brett Young, Brothers Osborne, Dan + Shay, Kane Brown featuring Alaina, Kelsea Ballerini and Luke Combs.”
“Following Aldean, FGL and Underwood with three nominations each are Little Big Town, Chris Stapleton, Lauren Alaina and Thomas Rhett.”
“Aldean’s four nominations are also in the video, male video and CMT performance of the year categories.”
“...the year...”
“Florida Georgia Line and Bebe Rexha share nominations for video and collaborative video of the year for Meant to Be while the Brian Kelley co directed Smooth video is up for duo video and Everybody from FGL s CMT Crossroads with the Backstreet Boys is nominated for CMT performance of...”


“… Retreat from the feat of CMT artist of the year Keith Urban in 2017... "
“… Backstreet boys and Florida Georgia line from CMT crossroads Charles Kelly Jason aldian Darius rock and Derek truck midnight knight from CMT Music Awards 2017 earth stormfire and Madame prewar September from CMT crossroads Jason aldian Keith city christendon and small big city I won... "
"Other categories are published by the associated press."
"Ballerini helped announce three categories of nominees on NBC's today show on Tuesday (May 8)," he said
"Andrea day, backstreet boys, Carly Pierce, common, Derek truck, Devon Dawson, Goku, lanko, Russell Dixon, Walker Hayes and earth, wind and fire are also the first nominees for the CMT Music Awards."
"In addition, the 2018 nomination marks the first time that pop musicians rexa, Ludacris and Justin Timberlake have been selected in the video category of the year, as well as videos by Rhett, Blake Sheldon, Brett young, the Osborne brothers, Dan Shea, Alana starring Kane brown, Kelsey Ballerini and Luke combs."
"After Alden, fugley and Underwood, the three nominees are Xiaocheng, Chris Stapleton, Lauren arena and Thomas Reid."
"Aldean's four nominations are also in the category of video, men's video and CMT annual performance."
“… This year... "
"Florida Georgia line and Bebe Rexha share annual video and cooperative video nominations, while Brian Kelley's smooth video is duo video, and everyone from FGL's CMT crossroads and backstreet boys is nominated for CMT performance..."



Number  1342
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Alan Bersten Tonya Harding with Sasha Farber POPULAR VIDEO ON VARIETY”
“The full pairings are below Adam Rippon with Jenna Johnson Arike Ogunbowale with Gleb Savchenko Chris Mazdzer with Witney Carson Jamie Anderson with Artem Chigvintsev Jennie Finch Daigle with Keo Motsepe Johnny Damon with Emma Slater Josh Norman with Sharna Burgess Kareem Abdul Jabbar with Lindsay Arnold Mirai Nagasu with...”
“This season will be the shortest to date for the series, lasting only four weeks with double eliminations every week.”
“The new season of “Dancing With the Stars” premieres April 30 at 8 p.m. ET/PT on ABC.”
“It’s not surprising the ABC competition series is focusing on athletes this season given the continued success of athletes on the show such as past winners Emmitt Smith, Apolo Anton Ohno, Kristi Yamaguchi, Shawn Johnson, and Laurie Hernandez.”
“Len Goodman, Carrie Ann Inaba, and Bruno Tonioli will be back at the judges’ table, and Tom Bergeron and Erin Andrews will return as hosts.”
“The professional dancers joining her are Sharna Burgess, Witney Carson, Emma Slater, Jenna Johnson, Gleb Savchenko, Artem Chigvintsev, Keo Motsepe, Alan Bersten, and Sasha Farber.”
“Lindsay Arnold is returning to defend her title after winning last season with musician Jordan Fisher.”
“Rounding out the list of 10 athletes are Josh Norman, Arike Ogunbowale, Chris Mazdzer, Johnny Damon, Mirai Nagasu, and Kareem Abdul-Jabbar.”
“Previously announced cast members were Olympians Adam Rippon, Jamie Anderson, Jennie Finch, and Tonya Harding.”


"Popular video of Alan belsten Tonya Harding and Sasha Farber on variety show"
"The complete pairing is as follows: Adam Rippon, Jenna Johnson, Alic ogonballe, grubby safchenko, Chris Mazel, vitny Carson, Jamie Anderson, altem chiwentsev, Jeanne finch dagger, Kio motsepe Johnny Damon, Emma Slater Josh Norman, and Shana Burgess Karim a Boudoul Jabbar, Lindsay Arnold Miley Caucasus and... "
"This season will be the shortest in the series so far, lasting only four weeks, with two knockouts per week."
Dancing with the stars will premiere on ABC at 8 p.m. EST on April 30
"It's not surprising that the ABC competition series focuses on athletes this season, given the continued success of athletes such as past winners Emmett Smith, Apollo Anton Daye, Christie Yamaguchi, Sean Johnson, Laurie Hernandez."
"Ron Goodman, Carrie Ann Inaba and Bruno tonioli will return to the judges, and Tom bergeran and Irene Andrews will return as hosts."
"Her professional dancers are Shana Burgess, vitny Carson, Emma Slater, Jenna Johnson, glebe savinko, altem ziegwenzev, Kio mosepe, Ellen belsten and Sasha Farber."
"Lindsay Arnold will be back in defence after winning last season with musician Jordan Fisher
"In the list of 10 athletes, Josh Norman, Alec ogonballe, Chris Mazel, Johnny Damon, Miley Caucasus and Karim Abdel Jabbar came fourth."
"Previously announced actors are Olympian Adam Rippon, Jamie Anderson, Jennie Finch and Tony Harding."



Number  1343
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo: Ian Vogler/Getty ImagesThat night, Meghan and Harry went to hang out with some performance artists as part of an event for Courtey Creative.”
“The trench from Club Monaco is sold out, but there’s a doppleganger on sale.”
“Welly wanging is a sport where you try to throw a rainboot (Wellington boot) as far as possible.”
“Apparently, Meghan and her team of schoolchildren of Auckland defeated Harry and his team.”
“Meghan in Auckland, New ZealandFinally, Meghan and Harry have welly wanged.”
“Get the look (or a facsimile) below.”
“She finished the outfit with a gorgeous Oscar de la Renta coat, which is as beautiful and bouncy as her sister-in-law’s hair.”
“It’s still available on Shopbop, FYI.”
“Photo: Clodagh Kilcoyne/WPA Pool/Getty ImagesEven better, she paired them with a relatively inexpensive (for a royal) dress from trendy maternity brand Hatch.”
“Her cow-hide and Lucite heels are by Gianvito Rossi, and they are incredible.”


"Photo: Ian fogler / Getty picture that night, Megan and Harry went to play with some performing artists as part of Coty's creative activities."
"The moat of the club of Monaco is sold out, but there is a doppleganger for sale."
"Well wanting is a sport. You try to throw a rain boot (Wellington boot)
"Obviously Megan and her student team in Auckland beat Harry and his team."
"Megan is in Auckland, New Zealand. In the end, Megan and Harry have a happy dream."
"Please see the picture (or fax) below."
"She did it in a gorgeous Oscar de la Renta coat, as beautiful and elastic as her sister-in-law's hair."
"There's more on shoptop, just for reference."
"Photo: Clodagh kilcoyne / WPA pool / Getty Images even better, she paired them with a relatively cheap (Royal) dress from fashion pregnant women's brand hatch."
"It's incredible that her cowhide and Lucite heels were designed by gianvito Rossi."



Number  1344
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I love you baby, I love you.””
“Rockwell won the SAG Award for outstanding performance by a male actor in a supporting role for Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri, and thanked his “beloved” partner Bibb “who puts up with me.”
“The actor, who is nominated for Best Supporting Actor for his role in the drama Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri, has already taken home a Golden Globe and a SAG Award this awards season (among other accolades) for his portrayal of emotionally disturbed police officer Jason Dixon.”
“And his partner of 10 years, Leslie Bibb, has been cheering alongside him the whole time.”
“Image zoom Credit: Michael Fisher/InstagramRockwell, 49, decided to thank his longtime love for all her support by wearing a pair of custom David Yurman “Leslie Bibb” cufflinks to complement his Prada tuxedo and Christian Louboutin shoes on the Oscars red carpet.”
“According to David Yurman, the custom pieces cost about $5,500 and took a month to make.”
“His glamorous date selected a J. Mendel gown and Neil Lane Jewelry.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Prada has been supportive of Sam and Three Billboards from the very beginning,” Rockwell’s stylist Michael Fisher told PEOPLE.”
““Sam is a method actor and in a lot of ways, Miuccia is a method designer.”


"I love you, baby, I love you."
Rockwell won the American Actors Guild Award for his excellent performance on three billboards outside abin, Missouri, and thanks his "beloved" partner, Bieber, "for tolerating me."
"The actor was nominated for Best Supporting Actor for his role in three billboards out of Missouri, and this season he won Golden Globe and sag (among other honors) for his role as emotional police officer Jason Dixon."
"His partner of 10 years, Leslie Bieber, has been cheering around him."
"Photo zooming credit: Michael Fisher / instagram Rockwell, 49, decided to wear a customized pair of David youman" Leslie Bibb "cufflinks on the Oscar red carpet to complement his Prada evening dress and Christian Louboutin shoes to thank him for his long-standing support for her."
"According to David youman, these custom pieces cost about $5500 and take a month to make."
"His charming date chose a J. Mendel dress and Neil Lane's jewelry."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Prada supported Sam and the three billboards from the beginning," Rockwell stylist Michael Fisher told people
"Sam is a method actor, and in many ways, Murcia is a method designer."



Number  1345
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“His former studio The Weinstein Company officially filed for bankruptcy on March 20, releasing all employees from the Non-Disclosure Agreements they signed while working under Weinstein.”
“McGowan has been one of the most outspoken voices against Weinstein throughout the #MeToo movement.”
“Weinstein allegedly proceeded to sit her on the side of the jacuzzi, where he forcibly performed oral sex on her while masturbating.”
“McGowan went to Weinstein’s hotel suite thinking the two would talk about her career, but he pulled her into a room with a jacuzzi and took off her clothes as soon as she arrived.”
“We win.”A message to Harvey Weinstein on his birthday #RoseArmy pic.twitter.com/YP61rONbjg — rose mcgowan (@rosemcgowan) March 20, 2018According to McGowan’s book, the sexual abuse occurred at the 1997 Sundance Film Festival.”
“Happy fucking birthday.”
“I told you 20 years ago if I heard of you doing this to another girl or woman we would come for you — I would come for you.”
““I told you we’d be coming.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"
"Weinstein, his former studio, formally filed for bankruptcy on March 20, lifting the confidentiality agreement signed by all employees working under Weinstein."
"Throughout the meto'o movement, McGovern has been one of the most outspoken voices against Weinstein."
Weinstein is said to have seated her next to a Jacuzzi, where he masturbated and forced oral sex on her
"McGowan went to Weinstein's hotel suite and thought they would talk about her career, but he pulled her into a room with a jacuzzi and she took off her clothes as soon as she arrived."
"We won." A letter to Harvey Weinstein on his birthday pic.twitter.com/YP61rONbjg -Rose McGowan (@ rosemagowan) March 20, 2018 according to McGowan's book, sexual abuse took place at the 1997 Sundance Film Festival
"Happy Birthday"
"I told you 20 years ago that if I heard you did this to another girl or woman, we would come to you - I would come to you."
"I told you we would come."



Number  1346
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s been six months, and my stomach is lower, my breasts are a different shape, [I have] new stretch marks, and I feel like a stranger in my body more than ever.””
““Each day feels like a battle to learn how to love my body postpartum,” Holliday shared alongside photos of herself in a bra and underwear.”
“The size 22 supermodel took to Instagram on Tuesday, showing video of a male driver asking her about her cholesterol.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““My driver who is fat is questioning if I’m healthy,” Holliday, 31, wrote on the video.”
““My cholesterol is fine, I’m perfect,” she can be heard telling him.”
““I’m healthy.”In the video’s caption, the mother of two claimed the driver’s questioning stopped after she told him she was healthy — as he turned the radio on and changed the subject.”
“Image zoom Credit: Tess Holliday/InstagramThe incident was so upsetting, Holliday said she wouldn’t be using Uber again.”
““Hey @uber I don’t pay more to use your “black car” service to be told that there’s no way I could possibly be healthy because I’m fat & then questioning it,” she said.”
““No one should have to tolerate this at any level of the services you offer.”“I’m fat.”


"It's been six months, my stomach is getting lower and my breasts are changing. I have new stretch marks, and I feel more strange in my body than ever before."
"Every day is like a battle to learn how to love my body after childbirth," Holliday said, sharing photos of himself wearing bras and underwear
The size 22 supermodel posted a video on instagram on Tuesday in which a male driver asked her about her cholesterol
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"My fat driver is questioning my health," Holliday, 31, wrote in the video
"My cholesterol is good, I'm perfect," she told him
"I'm healthy." In the title of the video, the mother of two claims that after she told the driver she was healthy, the driver stopped asking questions - because he turned on the radio and changed the subject
"Image scaling credit: the Tess Holliday / instagram incident is so disturbing that Holliday said she would no longer use Uber."
"Hey @ Uber, I won't spend more money to use your" black car "service, let others tell me that I can't stay healthy because I'm fat, and then question it," she said
"No matter what kind of service you provide, it should not be tolerated." "I'm fat."



Number  1347
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...night...”
“Dia Dipasupil Getty Photographs Lily Aldridge To prep Lily s lips make up artist Quinn Murphy used L Occitane Licensed Natural Pure Shea Butter as a primer to the nude lipstick so her lips would keep moist all through the...”
“We initially have been going to do an extended model of the look however after she had the gown on we realized brief can be higher fitted to the completed look so we minimize it blunt and fluffy Love Hailey...”
“Baldwin s fluffed bob...”
“You possibly can thank superstar hairstylist Justine Marjan and Hidden Crown Hair Clip-in Extensions.”
“From easy hacks to magnificence tips that make these execs borderline genius, our routines can be endlessly grateful.”
“The mannequin’s hair hack is simply the start.”
“Take a look at extra ideas from prime superstar hairstylists and make-up artists under!”
“Dia Dipasupil/Getty Photographs Sarah HylandHairstylist Ryan Richman positioned a hair primer, Paul Mitchell Neuro Prime, which reduces the speed of warmth switch, earlier than utilizing scorching instruments on her hair.”
“JEAN BAPTISTE LACROIX AFP Getty Pictures Janelle Monae For a wholesome purple carpet glow make up artist Jessica Smalls utilized Marc Jacobs Magnificence Glow Stick Glistening Illuminator in Highlight seven hundred above her cheeks and to her forehead bones a...”


“… At night... "
De Di Pasi Pierre Gatti photographed Lili Aldridge, preparing Lili's lips, make-up artist Quinn Murphy using L xxxam natural pure shea butter as primer and coated with naked lipstick so that her lips would remain moist.
"We initially planned to make an extended model of the appearance, but after she put on the dress, we realized that brevity could be more suitable for the finished appearance, so we tried to reduce it as straightforward and fluffy as possible..."
"Baldwin knocked Bob over..."
"You may be able to thank superstar hairdresser Justin Mayan and the extension of the hidden crown hairpin."
"From the simple skills to the wonderful skills that make these executives almost genius, our daily work will be greatly appreciated."
"The haircut of the mannequin is just the beginning."
"Take a look at the extra ideas of superstar hairdressers and makeup artists!"
"Dia dipasupil / Getty photos Sarah Hyland hairstylist Ryan Richman has put a hair primer, Paul Mitchell neuro prime, on his hair, which reduces the speed of the heating switch earlier than using a glowing instrument on his hair."
"Jean-Baptiste Lacroix AFP Getty pictures Janelle monae is a healthy purple carpet glow makeup artist. Jessica smalls uses Marc Jacobs' gorgeous glow stick to use flash illuminators at 700 highlights above the cheek and forehead bone..."



Number  1348
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by ABC]”
“A post shared by Chad Johnson (@realchadjohnson) on Jun 6, 2017 at 9:20pm PDT“Do you want to be in a relationship?” Dr. Darcy asked him.”
“Chad Johnson is still trying to cope with his mother’s death.”
“The Bachelorette star lost his mother just six months before going on the show as a contestant.”
“Chad was immediately one of the standout contestants on the season.”
““Yeah and they turned me into the bad guy.”The Bachelor in Paradise star appeared in a sneak peek for an all-new episode of Famously Single with Dr. Darcy Sterling.”
“Chad appeared to be in an unusually vulnerable state, discussing his personal issues with the therapist in front of the camera, E!”
“News reported.”
“The Bachelorette “villain” opened up to Sterling about how his mother’s death is seemingly affecting his romantic relationships with women.”
““I come on these shows sometimes and people see me as this jerk who’s defensive or who, you know, kind of is standoffish.”


"[ABC selected pictures]"
"Chat Johnson (@ realchadjohnson) shared a post at 9:20 pm Pacific time on June 6, 2017" do you want to fall in love? "Dr. Darcy asked him."
"Chad Johnson is still struggling with his mother's death."
"The single star lost her mother six months before she was on the show as a contestant."
"Chad immediately became one of the best players of the season."
"Yes, they made me a bad man." The star of "the Bachelor of heaven" appeared in an episode "the famous Bachelor" CO produced with Dr. Darcy Stirling
"Chad seems to be in an extremely fragile state, discussing his personal problems with the therapist in front of the camera, e!"
"News coverage."
The single "villain" disclosed to Stirling that his mother's death seemed to have affected his romantic relationship with women
"I sometimes go on these shows and people see me as a defensive jerk, or, you know, a little bit cold."



Number  1349
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: David Becker/GettyGrande announced her desire to put on the benefit concert in a special message just four days after the tragedy.”
“The pop line-up also has The Black Eyed Peas, Coldplay, Usher and Pharrell performing.”
“Katy Perry, Miley Cyrus and Justin Bieber are joining Grande and Brit-favorites Take That and One Direction’s Niall Horan are also included in the show.”
“The show is expected to bring in around $2.6 million.”
“All proceeds from the concert, taking place at the Emirates Old Trafford stadium in the city, are going to the Red Cross’s Manchester Emergency Fund.”
“Those who were at the original gig on Monday May 22 have been offered free tickets, while the rest went on sale for $52 (£40).”
“Twenty-two people died and more than 100 were injured in the blast.”
“The concert raises money for those who lost loved ones in the suicide bombing at Grande’s Manchester gig on May 22.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Around 45,000 tickets were gone just moments after they went on sale at 10 a.m U.K. time, the twitter site for the concert confirmed.”


"Photo scaling credit: David Becker / Getty grand announced in a special speech four days after the tragedy that she wanted to hold a charity concert."
"There are black eyed peas, Coldplay, Arthur and Farrell in the popular lineup."
"Katie Perry, Miley Cyrus and Justin Bieber will join the most popular bands in grand and the UK, including Neil Holland of one direction."
"The show is expected to generate about $2.6 million in revenue."
"All proceeds from the concert will be donated to the Red Cross's Manchester emergency fund and the concert will be held at Amir's Old Trafford stadium."
"Those who attended the original concert on May 22 (Monday) were given free tickets, while the rest were sold for 52 dollars (40 pounds)," he said
"The explosion killed 22 people and injured more than 100."
"The concert raised money for those who lost their loved ones in the suicide bombing at the Manchester concert on May 22nd."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The concert's Twitter site confirmed that "about 45000 tickets disappeared when they started selling at 10am British time."



Number  1350
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She and her husband Dean McDermott have also got two other children: an eight-year-old daughter called Stella and a nine-year-old son called Liam.”
“Fellow mamas what are you dressing up your #bump as?'”
“On Tuesday, the actress posted an Instagram photo of herself and her four-year-old son Finn dressed as 'MC MC MamaBear2B and her DJ CurlyCub.'”
“Both of them had committed to the look, the 43-year-old wearing a sheer black tank top that showed off her burgeoning baby bump.”
“...introducing to the stage On Monday a pregnant Tori Spelling posted an Instagram photo of herself and her son Finn dressed up on Halloween as MC MamaBear2B and her DJ CurlyCub A loose black cap had been pulled over her...”
“...platinum blonde hair and she posed with one hand in a peace sign and another clutching a toy microphone to dress as MC Hammer...”
“Gold chains and a pair of baggy gold-coloured trousers augmented the look, and she rounded it out with black and white checked trainers.”
“Her son gawking up at her from beside her, she wrote in her caption that 'We always do 2 costumes for Halloween!”
“This was our 2nd #Halloween get up from last night...'Over the past couple of days, she'd been furnishing her Instagram following with updates as to the other costumes, revealing they were 'DIY' (Do It Yourself).”
“'And this is a 100% no sew project!”


"She and her husband, Dean McDermott, have two other children: an 8-year-old daughter named Stella and a 9-year-old son named Liam."
"Mums, what do you look like with your lumps?"
"On Tuesday, the actress posted a picture of herself and her four-year-old son Finn on instagram, dressed as" MC mamabaer2b and her DJ curly cub. "
"They both like the look. The 43 year old is wearing a black vest, which shows the small lump she just grew."
“…… On Monday, a pregnant Tori Spelling posted a photo on instagram showing her and her son Finn dressed up as MC mamaber2b and her DJ curly cub on Halloween, wearing a loose black hat... "
“… With platinum hair, a sign of peace in one hand and a toy microphone in the other, dressed up as Mike Hammer... "
Gold chains and a loose pair of gold trousers add to her look, and she surrounds it with black and white checked sneakers
"Her son was staring at her, and she wrote in the title:" we always wear two costumes for Halloween! "
"This is the second time we've got up on Halloween since last night..." In the past few days, she has been showing other clothing updates on instagram, revealing that they are "DIY."
"This is a 100% seamless project!"



Number  1351
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’ve realized that I need to start having confidence in my relationship with John and that he accepts me for all my faults,” she told the camera.”
“...said she did feel bad she didn t tell Cena...”
“Her family were not happy, especially Colace, who wondered why Bella didn’t think she could come to her.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“It’s crazy ’cause John doesn’t even know and here we talk about marriage and we never bring it up.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
““I tried to forget about it but now it’s starting to come up, and I figured you guys have to hear from me before you hear from anyone else.”
““Even when I started walking down the aisle, I knew this was a huge mistake and how can I get out of it and I couldn’t,” she recalled.”
“We drove to Vegas, did it.”The union was something Bella regretted from the beginning.”
““Basically we got married by Elvis.”
“And got divorced at 23, to my high school sweetheart,” Bella said.”


"I realized that I needed to start to have confidence in my relationship with John, who accepted all my shortcomings," she told the camera
“… She said she was really sad that she didn't tell Senna... "
"Her family are not happy, especially koras, and she wants to know why Bella thinks she can't come to her."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"It's crazy because John doesn't even know that we talk about marriage here, but we never mention it." Want to know the latest news about people? "
"I tried to forget about it, but now it's starting to appear, and I think you have to hear from me first, and then from others."
"Even if I started walking down the aisle, I knew it was a huge mistake and how I could get rid of it, I couldn't," she recalled
"We drove to Vegas and did it." Bella felt sorry for the union from the beginning
"Basically we were married by Elvis."
"When I was 23, I divorced my high school sweetheart," Bella said



Number  1352
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To see how it all went down, check out our live blog of the Season 30 finale.”
“Love you Jess and Cody!”
“Reactions from the reality TV show’s passionate fanbase range from supportive cheers to negative jeers.”
“Are YOU happy that Cody and Jessica won the $1 million prize and will now start a family?”
“Sound off down in the comments section after reading a sampling of fan reactions.”
“SEE Jessica Graf and Cody Nickson deserved to win ‘The Amazing Race,’ say 60% of fansTracie Parker: “Way to go ‘Big Brother’ lovebirds!!!!!!!!”
“I’ve been for those guys since the first day of ‘Big Brother.”
“Hk Never watching this show again I hate the Big Brother couple they should have never had the chance to even be on this show SEE The Amazing Race 30 winners Jessica Graf and Cody Nickson interview After Big Brother this was our redemption project WATCH Jasmine Porter This is...”
“...redemption for them being screwed on Big Brother...”
“Whoooooooo!”


"To see how it all works, check out our live blog for season 30 finale."
"Love you, Jesse and Cody!"
"The response of the enthusiastic fans of reality TV shows ranges from cheers of support to negative ridicule."
"Cody and Jessica won a million dollars and are you happy to be married now?"
"After reading the fan response sample, please make a sound in the comments section."
"Seeing that Jessica Graff and Cody Nixon deserved to win the" magic game ", 60% of van Stracy Parker said:" big brother love bird, good job ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
"I've been supporting those guys since big brother's first day."
"Hong Kong won't watch this show any more. I hate big brother and his wife. They shouldn't have had the chance to watch this show. Watch the interview of Jessica Graf and Cody Nixon after big brother. This is our salvation plan. Watch Molly Potter. This is..."
“… They were fooled by big brother... "
"Wow



Number  1353
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It will air live on ABC from 9 p.m. to 11 p.m. ET/PT.”
“I can't wait to reunite with my friend Chris Harrison and the entire team in Atlantic City!”The 97th annual Miss America competition will be held in Atlantic City on Sunday, Sept. 10.”
““These young women are so inspirational to millions across the country, including my own daughters, and yours truly!”
“Sage is a true professional whose quick wit and charisma lights up the stage and the show.”"I can honestly say that co-hosting Miss America last year was one of the most memorable events I've been a part of in my 22 years in this business,” Steele said.”
““I'm extremely happy to be sharing the hosting duties once again with my friend Sage Steele.”
““It's an honor to grace the Miss America stage as host for the ninth time,” Harrison said.”
“Sage Steele, an ESPN host and commentator, will join him as co-host for the second year in a row.”
“This will be Harrison's ninth time hosting the show.”
“ -- Chris Harrison will return to host the 2018 Miss America competition, the Miss America Organization, Dick Clark Productions and ABC announced Monday.”


"It will be broadcast live on ABC from 9pm to 11pm est."
"I can't wait to be reunited with my friend Chris Harrison and the whole team in Atlantic City! The 97th Miss America contest will be held in Atlantic City on Sunday, September 10
"These young women are so inspiring to millions of people across the country, including my own daughters and your daughters!"
"Sachi is a real professional and his wit and charm illuminate the whole stage and the whole show," Steele said
"I'm very happy to be able to co chair again with my friend Sachi Steele."
"It's a great honor to host Miss America for the ninth time," Harrison said
"ESPN moderator and commentator sage Steele will be co moderator with him for the second year in a row."
"This will be Harrison's ninth time to host the show."
Miss America, Dick Clark productions and ABC announced on Monday that Chris Harrison will return to host the 2018 Miss America contest



Number  1354
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“This whole thing’s tragic.”
“On the Tuesday, October 24, premiere of TBS’ new sketch show, Drop the Mic, which pins two celebs up against each other in an epic rap battle, both Berry and Corden got in some personal digs.”
“It all began with Berry’s career choices.”
““Let’s not pretend that Catwoman didn’t suck.”
“Halle, that was a Batman movie, how’d you mess that up?” Corden began.”
“However, she was ready!”
““I’m glad Swordfish was to your satisfaction.”
“It’s probably the only time your d-ck has seen some action,” she rapped.”
““Yes, everybody knows Catwoman tanked, but I took Kingsman to the mother f-ckin’ bank… James has a Tony, that’s cool and all.”


"Wait a minute."
"This whole thing is so tragic."
"On Tuesday, October 24, at the premiere of TBS's new sketch show drop the mic, the two celebrities dueled in an epic rap battle, and berry and Corden both had some personal interests."
"It all started with Berry's career choice."
"Let's not pretend that Catwoman didn't smoke."
"Harry, it's a Batman movie. How did you screw it up? "Cordon began to say."
"But she's ready!"
"I'm glad the sailfish can satisfy you."
"It's probably the only time your d-ck sees some movement," she said softly
"Yes, everyone knows that the cat girl is drunk, but I took Kingsman to the mother bank James has a Tony, which is cool. "



Number  1355
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She’s a different kind of person in terms of what Hollywood usually throws money at.”POPULAR ON VARIETY”
““She has something people want to see,” Bock said.”
“The comedian’s third starring vehicle “I Feel Pretty,” written and directed by Marc Silverstein and Abby Kohn, launched to a soft $16 million last weekend.”
“It’s not a disaster, but it does represent Schumer’s lowest opening for a film yet.”
““In terms of her career trajectory, it’s been a declining scale,” box office analyst Jeff Bock said.”
““It’s a matter of her finding her feet.”
“She’s relatively new on the scene.”The comedian made her film debut alongside Bill Hader in 2015’s hit “Trainwreck.” The incisive rom-com, written by Schumer and directed by Judd Apatow, bowed with $30 million and went on to earn $110 million.”
“That’s an impressive tally, particularly for a genre that has struggled to live up to the glory years of Meg Ryan and Julia Roberts.”
“Audiences were familiar with Schumer’s prolific stand-up career and her Comedy Central show, and no doubt were eager to see her tackle the big screen.”
““Trainwreck” proved to be a tough act to follow.”


"From the point of view that Hollywood usually invests money, she is a different person." "Very popular in variety shows"
"She has something that people want to see," Bok said
Directed by Mark Silverstein and Abby Cohen, the comedian's third starring film, "I think it's beautiful," was released last weekend for $16 million
"It's not a disaster, but it does represent the lowest opening rate of Schumer films to date."
"From her career track, it's a declining scale," said box office analyst Jeff Bok
"It's about her finding her feet."
"She's relatively new on stage." The comedian made her movie debut with Bill hard in 2015's hit movie train crash. The brilliant ROM com, written by Schumer and directed by Judd apato, bows at $30 million and continues to earn $110 million
"It's an impressive number, especially for a genre that has been trying to live up to the glory years of Megarian and Julia Roberts."
"Audiences are familiar with Schumer's prolific stand up career and her comedy Center show, and there is no doubt that they are eager to see her emerge on the big screen."
"Train crash" proved to be a difficult behavior to follow



Number  1356
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Queen's public schedule will continue as normal.”
“Getty Images Royal British couple, Queen Elizabeth II, and her husband Phillip, Duke of Edinburgh, with two of their children, Prince Charles (left) and Princess Anne in 1951Although he isn't the king, his job title is pretty special.”
“He celebrated his 96th birthday in June 2017.”
“He spent his childhood in France, Germany and then here in Britain.”
“His family left Greece when Philip was just a one-year-old baby.”
“The Prince's early lifeGetty Images Prince Phillip in the Navy before he met his wife, who went on to become Queen Elizabeth IIPrince Philip was born in 1921 on the Greek island of Corfu.”
“He now holds the record for the longest-serving consort in British history!”
“He's the Queen's 'consort' - and his role is to support Queen Elizabeth II.”
“Prince Philip is also the grandfather of Princes William and Harry, and the great-grandfather of Prince George and Princess Charlotte.”
“Getty Images Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Philip, feed Donna the elephant as they visit a zoo in Dunstable, UKPhilip gave up his job in the Navy after Queen Elizabeth II's father died and she became Queen.”


"The Queen's public schedule will continue as usual."
In 1951, British royal couple Elizabeth II and her husband Philip, Duke of Edinburgh, with their two children, Prince Charles (left) and Princess Anne. Although he is not king, his title is very special
"He celebrated his 96th birthday in June 2017."
He spent his childhood in France, Germany and later in England
"When Philip was a one year old baby, his family left Greece."
"The prince's early life" Prince Philip served in the Navy before meeting his wife, who later became Elizabeth II. Prince Philip was born on the Greek island of Corfu in 1921
"He is now the longest serving spouse in British history!"
"He is the Queen's' spouse '- his role is to support Queen Elizabeth II."
Prince Philip is also the grandfather of Prince William and Prince Harry, and the great grandfather of Prince George and Princess Charlotte
Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Philip feed Donna elephants while visiting the zoo in Dunstable. After the death of Queen Elizabeth II's father, Philip gives up his job in the Navy and Donna becomes queen



Number  1357
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So take it all with a big grain of salt.”
“The report which said things could get quite nasty if Paris doesn t choose one of these girls to date exclusively is the kind of fan fiction that has become an annoying reality for celebrities who don t adhere to...”
“With that, unfortunately, comes having every aspect of her life analyzed.”
“Her relationship status and dating life are part of that and when a recent report surfaced that alleged Jackson was dating three women at once the daughter of the pop icon Michael Jackson took it upon herself to set the...”
“...record straight...”
“After Gossip Cop published a report refuting that Jackson was dating three women at the same time Cara Delevingne Ashley Benson and Caroline D Amore according to The National Enquirer Jackson s rep also denied it all saying No idea...”
“...how or why they come up with this stuff...”
“Definitely not true.” Jackson later hopped on Twitter to echo that statement, tweeting, "I’ve never met miss benzo.”
“Caroline is one of my bestest friends who is **straight** and **married**, and also the mother of my godchild.”
“Cara and I were never officially exclusive, you guys made that up."”


"Then eat it all."
"This report says that if Paris doesn't choose one of these girls to date alone, things can get pretty bad. This is a kind of fan fiction, which has become an annoying reality. Celebrities who don't insist on..."
"Unfortunately, it was followed by an analysis of all aspects of her life."
"Her relationship status and dating life are part of it. When a recent report said Jackson was dating three women at the same time, pop idol Michael Jackson's daughter decided to..."
“… Direct record... "
"After gossip police published a report refuting Jackson's dating with three women at the same time, national inquirer reported that Carla delaviny Ashley Benson and Caroline de amore also denied it and said they didn't know..."
“… How or why do they think of these things... "
"Absolutely not true." Jackson later echoed this on twitter, tweeting, "I've never met Miss bezo."
"Caroline is one of my best friends. She's both heterosexual and married, and she's my godmother."
"Carla and I have never been exclusive to the government. You made it up."



Number  1358
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do not mind anything that anyone tells you about anyone else quote demoIt wasn’t a dream.”
“The languages only differ in their grammar, their pronunciation and their most common words.”
“...every pleasure is to be welcomed and every pain avoided...”
“The List for doing things Start International News Magazine Websites Installing Themes Purchase PenNews on Themeforest In a free hour when our power of choice is untrammelled and when nothing prevents our being able to do what we like best...”
“One morning, when Gregor Samsa woke from troubled dreams, he found himself transformed in his bed into a horrible vermin.”
“...the Almighty who formed us in his own image and the breath...”
“DEMO POST TITLE IN UPPER CASE When I hear the buzz of the little world among the stalks and grow familiar with the countless lorem ipsum dolor indescribable forms of the insects and flies then I feel the presence of...”
“...among the tall grass by the trickling stream and as I lie close to the earth a thousand unknown plants are noticed by me...”
“When while the lovely valley teems with vapour around me and the meridian sun strikes the upper surface of the impenetrable foliage of my trees and but a few stray gleams steal into the inner sanctuary I throw myself down...”
“...a greater artist than now...”


"Don't mind anyone telling you anything about other people, because it's not a dream."
These languages differ only in grammar, pronunciation and the most commonly used words
“…… Every happiness should be welcomed, and every pain should be avoided... "
"The to do list starts from the website of international news magazine, installs the theme, buys the theme news in free time, when our choice is not limited, when there is no obstacle that we can do our favorite things..."
One morning, Greg Samsa woke up from a nightmare and found himself a terrible pest in bed
“…… Shape our Almighty with his own image and breath... "
"The title of the Demonstration Article is capitalized. When I hear the buzzing of the small world between the branches, I am familiar with the sad and indescribable forms of countless insects and flies, and then I feel..."
“…… In the tall grass beside the stream, when I lay near the ground, I noticed a thousand unknown plants... "
"When the lovely valley around me is full of water vapor, the meridian sunlight shines on the upper surface of my impenetrable branches and leaves, and only a few scattered glimmers of light sneak into my inner shelter, I beat myself down..."
“… A greater artist than he is now... "



Number  1359
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s tough to look at pictures and feel like I’m missing something, and in a way, I don’t even know my baby yet.””
““It’s strange to spend eight days with my newborn and then to leave and go on tour,” he said.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“"To witness the strength, endurance and love it takes to become a mother is the most beautiful thing I have ever experienced," Macklemore wrote SundayMacklemore Reveals His Second Daughter's Birth Date — and Her Animal-Inspired NameMacklemore has a new baby bear to love!”
“The musician welcomed his second child, daughter Colette Koala Haggerty, on Friday, March 16, he announced on Instagram Sunday in a sweet Mother’s Day tribute to his wife Tricia Davis.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“To witness the strength endurance and love it takes to become a mother is the most beautiful thing I have ever experienced Macklemore 34 captioned a home video series featuring the moments surrounding Colette s birth set to the rapper s song Excavate Happy Mother s Day to the women...”
“...that give us life...”
“I love you @baba_g,” added the new dad.”
“The newest addition joins big sister Sloane Ava Simone, 2½, who is featured heavily (and adorably) in the video series Macklemore shared on Sunday.”


"It's hard to look at the pictures and feel like I've missed something. To some extent, I don't even know my baby."
"It's strange to stay with my newborn for eight days and then leave to travel," he said
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Witnessing the strength, endurance and love I need to be a mother is the most beautiful thing I've ever experienced," markmore wrote. On Sunday, markmore revealed the birth date of his second daughter, her animal inspired name. Markmore has a new baby bear to love! "
"The musician welcomed his second child, Collette koala hagati, on Friday, March 16. He announced mother's Day greetings to his wife Tricia Davis on instagram Sunday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Witnessing the strength, endurance and love I need to be a mother is the most beautiful thing I have ever experienced. In a family video series, mclermo 34 focuses on the moment of klaette's birth and takes the rap singer's song happy mother's day as the background..."
“… Give us life... "
"I love you, Dad," the new dad added
"The latest addition is two-and-a-half-year-old sister Sloan AVA Simona, who played an important (and lovely) role in the video series mcclemore shared on Sunday."



Number  1360
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He’s constantly up and down.”Image zoom Rob and Dream Kardashian | Credit: Rob Kardashian/TwitterStill, close friends and family hope the reclusive reality star will turn things around and find as much happiness with himself as he has with Dream.”
““He can’t seem to get healthy even though he says he wants to be,” said the insider.”
“...in recent years is still struggling to maintain a healthy lifestyle...”
“It s family over everything and I love that my brother is the same way RELATED VIDEO Khloé Kardashian Shares New Photo of Daughter True After Date Night with Tristan Thompson Earlier this month a source told PEOPLE that Rob who has battled depression weight gain and type 2 diabetes...”
““I’m so proud of him!”Khloé went on to say that their father would be “really proud that Rob wants to implement his Armenian roots into Dream’s upbringing.”“It would mean so much to him that all of his grandchildren are so close,” she said.”
““My dad would do anything for his kids and my brother is the same way for Dream,” she gushed.”
“Khloé, 33, praised Rob, 31, for his relationship with his 1½-year-old daughter Dream, whom he shares with ex Blac Chyna.”
““My brother Rob is like my father in so many ways — his sense of humor, silly nature, the way he loves and respects family,” she said.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“"My dad would do anything for his kids and my brother is the same way for Dream," says Khloé KardashianKhloé Kardashian Says Late Dad Would Be 'Proud' of Brother Rob Ahead of Father's DayKhloé Kardashian has lots of love for her little brother Rob.”


"He's always up and down." Photo zoom rob and dream Kardashian | photo source: Rob Kardashian / twitter still, close friends and family hope the reclusive reality star can turn the tide and find as much happiness as her dream
"Even if he says he wants to be healthy, he doesn't seem to be able to be healthy," the person familiar with the matter said
“…… In recent years, we are still trying to maintain a healthy lifestyle.... "
"Family is everything, and I love videos about my brother. Earlier this month, Kardashian and Tristan Thompson shared a new photo of their daughter after their date night. Rob has struggled with depression, weight gain and type 2 diabetes, a source told people
"I'm so proud of him! Khlo é went on to say that their father would be "proud that rob wanted to integrate his Armenian blood into dream's growth." "It means a lot to him because all his grandchildren are close," she said
"My father is willing to do anything for his children, and so is my brother for his dreams," she gushed
Heloe, 33, praised the relationship between rob, 31, and his 1.5-year-old daughter dream, which he shared with former Blake chener
"My brother rob is like my father in many ways - his sense of humor, his stupid nature, the way he loves and respects his family," she said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"My father would do anything for his children, and my brother would do the same for his dreams," khlo é Kardashian said. The late father would be proud of his brother, because khlo é Kardashian loved her brother rob very much before his father's birthday



Number  1361
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“No abuse: The LA County Department Of Children And Family Services recently closed its probe into allegations that he beat daughter Shayla...”
“He says he has been unable to see his daughter Shayla for two months, and wants to have the matter dealt with as soon as possible.”
“Sources close to the Hitch star tell TMZ that he and his wife Jada Pinkett Smith did not give him any money despite the singer and actor's claims on Sunday that the duo dished out to contribute to his legal plight.”
“The 38-year-old rapper and actor has been engaged in a bitter courtroom feud with ex-wife Norma Mitchell Gibson over their 10-year-old daughter Shayla.”
“Scroll down for video Hitting back Will Smith has reportedly hit out at Tyrese s claims that he donated 5million 3 8million towards his custody battle with his estranged wife Insiders claim Will and Jada have hit back at Tyrese s claims as they insist they did not give him...”
“...any money despite his outburst...”
“MailOnline has contacted representatives for Will and Tyrese for comment.”
“In his initial comment, The Fast And The Furious star said: ' When we show UP for each-other there’s nothing that can’t be done I️ repeat nothing.”
“'My wife kept the news away from me cause I’ve been on with lawyers all day but our family and our sister Jada-Pinkett Smith and my brother Will Smith just sent us 5 million dollars to help keep us afloat.'”
“Golden handshake Sources close to the Hitch star tell TMZ that he and his wife Jada Pinkett Smith did not give him any money despite the singer and actor s claims on Sunday that the duo dished out to contribute Right behind him Tyrese loves to share snaps of his...”


"No abuse: the Los Angeles County Department of child and family services recently ended an investigation into charges that he assaulted his daughter Sheila..."
"He said he had not seen his daughter Sheila for two months and he wanted to deal with it as soon as possible."
"Sources close to the hitchhiker told TMZ that the singer and actor and his wife Jada pinkert Smith did not give him any money, although they claimed on Sunday that they were paying to create a legal dilemma for him."
"The 38 year old rapper and actor had a heated court dispute with his ex-wife, Norma Mitchell Gibson, over their 10-year-old daughter, Shayla."
"Rolling down the video to fight back will smith is reported to have attacked tyris for donating $5.038 million to his custody fight with his separated wife. Insiders claim that will and Jada fought back against tyris because they insisted they didn't give him..."
“… No matter how grumpy he is, whether he has money or not... "
"Mailonline has contacted representatives of will and tyreese for comments."
"In his initial comments, the quick and angry star said," when we show up for each other, there's nothing we can't do. I don't repeat anything. "
"My wife didn't let me know because I was with lawyers all day, but our family, sister Jada pinkert Smith and brother will smith just sent us $5 million to help us make ends meet."
"People close to Kim's handshake told TMZ that he and his wife Jada pinkert Smith didn't give him any money, although the singer and actor claimed on Sunday that they were performing behind him, and tyris liked to share his photos..."



Number  1362
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He is deeply sorry for the pain these consensual decisions caused his family, and others.””
“But to those affected, I am so deeply sorry,” he wrote.”
“He has also been dropped by his US publisher, Penguin Random House.”
“The anonymous allegations were made online on Sunday, in the comments section of a piece about sexual harassment in the children’s books world, published by the US trade magazine School Library Journal.”
“Several accused Dashner of sexual harassment; one comment alleged that the “harassment/abuse from James Dashner was not a one-time unwanted touch or a joke I took the wrong way.”
“It entailed months of manipulation, grooming and gaslighting”.”
“Dashner initially made no response to the allegations, but after his agent Michael Bourret at Dystel, Goderich and Bourret said he “couldn’t in good conscience continue working with James” on Tuesday, the author issued a statement on Twitter on Thursday afternoon.”
“After “re-examining my actions and searching my soul”, Dashner wrote, he had “taken these past few days for introspection, to see if I’ve been part of the problem”.”
“He concluded: “I think that I have.”“I didn’t honour or fully understand boundaries and power dynamics.”
“I can sincerely say that I have never intentionally hurt another person.”


"He apologizes for the pain these voluntary decisions have caused his family and others."
"But for those affected, I apologize," he wrote
"He was also abandoned by his American publisher, Penguin Random House."
"The anonymous charges were published online on Sunday in the comments section of an article on sexual harassment in children's books published in the school library journal, an American trade journal."
Some accused Dashner of sexual harassment; one comment said "James Dashner's harassment / abuse is not a one-time unwelcome contact, nor is it a joke I made in the wrong direction."
"It takes months of operation, grooming and lighting."
"Dashner did not initially respond to the charges, but after his agent, Michael Bourret, was in dystel, godrich and Bourret said on Tuesday that he" had no conscience to continue working with James, "the author said in a twitter statement on Thursday afternoon
"After" reexamining my behavior, my soul, "Dashner wrote," he's "reflected over the past few days to see if I'm involved in this issue."
"I think I have," he concluded "I don't respect or fully understand the dynamics of boundaries and power."
"I can honestly say that I have never intentionally hurt anyone."



Number  1363
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His heart is probably golden-colored, if you could paint it.””
“It’s just wonderful to be around.”
“In the May issue of Elle magazine, the “Captain America” actor says he makes it a point to stay on good terms with his exes, and even goes in for a “big hug” when he runs into them.”
“(We’ve never wanted to be someone’s ex more in our lives.)”
““I’ve had no bad breakups in my life,” said Evans, who’s dated Kate Bosworth, Jessica Biel, and, most recently, his “Gifted” co-star Jenny Slate.”
““Typically, if I see an ex, I give a big hug, and it’s wonderful to catch up,” the 35-year-old told the magazine.”
““If you’re ever fortunate enough to love someone and have them love you back, it’s worth protecting that.”
“It’s rare that someone can truly know you.”
“And if you’ve broken through that kind of wall, I think it’s important to value that.”It sure seems like he does.”
“The actor has spoken of Slate in only glowing terms while promoting “Gifted” the last few months.”


"His heart may be gold, if you can draw it."
"It's great to be around."
In the May issue of Elle magazine, the hero of Captain America said he stressed maintaining a good relationship with his ex girlfriend and even hugging them when he met her
"We don't want to be ex husbands any more in our life."
"I've never had a bad breakup in my life," Evans said He dated Kate Bosworth, Jessica bell and, most recently, his "genius" partner, Jennie Slater
"Generally speaking, if I see my ex boyfriend, I give him a big hug. It's great to catch up," the 35 year old told the magazine
"If you've ever been lucky enough to fall in love with someone and have them love you, it's worth protecting."
"Few people really know you."
"If you've broken through this wall, I think it's important to take that seriously." He does look like that
"The actor has used only a few bright words to describe Slater when promoting genius in the past few months."



Number  1364
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is suing MTV”
“This time around Battle of the Exes they called everybody because they know that as soon as they call a few people that we all call each other and we re like Oh we already figured out the theme Q Is it true that one of The Challenge cast members...”
“What I really think, and where I’m getting at is, however you act on the Challenge for whatever extenuating circumstance, that’s really how you are under pressure or not,” Abram Boise told The Celebrity Café in a recent interview.”
“A: “I tell people if they’ll lie, cheat, steal on a challenge it means to lie, cheat and steal in the real life.”
“Are they really that way in real life?”
“Q: Are the cast members putting on an act for the cameras?”
“Still, the cast members have to pay for their own drinks, nightclub admission, etc.”
“Of course, the ‘Challenges’ always take place in foreign countries, and oftentimes it’s not illegal to drink in those country if you’re under 21.”
“A: “Battle of the Exes” cast member Priscilla Mendez told US Davis’ newspaper The Auggie that MTV does not pay for the cast’s recreational activities, and does not condone underage drinking.”
“Q: Does MTV foot the bill when the cast mates go out on the town during the Challenges?”


“… Suing MTV
"Before and after the battle of ex girlfriends, they called everyone, because they knew that as long as they called several people, we would call each other. We were like, oh, we have made it clear that the theme q is true, one of the challenging actors..."
"What I really think is that no matter how you deal with challenges in any extenuating circumstances, it's whether you have pressure or not," Abram Boise told celebrity cafe in a recent interview
A: "I tell people that if they lie, cheat and steal in a challenge, it means lying, cheating and stealing in real life."
"Is that true in real life?"
"Are the actors performing for the camera?"
"Even so, the actors still have to pay for drinks, nightclub tickets and so on."
"Of course, 'challenges' always happen abroad, and if you're under 21, it's not usually illegal to drink in those countries."
A: Priscilla Mendes, a member of the cast of "the battle of ex girlfriends", told Davis' ogie newspaper that MTV does not pay for the entertainment activities of the cast, nor does it condone underage drinking
Q: in the challenge, when the actors are out of town, will MTV pay for it? "



Number  1365
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"If I can try and fill a very small part of that, then job done."”
““For an hour Prince Harry sat with us talking and playing with our children, laughing and making memories,” the Carrolls wrote on a Facebook page devoted to Ollie’s battle.”
“The prince spent time with Ollie Carroll, 6, along with his younger sister, Amelia.”
“Both suffer from Batten disease, a fatal neurodegenerative disorder that eventually robs its patients of sight and mobility and leaves them with dementia.”
“Prince Harry meets Ollie Carroll, a terminally ill 6-year-old, during a visit to London's Great Ormond Street Hospital.”
“Manchester Evening News SyndicationHarry met Ollie last year when the young boy, who had lost the ability to stand on his own, rose with help from his mom to give the prince a hug at the WellChild Awards gala last fall.”
“RELATED: Prince Harry shares laughs, hugs with inspirational kids at awards galaThe annual charity fundraiser recognizes the courage of children, their caregivers and youth who help them.”
“Prince Harry and Ollie, during their first meeting at WellChild gala in October 2016.”
“Daniel Leal Olivas AP Ollie s parents Mike and Lucy Carroll wrote to Harry afterward to thank him for giving our son the strength to stand when we thought this was no longer possible The prince reunited with the family on Tuesday when he paid a visit to the hospital...”
“...where Ollie and Amelia were receiving treatment...”


"If I can try to fill in a small part of it, then the work is done."
"Prince Harry sat with us for an hour, chatting, playing, laughing and remembering with our children," the carols wrote on a Facebook page devoted to the battle of Ollie
"The prince is with Ollie Carroll, 6, and his sister Amelia."
Both suffer from Barton's disease, a fatal neurodegenerative disease that eventually deprives the patient of vision and mobility, leading to dementia
Prince Harry Met 6-year-old terminally ill Ollie Carroll while visiting London's Great Ormond Street Hospital
"When Manchester evening news syndicate Harry Met Ollie last year, the little boy who lost his independence stood up with the help of his mother and gave the prince a hug at the Wilshire awards party last fall."
Related report: Prince Harry shared laughter and hugs with inspiring children at the awards party. The annual charity fundraiser praised the courage of helping their children, their caregivers and young people
"In October 2016, Prince Harry and Ollie met for the first time at the wellchild party."
"Daniel Lyle Oliva AP oli's parents Mike and Lucy Carroll later wrote to Harry to thank him for giving our son the strength to stand up. We thought it was impossible. The prince was reunited with his family when he visited the hospital on Tuesday..."
“… Where Ollie and Amelia were treated... "



Number  1366
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He announced London and southeast England set for tier 4 rules with Christmas bubbles canceled Reuters UK news in pictures 18 December 2020 Actors from the Wintershall Estate perform an adaptation of their traditional Nativity play on December 18, 2020 in Guildford, England.”
“...pictures 19 December 2020 Prime Minister Boris Johnson speaks during a news conference in response to the ongoing situation with the coronavirus disease pandemic inside 10 Downing Street London...”
“Reuters UK news in pictures 17 January 2021 People on the sea front in Brighton during England s third national lockdown to curb the spread of coronavirus PA UK news in pictures 16 January 2021 Cubicles erected inside Salisbury Cathedral Wiltshire for people to receive an injection of the Pfizer...”
“...in pictures 19 January 2021 A surfer rides a wave in the sea off of Boscombe beach in Dorset PA UK news in pictures 18 January 2021 British Prime Minister Boris Johnson stands outside a room where technicians are manufacturing the AstraZeneca covid 19 vaccine at Oxford Biomedica in Oxford...”
“UK news in pictures Show all 50 1 50 UK news in pictures UK news in pictures 20 January 2021 Flooding underneath the A46 at Six Hills Lane in Leicestershire as Storm Christoph is set to bring widespread flooding gales and snow to parts of the UK PA UK news...”
““It's all filled with excitement, getting everything ready, feeling like you don't really know what's going to happen.”
“It changes your perspective on absolutely everything.”
““It made me feel a bit more nervous.”
“I'm never scared of flying - and as soon as there was any turbulence I was like 'oh my God', because there's more than my life I have to care about now.”
“...here Tom Daley and his husband have revealed that they re expecting their first child together Even on a plane...”


"He announced that the four rule of the Christmas bubble in London and Southeast England was cancelled. Reuters's British news photo December 18, 2020 the actor of winter wale estate will perform their traditional adaptation of the Jesus birth drama in England in December 18, 2020.
“…… Picture on December 19, 2020, Prime Minister Boris Johnson delivered a speech at a news conference in response to the continuation of the coronavirus pandemic at 10 Downing Street, London.... "
"Reuters news photo on January 17, 2021 during the third national blockade in Britain, people in Brighton seashore stopped the spread of coronavirus. British news photo on January 16, 2021, a small compartment was erected in Wiltshire of Salisbury Cathedral for people to receive Pfizer Injection..."
“…… A surfer rides on the sea near Boscombe beach, Dorset, on January 19, 2021. In the news picture, British Prime Minister Boris Johnson stands outside the room where technicians from Oxford biomedica are making a vaccine against AstraZeneca coronavirus 19 on January 18, 2021... "
"The British news in the picture shows that on January 20, 2021, there was a flood under a46, Liushan lane, Leicestershire. Storm Christopher will bring large-scale flood, gale and snowfall to some parts of the UK..."
"They're all excited, they're all ready, and they feel like they really don't know what's going to happen."
"It changes the way you think about anything."
"It makes me feel a little nervous."
"I'm never afraid of flying - whenever there's turbulence, I say 'my God,' because I'm not just concerned about my life right now."
“…… Tom Daly and his husband revealed that even on the plane, they are looking forward to their first child together... "



Number  1367
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This event brought the duo became much closer.”
“Han was not happy to have Chewie around until the day Chewbacca saved Solo from a beating after being caught cheating.”
“Now that it has been confirmed that a Star Wars Anthology film following a young Han Solo will be directed by Lego Movie directors Phil Lord and Chris Miller for a Summer 2018 release, I thought this might be worth republishing.”
“What would a Han Solo standalone original movie be about?”
“Sifting through the backstory established in the original trilogy, the elaborate expanded universe in the books and games, witht he help of Wookieepedia, we have some good ideas of what we might expect from this standalone tale.”
“How Old Will Han Be?”
“Harrison Ford was 33 years old when he started filming George Lucas‘ original Star Wars film, later subtitled A New Hope.”
“The movie took place in 0 ABY (After the Battle of Yavin) and Lucasfilm has published Han Solo’s birth year as 29 BBY (Before battle of Yavin).”
“Solo was originally supposed to appear in Episode III: Revenge of the Sith as a ten-year old boy who helps Yoda find General Grievous’ location.”
“(Concept art from preproduction can be seen above).”


"It brings the two closer together."
"Han Han was not happy to have chewy around until Chewbacca rescued solo from the beating after he was found cheating."
"It's now certain that a Star Wars movie after young Han Han's solo will be directed by LEGO film directors Phil Lord and Chris Miller and will be released in the summer of 2018, and I think it may be worth reissue."
"What is Han Han's original solo movie about?"
"With the help of wookiepedia, we have carefully studied the background story established in the original trilogy, the carefully expanded universe in books and games, and we have some good ideas about this independent story."
"How old is Han Han?"
Harrison Ford began filming George Lucas's original Star Wars at the age of 33, and later subtitled it with new hope
"The film took place in 0aby (after the battle of Yavin), and Lucas pictures announced that hansolo was born in 29bby (before the battle of Yavin),"
"Solo was supposed to play a 10-year-old boy in Episode 3: Revenge of the Sith who helped Yoda find General Grievous's location."
"The concept art of pre production is shown in the picture above."



Number  1368
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  1369
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I don’t know, the whole thing is really… it’s like such an amazing experience.””
“To make her clean again.”
“Kylie Jenner opened up about the challenges of motherhood during a new interview conducted by Kim Kardashian.”
“In the Evening Standard magazine covey story, Kardashian, 37, pointed out that the “early stages of motherhood are challenging,” prompting the 20-year-old to reply, “It’s actually been the opposite for me.”
“I feel like it’s just been so amazing, and so much fun.”
“I m learning so much more about myself and life and it s been such a great experience Of course there s hard times and stuff even in the beginning just not sleeping the nights like baby blues and all the ups and downs Jenner admitted in the ES story...”
“...posted online on Monday May 1”
““And also even when I’m here it was so hard to leave this morning.”
“I’m like, ‘I’ll be right back, I’m so sorry, I have to leave!’ and she doesn’t even know what’s going on.”
“I think about her all the time, anywhere I am.”


"I don't know. The whole thing really It's like such a wonderful experience. "
"Clean her up."
"Kelly Jenner has opened up the challenge of motherhood in a new interview with Kim Kardashian
In the evening news magazine Covey story, Kardashian, 37, pointed out that "early motherhood was challenging," prompting Kardashian, 20, to reply, "in fact, for me, it's just the opposite."
"I think it's great, it's fun."
"I've learned more about myself and my life. It's a great experience. Of course, even at the beginning, I had some difficulties, but I didn't sleep like baby blues and all the ups and downs Jenna admitted in the story..."
“… Monday, May 1
"And even if I'm here, it's hard to leave this morning."
"I said," I'll be right back. I'm sorry, I have to go! "She doesn't even know what happened."
"I think about her all the time."



Number  1370
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Michelle Pfeiffer about the physical two dimensionality required for her to play a cocaine freak in Scarface For the latest celebrity news and interviews subscribe to our new podcast In Case You Missed Us below...”
“Of course I tried to time it so that as the movie went on I became thinner and thinner and more emaciated The problem was the movie went six months I was starving by the end of it because the one scene that was the end of the film where...”
““Michelle, as the father of a daughter, I’m concerned with body image.”
“The preparation for this film, what did you weigh?” moderator Jesse Kornbluth asked the Oscar nominee at a Tribeca Film Festival panel on Thursday, April 19, according a video posted by a fan.”
“After the audience began to boo the question and wondered aloud why it even needed to be asked Kornbluth clarified This is not the question you think it is The infamous moment at tonight s Scarface reunion panel where MichellePfeiffer was asked by the moderator who apparently is the father...”
“...of a daughter how much she weighed during filming which was followed by a mixture of confusion and disdain from the audience...”
“#Tribeca2018 pic.twitter.com/xQUQ6FJqtC — Mark Espinosa (@SportsGuy515) April 20, 2018“Well, OK.”
“I don’t know, but I was playing a cocaine addict so that was part of the physicality of the part, which you have to consider,” the 59-year-old actress explained.”
““The movie was only supposed to be, what?”
“A three-month, four-month [shoot]?”


"Michelle Pfeiffer subscribes to our new podcast about the body dimensions she needs to play a cocaine freak in the latest celebrity news and interviews in case you miss us below..."
"Of course, I try to time, so as the movie goes on, I get thinner and thinner. The problem is that it's been six months since the movie, and I'm hungry at the end of the movie, because a scene at the end of the movie is... "
"Michelle, as the father of a daughter, I'm very concerned about body image."
"How much did you weigh in preparation for the film? On Thursday, April 19, a fan released a video in which host Jesse Kern Bruce asked the Oscar nominees at a panel discussion at the Tribeca Film Festival
"As the audience starts to hush this question and wonder aloud why it even needs to be asked, Cohen brute clarifies that this is not what you think this is at the infamous moment of tonight's scar reunion group, and Michelle leppfeiffer is asked by the host who is apparently the father..."
“…… How much weight does a daughter weigh during the shooting process, and then the audience is confused and disdained... "
"# Tribeca 2018 pic.twitter.com/xqq6fjqtc -Mark Espinosa (@ sportsguy515) April 20, 2018 "OK, OK."
"I don't know, but I'm playing a cocaine addict, so it's part of the character's body, and you have to think about that," the 59 year old actress explained
"The movie was supposed to be, what?"
"Three months, four months of shooting?"



Number  1371
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From the meals and drinks to internet hosting etiquette, Kristin’s recommendation will come in useful in just some brief days.”
“Information.”
“The style designer and greatest-promoting writer took trip of her busy schedule to share her Tremendous Bowl social gathering ideas solely with E!”
“...soccer match of the yr And sure she is aware of simply what to do if a number of friends present up at her door to benefit from the popular culture occasion...”
“Whereas her husband Jay Cutler and the Miami Dolphins will not be enjoying within the ultimate recreation of the season Kristin will nonetheless be becoming a member of hundreds of thousands of People in having fun with the most important...”


"From catering to hosting etiquette, Christine's recommendations will be useful in just a few days."
"Information."
"This fashion designer and the greatest publicity writer is busy with E!"
“…… If a lot of friends show up at her door and benefit from pop culture, she will know what to do.... "
"Although her husband Jay Cutler and the Miami Dolphins won't be able to enjoy the ultimate entertainment of the season, Christine will be one of hundreds of thousands of people, having fun with the most important people..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Image zoom Lara Spencer and Rick McVey | Credit: CourtesyImage zoom Lara Spencer and Rick McVey | Credit: CourtesyMcVey is also a divorcé and the father of three grown daughters...”
““[David] Happy Happy big 5-0 to the best dad our kids could ever ask for.” she wrote.”
“In August, she shared a photo of Haffenreffer with their two kids in a birthday tribute post.”
“Despite their split, Spencer and Haffenreffer have remained committed to raising their children together.”
“After 15 years together, Spencer announced in March 2015 that she and Haffenreffer were amicably divorcing.”
“This will be the second marriage for Spencer, who was previously wed to real estate broker and former reporter David Haffenreffer, with whom she shares two teenage children: daughter Katharine and son Duff.”
““The first 3 attempts at this selfie had the #eiffeltower coming out of my head like a single antenna #smallvictory #paris,” Spencer, 48, captioned a smiling selfie of the pair in front of the Eiffel Tower in July.”
“Image zoom Lara Spencer and Rick McVey | Credit: CourtesyShe has shared multiple photos on social media of herself with McVey, including a trip to Paris last year.”
“Spencer, who is the creator, producer and host of HGTV’s Flea Market Flip, first met McVey — the founder, chairman and CEO of MarketAxess, a publicly traded and successful financial technology company — after being set up on a blind date arranged by a mutual friend.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Picture zooming Lara Spencer and Rick McVey | picture zooming Lara Spencer and Rick McVey | picture zooming Lara Spencer and Rick McVey | picture zooming courtsymcvey is also a divorcee, the father of three adult daughters..."
"(David) happy 5-0 to the best dad our kids have ever had." She wrote
In August, she shared photos of hafen River and her two children in a birthday message
"Despite the breakup, Spencer and hafenrev are still committed to raising their children together."
"After 15 years together, Spencer announced in March 2015 that she and hafenrev were amicably divorced."
"It's going to be Spencer's second marriage. Spencer married real estate agent and former journalist David hafenrefer, and they have two teenagers: daughter Catherine and son Duff."
In July this year, Spencer, 48, wrote in a smiling face selfie in front of the Eiffel Tower: "the first three attempts of this selfie make me think of the Eiffel Tower, which is like an antenna" little victory "in Paris."
"Image zooming Laura Spencer and Rick McVey | credit: Curtis shared a number of photos of himself and McVey on social media, including his trip to Paris last year."
"Spencer is the creator, producer and host of HGTV's flea market flip. After setting up at a blind date arranged by mutual friends, he first met McVeigh, the founder, chairman and CEO of marketaxess, a listed and successful financial technology company."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  1373
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As the lab workers exit, Veronica, Cheryl and Toni move in.”
“While inside, they discover that Sweet Pea and Fangs were right in their assumptions.”
“[2]Nick St. Clair hosts a party in his room in the Five Seasons hotel.”
“Later that day, Mr. Philips agreed to reopen the Red and Black as long as Jughead didn't include Jingle Jangle or gangs within the paper.”
“[1]While Toni Topaz was giving Jughead Jones a tour of Southside High, she pointed out a group of kids consuming Jingle Jangle in their natural habitat.”
“The couple then consumed the drug at a secluded location at Lovers' Lane, which ends them up in the Black Hood's line of fire.”
“The following night, Reggie delivered the Jingle Jangle in the diner's parking lot to Midge and Moose, attempting to do it in secret, but ended up being photographed by Alice Cooper, unbeknownst to Reggie and his clients.”
“Reggie told her that he'll see what he can do.”
“...it was for her and Moose Mason...”
“After instructing Midge to keep her voice down on school property because the simple mentioning of the drug can land them both in a lot of trouble Reggie asked who the Jingle Jangle was for to which she replied that...”


"When the lab staff left, Veronica, Cheryl and Tony moved in."
"Inside, they found that the sweet pea and fangs hypothesis was correct."
"Nick St. Clair had a party in the four seasons room."
"Later that day, Mr. Philips agreed to reopen the red and Black newspapers, as long as there were no jingles or gangs in them."
[1] When Tony Topaz showed Judd Jones around southern high school, she pointed out that a group of children were tinkling in their natural habitat
"Then the couple took drugs in a secluded place in lover's lane, and finally they were surrounded by a line of fire with a black hood."
"The next night, Reggie passed the jingle in the restaurant parking lot to Mickey and moose, trying to do it secretly, but it was finally photographed by Alice Cooper, and neither Reggie nor his clients knew it."
"Reggie told her he would see what he could do."
“… It's for her and Mason the moose... "
"Reggie instructs Mickey to speak quietly at school, because the mention of drugs will cause them a lot of trouble. Reggie asked who was listening to the jingle, and she said



Number  1374
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But for a truly meta experience, you can watch Zendaya watching herself, below:Related: Why This Tweet Comparing Bella Thorne and Zendaya Is TOTALLY Unfair...”
“Thankfully, the vids are all still online for the world's viewing pleasure.”
“To her, the thought of not being 100 percent true to herself is cringeworthy—hence, why she was literally cringing as she revisited some of her old videos from her short stint as a vlogger.”
“The Spider-Man: Homecoming star posted a video in which she watched and critiqued YouTube videos created by her 14-year-old self, Elle reports.”
“The peppy girl in the videos—whose catchphrase is "don't forget to smile"—is admittedly quite a bit different from the Zendaya the world is used to seeing slay on red carpets and take down trolls on Twitter.”
“When I was younger I genuinely felt that I had to make a persona that matched Rocky which is the character that I used to play she says of the old clips referencing her character on Disney Channel s Shake...”
“It Up...”
“"This is back when I literally had an entire alter-ego, and this sh*t is so obnoxious — I can't even believe."”
“As it turns out, 2017 Zendaya isn't really feeling 2010 Zendaya's schtick.”
“"'Happy smiley faces?'”


"But to get a real meta experience, you can look at zendaya, look at herself, next: related: why is this microblog comparing Bella Thorne and cendaya totally unfair..."
"Thank goodness, the videos are still on the Internet. It's fun to watch all over the world."
"For her, she cringes at the thought of not being 100% true to herself, so she does not hesitate to relive some of the old videos of her short career as a video producer."
Spider Man: Homecoming star released a video in which she watched and commented on a 14-year-old YouTube video she made, Elle reported
"The catchword of the lively girl in the video is' don't forget to smile '- she's undeniably very different from zendaya, who is used to seeing the killing on the red carpet and the villain on twitter."
"When I was young, I really felt that I had to play a role that matched the role I used to play rocky," she said of her role in Disney Channel swing
"Hang it up..."
"It's back to the time when I had a completely different self. It's so annoying, I can't believe it."
"It turns out that zendaya in 2017 didn't really feel the desire of zendaya in 2010."
"Happy smile?"



Number  1375
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Since then, she has inspired two books, an ice cream flavor and has gained worldwide attention.”
“She grew from 29 pounds to 500 pounds by September 23.”
“Dedicated Cincinnati Zoo caretakers hand-raised her and gave her 24-hour care so that she would grow strong enough to be able to live at the zoo with her parents.”
“After her birth in January 2017, she was the first Nile hippopotamus in captivity to survive being born six weeks prematurely.”
“...fionathehippo fionafix keepingupwiththekelbles cincyzoopic It s been a big year for baby Fiona...”
“The blissful bride to be later posted a series of photos to her Instagram page of the happy couple and the photogenic animal captioned We re so happy Fiona could be there on our special day here s to many more years of going to zoos with you cincinnatizoo cincinnatizoo...”
“While Kelble got down on one knee to pop the question to Roll, baby Fiona pressed herself up against the glass, got a front row seat to the sentiments and gave the photobomb of a lifetime.”
“Though Hayley Roll knew they were there to visit their favorite mammal in celebration of their one-year anniversary, what she didn’t know was that Fiona was about to make her appearance at just the right time.”
“While many people call on their friends and family to be waiting in the background of a surprise proposal, Nick Kelble got an extra special guest while popping the question to his fiancé in October – Fiona, Cincinnati Zoo’s very own baby hippo.”
“...literally...”


Since then, she has created two books, an ice cream flavor book, which has attracted worldwide attention
"By September 23, her weight had gone from 29 pounds to 500 pounds."
"Dedicated Cincinnati Zoo caretakers helped her up and took care of her 24 hours to make her strong enough to live in the zoo with her parents."
"Born in January 2017, she was the first captive Nile hippo to survive six weeks of premature birth."
“…… Fiaathhippo fiofafix kepupupto kelbs cursiopots this is an important year for Fiona baby... "
"The happy bride will post a series of photos on her happy couple's instagram page later. The animals in the photos say:" we are very happy that Fiona can come here on our special day and go to the zoo with you.
"When kelble knelt down to ask this question, baby Fiona put herself on the glass, got a front seat to express her feelings, and gave her a lifetime of light."
"Although Hayley roll knew they were coming to visit their favorite mammal to celebrate their first anniversary, what she didn't know was that Fiona was preparing to show up at the right time."
"Although many people appeal to their friends and family to wait in the context of a sudden suggestion, Nick kelble asked his fiancee in October about a special guest - Fiona, Cincinnati Zoo's own hippopotamus."
“… Really... "



Number  1376
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Indica una valoración global para el sitio:”
“¿Cómo podemos mejorar?”
“ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Comentarios Noticias México Coronavirus Videos Mundo Feminicidios Ciencia Tecnología Envía tus comentarios a MSN Agradecemos tus comentarios...”
“Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية”
“English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska...”
“English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland...”
“...msn volver a msn inicio noticias por Microsoft News búsqueda web Ir a navegación Ir a contenido Iniciar sesión Cambiar idioma y contenido Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada...”


“Indica una valoración global para el-sitio:”
"Como podmos machola?"
"Mexican coronavirus video"
“Türkiye T the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the  the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the the T T T T T T T T  At present, t is adopting λ λ α α α λ α α α according to different bases, in different Europe and in different countries It's the first time that we've been able to find a way to solve the problem
"English Italian Italian Magyarorsz á g Magyar Malaysian English Mexican Spanish Dutch New Zealand English Norwegian Norsk bokm å L Ö sterreich Deutsch per ú Espa NIA ol Philippine English Polska Polska Polska Portuguese Portuguese Portuguese Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South African English Swiss Fran å AIS Suomi Suomi sverige Svenska..."
"Canada, English, French, French, Spanish, Republic, Chile, Spanish, Colombia, Spanish, Denmark, Denmark, Germany, German, French, French, India, English, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, India, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia Asia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, Indonesia, International Edition, English, Ireland... "
“… MSN Volver a MSN Inicio noticias por Microsoft News B ú squeda Web IR a navigaci ó n IR a contenido iniciar Sesi ó n cambian idioma y contenido Afrique Francophone AIS am é Rica Latina Espa? Ol Argentina Espa? Ol Australian English Belgi è Nederlands Belgique francoais Brasil Portugu ê s Canada... "



Number  1377
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m very heartbroken over her passing, especially since it was cancer.””
““I’m a compassionate person.”
“As Us Weekly previously reported, Moran was found dead in her Indiana home at the age of 56 on Saturday, April 22.”
“Authorities later revealed that she likely died of complications from stage IV cancer.”
“Baio, 56, appeared on The Bernie & Sid Show on Monday to discuss his former Joanie Loves Chachi costar’s death.”
““For me, you do drugs or drink, you’re gonna die.”
“I’m sorry if that’s cold, but God gave you a brain, gave you the will to live and thrive and you gotta take care of yourself,” he said, sparking controversy on social media.”
“The Charles in Charge alum’s comments came shortly before officials released the likely cause of death.”
“In his Facebook post on Monday night, he explained to fans that he had been misinformed by false news reports claiming Moran had died of a heroin overdose.”
““This made me very upset and angry,” he wrote, recalling the moment he read the incorrect headlines.”


"I feel very sad about her death, especially because she has cancer."
"I'm a compassionate person."
"As previously reported by us weekly, Moran was found dead at his home in Indiana on Saturday, April 22, at the age of 56."
"Authorities later revealed that she was likely to die from complications of stage IV cancer."
"Bio, 56, appeared on Bernie and Sid's show on Monday to discuss the death of his former Joanne aichachi partner."
"For me, if you take drugs or drink alcohol, you will die."
"I'm sorry if it's cold, but God has given you a brain, given you the will to survive and thrive, you have to take care of yourself," he said, sparking controversy on social media
"The comments by the alumni in charge of Charles came shortly after the official announcement of the possible cause of death."
"On Monday night, he explained to fans on Facebook that he was misled by false news reports that Moran died of a heroin overdose."
"It made me very frustrated and angry," he wrote, recalling the moment he read the wrong title



Number  1378
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She like walks around the house naked and stuff.”Despite going under the knife multiple times, Mama June isn’t bothered by those who accuse her of “cheating ” her way to self-improvement.”
““I’ve seen a lot of changes in her,” Mama June’s youngest daughter Alana “Honey Boo Boo” Thompson dished on the reunion of Mama June: From Not to Hot about her mother’s physical and mental transformation.”
“All to the tune of $75,000.”
“...of loose skin.”
“...turkey neck bat wings and stomach an area where doctors removed 9 lbs...”
“FROM COINAGE 9 Healthy Kitchen Staples That Cost Less Than 1 Per Serving In a matter of months she underwent an extensive series of surgeries that include the insertion of a gastric sleeve breast augmentation and skin removal on her...”
“...ex Mike Sugar Bear Thompson s wedding...”
“Image zoom Credit Splash News In March PEOPLE exclusively revealed Mama June s extreme weight loss when she made her slimmed down debut and stepped into her red hot revenge dress which helped serve as motivation for her to attend...”
“...a prop...”
“The new photos show off 37 year old Mama June s toned physique as she sports a fitted one piece red bathing suit similar to the female lifeguards in the iconic 90s series and holds a red rescue buoy as...”


"She likes to walk around the house naked." Although she was stabbed many times, Joan's mother was not bothered by those who accused her of "cheating" herself
"I saw a lot of changes in her," said Alana Thompson, the youngest daughter of Joan's mother. "Sweetheart Bobo" tells about her mother's physical and mental changes in the reunion of Joan's mother: never hot to hot
"That's 75000 dollars."
“… The skin is flabby. "
“… Turkey neck bat wing and stomach doctor removed 9 pounds of area... "
"Starting with nine healthy kitchen staples produced by the mint, in just a few months, she underwent a series of extensive operations, including inserting a gastric cuff for breast augmentation and skin resection..."
“… The wedding of former Mike Thompson the sugar bear... "
"Image scaling credit splash news in March people exclusive revealed mom's extreme weight loss in June when she made her weight loss debut and entered her red hot revenge dress, which helped as her motivation to participate..."
“… Props... "
"The new photo shows the body-building of 37 year old Joan's mother. She is wearing a fitting red swimsuit, similar to the female lifeguard in the iconic '90s series, holding a red buoy as..."



Number  1379
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“Thursday, July 6, at 10 p.m.”
“Now I can find what really is gonna make me happy.”Life of Kylie premieres on E!”
““This is like a therapy session.”
““This isn’t Keeping Up With the Kardashians,” she says.”
“I do feel pressure to not let anybody down.”The preview also shows Jenner taking a lucky high school student to prom, posing in an array of sexy ensembles for various photo shoots and even chilling with her BFF Jordyn Woods during rare moments of downtime.”
““This show is a gift to my fans.”
““There’s an image that I feel constantly pressured to keep up with,” she says, adding that she hopes Life of Kylie will help her fans get to know both sides of the reality TV queen.”
“Jenner then goes on to explain that she has two sides: There’s the glamorous social media maven with more than 93 million Instagram followers, and then there’s the young girl from Calabasas who likes to kick it with her besties whenever she isn’t working.”
““I don’t think any of us knew what we were getting ourselves into,” she tells the camera.”


"Wait a minute."
Thursday, July 6, 10 pm
"Now I can find something that really makes me happy." Kelly's life premiered on channel e
"It's like a course of treatment."
"It can't keep up with the kardashians," she said
"I do feel the pressure not to let anyone down." The rehearsal also shows Jenna taking a lucky high school student to a dance, posing sexy group photos in all kinds of photos, and even spending a rare break with her boyfriend Jordan woods
"This show is a gift for my fans."
"There is an image that I feel constant pressure to keep up," she said, adding that she hopes Kelly's life will help her fans understand both sides of the reality show queen
"Jenner went on to explain that she has two sides: a charming social media expert with more than 93 million instagram fans, and a young girl from Calabasas who likes to kick it with her friends whenever she's not working."
"I don't think any of us know what we're in," she told the camera



Number  1380
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...second time for the votes of the public separate from the previous round s votes...”
“Color key Artist received the highest number of votes on his her team and directly advanced to the Top 12 Artist was not chosen by the public and was left to perform again in Round 2 Round 2 edit For Tuesday and Wednesday nights the 20 remaining artists performed a...”
“...in the Battle rounds Stolen in the Battle rounds Eliminated in the Battle rounds Eliminated in the Battle rounds Withdrew Coaches Top 48 artists Adam Levine Rayshun LaMarr Jackie Verna Sharane Calister Mia Boostrom Drew Cole Reid Umstattd Gary Edwards Jackie Foster Jordyn Simone Miya Bass Tish Haynes Keys Angel...”
“Teams edit Color key Winner Winner Runner up Runner up Third place Third place Fourth place Fourth place Eliminated in Live Shows Eliminated in Live Shows Eliminated in the Live Playoffs Stolen in the Knockout rounds Stolen in the Knockout rounds Eliminated in The Knockouts Eliminated in The Knockouts Stolen...”
“[7]· Notes: At nineteen, Shawn Mendes became the youngest advisor on the American version of this show's history.”
“Adam Levine and Blake Shelton duet on "Fly Me to the Moon", Kelly Clarkson and Alicia Keys perform an amazing version of "Feeling Good".”
“[6]The coaches perform a medley set in vintage Las Vegas in the promo.”
“[5]This season's advisors for the Battle Rounds were Julia Michaels for Team Adam, Shawn Mendes for Team Alicia, Hailee Steinfeld for Team Kelly, and Trace Adkins for Team Blake.”
“Miley Cyrus and Jennifer Hudson were replaced by new coaches Kelly Clarkson, who was Team Blake's battle advisor in the second season and key advisor for the Knockout Rounds in thirteenth season, and Alicia Keys who returned to the panel, Carson Daly returned for his fourteenth season as host.”
“Adam Levine and Blake Shelton returned as coaches, making them the only members of the coaching panel to be part of all fourteen seasons.”


“… The second is a public vote, separate from the previous round
"The color key artist won the highest number of votes in his team and went straight to the top 12. The artist was not selected by the public and could only perform again in the second edition of the second round on Tuesday and Wednesday nights. The remaining 20 artists gave a performance... "
“… Being stolen in the battle wheel being eliminated in the battle wheel being eliminated in the battle wheel former 48 artists Adam Levin ray shunla Mar jekyweina saran karistmia bustrom druckered umm stadgary Edwards jekyforster Jordin Simon Mia bastish Haines key angel... "
"Team editor color key winner runner up runner up third third third fourth fourth eliminated in live performance eliminated in live playoffs eliminated in knockout stolen in knockout eliminated in knockout eliminated in knockout stolen in knockout..."
[7] Note: at the age of 19, Sean Mendes became the youngest consultant in the history of the American version of the show
Adam Levin and Blake Sheldon perform an amazing "feel good" version of Kelly Clarkson and Alicia case in the send me to the moon duet
"[6] in the promo, the coaches perform a medley against the backdrop of Las Vegas."
[5] This season's battle advisors are Julia Michaels of Adam, Sean Mendes of Alicia, Haley Stanfield of Kelly and tres Adkins of black
"Miley Cyrus and Jennifer Hudson have been replaced by new coach Kelly Clarkson, who is black's combat advisor in the second season and key advisor in the knockout in the 13th season. Alicia case has returned to the group and Carson Daley has returned to his 14th season as host."
"Adam Levin and Blake Sheldon have returned as coaches, making them the only coaching staff in 14 seasons."



Number  1381
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Michael Loccisano/Getty Images)”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“ET on Sunday.”
“Miranda Lambert Is Ravishing in Red as She Hits the ACMs Solo After Anderson East SplitMiranda Lambert made her first red carpet appearance after splitting from boyfriend Anderson East at the ACM Awards on Sunday in Las Vegas.”
“The country superstar looked ravishing in red in a flowing gown with a cut-out, sequined bodice.”
“She accessorized with a pink clutch and had her hair styled in loose waves.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Jason Kempin/ACMA2018/GettyLambert, 34, and Anderson, 30, made their romance red carpet official in 2016 at the same event and also posed together last year at the annual awards show.”
“Be sure to check out PEOPLE’s full ACM Awards coverage to get the latest news on country’s big night.”
“Image zoom Credit: John Shearer/WireImageIn early March, the country star hinted at a possible breakup when she reflected on pouring her emotions into her music during a concert at the Thompson-Boling Arena in Knoxville, Tennessee.”


"Image scaling credit: Michael locciano / Getty Images)"
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Eastern time on Sunday."
"At the ACM awards ceremony in Las Vegas on Sunday, Miranda Lambert made her debut on the red carpet after breaking up with her boyfriend Anderson East. She was a hit in the ACMS solo after Anderson East broke up."
The country superstar looks charming in a flowing robe and a cut-out sequined corset in red
"She wore a pink hairpin and combed her hair in a loose wavy shape."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Image zooming credit: Jason kempin / acma2018 / Getty Lambert, 34, and Anderson, 30, formally stepped onto their romantic red carpet at the same event in 2016 and took a group photo at last year's annual awards ceremony."
"Be sure to check out people's comprehensive ACM award coverage to get the latest news on the country's big night."
In early March, at a concert at Thompson Boleyn stadium in Knoxville, Tennessee, the country star recalled pouring his emotions into his music, suggesting a possible breakup



Number  1382
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“She retweeted the post alongside a series of red hearts and prayer hands.”
““Whether or not the tea that’s out there is true prayers with @Evelyn Lozada,” a fan wrote to the reality star with a heart emoji.”
“?☀️ A post shared by Evelyn Lozada (@evelynlozada) on Jul 3, 2017 at 8:52am PDTLozada took to Twitter on Thursday to thank a fan offering her support following the split.”
“???”
“The former Dodgers star flew to Vegas in June without Lozada and Leo, while the TV personality enjoyed a vacation in the Bahamas in early July.”
“Lozada and Crawford, who were last seen together in March celebrating Leo’s birthday party, recently sparked breakup rumors when fans began to notice that they’d been posting several Instagram photos traveling without each other’s company.”
“The couple welcomed their first child together, Leo, in March the following year.”
“The duo got engaged in December 2013 after Crawford proposed to Lozada on Christmas Eve with a $1.5 million ring.”
““Right now they are focused on being responsible and loving parents to their 3-year-old kid.” The former flames “do remain friends,” but Lozada, who currently resides in Arizona, is not living with the baseball star.”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
"She forwarded this post with a series of hearts and hands of prayer."
"Whether or not the tea outside is really praying with @ Evelyn lozada," one fan wrote to the reality TV star with a heart-shaped symbol
“? ☀️  Evelyn lozada (@ evelynlozada) shared a post on twitter at 8:52 a.m. on July 3, 2017, thanking a fan for her support after the breakup. "
“???”
"The former Dodger star flew to Vegas in June without lozada and Leo, while the TV celebrity was on holiday in the Bahamas in early July."
"The last time lozada and Crawford met was in March. They celebrated Leo's birthday party together. Recently, fans began to notice that they posted several photos on instagram without each other's company, which triggered rumors of a breakup."
The next March, the couple ushered in their first child, Leo
"They got engaged in December 2013, when Crawford proposed to lozada on Christmas Eve and presented him with a $1.5 million ring."
"Now they focus on responsible and loving parents for their 3-year-old." Former flame "is still a friend," but lozada, who currently lives in Arizona, doesn't live with the baseball star



Number  1383
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The special will revisit some of the funniest and most beloved segments, such as “Bitch Stole My Look,” “Guess Me from Behind,” and “Starlet or Streetwalker.” It will also feature surprise celebrity guests, taking viewers behind-the-scenes with insider scoop from cast and crew.”
“I can’t wait!” Rancic, 43, said in a statement to PEOPLE.”
“From celebrity appearances and never-before-seen moments with the late, great Joan Rivers, the finale is going to be a show fans won’t want to miss as we all celebrate the great run the show has had.”
““For the past 20 years, Fashion Police has been part of the pop culture zeitgeist and it’s definitely been a fun ride for the hosts as well as the viewers.”
“The upcoming special will look back at the show’s most memorable moments, from the many celebrity guests to all the outrageous fashion debates over the years.”
““I am truly proud to be part of this legacy.”RELATED VIDEO: Melissa Rivers Says Joan Rivers Would Have Been Excited to See Nicole Kidman’s Outfit at the OscarsIn addition to Melissa, the current panel also includes Giuliana Rancic, Brad Goreski, NeNe Leakes and Margaret Cho.”
“...for having the vision to see the potential of Fashion Police which changed both the entertainment and fashion industries,” Melissa said in a statement.”
““Thank you to E!”
“After Joan died at 81 in September 2014 — a week after she stopped breathing during throat surgery — the franchise continued with the blessing of her daughter and executive producer on the show since its launch, Melissa, 49, who became a co-host in 2015.”
“Fashion Police was helmed by the legendary comedian since its inception in 1995, covering every major award show and fashion event with Joan’s signature sharp wit.”


The special will revisit some of the most interesting and popular clips, such as "whore stole my look", "guess me from behind" and "little star or busker". It will also have surprise celebrity guests to bring the audience behind the scenes through the crew and the crew's in-house exclusive
"I can't wait! Lange, 43, said in a statement
"Judging from the appearance of celebrities and the moments never seen before with the late great Joan Rivers, the ending will be a show that fans don't want to miss, because we are all celebrating the great success of the show."
"The fashion police have been part of the spirit of the pop culture era for the past 20 years, and it's definitely an interesting trip for the hosts and the audience."
"The upcoming special will look back on the show's most memorable moments, from many celebrity guests to all the outrageous fashion debates over the years."
"I'm really proud to be part of this legacy." Related video: Melissa Rivers said Joan Rivers would be excited to see Nicole Kidman's costume at the Oscars. In addition to Melissa, the current jury includes Juliana Lynch, Brad goresky, Nene Rix and Margaret Jo
Melissa said in a statement: "the Seeing the potential of fashion police with foresight has changed the entertainment industry and the fashion industry. "
"Thank you for your help!"
"In September 2014, Joan died at the age of 81. A week ago, she stopped breathing during throat surgery. Since the start of the show, Melissa, 49, has continued to be its anchor with the blessing of her daughter and executive producer, and she became co host in 2015. "
Since its inception in 1995, the legendary comedian has been in charge of the fashion police, covering every major award ceremony and fashion event with Joan's signature wit



Number  1384
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are so happy to share with loved ones the wonderful news that we got married!””
“After reuniting and marrying in 2016, the pair told Entertainment Tonight, “Life is full of ups and downs but in the end, you’ll end up where you’re supposed to be.”
“They became engaged in March 2015 but called off their wedding just days before their planned nuptials in May 2015.”
“The two walked a rocky path from the start.”
“He also blocked Palin, 27, on social media at the time.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“A source knowledgeable of the situation told PEOPLE in February that Meyer had, around Christmas 2017, moved out of the home he and Bristol had shared in Austin, Texas.”
“The couple married in June 2016.”
“In divorce documents filed by Meyer, he cited “discord or conflict of personalities” as the reason for their split.”


"We are very happy to share the good news of our marriage with our relatives!"
"After getting married again in 2016, they told Entertainment Tonight," life is full of ups and downs, but in the end, you'll get where you need to go. "
"They were engaged in March 2015, but cancelled a few days before the wedding planned for may 2015."
"They took a rough road from the beginning."
"He also blocked Palin, 27, on social media."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"A person familiar with the matter told people in February that Meyer moved out of his and Bristol home in Austin, Texas, around Christmas 2017."
"The couple got married in June 2016."
In his divorce filing, Meyer mentioned "discord or conflict of character" as the reason for their separation



Number  1385
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If it is necessary to abbreviate “costume designer” for space, please use “designer.””
“Things Kim Wilcox Excellence in Sci Fi Fantasy Television Black Mirror USS Callister Maja Meschede Game of Thrones Michele Clapton Once Upon a Time Eduardo Castro Dan Lester Sleepy Hollow Mairi Chisholm Star Trek Discovery Gersha Phillips Excellence in Short Film Design Assassin s Creed I Am Commercial Patrik Milani...”
“...form Costume Design...”
“Produced by JumpLine, this year’s platinum anniversary CDGA gala will take place on Tuesday, February 20, 2018 at the Beverly Hilton Hotel.”
“Honorees including the Career Achievement, Distinguished Collaborator, Distinguished Service, and Spotlight awards will be announced in the coming weeks.”
“The 20th CDGA will be sponsored by THE OUTNET.COM, Harper’s BAZAAR, Westfield, and Grand Marnier®.”
““I would like to congratulate all of the nominees of the 2018 Costume Designers Guild Awards.”
“As we commemorate the 20th year of the CDGA, we are so proud of the legacy Costume Designers have created for the Film and Television industry.”
“We look forward to celebrating the art of Costume Design and our honorees at our awards gala on February 20, 2018,” said Salvador Perez, President of the Costume Designers Guild Local #892.”
“Following is the list of final nominees.”


If the space needs to be abbreviated as "study designer", use "designer"
"East West King Wilcox excellent science fiction fantasy TV black mirror U.S. Navy caliste majamescud power game Michelle Clapton once Eduardo Castro Dan Leicester sleepy hollow Merrich Shaw Star Trek found gersa Phillips excellent short film design assassin creed I'm commercial Patrick Milani..."
“… "Formal fashion design..."
"This year's platinum anniversary cdga party produced by Jumpline will be held at the Beverly Hilton Hotel on Tuesday, February 20, 2018."
"Winners, including career achievements, outstanding collaborators, outstanding service and spotlight awards, will be announced in the coming weeks."
"The 20th cdga will be composed of Extranet, Harper market, Westfield and grand Marnier."
"I would like to congratulate all the nominees for the 2018 Fashion Designers Association Award."
"As we celebrate the 20th anniversary of cdga, we are proud of the legacy that fashion designers have created for the film and television industry."
"We are looking forward to celebrating the art of fashion design and our winners at the awards show on February 20, 2018," said El Perez, President of the local Fashion Designers Association
"Here is the final list of nominations."



Number  1386
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pair first stepped out together as a couple in January 2012.”
““Getting prepped to go back into the trenches.”Us Weekly exclusively reported in December 2014 that The Danish Girl actor and the businesswoman tied the knot in a private ceremony at Babington House in Somerset, England, less than one year after he proposed.”
““We’ve just about got to that stage when we’re beginning to get sleep and remember what that word means,” the Golden Globe winner added.”
““Last time we didn’t know either, and we did that thing where there was basically only one name for each sex that we agreed on.”The Les Miserables actor and the PR executive welcomed daughter Iris in June 2016.”
““We don’t know [what we’re having] — we’re not going to find out,” he told the cohosts.”
“The Fantastic Beasts and Where to Find Them star opened up about preparing to welcome his second child during his visit to Live With Kelly and Ryan in February.”
““Eddie and Hannah are delighted to confirm they are expecting a second child,” a spokesperson for the Oscar winner, 36, told Us Weekly at the time.”
“2.”
“The pair announced their son’s arrival in the London Times: “On 10th March 2018 to Hannah (Bagshawe) and Edward, a son, Luke Richard Bagshawe Redmayne, brother to Iris.”The couple revealed in November 2017 that they were expecting baby No.”
“Eddie Redmayne and wife Hannah Redmayne have welcomed their second child together.”


"In January 2012, the two first came together as lovers."
"Prepare to return to the trenches." In December 2014, US weekly exclusively reported that the Danish actress and the businesswoman had a private wedding at Babington palace in Somerset, less than a year after he proposed
"We're just at that stage, we're going to sleep, remember the meaning of the word," the Golden Globe winner added
"Last time we didn't know, we did one thing, each gender basically has only one name, we agreed." The les miserables actor and PR Director welcomed his daughter iris in June 2016
"We don't know (what we're eating) - we won't know," he told the gang
"The amazing beast and where to find them star opened up about preparing to meet his second child during his visit with Kelly and Ryan in February."
"Eddie and Hannah are happy to confirm that they are pregnant with a second child," a spokesman for the 36 year old Oscar winner told weekly at the time
“2.”
The two announced their son's arrival in the London Times: "on March 10, 2018, Hannah and her son Edward, Luke Richard bagshawe Redmayne, iris's brother." The couple revealed in November 2017 that they were not pregnant with children. "
"Eddie Redman and his wife Hannah Redman have their second child."



Number  1387
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Hader and Carey share three daughters together: Hannah, 8, Harper, 5, and Hayley, 3.”
“Image zoom Credit: Alberto E. Rodriguez/GettyPEOPLE confirmed in November that the Saturday Night Live alum and his filmmaker spouse of over 11 years had been separated since July and were in the process of getting a divorce.”
“The actor, who starred in Trainwreck, also stated that spousal support should be paid to Carey.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Thursday, Hader, 39, filed court documents citing irreconcilable differences as the cause of the split and is seeking joint physical and legal custody of their children, according to court documents obtained by The Blast.”
“PEOPLE confirmed last month that Bill Hader and Maggie Carey had been separated since July and were in the process of getting a divorceBill Hader Files for Divorce from Wife Maggie Carey After 11 Years of MarriageBill Hader has officially filed for divorce from wife Maggie Carey.”


Hard and Kelly have three daughters: Hannah, 8, Harper, 5 and Haley, 3
"Credit for image zooming: Alberto E. Rodriguez / gettypeople confirmed last November that the alumni, who was broadcast live on Saturday night, and his filmmaker's spouse, who has been married for more than 11 years, have separated since July and are currently going through divorce procedures."
The actor, who starred in the train crash, also said she should be paid alimony
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Court documents obtained from the bombings show that harde, 39, filed court documents on Thursday, citing irreconcilable differences as the reason for the breakup and seeking common physical and legal custody of his children."
"It was confirmed last month that Bill hard and Maggie Kelly had been separated since July and were now going through divorce procedures. After 11 years of marriage, Bill hard formally filed for divorce with his wife, Maggie Kelly."



Number  1388
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
““I’m realizing as I’m saying this, I’m putting my foot in my mouth, so I pass the bear on to the next person, and she’s like, ‘Well, it’s pretty sunny outside for me!’” Faris remembers another parent touting.”
“Anna Faris opens up about a recent funny experience she had trying to get her 5 year old son Jack into a school in L A During her appearance on Wednesday s The Ellen DeGeneres Show the Mom star 41 reveals that applying for private schools has been terrifying I”
“...went to this private school where they had all the parents sit around in a circle and I don t know anybody and there were a bunch of toys in the middle of a circle and we were supposed to pick a toy out and talk about the weather she...”
“...recalls of the awkward icebreaker...”
“"That was the only instruction."”
“Faris says she viewed the exercise as therapeutic, and picked up a stuffed bear to talk about how scared she was to be doing this and her fears of rejection.”
“She remembers speaking for a while before forcing herself to stop.”
“She notes that the rest of the moms and dads solely commented on the weather.”
“Embed Code Restart RELATED CONTENT Anna Faris Talks Love and Friendship With Chris Pratt and What She s Looking for in a Relationship Anna Faris and Chris Pratt Have Settled Into a Nice Friendship After Split Exclusive Dax Shepard Reveals He Had the Hots for Anna Faris Back in 2005”


Related libraries
"I realized that when I said this, I put my foot in my mouth, so I passed the bear on to the next person, and she said," well, it's sunny outside for me! "Faris remembers another parent boasting."
"Anna Faris recounts an interesting experience recently when she tried to get her 5-year-old son Jack into a school in Los Angeles. In her appearance on the Ellen DeGeneres Show the mom star 41 on Wednesday, she revealed that applying for a private school scared me."
“… I went to a private school where all the parents form a circle. I don't know anyone. There are a lot of toys in the middle of the circle. We should choose a toy and talk about her... "
“… Remember that clumsy icebreaker... "
"This is the only instruction."
Faris said she saw the sport as a cure and picked up a plush bear to talk about how scared she was when she did it and her fear of rejection
"She remembered saying it for a while and then forcing herself to stop."
"She noticed that the rest of the moms and dads only commented on the weather."
"Embedded code restart related content Anna Faris and Chris Platt talk about love and friendship, what kind of relationship she is looking for. After Anna Faris and Chris Platt broke up, dukes Sheppard revealed that he had a special love for Anna Faris as early as 2005, and had formed a very good friendship."



Number  1389
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The statement was first reported on Friday by Entertainment Tonight.”
““We kindly ask that the media respect our privacy at this time.”Taylor has appeared in several of Stiller’s films, including Dodgeball: A True Underdog Story, Tropic Thunder and Zoolander and its sequel.”
“Our priority will continue to be raising our children as devoted parents and the closest of friends,” the actors wrote.”
“Ben Stiller speaks about diagnosis with prostate cancer Read more“With tremendous love and respect for each other, and the 18 years we spent together as a couple, we have made the decision to separate.”
“They were married in May 2000 and have two children, who they said will remain their priority.”
“Stiller and Taylor released a joint statement on Friday announcing their breakup.”
“Actors were married in May 2000 and have two children, who they said will remain their priorityThis article is more than 3 years oldThis article is more than 3 years oldActors Ben Stiller and Christine Taylor have announced that they are separating after 17 years of marriage.”


"This statement was first reported on Friday by tonight's entertainment program."
"We urge the media to respect our privacy at this time." Taylor has starred in several of Stiller's films, including dodgeball: the story of a real loser, tropical thunder, zoo man and their sequels
"Our first priority will continue to be to develop our children into loyal parents and closest friends," the actors wrote
"Ben Stiller read more about prostate cancer diagnosis." with great love and respect for each other and the 18 years we spent together as a couple, we decided to separate
"They got married in May 2000 and have two children, which they say will remain their priority."
"Stiller and Taylor issued a joint statement on Friday announcing their separation."
"The actors got married in May 2000 and had two children. They said they would keep their priority. This article is more than three years old. This article is more than three years old. Actors Ben Stiller and Christina Taylor announced that they would separate after 17 years of marriage."



Number  1390
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch below:”
“BuzzFeed posted the trailer, which includes profanity.”
““Rough Night” opens June 16.”
“Matt Tolmach and Dave Becky will also produce.”
“Both Aniello and Downs produced the film through their Paulilu banner.”
“Sony picked up the project in an aggressive bidding war.”
“The script for “Rock That Body” appeared on the Black List in 2015.”
“The film is directed by Lucia Aniello from a script she wrote with her writing partner Paul W. Downs.”
“An attorney tells the quintet they could be facing up to 15 years, because they’ve moved the body.”
“Bell’s character leaps onto a male stripper at the rented condo and accidentally kills him, then snorts up the cocaine to conceal it.”


Watch below:
"Buzzfeed has released a trailer that includes blasphemy."
Hard night will be released on June 16
"Matt tormach and Dave Becky will also make it."
"Both aniello and Downes made the film through their paulillo flag."
"Sony took over the project in a fierce bidding war."
"In 2015, the script of" rock the body "appeared on the blacklist."
"The film is directed by Lucia Anello, who wrote the script with her writing partner Paul W. downs."
"A lawyer told the quintet that they could face a 15 year sentence because they removed the body."
"Bell's character jumps on a male stripper in a rented apartment, accidentally kills him, and then sniffs out cocaine to cover up."



Number  1391
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Chances are that if you’re reading this piece, you’re a woman, and I see you, my sister.”
“While true crime as a category is robust across most demographics, its core audience is women — and most of them fall into that tasty 25-to-45 advertising demographic.”
“This wasn’t, I knew, a love story.”
“I listened, and I waited for the other shoe to drop.”
“As she told her story, one part of my brain racked up similarities between her story and my own: how John had seemed perfect, how he swept her off her feet, how he made her feel loved — utterly, completely, and thoroughly loved.”
“Listening to Dear John, hearing the details of internet courtship, I took notice of Newell’s words.”
“Like Newell, I am also fiftysomething, and, as she had, I met my man online.”
“The plot centers on Deborah Newell, a fiftysomething SoCal interior designer who met Meehan on Our Time, a dating website for people of a certain age.”
“Right.”
“The series, which depicts the many ways Meehan preyed upon women, shows the escalating devastation a bad man can cause — and the ease with which we women can believe that the worst guy is actually Mr.”


"If you're reading this, you're probably a woman. I see you, my sister."
"While real crime is active as a category in the majority of the population, its core audience is women - and most of them are advertising people aged 25 to 45."
"I know it's not a love story."
"I'll listen and wait for the other shoe to fall."
"When she tells her story, part of my brain finds similarities between her story and mine: how John looks perfect, how he pulls her off his feet, how he makes her feel loved - complete, complete, complete."
"Listen, dear John, listening to the details of courtship online, I noticed Newell's words."
"Like Newell, I'm in my fifties. Like her, I met my man online."
"The plot centers on Deborah Newell, a socal interior designer in her 50s who meets Meehan in our time, a dating website for people of a certain age."
"Yes."
"This series describes the ways in which mihan plunders women, shows the escalating destruction that a bad man can cause - and that we women can easily believe that the worst man is actually Mr. mihan."



Number  1392
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the best looks from last night’s AMAs red carpet!”
“Back to the guessing game!”
“Not even Alena could get Nick to tell us who he’s been dating.”
“...pic.twitter.com/oZFDwNmVS7 — Nick Jonas (@nickjonas) November 20, 2017Ugh!”
“The #amas were one to be remembered this year for so many reasons.”
“I love my sweet sweet niece Alena!”
“My brother @kevinjonas and my sister in law @daniellejonas planned this all and then took this video of the live TV feed… this may be my favorite red carpet moment ever.”
“Check out Alena ask her uncle who he’s seeing lately!”
“Kevin Jonas sent over the video of his daughter, Alena, and she totally crushed her first interview!”
“While being interviewed, the “Find You” singer was asked a hard hitting question by the sweetest interviewer ever, his niece!”


"Look at the best look on the AMAS red carpet last night!"
"Back to guessing!"
"Even Alena can't let Nick tell us who he's dating."
“... pic.twitter.com/oZFDwNmVS7 -Nick Jonas (@ nickjonas) November 20, 2017
"For a variety of reasons, the Amar family is one of the most memorable families this year."
"I love my lovely niece, Alena!"
"My brother @ kevinjonas and my sister-in-law @ DanielleJonas planned all this and then made this live TV video It's probably my favorite red carpet moment. "
"Look at Alena and ask her uncle who he's seeing lately!"
"Kevin Jonas passed on the video of her daughter Alena, and she completely failed her first interview!"
In an interview, the singer who "found you" was asked a difficult question by the sweetest interviewer ever, his niece



Number  1393
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I support anything she does.” And, when Kim dropped her beauty line, La La immediately phoned her for some assistance in the beauty department.”
““She’s one of my closest friends.”
“So, with that being said, she filled us in on her daily food diary.”
“You can’t work your a-s off in the gym and then just throw it all away by eating horrible.” Ultimately, La La says she’s just trying to “find the balance” with hustling in the gym, and fueling her body the right way.”
“I can’t say I’m always great at it, but I try to keep that in mind.”
“I’m trying to stay consistent in making better choices when it comes to food.”
““And, I feel like a lot of us struggle with that.”
““With looking right, it’s mostly about your eating,” she admits.”
““And, I love to box.” But, the actress, knows that when it comes to looking your best it’s not only about sweating it out in the gym.”
““The Dogpound is actually close to my house; the owner [CEO and Founder, Kirk Myers] and I are very close friends,” La La tells us.”


"I support what she does." And when Kim gave up her beauty route, Lala immediately called her and asked her to help in the beauty department
"She's one of my closest friends."
"So, speaking of this, she wrote us her daily diet diary."
"You can't finish your A-S in the gym and throw it all away if you eat badly." In the end, Lala said she just wanted to "find balance" by being busy in the gym and replenish her body in the right way
"I can't say I've always been good at it, but I try to remember that."
"In terms of food, I've been trying to make better choices."
"And I think a lot of us are struggling with it."
"If you're right, it's mainly because of your diet," she admits
"Besides, I like boxing." But the actress knows that it's not just sweating in the gym to look the best
"The kennel is actually very close to my home; the owner (CEO and founder Kirk Myers) and I are very close friends," Lala told us



Number  1394
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kim Kardashian West Dishes on Newborn Daughter Chicago’s Chic Nursery...”
“Maybe True picked the wallpaper in my tummy.”Image zoom Khloé Kardashian and daughter True | Credit: Khloe Kardasahian/InstagramRELATED VIDEO: Sleeping Tight!”
““It’s so funny how we feel our children’s personalities before we even meet them.”
““The funny part is True has the longest skinniest legs like a flamingo!” Kardashian writes.”
“Image zoom True Thompson’s nursery | Credit: Keila LopezImage zoom True Thompson | Credit: Khloe Kardashian/InstagramHilariously, the new mom says, baby True might’ve had a say in her room’s decor — even from inside her mama’s belly!”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“I knew I wanted to do an animal somewhere in her room, but I wanted to do something a little more creative and not so traditional.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““I love how elegant the flamingo is.”
““The flamingo wallpaper was actually the first thing I saw that I knew I needed to have in my daughter’s nursery,” she explains.”
“Only I would ask for that challenge,” jokes the reality star, 33, showing off her baby girl‘s pink, white and gray space.”


"Kim Kardashian's western food at her new daughter's chic nursery in Chicago..."
"Maybe I did pick wallpaper in my stomach." Image zooming khlo é Kardashian and his daughter real | image source: Khloe kardasahian / instagram relatedvideo: sleep in
"It's funny that we feel their personality before we see them."
"The interesting part is that they really have the longest and thinnest legs, like flamingos! "Kardashian wrote."
"Picture zooming real Thompson's nursery | credit: Keira Lopez Maggie zooming real Thompson | credit: Khloe Kardashian / instagram Hilary, the new mother said, baby could really have a say in the decoration of her room - even from her mother's stomach!"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"I know I want to be an animal somewhere in her room, but I want to do something more creative and less traditional." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"I like the elegance of flamingos."
"Flamingo wallpaper was actually the first thing I saw, and I knew I needed to be in my daughter's nursery," she explained
The 33 year old reality star joked: "I'm the only one who will ask for this challenge." She's showing off her baby girl in pink, white and gray space



Number  1395
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Reunion With Nicole Kidman Related Gallery...”
“"I didn’t sleep the night before.”
“Alexander Skarsgard’s diabolical, abusive character, Perry Wright, was killed off in the finale of the first season of the hit HBO drama, Big Little Lies.”
“So, fans were confused when they saw photos of Skarsgard on the show’s season two set.”
“"I was on set, yes.”
“I can’t disclose what I did on set,” Skarsgard coyly shared on Wednesday’s Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon.”
“"Maybe, I was acting.”
“I might have been just moral support.”
“I might have just made coffee for the ladies.”
“I might have helped Meryl Streep with her acting… Not help, but just give her little pointers, fine tune it a bit.”In the upcoming season, Streep is portraying Mary Louise Wright, the headstrong mother of Perry.”


"Reunite with Nicole Kidman related gallery..."
"I didn't sleep the night before yesterday."
"Alexander scargaard's demonic, abusive character, Perry Wright, was killed at the end of HBO hit little lies Season 1."
"So fans were confused when they saw a picture of scarsgarde on the set of the second season of the show."
"I'm on set, yes."
"I can't reveal what I did on set," skasgarde said shyly on Wednesday in the tonight show, starring Jimmy Fallon
"Maybe I'm acting."
"I may be just a spiritual support."
"I may have just made coffee for the ladies."
"I might have helped Meryl Streep with her acting It won't help, but just give her some advice and fine tune it. " In the coming season, Streep will play Mary Louis Wright, the wayward mother of Perry



Number  1396
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...width 2070 data image do not crop data image do not resize data image watermark data lightbox Other Links From TVGuide com Lena DunhamJennifer Garner...”
“Jennifer Garner Alias data image credit Mitch Haaseth ABC via Getty Images data image alt text Jennifer Garner Alias data image credit url data image target url data image title Jennifer Garner Alias data image crop data image crop gravity data image aspect ratio data image height 1380 data image...”
“She currently lends her voice to the Netflix animated series Llama Llama.”
“Garner's starring role in Camping marks her first major TV role since Alias in which she starred from 2001-2006 alongside Michael Vartan and Victor Garber.”
“The weekend will see marriages tested and friends clashing.”
“However, things go south when her docile sister, holier-than-thou ex-bestie and a free-spirited crasher gather in one place.”
“The eight-episode comedy is adapted from the British series of the same name and centers around a camping trip celebrating Kathryn's husband's 45th birthday.”
“She is set to play Kathryn Siddell-Bauers, a "controlling L.A. mom who is far less cheerful than her Lululemons imply" according to TVLine.”
“The actress is slated to star in HBO's limited series Camping from Girls producers Lena Dunham and Jenni Konner.”
“Jennifer Garner is headed back to television and this time, she won't be needing any colorful wigs.”


“… Width 2070 data image does not crop data image does not adjust data image size watermark data light box other links from tvguide com Lena Dunham Jennifer Garner... "
"Jennifer Garner alias data picture credit Mitch haaseth ABC via Getty Images data picture alt text Jennifer Garner alias data picture credit URL data picture target URL data picture Title Jennifer Garner alias data picture crop data picture crop gravity data picture aspect ratio data picture height 1380 data picture..."
"She's currently dubbing the Netflix animated series camel."
"Ghana's leading role in camping marks her first major TV role since she starred in alias with Michael waltan and Victor Garber in 2001-2006."
"The weekend will witness the trials of marriage and conflicts with friends."
"However, when her meek sister, a more holy ex-wife than you and a free spirited prodigal gather in one place, things get worse."
"This 8-episode comedy is adapted from the British drama of the same name and centers on the camping to celebrate Catherine's husband's 45th Birthday."
According to tvline, she will play Kathryn siddell Bauers, a "mother who controls Los Angeles and is far less happy than the lullaby suggests."
"The actress will play the roles of Lina Dunham and Jenny Connor in HBO's limited edition series camping."
"Jennifer Garner will be back on TV. This time, she won't need any colorful wigs."



Number  1397
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 20-year-old singer left Fifth Harmony in December 2016 to pursue a solo career, and tells The New York Times that despite so much time having past, she didn't expect to be so publicly shaded by the four remaining members of the group.”
“"I wasn’t expecting it, I wasn’t prepared for it -- especially because at that point I’d moved on from it.”
“I was just like, ‘What?”
“Why?’” she recalls, tearing up.”
“"I have to make space for the good stuff to happen in my life.”
“I don’t like holding onto the past, especially when it’s stuff that, in my opinion, is just petty."”
“While Cabello and many viewers watching found the VMAs performance to be a dig at the new solo artist, Ally Brooke told Good Morning America that the fifth member was actually supposed to represent the media.”
““We get asked all the time if we’re getting a fifth member,” she explained.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 20-year-old singer left fifth harmony in December 2016 for a solo career and told the New York Times that despite all the time, she didn't expect to be covered up so publicly by the remaining four members."
"I didn't expect that, and I wasn't ready - especially because at that moment, I had left it."
"I just thought," what? "
"Why? "She recalled, tearing."
"I have to make room for the good things that happen in my life."
"I don't like to stick to the past, especially things that seem trivial to me."
"When Cabello and many of the audience saw that Vmas was mocking the new solo artist, ally Brooke told Good Morning America that the fifth member should actually represent the media."
"We are always asked if there is a fifth member," she explained



Number  1398
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click here to upload yours.”
“...and the Partridge Family perform classic hit I Woke Up in Love This Morning MOST READ IN NEWS IMPORTANT CLUES WHO investigator says evidence of how Covid started uncovered in Wuhan Exclusive TRUTH IS IN THERE CIA expert probing code filled diary of first man at Roswell UFO crash SPANISH”
“Instead, the late actor and musician, who shot to fame as Keith in 1970s TV sitcom The Partridge Family, reportedly left most of his estate to his son Beau.”
“4 David Cassidy and his daughter Katie at the 9th annual Family Television Awards in 2007 Credit Getty Images Getty Documents obtained by The Blast show the pop idol who died last month aged 67 left his 150 000 111 000 assets to Beau while his three half siblings were...”
“...left music memorabilia...”
“But the star made it clear that he did not want to leave any of his assets to his daughter Katie, who was by his side when he died.”
“He wrote: “It is my specific intent not to provide any benefits hereunder to Katherine Evelyn Cassidy.”The will was drafted in 2004.”
“Originally it named his then-wife Susan as personal representative, but the role fell to his cousin following their 2016 divorce.”
“4 A copy of the purported will that shows how Katie was left nothing Credit The Mega Agency 4 Cassidy had struggled with drink and more recently dementia Credit Splash News 4 David shot to fame as Keith in 1970s TV sitcom The Partridge Family Credit Getty Contributor David Cassidy...”
“FEW Gibraltar jabs 40 of residents compared to Spain s 4 showing slow EU rollout UNDER A BLOOD RED SKY Plume of Saharan sand blown in from Africa turns French skies orange MAGIC JABS Covid plunges 45 in Israel after 2nd jab but single dose not very effective CRASH TRAGEDY”


"Click here to upload your."
“…… What's more, the Partridge Family's performance is a classic hit. I woke up in love this morning to see the most important news clue. Who said the investigator said that the evidence of how keweide started to crack down in Wuhan is the exclusive truth. It's there that the CIA experts explored the first person in Roswell's UFO crash with the code written in daily Spanish
The late actor and musician rose to fame as Keith in the 1970s TV sitcom Partridge Family. He is said to have left most of his fortune to his son Bo
"4 according to the award-winning materials of David Cassidy and his daughter Katie at the 9th family TV awards ceremony in 2007, the documents obtained in the explosion show that the pop idol died last month at the age of 67, leaving his 1511 thousand assets to Bo, while his three half brothers and sisters are..."
“… Leave a musical souvenir... "
"But the star made it clear that he didn't want to leave any of his assets to his daughter, Katie, who was with him when he died."
"My specific intention is not to provide any benefits to Catherine Evelyn Cassidy," he wrote The will was drafted in 2004
"Initially, the company named his then wife Susan as a personal representative, but after the divorce in 2016, the role fell to his cousin."
"4 a copy of the purported will shows how Katie has nothing to do with the credit giant 4 Cassidy has been splashing with drinks and recent dementia Credit News 4 David made a splash in Keith's 1970s TV sitcom Partridge Family credit Getty contributor David Cassidy..."
"Compared with Spain, only 40 residents in gibraltarian have been shot a few times, which shows that the European Union is slowly unfolding under the blood red sky plume of the Sahara desert blowing from Africa, the French sky has turned into orange magic, and coved has plummeted 45 times after being shot a second time in Israel, but the effect of a single shot is not very good."



Number  1399
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It is important that police investigate every allegation of this nature.””
“Nelly, whose real name is Cornell Iral Haynes Jr, denied the allegation while his lawyer, Scott Rosenblum, called the accusation “scurrilous” and “motivated by greed”.”
“The incident in question allegedly took place last year, after his show at the Cliffs Pavilion in Essex.”
“The woman accusing Nelly of misconduct claims she asked him to take a photo following his 5 December performance.”
“She says the rapper gripped her tightly with his arm and brought her and her friends to his dressing room.”
“Once in the dressing room, the accuser claims Nelly escorted her into a separate room and began to masturbate in front of her.”
“According to her account, Nelly also tried to take her top off and force her to perform oral sex.”
“As she ran away, she claims he called her a “cunt”.”
“The investigation comes just months after the rapper, known chiefly for songs like Dilemma and Hot in Herre, was arrested in Washington state after being accused of rape by a 22-year-old student at the University of Washington named Monique Green.”
“The criminal case against the rapper collapsed when prosecutors said they could not “proceed or fully assess the merits of the case” without the cooperation of the accuser, who wanted to stop the investigation.”


"It is important that the police investigate every charge of this nature."
Nelly, whose real name is Cornell iral Haynes Jr., denied the charge, while his lawyer, Scott Rosenblum, called it "shameless" and "greedy."
The incident is said to have happened after his performance at the Cleves residence in Essex last year
"The woman who accused Nelly of misconduct said she asked him to take photos after the performance on December 5."
"She said the rapper grabbed her with his arms and took her and her friends to his dressing room."
"As soon as she entered the dressing room, the plaintiff claimed that Nelly escorted her into a separate room and started masturbating in front of her."
"According to her account, Nelly also tried to take off her coat and force her to have oral sex."
When she ran away, she claimed that he called her "bitch"
Just a few months before the investigation, the rapper, best known for songs such as "difficult times" and "hot hull," was arrested in Washington state after being accused of rape by a 22-year-old student at the University of Washington, Monique green
"In this criminal case against rappers, prosecutors said that without the cooperation of the plaintiffs, they could not" continue or comprehensively assess the merits of the case ", and the plaintiffs wanted to stop the investigation



Number  1400
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...have spun a solid half- hour comedy out of what could have just been a sketch (and was an ad).”
“But while they haven’t created anything as groundbreaking or enduring as that Louis CK series or Christopher Guest mock rockumentary, the folks behind What Would Diplo Do?”
“And despite airing on a cool-kid outlet like Viceland, most of the boundary pushing has to do with the format, as well as Van Der Beek fully breaking out of his meme-ridden, teen-drama image.”
“It combines elements of more traditional sitcoms with the semi-autobiographical comedies that remain en vogue—there are teachable moments, but they come long after insulting someone like Calvin Harris.”
“...is surprisingly funny.”
“But though the premise is a bit thin, What Would Diplo Do?”
“All of these concerns might harsh the faux Diplo’s buzz, if he cared about haters, which he swears he doesn’t.”
“And why would Viceland make its scripted comedy debut with untested writers and producers?”
“He might have played a more egotistical version of himself to great effect opposite Krysten Ritter, but would he be able to carry a whole series while channeling that self-deprecation through someone else?”
“23, the Dawson’s Creek alum doesn’t have a significant comedy background.”


“… With a sketch (and an ad), it's a half-hour comedy. "
"But even though they haven't created anything as groundbreaking or lasting as the Louis CK series or Christopher's guest role in mock rock, what will the people behind them do?"
"Although it's broadcast on a cool children's TV station like vechelan, most of the boundary promotion is related to form, and Vanderbilt has completely broken his infatuated image of teenage drama."
It combines elements of traditional sitcoms and semi autobiographical comedies, which are still popular and sometimes teachable, but they come long after insulting people like Calvin Harris
“… It's very interesting. "
"But even if the premise is a little thin, what will diplo do?"
"All these worries may hurt the reputation of fake diplo. If he cares about haters, he swears that he will not."
"Why did vechelan make his first screenwriting comedy among untested writers and producers?"
"He may play a more conceited version, playing opposite krysten Ritter, but can he carry on the whole series while passing on this self mockery through others?"
"On the 23rd, Dawson Creek alumni had no obvious comic background."



Number  1401
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“They are as tinged with movie magic as you'd expect for a meta romantic comedy.”
“Stop it right now.”
“I have to show you something.”
“Quick!!”
“It is these photos of a movie starring Liam Hemsworth, Priyanka Chopra, and Rebel Wilson.”
“But these are not just any photos.”
“They are bonkers photos.”
“They come from the New York City set of Isn't It Romantic, a romantic comedy coming out on Valentine's Day 2019.”
“According to Variety, it's about a "a cynical young woman who doesn’t believe in love and then wakes up one day to discover that her life has become a romantic comedy."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"They are just like the meta romantic comedy you expect, with the color of movie magic."
"Stop at once."
"I have to show you something."
"Come on!"
"This is a picture of a movie starring Liam Hemsworth, Priyanka Chopra and rebel Wilson."
"But these are not just photos."
"They're crazy pictures."
"They come from New York City's" isn't it romantic? "A romantic comedy to be shown on Valentine's day in 2019
According to variety, the film is about a "cynical young woman who doesn't believe in love and then wakes up one day to find her life turned into a romantic comedy."



Number  1402
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”
“It just felt about the two of them, which was great.”Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”
“Meghan Markle will give a speech at the evening reception Saturday celebrating her marriage to Prince Harry.”
“Following months of speculation that the actress, 36, would break protocol and address guests on her wedding day, Kensington Palace confirmed that Markle will do exactly that at Frogmore House party on Saturday night.”
“Approximately 200 friends and family members are expected to be present at the celebration hosted by Prince Charles.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Ms.”
“Markle will speak at the Evening Reception,” the palace confirmed.”
“Harry spoke to attendees earlier at the lunch reception hosted by Queen Elizabeth at Windsor Castle’s St. George’s Hall.”
“Watch our full special, Meghan and Harry – a Fairy-Tale Wedding, on PeopleTV, now available on PeopleTV.com and on your favorite streaming device.”


"Sign up for our newsletters and get the latest news from Kate Middleton, Megan markel and others!"
"They both feel good," couldn't they get enough Royal coverage? "
"Megan markel will speak at a reception to celebrate her marriage to Prince Harry on Saturday night."
"There has been speculation for months that the 36 year old actress will break the etiquette and address guests on the wedding day, and Kensington Palace confirmed that markel will do it at the flagmore house party on Saturday night."
"About 200 relatives and friends will attend the celebration hosted by Prince Charles."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Ma'am. “
"Markel will speak at the evening reception," the Palace confirmed
"Harry spoke earlier at the Queen Elizabeth luncheon reception at St. George's Hall in Windsor Castle
"Watch all our special shows on peopletv, Megan and Harry's fairy tale wedding, now on people's TV network, on your favorite streaming device."



Number  1403
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yes.”
“Was his Southern accent something you brought to him?”
“She’s capable and she’s willing, and to an extent, her loyalty is up for grabs.”
“And she will be invested in him, because he’s saving her — and that’s not nothing, either, when you’re trying to build a chain of command.”
“She has a computer brain — she was raised on Vulcan and did particularly well at the academy.”
“She’s also very capable.”
“That’s pretty rare.”
“She’s someone that has already made a decision to do what needs to be done practically and smartly in a crisis situation, and she gets who the enemy are and how you need to treat them.”
“What does he see in Burnham that looks useful?”
“He’s got an enormous amount on his mind.”


"Yes."
"Did you bring him his southern accent?"
"She's very capable and willing, and to some extent, her loyalty can be won."
"She'll be invested in him because he's saving her - it's nothing when you're trying to build a chain of command."
"She has a computer brain - she grew up in Vulcan island and did particularly well in college."
"She's very capable, too."
"It's rare."
"She is a person who has made a decision. In a crisis, she must do what needs to be done realistically and wisely. She knows who the enemy is and how you need to treat them."
"What did he see useful in Burnham?"
"He thinks too much in his head."



Number  1404
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  1405
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m not going to go on Dancing with the Stars.””
“Go to PeopleTV.com, or download the PeopleTV app on your favorite mobile or connected TV device.”
“Meets the 29 Ladies Vying for His HeartFollowing months of mounting anticipation, audiences finally got to watch Arie Luyendyk Jr. meet the 29 women that will race after his heart on season 22 0f The Bachelor — and they didn’t hold back on sharing their opinions about the contestants.”
“To kick off the New Year the ABC reality series returned on Monday night with the premiere episode when the 36 year old former race car driver who was the runner up on Emily Maynard s Bachelorette season in 2012 first greeted each of the ladies after they exited the...”
“...limos and later spoke with them individually ahead of the first rose ceremony...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Fans were quick to take to social media, where they tweeted their thoughts about the contestants’ arrivals.”
“Some loved the introductions, including Weiner, Arkansas, native Tia, who jokingly gifted Luyendyk Jr. a miniature red plastic wiener, and Bekah, who arrived in a 1965 Mustang.”
“Others weren’t as amused/impressed.”
“And some were left with unanswered questions, including why Bekah’s age was not revealed.”


"I won't dance with the stars any more."
"Go to the people's TV network, or download the peopletv app on your favorite mobile or connected TV device. “
"After months of anticipation, the audience finally saw Ali luyandick Jr. meet 29 women who are going to race with him in season 22 of bachelor - they did not hesitate to share their views on the contestants."
"To kick off the new year, ABC's reality show series premiered on Monday night. The 36 year old former Racer finished second in Emily Maynard's single season in 2012 when they left And then, for the first time, she met every lady. "
“…… Limousine, and then talk to them alone before the first rose ceremony.... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Fans quickly expressed their views on the arrival of the contestants on social media."
"Some people like these introductions, including Weiner of Arkansas, TIA, who jokingly gave little luyandik a miniature red plastic sausage, and Becca, who arrived on a Mustang in 1965."
"Others are not that happy / impressed."
"There are still some unanswered questions, including why Bekaa's age has not been disclosed."



Number  1406
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See photos from the 2018 Winter Olympics Closing Ceremony and watch the 2018 Winter Olympics Closing Ceremony on NBC and on NBCOlympics.com at 8 p.m.[NATL] The Pyeongchang Winter Olympics Closing Ceremony in Photos...”
“Vonn also posed for a selfie with Maia Shibutani as part of the Closing Ceremony festivies to cap off would could be her last Olympics as a competitor.”
“You're honestly starting to get v clingy and I can't anymore."”
“Adam, please stop calling me.”
“"Today, at closing ceremonies, it ends.”
“"Two weeks ago, at opening ceremonies, we met and a friendship began," Kenworthy wrote.”
“[NATL] These US Athletes Won Medals at the 2018 Winter OlympicsKenworthy also took to Instagram to post a picture with fan-favorite Adam Rippon, who helped Team USA's figure skating team win bronze in the team event.”
“...fourth in the men s snowboard cross final and Taufatofua who was the sole representative for Tonga and appeared shirtless as its flag bearer at both the Opening and Closing Ceremonies...”
“Olympics Hottest Athletes The three time Olympian posted selfies and photos with Kenworthy who did not medal but is leaving Pyeongchang with a puppy he rescued from a South Korean dog meat farm Matt Hamilton who helped Team USA s curling team win a gold medal Nick Baumgartner who placed...”
“It was a privilege to walk with all of these amazing athletes ."”


"Look at the photos of the closing ceremony of the 2018 Winter Olympics, and watch the closing ceremony of the 2018 Winter Olympics on NBC and other websites nbcopympics.com At 8 p.m., a picture of the closing ceremony of the Pingchang Winter Olympics.... "
"Feng also posed with Maya shbutani as part of the closing ceremony celebration to end her last Olympic Games as a competitor."
"You're really starting to stick. I can't stick anymore."
"Adam, please don't call me any more."
"It's over at the closing ceremony today."
"Two weeks ago, at the opening ceremony, we met and friendship began," Kenworthy wrote
"These American athletes won medals at the 2018 Winter Olympics, and Kenworthy posted a picture on instagram with his favorite fan, Adam Ripon, who helped the US figure skating team win a bronze medal in the team event."
“…… Taofatuofa, the only representative of Tonga, took the fourth place in the men's ski cross final. He was shirtless at the opening and closing ceremonies and served as his flag bearer. "
"The most popular athletes of the three Olympic Games have posted photos of themselves and Kenworthy, who does not have a medal but is leaving Pyeongchang with puppies, who rescued Matt Hamilton from South Korea's dog meat farm, who helped the U.S. curling team win the gold medal and Nick baumgartena, who placed..."
"It's an honor to walk with these great athletes."



Number  1407
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She has been hounded by the press, and is very upset,” the source said.”
“Despite seeking peace for her pregnancy, the cheating allegations took a toll on her, a second source told PEOPLE previously.”
“Kevin Hart‘s wife shared a stunning time-lapse video of her growing baby bump while doing squat workouts on her back patio.”
“The video ends with a recent video of Parrish doing squats while holding her newborn son.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Parrish, who gave birth to son Kenzo on Nov. 21, showed off her amazing transformation while Beyoncé‘s “7/11” played in the background.”
““#fbf Thx to my awesome trainer @rebeccabroxfit for documenting such a dope pregnancy time-lapse vid,” she wrote in the caption.”
“It was a simple cute idea when you suggested it to me and it came out perfect i couldn t be happier to see US grow together pregnancy is beautiful babyZo Parrish worked hard to keep her fit figure in the lead up her son s arrival and then went...”
“...right back to training following his birth...”
“The new mom showed off her post-pregnancy weight in a mirror selfie on Wednesday, while also detailing how she kept her pregnancy “drama free.”“1 week postpartum ,” she wrote in the caption.”


"She has been besieged by the media and is very upset," the source said
"Although she sought peace for her pregnancy, the charges of cheating cost her," a second source told people earlier
"Kevin Hart's wife shared a stunning time-lapse video of her growing baby lumps as she squats on the back terrace."
"The video ends with the latest video of Parrish squatting with his newborn son in his arms."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Parish gave birth to her son Kenzo on November 21, and when Beyonce's" 7 / 11 "was shown backstage, she showed her amazing transformation."
"FBF thx thanks my excellent coach @ rebeccabroxfit for recording such a delayed drug pregnancy video," she wrote in the title
"It's a simple and lovely idea. When you suggest to me that it's perfect, I can't be happy to see us grow up together. Pregnancy is a beautiful baby. Palish tries to keep her healthy figure in her son's arrival, and then goes..."
“… He will resume training immediately after he was born. "
"The new mother showed her weight after pregnancy in her selfie on Wednesday, and detailed how she kept her pregnancy" non dramatic. ". "One week after birth," she wrote in the title



Number  1408
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“✅”The quote is a play on lyrics from Drake’s new song “8 Out of 10,” on which he rapped, “Kiss my son on the forehead then kiss your ass goodbye.””
““It’s been about a year,” Halsey told E!”
“Thanks for respecting our privacy at this time," Halsey announced Tuesday, confirming the newsHalsey and G-Eazy Are 'Taking Time Apart' After a Year of DatingIn the end, Halsey and G-Eazy are going their separate ways.”
“The musicians, who collaborated on their hit “Him & I,” are “taking time apart” after a year of dating, Halsey confirmed Tuesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I normally keep this kind of thing private but provided our public nature I feel the need to inform my fans.”
“G-Eazy and I are taking some time apart,” she wrote in a note posted to her Instagram Story.”
““I’m eager to continue the upcoming passage of time dedicating myself to my art and my career, and the duration of my tour.”
“I wish him the best.”
“Thanks for respecting our privacy at this time.”Image zoom Halsey’s statement | Credit: Halsey Instagram StoryImage zoom G-Eazy and Halsey | Credit: Jeff Kravitz/FilmMagicHalsey, 23, and G-Eazy, 29, began dating in summer 2017.”


“ ✅ "It's based on the lyrics of Drake's new song nine times out of ten, where he taps and says," kiss my son on the forehead, and then kiss your ass goodbye. "
"About a year," Halsey told me! "
"Thank you for respecting our privacy at this time," Halsey announced on Tuesday, confirming the news that Halsey and g-eazy are 'separated' after a year of dating at the end of the year, Halsey and g-eazy are going their own way
Halsey confirmed on Tuesday that the two musicians are "going their separate ways" after a year of dating
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I usually keep such things secret, but if we are public, I feel it necessary to inform my fans."
"G-eazy and I are going to be apart for a while," she wrote in an article on instagram
"I'm eager to continue the time that's coming, to devote myself to my art and career, and my tour."
"I wish him all the best."
"Thank you for respecting our privacy at this time." Statement of image zoom Halsey | source: Halsey instagram story image zoom g-eazy and Halsey | source: Jeff Kravitz / filmmagic Halsey, 23, and g-eazy, 29, dating in the summer of 2017



Number  1409
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Makeup: Rings, from top: W. Britt, $295, wbritt.com ; Vrai & Oro, $175, vraiandoro.com ; Vita Fede, $315, vitafede.com .”
“(It isn't.”
“Never has it been so easy to discover and discuss products—can you imagine walking into the drugstore two years ago to buy a light-therapy mask?”
“For $30!”
“But this beauty revolution hasn't come without its backlash .”
“Critics claim—among other things—that devoting time and energy to beauty and self-care makes you vapid, somehow less of a feminist, or just another lemming embracing an empty pastime because it looks cool on Instagram, not because it's genuinely useful.”
“We firmly disagree.”
“Beauty matters , and it's OK that it matters.”
“You can hoard all the skin care your medicine cabinet can handle and still fight for what you care about.”
“If a lipstick makes you feel ready to take on the world, that's important.”


"Make up: ring, from above: W. Britt, 295 dollars, wbritt.com Website vrai & Oro, 175 dollars, vraiandoro.com Website; Vita Feder $315, vitafede.com .”
"It's not."
"It's never been easy to find and discuss products. Can you imagine going to a pharmacy to buy a phototherapy mask two years ago?"
"Thirty dollars!"
"But the beauty revolution is not without its rebound."
"Critics claim that spending time and energy on beauty and self-care can make you boring, and somehow you're no longer a feminist or just another lemming hug, an empty pastime, because it looks cool on instagram, not because it's really useful."
"We strongly disagree."
"Beauty is important, and it doesn't matter if it's important."
"You can stock up all the skin care products that the medicine cabinet can handle and still fight for what you care about."
"It's important if lipstick makes you feel ready to accept the world."



Number  1410
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Literally Made For KiraKira...”
“And I apologize.”
“Naturally, the news came as a shock to Tatum's and Dewan's fans—though they took solace in the fact that the split is seemingly amicable.”
“In their statement announcing the news, Tatum and Dewan said they'd "lovingly chosen" to separate and that "nothing has changed" about how much they love each other.”
“It's not so surprising, then, that Dewan was completely gracious on The Ellen DeGeneres Show Wednesday (May 2) after DeGeneres accidentally called her "Jenna Dewan Tatum."”
“"Please welcome Jenna Dewan Tatum—Jenna Dewan, sorry," DeGeneres said right before bringing her and the other World of Dance judges out to discuss their show.”
“Before the segment wrapped, DeGeneres apologized for her slip-up.”
“"I'm so sorry; I introduced you [as Jenna Dewan Tatum], and it was just such a habit.”
“I have to say the way that you and Channing are handling everything is beautiful—for your daughter [Everly], and the statements have been great.”
“I just have known both of you for so long, and I'm so used to saying it."”


"It's really for Kira Kira..."
"I apologize."
"Of course, the news is a blow to Tatum and Dewan fans, although they feel comforted that their breakup seems friendly."
In a statement announcing the news, Tatum and Dewan said they "lovingly chose" to separate and that there was "no change" in their love for each other
"It's not surprising, then, that after Ellen DeGeneres accidentally called her" Jenna Dewan Tatum "on Wednesday's (May 2) show, she was very elegant."
"Please welcome Jenna Dewan Tatum Jenna Dewan, I'm sorry," DeGeneres said before bringing her and other world dance judges out to discuss their performances
"Before the end of the show, Denise apologized for her mistake."
"I'm sorry to introduce you [Jenna Dewan Tatum], it's just a habit."
"I have to say that the way you and Channing handle everything is wonderful for your daughter (Everly), and these statements are great."
"I've only known you two for so long. I'm used to saying that."



Number  1411
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Another wrote, "Omg please be dating Wells.”
“Modern Family star Sarah Hyland and Bachelorette Alum Wells Adams attended a Halloween party Saturday night, dressed as characters from the Netflix hit, Stranger Things.”
“Hyland sported the signature hat of Gaten Matarazzo's Dustin, while Adams rocked a pink dress and blonde wig (and a box of Eggos) as Millie Bobby Brown's super powered chatacter, Eleven.”
“The actress shared the pic on Instagram with the caption, "#strangerthings have happened #happyhalloween."”
“EXCLUSIVE: Wells Adams Speaks Out Regarding Rumors That He's the Next 'Bachelor'The coordinating costumes and caption have sparked dating rumors about the two.”
“Fans are certainly on board with the idea.”
“"If they’re dating I would die of happiness," wrote one commenter.”
“One of the best bachelor guys!"”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
Another wrote, "my God, please date wells."
"Modern family movie star Sarah Helan and single schoolgirl wells Adams went to a Halloween party on Saturday night. They dressed up as characters in Netflix's hit movie strange things."
"Helan wears gayton matalazzo's Dustin's iconic hat, while Adams shakes a pink dress and a gold wig (and a box of eggs) to play Millie Bobbie Brown's 11 year old superstar."
The actress shared the photo on instagram with the title: "something strange has happened. I wish you happiness."
"Exclusive report: wells Adams spoke about the rumor that he was the next 'Bachelor', and the coordinated clothing and subtitles triggered rumors about their date."
"Fans certainly agree with the idea."
"If they were dating, I would die of happiness," one commentator wrote
"One of the best bachelors!"
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  1412
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I feel fortunate enough to be able to go off and join other companies, but every time I come back to Grey’s it’s really like being home.””
“Literally for me it’s definitely home.”
“I love working with the cast.”
““I love working with Shonda Rhimes.”
““I love being part of this company,” she gushed.”
“Back in November, TVLine lightly grilled Raver about the possibility of returning to Grey’s on a more permanent basis, telling us that she’d “100 percent” jump at the chance to rejoin the show’s series-regular ranks.”
“Grey's Season 14 PhotosRaver will juggle her latest Grey’s stint with her forthcoming recurring role on another ABC drama, Designated Survivor (which kicks off March 7).”
“Teddy will presumably be free to pursue a romance with the now-single Owen, although it’s unclear if that’s co-showrunner Krista Vernoff’s plan.”
“The 24 vet returned earlier this season to flirt support her longtime BFF, Owen (Kevin McKidd), in the wake of his sister Megan’s (Abigail Spencer) quasi-resurrection.”
“TVLine has learned that Kim Raver is bringing her MD character back to Grey’s Anatomy this spring for a multi-episode arc.”


"I feel very lucky to be able to join other companies, but every time I come back to Gray's house, it's really like I'm home."
"For me, it's definitely home."
"I love working with actors."
"I love working with shoda Reims."
"I like to join the company," she gushed
"As early as November last year, tvline downplayed the question of whether it was possible for Raver to return to Grey's permanently, telling us that she would" 100 percent "seize the opportunity to rejoin the regular lineup of the show."
"Gray's Season 14 photo grave will play her latest role in another ABC TV series named survivor, which will be broadcast on March 7
"Teddy may be free to pursue a romance with Owen, who is now single, but it's not clear whether it's a co starring Krista furnoff's plan."
"The 24-year-old veteran came back earlier this season to flirt and support her old friend Owen (Kevin mckead) after his sister Megan (Abigail Spencer) is about to resurrect."
"Tvline has learned that Jin Ruifu will bring her MD character back to Gray's anatomy this spring to stage a multi episode arc."



Number  1413
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She is chipped,' the star wrote at the time of her sister Julia's disappearance...”
“'Her chocolate lab is named Cindy Crawford.”
“According reports at the time, multiple fires were discovered in Julia's apartment the night she went missing and personal belongings like her purse and phone were left behind.”
“Julia had been missing from Silver Lake since January 31 at around 11.00 pm Pacific time.”
“We would also like to thank the Los Angeles Police Department, KlaasKIDS, SERT Ministries and Anonymity Rescue for their efforts in bringing Julia home,' she shared.”
“'We are so grateful to every single person who helped spread the word and joined us in our search.”
“The actress added a thank you to everyone that helped find her sister in her Instagram post Tuesday.”
“...her fans to reach out if they had any information...”
“...for the help and that the search is over after her sister and her pooch had been found Arielle had previously asked for help from her followers when the star shared a post on Instagram in early February describing and including photos of her petite blonde sister Julia Kebbel asking...”
“Julia Kebbel right has been found after going missing from Silver Lake since January 31 according to her sister actress Arielle Kebbel Julia Kebbel pictured was found safe along with her beloved pooch Cindy her sister shared to Instagram Arielle Kebbel took to Instagram to tell her fans thank you...”


"She was very sad," the star wrote when her sister Julia disappeared
"Her chocolate lab is Cindy Crawford."
"It was reported at the time that on the night of Julia's disappearance, a number of fires were found in her apartment, and personal belongings such as wallets and telephones were left behind."
"Julia has been missing at Silver Lake since around 11 p.m. Pacific time on January 31."
"We also want to thank the Los Angeles Police Department, klaaskids, SERT departments and anonymous rescue for their efforts to bring Julia home," she said
"We are very grateful to everyone who helped spread the information and joined our search."
"In her instagram post on Tuesday, the actress expressed her gratitude to all those who helped her find her sister."
“… If there is any news, her fans will lend a helping hand... "
“… In order to seek help, after her sister and her dog were found, the search has ended. Ariel once shared a post on instagram in early February, describing and including a picture of her petite blonde sister Julia Cabell, asking her followers for help.... "
"Julia Cabell was found missing in Silver Lake on January 31. In the photo, Julia Cabell and her beloved dog Cindy were found together. Cindy and her sister shared them with instagram. Ariel Cabell came to instagram to thank her fans..."



Number  1414
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No matter if you were #TeamBryan or #TeamPeter going into Rachel’s finale, there’s no doubt — she and Bryan are still in love, and they don’t care who knows it.”
“That didn’t fly with Rachel, and the two had a really emotional breakup, one that Rachel thinks overshadowed the fact that she found longtime love with Bryan.”
““And I really haven’t talked to him because I don’t have anything else to say.”
““For me, the reason there was so much emotion [in the finale] was because that was closure for me, that was it,” Rachel told Us Weekly.”
“...took away from him And for the record Peter and Rachel do not talk...”
“I ve never been engaged before and neither has Bryan and I felt like we were more on the defense about our relationship and having to explain more of it than rather it just showing So I just wish you really got to see Bryan and I hate that it...”
“[The breakup with Peter] really did overshadow, I felt, a happy moment for us, like one of the best moments of my life,” Rachel told Us Weekly.”
““I wish you were able to really see more of Bryan.”
“The finale was tough to watch, as Peter and Rachel seemed like a better match to many fans but Peter wasn’t convinced that he could be engaged after knowing someone for, like, six weeks (imagine that).”
“Rachel and Bryan are, too!”


"Whether you're team Bryan or team Peter walking into the end of Rachel, there's no doubt - she and Bryan are still in love, they don't care who knows."
"It wasn't just a take-off with Rachel. They really broke up in love. Rachel thinks it conceals the fact that she and Brian have found a long-term love."
"I really didn't talk to him because I had nothing else to say."
"For me, the reason there's so much emotion [in the end] is because it's the end for me, that's it," Rachel told us weekly
“…… It's taken away from him, and Peter and Rachel are not allowed to talk... "
"I've never been engaged before, and Brian and I feel that we are more defending our relationship and have to explain more than just show it, so I just hope you can really see Brian. I hate this..."
"It's really overshadowed our happy moments, like one of the best in my life," Rachel told weekly
"I wish you could see Brian more."
"It's hard to see the ending because Peter and Rachel seem to be a better match for many fans, but Peter doesn't believe he can get engaged after six weeks of meeting someone (imagine it),"
"So are Rachel and Brian!"



Number  1415
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you or someone you know needs help, please call the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255).”
“Seriously, I’m sure a lot of people can relate," Lowell said.”
“Catelynn Lowell and Tyler Baltierra struggled with a painful emotional blow on Monday's Teen Mom OG, when the couple revealed that Catelynn had suffered a miscarriage.”
“The couple -- who revealed that Lowell was pregnant with her third child back in January -- opened up to producers about losing the baby while they tried to hold back tears.”
“"It was very traumatic.”
“[I saw] her shaking, and she’s got blood everywhere,” Baltierra recalled.”
“"She kinda, like, cleaned herself up and we figured what was going on… We just sat on the bed and cried.”
“We just held another.”
“There’s nothing you can really do."”
“The MTV reality stars share 3-year-old daughter Novalee and are biological parents to 8-year-old daughter Carly, whom they gave up for adoption.”


"If you or someone you know need help, please call the national suicide prevention lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255)."
"Seriously, I'm sure a lot of people can understand," Lowell said
Caitlin Lowell and Tyler baltira, who suffered a painful emotional shock on Monday's "teenage mom og," revealed that Caitlin had a miscarriage
"The couple revealed that Lowell was pregnant with her third child in January, and they disclosed the loss to the producers while trying to hold back tears."
"It was very painful."
"I saw her shivering and blood everywhere," baltira recalled
"She's kind of, like, clean herself up and we know what's going on We just sat on the bed and cried
"We just had another meeting."
"There's really nothing you can do about it."
"MTV reality show stars share their 3-year-old daughter novali, who is the biological parent of 8-year-old daughter Carly, who was abandoned by them."



Number  1416
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the show...”
“We shouldn t be too surprised though because Schumer actually released a video on Instagram this past May of herself on the set of the courtroom reality show where Her Funnyness goofed around with Petri Hawkins Byrd the bailiff on...”
““My sister and I sat in on the cases for the day because we love her!!!!”
“You know I was in the audience on #judgejudy,” she wrote.”
““Hell yeah!”
“Turns out, Amy and her sister are huge Judge Judy fans, with Schumer taking to Instagram to comment on her surprise appearance.”
“Naturally, people were shook and Twitter had a field day.”
“Imagine their surprise when they flipped on CBS in the middle of the afternoon to find none other than comedian and Jennifer Lawrence BFF, Amy Schumer.”
“Judge Judy type TV Show genre RealityNormally when viewers turn on Judge Judy, they can expect a defendant losing a case in less than a minute or the drama of a dog choosing its rightful owner.”


“… Show... "
"We shouldn't be too surprised, though, because in May of this year, Schumer released a video on instagram about her playing with bailiff Petrie Hawkins Byrd on the court reality show..."
"My sister and I sat on the box all day, because we love her!!"
"You know I'm in the audience of judgment studies," she wrote
"Yes
"Amy and her sister proved to be big fans of Judy judges, and Schumer commented on her unexpected appearance on instagram."
"Naturally, people are shocked and Twitter is having a good time."
"Imagine how surprised they will be when they see no one else on CBS in the afternoon except comedian, Jennifer Lawrence BFF and Amy Schumer."
"Judy type TV shows usually when viewers turn on Judy's TV, they can expect the defendant to lose in less than a minute, or a dog to choose its rightful owner."



Number  1417
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“FROM PEN: Raising a Little Princess: All About Charlotte’s Amazing ChildhoodOn a super-smiley palace snap posted to David’s account, the retired soccer star got a little sentimental about his only daughter’s newest milestone.”
““Dear Harper I can’t believe it has been already 6 years you are such a big girl so to the best sister in the world I love you so much have a amazing day ❤️❤️,” Cruz captioned a photo of himself with Harper on his shoulders.”
“...to the youngest member of the family...”
“Chimed in mom Victoria 43 with a solo photo of Harper on the palace grounds holding a single red balloon Our little birthday princess x Kisses Harper s three big brothers Cruz David 12 Romeo James 14 and Brooklyn Joseph 18 all used the social media app to send love...”
“” he added.”
“...invited so it was a beautiful thing to do with My mum Harper plus a few school friends Image zoom We were honored to be able to there Beautiful tea party...”
“RELATED VIDEO Victoria and David Beckham Celebrate Son Brooklyn s 18th Birthday In another photo this time of himself alongside Harper and his mother David clarifies This wasn t the palace opening the gates for Harper s birthday party this was a tea party where us and other guests were...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““Lucky Harper meeting a real life princess at the Palace x ❤️,” David, 42, captioned the group shot, in which his daughter is outfitted for the occasion in Cinderella’s sparkly blue gown.”


"From Pan: raising the little princess: Charlotte's childhood - with a snapshot of the super smile palace posted on David's account, the retired football star is sentimental about his only daughter's latest milestone."
"Dear Harper, I can't believe you've been six years. You're a big girl, so I love you so much for the best sister in the world. Have a nice day." ❤️❤️ "Cruz made a headline on a photo of himself and Harper side by side."
“… To the youngest member of the family... "
"Mother Victoria, 43, echoes a personal photo of Harper in the Palace Square, in which Harper is holding a red balloon, and our birthday princess x kisses Harper's three brothers, Cruz David 12, Romeo James 14 and Brooklyn Joseph 18, all using social media apps to convey love..."
"He added
“… I've been invited, so it's a wonderful thing to do it with my mother Harper and some school friends. We're very honored to have a beautiful tea party there... "
"Related video Victoria and David Beckham celebrate their son Brooklyn's 18th birthday in another photo. This time, he clarifies with Harper and his mother David that this is not a palace opening for Harper's birthday party. This is a tea party. We and other guests are..."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Fortunately, Harper met a real princess in X palace ❤️ David, 42, captioned the photos of his daughter in Cinderella's sparkling blue robe



Number  1418
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s wedding on 19 May is likely to be the first public appearance by the Queen’s consort since the operation.”
“The Queen Mother underwent two successful hip replacement operations in the 1990s, first a planned procedure aged 95, followed by an emergency operation when she was 97.”
“Medical experts have said a few weeks after a hip replacement patients are usually back to their normal lifestyle, free from pain.”
“For about a month before the operation, Philip had complained about trouble with the joint.”
“...aftercare as he learns to walk again on his new hip...”
“The Queen also gave an update telling a wellwisher in Windsor He said he s getting on very well The duke will have begun his rehabilitation moving with the aid of a stick or crutches and will face weeks of...”
“Anne, whose visit lasted about 50 minutes, is believed to be theonly member of the royal family to visit Philip in the central London hospital.”
“...who said he was on good form...”
“Buckingham Palace said he would continue his recovery at Windsor adding His royal highness would like to convey his appreciation for the messages of good wishes he has received On Thursday he was visited by his daughter the princess royal...”
“Prince Philip, 96, left the private King Edward VII hospital in London at midday on Friday; he was admitted on Tuesday 3 April.”


"The wedding of Prince Harry and Megan Marcel on May 19 is likely to be the first public appearance of the Queen's spouse after the operation."
The queen mother underwent two successful hip arthroplasties in the 1990s, the first planned at the age of 95, and then emergency at the age of 97
"Medical experts say that a few weeks after a hip replacement, patients usually return to a normal lifestyle without pain."
About a month before the operation, Philip had been complaining about joint problems
“… When he learns to walk with his new buttocks, he has to deal with the aftermath. "
"The queen also gave an update to one of Windsor's benefactors. He said that he was in a good condition. The Duke will start to recover and will move with the help of sticks or crutches. He will face several weeks of..."
Anne is believed to be the only royal member to visit Philip at central London hospital, and her visit lasted about 50 minutes
“… Who says he's in good shape... "
"Buckingham Palace said he would continue to recover in Windsor, adding that his highness would like to convey his thanks for the message of blessing he received on Thursday, and that his daughter, the princess, visited him..."
Prince Philip, 96, left London's private Edward VII hospital at noon on Friday and was admitted to hospital on Tuesday, April 3



Number  1419
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“Watch below RELATED CONTENT Nick Cannon Claps Back to Dane Cook Shaming Him for Wearing a Horrific Turban Dane Cook Reveals the Dumbest Thing Jessica Simpson s Ever Said EXCLUSIVE Dane Cook Permanently Banned From the Laugh Factory Source Says Miley Cyrus Reportedly Hooking Up With Dane Cook This video...”
“In September 2015, Us Weekly reported that Cook was"hooking up" with Miley Cyrus, who was 22 at the time while he was 43.”
“This isn't the first time Cook has been linked to a younger woman.”
“Cook hasn't been shy about his lady love, sharing a photo of the two holding hands while on vacation.”
“The two arrived in Hawaii on Thursday, according to Taylor's Instagram, and aside from hanging out on the beach, have also found time to work out together.”
“BackgridCook and Taylor have been dating since last year.”
“Taylor showed off her fit physique in an orange bikini, while Cook went shirtless in a pair of board shorts.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
“… Not available because we can't load messages from sponsors... "
"Look at the related content below. Nick Cannon takes a picture of the Danish chef humiliating him with a terrible headscarf. The Danish chef reveals the most stupid thing Jessica Simpson has ever done. Saying that the exclusive Danish chef is permanently banned from laughing factory sources, saying that Millie Cyrus is reported to hook up with the Danish chef in this video..."
"In September 2015, US Weekly reported that cook had" colluded "with Miley Cyrus, then 22 and 43 years old
"This is not the first time cook has been associated with a young woman."
"Cook is not shy about his lover. He shared a picture of them holding hands on holiday."
"According to Taylor's instagram, the two arrived in Hawaii on Thursday, taking time to exercise together in addition to hanging out on the beach."
"Backgridcook and Taylor have been dating since last year."
Taylor showed off her healthy build in an orange bikini, while cook showed up in a pair of shorts and shirtless



Number  1420
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“Selma Blair, Luke Wilson, Jennifer Coolidge, waiting to hear you'll be back!”
“Plot details aren't known yet, but Kirsten “Kiwi” Smith and Karen McCullah, the original screenwriters, were reported to be in talks to write the script.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Look how good Elle Woods look:This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Any Legally Blonde fan knows that when Witherspoon revisited her character's wardrobe in 2016, during the movie's 15th anniversary, she revealed the sparkly pink bikini still fits.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
"Selma Blair, Luke Wilson, Jennifer Coolidge, waiting for you to come back!"
"The details of the plot are not clear, but it is reported that the original screenwriters Kirsten Chevy Smith and Karen McCullah are in talks about writing the script."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"You see how good al woods looks: this content was imported from instagram."
"As any legitimate blonde fan knows, in 2016, during the film's 15th anniversary, when Witherspoon revisited her character's wardrobe, she revealed that the glittering pink bikini still fitted."
"This content was imported from instagram."



Number  1421
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Photo via Twitter/Variety]”
“After all, feeling your best in this uneasy climate is an act of feminism in itself - if a new pair of shoes helps you accomplish that, go right ahead and get 'em.”
“Besides having Kristen Bell as the show's first-ever host, the evening featured an all-female bill of presenters and the famous "I Am An Actor" introduction only highlighted leading ladies, including Allison Janney, Millie Bobby Brown, and the inimitable Tracee Ellis Ross.”
“Ross, who's been a comedic force for decades, naturally cracked a joke during her moving monologue.”
“Surely it lightened the mood, but it also hit upon an important point when it comes to feminism - and any sort of social activism in general.”
“"When I was a little girl, I dreamt of growing up and being a courageous woman who could use my voice for important issues that affect all of us...and have a lot of shoes.”
“I am happy to report that both are true.”
“I utilize my agency and my voice for equity and justice in our industry and beyond, and I have so many shoes.”
“Like, I have a lot of shoes.”
“I am Tracee Ellis Ross, and I am an actor."”


"[images via Twitter / variety]"
"After all, feeling your best in this uneasy atmosphere is a feminist act in itself - if a new pair of shoes can help you do that, buy it."
In addition to making Kristen bell the first host of the show, there was an introduction of the hostess and the famous "I'm an actor" throughout the evening, which only introduced the famous heroines, including Alison Jennie, Millie Bobby Brown and the unique Tracee Ellis Ross.
"Ross, who has been a comic force for decades, naturally tells a joke in his moving monologue."
"Of course, it lightens the mood, but it also touches on an important point when it comes to feminism - and any form of social activity in general."
"When I was a little girl, I dreamed of growing up to be a brave woman who could use my voice to deal with important issues that affect all of us And there are a lot of shoes. "
"I'm happy to report that both are true."
"I use my agent and my voice to fight for fairness and justice inside and outside our industry, and I have so many shoes."
"For example, I have a lot of shoes."
"I'm Tracy Ellis Ross. I'm an actor."



Number  1422
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“God Bless all of them.””
“They risk so much every day to make us well and keep us protected.”
“Let’s take a minute and all be thankful for medical professionals, police, firefighters and our brave military forces here and around the world.”
“They were so helpful and kind as I returned home.”
“Another shout out goes to the wonderful men and women of the Los Angeles Police Dept.”
“They make you feel good even though you’re in the hospital for feeling bad.”
“I wanted to take a moment to send a big thank you to the wonderful doctors, nurses and staff at Cedars-Sinai Medical Center during my short stay there this week.”
“He posted a message on his Facebook page saying:“Hope you’re having a beautiful Sunday.”
“The fitness icon was hospitalized last week for indigestion.”
“Richard Simmons has shared a message regarding his health regarding his voluntary absence from public life since 2014.”


"God bless them."
"They take such a big risk every day to make us recover and protect us."
"Let's take a minute to thank the medical professionals, the police, the firefighters and our brave troops here and around the world."
"When I came home, they were so helpful and kind."
"The good men and women of LAPD yelled again."
"They make you feel good, even if you're in the hospital because you don't feel good."
"During my short stay this week, I would like to take a moment to express my heartfelt thanks to the excellent doctors, nurses and staff of cedar Sinai Medical Center."
"I hope you have a good Sunday," he wrote on Facebook
"Fitness idol was hospitalized last week for indigestion."
"Richard Simmons shared a health message about his willingness to leave public life since 2014."



Number  1423
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Ariana Grande Thanks Her LGBTQ Fans in Open Letter to Celebrate Pride MonthAriana Grande Says She 'Cried 10 Hundred Times' While Writing New AlbumAriana Grande Teases Nicki Minaj Collab on New AlbumRelated Gallery...”
“"Pete loves him some Ariana."”
“Fresh off finally revealing that they were officially a couple in an adorable Harry Potter-themed Instagram post, Davidson has taken it to the next level.”
“The Saturday Night Live star just got two fresh new tattoos, one on his neck, the other on his right thumb, and both appear to be tributes to his new girlfriend.”
“The neck tattoo shows a black bunny mask, mirroring the one worn by Grande on the cover of her Dangerous Woman album.”
“The second tattoo, on his thumb, is of her initials, "AG."”
“Photos of the tattoos were posted on social media on Saturday by Los Angeles tattoo artist London Reese.”
“"We had a good night, somewhere in the hills of Los Angeles," Reese wrote on Instagram.”
“Those tattoos Pete Davidson got for Ari are real: The tattoo artist posted about it on his feed and story pic.twitter.com/3w0grTa5yQ — Bobby (@BobbysByline) June 2, 2018Grande joins Hillary Clinton in ink form on Davidson's body.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Ariana Grande thanks her LGBTQ fans for celebrating pride in the open letter. Montarina Grande says she 'cried 100 times' while writing the new album. Ariana Grande teases nikiminagi for working with the gallery related to the new album “
"Pete loves him a little, Ariana."
Davidson took this to a new level when he posted a cute post on instagram with the theme of "Harry Potter" and finally revealed that they are a formal couple
"The live star on Saturday night has just got two new tattoos, one on his neck and the other on his right thumb, both of which seem to pay homage to his new girlfriend."
The tattoo on his neck is a black rabbit mask, the same one that Grande wore on the cover of dangerous women
The second tattoo, on his thumb, is her initials "Ag"
"These tattoo photos were posted on social media by Los Angeles tattoo artist London Reese on Saturday."
"We had a great night on a hill in Los Angeles," Reese wrote on instagram
"The tattoos Peter Davidson gave Ali are real: the tattoo artist posted information in his own videos and stories pic.twitter.com/3w0grTa5yQ -On June 2, 2018, grand and Hillary Clinton met in the form of ink on Davidson. "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  1424
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Find out when RHOA returns for Season 10.”
“So how will this crew of Southern Belles get along with NeNe back in the building?”
“Though, many fans have continued using her dramatic GIFS, memes, and one-liners in her absence.”
“She provided the utmost entertainment through her many witty quotes, comebacks, and side-eye before letting fans know that she sadly wouldn't return for season 8.”
“From the beginning of the series she was a favorite, as she never hesitated to say exactly what was on her mind.”
“With her blonde hair and dramatic personality she turned heads whenever she entered a room.”
“Fans first met the outspoken NeNe in the very first season of RHOA.”
“...she said.”
“Let the shade begin, hunni!"”
“I'm back and ready for Season 10.”


"See when RhoA will be back in season 10."
"So, how will these Southern beauties get along with Nain in the building?"
"Nevertheless, many fans continue to use her dramatic gifts, memes and a sentence from her absence."
"Before letting fans know that she's sorry she won't be back in the eighth season, she provided maximum entertainment with a lot of witty quotes, comebacks and sidelights."
"From the beginning, she was very popular, because she never hesitated to say what she thought."
"She has blonde hair, blue eyes and a bright personality. She turns her head as soon as she enters the room."
"The first time the fans saw the outspoken Nene was in Roya's first season
“…… She said
"Let the shadows begin, hooney!"
"I'm back for season 10."



Number  1425
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They later married in a surprise and secret ceremony on August 5, 2015 — just a few days before Theroux’s 44th birthday.”
“This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”
“...most romantic holiday of the year one day before publicly announcing that they had split...”
““They saw each other late at night on Valentine’s Day in L.A.,” a source close to the actress tells PEOPLE.”
““They decided together that they would make the announcement the next day.”
“Justin flew on a private jet to L.A. to see Jen one last time.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The insider adds that the former couple were divided on when to announce the breakup news, with the Friends star hoping to continue to keep the matter private.”
““Jen didn’t want to announce it for as long as possible, because she wanted to avoid the media attention,” the source says.”
“The couple’s decision to split comes just days after the actress’s 49th birthday, which she and Theroux spent apart.”
“Aniston celebrated in Malibu, California, with a gathering alongside pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton-Smith and Kristin Hahn on Feb. 11.”


"They later had a surprise and secret wedding on August 5, 2015 - just a few days before Cyrus' 44th birthday."
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."
“… The most romantic holiday of the year is the day before they publicly announce their separation... "
"They met late on Valentine's day in Los Angeles," a source close to the actress told people
"Together they decided to announce it the next day."
"Justin went to Los Angeles by private jet to see Jane for the last time." Get news, feature and other push notifications. “
The source added that there was a disagreement over when the first two would announce the break-up and that the friends star wanted to keep it a secret
"The longer Jennifer doesn't want to announce, the better, because she wants to avoid media attention," the source said
"The couple decided to break up just a few days after the actress's 49th birthday, when she and Cyrus spent their 49th birthdays respectively."
On February 11, Aniston held a celebration in Malibu, California. His good friends Courtney Cox, Andrea bendwald, Lee kilton Smith and Christine Hahn also took part in the celebration



Number  1426
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’ve realized that I need to start having confidence in my relationship with John and that he accepts me for all my faults,” she told the camera.”
“...said she did feel bad she didn t tell Cena...”
“Her family were not happy, especially Colace, who wondered why Bella didn’t think she could come to her.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“It’s crazy ’cause John doesn’t even know and here we talk about marriage and we never bring it up.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
““I tried to forget about it but now it’s starting to come up, and I figured you guys have to hear from me before you hear from anyone else.”
““Even when I started walking down the aisle, I knew this was a huge mistake and how can I get out of it and I couldn’t,” she recalled.”
“We drove to Vegas, did it.”The union was something Bella regretted from the beginning.”
““Basically we got married by Elvis.”
“And got divorced at 23, to my high school sweetheart,” Bella said.”


"I realized that I needed to start to have confidence in my relationship with John, who accepted all my shortcomings," she told the camera
“… She said she was really sad that she didn't tell Senna... "
"Her family are not happy, especially koras, and she wants to know why Bella thinks she can't come to her."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"It's crazy because John doesn't even know that we talk about marriage here, but we never mention it." Want to know the latest news about people? "
"I tried to forget about it, but now it's starting to appear, and I think you have to hear from me first, and then from others."
"Even if I started walking down the aisle, I knew it was a huge mistake and how I could get rid of it, I couldn't," she recalled
"We drove to Vegas and did it." Bella felt sorry for the union from the beginning
"Basically we were married by Elvis."
"When I was 23, I divorced my high school sweetheart," Bella said



Number  1427
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I see these women and I think, ‘Yes, it can be balanced, it can all work out.’ I do believe that it’s possible to have it all — work, a career, babies.”
“I also look to learn.”
“It was hard,” Beyoncé said.”
“And that was hard, because all of my family and my friends knew and we celebrated.”
“It’s one of the reasons I did not share I was pregnant the second time [with Blue], because you don’t know what’s going to happen.”
““There are so many couples that go through that and it was a big part of my story.”
“When she explained why she wanted to open up about her lossWhen Oprah interviewed Bey later in 2013, she explained why it was so important for her to talk publicly about her miscarriage.”
“And it was the best form of therapy for me, because it was the saddest thing I’ve ever been through.”2.”
“And it was actually the first song I wrote for my album.”
“Literally the week before I went to the doctor, everything was fine, but there was no heartbeat.”From there, the Grammy winner put her feelings into her music: “I went into the studio and wrote the saddest song I’ve ever written in my life.”


"When I saw these women, I thought," yes, it can be balanced, it can be solved. " I believe it's all possible - work, career, kids. "
"I want to learn, too."
"It's hard," Beyonce said
"It's hard because all my family and friends know that we celebrate."
"This is one of the reasons for my second (and blue) pregnancy, because you don't know what's going to happen."
"There are so many couples who have gone through it, and that's a big part of my story."
"When Oprah interviewed Bei in late 2013, she explained why she wanted to disclose her loss and why it was so important for her to talk about her abortion in public."
"It's the best treatment for me because it's the saddest thing I've ever experienced."
"This is actually the first song I wrote for the album."
"Just a week before I went to see the doctor, everything was fine, but there was no heartbeat." Since then, the Grammy winner has incorporated her feelings into her music: "I went into the studio and wrote the saddest song I've ever written in my life."



Number  1428
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““An hour later you’re going, ‘God, I can’t wait ’til they get home.’ ””
““There’s days where you go, ‘Oh my God, when does school start?’ ” he said.”
“Gwen Stefani and her kids opted for a less traditional spring break this year — rather than jet off to the tropics, they headed to Blake Shelton‘s home state of Oklahoma for some adventures in nature.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The No Doubt frontwoman, 48, documented the outdoor fun on her Instagram stories Monday.”
“A series of Boomerangs captured the children jumping off rocks into the water and floating along with the stream.”
“Out of the water, they had a blast burying themselves in the sand and riding ATVs.”
“Stefani, donning a green tank top and reflective aviator-style shades, also made sure to share a selfie.”
“She even appears to have captured Shelton in the wilderness despite his camo attire.”
“Along for the fun was Stefani’s goddaughter Stella, who proved to be a model in the making while posing for a shot on the singer’s Instagram page wearing camo overalls.”


"You're leaving in an hour." God, I can't wait for them to go home. "
"Sometimes you say, 'my God, when does school start? "He said
Gwen Stefani and her children chose a less traditional spring break this year. Instead of flying to the tropics, they went to black Shelton's home state of Oklahoma for some natural exploration
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"There is no doubt that the 48 year old actress recorded her outdoor anecdotes on instagram on Monday."
"A series of boomerangs caught the children jumping from the rocks into the water and floating with the stream."
"Coming out of the water, they buried themselves on the beach, riding ATV."
"Stefani, wearing a green vest and reflective pilot style sunglasses, must also share a selfie."
"Although Sheldon was in camouflage, she seemed to have captured him in the wilderness."
Stella, Stephanie's goddaughter, also took part in the event, posing as a model on instagram's home page in a camouflage costume



Number  1429
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s never easy to part ways with the person you planned [your] entire future with, but futures can be rewritten and as of today mine is a blank page.”Azalea recently admitted she got revenge on Young during an appearance on Watch What Happens Live in March.”
““I genuinely wish Nick the best.”
““Unfortunately although I love Nick and have tried to rebuild my trust in him — it’s become apparent in the last few weeks I am unable to,” Azalea wrote on Instagram.”
“After getting engaged to Young in 2015, Azalea called it quits with the NBA player the following year after he was involved in an alleged cheating scandal.”
“But I will spit in his eggs if he keep playin with me on ig.”Image zoomBefore Hopkins, Azalea was in a relationship with Nick Young, 33, and was romantically linked to rapper Tyga.”
“We good.”
““He’s my man so, he didn’t drop it.”
“One fan was bold enough to ask Hopkins, “Are you her boyfriend?” to which he responded, “Yes indeed.”Azalea also responded to a fan who questioned their relationship status.”
“...stirring fans into a frenzy...”
“Image zoom Iggy Azalea and DeAndre Hopkins Credit Jason Merritt Getty Gabe Ginsberg Getty Azalea and Hopkins first sparked romance rumors when the NFL star posted an Instagram of himself captioned My Aussies call me Legend Azalea then wrote I could think of a few other things to call you...”


"It's never easy to break up with the person you plan for the future, but the future can be rewritten. From today on, mine is a blank page." Rhododendron recently admitted that she retaliated against Yang in March's "observe what happened at the scene" program
"I wish Nick all the best."
"Unfortunately, while I love Nick and try to rebuild my trust in him - it's obvious that in the past few weeks, I can't," Rhododendron wrote on instagram
"After his engagement to Yang in 2015, Rhododendron broke up with the NBA player the following year because of his alleged cheating scandal."
"But if he continues to play funny games with me, I'll throw up in his eggs." Zoom before Hopkins, azalea had a relationship with Nick Young, 33, and had a romantic relationship with rapper tyga
"We're fine."
"He's my man, so he didn't fall."
One fan boldly asked Hopkins, "are you her boyfriend? In response, he said, "yes, it is." Rhododendron also answered a fan's question about their relationship
“… Arouse fans' enthusiasm... "
"Iggy azalea and deandre Hopkins credit Jason Merritt Getty Gabe Ginsberg Getty azalea and Hopkins first sparked romantic rumors when the NFL star posted his photo titled" my Australian calls me the legendary cuckoo "on instagram, and then wrote that I can think of something else to call you..."



Number  1430
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Get a sneak peek at the new season, below.”
“'… I think that will be fun to see me not getting so butthurt about things that don’t matter."”
“The Vanderpump Rules pal's marriage to Mike Shay ended in divorce; shortly thereafter, her romantic relationship with longtime friend Rob Valletta was also put on ice.”
“If breaking up is hard to do, then breaking up twice is even harder — and Scheana recently opened up about that in a major way.”
“Speaking to Us Weekly, the SURver admitted that she cringes at certain scenes from Vanderpump Rules Season 6.”
“(Hint: She talked about Rob.”
“A lot.”
“Peep the clip above if you need proof.)”
“Just seeing where I was last year and how I obsessed I was with my relationship and all of that and coming into this year I feel like I m much more self aware self deprecating and I feel like...”
“I m me again for the first time in a while I kind of lost myself for a couple years and got caught up in the things that weren t important she shared...”


"Look at the next season."
“…… I think it would be fun to see me not hurt on unimportant things. "
The vanderpuls' marriage to Mike Shea ended in divorce; shortly after that, her romantic relationship with her old friend Rob Valletta was shelved
"If it's hard to break up, it's even harder to break up twice - scheana recently made it public in an important way."
"In an interview with us weekly, she admitted that she winced at some scenes of season 6 of the van der Pol rules."
"(hint: she's talking about rob."
"A lot."
"If you need proof, please peek at the clip above.)"
"I just saw my state last year, and how I was infatuated with my relationship and all these. Entering this year, I feel that I am more self aware and self depreciating. I feel that..."
"For the first time in this period, I'm back to myself. I'm a little lost in the unimportant things she shared..."



Number  1431
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...message in that she was not a victim of Jackson but rather a victim of the media...”
“We re friends She never blamed Jackson for the controversy Even during their initial reunion Olympios claimed they never had bad blood This didn t necessarily seem true when Olympios released a statement during the time of the scandal which stated I am a victim Olympios has since clarified her...”
“Even though she and Jackson were seen holding hands, she stated, “DeMario and I are close friends.”
“We’re friends, so get over it.”She also sat down with ET to officially set the record straight.”
“You guys are f*cking assh*les.”
“To those photographers following me around Disney yesterday, you can go f*ck yourselves.” She asserted, “DeMario and I had a tough summer so leave us the f*ck alone.”
“Olympios started off her venting session by noting, “I have something to say about this TMZ story.”
“Olympios quickly took to Instagram live to shut those rumors down.”
“TMZ published a story about their time at Disneyland, claiming Olympios and Jackson were hooking up.”
“They aren’t datingYou better believe that if you spread false information about Olympios, she’ll have something to say about it.”


“…… She is not a victim of Jackson, but a victim of the media... "
"We are friends, she never blamed Jackson for the controversy, even in their initial reunion, Olympus claimed that they never had bad blood, which seems not necessarily true, when Olympus issued a statement during the scandal saying that I was the victim, Olympus has clarified her..."
Although she was seen holding hands with Jackson, she said, "demario and I are close friends."
"We're friends, so don't get tangled up." She also sat down with ET to formally clarify the facts
"You bastards."
"For those photographers who followed me around Disney yesterday, go by yourself." "Demario and I had a tough summer, so don't disturb us," she asserted
"I have something to say about the story of TMZ," Olympus said at the beginning of her venting
"Olympus quickly shut down these rumors through instagram live."
"TMZ published a story about them at Disneyland, claiming that Olympus and Jackson are dating."
"They're not dating. You'd better believe that if you spread false information about Olympia, she will have something to say."



Number  1432
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They finalized their divorce in 2016 but Bethenny is reportedly now seeking full custody of their only child.”
“Bethenny was previously married to Jason Hoppy who she shares daughter Bryn with.”
“But Bethenny Frankel was back looking very content in the businessman's company on Sunday during a trip to Miami.”
“The 47-year-old SkinnyGirl founder flaunted her lithe figure in a green bikini as she soaked up some sun alongside Dennis and her daughter Bryn, seven.”
“Still single?”
“Bethenny Frankel reunited with ex-boyfriend Dennis Shields, who affectionately had his hand on her knee, during a trip to Miami on SundayDennis affectionately rested his hand on Bethenny's leg as they relaxed poolside sharing a sun lounger.”
“However, a source told DailyMail.com: 'They are not “dating”.”
“Bethenny and Bryn love Dennis and his family and they have been a support system during her negative divorce and a positive influence in Bryn’s life.'”
“'They had a 27 year friendship before they dated so they picked that up where they left off once they realized they didn’t work as a couple,' the insider continued.”
“'Her daughter adores him and his family and she comes first above all.”


"They finalized the divorce agreement in 2016, but it's reported that Bethany is now seeking full custody of their only child."
"Bethenny used to marry Jason hoppy, and she has a daughter Bryn."
"But when Bethany Frankel was traveling in Miami on Sunday, he was very satisfied with the businessman's company."
"The 47 year old founder of skinny girl, dressed in a green bikini, basks in the sun with Denis and her 7-year-old daughter, Bryan, and shows off her lithe figure."
"Or single?"
Bethany Frankel and her ex boyfriend Dennis shields meet again. Dennis Shields' hand is affectionately on her lap. On a trip to Miami on Sunday, Dennis affectionately puts his hand on Bethany's leg. They relax by the pool and share a sun chair
However, a source told the Daily Mail: 'they're not' dating '
"Bethenny and Bryn love Dennis and his family. They were a support system during Dennis's divorce and had a positive impact on Bryn's life."
"They had 27 years of friendship before their date, so when they realized they were not husband and wife, they started over where they broke up," the source continued
"Her daughter adores him and his family, and she comes first."



Number  1433
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I want to be able to come home at night and feel that part of me is still intact, secret."”
“That's what I need to do to preserve my mental health.”
“The South African actress has two adopted children - Jackson and August - and while she never planned on raising her children on her own, Charlize has adapted to the challenges on motherhood.”
“She shared: ''I'm not trying to prove anything or become a symbol.”
“It's just the way things worked out.”
“"When you adopt, you have to do it unconditionally.”
“I threw myself into the adoption process because I was convinced that I could fulfill the role of mother and give my children all the love and attention they need.”
“No one aspires to become a single parent, but I learned a long time ago that you can't control everything in life.”
“I have adapted to the situation because I am pragmatic."”
“The Oscar-winning actress - who split from Sean Penn last year - also revealed she "craved" motherhood before she decided to adopt her children.”


"I want to come home in the evening and feel that part of me is still intact, secret."
"That's what I need to do to keep my mental health."
"The South African actress has adopted two children - Jackson and Auguste - and although she never planned to raise them on her own, Charlize has adapted to the challenge of being a mother."
"I'm not trying to prove anything, I'm not trying to be a symbol," she said
"That's how it worked out."
"When you adopt, you have to do it unconditionally."
"I am fully committed to the adoption process because I am confident that I can fulfill my role as a mother and give my children all the love and attention they need."
"No one aspires to be a single parent, but I learned a long time ago that you can't control everything in life."
"I've adapted to this situation because I'm pragmatic."
The Oscar winning actress broke up with Sean pan last year and revealed that she was "eager" to be a mother before deciding to adopt a child



Number  1434
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Following her Facebook video, The DailyMail.com revealed Sinead is in a hospital in New Jersey and a pal also revealed on her Facebook page she is “surrounded by love and receiving the best of care.””
“The star also sparked concerns last year when she disappeared for more than 36 hours after going on a bike ride in Chicago.”
“The Irish singer has previously revealed her health struggles, having to undergo emergency surgery in 2016.”
““Mental illness, it’s like drugs, it doesn’t give a s*** who you are, and equally what’s worse, it’s the stigma, it doesn’t give a s*** who you are.”
““I want everyone to know what it’s like, that’s why I’m making this video.”
“...motel in the a e end of New Jersey she added...”
“And there s absolutely nobody in my life except my doctor my psychiatrist the sweetest man on Earth who says I m his hero and that s about the only thing keeping me alive at the moment and that s kind of pathetic I am now living in a Travelodge...”
“Weeping, Sinead said: “I’m all by myself.”
“The Grammy winner posted the 12-minute footage on Facebook in early August, revealing she was all alone and struggling to live every day.”
“Dr Phil to be interviewed just a month after she shared an emotional video on Facebook where she hinted at having suicidal thoughts...”


After her Facebook video, the daily mail revealed that Snyder was in a hospital in New Jersey, and a friend of hers also revealed on her Facebook that she was "surrounded by love and taken the best care of."
"The star's disappearance for more than 36 hours after cycling in Chicago last year has also raised concerns."
"The Irish singer previously revealed that he was in poor health and had to undergo emergency surgery in 2016."
"Psychosis, like drugs, can't give a s-who you are. What's worse, it's a shame. It can't give a s-who you are."
"I want everyone to know what it looks like, and that's why I made this video."
“… Motels in Eastern New Jersey, she added
"In my life, in addition to my doctor, my psychiatrist, the most lovely person in the world, he said that I am his hero, which is the only thing that can make me live. It's a little pitiful. I live in a tramp now..."
"I'm alone," Snyder cried
"The Grammy winner posted the 12 minute video on Facebook in early August, revealing that she was alone and working hard every day."
"Dr. Phil shared an emotional video on Facebook, suggesting that she had suicidal thoughts. A month later, she will be interviewed..."



Number  1435
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We don’t know if we’d trade this for a Magic Mike show, but we’re just saying… If we were offered the chance to see Channing Tatum perform something live, we’d have to think about it for a very long minute.”
“(Oh, and fun fact: This isn’t the first time Tatum has performed “Let it Go.” He also did so on Lip Sync Battle, and let’s keep this trend going!)”
“Make sure your volume’s up and you’re somewhere private, because not laughing out loud is so not an option.”
“If you want to see his performance, check out the video below — we skipped to the crucial part for your convenience.”
“(Looking at you, Wicked fans!)”
“We’re sure that, somewhere out there, Idina Menzel is green with envy.”
“We know he’s an exceptionally talented dancer and performer, and he clearly pulled out all the stops to take on this role.”
“Image zoom Credit: TheEllenShowOur jaws were frozen to the ground for his whole performance.”
“His princess costume was really, truly what dreams are made of.”
“So after visiting Ellen, Berry left a sealed envelope with a dare intended for Channing to pay his debt.”


"We don't know if we're going to trade this for a magic show, but we're just saying If we have a chance to see Channing Tatum perform something live, we have to think about it for a long time
"Oh, the interesting fact is: This is not Tatum's first time to perform let go. He has also performed in the mouth fight. Let's continue this trend! "
"Be sure to turn up the volume and find a private place, because it's impossible not to laugh loudly."
"If you want to see his performance, please watch the video below - for convenience, we skipped the key parts."
"Look at you, evil fans!"
"We're sure that somewhere out there, Edina Menzel is jealous."
"We know he's a very talented dancer and performer, and he obviously does his best to play the role."
"Image scaling credit: Alan Howard's chin was frozen to the ground throughout the show."
"His princess costume is really, really part of the dream."
"So after visiting Allen, berry left behind a sealed envelope with a letter in it for Chenning to pay off his debt."



Number  1436
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But, as they warmed up in the stage lights during the break, they started to fly away!” In addition to her apology, O’Hara promises to donate over 100 volunteer hours to the American Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals.”
““I, of course, rehearsed it at home several times and it worked, but [the finale was] a different place and a different environment, and I don’t think the contraptions were warm enough to wake the butterflies up.”
““They need to warm up to a certain temperature in order to fly away,” she explained.”
“It’s important that everyone knows I would never purposely hurt any living being and have the utmost respect for all animals.”In an interview with Entertainment Weekly, O’Hara says she suspects the butterflies’ failure to launch was the result of their climate-controlled shipping conditions.”
““I would like to publicly offer the entire world my deepest apology.”
““Despite months of research and rehearsing with a professional company, what I hoped would be an amazing and safe display of optimism, and a surprise for everyone including production and the network, it did not go as planned,” O’Hara said in a statement posted to Twitter.”
“Unfortunately, the butterflies never took flight.”
“O’Hara, who was one of the show’s four finalists headed into Friday night’s finale, had planned to release the insects from her costume during her final lip sync for her life.”
“Photo: Santiago Felipe/Getty ImagesYour fav could never intentionally hurt a living creature, but a failed onstage stunt now has Drag Race season ten queen Asia O’Hara apologizing for the fate of a number of butterflies.”
“Asia O’Hara.”


"But when they warm up in the stage light during the break, they start to fly away! "In addition to apologizing, O'Hara also promised to donate more than 100 volunteer hours to the American Society for the prevention of cruelty to animals."
"Of course, I rehearsed several times at home, and the effect was good, but in different places and different environments, I don't think these gadgets are warm enough to wake the butterfly up."
"They need to be heated to a certain temperature to fly away," she explained
"It's important that everyone knows that I will never intentionally harm any living thing and that I have the greatest respect for all animals," O'Hara told Entertainment Weekly
"I want to publicly express my deepest apology to the world."
"Despite months of research and rehearsal with a professional company, I hope it will be a surprising and safe optimistic performance, a surprise for everyone including production and networking, but it didn't go as planned," O'Hara said in a statement on twitter
"Unfortunately, butterflies never fly."
"O'Hara is one of the four finalists in the show's finale on Friday night. She had planned to release the insects from her clothes at the last lip sync in her life."
"Photo: Santiago Felipe / Getty Images your favorite will never intentionally hurt a creature, but a failed stage stunt has now dragged down season 10. Queen Asia O'Hara apologizes for the fate of some butterflies."
"O'Hara of Asia."



Number  1437
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Arrow is produced by Bonanza Productions Inc. in association with Berlanti Productions and Warner Bros. Television.”
“Based on the DC characters, the series is executive produced by Greg Berlanti, Marc Guggenheim, Wendy Mericle and Sarah Schechter.”
“Colton Haynes returns as Roy Harper for the new season after being absent from the series.”
“Arrow stars Stephen Amell as Oliver Queen, David Ramsey as John Diggle, and Emily Bett Rickards as Felicity Smoak.”
“Oliver will find himself vulnerable in a way unlike ever before when a mysterious new enemy begins to unravel his work as Green Arrow, challenging him to redeem his name or risk losing everything.”
“Now, Oliver will come face-to-face with many of the criminals he placed behind bars, as he makes a new home for himself at Slabside Maximum Security Prison.”
“There has been no shortage of close calls for Oliver Queen when it comes to protecting his Super Hero identity, but in the season six finale, he was finally backed into a corner and forced to reveal himself to the world as the Green Arrow.”
“Finally, since Oliver finds himself locked up, some familiar faces will be back including Michael Jai White as Ben Turner/Bronze Tiger, Cody Runnels as Derek Sampson and Vinnie Jones Danny “Brick” Brickwell.”
“The legendary group of assassins were recruited by Ricardo Diaz (Kirk Acevedo) to exact his revenge on Oliver and the team after they took down his burgeoning criminal empire in season six.”
“Silencer a master of stealth...”


"Arrow is co produced by bonanza productions Inc. with berlanti productions and Warner Bros TV."
"Based on the DC role, the series is directed by Greg berlanti, Marc Guggenheim, Wendy merrile and Sarah Schechter."
"Colton Haines will be back in the new season as Roy Harper after his absence from the series
"Arrow stars Stephen amel as Oliver Quinn, David Ramsay as John digger, and Emily bate Ricardo as felicity smock."
"When a mysterious new enemy begins to disintegrate his work as a green arrow, challenge him to recover his reputation or risk losing everything, Oliver will find himself more vulnerable than ever."
"Now, Oliver is going to face many of the criminals he's put in prison because he's built a new home for himself at the highest security prison in slabside."
"In terms of protecting his superhero identity, Oliver Quinn has a lot of sweet calls, but in the final of the sixth season, he was finally forced to show himself to the world as a green arrow."
Finally, as Oliver finds himself locked up, some familiar faces will return, including Michael Jay white as Ben Turner / Bronze tiger, Cody lennelles as Derek Sampson and Winnie Jones Denny as brick brickwell
"The legendary assassin group is recruited by Ricardo Diaz (played by Kirk Acevedo) to avenge Oliver and his team after they captured his new criminal empire in the sixth season."
"Master of silencing"



Number  1438
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“””
“Along with 'You go, Glen Coco!”
“” —Regina GeorgeFetch is a slang term Gretchen Wieners often uses and tries to 'make it happen,' hoping it becomes a new it-word.”
“The word's actual meaning is supposed to be 'nice', 'fresh', 'desirable,' or 'cool'.”
“It is most likely a shortened version of the word "fetching," a now less-common term for attractive.”
“Fetch was first used by Gretchen when Cady showed her bracelet to the Plastics.”
“Later in the movie, she repeated it after their performance in Winter Talent Show, putting off Regina.”
“Modern DayThe slang became extremely popular with the Mean Girls' fandom and to this day, after 16 years as of 2020, people all over the world are still trying to make 'fetch' a real thing.”
“', 'fetch' is by far the most memorable term from the franchise.”
“...it's not going to happen!”


“””
"Follow you, Glen coco!"
"- Regina georgefetch is a slang term often used by Gretchen wieners. She tries to 'make it happen' and hopes it will become a new it word."
"The actual meaning of the word should be" good, "" fresh, "" desirable, "or" cool. "
"It's probably an acronym for" fetching, "a less common term for attraction now."
"Gretchen used fetch for the first time when Katie showed her bracelet to the plastic bag."
"Then in the movie, after her performance in the winter talent show, she repeated that and dragged Regina into the water."
"Modern slang has become so popular in the craze for mean girls that today, 16 years after 2020, people around the world are still trying to make 'fetch' a real thing."
"Until now, 'fetch' is the most memorable term in franchise."
“… It won't happen



Number  1439
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“❤️ A post shared by Kim Kardashian West (@kimkardashian) on Jun 6, 2017 at 4:30pm PDT Jun 6, 2017 at 4:30pm PDTPerhaps, next time, it's best not to judge other people's parenting at all.”
“In July, the reality star responded to people who shamed her for dressing her 4-year-old daughter North West in a corset-style dress with a Snapchat video that showed her dress didn't feature a real corset, but rather a lace-up detail designed to look like one.”
“Dia Dipasupil/Getty ImagesThe INSIDER Summary:Kim Kardashian has responded to criticism over the position of her son Saint West's car seat.”
“The mom of two posted a photo of her 20-month-old son in a forward-facing car seat on Facebook this June.”
“In the comments, many people argued the car seat position was unsafe and broke California state law that requires toddlers under 2 to sit in rear-facing seats.”
“However, the law doesn't apply to children who are over 40 inches tall or weigh more than 40 pounds.”
“In a new video, Kardashian explained that Saint West meets those requirements.”
“Like other celebrity moms, Kim Kardashian West is used to being criticized for her parenting decisions.”
“The reality star recently defended her parenting skills in a new video, which we first read about on People.”
“In the video, posted to her website, Kardashian addressed accusations from Facebook users who claimed that she put her son Saint West in danger — and potentially even broke the law — by placing him in a forward-facing car seat.”


“ ❤️  Kim Kardashian West (@ KimKardashian) shared a post "next time, it's better not to judge other people's parenting style."
"In July this year, the reality star responded to some people who shamed her 4-year-old daughter North West in a corset dress in a snapchat video that showed her skirt was not a real corset, but the lace details of a corset."
"Dia Dipper / Getty imagines the inside summary: Kim Kardashian, who responds to criticism of her son's car seat in St West
"The mother of two posted a picture of her 20 month old son sitting in a forward facing car seat on Facebook in June."
"In the comments, many people thought that the car seat position was unsafe, violating California law requiring children under 2 years old to sit in rear facing seats."
"However, this law does not apply to children who are more than 40 inches tall or weigh more than 40 pounds."
"In a new video, Kardashian explains that St. West meets these requirements."
"Like other star moms, Kim Kardashian West is used to being criticized for her parenting decisions."
"The reality star recently defended his parenting skills in a new video, which is the first time we've seen it in people."
In a video posted on her website, Kardashian responded to Facebook users' accusations that she put her son, Saint West, on a forward facing car seat, putting him in danger and possibly breaking the law



Number  1440
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Image via Instagram/Ivan Nikolov/WENN.]”
“Such a mess!”
“On Sunday, you couldn’t escape everyone’s tributes to their dads on social media… but there was one in particular that stood out.”
“The public father-son spat was ignited after the 55-year-old MÃ¶tley CrÃ¼e star shared a post with some strong opinions about his sons and their mother, Pamela Anderson.”
“It wasn’t long before 22-year-old Brandon Lee fired back with his own response about Tommy’s absence in his life, and posted a video of his father seemingly passed out and unconscious on the floor.”
“Related: Tommy Lee Didn’t REALLY Quit Twitter After Fight With SonAlongside an image of him and his own father, Tommy initially wrote:“Happy Father’s Day fellas!”
“I’m not gonna sit here and post some fluffed up bullshit for the public to read….”
“I’m gonna be honest- Being a father ain’t easy!”
“I’m so tired of the fake shit I keep seeing all over IG… let’s get real: It’s a rollercoaster ok?”
“My father taught me to respect everyone and everything and to take care of those that I loved.”


"[picture via instagram / Ivan Nikolov / wenn.]"
"What a mess!"
"Last Sunday, you couldn't escape everyone's mourning for your father on social media But there is one thing that stands out
"After the 55 year old m Ã tley Cr Ã e star shared a strong opinion post about his son and their mother Pamela Anderson, the public spat between father and son was ignited."
"It wasn't long before Brandon Lee, 22, responded to the absence of Tommy in his life and released a video of his father seemingly fainting."
Related report: Tommy Lee didn't really quit twitter after a dispute with son alongside (photo of him and his father). Tommy initially wrote: "happy father's day, guys!"
"I don't want to sit here and publish some gibberish for the public to read..."
"I'll tell you the truth - it's not easy to be a father!"
"I'm tired of seeing fake dog poop all over the funny world Let's be realistic: it's a roller coaster, OK? "
"My father taught me to respect everyone and everything and take care of the people I love."



Number  1441
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To see more of Maci Bookout and her family, tune into new episodes of Teen Mom OG Season 8, which air this and every Monday night at 9 p.m. on MTV.”
“As for a future pregnancy, Bookout hasn’t said a whole lot, other than she’s open to the idea if it was what her husband wanted.”
“Maci Bookout is facing new rumors, which suggest the Teen Mom OG star is expecting her fourth child.”
“Days ago, Celebrity Insider shared a report with readers in which they mentioned a recent photo post made by Bookout on Instagram.”
“In the photo, as the outlet noted, Bookout was standing next to her husband, Taylor McKinney, and looking to be sporting a baby bump.”
“As fans can see in the photo shared below, Bookout looked to be round in her midsection as she held her husband’s hand and placed her other hand halfway into her pocket.”
“According to Celebrity Insider, Maci Bookout was caught photoshopping her midsection weeks ago while celebrating Halloween with her family and never addressed why she did so.”
“She’s also shared a couple of images in which a baby bump was possibly on display.”
“After Bookout shared her most recent suspicious photo, fans began commenting on the post with questions about her potential pregnancy.”
““Is that a baby bump?” one person asked.”


"To learn more about MACI bookout and her family, watch the new episode of Season 8 of young mom og, which will air on MTV at 9pm on Monday."
"As for future pregnancy, bookout didn't say much, but she was willing to accept the idea if it was what her husband wanted."
"MACI bookout is facing new rumors, which means the teenage mother, the og star, will have her fourth child."
"A few days ago, people in the celebrity circle shared a report with readers that mentioned a photo recently posted in bookout on instagram."
"In this photo, as the media said, bookout stands next to her husband, Taylor McKinney, looking like she's playing with a small lump."
"As fans can see in the photos shared below, bookout holds her husband's hand and puts the other hand in her half pocket. Her abdomen looks round."
"MACI bookout was photographed with her upper body a few weeks ago while celebrating Halloween with her family, according to people in celebrity circles, but never mentioned why she did it."
"She also shared a couple of photos that might have a baby lump."
"After bookout shared her latest suspicious photos, fans started commenting on her possible pregnancy in their posts."
"Is that a baby lump? "Asked one



Number  1442
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2013 Captain Phillips Best Actor Nominated [44]St. Louis Gateway Film Critics Association [ edit ]Miscellaneous [ edit ]See also [ edit ]”
“Year Nominated work Category Result Ref...”
“2013 Captain Phillips Best Actor Nominated 22 Empire magazine edit International Press Academy Satellite Awards edit London Film Critics Circle edit MTV channel edit Nickelodeon channel Kids Choice edit Online Film Critics Society edit People s Choice Awards edit Producers Guild of America edit San Diego Film Critics Society edit...”
“2021 Greyhound Best Actor in an Action Movie NominatedChicago Film Critics Association [ edit ]Detroit Film Critics Society [ edit ]Year Nominated work Category Result Ref.”
“1988 Big Best Actor Won [13] 1994 Forrest Gump NominatedAmerican Film Institute [ edit ]American Comedy Awards [ edit ]Australian Academy of Cinema and Television Arts [ edit ]Broadcast Film Critics Association (Critics' Choice) [ edit ]Broadcast Film Critics Association (Critics' Choice Super) [ edit ]Year Nominated work Category Result Ref.”
“Major award associations [ edit ]Academy Awards [ edit ]BAFTA Film Awards [ edit ]Emmy Awards (Primetime) [ edit ]Golden Globe Awards [ edit ]Screen Actors Guild Awards [ edit ]Tony Awards [ edit ]Others [ edit ]Academy of Science Fiction, Fantasy, & Horror Films (Saturn Awards) [ edit ]Year Nominated work Category Result Ref.”
“Tom Hanks has won a total of 50 awards on this list.”
“Actor, director, producer, and screenwriter, Tom Hanks has been honored with numerous awards and nominations, including two consecutive Academy Awards for Philadelphia (1993) and Forrest Gump (1994).”


"Captain Phillips nominated for best actor in 2013 [44] St. Louis Film Critics Association [editor] miscellaneous [editor] see also [editor]"
"Annual assigned job category results reference..."
"Captain Phillips nominated for best actor in 2013 22 Empire magazine editor International Journalism School Satellite Award editor London Critics Circle editor MTV channel editor Nickelodeon channel children's choice editor online Critics Association editor people's Choice Award editor American producers association editor San Diego Critics Association editor..."
"2021 Greyhound best action film actor nominations Chicago Film Critics Association [editor] Detroit Film Critics Association [editor] annual nominations category results reference."
"In 1988, the best actor was nominated by Forrest Gump [13] in 1994, American Film Academy [editor] American Comedy Award [editor] Australian Academy of film and Television Arts [editor] radio and Film Critics Association (film critics choose) [editor] radio and Film Critics Association (film critics choose super) [editor] Annual Nomination category results reference."
"Major Awards Association [editor] Oscar [editor] BAFTA Film Award [editor] Emmy (prime time) [editor] Golden Globe [editor] Screen Actors Association Award [editor] Tony [editor] other [editor] Academy of science fiction, fantasy and horror (Saturn) [editor] annual nominations category results reference."
"Tom Hanks has won a total of 50 awards on this list."
Actor, director, producer and screenwriter Tom Hanks has won many awards and nominations, including two consecutive Philadelphia Academy Awards (1993) and Forrest Gump Award (1994)



Number  1443
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email TooFab editors at tips@toofab.com._**”
“**_Got a story or a tip for us?”
“Happy 15th anniversary to "The Simple Life."”
“Paris Hilton honored the reality show that ran for five seasons between 2003 and 2007 by sharing a picture with co-star Nicole Richie and a throwback video on her Instagram.”
“"Happy 15 Year Anniversary to #TheSimpleLife.”
“Loves it!”
“So many fun, amazing & hilarious memories with Nicole," Hilton captioned the promotional picture of the two parodying the Grant Wood's famous painting, "American Gothic."”
“"Love that this show is so timeless & iconic," she continued.”
“"And that it has brought so much happiness and laughter to people around the world.”
“And the #Legend Tinkerbell who I love & miss very much.”


"Email toofab editor" tips@toofab.com_ **”
"Did you tell us a story or a tip?"
"Happy 15th anniversary of simple life."
"Paris Hilton honored the reality show by sharing a photo with CO star Nicole Ritchie and a retrospective video on her instagram during the five reality shows from 2003 to 2007."
"Happy 15th anniversary of simple life."
"I love it!"
"There are so many interesting, amazing and funny memories with Nicole," Hilton wrote in a promotional picture of the two imitating grant wood's famous painting American Gothic
"I love how timeless and iconic this show is," she continued
"It brings so much joy and laughter to people all over the world."
"And the legendary Tinker Bell that I like and miss very much."



Number  1444
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The immensely popular Fast And The Furious series was predicated upon the culture surrounding modified cars!”
“AdvertisementThis isn’t the first Hollywood production that centers around cars.”
“The meticulous hard work that is put into their cars creates a unique culture that is not just about materialism, but rather values like loyalty, trust, camaraderie, and friendship.”
“She said being around people who owned and cherished their cars was a great experience for her.”
“I freaking love her.”Despite being starstruck, Monreal does just fine amongst all the “macho” men and the cars.”
““I’m pretty sure I was awkward and just stared at her until she walked away.”
““I walked up to her, and Demian Bichir introduced me and was like, ‘this is Yvette.’ She looked at me and said, ‘Aw, you’re so pretty,’ and I nearly fainted but said thank you!”The young actress said she was feeling a bit awkward afterward.”
“...celebrity Eva Longoria...”
“I ve had family visit me on set so it s really nice to be able to show them what I m working on without having to fly out When asked if she had a particular moment in her mind that had her totally flabbergasted she recalled her meeting with...”
“She hails from Lawndale, California.”


"The very popular fast and intense series is based around the culture of refitted cars!"
"Advertising, this is not the first Hollywood car centered production."
"The meticulous hard work they put into their cars has created a unique culture that is not just about materialism, but about the values of loyalty, trust, friendship and friendship."
"It's a great experience for her to be with people who own and cherish their cars," she said
"I love her to death." Although he was fascinated by the stars, he did well in all the "men" and cars
"I'm sure I was embarrassed and kept staring at her until she walked away."
"I came up to her and Demian bisher introduced me and said," this is Yvette. " She looked at me and said, "ah, you're beautiful." I almost fainted, but I said thank you! "The young actress said she felt a little embarrassed afterwards."
“… Celebrity Eva Longoria... "
"I had family members on set to see me, so when asked if she had a special moment that completely stunned her, it was great to show them what I was doing without having to fly out, she recalled and When we meet... "
"She's from Randall, California."



Number  1445
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And for even more on how she’s spending Christmas with her family, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
““I love to mix holiday tableware with pieces I can use year-round.”Watch the video above to hear more of Decker’s holiday tips!”
“...with Joss Main plates...”
“At the same time she likes to keep her house festive but practical the mom of Vivianne 4 Eric II 3 and Forrest 8 months with husband Eric Decker notes adding she does the same for her Christmas dinner table...”
““I wanted to make sure it screamed ‘Merry Christmas, y’all!’” the singer and cookbook author, 30, exclusively says in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
“This season, Jessie James Decker is bringing wintry Christmas vibes to sunny Nashville!”


"For more information on how she spent Christmas with her family, let's take a look at the new issue of American weekly!"
"I like to mix holiday cutlery with cutlery that I can use all year round." Watch the video above to hear more holiday tips about dyke
“… With joss motherboard... "
"At the same time, she likes to keep her house festive, but the actual mother Vivian 4 Eric II 3 and Forrest 8 months notes with her husband Eric Decker added that she also makes the same Christmas table..."
"I want to make sure it screams' Merry Christmas, everyone! The 30-year-old singer and cookbook writer said exclusively in the new issue of American weekly
"This season, Jesse James Decker brings a Winter Christmas atmosphere to the sunny Nashville!"



Number  1446
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They are partners.” Phew!”
“Another insider added, “They oversell their friendship.”
“Over the past year, their on-screen chemistry has always been on point during the daily talk show — and that’s because their relationship is strong both on and off the air.”
““They get along famously,” a source told E!”
“News of the pair.”
““Ryan and Kelly have the same work ethic and values.”
“That’s why it works so well.” A source also told Closer Weekly exclusively, that “they are very in sync with each other.” The insider added, “With Ryan, Kelly feels like she’s met her match.”
“She says this has been the best few months she’s had on the show since she joined 16 years ago.”However, there’s been some struggle with their relationship behind the scenes recently following Ryan’s sexual harassment allegations.”
“According to Page Six, Kelly is worried about how Ryan’s situation could impact their show.”
““Kelly doesn’t want to risk anything happening to Live.”


"They're partners." Pooh
Another insider added: "they exaggerate their friendship."
"In the past year, their chemical reactions on the screen have always appeared on daily talk shows - it's because their relationship is strong both on TV and on TV."
"They get along very well," a source told e! "
"News of the two."
"Ryan and Kelly share the same professional ethics and values."
"That's why it works so well." "They're very synchronized with each other," one source told the exclusive of closer weekly "With Ryan, Kelly felt like he had an opponent," the source added
"She said it was her best months on the show since she joined the show 16 years ago," but recently, after Ryan's sexual harassment charges, the relationship between the two was a bit tangled behind the scenes
"According to the report on page 6, Kelly is worried about how Ryan's situation will affect their show."
"Kelly didn't want to risk his life."



Number  1447
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Something else to consider: Dimitri, as voiced by John Cusack, is definitely the sexiest prince in this new Disney Princess extended universe.”
“She’ll learn to do it.”
“Will she shade Cinderella at Disney Princess brunch?”
“Where does Anastasia rank between Belle and Mulan?”
“Your Disney princess ranking will take some reevaluating.”
“The most unexpected result of this corporate brouhaha?”
“Anastasia has always seemed like a Disney princess, but the 1997 movie musical was actually produced by Fox Animation Studios.”
“It’s what she deserves!”
“This is not just a rumor in St. Petersburg.”
“But a development that flew under the radar, as pointed out by Entertainment Weekly, is that Anastasia, the cinematic It-girl princess of the ’90s, is now a Disney princess.”


"One more thing to consider: Dimitri, voiced by John Cusack, is definitely the sexiest prince in the new Disney Princess universe."
"She'll learn."
"Will she shade Cinderella at Disney Princess brunch?"
"Anastasia is at the top between Bel and Mulan?"
"Your Disney Princess ranking needs to be reassessed."
"What is the most unexpected result of this enterprise storm?"
"Anastasia always looked like Disney Princess, but the 1997 musical was actually produced by Fox animation studio."
"She deserves it!"
"It's not just St. Petersburg rumors."
"But, as entertainment weekly points out, a remarkable development is that the nineties movie it girl Princess Anastasia is now Disney Princess."



**Something goes wrong**
“Related: Why Some People Are Upset Over the New Rogue One: A Star Wars Story TrailerCheck this out:”
“Hope the two are having as much fun as it looks like they are!”
“And though it all seems innocuous enough, there's one little detail that has some fans making a lot of assumptions...and that little detail is who she's with.”
“Chloe seems to be on vacation with YouTuber Logan Paul.”
“E!”
“...reports that the two are set to star in a 2018 remake of Valley Girl together, and perhaps that is where they became friends.”
“According to her Instagram, they wrapped filming last week.”
“And in celebration, it looks like she and Logan are enjoying the island life with some other friends.”
“However, just a few days ago, news surfaced that Chloe had reportedly separated from her beau of four years, Austin Nichols.”
“As E!”


"Related report: why some people feel uneasy about the new rogue one: a star wars story tracker, look at this:
"I hope they can be as happy as they look!"
"Although it all seems irrelevant, there is a small detail that some fans make a lot of assumptions And this little detail is who she's with. "
"Chloe seems to be on holiday with Uber Logan Paul."
“E！”
“…… The report said that the two will act together in a remake of "Gu Kailai girl" in 2018. Maybe this is where they become friends. "
"According to her instagram, they finished filming last week."
"To celebrate, she and Logan seem to be enjoying life on the island with other friends."
"However, just a few days ago, it was reported that Chloe had separated from her boyfriend of four years, Austin Nichols."
"As e!"



Number  1449
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“ADRIAN DENNIS Getty ImagesCaroline Hallemann Digital News Director As the digital news director for Town & Country, Caroline Hallemann covers everything from the British royal family to the latest episodes of Outlander, Killing Eve, and The Crown.”
“Pippa was recently seen at Princess Eugenie's wedding , and is thought to be due in the coming weeks.”
“...the fall as Kate s sister Pippa is expecting her first child with her husband James Matthews...”
“While the newest addition to the Sussex family isn t due until Spring 2019 given that Meghan has reportedly had her 12 week scan many royal reporters are more specifically predicting April or May Prince William and Duchess Kate will actually become an aunt and uncle for the first time...”
“Several members of the royal family including the Queen and Prince Charles shared their joy about Meghan's pregnancy this morning, as did Meghan's mom, Doria Ragland, who said she's "very happy at this lovely news and is looking forward to welcoming her first grandchild."”
“A spokesperson also revealed that the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge "are delighted for the couple and were able to congratulate them on Friday at the wedding in person."”
“"Their Royal Highnesses have appreciated all of the support they have received from people around the world since their wedding in May and are delighted to be able to share this happy news with the public."”
“Fiji and Tonga...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Adrian Dennis Getty picture Caroline hallerman digital news director as digital news director of town and country, Caroline hallerman covers everything from the British royal family to the latest episode Outlands, kill Eve and crown."
"Pippa was recently seen at Princess Eugenie's wedding and is expected to show up in the next few weeks."
“…… Kate's sister Pippa and her husband James Matthews are pregnant with her first child... "
"Although the latest members of the Sussex family won't be able to join until the spring of 2019, as Megan is reported to have been scanned for 12 weeks, many royal journalists predict more specifically that Prince William and Duchess Kate will become aunts and uncles for the first time in April or may..."
"Several members of the royal family, including the queen and Prince Charles, shared their joy about Megan's pregnancy this morning, as did Megan's mother, Doria lagrand, who said she was" very happy with the lovely news and looking forward to meeting her first grandson. "
A spokesman also revealed that the Duchess of Cambridge "are very happy for the couple and can personally congratulate them on Friday's wedding."
"Her Majesty is very grateful for all the support they have received from all over the world since their marriage in May, and is very happy to share this good news with the public."
"Fiji and Tonga..."



Number  1450
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“"#bootysecret ALERT!”
“@flawlessvegas gets you the summer ready booty you have always wanted!”
“Watch live now!"”
“Farrah posted to Instagram.”
“"I've enjoyed this no pain, quick & lasta two years.”
“#summerready #smooth #lifted #natural #dimples #butt #squats #momlife #swimsuit #bikinibody #celebritysecrets #buttinjections #2018."”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Bootysecret alert!"
"@ perfect Vegas offers you the summer booty you've always wanted!"
"Watch it live now!"
"Farah posted on instagram."
"For two years, I have been enjoying this painless, fast and lasting life."
"Summer preparation, smooth improvement, natural dimples, buttocks, squats, momlife, swimsuit, bikini, certalyty CRETS, buttocks injection, 2018."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information



**Something goes wrong**
“...you or your child have a serious underlying medical condition such as kidney disease and have diarrhoea and vomiting Your GP may suggest sending off a sample of your stool to a laboratory to confirm whether you have norovirus or another infection...”
“How is norovirus spread?”
“Preventing norovirusIt's not always possible to avoid getting norovirus, but following the advice below can help stop the virus spreading.”
“You can get norovirus more than once because the virus is always changing and your body is unable to build up long-term resistance to it.”
“You may also be infectious for a short time before and after this.”
“...outside the body for several days eating contaminated food which can happen if an infected person doesn t wash their hands before preparing or handling food Norovirus is most infectious from the start of symptoms until 48 hours after all symptoms have stopped...”
“You can catch it if small particles of vomit or stools poo from an infected person get into your mouth through close contact with someone with norovirus who may breathe out small particles of the virus that you then inhale touching contaminated surfaces or objects as the virus can survive...”
“Norovirus spreads very easily in public places such as hospitals, nursing homes and schools.”
“The symptoms appear one to two days after you become infected and typically last for up to two or three days.”
“...based hand gels don t kill the virus Maintain basic hygiene and cleaning to help stop the spread of norovirus by disinfecting any surfaces or objects that could be contaminated using a bleach based household cleaner...”


“…… If you or your child has serious underlying diseases such as kidney disease, diarrhea and vomiting, your family doctor may recommend that you send stool samples to the laboratory to confirm whether you are infected with norovirus or other infections... "
How does norovirus spread? "
"Prevention of norovirus does not always prevent norovirus infection, but following these recommendations can help prevent the spread of the virus."
"You may be infected with norovirus more than once, because the virus is always changing and your body cannot build long-term resistance to it."
"Before and after that, you may also be contagious."
“…… If the infected person does not wash his hands before preparing or handling the food, this may happen. Norwalk virus is the most infectious virus from the beginning of symptoms to 48 hours after all symptoms stop... "
"If small particles of vomit or feces from infected people enter your mouth through close contact with norovirus carriers, these people may exhale small particles of the virus, and then you inhale these particles to contact contaminated surfaces or objects, because the virus can survive..."
Norovirus is easy to spread in public places such as hospitals, sanatoriums and schools
"These symptoms appear one or two days after you are infected, usually lasting two or three days."
“… Alkaline hand gel does not kill the virus and maintain basic hygiene and cleanliness. Disinfect any potentially contaminated surface or object by using a bleach household cleaner to help prevent the spread of norovirus. "



Number  1452
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...and Toblerone chocolate bars in Texas (it may have something to do with the state’s colossal airports).”
“WATCH: Food Hack: Make Candied Apples with Candy CornOther unconventional winners include Oreos in West Virginia (how did a cookie make the candy list in the first place?)”
“Way Virginia Snickers Washington Tootsie Pops West Virginia Blow Pops Wisconsin Starbursts Wyoming Reese s Peanut Butter Cups District of Columbia M Ms Surprisingly the candy that finished first in the most states is candy corn though the tri colored treats are quite polarizing...”
“New York Sour Patch Kids North Carolina M M s North Dakota Hot Tamales Ohio Blow Pops Oklahoma Snickers Oregon Reese s Peanut Butter Cups Pennsylvania M M s Rhode Island Candy Corn South Carolina Candy Corn South Dakota Starburst Tennessee Tootsie Pops Texas Starburst Utah Jolly Ranchers Vermont Milky...”
“Cups Kentucky Tootsie Pops Louisiana Lemonheads Maine Sour Patch Kids Maryland Milky Way Massachusetts Sour Patch Kids Michigan Candy Corn Minnesota Tootsie Pops Mississippi 3 Musketeers Missouri Milky Way Montana Double Bubble Gum Nebraska Sour Patch Kids Nevada Hershey Kisses New Hampshire Snickers New Jersey Skittles New Mexico Candy Corn...”
“Alabama Candy Corn Alaska Twix Arizona Snickers Arkansas Jolly Ranchers California M Ms Colorado Milky Way Connecticut Almond Joy Delaware Life Savers Florida Skittles Georgia Swedish Fish Hawaii Skittles Idaho Candy Corn Illinois Sour Patch Kids Indiana Hot Tamales Iowa Reese s Peanut Butter Cups Kansas Reese s Peanut Butter...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“See the full list below.”
“Given that America spends $2.7 billion on candy this time of year, CandyStore.com took it upon themselves back in 2017 to collect 10 years of Halloween sales data for every state.”
“Here Is the Most Popular Halloween Candy in Every State in AmericaWith Halloween but a few weeks away, pillowcases are about to be filled to the brim with candy—but how do you dish out sweets your local trick-or-treaters are hoping for?”


“… And the TOBLERONE chocolate bar in Texas (probably related to the state's huge Airport)
"Watch: Food hackers: making applesauce out of Corn Candy. Other unconventional winners include Oreo of West Virginia
"Virginia Snickers way Washington Tootsie pop West Virginia blow pop Wisconsin starburst Wyoming Reese peanut butter cup District of Columbia m MS surprisingly, in most states, the first finished candy is candy corn, although the treatment of tricolor is quite polarized..."
"New York acid Patch Kids North Carolina m m s North Dakota hot corn flour steamed meat Ohio puff Oklahoma snick Oregon Rees peanut butter cup Pennsylvania m s Rhode Island candy corn South Carolina candy corn South Dakota starburst Tennessee Tusi pop Texas starburst Utah jolly ranchers Vermont milk..."
"Kentucky beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans beans Beans, beans, beans, beans, corn... "
"Alabama candy corn Alaska Twix Arizona snick Arkansas happy farmer California m Colorado Galaxy Connecticut almond happy Delaware lifeguard Florida skittles Georgia Swedish fish Hawaii skittles Idaho candy corn Illinois acid Patch Kids Indiana hot corn steamed meat "Horwallis peanut butter cup, Kansas Reese peanut butter..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"See the complete list below."
"Considering that the United States spends $2.7 billion a year on candy at this time of year, CandyStore.com As early as 2017, they began to collect 10 years of Halloween sales data for each state. "
"It's the most popular Halloween candy in the states of the United States. A few weeks after Halloween, the pillowcase will be full of candy, but how do you distribute the candy that your local trick or treat people want



Number  1453
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 4.”
“James is known for starring on Bad Girls Club Season 9 and Basketball Wives L.A.”
“The television personality denied a new report Monday that she fueled recent Rob Kardashian dating rumors to gain fame.”
“Photo by Mehgan James /InstagramJune 6 (UPI) -- Mehgan James says she didn't fake a romance with fellow reality star Rob Kardashian.”
“The 27-year-old television personality denied a new report Monday on Instagram that she fueled recent Kardashian dating rumors to gain fame.”
“Advertisement"I did not fake anything.”
“Like I said I never confirmed that I was dating rob.”
“Any one that asked I told them it was not true," she wrote in a since-deleted post.”
“"It takes two people to fake a relationship, any one who fakes a relationship by themselves is a complete idiot!!"”
“TMZ had reported Monday that James was the "mastermind" behind the romance rumors.”


"The fourth season."
"James is famous for starring in season 9 of bad girls club and basketball wife Los Angeles."
"The TV celebrity denied a new report Monday that she helped rob Kardashian become famous by fueling recent dating rumors."
"Photo source: mehgan James / instagram June 6 (UPI) -- mehgan James said she didn't pretend to be in love with Rob Kardashian, a reality TV star."
"The 27 year old TV celebrity denied a new report on instagram on Monday, saying she contributed to the recent rumors of Kardashian's date and made her famous."
"Ad" I didn't fake anything
"Like I said, I've never confirmed that I'm dating rob."
"Anyone who asks me, I tell them it's not true," she wrote in a deleted post
"It takes two people to pretend a relationship. Anyone who pretends a relationship himself is a complete idiot!"
"TMZ reported on Monday that James was the 'mastermind' behind the romantic rumor."



Number  1454
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...past...”
“The 28 year old model was joined by a group of friends while spending time on a boat on Friday February 5 in Miami Beach Fla It s not clear if Olivia will be going to the Super Bowl this year but she has been a regular there in years...”
“After she got home, Lucy took to Instagram to introduce fans to new puppy, which she adorably named Ethel.”
“The 31-year-old Pretty Little Liars actress picked up her new puppy from the shelter on Saturday afternoon (February 6) in Los Angeles.”
“Lucy Hale has adopted a new puppy!”
“He was nominated for Best Actor for his role in Ma Rainey’s Black Bottom, Best Supporting Actor for his role in Da 5 Bloods, and was Read moreLucy Hale's New Puppy Ethel Was Once Fostered by This Famous Actress!”
“Chadwick made history becoming the first actor to be nominated for four SAG Awards in a single year.”
“The 33-year-old Creed actor took to Instagram on Friday (February 5) to pay tribute to his late Black Panther co-star after he made history with all of his nominations at the 2021 SAG Awards.”
“A few days earlier, Emily took to Instagram to Read moreMichael B Jordan Honors Late Chadwick Boseman After Making History with SAG Awards Nominations Michael B. Jordan is remembering his late friend Chadwick Boseman.”
“Emily showed off growing baby bump in a short, black sweatshirt paired with black sweatpants, a gray blazer, and tan boots while the 33-year-old film producer sported bright orange sweats for their walk.”


“… In the past... "
"A group of friends joined the 28 year old model on a boat ride in Miami Beach, Florida, on Friday, February 5. It's not clear if Olivia will go to the Super Bowl this year, but she has been a regular there for many years... "
"When she got home, Lucy went to instagram and introduced a new puppy to her fans. She lovingly named it Ethel."
"The 31 year old beautiful little cheater actress picked up her new puppy from a shelter in Los Angeles on Saturday afternoon
"Lucy Hale has adopted a new puppy!"
"He was nominated for Best Actor for his role in Marlene's" black butt "and best supporting actor for his role in" big five blood ", and got more information. Lucy Hale's new dog Ethel was raised by the famous actress!"
"Chadwick made history as the first actor to be nominated for four sag awards in one year."
"The 33 year old creed actor saluted his late Panther partner on instagram last Friday (February 5) after making history by winning all nominations at the 2021 sag awards ceremony."
"A few days ago, Emily read more on instagram. Michael Jordan made history with his sag nomination in memory of the late Chadwick Bosman. Jordan is remembering his late friend, Chadwick Bosman
Wearing a black sweatshirt, black sweatpants, gray blazer and tan boots, Emily showed the audience the growing baby lump, while the 33 year old filmmaker walked in a bright orange sweatshirt



Number  1455
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...a break Inseparable The artist appeared to point something out to the actress mid stroll Casual Two days later Chris was seen leaving a Malibu market after picking up a small cup of coffee and a juice...”
“...when they revealed they were consciously uncoupling before their divorce was finalized in July 2016 Handsome The former couple remain close and continue to co parent their two children together daughter Apple 13 and son Moses 11 Having a moment Chris and Dakota enjoyed a view of the ocean during...”
“And hours earlier, Dakota Johnson, 28, and Chris Martin, 40, were spotted enjoying a PDA session on the beach in Malibu.”
“The stars, who were first linked in October, had their arms wrapped around each other while strolling along the water.”
“Happy couple: Dakota Johnson, 28, and Chris Martin, 40, were spotted enjoying a PDA session on the beach in the Los Angeles neighborhoodDakota sported a slightly sheer floral cover up with her black swimsuit underneath.”
“The Fifty Shades Of Grey star flashed her toned legs in the thigh-grazing frock, adding large framed sunglasses.”
“Dakota, who is the daughter of Melanie Griffith and Don Johnson, styled her brunette locks loose around.”
“She had one arm wrapped around the Coldplay front man's waist.”
“Blissful The duo who were first linked romantically in October had their arms wrapped around each other while strolling along the water In their own world Dakota sported a slightly sheer floral cover up with her black swimsuit underneath Having a moment together The lovebirds chatted it up on the...”
“...beach Dakota also brought along her beloved dog Zeppelin for the walk...”


“… An inseparable break, the artist seems to point out something. After two days of strolling among actresses, Chris is seen leaving Malibu market, picking up a small cup of coffee and juice... "
“… When they revealed that they had consciously broken their engagement before their divorce in July 2016, the former couple were still very close and continued to raise their two children together. Their daughter Apple was 13 years old, their son Moses was 11 years old, and Chris and Dakota were in During that time, I had a look at the sea. "
A few hours ago, Dakota Johnson, 28, and Chris Martin, 40, were playing with a PDA on the beach in Malibu
"The stars are connected for the first time in October, their arms twining as they walk on the water."
Happy couple: 28 year old Dakota Johnson and 40 year old Chris Martin are playing on a palm computer on a beach in Los Angeles. Dakota is wearing a black swimsuit and a slightly transparent flower coat
"The 50 degree gray star is shining on her slim thighs, plus a pair of big frame sunglasses."
"Dakota, the daughter of Melanie Griffith and Don Johnson, has dark hair that's very loose."
"She put one arm around the waist of Coldplay avant-garde."
"The two happy people were romantically linked for the first time in October. When they strolled in their own world, their arms were intertwined. Dakota was wearing a slightly transparent flower coat, and her black swimsuit was underneath. They had a good time together. The lovers were in I started talking on the Internet
“… Beach Dakota also brought her beloved dog Zeppelin airship for a walk. "



Number  1456
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I always post a photo in this mirror in my hospital room within 24 hours after having my babies (except with [daughter Carmen Gabriela, 4½] … I was too much of a nervous first time mama ) … I took this photo, Friday, the morning after this new baby was born,” wrote Hilaria.”
“The new mom of four got candid on Instagram Sunday, sharing a mirror selfie taken in her underwear less than a day after giving birth, plus snaps to her Instagram Story taken around the same time after delivering her two older sons.”
“Alec is also dad to 22-year-old daughter Ireland Baldwin, from his previous marriage to Kim Basinger.”
“8lbs 2oz  #wegotthis2018.”RELATED VIDEO: Hilaria Baldwin Shares Hilarious Snap After Family Photo with Santa Didn’t Turn Out as PlannedThe new addition joins siblings Leonardo Ángel Charles, 20 months, Rafael Thomas, 3 next month, and Carmen Gabriela, 4½.”
“He’s perfect!”
“The couple announced Romeo’s birth on Thursday, with the fitness instructor captioning a hospital photo of herself and Alec, 60, “He’s here!”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““We are happy to introduce you to Romeo Alejandro David Baldwin ” the 34-year-old wrote of herself and husband Alec Baldwin.”
“The newborn looks content in a long-sleeved white onesie, fast asleep as Hilaria’s left hand — still adorned with a hospital bracelet — supports his head.”


"I always put a picture in my ward mirror within 24 hours of giving birth (except with [daughter Carmen Gabriella, 4 and a half] I was so nervous when I was a mother for the first time I took this picture, Friday, the morning after the birth of this new baby, "Hillary wrote
"The new mothers of four met each other on instagram on Sunday, sharing a self portrait in a mirror taken in their underwear less than a day after childbirth, and a snapshot of instagram's story taken almost at the same time after giving birth to two older sons."
"Alec is also the father of his 22-year-old daughter, Ireland Baldwin, who was previously married to Kim Basinger."
“8lbs 2oz#wegotthis2018。” Related video: Hilaria Baldwin and Santa Claus's family photo were not finished as planned and shared a funny snapshot. The new members include brother and sister Leonardo Angel Charles, 20 months old, Raphael Thomas, 3 years old next month, Carmen Gabriella, 4.5 years old
"He's perfect!"
The couple announced Romeo's birth on Thursday, and the fitness coach subtitled her picture with Alec, 60, at the hospital
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"We are very happy to introduce you to Romeo Alejandro David Baldwin," the 34 year old wrote of himself and her husband Alec Baldwin
"The newborn looked satisfied in a white Long Sleeve Pajama, and Hilaria fell asleep with her left hand still wearing a hospital bracelet to support his head."



Number  1457
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Oh — she only watched her film that one time and will likely never see it again.”
“These days Clarkson is happily releasing music she wants to create and raising 1-year-old son Remington Alexander, and 3-year-old daughter River Rose with husband Brandon Blackstock.”
“"I think it was so heightened, so by the time everybody stopped talking about it we actually did date."”
““We were really good friends,” she says.”
“I was real hammered.”She also admits to briefly dating her co-star and Idol competition Justin Guarini, who placed second in the reality competition the year she won.”
““I literally ended up in a fountain soaked.”
“"I got very drunk at that premiere,” she confesses.”
“Clarkson filmed the movie in 28 days and admits she dreaded the film's premiere.”
“"I think that's what saved my career," she reasons.”
“Kelly Clarkson's 'Whole Lotta Woman' and 5 Others About Natural BeautyOnce she realized she couldn't get out of her role in the movie she begged Fuller to release her single before the movie dropped, and he did.”


"Oh, she only saw that movie once, and she may never see it again."
"Clarkson is happily releasing the music she wants to compose these days, and raising her 1-year-old son Remington Alexander, her 3-year-old daughter River rose and her husband Brandon Blackstock."
"I think it's exaggerated, so when people stop talking about it, we're really dating."
"We are really good friends," she said
She also admitted that she had a brief date with her partner and idol rival Justin Guarini, who ranked second in the reality show competition in the year she won
"I'm really in the fountain."
"I got drunk at the premiere," she admitted
"Clarkson made the film in 28 days and admitted that she was afraid of its premiere."
"I think that's the salvation of my career," she explained
Kelly Clarkson's "Lota woman" and five other films about natural beauty. When she realized that she couldn't get rid of her role in the film, she begged Fuller to release her single before the film stopped, and he did



Number  1458
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be sure to follow Zimbio (@zimbio) on Twitter and Instagram for all the latest 2018 TV Couples March Madness Challenge updates!”
“The full tournament schedule is listed below.”
“Scroll down and click through our interactive bracket to vote, and don’t forget to spread the word to help determine which of our 64 first-round teams will advance to Round 2.”
“So grab some snacks and start building your voting den because now’s the time to compete and represent your glorious fandoms, people!”
“Whatever the outcome may be, one thing’s for sure: This is going to be one hell of a competition!”
“Of course, there’s always room for a surprise upset, thanks to heavy-weight couples and first-time nominees Betty and Jughead from Riverdale and Waverly and Nicole from Wynonna Earp.”
“Will Supergirl’s Kara and Lena continue their impressive dominance, or will last year’s beloved runners-up, Emma and Regina from Once Upon a Time, finally get their moment in the spotlight?”
“Of course, 2018 is shaping up to be more competitive than ever, so anything can happen this time around!”
“The 100’s Clarke and Lexa snagged the much sought-after top spot last year for their second, consecutive win.”
“Well, that’s totally up to you.”


"Be sure to follow Zimbio (@ Zimbio) on Twitter and instagram to learn about all the latest TV couple March 2018 crazy challenge updates!"
"The full schedule of the competition is listed below."
"Scroll down and click on our interactive brackets to vote, and don't forget to spread information to help determine which of the 64 first round teams will make it to the second round."
"So, grab a snack and start building your voting room, because it's time to compete and represent your fans, everyone!"
"Whatever the outcome, one thing is for sure: it's going to be a hell of a competition!"
"Of course, there are always surprises, thanks to overweight couples and first-time nominees Betty and jahid from Riverdale, as well as Weasley and Nicole from winonaupe."
Will super girl Kara and Lina continue their impressive dominance, or will last year's favorite runners up Emma and Regina finally become the focus of attention
"Of course, 2018 is more competitive than ever, so anything can happen this time!"
"Top 100 players Clark and LexA won the second consecutive title last year and won the most sought after position at the top of the list."
"Well, it's up to you."



Number  1459
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Netflix, which previously has saved canceled shows including Longmire and The Killing, has not said how many episodes it has ordered for the new season.”
“The service has invested billions in developing new content, including movies, specials, dramas and comedies as it increasingly competes for eyeballs with traditional TV.”
“It seems nothing's ever really dead in the new world of peak TV.”
“Weeks after the show was canceled, Lucifer has been picked up for fourth season, but not by Fox, the network that axed the drama.”
“Instead, Netflix has acquired the series, produced by Warner Bros. Television, and it did so just in the nick of time.”
“The cast's options were set to expire at day's end, according to Deadline.”
“Lucifer, based on the DC Comics character of the fallen angel who moves to Los Angeles, bowed to so-so ratings when it debuted at midseason in 2015.”
“It managed to earn two renewals but saw viewership drop in its final year.”
“It averaged 3.3 million total viewers in according to Nielsen.”
“Though it added another 1.7 million with seven-day DVR playback, it ranked only 109th out of 169 programs on the Big Five this past season.”


"Previously, Netflix has saved canceled episodes including" Langmuir "and" kill ", but did not disclose how many episodes were ordered for the new season."
"The service has invested billions of dollars in the development of new content, including films, specials, plays and comedies, due to the growing competition for attention from traditional TV stations."
"In the new world of peak TV, it seems that nothing is really dead."
"A few weeks after the show was canceled, Lucifer has been selected for the fourth season, but not fox, which deleted the show."
"Instead, Netflix acquired Warner Bros.Television ）And the timing of the acquisition is just right. "
"According to the deadline, the actor's option will expire at the end of the day."
"Lucifer," adapted from Washington comics' character "the fallen angel who moved to Los Angeles," succumbed to average ratings at its mid season premiere in 2015
"It has successfully won two renewals, but its ratings dropped in the last year."
"According to Nielsen, the film has an average total audience rating of 3.3 million."
"Although it added another 1.7 million programs in seven days of DVR, it only ranked 109th out of 169 programs on five major TV stations last season."



Number  1460
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“While filling in as co-host for Kelly Ripa during LIVE With Kelly & Ryan on Tuesday, the Dancing With the Stars judge, who's engaged to actor Robb Derringer, adorably asked her mother, Patty, to be her matron of honor.”
“WATCH: Carrie Ann Inaba Pays Tribute to 'My Favorite Person' Florence Henderson on 'Dancing With the Stars' SetThe surprise all went down when the bride-to-be started explaining to Ryan Seacrest that she was still in the process of choosing her bridal party.”
“"It's really hard because you have your O.G.”
“...friends, like I have my friends from Hawaii, then I have my friends from L.A., and then I have my family friends, and then I have my mom," she said.”
“Patty was seated in the audience for the taping and was seemingly shocked when her daughter started directing attention to her seat.”
“"And I wanted to ask, Mom, would you be my matron of honor?"”
“Carrie Ann asked, as Patty became teary-eyed.”
“"Is that a 'yes'?"”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"In Tuesday's live broadcast with Kelly and Ryan, the star dancing judge was engaged to actor rob delinger, who lovingly invited her mother Patty to be her bridesmaid when she was co host of Kelly Ripa."
"Watch: in dancing with the stars, Carrie Ann Inaba pays homage to my favorite, Florence Henderson. When the bride to be began to explain to Ryan Seacrest that she was still choosing the bridal party, all the surprises were shattered. "
"It's really hard because you have your ECG."
"Friends, like I have friends in Hawaii, friends in Los Angeles, and my family friends, and my mom," she said
"Patty sat in the audience listening to the recording and seemed shocked when her daughter began to turn her attention to her seat."
"I want to ask, mom, would you like to be my Bridesmaid?"
"Asked Carrie ANN, with Patty's tears in her eyes."
"Is that" yes "



Number  1461
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lawyers for the Kardashians have said the family is not responsible for Rob & Chyna's cancellation, saying that production could not continue after Chyna obtained a restraining order against Rob last summer.”
“...cancelled their show, saying that the circumstances were too mercurial.”
“In new court documents obtained by DailyMail.com, Kris Jenner, Rob and Kim Kardashian - who are named as defendants in the suit - have dismissed the reality star's claims as 'bald conclusions that have no factual support.'”
“Chyna, real name Angela Renee White, first filed the suit in October, blaming the family for cancellation of her reality show, which was not renewed for a second season after 2016.”
“She claimed E!”
“...and production team, as well as herself and Rob, were all on board and ready to shoot a second season before the show was axed.”
“Chyna also claimed the Kardashians defamed her and have been using their 'fame, wealth, and power' to take her down.'”
“Blac Chyna real name Angela Renee White first filed the suit in October blaming the family for cancellation of her reality show which was not renewed for a second season after 2016 The 29 year old who is the mother of Rob s daughter Dream accused the family of throwing...”
“...their weight around to hamper her career after her split with Rob But in a reply memorandum filed on January 10 the Kardashians point out that Chyna s own statements affirm that plans for the production the show were never set in stone...”
“'Plaintiff [Blac Chyna] affirmatively alleges...that on "February 8, 2017, the E!”


"The lawyers for the kardashians said that the kardashians were not responsible for the cancellation of rob and chener's engagement, and said that chener's engagement could not be continued after he was given a restraining order against rob last summer."
“…… They canceled their performance, saying that the situation was too volatile. "
"In new documents obtained by the court, the daily mail, Chris Jenner, rob and Kim kardashan - who were named defendants in the lawsuit - dismissed the reality TV star's claim that it was' a bald conclusion without factual basis'
"Gina, whose real name is Angela Renee white, filed her first lawsuit in October, accusing her family of canceling her reality show and not continuing the second season after 2016."
"She claims to be gay!"
“…… And the production team, as well as herself and rob, are on board and ready to shoot the second season before the show is cut off. "
"Gina also claimed that the Kardashian family slandered her and had been using their 'fame and power' to bring her down."
"Blac Chyna, whose real name is Angela Renee white, filed her first lawsuit in October, accusing the family of canceling her reality show. After 2016, the second season of the show was not continued. The 29 year old mother of Rob's daughter dream accused the family of throwing... "
“…… After she and rob broke up, their pressure hindered her career, but in a reply memorandum submitted on January 10, Kardashian pointed out that Zina's own statement confirmed that the production plan of the play had never been the same... "
"The plaintiff [blac Chyna] made it clear that February 8, 2017, e! "



Number  1462
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After you & # 39; I've stopped laughing at all these kids, make sure you vote down for your KoKo favorite quote.”
“In fact, during the 1In honor of Khloe's Bday, we witness some of the birthday girl's most heated quotes in KUWTK story, so get ready to laugh as we celebrate Khlo-Money and her 34 years on this planet.”
“She calls it as it is, does not shy away from unpleasant situations and has epic backing for everything her family or friends say to her.”
“Over the years, Khloe has proved that she is loud, funny and just the right amount crazy.”
“...wild days of the youngest Kardashian sister...”
“The reality star became mother this year Revenge Body became her second reality TV baby and the whole family took over Family Feud which frankly was among the highlights of our year 19659002 While the new mother and her family settle in LA we can not help but remember the...”
“Khlo-money is officially 34 years old and the boy has had her one year.”
“It's Khloe Kardashian's birthday, which means it's time to party!”


"When you and I stop laughing at these children, be sure to put down your favorite sentence."
"In fact, as we celebrate Khloe's birthday, we've witnessed some of the most heated words of the birthday girl in the kuwtk story, so as we celebrate khlo money and her 34 years on the planet, be ready to laugh."
"She calls her first name, never avoids unpleasant situations, and has epic support for everything her family or friends say to her."
"Over the years, Khloe has proved that she is loud, funny, and moderately crazy."
“… The crazy days of Kardashian's sister... "
"This reality TV star became a mother this year, and her revenge became her second reality TV baby. The whole family took over the family's enmity. Frankly speaking, this was one of the highlights of our 1965-9002. When the new mother and her family settled in Los Angeles, we couldn't help thinking of..."
"Khlo money is 34 years old and the boy gave birth to her for a year."
"Today is Kardashian's birthday, which means it's time to have a party!"



Number  1463
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was a joke.””
“And we all laughed about it.”
“And I wanted to protect the graze from the sun and said, ‘Does anyone have a T-shirt?’ And one of her friends said, ‘I’ve got this.”
“...and I slipped and hurt my back...”
“The English film producer finally opened up about the infamous tank in a February 2017 interview with GQ where he told the mag it was a joke among friends He added The truth is it was the fourth of July and a public holiday and we were playing a game...”
“The Thor star sported an “I [Heart] T.S.” tank top while the former couple frolicked on the beach, and much to his chagrin, the PDA moment continued to haunt Hiddleston for months following his high-profile split from the blonde beauty in September 2016.”
“...most memorable...”
“The 37 year old Avengers Infinity War actor made headlines in 2016 during his three month whirlwind romance with the 28 year old pop star when the two were spotted at Swift s star studded fourth of July party in Rhode Island but it was what he wore that was...”
“Te amo muito.”Though Brady’s fans were quick to comment their support for the way Brady honored his love, Hiddleston’s sign of affection by wearing a tank top for former fling Taylor Swift didn’t get the same reaction.”
““Feliz dia dos namorados!”


"It's a joke."
"We all laughed."
"I want to protect the herders from the sun and say, 'does anyone have a T-shirt? One of her friends said, "I have this."
“…… I slipped and hurt my back... "
"The British filmmaker finally made public the infamous tank in an interview with GQ in February 2017. He told the magazine that it was a joke between friends. He added that the fact is that today is July 4, a public holiday, and we are playing games..."
"The Raytheon star is wearing an" I (heart) T.S. "vest, while the former couple are playing on the beach. To his great chagrin, after his high-profile breakup with blondes in September 2016, the PDA moment continues to haunt sidleston for several months."
“… The most unforgettable... "
"The 37 year old Avenger Infinite War actor made the headlines in a three-month whirlwind romance with the 28 year old pop star in 2016 when they were found at Swift's starry July 4 Party in Rhode Island, but he was wearing..."
Although Brady's fans were quick to comment on their support for Brady's way of expressing their love, sidleston's move to put on a vest for the former man Taylor Swift didn't get the same response
"Feliz dia DOS namorados!"



Number  1464
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And at least in part, we have Ellen — and Ellen — to thank.”
“An argument, by the way, generally made by heterosexuals who have no idea of how often they assert their own sexuality on a daily basis in the pictures on their desks, the conversations they have about their spouses or their children, and the way they interact.”
“As her anniversary approaches, there is some danger in overstating the impact of DeGeneres’ dual public announcement: literally on an April 14, 1997 Time cover emblazoned with the words “Yep, I’m Gay,” and figuratively two weeks later, in the April 30, 1997 "Puppy Episode" of her ABC sitcom Ellen.”
“Culture and history seldom pivot on one moment alone, and almost never do so on the back of a single TV episode — even one watched by 36 million people.”
“Yet despite those caveats, there’s little doubt that DeGeneres’ decision to publicly embrace her homosexuality — and, with ABC’s reluctant but eventual cooperation, to extend that embrace to her fictional character — was a watershed in how gay men and women are treated on TV.”
“And over time, the lessons we learn from TV seep into real life.”
“Granted, Ellen Morgan was not the first gay character to enter our homes through our TV sets.”
“Viewers had already seen Billy Crystal's star-making performance in the 1977 sitcom Soap as the long-suffering Jodie Dallas, though he had more on-air relationships with women than with men.”
“And more than a year before Ellen’s coming-out declaration, NBC's Friends had aired "The One with the Lesbian Wedding" of Susan and Carol — transforming a couple who had initially served as a reflected joke on Ross into people in their own right.”
“Still for the most part gay men and women were as invisible on TV as they were in movies making occasional appearances as characters whose tragic disgrace was linked to a hinted at love that dare not speak its name The most you d find were asexual camp twists on...”


"At least in a way, we want to thank Alan and Alan."
"By the way, this kind of argument is usually raised by heterosexuals, who don't know their photos on their desks, their conversations about their spouses or children, and how often they insist on their sexual orientation in the way they interact."
"As her anniversary approaches, it's dangerous to exaggerate the impact of DeGeneres's double public statements: literally on the cover of time magazine on April 14, 1997, with the words" yes, I'm gay ", figuratively two weeks later, in the" dog episode "of ABC sitcom Allen on April 30, 1997."
"Culture and history rarely focus on one moment, and almost never on one moment behind an episode - even an episode watched by 36 million people."
"However, despite these warnings, there is no doubt that DeGeneres' decision to publicly embrace her homosexuality - and its unwillingness with ABC, but the ultimate collaboration to extend this embrace to her fictional characters - is a watershed in how to treat gays and lesbians on TV."
"As time goes on, the lessons we learned from TV have penetrated into real life."
"Of course, Alan Morgan is not the first gay character to enter our family through television."
Viewers have seen Billy Crystal play the long suffering Jodie Dallas in the 1977 sitcom soap opera, even though he has more relationships with women than with men on TV
More than a year before Allen's announcement, friends on NBC aired Susan and Carol's "lesbian wedding," turning a couple who initially joked with rose into their own
"In most cases, gays and lesbians are invisible on TV as they are in movies. They occasionally appear in some characters whose tragic humiliation is associated with a suggestive love that does not dare to name itself - the most you can find is the distortion of the asexual camp..."



Number  1465
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Watch below:Beyonce, Nicole Richie & More, Inside Jessica Alba's Star-Studded Birthday Bash This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“In April, her Prince vs. Michael Jackson-themed birthday bash was attended by Beyonce, Kelly Rowland, Nicole Richie and more.”
“PICS: Pregnant Jessica Alba Wraps Up 'Epic' Family Vacation in Hawaii With Sweet MessageOf course, Alba and her husband, Cash Warren, have plenty of celebrity friends.”
“Alba was supported by her famous pals, including Rachel Zoe and Molly Sims.”
“3's NameIn happier news, the 36-year-old actress -- who's currently pregnant with her third child -- stunned with her daughters at an event for a new diaper collaboration between her The Honest Company and fashion brand The Great on Saturday.”
“NEWS: Jessica Alba Reveals 'Unusual' Requirements for Baby No.”
“RIP Bowie."”
“Bowmeister was the sweetest love bug.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Look at the picture below: Beyonce, Nicole Richie & more, at Jessica Alba's starry birthday party, this video is not available because we can't load sponsor information."
In April this year, Beyonce, Kelly Rowland, Nicole Ritchie and others attended her prince and Michael Jackson themed birthday party
"Picture: pregnant Jessica Alba ends her epic family vacation in Hawaii with a sweet message. Of course, alba and her husband, Cash Warren, have a lot of celebrity friends
Alba has the support of her famous friends, including Rachel Zoe and Molly Simms
The 36 year old actress, who is pregnant with her third child, and her daughters were stunned at an event on Saturday as she is a new diaper collaboration between an honest company and the fashion brand the great
"News: Jessica Alba revealed that the request for baby number one is" unusual. "
"Rip Bowie."
"Baumeister is the loveliest love bug."



Number  1466
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
““Why does this always happen?”
“Ashley Iaconetti, who began her Bachelor tenure on Chris Soules’ season and went on to appear on two seasons of Bachelor in Paradise, is most known for crying on the show after getting rejected.”
“When entering The Bachelor Winter Games house, the 29-year-old journalist had her eye on Canadian Bachelor star Kevin Wendt.”
““I’ve made my Bachelor Games claim right now.”
“Kevin, we’re going out on a date,” Ashley tells the camera in Us Weekly’s exclusive sneak peek of the Monday, February 13, premiere.”
““You guys know me.”
“I zone in on one person, and I’m not looking anywhere else.”Unfortunately, he was looking elsewhere.”
“He chooses Bibiana Juliana, a contestant from Arie Luyendyk Jr.’s season, for his date, and she agrees.”
“With that, Ashley cannot contain her emotions, breaking down in tears in an interview.”


"Wait a minute."
"Why is it always like this?"
"Ashley aconetti started her single life in this season of Chris sules and appeared in two seasons of Bachelor in heaven. She is best known for crying on the show after she was rejected."
"When entering the bachelor Winter Games home, the 29 year old reporter has his eye on Canadian bachelor star Kevin winter."
"I've applied for the singles game now."
"Kevin, we're going out on a date," Ashley told the camera during an exclusive peek at the US weekly premiere on Monday, February 13
"You know me."
"I'm looking at a man, I'm not looking anywhere else." Unfortunately, he was looking elsewhere
"He chose Bibiana Juliana as his date, and she agreed." Bibbianna Juliana is a contestant for this season of Arie luyendyk Jr
"With that, Ashley couldn't control his emotions and burst into tears in an interview."



Number  1467
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:RELATED: Kaley Cuoco Cries as She Recites Emotional Wedding Vows to Karl Cook: WatchPICS: Kaley Cuoco Marries Karl Cook: See Her Gorgeous Wedding LookWATCH: Kaley Cuoco Celebrates Pink-Themed Bachelorette Party With Lots of Dancing to Britney Spears and BeyonceRelated Gallery...”
“Rauch wrote on a photo of Cuoco and Cook sharing a kiss in a beautifully decorated horse stable.”
“The actor took to Instagram to share several pics from Cuoco's wedding to Karl Cook on Saturday, posting sweet tributes to his on-screen wife and real-life ex-girlfriend.”
“Cuoco and Galecki dated for about two years from 2007-2009, shortly after sparking their on-screen romance on Big Bang Theory, but have remained on good terms since splitting.”
“"Couldn’t be happier for my fake wife @normancookand @mrtankcook whose words brought us all to tears last night," Galecki captioned a sweet black-and-white pic of he and Cuoco sharing a smile on her big day.”
“"So much love for you both."”
“The actor also posted a pic with both Cuoco and Cook -- or "KC Squared" as the actress adorably referred to her new husband in one of her elated posts about their wedding day -- writing, "Deepest congrats to the newlyweds.”
“Love you both so much @normancook & @mrtankcook So moved by tonight.”
“❤️."”
“Of course, Galecki wasn't the only Big Bang Theory star present to celebrate Cuoco's big day.”


"Embedded code restart" content: related: kaley cuoco recites touching wedding vows to Karl cook while crying: look at the picture: kaley cuoco marries Karl Cook: look at her gorgeous wedding Watch: kaley cuoco celebrates the pink themed bachelor party with Britney Spears and Beyonce Reiter gallery... "
"Rauh wrote in a photo that Kuko and cook were kissing in a beautifully decorated stable."
"The actor shared on instagram several photos of Kuko's wedding to Carl cook on Saturday, paying a sweet tribute to his on-screen wife and real-life ex girlfriend."
Kuko and galky dated for about two years from 2007 to 2009, shortly after the big bang theory triggered their on-screen romance, but they have maintained a good relationship since their breakup
"What my fake wives @ normancook and @ tankcook said last night brought tears to our eyes. It's so happy," galecki wrote in a black-and-white photo of him and cuoco sharing a smile on her important day
"I love you so much."
The actor also posted a picture of Kuco and cook - or "KC squared," because the actress lovingly mentioned her new husband in a post about their jubilant wedding day - and wrote, "congratulations to the newlyweds."
"I love you both very much@ normancook&@tankcook Sir, I'm so moved tonight. "
“ ❤️ ."”
"Of course, galecki is not the only big bang theory star present to celebrate the day of cuckoo."



Number  1468
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“According to Beyoncé’s Instagram, the names are Rumi and Sir Carter, two handles that are definitely unique enough to keep company with the likes of Blue Ivy.”
“Beyoncé announced that she and Jay Z would be expecting not one, but two new additions to the family in February of this year with an artistic Instagram photo of herself clad in a veil and an exposed baby bump that sent the Internet into a tizzy.”
““We would like to share our love and happiness.”
“We have been blessed two times over,” the “Lemonade” singer captioned the photo.”
“Beyoncé shared a series of photos throughout her pregnancy, many who featured their 5-year-old daughter, Blue Ivy Carter.”
“The twins’ birth was one of the most widely anticipated events of 2017, with Beyoncé’s avant garde Instagram pregnancy announcement breaking a Guinness World Record for most liked photo on Instagram.”
“The power couple, who married in 2008, welcomed Blue – who is now five – on January 7, 2012.”
“See the name announcement in all its glory below.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
Please enter a valid email address
"According to Beyonce's instagram, which is named rummy and Sir Carter, these two handles are absolutely unique enough to be compatible with plants such as blue ivy."
"Beyonce announced that what she and jay z are looking forward to is not one, but two new family members added in February this year. A veiled art photo of her on instagram and an exposed baby lump have thrown the Internet into chaos."
"We are willing to share our love and happiness."
"We've been blessed twice," the lemonade singer wrote in the title of the photo
"Beyonce shared a series of photos during her pregnancy, many of which were photos of their five-year-old daughter, Ivy Carter."
"The birth of the twins is one of the most anticipated events in 2017, and Beyonce's avant-garde instagram pregnancy announcement broke the Guinness world record for the most popular photo on instagram."
"The power couple got married in 2008, and on January 7, 2012, they ushered in blue, now five years old."
"Please see the name announcement below."



Number  1469
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They have a son Tennessee, who turns 5 later this month.”
“They split three years later and Witherspoon went on to marry talent agent Jim Toth in 2011.”
““Happy 18th Birthday to my sweet girl @avaphillippe!” the Legally Blonde actress, 41, captioned a throwback pic with her look-alike daughter.”
““Your kindness, grace, intelligence and humor never cease to amaze me.”
“I love you and your HUGE [heart] and I feel so lucky that I get to be your mom.”
“#proudmom #18.”Happy 18th Birthday to my sweet girl @avaphillippe !”
“?Your kindness, grace, intelligence and humor never cease to amaze me.”
“I love you and your HUGE ❤️ and I feel so lucky that I get to be your mom.”
“?#proudmom #18 A post shared by Reese Witherspoon (@reesewitherspoon) on Sep 9, 2017 at 10:47am PDT#18 A post shared by Reese Witherspoon (@reesewitherspoon) on Sep 9, 2017 at 11:28am PDTPhillippe, 42, also shared a series of pics of his daughter on Instagram.”
““Happy birthday, punk,” the Shooter star wrote.”


"They have a son, Tennessee, who turns five later this month."
"They broke up three years later, and Witherspoon married genius agent Jim Toth in 2011."
"Happy 18th birthday to my lovely daughter @ avaphillippe! The 41 year old as like as two peas in a picture, she added a title to the picture.
"I'm amazed by your kindness, grace, wisdom and humor."
"I love you and your big heart, and I feel very lucky to be your mother."
"Proud mother, 18 years old." Happy 18th birthday to my lovely daughter @ avaphillippe
"Your kindness, grace, wisdom and humor will always surprise me."
"I love you and your great family ❤️  I'm lucky to be your mother. "
"? production? 18 Reese Witherspoon (@ Reese Witherspoon) at 10:47 am on September 9, 2017? 18 Reese Witherspoon (@ Reese Witherspoon) at 11:28 am on September 9, 2017? Phillippe, 42, also shared a series of photos of his daughter on instagram."
"Happy Birthday punk," the shooting star wrote



Number  1470
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit www.latingrammy.com/en/press.”
“The media credentialing process to cover the 19th Annual Latin GRAMMY Awards is open.”
“Winners will be revealed on November 15, 2018, during the 19th Annual Latin GRAMMY Awards' Premiere and telecast ceremonies in Las Vegas.”
“Voting members will begin the final round of online voting on September 28, 2018.”
“The 2018 nominees were selected from nearly 14,000 submissions across 49 categories during the eligibility period (June 1, 2017 through May 31, 2018).”
“The Latin GRAMMY Awards are voted on by The Latin Recording Academy's international membership body of music makers, who represent all genres and creative disciplines, including recording artists, songwriters, musicians, producers, and mixing and studio engineers.”
“), Monsieur Periné (Encanto Tropical), and Rozalén (Cuando El Río Suena...).”
“2), Luis Miguel (¡México Por Siempre!”
“Al Folclore Latinoamericano En Manos De Los Macorinos vol...”
“The Album Of The Year list is composed of a diverse group of established and new artists genres and eclectic collaborations such as Pablo Alborán Prometo J Balvin Vibras Chico Buarque Caravanas Jorge Drexler Salvavidas de Hielo El David Aguilar Siguiente Kany García Soy Yo Natalia Lafourcade Musas Un Homenaje...”


"Please visit www.latingrammy.com/en/press 。”
"The media certification process for reporting the 19th Latin Grammy Awards has begun."
"The winners will be announced at the premiere of the 19th Latin Grammy Awards in Las Vegas on November 15, 2018 and at a TV broadcast ceremony."
"Voting members will start the last round of online voting on September 28, 2018."
"The 2018 nominees were selected from nearly 14000 submissions in 49 categories during the eligibility period (June 1, 2017 to May 31, 2018)."
"The Latin Grammy Awards were voted by the international group of music producers of the Latin Conservatory of music, representing all music genres and creative disciplines, including record artists, songwriters, musicians, producers, mixing and studio engineers."
"Mr. Palin (tropical Encanto) and Mr. rozalen (Suena Islands...)."
"2) Louis Miguel
"Latin American Art Exhibition Manos de Los marcorinos No Volume
"The album of the year list is created by a collaboration with new artist genres and Eclectics such as prometo J Baldwin vibras Buarque caravanas hall hedrex salvavidas de hielo El David Aguilar Siguiente Kany Garc í a so yo Natalia lafourcade musas UN homenaje..."



Number  1471
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Baldwin made Talk Radio with the director and does not mince words about how much he disliked the 1988 experience: “Stone’s ‘technique’ was to generate as much tension on the set as he believed the film required.”
“...or Oliver Stone.”
“Both have daddy issues, trying to live up to what they imagine are the expectations of their larger-than-life fathers (Fred Trump the developer, Alex Baldwin, Jr. the beloved history teacher).”
“Both hold grudges for a long time (see below about Ford and ex-wife Basinger as evidence).”
“Both are easy to anger.”
“The people they hate, they really hate.”
“The people they love, they really love.”
“Both are men of great appetites (figuratively speaking).”
“But in other ways, ways that I suspect helps Baldwin play Trump, they are similar.”
“...left for daughter Ireland...”


Baldwin had a radio talk with the director and talked about how much he didn't like the experience of 1988: "stone's" technique "is to create the tension he thinks the film needs on the set."
"Or Oliver Stone."
"Both have problems with their fathers, trying to live up to the expectations of their imagined parents (developer Fred trump, beloved history teacher Alex Baldwin)."
"Both men held grudges for a long time (see the following evidence for Ford and his ex-wife Basinger)
"Both are prone to anger."
"People they hate, they really hate."
"The people they love, they do."
"Both of them have a lot of appetite (figuratively)
"But in other ways, I doubt the way to help Baldwin play trump, they are similar."
“… To Ireland... "



Number  1472
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Boneta has previous appearances on American television screens through Beverly Hills 90210 and Pretty Little Liars.”
“Under 21 list this year...”
“The singer is a Mexican American with other credits as an actress in Power Rangers multi platinum song Shower and a guest star spot in FOX Emmy winning series Empire her achievements earning her a spot on Billboard s 21”
“1 on the Billboard Latin charts with "Can't Get Enough" featuring Pitbull, who coincidentally will become the first-ever recipient of the Latin AMA Dick Clark Achievement Award.”
“Becky G is 20 years old and has already earned her first No.”
“The awards show will begin at 8 p.m. EST live from the Dolby Theater in Hollywood.”
“Becky G will host Telemundo's third annual Latin American Music Awards (Latin AMAs) alongside Diego Boneta on Oct. 26.”


"Bonetta has appeared on American TV through Beverly Hills 90210 and little liar."
"This year's Under-21 list..."
"The singer, a Mexican American, was an actress at the multi platinum concert of the electric Ranger and a guest star in the fox Emmy winning series empire. Her achievements earned her a place in billboard Episode 21."
Top of the billboard Latin list is Peter bull, who plays "not enough." coincidentally, Peter bull will become the first person ever to win the Latin achievement award
"Becky G is 20 years old and has won the first No
"The awards ceremony will be broadcast live at 8 p.m. EST at the Dolby theater in Hollywood."
"Becky g will host telemundo's third annual Latin American Music Awards with Diego bonetta on October 26."



Number  1473
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“...out that of all people it was her best friend Hope Katharine Isabelle who leaked her nude photos to the press...”
“On Sunday, Megan decided that she really needs to move in with Kyle West (Josh Henderson) after having another stalker break into his home.”
“Kyle gladly welcomes Megan and even opts to upgrade the security measures at his place.”
“However, Megan does not approve of the idea of having security cameras everywhere, not after how her nude photos were leaked to the media just when she had the chance to jumpstart her acting career.”
“The night before Megan's move, she decided to invite over her best friends Hope and Shaun (Carra Patterson) for a sleepover and to keep her company while she packs up the stuff she will bring with her to Kyle's home.”
“Soon, things get tense when Hope and Shaun find themselves in a heated argument, eventually leading to the revelation of Hope's betrayal.”
“SubmitFree CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”


Submit
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"
“…… Among all the people, it's her best friend who hopes that Katherine Isabel divulges her nude photos to the media... "
"On Sunday, Megan decided that she really needed to move to Kyle West (Josh Henderson) after another stalker broke into his home."
"Kyle is happy to welcome Megan and even choose to upgrade the security measures in his place."
"However, Megan doesn't approve of the idea that there are security cameras everywhere, especially after her nude photos were leaked to the media when she had a chance to start her acting career."
"The night before Megan moves, she decides to invite her good friend hope and Sean (Carla Patterson) to spend the night together and help her pack up the things she took with her to Kyle's house."
"Soon, when hope and Sean find themselves in a fierce quarrel, things become tense, which eventually leads to the disclosure of hope's betrayal."
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get daily planned headlines and special offers!"



Number  1474
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The couple, who started dating in 2015, had attended a First Communion party for fellow former RHONJ star Teresa Giudice’s daughter, Audriana, 7, earlier that night.”
“Cantin was able to free himself and call police, the release states.”
“...her millionaire boyfriend were beaten and bound during a home invasion at their New Jersey townhouse PEOPLE confirms...”
““Dina and David are obviously shaken up from the traumatic and violent home invasion and robbery,” their attorney, Andrew B. Brettler, tells PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Manzo, 45, and David Cantin, 37, returned home just before 11 p.m. Saturday to the townhouse they share in Holmdel and found two assailants inside, who rushed at them as they opened the door, according to the Monmouth County Prosecutor’s Office.”
“One of the assailants hit Cantin several times with a baseball bat, while the other punched Manzo “multiple times,” according to a release from the prosecutor’s office.”
“Image zoom From left: Dina Manzo and David Cantin.”
“Image zoom From left: David Cantin and Dina Manzo.”
“| Credit: Dina Manzo/InstagramThe thieves tied up the couple before making off with personal belongings such as cash and jewelry, the release states.”


"The couple started dating in 2015, and earlier that night they attended the first communion Party of audiana, the 7-year-old daughter of former rhonj star Teresa Giudice."
"Canting has to release himself and call the police. Release status."
“… Her millionaire boyfriend was beaten and tied up in a burglary in New Jersey, and people confirmed that
"Dina and David are clearly shaken from trauma and violence, family invasion and robbery," their lawyer, Andrew bretler, told the people
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Manzo, 45, and David canting, 37, came home before 11 p.m. Saturday to their townhouse in homdale and found two attackers inside, according to the montmouth county prosecutor's office. They rushed towards them as they opened the door
"According to the prosecutor's office, one of the attackers hit canting with a baseball bat several times, and the other hit Manzo" many times. "
"Image zooming from left to right: Dina Manzo and David canting."
"Image zooming from left to right: David canting and Dina Manzo."
Credit: according to news released by Dina Manzo / instagram, thieves tied up the couple and then fled with personal belongings such as cash and jewelry



Number  1475
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The outfits will be available for bidding starting January 19, here, with the auction running through January 26.”
“The black dresses and tuxedos were donated by the designers, who include Versace, Vera Wang, Armani, Balenciaga, Gucci, Prada, and many others, and all money raised will be donated to the Time's Up legal defense fund.”
““Each time they’ve stepped up they’ve inspired more attorneys to join the Time's Up Legal Defense Fund and more individuals to contribute."”
“...of Time s Up s legal defense fund...”
“Tracee Ellis Ross in Marc Jacobs We re thrilled that actors and others in the entertainment industry are leading in this extraordinary way to end the scourge of workplace sexual harassment said Fatima Goss Graves the President and CEO of the National Women s Law Center which is in charge...”
“The initiative was announced Wednesday by Time's Up, eBay, and Condé Nast—Glamour's parent company—who are teaming up to run the auction taking place this Friday.”
“Now, they're putting those red carpet outfits up for auction to benefit the movement's legal defense fund.”
“Up...”
“Earlier this month stars including Reese Witherspoon Tracee Ellis Ross Mandy Moore Nicole Kidman and Laura Dern wore all black to the 2018 Golden Globes in a show of solidarity with survivors of sexual harassment and assault as well as to raise awareness about anti workplace harassment initiative Time s...”


"The costumes will start bidding here on January 19, and the auction will last until January 26."
"These black dresses and tuxedos are donated by designers, including Versace, Wang Weiwei, Armani, barista, Gucci, Prada and many others. All the money raised will go to the Legal Defense Fund of time."
"Every time they make progress, they will encourage more lawyers to join the progressive Legal Defense Fund of the times, and they will also encourage more individual donations."
“… Time's Legal Defense Fund... "
"Tracee Ellis Ross said in Marc Jacobs that we are very happy that actors and others in the entertainment industry have done this extraordinary way to end the scourge of sexual harassment in the workplace," said Fatima Goss graves, President and CEO of the National Women's Law Center, which is responsible for
"The plan was announced on Wednesday by the parent companies of time, eBay and cond é Nast glamour, who will work together to manage the auction on Friday."
"Now, they're auctioning off these red carpet clothes in favor of the campaign's Legal Defense Fund."
"Up..."
"Earlier this month, stars including Reese Witherspoon, Tracy Ellis rose Mandy Moore, Nicole Kidman and Laura Dean wore all black at the 2018 Golden Globe awards to show their support for survivors of sexual harassment and sexual assault and to raise awareness of the anti workplace harassment initiative..."



Number  1476
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m not ever trying to put my hands on any female.”Rihanna has not yet publicly responded to Brown’s version of events.”
“...put makeup on...”
““I felt like a f**king monster,” the 28-year-old singer said in the documentary Chris Brown: Welcome To My Life.”
“Brown said the fight with Rihanna started when she became jealous that his ex showed up at a pre-Grammys party they attended.”
““She starts going off, she throws the phone, ‘I hate you!’, whatever, whatever, she starts hitting me, we’re in a little Lamborghini, you know she’s fighting me,” Brown claimed.”
““Like I remember she tried to kick me, just like her beating s**t, but then I really hit her.”
“With a closed fist like I punched her and it busted her lip and when I saw it I was in shock I was f k why did I hit her like that Brown recalled So from there she s...”
“...spitting blood in my face it raised me even more...”
“It’s a real fight in the car, and we driving in the street.”
““She grabbed my nuts.”


"I've never tried to put my hand on any woman." Rihanna has yet to respond publicly to Brown's views on the incident
“… Make up... "
"I feel like a monster," the 28 year old singer said in the documentary welcome to my life
"Brown said that when Rihanna was jealous of his ex girlfriend showing up at the Grammy Awards they attended, she began to quarrel with Rihanna."
"She started to get angry. She threw the phone away and said," I hate you! "Anyway, anyway, she started hitting me, we were in a little Lamborghini, you know she was fighting with me," Brown claimed
"I remember she wanted to kick me like she hit me, but then I really hit her."
"I clenched my fist and hit her, broke her lips, when I saw it, I was shocked, I didn't understand why I hit her, as brown recalled, so she came from there..."
“… Spit blood on my face, make me higher... "
"It's a fight in the car. We drive in the street."
"She's got my nuts."



Number  1477
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Jessica Graf and Cody NicksonGetty ImagesThe “Big Brother” alumni were an adorable and stylish couple on the red carpet with Nickson cradling Graf’s baby bump.”
“News host glittered in this silvery minidress inspired by a double-breasted suit jacket.”
“Glitter, sequins and feathers ruled the red carpet as stars attended the 2018 People’s Choice Awards in Santa Monica, California.”
“Stars including Chrissy Teigen, Victoria Beckham and Giuliana Rancic looked dazzling as they arrived at the awards ceremony, which honored achievement in film, TV, music, social media and other areas of pop culture.”
“Here are some of the style highlights from the evening.”
“Victoria BeckhamWireImageThe designer was honored with a People’s Choice fashion icon award, and she certainly dressed for the occasion with this sleek, white pantsuit paired with black pumps.”
“Chrissy TeigenGetty ImagesThe social media superstar looked stunning in a sequined, beaded minidress, which she paired with sparkly heels.”
“Melissa McCarthyGetty ImagesThe actress looked radiant in a black pantsuit layered with a patterned, wide-sleeved coat.”
“Scarlett JohanssonGetty ImagesThe actress went for a rocker-chic vibe with high-waisted trousers, a thick leather belt, a corset-like top and slicked back hair.”
“Allison JanneyGetty ImagesThe actress looked chic as ever in a white ensemble that looked like a gown, but was actually a flowing jumpsuit.”


"Photos of Jessica Graf and Cody nixongetti" the alumni of big brother are a lovely and fashionable couple on the red carpet, Nixon holding Graf's lump. "
"Inspired by the double breasted suit jacket, the newscaster is shining in this silver miniskirt."
Stars shine sequins, sequins and feathers on the red carpet at the 2018 people's Choice Awards ceremony in Santa Monica, California
"The stars, including Chris tegan, Victoria Beckham and Juliana ranch, were all dazzling when they came to the ceremony. The awards ceremony recognized achievements in film, television, music, social media and other areas of popular culture. "
"Here are some of the highlights of the evening."
"Designer Victoria Beckham has won the people's choice of fashion icon award. She is wearing these fashionable white trousers and black high heels for this occasion, of course."
Chrissy teigengetty, the social media superstar, looks fabulous in a sequined, pearlescent miniskirt with shiny high heels
Melissa McCarthy, the actress looks radiant in black jumpsuits and a patterned wide sleeve coat
"The image of Scarlett johansongetti, the actress's pursuit of rock 'n' roll style, high waisted trousers, thick belts, corset like top and smooth back hair."
The image of Alison janigetti, the actress in a white suit, looks like a robe, but is actually a flowing jumpsuit, looks as chic as ever



Number  1478
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You’re warned of at least a few revival spoilers in the interim, but did your favorites make the list?”
“As such, we’re not counting reboots or re-imaginings, or TV series continuations of famous films (sorry, Wet Hot American Summer).”
“For purposes of this inalienable ranking, we’ve laid out a few ground rules: A TV revival needn’t keep its original series’ name, but at least a majority of characters (or stars) and premise.”
“...ranked examples of the last decade or so to prove it.”
“The TV industry’s gone revival-crazy, and we’ve got twenty (!)”
“These are just some of TV’s best and brightest making unexpected returns to the airwaves decades after the fact, to say nothing of renewed revivals like Will & Grace, Arrested Development and more.”
“The Twilight Zone.”
“Roseanne.”
“Murphy Brown.”


"In the meantime, at least a few revival spoilers have warned you, but are there any on your favorite list?"
"So we don't count rebooting or reimagining, or TV series of famous movies (sorry, hot and humid American summer)."
"For this indivisible ranking, we have made some basic rules: the revival of a TV series does not need to retain its original serial name, but at least most of the characters (or stars) and premises."
"Rank the examples of the past decade or so to prove that."
"The TV industry is crazy. We have 20 (!)"
"These are one of the best and brightest shows in television, and they unexpectedly returned to the broadcasting industry a few decades later, not to mention new revivals like will & grace and stagnation."
"Twilight zone."
"Roxanne."
"Murphy brown."



Number  1479
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He was just one of the guys, and [crew members] would run through a wall for him.””
“A source on the set of Gibson’s movie How I Spent My Summer Vacation, filmed in Mexico this spring, says Gibson “was not raging around.”
“Ari Emanuel, the head of WME, “personally hated the things Mel has said and done,” says an industry source.”
“His agency William Morris Endeavor announced on July 9 that it would no longer represent him, a few days after the death of his longtime personal agent Ed Limato.”
““The legality of the tapes will be fought over, and it could be argued that she deliberately pushed his buttons.”In the meantime Gibson’s vitriolic rants, on top of anti-Semitic remarks he made during his 2006 arrest for drunk driving, have turned some of Hollywood against him.”
“But “as inflammatory as this tape is, it’s not a slam dunk against Mel,” says former L.A. prosecutor Jeffery Rubenstein.”
“L.A. criminal defense attorney Trent Copeland calls the tapes “a smoking gun of domestic violence” that will create public pressure to charge Gibson, perhaps with battery and making threats.”
“(A Gibson source said the actor was restraining Grigorieva from shaking Lucia “like a rag doll”; Gibson also claims to have evidence Grigorieva was using tapes to try to extort money from him.)”
“Gibson may have to answer that in court: The L.A. County Sheriff’s Department announced it is investigating Grigorieva’s claims that he hit her in the face “more than once” this January, knocking out a dental veneer.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"He's just one of them, and [the crew] will go through the wall for him."
Gibson "didn't fly around," a source on the set of "how I spend my summer vacation," which Gibson shot in Mexico this spring, said
"ARI Emanuel, head of WME," personally hates Mel's words and deeds, "said one person in the industry
On July 9, his agent, William Morris endeavor, announced that he would no longer represent him, a few days after his longtime private agent, ed limato, died
"The legality of these tapes will be debated. It can be said that she deliberately pressed his button." At the same time, Gibson, who was arrested for drunk driving in 2006, made a sharp rant in addition to his anti Jewish remarks, which made some people in Hollywood resent him
"But," said Jeffrey Rubinstein, a former Los Angeles prosecutor, "although the video is provocative, it's not a dunk to Mel."
Trent Copeland, a Los Angeles criminal defense lawyer, called the videos "domestic violence cigarettes," which would create public pressure to charge Gibson, possibly with batteries and threats
"A Gibson source said the actor was restricting grigorieva from shaking Lucia" like a doll "; Gibson also claimed that there was evidence that grigorieva tried to extort money from him by using tapes."
"Gibson may have to answer this question in court: the Los Angeles County Police Department announced that they are investigating grigorieva's claim that grigorieva had hit her in the face" more than once "in January and had a tooth veneer removed."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  1480
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"There's a true admiration there and a large level of understanding on both sides, for sure," he told InStyle in January.”
“And Lambert may have recently hinted at the split on stage to her fans.”
“Before performing “Tin Man” during a concert in Knoxville in March, Lambert talked about how she channels heartbreak into her music, according to Knox News.”
“"I make it my mission every single time I step on the stage that no matter what, no matter where I am, I want to make you feel everything you could possibly feel.”
“I want you to feel sad, mad, happy and nostalgic and really pissed sometimes.”
“That's my favorite,” she said.”
““And part of feelings is also heartbreak unfortunately, but fortunately for me, I can use it for my art or whatever.”
“I like to write sad songs.”
“I like to listen to sad songs, so I want to sing y'all one.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"There is no doubt that both sides have a lot of admiration and understanding," he told InStyle in January
"Lambert may have hinted at a break-up to her fans on stage recently."
According to Knox news, before performing "Tin Man" at a concert in Knoxville in March, Lambert talked about how she integrated heartbreak into music
"Every time I step on the stage, I take it as my mission. No matter where I am, no matter where I am, I want you to feel everything you may feel."
"I want you to feel sad, crazy, happy and nostalgic, and sometimes really angry."
"That's my favorite," she said
"Unfortunately, some emotions are heartbreaking, but fortunately for me, I can use it for my art or anything."
"I like to write sad songs."
"I like to listen to sad songs, so I want to sing one of you."



Number  1481
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And be sure to check back here on Met Gala Monday for in-depth red carpet coverage.”
““But I knew I was doing something right when the hot moms came over to me at school and were like, ‘Where did you get that coat, sweetie?”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Katy Perry Is Happy to Be in Her 30s Having Learned Everything Doesn t Have to End in Marriage Image zoom With the Met Gala now less than three weeks away we know you re anxious to see the A list guests the over the top dresses and all the...”
“...super avant garde Comme des Garçons ensembles populating the much anticipated exhibit honoring the brand s designer Rei Kawakubo...”
“Well, Vogue‘s May issue is just the thing you need to hold you over until May 1.”
“This year’s co-chair, Katy Perry, graces the cover wearing Comme des Garçons’ architectural, artistic and yes, sometimes wacky runway looks throughout the entire spread.”
“Image zoom Credit: Mert Alas and Marcus Piggott/VogueStyled by the legendary Grace Coddington, Perry models pieces from Comme des Garçons’ runway collections spanning from 2005 to 2017 each more eye-catching than the next.”
“(Which has us imagining what she’ll wear for her big moment on May 1 – and wondering how she’ll possibly get up the grand staircase in these restricting designs.)”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Please be sure to come back here on Monday at the metropolitan event and learn more about the red carpet report."
"But I know what I did was right. At that time, the hot mothers in school came to me and asked me," where did you get your coat, honey? "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Katie Perry is very happy to be in her 30s, because she knows that everything doesn't have to be magnified by the image of marriage. Now it's less than three weeks before the metropolitan celebration. We know that you'd like to see A-class guests' super dress and all the..."
“… The ultra avant-garde combe des gasons ensemble is full of the long-awaited exhibition, honorary brand designer kawakupauli... "
"Well, Vogue's May Day is exactly what you need to drag you to May 1."
"This year's co chairman, Katy Perry, has added a lot of color to the cover of the exhibition area, dressed in the architectural style, artistic style and sometimes eccentric T-shape of the common des Gar à ons."
"Image zooming credit: Mert alas and Marcus Piggott / vogue are designed by the legendary grace Coddington, and Perry models the works of the common des Gar à ons runway series from 2005 to 2017, each of which is more eye-catching than the next one."
"(it makes us imagine what she's going to wear at the big moment on May 1st - and how she's going to climb the grand staircase in these restrictive designs.)
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  1482
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In other news, here’s an exclusive look at A$AP Rocky’s latest GUESS capsule.”
“Browse through our favorite pieces from the collection above and shop the full lineup below.”
“Just this year, the sisters have received heat for their Biggie and Tupac tees, Kylie was accused of stealing another brand's designs and of course, there was Kendall's infamous Pepsi ad.”
“One reason for the lack of promotion could be the backlash Kendall and Kylie have received in the past.”
“What's more, the collection is based on the Jenners' personal style and features pieces that seem at home in both their wardrobes — soft velvet bralettes, sheer bodysuits and satin shorts that are designed to be worn as standalone pieces.”
“The silence from the sisters is strange considering their Instagram pages are filled with updates about new lip kits, modeling contracts and clothing drops — there are even promotions for scientifically dubious items like fit tea and waist trainers.”
“The collection was unveiled with just a single Instagram post from Topshop and nothing from either of the Jenners.”
“A new Kendall and Kylie lingerie collection for Topshop dropped this week but looking at the sisters' social media you'd have no idea.”


"In other news, here's an exclusive introduction to $AP Rocky's latest guess capsule."
"Browse through our favorite works in the above series and buy the full set of products below."
"Just this year, the biggie and Tupac T-shirts of the two sisters were popular. Kelly was accused of stealing the design of another brand and, of course, Kendall's infamous Pepsi Advertisement."
"One reason for not being promoted may be the strong opposition Kendall and Kelly had in the past."
"More importantly, the collection is based on the personal style of Mr. and Mrs. Jenner. In their two wardrobes, there are some clothes that look like home - soft velvet bras, transparent tights and satin shorts, which are designed as independent pieces."
"The silence between the sisters is strange because their Instagram pages are full of updates on new lipsticks, model contracts and clothes, and even some promotional activities, such as fitness tea and waist trainers."
"Only Topshop has posted a post on instagram, and none of the Jenners have."
"This week Topshop launched a new Kendall and Kelly underwear line, but look at the sisters' social media, you may not know."



Number  1483
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s not about that.”Watch her latest explanation of “Swish Swish” on The Tonight Show above.”
“You have to follow your [heart emoji],” Rose wrote in a series of tweets.”
“Perry was even asked by Jimmy Fallon on The Tonight Show Friday whether this song, off her upcoming Witness album, was about “anyone we know.” While the pop diva remained cryptic, she explained the meaning of “Swish Swish” is “liberation” from bullies.”
““I think it’s a great anthem for people to use whenever someone’s trying to hold you down or bully you,” she said.”
“That s kind of what this record is about it s just like a 360 degree liberation If Chained to the Rhythm was about political liberation and Bon Appétit was a sexual liberation then Perry calls Swish Swish the liberation from all the negative that doesn t serve you Perry...”
“...directed her fans to the segment on social media Saturday morning...”
““Here’s some of the tea and a biscuit,” she tweeted.”
“Since “Swish Swish” dropped on Thursday, listeners, including Swift pal Ruby Rose, pointed to the lyrics as a diss track.”
““I’ve always stood up for the people I love and against things I think are cheap or mean spirited.”
“That’s not new.”


"That's not the problem." Take a look at her latest explanation of "whoosh" on the tonight show
"You have to follow your [inner expression]," Rose wrote in a series of microblogs
On Friday's "Tonight Show," Jimmy Fallon even asked Perry if the song from her upcoming witness album was about "anyone we know.". Although the pop diva is still mysterious, she explains that "whoosh" means "free from the bully."
"I think it's a great ode that people can use whenever someone tries to suppress you or bully you," she said
"This is the content of this record. It's like a 360 degree liberation. If rhythm is about political liberation and Bon app é tit is about personality liberation, then Perry calls it swish swish, liberated from all the negatives that don't serve you, Perry..."
"On Saturday morning, she brought her fans to social media..."
"It's some tea and biscuits," she said on Weibo
Since "swish swish" aired on Thursday, audiences, including Swift's friend Ruby Rose, have seen lyrics as diss tracks
"I've always supported the people I love and opposed what I thought was cheap or mean."
"It's not new."



Number  1484
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It can become very difficult for anyone to tell the difference between facts that are true and facts that are not For months the Eurosceptic press trumpeted every dubious claim and rubbished every expert warning filling the front pages with too many confected anti migrant headlines to count many of...”
“He also compared 10 Nobel prize-winning economists who signed an anti-Brexit letter to Nazi scientists loyal to Hitler.”
“Oakeshott went even further to absolve herself of any journalistic responsibility: “It’s up to other people to decide whether they give it any credibility or not,” she concluded.”
“...a dead pig a story reported in dozens of newspapers and repeated in millions of tweets and Facebook updates which many people presumably still believe to be true today...”
“So we merely reported the account that the source gave us We don t say whether we believe it to be true In other words there was no evidence that the prime minister of the United Kingdom had once inserted a private part of his anatomy into the mouth of...”
““We couldn’t get to the bottom of that source’s allegations,” she said on Channel 4 News.”
“Pressed to provide evidence for the sensational claim, Oakeshott admitted she had none.”
“Isabel Oakeshott, the Daily Mail journalist who had co-written the biography with Lord Ashcroft, a billionaire businessman, went on TV and admitted that she did not know whether her huge, scandalous scoop was even true.”
“Then, after a full day of online merriment, something shocking happened.”
“He could take it.”


"It's hard for anyone to distinguish the true facts from the untrue ones. For several months, the Euroskeptic press has vigorously publicized every suspicious statement and attacked every expert's warning. There are too many fabricated anti immigration headlines on the front page, which is hard to count..."
"He also compared 10 Nobel Laureates in economics who signed the anti brexit letter with Nazi scientists loyal to Hitler."
Oakeshott even went a step further by exempting herself from any journalistic responsibility: "it's up to others to decide whether they give it any credibility," she concluded
“… The story of a dead pig has been reported in dozens of newspapers and repeated in millions of Twitter and Facebook updates. Many people today probably still believe it's true... "
"Therefore, we only reported what the source said to us, we don't say whether we believe it is true, in other words, there is no evidence that the British prime minister once inserted part of his private organs "In my mouth."
"We can't figure out the source's accusations," she said on Channel 4 news
Oakeshott was asked to provide evidence for this sensational statement, and she admitted that she had no evidence
Daily Mail reporter Isabel Oakeshott, who co wrote the biography with billionaire Lord Ashcroft, admitted on television that she didn't know whether her exclusive account of the massive scandal was true
"Then, after a whole day of online fun, a shocking thing happened."
"He can take it."



Number  1485
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...well...”
“Since the storm tore through the Texas coast and forced thousands of people to evacuate their homes we ve witnessed a non stop outpouring of support from celebs like Drake Sandra Bullock Kevin Hart and Zendaya who have all made sizable donations and rallied for others to make contributions as...”
“It absolutely warms our hearts to see celebrities continue to step up and show compassion to the victims of Hurricane Harvey during following has to be one of the most traumatic experiences ever, and what will surely be a very long and arduous recovery process.”
“Way to go, Pink!”
“Thank you @Pink for your generous donation to our #HurricaneHarvey relief efforts."”
“"We're partial to red, but pink is great, too.”
“The organization also posted a video of its staff members thanking Pink for her generous gesture.”
“...the organization tweeted.”
“"Thank you @Pink from the bottom of our ❤️ for your donation of a half million dollars to @RedCross #HurricaneHarvey relief efforts!"”
“...made landfall on August 25”


“… Well
"Since the storm swept the coast of Texas and forced thousands of people to leave their homes, we've seen a steady stream of support from celebrities like Drake Sandra Bullock, Kevin Hart and cendaya, who have made huge donations and united to contribute to others..."
"It's absolutely warm to see celebrities continue to come forward and show sympathy for the victims of Hurricane Harvey in the next period of time. It's going to be one of the most painful experiences in history. It's definitely a very long and difficult recovery process."
"Well done, pink!"
"Thank you @ pink for donating generously to our rescue work in hurricane Harvey."
"We prefer red, but pink is also great."
"The group has also released a video in which the staff thank pink for her generous gesture."
“…… The organization tweeted. "
"Thank you @ pink from our bottom ❤ Thank you for donating US $500000 to Red Cross Hurricane Harvey
"Landing on August 25"



Number  1486
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thank you, Ellen [DeGeneres], I couldn't love you more.”
“This is a really special night.”
“And she said, 'Well, I look like a boy.'”
“But then I said, you know, I really want to know why you feel this way about yourself.”
“And these are artists like Michael Jackson and David Bowie and Freddie Mercury and Annie Lenox and Prince and Janis Joplin and George Michael, Elton John — so many artists, her eyes glazed over.”
“And in that presentation were androgynous rock stars and artists that live their truth, [who] are probably made fun of every day of their life, and carry on and wave their flag and inspire the rest of us.”
“But I didn't say anything and instead, I went home and made a PowerPoint presentation for her.”
“Like, what?”
“Can I kick a six-year-old's ass?”
“Who said this?”


"Thank you, Ellen. I can't love you more."
"It's a special night."
"She said," well, I look like a boy. "
"But then I said, you know, I really want to know why you feel this way about yourself."
"These are artists like Michael Jackson, David Bowie, Freddie Mercury, Annie Lennox, Prince, Janice Joplin, George Michael, Elton John - so many artists, her eyes are dull."
"In that speech, there were androgynous rock stars and artists who lived their real lives, who might be teased every day, who continued to wave their flags and inspire the rest of us."
"But I didn't say anything. I went home and gave her a PowerPoint presentation."
"For example, what?"
"Can I kick a six-year-old in the ass?"
"Who said that?"



Number  1487
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Amber's book on 'hardship, hope and addiction' was written while she was serving a five-year jail sentence in 2012 at Indiana's Rockville Correctional Facility.”
“...coped with her harsh circumstances to become a better person...”
“Amber Portwood showed off her impressive weight loss journey via Twitter on Monday, just in time before the sixth season debuts of Teen Mom OG.”
“The 25 year old star captioned the proud portrait 36 lbs down and 15 more to go almost at my goal Scroll down for video After Amber Portwood took to Twitter on Monday to show off her 36 pound weight loss just in time before the sixth season of the...”
“Teen Mom reboot Teen Mom OG Amber ditched her glasses to flaunt her glowing complexion wearing a barely there makeup look consisting off foundation blush brow pencil and mascara...”
“She tied up her dark brunette tresses in a tousled bun to display her defined cheekbones as well as double pierced ears featuring diamond encrusted hoops and studs.”
“The mother of one, to six-year-old Leah Shirley, opted for a white long sleeve for her up-close portrait, drawing major attention to her crystal blue eyes.”
“Before: The mother of one, seen here in April at the 2015 MTV Movie Awards, still says she is 15 pounds away from her goal weightShortly after releasing a photo showcasing her shocking transformation, the reality star received a lot of positive attention and questions about her lifestyle swaps.”
“The author commented to her 261k Twitter followers that her drastically changing look has certainly not been an overnight process.”
“She dished that though it did take some time, there's wiggle room: 'It took about 4 months...but I fell off for a couple weeks.'”


"Amber wrote this book about 'hardship, hope and addiction' when she was serving five years in lockville prison, Indiana, in 2012."
“… In order to be a better person and put up with her harsh environment... "
Amber porterwood tweeted her impressive weight loss story on Monday, just in time for the premiere of the sixth season of teen mom
"The 25-year-old star tweeted a picture of her losing 36 pounds before the sixth season on Monday, and showed this proud portrait in the video. The 36 pound weight lost 15 pounds, almost reaching my goal..."
"The teenage mother redirected the girl Angell to take off her glasses, show off her bright complexion, and wear a make-up that has almost no makeup, which is lined with pink eyebrow pencil and mascara."
"She tied her dark brown hair into a messy bun, revealing her well-defined cheekbones and her ears with diamond earrings and studs."
"A child's mother, six-year-old Leah Shirley, chose a long white sleeve as her close portrait, which attracted great attention to her crystal blue eyes."
"Before: the mother of a child who appeared at the 2015 MTV Movie Awards in April still said she was 15 pounds away from her target. Shortly after the release of a photo showing her amazing transformation, the reality TV star received a lot of positive attention and questions about her lifestyle transformation. "
"The author commented to her 261k twitter fans that her dramatic appearance is definitely not a one-time process."
"She said that although it did take a while, there was still room for maneuver:" it took about four months But I fell for a few weeks. "



Number  1488
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on ABC.”
“You simply need to watch when the BBMAs air Sunday night at 8 p m on ABC The 2017 Billboard Music Awards are about upon us What s more with every day an ever increasing number of promising acts are being reported to show up at the occasion from Cher...”
“Why not do it at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards?Billboard Music Awards 2017 As the fervor keeps on developing for the yearly honor appear, E!”
“News has found an energizing pattern during the current year’s broadcast.”
“For so a number of our most loved craftsmen they will encounter a major first Sunday night in Las Vegas Under two weeks in the wake of appearing her new single Malibu Miley Cyrus will go to the T Mobile Arena to play out the hit tune for the first...”
“...run through on TV”
“We are excited to have her introduction Malibu at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards and anticipate a crude and legit execution that will probably shock numerous official maker Mark Bracco said in a statement Speaking of exhibitions John Legend and Florida Georgia Line will perform interestingly at the Billboard Music...”
“Awards together...”
“Points of interest stay tight lip with reference to what this unforeseen cooperation will bring While Ludacris is coming back to have for the fourth year previous High School Musical star Vanessa Hudgens will have her initially encounter co facilitating the live broadcast airing on ABC I m so fantastically...”
“...eager to have the year with she shared on Instagram after the news was made authority...”


"Et on ABC."
"All you need to do is watch bbmas' Billboard Music Awards 2017, which is broadcast on ABC at 8 p.m. on Sunday. More importantly, it is reported that more and more promising actors appear on this occasion every day..."
"Why not do it at the Billboard Music Awards 2017? With the continuous development of the annual honor, the Billboard Music Award 2017 appears, e! "
"News has found an exciting pattern in this year's broadcast."
"For our favorite craftsmen, in two weeks, they will meet an important first Sunday night in Las Vegas. After her new single Malibu Miley Cyrus, they will go to T Mobile arena to play the first popular song..."
“… "Play it on TV"
"We are very happy to see her introduction to Malibu at the Billboard Music Awards in 2017, and look forward to a rough and legal performance, which may shock many official producers, mark Bracco, in a statement that John Legend and Florida Georgia line will have interesting performances at the Billboard Music Festival..."
"Win awards together..."
"When Ludacris comes back in his fourth year, he talks with his lips closed about what this unexpected cooperation will bring. Vanessa Huggins, the last high school musical star, will meet her for the first time and jointly promote the live broadcast of ABC. It's incredible for me... "
“… Eager to share this year's news with her, she was authorized on instagram... "



Number  1489
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'And I always had this idea that I was going to be married by this age, kids, and this was going to be my plan … and now, I mean I’m almost 29 but I don’t really have a timestamp on anything anymore, which is nice.'”
“'I’ve always been someone who maybe jumps into things a little too quickly and I fall really fast,' she told UsWeekly on August 6.”
“The 28-year-old reality star began dating Devin in July of 2017, two months after ending her relationship with fiance Ben Higgins, whom she met on season 20 of The Bachelor.”
“Lauren and Devin met on Tinder and struck up a friendship before she competed on the ABC reality dating game show.”
“Splits The Bachelor s Lauren Bushnell split with beau Devin Antin after a year of dating pictured March I don t think I ve shared before but I only met up with one person from the app and it was him the beauty wrote during an Instagram Q A with...”
“...fans in October 2017”
“'We hung out for a while but more as friends but always got along really well.”
“'Fast forward two years later when I moved back to L.A. we hung out to catch up and things just kinda happened after that.'”
“...she explained.”
“The former flight attendant also said that her last relationship with Higgins made her more aware of walking down the aisle.”


"I've always had the idea that I'm going to get married at this age, children, it's going to be my plan Now, I mean, I'm almost 29 years old, but I don't have a timestamp for anything anymore, which is good. "
"I've always been like this," she said in an interview with us weekly on August 6. "I may jump a little too fast. I fall fast."
"The 28 year old reality star started dating Devon in July 2017 and ended her relationship with fiance Ben Higgins two months ago, whom she met in season 20 of bachelor."
"Lauren and Devon got to know each other on tinder and formed a friendship before she took part in the ABC reality dating game show."
"I don't think I've shared the March photo taken by Lauren Bushnell and beau Devon Antin one year after their breakup, but I only met one person in the app. The beauty wrote in instagram Q & A that it was him..."
"Fans in October 2017"
"We've been dating for a while, but more as friends, but we always get along well."
"Two years later, when I moved back to Los Angeles, we got together to catch up, and then it happened."
“…… She explained
"The former stewardess also said that her last relationship with Higgins made her more aware that she was on the aisle."



Number  1490
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  1491
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When she was lip syncing to Beyoncé and her dogs weren’t having it...”
“She was unceremoniously fired from the show at the season’s end, and has called the experience “embarrassing, devastating, humiliating, a bummer of a mistake.” Years later, she’s finally come out on top.”
“And when she got over their breakup by watching You’ve Got Mail on repeat:(Image: Obvious Child)Slate said she wept through You’ve Got Mail “so many times it was unbelievable” during her breakup with Evans.”
“I mean, I understand why I think I’m beautiful, but if you’ve had a certain lifestyle and I’m a very, very different type of person — I don’t want to be an experiment.”3.”
“She has admitted that originally, she didn’t think she was Captain America’s type: “Eventually, when it was like, Oh, you have these feelings for me?, I was looking around like, Is this a prank?”
“When she thought it was a prank that Chris Evans was into her:(Image: Comedy Central)Slate famously dated Hollywood heartthrob Chris Evans after the two filmed the movie Gifted together.”
“2.”
“She is the underdog we all see in ourselves.”
“Slate famously cursed on her very first appearance on SNL.”
“Everybody knows nothing heals a broken heart like sobbing it out to your favorite romcoms and screaming “You Oughta Know” at the top of your lungs.”


"When she and Beyonce lip synch, her dog doesn't like it..."
She was rudely fired at the end of the season, calling the experience "embarrassing, devastating, humiliating, a victim of mistakes." A few years later, she finally stood out
"When she ended their breakup by watching a replay of you have mail: (picture: obvious child) Slater said it was incredible that she cried many times in you have mail when she broke up with Evans."
"I mean, I understand why I feel beautiful, but if you have a lifestyle and I'm a very, very different type of person - I don't want to be an experiment."
At first, she admitted, she didn't think of herself as Captain America's type: "in the end, when it's like, oh, do you have these feelings for me? I looked around. Is this a prank? "
"When she thinks it's a prank, Chris Evans is her: (photo: Comedy Center) Slater's famous date with Hollywood heartthrob Chris Evans, the two filmed a movie and gave it away together."
“2.”
"She's the weak in the eyes of all of us."
"Slater was cursed the first time he appeared on SNL."
"Everyone knows that there's nothing like sobbing and screaming" you should know "at your favorite series to heal a broken heart."



Number  1492
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I feel like it’s better there.”VARIETY VIDEO:”
“You’re saying these things to get this type of emotion or just get an answer for something else.”
“That’s where you can see a bit of like, OK, you’re asking these questions.”
““And I feel like he even speaks it clearer and messages it clearer and better through the music.”
““He’s speaking on a lot on this album,” he said.”
“Pusha also said that West’s own album, which is due next week, may clarify some of the rapper’s recent controversial comments about Donald Trump and other matters, although he is somewhat vague on how that clarification takes place.”
“The image has been altered slightly from its original rendition, which appeared on the cover of the National Enquirer: a beer can has been removed, presumably for copyright reasons.”
““This is what people need to see to go along with this music,” Pusha quoted West as saying.”
“Picked the picture, great, we look, boom, boom, boom, it’s good.”Pusha said that West paid for the artwork out of his own pocket.”
“He picked the photographer, I took these pictures, I was like, ‘Yo, these are fresh.’ I picked all of these pictures out, he had a little edit to it, how he wanted the actual grading of the picture to look.”


"I think it's better there." Variety Video:
"You're saying these things to get this emotion, or just to get answers to other things."
"You can see a little bit there, well, you're asking these questions."
"I think he speaks more clearly and conveys better and better information even through music."
"He said a lot on this album," he said
"Pusa also said that West's own album, which will be released next week, may clarify some of the rapper's recent controversial comments on Donald Trump and other issues, but he is somewhat vague about how this clarification was carried out."
"This picture is slightly different from the original on the cover of the national inquirer: a beer can has been removed, possibly for copyright reasons."
"This is what people need to see to play with this music," Pusa quoted West as saying
"It's great to choose this painting. Let's see. Bang, bang, bang, good." Pusa said that West bought the painting out of his own pocket. "
"He chose a photographer, and I took these pictures, and I said," Oh, these are all fresh. " I picked out all the photos, and he did a little editing on them, and he wanted to see what the actual level of the photos looked like. "



Number  1493
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Kelsey Stiegman Senior Style Editor Kelsey is Seventeen.com's fashion expert and resident Harry Potter nerd.”
“Follow her on Instagram!”
“Kelsey is the assistant style editor at Seventeen.com.”
“Just sayin'.”
“SplashI don't know about you, but I definitely wouldn't wear a sweat-soaked jersey for anyone I wasn't making out with on the regs.”
“SplashIf you needed more evidence that these two are totally back on, they drove off together to reportedly head back to Selena's place.”
“SplashWhen Selena left, the "Fetish" singer had shed her denim shell for Justin's number eight jersey.”
“SplashSelena arrived to the L.A. rink last night wearing all black under a denim jacket, then watched from the stands while her not-so-ex ex-boyfriend skated around the ice rink like the Canadian that he is.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
Kelsey stigman senior style editor Kelsey is a fashion expert of 17.com and a bookworm resident in Harry Potter
"Follow her on instagram!"
Kelsey is assistant editor of fashion magazine
"That's it."
"I don't know about you, but I'll never wear a sweaty shirt for someone I don't make out with at Reggie."
"If you need more evidence to prove that these two people have completely started over, they drove together to Serena's house."
"When Selena left, the" fetishist "singer took off her jeans for Justin's No. 8 shirt."
"Serena came to the Los Angeles rink in a denim jacket and all black last night and stood in the stands to watch, while her ex boyfriend didn't skate on the rink like a Canadian."



Number  1494
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple are yet to share a photo of the newborn.”
“His second son, Jagger, was born on October 9.”
“But on Tuesday, wife Mackenzie Edwards shared the first photo of Teen Mom OG star Ryan Edwards following treatment, feeding their nearly two-month-old son, Jagger.”
“The 30-year-old was seen sitting on the couch while giving the unseen baby a bottle while fans asked the beauty a series of questions about her home life now that her man has returned.”
“Scroll down for video Dotting father Teen Mom OG star Ryan Edwards has been seen for the first time with his two month old son Jagger after he missed the birth due to his rehab stint Taking to Instagram Stories one follower wrote How s life now that Ryan s...”
“...home with the kids and new baby...”
“Mackenzie replied: 'He's the biggest help.”
“I love this man,' and added two black love hearts.”
“She also confirmed to her 327,000 followers that they were '100% completely married and together'.”
“Helping out now he's home: 'He's the biggest help.”


"The couple haven't shared a picture of the newborn yet."
"His second son, Jagger, was born on October 9."
But on Tuesday, wife Mackenzie Edwards shared the first picture of young mom og star Ryan Edwards after treatment, feeding their nearly two month old son Jagger
"The 30-year-old girl was seen sitting on the sofa giving her invisible baby a bottle, while fans asked the beauty a series of questions about her family life because her man had come back."
"Rolling down VOD father and teenage mother og star Ryan Edwards is with his two month old son Jagger for the first time because he missed the birth of his child during rehabilitation treatment. One follower wrote, "what's Ryan's life like now..."
“… Take the baby and the new baby home... "
McKenzie replied, "he's the biggest help."
"I love this man," he added two more black hearts
"She also confirmed to 327000 followers that they were" 100% married and together. "
"Now he's helping at home:" he's the biggest helper. "



Number  1495
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO Prince Harry in Afghanistan: William is jealous of me...”
“'Yes you get shot at, but if the guys who are doing the same job as us are being shot at on the ground, I don't think there's anything wrong with us being shot at as well.”
“'It's operational flying back home.”
“'Before coming out here I was very jealous of my brother,' he said.”
“Prince Harry revealed there is envy on both sides.”
“Daring job: Harry's Apache helicopter work in the Afghan desert is envied by his older brother WilliamBased at RAF Valley on Anglesey in North Wales, he commands missions to help stranded climbers and stricken vessels in the area.”
“William, 30, the future Commander-in-Chief of the Armed Forces, is an RAF Flight Lieutenant and works as a Search and Rescue Force pilot on Sea King helicopters.”
“The guys out there are, simple as that.'”
“'People back home will have issues with that, but we're not special.”
“Just the same as us - no-one knows who's in the cockpit.”


"Video Prince Harry in Afghanistan: William envies me..."
"Yes, you will be shot, but if people who do the same work as us are shot on the ground, I don't think there's anything wrong with us being shot too."
"It's possible to fly home."
"Before I came out, I was jealous of my brother," he said
"Prince Harry revealed that both sides were jealous."
"Bold work: Harry's Apache helicopter's work in the Afghan desert is the envy of his brother Willie. He's in the RAF Valley in Anglesey, North Wales, directing missions to help stranded climbers and ships in the area
"William, 30, the future commander-in-chief of the armed forces, is a flying lieutenant of the Royal Air Force and a search and rescue force pilot on the sea king helicopter."
"People outside, it's that simple."
"People in China will have opinions on this, but we are not special."
"Just like us - no one knows who's in the cockpit."



Number  1496
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“People's Choice Awards nominations below and vote up the musicians you think have the best chance of topping their category.”
“If you can't get enough of voting, go ahead and check out the 45th E!”
“That'll be up to you fans to decide.”
“Will BTS take the Group of 2019 award?”
“Could Shawn Mendes take the Male Artist of 2019?”
“People's Choice Awards 2019 nominees for music, though, who do you think will get the most votes?”
“Of all the E!”
“We're talking the ultimate hit-song generator Drake, female rap powerhouse Cardi B, Mr. Nice Guy Ed Sheeran, and the sweet Taylor Swift, among so many other great artists.”
“People's Choice Awards include a range of top stars.”
“From the top songs and albums of the year to the best male and female artists, each music category for the E!”


"People's Choice Awards will be selected from the nominations below to select the musicians you think are most likely to surpass their category."
"If you don't get enough votes, go to the 45th e!"
"It's up to your fans."
"Will BTS win the group award in 2019?"
"Can Sean Mendes win the male artist of 2019?"
"People's Choice Award 2019 music nominees, but who do you think will get the most votes?"
"Of all the people!"
"We're talking about Drake, the ultimate hit producer, Katie B, the great rapper, ed Sheeran, Taylor Swift, and many other great artists."
"People's choice awards include a series of top stars."
"From songs and albums of the year to best male and female artists, every music category is e!"



Number  1497
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“References [ edit ]Citations [ edit ]Sources [ edit ]”
“The impact of the vibrant Twilight fandom and its lasting legacy is explored in a book by Laurena Aker: Fan Phenomena: The Twilight Saga.”
“Both articles discuss the fandom's growing influence as its population of followers grew over time.”
“The fandom was publicly recognized by major news publications in 2010, by the Los Angeles Times, and in 2014, by The Wire, a publication owned by the Atlantic Monthly Group.”
“This upset existing male fans of older genres who protested at this intrusion, "Twilight Ruined Comic-Con".”
“At Comic-Con in 2008, large numbers of female Twilight fans came to see the panel of actors from the Twilight movies.”
“There has been conflict between the fans of Twilight and the fans of other series.”
“Some fans are known as Twerds which is a portmanteau of the words "Twilight" and "nerd".”
“The fans are known as Twilighters or Fanpires while the especially dedicated fans are called Twihards and the mature women are Twi-Moms.”
“Twilight fandom is the community of fans of the Twilight series of novels, movies and other related media.”


"Reference [editor] citation [editor] source [editor]"
"The influence of the energetic Twilight fans and their lasting legacy are explored in a book by laurenna Aker: the fan phenomenon: the twilight saga."
"Both articles discuss that as the number of fans grows, the influence of the fan community is expanding."
"Both the Los Angeles Times in 2010 and the Atlantic Monthly group's wired in 2014 publicly acknowledged this fan base."
"It's unsettling to the existing male fans of the old type, who protest against the invasion and the destruction of the cartoon by twilight."
"At the 2008 comics conference, a large number of Twilight female fans came to watch the cast of the film."
"There was a conflict between Twilight fans and fans of other series."
Some fans are called tweeds, a combination of "Twilight" and "nerd."
"Fans are known as" Twilight city "or" fans ", while dedicated fans are known as" twihards ", and mature women are known as" mother Twi. "
Twilight fans are fans of Twilight novels, movies and other related media



Number  1498
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ehrenreich in ‘Solo’ (Disney/Lucasfilm)He went back to the original movies to watch Ford, but didn’t set out to imitate him or copy a signature move, whether it’s cocking his head or giving a wry smile.”
“Ehrenreich captures Solo’s gruff charms and misplaced confidence in embryonic form.”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”
“Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors...”
“A Los Angeles native, he’s already been to Cannes before with his debut, Francis Ford Coppola’s 2009 road movie Tetro (they reunited for the horror Twixt two years later).”
“I don’t have control over how well it turns out, how good the movie is, what anybody thinks or what anybody I’m working with thinks.”Certainly the 28-year-old Ehrenreich is no beginner.”
“I have control over my job, and my part and how much work I do on it.”
““What do I have control over?”
“This is intense but I have a certain set of tools at this point as far as coping.”
““For me, starting out and having less experience was more intense.”


"In solo (Disney / Lucas), Ellen Ritchie went back to see Ford in the original film, but he didn't intend to imitate him or a sign action, whether it was a tilt of the head or a wry smile."
"Ellen Reich captured the rudiment of solo's rugged charm and misplaced confidence."
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here independent culture newsletters best movie music TV broadcast will be sent directly to your in box every week..."
"The best movie music TV broadcast of independent cultural communication is sent directly to your mailbox every week. Please enter your email address. Please enter a valid email address. Please enter a valid email address to register. Thank you for registering with verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors..."
As a native of Los Angeles, he has been to Cannes before, and his debut is the road movie Tetro made by Francis Ford Coppola in 2009 (they met again two years later because of the horror film)
"I can't control how it turns out, how good the movie is, what anyone thinks or who I work with." Of course, Ehrenreich, 28, is not a beginner
"I can control my job, my role and how much work I do in it."
"What can I control?"
"It's intense, but I have a set of tools at this point to deal with."
"For me, less experience makes me more nervous at first."



Number  1499
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It's the actual real thing to scale”Getty Actress Tiffany Haddish, dressed in Brandon Maxwell, told AJ she's ready for the after-parties, saying, “Yeah, who getting me pregnant tonight?””
“Dressed in a Balmain gown, Jennifer revealed, “Olivier (Rousteing) just designed it.”
“This year's theme, "Heavenly Bodies: Fashion and the Catholic Imagination" brought out an array of jaw-dropping fashion moments.”
“Madonna, who arrived wearing a veil in a Catholic queen themed ensemble, told AJ, “We've been planning for a month, maybe more.”
“I'm a planner.”
“First, I thought I should just come in on a cross, carried on a cross.”George Clooney, who served as co-chair of the event with his wife Amal, just celebrated a birthday yesterday.”
“AJ asked him if he had a chance to party.”
“George revealed, “I went out to dinner and then all the women wanted to call it a night at 9 o'clock because of today!”Getty Jennifer Lopez hit the carpet with boyfriend Alex Rodriguez.”
“He sketched it and sent it to me and we had two choices and this is so amazing.”
“I was in the van on my way from the hotel here being sewn up into this dress!”Getty Sarah Jessica Parker arrived with her date Andy Cohen wearing a nativity scene headpiece and told AJ, “It's a Neapolitan nativity altar, for real.”


Gaerty actress Tiffany hadish in Brandon Maxwell told AJ she was ready for the party and she said, "Yeah, who made me pregnant tonight?"
Jennifer revealed that she was wearing a balman dress, "Oliver (rostan) just designed it."
This year's theme "celestial bodies: fashion and Catholic imagination" brings a series of stunning fashion moments
Madonna, wearing a veil, comes to a Catholic queen themed ensemble and tells AJ, "we've been planning for a month, maybe more."
"I'm a planner."
"First of all, I think I should come in on a cross and carry it." George Clooney, CO chair of the event with his wife Amar, just celebrated a birthday yesterday
"AJ asked if he had a chance to go to the party."
George revealed: "I go out to dinner, and then all the women want to finish the night at 9 o'clock, because today! "Gatty Jennifer Lopez and her boyfriend Alex Rodriguez hit the carpet."
"He drew a sketch and sent it to me. We have two choices. It's amazing."
"I was sewn into the van of this dress on the way from the hotel! Getty Sarah Jessica Parker came here with her date, Andy Cohen, wearing a Christmas scene headdress and telling AJ, "this is a Christmas altar in Naples, really."



Number  1500
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.262406015037594
Correct number is  349
Total number is  1330
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
